BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some students who
have recently graduated from high school must immediately enroll in one
or more remedial or precollege classes at Washington's public colleges
and universities before they can proceed successfully through college.
The legislature also finds that these students should have received
basic skills in English, reading, spelling, grammar, study skills, and
mathematics before graduating from high school. It is further the
intent of the legislature that the school districts from which these
students received their high school diplomas either provide remedial
education for recent high school graduates or pay the cost of providing
state-supported remedial classes for those students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By June 1st of each year, each state
university, regional university, state college, and the state board for
community and technical colleges shall provide a report to the office
of the superintendent of public instruction. The report shall contain
the following information: (a) The number of students who, within
three years of high school graduation, enrolled at the institution of
higher education or at a community college or technical college in a
state-supported precollege level class or laboratory in study skills,
mathematics including intermediate algebra, reading, grammar, spelling,
writing, or English; (b) the types of precollege classes in which each
student is enrolled; and (c) the Washington high school from which each
student graduated.
(2) Each institution of higher education shall report the
information required in subsection (1) of this section to the
Washington school district from which each student graduated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By June 30th of each even-numbered year,
the state board for community and technical colleges shall establish
and report to the superintendent of public instruction an average per-student instructional cost for state-supported developmental and
precollege classes and laboratories offered in the community and
technical colleges. The classes shall include, but need not be limited
to precollege classes in study skills, mathematics including
intermediate algebra, grammar, reading, spelling, writing, and English.
English as a second language classes shall not be included.
(2) By June 30th of each even-numbered year, each of the state
universities, regional universities, and the state college shall report
to the office of the superintendent of public instruction with the
average per-student instructional cost for state-supported precollege
classes offered by that institution in study skills, mathematics
including intermediate algebra, English, writing, spelling, grammar,
and reading. English as a second language classes shall not be
included.
(3) "State-supported" means that the precollege class or laboratory
is supported in whole or in part by money from the state general fund
or student operating fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Beginning with the fall 2012 academic term,
a charge shall be assessed to each Washington school district that,
within the three years preceding the report required in section 2 of
this act, graduated a student attending any state-supported precollege
class or laboratory in study skills, English, reading, spelling,
grammar, or mathematics including intermediate algebra offered at a
Washington institution of higher education. Beginning with the 2015
fiscal year, the superintendent of public instruction shall subtract
from the allotment of each such school district an amount equal to the
average per-student instructional cost of each state-supported
precollege class attended during the preceding fiscal year by each
student who graduated from that school district during the preceding
three years and who subsequently enrolled in a state-supported
precollege class at an institution of higher education. As used in
this section, "state-supported" means that the class is supported in
whole or in part with either state general fund money or with student
operating fees. Funding shall first be reduced from nonbasic education
funds, unless otherwise requested by the affected school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Once an institution of higher education
has determined that a student who has graduated within the preceding
three years needs to improve his or her competency in material that is
determined by the institution of higher education to be precollege
material, the institution shall notify the Washington school district
that granted to the student a high school diploma.
(2) The school district may either provide the needed instruction
in a timely manner, or the district may pay the charges assessed in
section 4 of this act. If the school district provides the
instruction, it shall not charge tuition to the student. If the
institution of higher education that the student attends is located
more than thirty miles from the school district that granted the
student's high school diploma, the student shall be permitted to
receive the instruction from either the institution of higher education
or from another provider, including a local school district, that is
approved by the institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall reimburse
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 that,
pursuant to section 4 of this act, provide instruction in precollege
material.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of each of the colleges and universities shall waive tuition fees for
precollege classes taken by any student who has graduated from a high
school in the state of Washington within three years immediately
preceding the student's enrollment in those precollege classes.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.225.220 and 1995 c 335 s 602 and 1995 c 52 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any board of directors may make agreements with adults choosing
to attend school, and with the exception of students attending under
section 5 of this act, may charge the adults reasonable tuition.
(2) A district is strongly encouraged to honor the request of a
parent or guardian for his or her child to attend a school in another
district or the request of a parent or guardian for his or her child to
transfer as a student receiving home-based instruction.
(3) A district shall release a student to a nonresident district
that agrees to accept the student if:
(a) A financial, educational, safety, or health condition affecting
the student would likely be reasonably improved as a result of the
transfer; or
(b) Attendance at the school in the nonresident district is more
accessible to the parent's place of work or to the location of child
care; or
(c) There is a special hardship or detrimental condition.
(4) A district may deny the request of a resident student to
transfer to a nonresident district if the release of the student would
adversely affect the district's existing desegregation plan.
(5) For the purpose of helping a district assess the quality of its
education program, a resident school district may request an optional
exit interview or questionnaire with the parents or guardians of a
child transferring to another district. No parent or guardian may be
forced to attend such an interview or complete the questionnaire.
(6) Beginning with the 1993-94 school year, school districts may
not charge transfer fees or tuition for nonresident students enrolled
under subsection (3) of this section and RCW 28A.225.225.
Reimbursement of a high school district for cost of educating high
school pupils of a nonhigh school district shall not be deemed a
transfer fee as affecting the apportionment of current state school
funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 28B.10 RCW.

--- END ---