BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.45.100 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 211 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Payment of the tax imposed under this chapter is due and
payable immediately at the time of sale, and if not paid within one
month thereafter will bear interest from the time of sale until the
date of payment.
(a) Interest imposed before January 1, 1999, is computed at the
rate of one percent per month.
(b) Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, is computed on a
monthly basis at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate
so computed must be adjusted on the first day of January of each year
for use in computing interest for that calendar year. The department
must provide written notification to the county treasurers of the
variable rate on or before December 1st of the year preceding the
calendar year in which the rate applies.
(2) In addition to the interest described in subsection (1) of this
section, if the payment of any tax is not received by the county
treasurer or the department of revenue, as the case may be, within one
month of the date due, there is assessed a penalty of five percent of
the amount of the tax; if the tax is not received within two months of
the date due, there will be assessed a total penalty of ten percent of
the amount of the tax; and if the tax is not received within three
months of the date due, there will be assessed a total penalty of
twenty percent of the amount of the tax. The payment of the penalty
described in this subsection is collectible from the seller only, and
RCW 82.45.070 does not apply to the penalties described in this
subsection.
(3) If the tax imposed under this chapter is not received by the
due date, the transferee is personally liable for the tax, along with
any interest as provided in subsection (1) of this section, unless an
instrument evidencing the sale is recorded in the official real
property records of the county in which the property conveyed is
located.
(4) If upon examination of any affidavits or from other information
obtained by the department or its agents it appears that all or a
portion of the tax is unpaid, the department must assess against the
taxpayer the additional amount found to be due plus interest and
penalties as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The
department must notify the taxpayer by mail, or electronically as
provided in RCW 82.32.135, of the additional amount and the same
becomes due and must be paid within thirty days from the date of the
notice, or within such further time as the department may provide.
(5) No assessment or refund may be made by the department more than
four years after the date of sale except upon a showing of:
(a) Fraud or misrepresentation of a material fact by the taxpayer;
(b) A failure by the taxpayer to record documentation of a sale or
otherwise report the sale to the county treasurer; or
(c) A failure of the transferor or transferee to report the sale
under RCW 82.45.090(2).
(6) Penalties collected on taxes due under this chapter under
subsection (2) of this section and RCW 82.32.090 (2) through (8) must
be deposited in the ((housing trust fund as described in chapter 43.185
RCW)) state general fund.

--- END ---