BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.260 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the Washington State University extension energy
program is authorized to extend grants to the successful pilot programs
implementing RCW 70.260.020. By December 1, 2013, the Washington State
University extension energy program shall provide a report to the
governor and the appropriate legislative committee consistent with the
requirements of RCW 70.260.020(5)(a). In addition to the report
requirements in this section, the report shall include the amount spent
on administration and other indirect costs. The report shall clearly
delineate the administrative costs relative to jobs produced. For
purposes of reporting to the governor and appropriate legislative
committees, any job or resources spent that is not directly performing
energy audits, weatherization, or other urban residential and
commercial energy efficiency upgrades is considered administration.

--- END ---