BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the state
work-study program is the second oldest program of its kind in the
country and has been serving students and employers in Washington state
for nearly forty years. This program is a vital component of financial
aid that helps low and middle-income students earn money for college
while gaining valuable experience in jobs that are related to their
career goals. Therefore, the legislature intends to preserve the
current level of funding in the state work-study program.
The legislature also recognizes that education and training,
particularly for high-level skills, are key ingredients to economic
growth and competitiveness and is a shared concern of the state,
businesses, and professionals. Thus, the legislature finds that it is
a joint responsibility of the state, businesses, and professionals to
invest in the successful training of the future workforce, which
includes programs that support students gaining the necessary work-related experience.
It is for these reasons that the legislature intends to add a
surcharge to business and professional licenses to help generate
revenue for the state work-study program. However, in recognition of
the state's share in this responsibility, the legislature acknowledges
that the revenue generated from this source will only be a partial
funding source.

Sec. 2 RCW 23B.01.520 and 1989 c 165 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every domestic corporation, except one for which existing law
provides a different fee schedule, shall pay for filing of its articles
of incorporation and its first year's license a fee of one hundred
seventy-five dollars plus a ten dollar surcharge. Revenue collected
from the ten dollar surcharge shall be deposited in the education
legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 and must be used solely
to fund the state work-study program established in chapter 28B.12 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 23B.01.530 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the privilege of doing business, every corporation organized
under the laws of this state, except the corporations for which
existing law provides a different fee schedule, must make and file a
statement in the form prescribed by the secretary of state and must pay
an annual license fee plus a ten dollar surcharge each year following
incorporation, on or before the expiration date of its corporate
license, to the secretary of state. Revenue collected from the ten
dollar surcharge shall be deposited in the education legacy trust
account created in RCW 83.100.230 and must be used solely to fund the
state work-study program established in chapter 28B.12 RCW. The
secretary of state must collect an annual license fee of sixty dollars
for corporations that are not inactive corporations, of which ten
dollars is designated to be deposited into the secretary's revolving
fund per RCW 43.07.130. The secretary of state must collect an annual
license fee for inactive corporations as established by the secretary
of state in rule. As used in this section, "inactive corporation"
means a corporation that certifies at the time of filing under this
section that it did not engage in any business activities during the
year ending on the expiration date of its corporate license.

Sec. 4 RCW 24.03.405 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state must establish by rule, fees for the
following:
(a) Filing articles of incorporation.
(b) Filing an annual report of a domestic or foreign corporation.
(c) Filing an application of a foreign corporation for a
certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state.
(d) An application for reinstatement under RCW 24.03.386.
(e) Filing articles of amendment or restatement or an amendment or
supplement to an application for reinstatement.
(f) Filing articles of merger or consolidation.
(g) Filing a statement of change of address of registered office or
change of registered agent, or revocation, resignation, or any
combination of these.
(h) Filing articles of dissolution.
(i) Filing an application of a foreign corporation for an amended
certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state.
(j) Filing an application for withdrawal of a foreign corporation
and issuing a certificate of withdrawal.
(k) Filing a certificate by a foreign corporation of the
appointment of a registered agent.
(l) Filing a certificate of election adopting the provisions of
chapter 24.03 RCW.
(m) Filing an application to reserve a corporate name.
(n) Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved corporate name.
(o) Filing a name registration.
(p) Filing any other statement or report authorized for filing
under this chapter.
(2) Fees collected according to subsection (1)(a) and (c) of this
section must include a ten dollar surcharge. The revenue collected
from the ten dollar surcharge shall be deposited in the education
legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 and must be used solely
to fund the state work-study program established in chapter 28B.12 RCW.
(3) Fees are adjusted by rule only in an amount that does not
exceed the average biennial increase in the cost of providing service.
This must be determined in a biennial cost study performed by the
secretary.

Sec. 5 RCW 25.05.500 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A partnership which is not a limited liability partnership on
June 11, 1998, may become a limited liability partnership upon the
approval of the terms and conditions upon which it becomes a limited
liability partnership by the vote necessary to amend the partnership
agreement except, in the case of a partnership agreement that expressly
considers obligations to contribute to the partnership, the vote
necessary to amend those provisions, and by filing the applications
required by subsection (2) of this section. A partnership which is a
limited liability partnership on June 11, 1998, continues as a limited
liability partnership under this chapter.
(2)(a) To become and to continue as a limited liability
partnership, a partnership must file with the secretary of state an
application stating the name of the partnership; the location of a
registered office, which need not be a place of its activity in this
state; the address of its principal office; if the partnership's
principal office is not located in this state, the address of a
registered office and the name and address of a registered agent for
service of process in this state which the partnership will be required
to continuously maintain; the number of partners; a brief statement of
the business in which the partnership engages; any other matters that
the partnership determines to include; and that the partnership thereby
applies for status as a limited liability partnership.
(b) A registered agent for service of process under (a) of this
subsection must be an individual who is a resident of this state or
other person authorized to do business in this state.
(3) The application must be accompanied by a fee plus a ten dollar
surcharge for each partnership as established by the secretary of state
in rule. Revenue collected from the ten dollar surcharge shall be
deposited in the education legacy trust account created in RCW
83.100.230 and must be used solely to fund the state work-study program
established in chapter 28B.12 RCW.
(4) The secretary of state must register as a limited liability
partnership any partnership that submits a completed application with
the required fee.
(5) A partnership registered under this section must pay an annual
fee, in each year following the year in which its application is filed,
on a date and in an amount specified by the secretary of state. The
fee must be accompanied by a notice, on a form provided by the
secretary of state, of the number of partners currently in the
partnership and of any material changes in the information contained in
the partnership's application for registration.
(6) Registration is effective immediately after the date an
application is filed, and remains effective until:
(a) It is voluntarily withdrawn by filing with the secretary of
state a written withdrawal notice executed by a majority of the
partners or by one or more partners or other persons authorized to
execute a withdrawal notice; or
(b) Thirty days after receipt by the partnership of a notice from
the secretary of state, which notice must be sent by first-class mail,
postage prepaid, that the partnership has failed to make timely payment
of the annual fee specified in subsection (5) of this section, unless
the fee is paid within such a thirty-day period.
(7) The status of a partnership as a limited liability partnership,
and the liability of the partners thereof, is not affected by: (a)
Errors in the information stated in an application under subsection (2)
of this section or a notice under subsection (6) of this section; or
(b) changes after the filing of such an application or notice in the
information stated in the application or notice.
(8) The secretary of state may provide forms for the application
under subsection (2) of this section or a notice under subsection (6)
of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 25.10.916 and 2009 c 188 s 1307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall adopt rules establishing fees that
shall be charged and collected for:
(a) Filing of a certificate of limited partnership or an
application for a certificate of authority of a foreign limited
partnership;
(b) Filing of an amendment or restatement of a certificate of
domestic or foreign limited partnership;
(c) Filing an application to reserve, register, or transfer a
limited partnership name;
(d) Filing any other certificate, statement, or report authorized
or permitted to be filed; and
(e) Copies, certified copies, certificates, service of process
filings, and expedited filings or other special services.
(2) In the establishment of a fee schedule, the secretary of state
shall, insofar as is possible and reasonable, be guided by the fee
schedule provided for corporations governed by Title 23B RCW and the
fee must include a ten dollar surcharge to all fees collected according
to subsection (1)(a) of this section. Revenue collected from the ten
dollar surcharge shall be deposited in the education legacy trust
account created in RCW 83.100.230 and must be used solely to fund the
state work-study program established in chapter 28B.12 RCW.
(a) Fees for copies, certified copies, certificates of record, and
service of process filings are the same as in RCW 23B.01.220.
(b) Fees for reinstatement of a foreign or domestic limited
partnership are the same as in RCW 23B.01.560.
(c) All fees collected by the secretary of state shall be deposited
with the state treasurer pursuant to law.

Sec. 7 RCW 25.15.805 and 2010 c 196 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall adopt rules establishing fees
which shall be charged and collected for:
(a) Filing of a certificate of formation for a domestic limited
liability company or an application for registration of a foreign
limited liability company;
(b) Filing of a certificate of dissolution for a domestic limited
liability company;
(c) Filing a certificate of cancellation for a foreign limited
liability company;
(d) Filing of a certificate of amendment or restatement for a
domestic or foreign limited liability company;
(e) Filing an application to reserve, register, or transfer a
limited liability company name;
(f) Filing any other certificate, statement, or report authorized
or permitted to be filed;
(g) Copies, certified copies, certificates, service of process
filings, and expedited filings or other special services.
(2) In the establishment of a fee schedule, the secretary of state
shall, insofar as is possible and reasonable, be guided by the fee
schedule provided for corporations governed by Title 23B RCW and the
fee must include a ten dollar surcharge to all fees collected according
to subsection (1)(a) of this section. Revenue collected from the ten
dollar surcharge shall be deposited in the education legacy trust
account created in RCW 83.100.230 and must be used solely to fund the
state work-study program established in chapter 28B.12 RCW. Fees for
copies, certified copies, certificates of record, and service of
process filings shall be as provided for in RCW 23B.01.220.
(3) All fees collected by the secretary of state shall be deposited
with the state treasurer pursuant to law.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.24.086 and 1999 c 240 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of
each professional, occupational(([,])), or business licensing program
be fully borne by the members of that profession, occupation(([,])), or
business. The director of licensing shall from time to time establish
the amount of all application fees, license fees, registration fees,
examination fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee
associated with licensing or regulation of professions,
occupations(([,])), or businesses, except for health professions,
administered by the department of licensing. In fixing said fees, the
director shall set the fees for each such program at a sufficient level
to defray the costs of administering that program and shall include an
additional three percent surcharge on all initial license fees and
annual license renewal fees. Revenue collected from the three percent
surcharge shall be deposited in the education legacy trust account
created in RCW 83.100.230 and must be used solely to fund the state
work-study program established in chapter 28B.12 RCW. All such fees
shall be fixed by rule adopted by the director in accordance with the
provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.70.250 and 2006 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of
each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. The
secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the
fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of
administering that program and the cost of regulating licensed
volunteer medical workers in accordance with RCW 18.130.360, except as
provided in RCW 18.79.202 until June 30, 2013, and shall include an
additional three percent surcharge on all initial license fees and
annual license renewal fees. Revenue collected from the three percent
surcharge shall be deposited in the education legacy trust account
created in RCW 83.100.230 and must be used solely to fund the state
work-study program established in chapter 28B.12 RCW. All such fees
shall be fixed by rule adopted by the secretary in accordance with the
provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2012.

--- END ---