BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.32.070 and 2009 c 415 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall determine the format and layout of
the voters' pamphlet published under RCW 29A.32.010. The secretary of
state shall print the pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size,
quality, and weight of paper that in the judgment of the secretary of
state best serves the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of
contents. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order
specified by RCW 29A.72.290.
(2) The voters' pamphlet must provide the following information for
each statewide issue on the ballot except measures for an advisory vote
of the people whose requirements are provided in subsection (((11)))
(3) of this section:
(((1))) (a) The legal identification of the measure by serial
designation or number;
(((2))) (b) The official ballot title of the measure;
(((3))) (c) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining
the law as it presently exists;
(((4))) (d) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining
the effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;
(((5))) (e) The fiscal impact statement prepared under RCW
29A.72.025;
(((6))) (f) The total number of votes cast for and against the
measure in the senate and house of representatives, if the measure has
been passed by the legislature;
(((7))) (g) An argument advocating the voters' approval of the
measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing
argument;
(((8))) (h) An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the
measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing
argument;
(((9))) (i) Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed by
the names of the committee members who submitted them, and may be
followed by a telephone number that citizens may call to obtain
information on the ballot measure; and
(((10))) (j) The full text of the measure((;)).
(((11))) (3)(a) Two pages shall be provided in the general election
voters' pamphlet for each measure for an advisory vote of the people
under RCW 43.135.041, and shall consist of:
(i) The serial number assigned by the secretary of state under RCW
29A.72.040((,));
(ii) The short description formulated by the attorney general under
RCW 29A.72.283((,));
(iii) The tax increase's most up-to-date ten-year cost projection,
including a year-by-year breakdown, by the office of financial
management under RCW 43.135.031((,)); and
(iv) The names of the legislators, and their contact information,
and how they voted on the tax increase upon final passage so they can
provide information to, and answer questions from, the public.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "names of the
legislators, and their contact information" includes each legislator's
position (senator or representative), first name, last name, party
affiliation (for example, Democrat or Republican), city or town they
live in, office phone number, and office e-mail address.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.72.025 and 2009 c 415 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of financial management, in consultation with the
secretary of state, the attorney general, and any other appropriate
state or local agency, shall prepare a fiscal impact statement for each
of the following state ballot measures: (((1)))
(a) An initiative to the people that is certified to the ballot;
(((2)))
(b) An initiative to the legislature that will appear on the
ballot; (((3)))
(c) An alternative measure appearing on the ballot that the
legislature proposes to an initiative to the legislature; (((4)))
(d) A referendum bill referred to voters by the legislature; and
(((5)))
(e) A referendum measure appearing on the ballot.
(2) Fiscal impact statements must:
(a) Be written in clear and concise language((,));
(b) Avoid legal and technical terms, when possible((, and));
(c) Be filed with the secretary of state no later than the tenth
day of August((. Fiscal impact statements may));
(d) Where appropriate, include easily understood graphics((.
A fiscal impact statement must));
(e) Describe any projected increase or decrease in revenues, costs,
expenditures, or indebtedness that the state or local governments will
experience if the ballot measure were approved by state voters((.)),
including the effect that any decrease in revenues may have upon an
increase in demand for government services that is attributable to a
recession;
(f) Where appropriate, ((a fiscal impact statement may)) include
both estimated dollar amounts and a description placing the estimated
dollar amounts into context((. A fiscal impact statement must));
(g) Include both a summary of not to exceed one hundred words and
a more detailed statement that includes the assumptions that were made
to develop the fiscal impacts((.
Fiscal impact statements must)); and
(h) Be available online from the secretary of state's web site and
included in the state voters' pamphlet. Additional information may be
posted on the web site of the office of financial management.
(3) As used in this section, "recession" means a decline in the
gross state product for at least six months.

--- END ---