BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.08.175 and 2010 c 217 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a city or county may by ordinance
or resolution create a golf cart zone, for the purposes of permitting
the incidental operation of golf carts, as defined in RCW 46.04.1945,
upon a street or highway of this state having a speed limit of twenty-five miles per hour or less.
(2) Every person operating a golf cart as authorized under this
section is granted all rights and is subject to all duties applicable
to the driver of a vehicle under chapter 46.61 RCW.
(3) Every person operating a golf cart as authorized under this
section must be at least sixteen years of age and must have completed
a driver education course or have previous experience driving as a
licensed driver.
(4) A person who has a revoked license under RCW 46.20.285 may not
operate a golf cart as authorized under this section.
(5) The legislative authority of a city or county may ((prohibit
any person from operating a golf cart as authorized under this section
at any time from a half hour after sunset to a half hour before
sunrise)) set the hours that a golf cart may be operated in the golf
cart zone.
(6) The legislative authority of a city or county may require a
decal or other identifying device to be displayed on golf carts
authorized on the streets and highways of this state under this
section. The city or county may charge a fee for the decal or other
identifying device.
(7) The legislative authority of a city or county may prohibit the
operation of golf carts in designated bicycle lanes that are within a
golf cart zone.
(8) Golf carts must be equipped with reflectors, seat belts, and
rearview mirrors when operated upon streets and highways as authorized
under this section. However, the legislative authority of a city or
county may require additional equipment beyond what is listed in this
subsection.
(9) A city or county that creates a golf cart zone under this
section must clearly identify the zone by placing signage at the
beginning and end of the golf cart zone on a street or road that is
part of the golf cart zone. The signage must be in compliance with the
department of transportation's manual on uniform traffic control
devices for streets and highways.
(10) Accidents that involve golf carts operated upon streets and
highways as authorized under this section must be recorded and tracked
in compliance with chapter 46.52 RCW. The accident report must
indicate that a golf cart operating within a golf cart zone is involved
in the accident.

--- END ---