BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 85.38.010 and 1991 c 349 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Governing body" means the board of commissioners, board of
supervisors, or board of directors of a special district.
(2) "Owner of land" means the record owner of at least a majority
ownership interest in a separate and legally created lot or parcel of
land, as determined by the records of the county auditor, except that
if the lot or parcel has been sold under a real estate contract, the
vendee or grantee shall be deemed to be the owner of such land for
purposes of authorizing voting rights. It is assumed, unless shown
otherwise, that the name appearing as the owner of property on the
property tax rolls is the current owner.
(3) "Qualified voter of a special district" means a person who is
either: (a) A natural person who is a voter under general state
election laws, registered to vote in the state of Washington for a
period of not less than thirty days before the election, and the owner
of land located in the special district for a period of not less than
thirty days before the election; (b) a corporation or partnership that
has owned land located in the special district for a period of not less
than sixty days before the election; or (c) the state, its agencies or
political subdivisions that own land in the special district or lands
proposed to be annexed into the special district except that the state,
its agencies and political subdivisions shall not be eligible to vote
to elect a member of the governing board of a special district.
(4) "Special district" means: (a) A diking district; (b) a
drainage district; (c) a diking, drainage, and/or sewerage improvement
district; (d) an intercounty diking and drainage district; (e) a
consolidated diking district, drainage district, diking improvement
district, and/or drainage improvement district; or (f) a flood control
district.
(5) "Special district general election" means the election of a
special district regularly held ((on the first Tuesday after the first
Monday in February in each even-numbered year)) pursuant to RCW
85.38.100 at which a member of the special district governing body is
regularly elected.

Sec. 2 RCW 85.38.100 and 1991 c 349 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
General elections shall be held in each special district on the
((first Tuesday after the first Monday in February)) special election
date described in RCW 29A.04.321(2)(a) in each even-numbered year. The
auditor of the county within which a special district, or the largest
portion of a special district, is located may provide for special
elections whenever necessary on the dates authorized in RCW
29A.04.321(2).

--- END ---