BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.703 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 32 are each amended
to read as follows:
The governing boards of each of the state universities, the
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and community
colleges in addition to their other duties prescribed by law shall have
the power and authority to establish programs for intercollegiate
athletic competition; however, such programs at the University of
Washington and Washington State University shall not be funded with
state appropriations or operating fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.031.
Such competition may include participation as a member of an athletic
conference or conferences, in accordance with conference rules.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.031 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 2 and 2011 c 274
s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The term "operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include
the fees, other than building fees, charged all students registering at
the state's colleges and universities but shall not include fees for
short courses, self-supporting degree credit programs and courses,
marine station work, experimental station work, correspondence or
extension courses, and individual instruction and student deposits or
rentals, disciplinary and library fines, which colleges and
universities shall have the right to impose, laboratory, gymnasium,
health, technology and student activity fees, or fees, charges,
rentals, and other income derived from any or all revenue producing
lands, buildings and facilities of the colleges or universities
heretofore or hereafter acquired, constructed or installed, including
but not limited to income from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms,
hospitals, infirmaries, housing or student activity buildings,
vehicular parking facilities, land, or the appurtenances thereon, or
such other special fees as may be established by any college or
university board of trustees or regents from time to time. All moneys
received as operating fees at any institution of higher education shall
be deposited in a local account containing only operating fees revenue
and related interest: PROVIDED, That: (a) A minimum of five percent
of operating fees shall be retained by the four-year institutions of
higher education that increase tuition for resident undergraduate
students above assumed tuition increases in the omnibus appropriations
act((,)); (b) a minimum of four percent of operating fees shall be
retained by four-year institutions of higher education that do not
increase tuition for resident undergraduates above assumed increases in
the omnibus appropriations act((, and)); (c) a minimum of three and
one-half percent of operating fees shall be retained by the community
and technical colleges for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820; and (d)
operating fees of the University of Washington and Washington State
University shall not be used to fund programs established for
intercollegiate athletic competition authorized under RCW 28B.10.703,
except that this prohibition on the use of operating fees is not
applicable to tuition waivers provided to achieve gender equity in
intercollegiate athletic competition in accordance with RCW 28B.15.740.
At least thirty percent of operating fees required to be retained by
the four-year institutions for purposes of RCW 28B.15.820 shall be used
only for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820(10).
(2) In addition to the three and one-half percent of operating fees
retained by the institutions under subsection (1) of this section, up
to three percent of operating fees charged to students at community and
technical colleges shall be transferred to the community and technical
college innovation account for the implementation of the college
board's strategic technology plan in RCW 28B.50.515. The percentage to
be transferred to the community and technical college innovation
account shall be determined by the college board each year but shall
not exceed three percent of the operating fees collected each year.
(3) Local operating fee accounts shall not be subject to
appropriation by the legislature or allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW.

--- END ---