BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the greatest extent practicable and within available
resources, the marine division of the department shall expand existing
opportunities and develop new opportunities to provide for the
preferential hiring of veterans. Options may include, but are not
limited to, increasing awareness of the veteran preference points
hiring process, notifying veteran assistance organizations of relevant
job vacancies, collaborating with other applicable state and local
agencies to increase veteran hiring, and participating in the wounded
combat veterans internship program. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" has the same meaning as in RCW 41.04.007.
(2) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement the
requirements of this section.

--- END ---