BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that misclassification
of drayage drivers as independent contractors results in drivers
working in unsafe conditions and without the benefit of such
protections as overtime wages and unemployment benefits. The
legislature further finds that misclassification is unfair to law-abiding businesses and results in lost revenue to the state. By
defining drayage drivers as statutory employees, the legislature
intends to avoid litigation, increase safety to drivers and the public,
insure drivers receive employment protections to which they are
entitled, and facilitate collection of taxes. The legislature intends
that the statutory inclusion of drayage drivers under the employment
standards in this act is not evidence of legislative intent to exclude
drayage drivers from the protection of other employment standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
A drayage truck operator is an employee and the entity or person
who arranges for or engages the services of the drayage truck operator
is an employer for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of this
section, "drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use on-road vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand pounds operating on or transgressing through port or
intermodal rail yard property for the purpose of loading, unloading, or
transporting cargo, including containerized, bulk, or break-bulk goods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
A drayage truck operator is an employee and the entity or person
who arranges for or engages the services of the drayage truck operator
is an employer for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of this
section, "drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use on-road vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand pounds operating on or transgressing through port or
intermodal rail yard property for the purpose of loading, unloading, or
transporting cargo, including containerized, bulk, or break-bulk goods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
A drayage truck operator is an employee and the entity or person
who arranges for or engages the services of the drayage truck operator
is an employer for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of this
section, "drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use on-road vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand pounds operating on or transgressing through port or
intermodal rail yard property for the purpose of loading, unloading, or
transporting cargo, including containerized, bulk, or break-bulk goods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
A drayage truck operator is an employee and the entity or person
who arranges for or engages the services of the drayage truck operator
is an employer for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of this
section, "drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use on-road vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand pounds operating on or transgressing through port or
intermodal rail yard property for the purpose of loading, unloading, or
transporting cargo, including containerized, bulk, or break-bulk goods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
A drayage truck operator is an employee and the entity or person
who arranges for or engages the services of the drayage truck operator
is an employer for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of this
section, "drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use on-road vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand pounds operating on or transgressing through port or
intermodal rail yard property for the purpose of loading, unloading, or
transporting cargo, including containerized, bulk, or break-bulk goods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Services performed by a drayage truck operator are considered
services in employment, not subject to RCW 50.04.140. For purposes of
this section, "drayage truck operator" means the driver of any in-use
on-road vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating greater than thirty-three thousand pounds operating on or transgressing through port or
intermodal rail yard property for the purpose of loading, unloading, or
transporting cargo, including containerized, bulk, or break-bulk goods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---