BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.360 and 1988 c 288 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
The order of adoption by which each rule is adopted by an agency
shall contain all of the following:
(1) The date the agency adopted the rule;
(2) A concise statement of the purpose of the rule;
(3) A reference to all rules repealed, amended, or suspended by the
rule;
(4) A reference to the specific statutory or other authority
authorizing adoption of the rule;
(5) Any findings required by any provision of law as a precondition
to adoption or effectiveness of the rule; ((and))
(6) If the rule qualifies as a significant legislative rule of an
agency that is under the authority of the governor, the signature of
the governor; and
(7) The effective date of the rule if other than that specified in
RCW 34.05.380(2).

--- END ---