BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
implement waste, fraud, and abuse detection, and prevention and
recovery solutions to improve program integrity for medicaid and the
children's health insurance program in the state and create efficiency
and cost savings through a shift from a retrospective "pay and chase"
model to a prospective prepayment prevention and detection model.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Children's health insurance program" means the children's
health insurance program established under Title XXI of the social
security act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.
(2) "Enrollee" means an individual who is eligible to receive
benefits and is enrolled in either the medicaid or children's health
insurance programs.
(3) "Medicaid" means the program to provide grants to states for
medical assistance programs established under Title XIX of the social
security act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.
(4) "Secretary" means the United States secretary of health and
human services, acting through the administrator of the centers for
medicare and medicaid services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This chapter specifically applies to:
(1) State medicaid programs; and
(2) The state children's health insurance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The state shall implement state-of-the-art
clinical code editing technology solutions to further automate claims
resolution and enhance cost containment through improved claim accuracy
and appropriate code correction. The technology must identify and
prevent errors or potential overbilling based on widely accepted and
transparent protocols such as the American medical association and the
centers for medicare and medicaid services. The edits must be applied
automatically before claims are adjudicated to speed processing and
reduce the number of pended or rejected claims and help ensure a
smoother, more consistent and more transparent adjudication process and
fewer delays in provider reimbursement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The state shall implement state-of-the-art
predictive modeling and analytics technologies to provide a more
comprehensive and accurate view across all providers, beneficiaries,
and geographies within the medicaid and children's health insurance
programs in order to:
(1) Identify and analyze those billing or utilization patterns that
represent a high risk of fraudulent activity;
(2) Be integrated into the existing medicaid and children's health
insurance program claims workflow;
(3) Undertake and automate such analysis before payment is made to
minimize disruptions to the workflow and speed claim resolution;
(4) Prioritize such identified transactions for additional review
before payment is made based on likelihood of potential waste, fraud,
or abuse;
(5) Capture outcome information from adjudicated claims to allow
for refinement and enhancement of the predictive analytics technologies
based on historical data and algorithms within the system; and
(6) Prevent the payment of claims for reimbursement that have been
identified as potentially wasteful, fraudulent, or abusive until the
claims have been automatically verified as valid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The state shall implement fraud
investigative services that combine retrospective claims analysis and
prospective waste, fraud, or abuse detection techniques. These
services must include analysis of historical claims data, medical
records, suspect provider databases, and high-risk identification
lists, as well as direct patient and provider interviews. Emphasis
must be placed on providing education to providers and ensuring that
they have the opportunity to review and correct any problems identified
prior to adjudication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The state shall implement medicaid and
children's health insurance program claims audit and recovery services
to identify improper payments due to nonfraudulent issues, audit
claims, obtain provider sign-off on the audit results, and recover
validated overpayments. Postpayment reviews must ensure that the
diagnoses and procedure codes are accurate and valid based on the
supporting physician documentation within the medical records. Core
categories of reviews may include: Coding compliance diagnosis related
group reviews, transfers, readmissions, cost outlier reviews,
outpatient seventy-two hour rule reviews, payment errors, billing
errors, and others.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 To implement this chapter, the state shall
either contract with the cooperative purchasing network to issue a
request for proposals to select a contractor or use the following
contractor selection process:
(1) No later than November 1, 2012, the state shall issue a request
for information to seek input from potential contractors on
capabilities and cost structures associated with the scope of work of
this chapter. The results of the request for information must be used
by the state to create a formal request for proposals to be issued
within ninety days of the closing date of the request for information.
(2) No later than ninety days after the close of the request for
information, the state shall issue a formal request for proposals to
carry out this chapter during the first year of implementation. To the
extent appropriate, the state may include subsequent implementation
years and may issue additional request for proposals with respect to
subsequent implementation years.
(3) The state shall select contractors to carry out this chapter
using competitive procedures as provided for in the state procurement
statute.
(4) The state shall enter into a contract under this chapter with
an entity only if the entity:
(a) Can demonstrate appropriate technical, analytical, and clinical
knowledge and experience to carry out the functions included in this
chapter; or
(b) Has a contract, or will enter into a contract, with another
entity that meets the above criteria.
(5) The state shall only enter into a contract under this chapter
with an entity to the extent the entity complies with conflict of
interest standards in the state procurement statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The state shall provide entities with a
contract under this chapter with appropriate access to claims and other
data necessary for the entity to carry out the functions included in
this chapter. This includes, but is not limited to, providing current
and historical medicaid and children's health insurance program claims
and provider database information, and taking necessary regulatory
action to facilitate appropriate public-private data sharing, including
across multiple medicaid managed care entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following reports must be completed by
the department:
(1) No later than three months after the completion of the first
implementation year under this chapter, the state shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and make available to the
public a report that includes the following:
(a) A description of the implementation and use of technologies
included in this chapter during the year;
(b) A certification by the department that specifies the actual and
projected savings to the medicaid and children's health insurance
programs as a result of the use of these technologies, including
estimates of the amounts of such savings with respect to both improper
payments recovered and improper payments avoided;
(c) The actual and projected savings to the medicaid and children's
health insurance programs as a result of such use of technologies
relative to the return on investment for the use of such technologies
and in comparison to other strategies or technologies used to prevent
and detect fraud, waste, and abuse;
(d) Any modifications or refinements that should be made to
increase the amount of actual or projected savings or mitigate any
adverse impact on medicare beneficiaries or providers;
(e) An analysis of the extent to which the use of these
technologies successfully prevented and detected waste, fraud, or abuse
in the medicaid and children's health insurance programs;
(f) A review of whether the technologies affected access to, or the
quality of, items and services furnished to medicaid and children's
health insurance program beneficiaries; and
(g) A review of what effect, if any, the use of these technologies
had on medicaid and children's health insurance program providers,
including assessment of provider education efforts and documentation of
processes for providers to review and correct problems that are
identified.
(2) No later than three months after the completion of the second
implementation year under this chapter, the state shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and make available to the
public a report that includes, with respect to such year, the items
required under subsection (1) of this section as well as any other
additional items determined appropriate with respect to the report for
such year.
(3) No later than three months after the completion of the third
implementation year under this chapter, the state shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the legislature, and make available to the
public, a report that includes with respect to such year, the items
required under subsection (1) of this section, as well as any other
additional items determined appropriate with respect to the report for
such year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 It is the intent of the legislature that
the savings achieved through this chapter shall more than cover the
costs of implementation. Therefore, to the extent possible, technology
services used in carrying out this chapter must be secured using a
shared savings model, whereby the state's only direct cost will be a
percentage of actual savings achieved. Further, to enable this model,
a percentage of achieved savings may be used to fund expenditures under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

--- END ---