BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.18.235 and 2011 c 332 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A registered owner who is a veteran, as defined in RCW
41.04.007, may apply to the department for disabled American veteran or
former prisoner of war license plates, for use on one personal use
motor vehicle required to display one or two license plates, excluding
vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions
established by the department. The veteran must be recorded as the
registered owner of the motor vehicle on which the disabled American
veteran or former prisoner of war license plate or plates will be
displayed and:
(a) Provide certification from the veterans administration or the
military service from which the veteran was discharged that the veteran
has a service-connected disability rating;
(b) Have lost the use of both hands or one foot;
(c) Have been captured and incarcerated by an enemy of the United
States during a period of war with the United States and have received
a prisoner of war medal;
(d) Have become blind in both eyes as the result of military
service; or
(e) Be rated by the veterans administration or the military service
from which the veteran was discharged and be receiving service-connected compensation at the one hundred percent rate that is expected
to exist for more than one year.
(2) A registered owner who is a Japanese-American who: (a) Was
confined in a wartime relocation and internment of civilians center,
under Executive Order No. 9066, between February 1942 and 1946; and (b)
can provide documentation that he or she is listed in the "National
Archives Record Group 210: Records of the War Relocation Authority,
1941-1989," may apply to the department for former prisoner of war
license plates described under this section, for use on one personal
use motor vehicle required to display one or two license plates,
excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and
conditions established by the department. The qualifying
Japanese-American must be recorded as the registered owner of the motor
vehicle on which the former prisoner of war license plate or plates
will be displayed.
(3) The special license plates under this section must:
(a) Display distinguishing marks, letters, or numerals indicating
that the registered owner is a disabled American veteran or former
prisoner of war; and
(b) Be issued for one personal use vehicle without the payment of
any vehicle license fees, license plate fees, or excise taxes.
(((3))) (4) A registered owner who is a veteran, as defined in RCW
41.04.007, may, in lieu of applying for the special license plates
under this section, apply for regular issue or any qualifying special
license plate and receive the full benefit of the vehicle license fee
and excise tax exemption provided in subsection (((2))) (3)(b) of this
section.
(((4))) (5) The department may periodically verify the one hundred
percent rate as described in subsection (1)(e) of this section.
(((5))) (6) A veteran who has been issued disabled American veteran
or former prisoner of war license plates under this section before July
1, 1983, continues to be eligible for the vehicle license fee and
excise tax exemption described in subsection (((2))) (3)(b) of this
section.
(((6))) (7) A disabled American veteran and former prisoner of war
license plate or plates may be transferred from one motor vehicle to
another motor vehicle owned by the veteran upon application to the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director.
(((7))) (8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Blind" means the definition of "blind" used by the state of
Washington in determining eligibility for financial assistance to the
blind under Title 74 RCW; and
(b) "Special license plates" does not include any plate from the
armed forces license plate collection established in RCW
46.18.200(((3))) (2).
(((8))) (9) Any unauthorized use of a special license plate under
this section is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---