BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to recognize that
special purpose water and sewer districts, as well as cities and towns
operating waterworks systems, have had and continue to have an
obligation to provide, operate, and maintain fire hydrants within
service areas. Districts, cities, and towns have historically met this
need and paid for it through adopted rate systems.
The legislature finds that, for the purposes of providing,
operating, and maintaining fire hydrants, a district, city, or town
operating a waterworks system functions for the benefit of its
customers, not the general public. Fire hydrant services are integral
to the water services provided to customers. Customers enjoy the
benefit of having fire hydrants in case of fires, and that benefit
correlates to the burden of paying rates. To that end, when providing,
maintaining, and operating fire hydrants for its customers, a district,
city, or town operating a waterworks system is functioning in a
proprietary capacity.
The purpose of this act is to affirm the authority of districts, as
well as cities and towns operating waterworks systems, to provide fire
hydrant services and finance the cost of these services through adopted
rate systems.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.92.010 and 2002 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town may construct, condemn and purchase, purchase,
acquire, add to, alter, maintain and operate waterworks, including fire
hydrants as an integral utility service incorporated within general
rates, within or without its limits, for the purpose of furnishing the
city and its inhabitants, and any other persons, with an ample supply
of water for all purposes, public and private, including water power
and other power derived therefrom, with full power to regulate and
control the use, distribution, and price thereof: PROVIDED, That the
rates charged must be uniform for the same class of customers or
service. Such waterworks may include facilities for the generation of
electricity as a by-product and such electricity may be used by the
city or town or sold to an entity authorized by law to distribute
electricity. Such electricity is a by-product when the electrical
generation is subordinate to the primary purpose of water supply.
In classifying customers served or service furnished, the city or
town governing body may in its discretion consider any or all of the
following factors: The difference in cost of service to the various
customers; location of the various customers within and without the
city or town; the difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair,
and replacement of the various parts of the system; the different
character of the service furnished various customers; the quantity and
quality of the water furnished; the time of its use; the achievement of
water conservation goals and the discouragement of wasteful water use
practices; the extent of fire hydrant services provided; capital
contributions made to the system including, but not limited to,
assessments; and any other matters which present a reasonable
difference as a ground for distinction. No rate shall be charged that
is less than the cost of the water and service to the class of
customers served.
For such purposes any city or town may take, condemn and purchase,
purchase, acquire, and retain water from any public or navigable lake
or watercourse, surface or ground, and, by means of aqueducts or pipe
lines, conduct it to the city or town; and it may erect and build dams
or other works across or at the outlet of any lake or watercourse in
this state for the purpose of storing and retaining water therein up to
and above high water mark; and for all the purposes of erecting such
aqueducts, pipe lines, dams, or waterworks or other necessary
structures in storing and retaining water, or for any of the purposes
provided for by this chapter, the city or town may occupy and use the
beds and shores up to the high water mark of any such watercourse or
lake, and acquire the right by purchase, or by condemnation and
purchase, or otherwise, to any water, water rights, easements or
privileges named in this chapter, or necessary for any of said
purposes, and the city or town may acquire by purchase or condemnation
and purchase any properties or privileges necessary to be had to
protect its water supply from pollution. Should private property be
necessary for any such purposes or for storing water above high water
mark, the city or town may condemn and purchase, or purchase and
acquire such private property. For the purposes of waterworks which
include facilities for the generation of electricity as a by-product,
nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a city or town
that does not own or operate an electric utility system to condemn
electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or facilities
of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or to acquire
such rights or facilities without the consent of the owner.
(2)(a) For the purposes of providing and maintaining fire hydrants,
a city or town operating a waterworks system functions for the benefit
of its customers, not the general public. Fire hydrant services are
integral to the water services provided by a city or town to its
waterworks customers.
(b) The amount of the rates charged to customers by a city or town
for providing, operating, and maintaining fire hydrants must correlate
with the costs of providing, operating, and maintaining fire hydrants.
Rates paid by customers for fire hydrants must be used by the city or
town to finance the provision, operation, and maintenance of fire
hydrants.

Sec. 3 RCW 57.08.005 and 2009 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A district shall have the following powers:
(1) To acquire by purchase or condemnation, or both, all lands,
property and property rights, and all water and water rights, both
within and without the district, necessary for its purposes. The right
of eminent domain shall be exercised in the same manner and by the same
procedure as provided for cities and towns, insofar as consistent with
this title, except that all assessment or reassessment rolls to be
prepared and filed by eminent domain commissioners or commissioners
appointed by the court shall be prepared and filed by the district, and
the duties devolving upon the city treasurer are imposed upon the
county treasurer;
(2) To lease real or personal property necessary for its purposes
for a term of years for which that leased property may reasonably be
needed;
(3) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
supply waterworks to furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and
any other persons, both within and without the district, with an ample
supply of water for all uses and purposes public and private, including
fire hydrants, with full authority to regulate and control the use,
content, distribution, and price thereof in such a manner as is not in
conflict with general law and may construct, acquire, or own buildings
and other necessary district facilities. Where a customer connected to
the district's system uses the water on an intermittent or transient
basis, a district may charge for providing water service to such a
customer, regardless of the amount of water, if any, used by the
customer. District waterworks may include facilities which result in
combined water supply and electric generation, if the electricity
generated thereby is a by-product of the water supply system. That
electricity may be used by the district or sold to any entity
authorized by law to use or distribute electricity. Electricity is
deemed a by-product when the electrical generation is subordinate to
the primary purpose of water supply. For such purposes, a district may
take, condemn and purchase, acquire, and retain water from any public
or navigable lake, river or watercourse, or any underflowing water, and
by means of aqueducts or pipeline conduct the same throughout the
district and any city or town therein and carry it along and upon
public highways, roads, and streets, within and without such district.
For the purpose of constructing or laying aqueducts or pipelines, dams,
or waterworks or other necessary structures in storing and retaining
water or for any other lawful purpose such district may occupy the beds
and shores up to the high water mark of any such lake, river, or other
watercourse, and may acquire by purchase or condemnation such property
or property rights or privileges as may be necessary to protect its
water supply from pollution. For the purposes of waterworks which
include facilities for the generation of electricity as a by-product,
nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a district to
condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or
facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or
to acquire such rights or facilities without the consent of the owner;
(4) To purchase and take water from any municipal corporation,
private person, or entity. A district contiguous to Canada may
contract with a Canadian corporation for the purchase of water and for
the construction, purchase, maintenance, and supply of waterworks to
furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and residents of Canada
with an ample supply of water under the terms approved by the board of
commissioners;
(5) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
operate systems of sewers for the purpose of furnishing the district,
the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside the district with an
adequate system of sewers for all uses and purposes, public and
private, including but not limited to on-site sewage disposal
facilities, approved septic tanks or approved septic tank systems, on-site sanitary sewerage systems, inspection services and maintenance
services for private and public on-site systems, point and nonpoint
water pollution monitoring programs that are directly related to the
sewerage facilities and programs operated by a district, other
facilities, programs, and systems for the collection, interception,
treatment, and disposal of wastewater, and for the control of pollution
from wastewater with full authority to regulate the use and operation
thereof and the service rates to be charged. Under this chapter, after
July 1, 1998, any requirements for pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based, among other things, on actual
measurement of accumulation of sludge and scum by a trained inspector,
trained owner's agent, or trained owner. Training must occur in a
program approved by the state board of health or by a local health
officer. Sewage facilities may include facilities which result in
combined sewage disposal or treatment and electric or methane gas
generation, except that the electricity or methane gas generated
thereby is a by-product of the system of sewers. Such electricity or
methane gas may be used by the district or sold to any entity
authorized by law to distribute electricity or methane gas.
Electricity and methane gas are deemed by-products when the electrical
or methane gas generation is subordinate to the primary purpose of
sewage disposal or treatment. The district may also sell surplus
methane gas, which may be produced as a by-product. For such purposes
a district may conduct sewage throughout the district and throughout
other political subdivisions within the district, and construct and lay
sewer pipe along and upon public highways, roads, and streets, within
and without the district, and condemn and purchase or acquire land and
rights-of-way necessary for such sewer pipe. A district may erect
sewage treatment plants within or without the district, and may
acquire, by purchase or condemnation, properties or privileges
necessary to be had to protect any lakes, rivers, or watercourses and
also other areas of land from pollution from its sewers or its sewage
treatment plant. For the purposes of sewage facilities which include
facilities that result in combined sewage disposal or treatment and
electric generation where the electric generation is a by-product,
nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a district to
condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or
facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or
to acquire such rights or facilities without the consent of the owners;
(6) The authority to construct, condemn and purchase, add to,
maintain, and operate systems of reclaimed water as authorized by
chapter 90.46 RCW for the purpose of furnishing the district and the
inhabitants thereof with reclaimed water for all authorized uses and
purposes, public and private, including with full authority to regulate
the use and operation thereof and the service rates to be charged. In
compliance with other sections of this chapter, a district may also
provide reclaimed water services to persons outside the district;
(7)(a) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
operate systems of drainage for the benefit and use of the district,
the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside the district with an
adequate system of drainage, including but not limited to facilities
and systems for the collection, interception, treatment, and disposal
of storm or surface waters, and for the protection, preservation, and
rehabilitation of surface and underground waters, and drainage
facilities for public highways, streets, and roads, with full authority
to regulate the use and operation thereof and, except as provided in
(b) of this subsection, the service rates to be charged.
(b) The rate a district may charge under this section for storm or
surface water sewer systems or the portion of the rate allocable to the
storm or surface water sewer system of combined sanitary sewage and
storm or surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of
ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes
a permissive rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems
shall be properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the
building. The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of
ten percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested.
(c) Drainage facilities may include natural systems. Drainage
facilities may include facilities which result in combined drainage
facilities and electric generation, except that the electricity
generated thereby is a by-product of the drainage system. Such
electricity may be used by the district or sold to any entity
authorized by law to distribute electricity. Electricity is deemed a
by-product when the electrical generation is subordinate to the primary
purpose of drainage collection, disposal, and treatment. For such
purposes, a district may conduct storm or surface water throughout the
district and throughout other political subdivisions within the
district, construct and lay drainage pipe and culverts along and upon
public highways, roads, and streets, within and without the district,
and condemn and purchase or acquire land and rights-of-way necessary
for such drainage systems. A district may provide or erect facilities
and improvements for the treatment and disposal of storm or surface
water within or without the district, and may acquire, by purchase or
condemnation, properties or privileges necessary to be had to protect
any lakes, rivers, or watercourses and also other areas of land from
pollution from storm or surface waters. For the purposes of drainage
facilities which include facilities that also generate electricity as
a by-product, nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a
district to condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution
rights or facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute
electricity, or to acquire such rights or facilities without the
consent of the owners;
(8) To construct, condemn, acquire, and own buildings and other
necessary district facilities;
(9) To compel all property owners within the district located
within an area served by the district's system of sewers to connect
their private drain and sewer systems with the district's system under
such penalty as the commissioners shall prescribe by resolution. The
district may for such purpose enter upon private property and connect
the private drains or sewers with the district system and the cost
thereof shall be charged against the property owner and shall be a lien
upon property served;
(10) Where a district contains within its borders, abuts, or is
located adjacent to any lake, stream, groundwater as defined by RCW
90.44.035, or other waterway within the state of Washington, to provide
for the reduction, minimization, or elimination of pollutants from
those waters in accordance with the district's comprehensive plan, and
to issue general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, local improvement
district bonds, or utility local improvement bonds for the purpose of
paying all or any part of the cost of reducing, minimizing, or
eliminating the pollutants from these waters;
(11) Subject to subsection (7) of this section, to fix rates and
charges for water, sewer, reclaimed water, and drain service supplied
and to charge property owners seeking to connect to the district's
systems, as a condition to granting the right to so connect, in
addition to the cost of the connection, such reasonable connection
charge as the board of commissioners shall determine to be proper in
order that those property owners shall bear their equitable share of
the cost of the system. For the purposes of calculating a connection
charge, the board of commissioners shall determine the pro rata share
of the cost of existing facilities and facilities planned for
construction within the next ten years and contained in an adopted
comprehensive plan and other costs borne by the district which are
directly attributable to the improvements required by property owners
seeking to connect to the system. The cost of existing facilities
shall not include those portions of the system which have been donated
or which have been paid for by grants. The connection charge may
include interest charges applied from the date of construction of the
system until the connection, or for a period not to exceed ten years,
whichever is shorter, at a rate commensurate with the rate of interest
applicable to the district at the time of construction or major
rehabilitation of the system, or at the time of installation of the
lines to which the property owner is seeking to connect. In lieu of
requiring the installation of permanent local facilities not planned
for construction by the district, a district may permit connection to
the water and/or sewer systems through temporary facilities installed
at the property owner's expense, provided the property owner pays a
connection charge consistent with the provisions of this chapter and
agrees, in the future, to connect to permanent facilities when they are
installed; or a district may permit connection to the water and/or
sewer systems through temporary facilities and collect from property
owners so connecting a proportionate share of the estimated cost of
future local facilities needed to serve the property, as determined by
the district. The amount collected, including interest at a rate
commensurate with the rate of interest applicable to the district at
the time of construction of the temporary facilities, shall be held for
contribution to the construction of the permanent local facilities by
other developers or the district. The amount collected shall be deemed
full satisfaction of the proportionate share of the actual cost of
construction of the permanent local facilities. If the permanent local
facilities are not constructed within fifteen years of the date of
payment, the amount collected, including any accrued interest, shall be
returned to the property owner, according to the records of the county
auditor on the date of return. If the amount collected is returned to
the property owner, and permanent local facilities capable of serving
the property are constructed thereafter, the property owner at the time
of construction of such permanent local facilities shall pay a
proportionate share of the cost of such permanent local facilities, in
addition to reasonable connection charges and other charges authorized
by this section. A district may permit payment of the cost of
connection and the reasonable connection charge to be paid with
interest in installments over a period not exceeding fifteen years.
The county treasurer may charge and collect a fee of three dollars for
each year for the treasurer's services. Those fees shall be a charge
to be included as part of each annual installment, and shall be
credited to the county current expense fund by the county treasurer.
Revenues from connection charges excluding permit fees are to be
considered payments in aid of construction as defined by department of
revenue rule. Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance
services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.
Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
A water-sewer district shall not provide on-site sewage system
inspection, pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services
under this section using water-sewer district employees unless the on-site system is connected by a publicly owned collection system to the
water-sewer district's sewerage system, and the on-site system
represents the first step in the sewage disposal process.
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public entity
and public property, including the state of Washington and state
property, shall be subject to rates and charges for sewer, water, storm
water control, drainage, and street lighting facilities to the same
extent private persons and private property are subject to those rates
and charges that are imposed by districts. In setting those rates and
charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services, such as stream
improvements or donation of property;
(12) To contract with individuals, associations and corporations,
the state of Washington, and the United States;
(13) To employ such persons as are needed to carry out the
district's purposes and fix salaries and any bond requirements for
those employees;
(14) To contract for the provision of engineering, legal, and other
professional services as in the board of commissioner's discretion is
necessary in carrying out their duties;
(15) To sue and be sued;
(16) To loan and borrow funds and to issue bonds and instruments
evidencing indebtedness under chapter 57.20 RCW and other applicable
laws;
(17) To transfer funds, real or personal property, property
interests, or services subject to RCW 57.08.015;
(18) To levy taxes in accordance with this chapter and chapters
57.04 and 57.20 RCW;
(19) To provide for making local improvements and to levy and
collect special assessments on property benefited thereby, and for
paying for the same or any portion thereof in accordance with chapter
57.16 RCW;
(20) To establish street lighting systems under RCW 57.08.060;
(21) To exercise such other powers as are granted to water-sewer
districts by this title or other applicable laws; and
(22) To exercise any of the powers granted to cities and counties
with respect to the acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation
of, and fixing rates and charges for waterworks and systems of sewerage
and drainage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 57.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of providing, operating, and maintaining fire
hydrants, a district operates for the benefit of its customers, not the
general public. Fire hydrant services are integral to the water
services provided by a district to its customers.
(2)(a) A district may acquire, construct, operate, and maintain
fire hydrants as part of the district's waterworks system.
(b) A district has the same powers of imposing charges for
providing fire hydrants, collecting fire hydrant service charges, and
financing fire hydrants systems by issuing general obligation bonds,
issuing revenue bonds, and creating improvement districts as it has for
imposing charges for providing water, collecting delinquent water
service charges, and financing water systems by issuing general
obligation bonds, issuing revenue bonds, and creating improvement
districts.
(c) The amount of the rates charged to customers by a district for
providing, operating, and maintaining fire hydrants must correlate with
the costs of providing, operating, and maintaining fire hydrants.
Rates paid by customers for fire hydrants must be used by the district
to finance the provision, operation, and maintenance of fire hydrants.

--- END ---