BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state
building code council has adopted rules relating to laws on
installation of carbon monoxide alarms in homes and buildings. The
legislature finds that amending the state's real estate seller
disclosure forms and ensuring that the responsibility for carbon
monoxide alarms is that of the seller, will aid in implementing this
law.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.06.020 and 2011 c 200 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a transaction for the sale of improved residential real
property, the seller shall, unless the buyer has expressly waived the
right to receive the disclosure statement under RCW 64.06.010, or
unless the transfer is otherwise exempt under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to
the buyer a completed seller disclosure statement in the following
format and that contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER
Please complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If
the question clearly does not apply to the property write "NA." If the
answer is "yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets.
Please refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide
your explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each
page of this disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the
disclosure statement must occur not later than five business days,
unless otherwise agreed, after mutual acceptance of a written contract
to purchase between a buyer and a seller.

NOTICE TO THE BUYER
THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES ARE MADE BY SELLER ABOUT THE CONDITION OF THE
PROPERTY LOCATED AT . . . . . . . . . . . .
("THE PROPERTY"), OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

SELLER MAKES THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES OF EXISTING MATERIAL FACTS OR
MATERIAL DEFECTS TO BUYER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE
PROPERTY AT THE TIME SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT.
UNLESS YOU AND SELLER OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, YOU HAVE THREE
BUSINESS DAYS FROM THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO YOU TO RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A
SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S
AGENT. IF THE SELLER DOES NOT GIVE YOU A COMPLETED DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT, THEN YOU MAY WAIVE THE RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER
THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE AGREEMENT.

THE FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY SELLER AND ARE NOT THE
REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY. THIS
INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF
ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN BUYER AND SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS
PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF
QUALIFIED EXPERTS TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE, WITHOUT
LIMITATION, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS,
ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, ON-SITE WASTEWATER
TREATMENT INSPECTORS, OR STRUCTURAL PEST INSPECTORS. THE PROSPECTIVE
BUYER AND SELLER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR INSPECTIONS
OF THE PROPERTY OR TO PROVIDE APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT
BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE, INSPECTION, DEFECTS OR
WARRANTIES.

Seller . . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the property.

I. SELLER'S DISCLOSURES:

*If you answer "Yes" to a question with an asterisk (*), please explain your answer
and attach documents, if available and not otherwise publicly recorded. If necessary,
use an attached sheet.

1. TITLE

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Do you have legal authority to sell
the property? If no, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is title to the property subject to
any of the following?

(1) First right of refusal

(2) Option

(3) Lease or rental agreement

(4) Life estate?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any encroachments,
boundary agreements, or boundary
disputes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Is there a private road or easement
agreement for access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any rights-of-way,
easements, or access limitations that
may affect the Buyer's use of the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any written agreements
for joint maintenance of an easement or
right-of-way?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Is there any study, survey project,
or notice that would adversely affect the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there any pending or existing
assessments against the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Are there any zoning violations,
nonconforming uses, or any unusual
restrictions on the property that would
affect future construction or
remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Is there a boundary survey for the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Are there any covenants,
conditions, or restrictions recorded
against the property?

2. WATER

A. Household Water

(1) The source of water for the
property is:
[ ] Private or publicly owned water
system
[ ] Private well serving only the
subject property . . . . . .
*[ ] Other water system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *If shared, are there any written
agreements?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) Is there an easement (recorded
or unrecorded) for access to and/or
maintenance of the water source?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Are there any problems or
repairs needed?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (4) During your ownership, has the
source provided an adequate
year-round supply of potable
water? If no, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(5) Are there any water treatment
systems for the property? If yes,
are they [ ]Leased [ ]Owned

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(6) Are there any water rights for
the property associated with its
domestic water supply, such as a
water right permit, certificate, or
claim?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (a) If yes, has the water right
permit, certificate, or claim been
assigned, transferred, or changed?

*(b) If yes, has all or any portion of
the water right not been used for
five or more successive years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(7) Are there any defects in the
operation of the water system (e.g.
pipes, tank, pump, etc.)?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

B. Irrigation Water

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Are there any irrigation water
rights for the property, such as a
water right permit, certificate, or
claim?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(a) If yes, has all or any portion of
the water right not been used for
five or more successive years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(b) If so, is the certificate
available? (If yes, please attach a
copy.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(c) If so, has the water right
permit, certificate, or claim been
assigned, transferred, or changed?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) Does the property receive
irrigation water from a ditch
company, irrigation district, or
other entity? If so, please identify
the entity that supplies water to the
property:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

C. Outdoor Sprinkler System

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Is there an outdoor sprinkler
system for the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) If yes, are there any defects in
the system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) If yes, is the sprinkler system
connected to irrigation water?

3. SEWER/ON-SITE SEWAGE
SYSTEM

A. The property is served by:
[ ] Public sewer system,
[ ] On-site sewage system (including
pipes, tanks, drainfields, and all other
component parts)
[ ] Other disposal system, please
describe:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. If public sewer system service is
available to the property, is the house
connected to the sewer main? If no,
please explain.

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Is the property subject to any
sewage system fees or charges in
addition to those covered in your
regularly billed sewer or on-site sewage
system maintenance service?

D. If the property is connected to an
on-site sewage system:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(1) Was a permit issued for its
construction, and was it approved
by the local health department or
district following its construction?

(2) When was it last pumped ?

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Are there any defects in the
operation of the on-site sewage
system?

[ ] Don't know (4) When was it last inspected?

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

By whom: . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Don't know (5) For how many bedrooms was
the on-site sewage system
approved?

. . . . . . . . . . . . bedrooms

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know E. Are all plumbing fixtures, including
laundry drain, connected to the
sewer/on-site sewage system? If no,
please explain: . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Have there been any changes or
repairs to the on-site sewage system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know G. Is the on-site sewage system,
including the drainfield, located entirely
within the boundaries of the property?
If no, please explain.
. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Does the on-site sewage system
require monitoring and maintenance
services more frequently than once a
year?
. . . . . . . . . . . .

NOTICE: IF THIS RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT IS BEING COMPLETED FOR NEW CONSTRUCTION WHICH
HAS NEVER BEEN OCCUPIED, THE SELLER IS NOT REQUIRED TO
COMPLETE THE QUESTIONS LISTED IN ITEM 4. STRUCTURAL OR ITEM
5. SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

4. STRUCTURAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Has the roof leaked within the last
five years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Has the basement flooded or
leaked?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Have there been any conversions,
additions, or remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(1) If yes, were all building
permits obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) If yes, were all final
inspections obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Do you know the age of the house?
If yes, year of original construction:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Has there been any settling,
slippage, or sliding of the property or its
improvements?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any defects with the
following: (If yes, please check
applicable items and explain.)

□ Foundations
□ Decks
□ Exterior Walls

□ Chimneys □ Interior Walls □ Fire Alarm

□ Doors □ Windows □ Patio

□ Ceilings □ Slab Floors □ Driveways

□ Pools □ Hot Tub □ Sauna

□ Sidewalks □ Outbuildings □ Fireplaces

□ Garage Floors □ Walkways □ Siding

□ Other □ Wood Stoves

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Was a structural pest or "whole
house" inspection done? If yes, when
and by whom was the inspection
completed? . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know H. During your ownership, has the
property had any wood destroying
organism or pest infestation?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know I. Is the attic insulated?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know J. Is the basement insulated?

5. SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

*A. If any of the following systems or
fixtures are included with the transfer,
are there any defects? If yes, please
explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Electrical system, including
wiring, switches, outlets, and
service

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Plumbing system, including pipes,
faucets, fixtures, and toilets

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Hot water tank

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Garbage disposal

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Appliances

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Sump pump

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Heating and cooling systems

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Security system
[ ] Owned [ ] Leased

Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

*B. If any of the following fixtures or
property is included with the transfer,
are they leased? (If yes, please attach
copy of lease.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Security system . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Tanks (type): . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Satellite dish . . . . . .
Other: . . . . . .

*C. Are any of the following kinds of
wood burning appliances present at the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Wood stove?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (2) Fireplace insert?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (3) Pellet stove?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (4) Fireplace?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know If yes, are all of the (1) wood
stoves or (2) fireplace inserts
certified by the U.S. Environmental
Protection Agency as clean burning
appliances to improve air quality
and public health?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Is the property located within a city,
county, or district or within a
department of natural resources fire
protection zone that provides fire
protection services?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know E. Is the property equipped with carbon
monoxide alarms?
(Note: Pursuant to RCW 19.27.530,
seller must equip the residence with
carbon monoxide alarms as required by
the state building code.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know F. Is the property equipped with smoke
alarms?

6. HOMEOWNERS'
ASSOCIATION/COMMON
INTERESTS

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Is there a Homeowners'
Association? Name of Association and
contact information for an officer,
director, employee, or other authorized
agent, if any, who may provide the
association's financial statements,
minutes, bylaws, fining policy, and other
information that is not publicly
available:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Are there regular periodic
assessments:

$. . . per [ ] Month [ ] Year
[ ] Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any pending special
assessments?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any shared "common
areas" or any joint maintenance
agreements (facilities such as walls,
fences, landscaping, pools, tennis
courts, walkways, or other areas co-owned in undivided interest with
others)?

7. ENVIRONMENTAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Have there been any flooding,
standing water, or drainage problems on
the property that affect the property or
access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Does any part of the property
contain fill dirt, waste, or other fill
material?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Is there any material damage to the
property from fire, wind, floods, beach
movements, earthquake, expansive
soils, or landslides?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Are there any shorelines, wetlands,
floodplains, or critical areas on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any substances,
materials, or products in or on the
property that may be environmental
concerns, such as asbestos,
formaldehyde, radon gas, lead-based
paint, fuel or chemical storage tanks, or
contaminated soil or water?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Has the property been used for
commercial or industrial purposes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Is there any soil or groundwater
contamination?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there transmission poles or
other electrical utility equipment
installed, maintained, or buried on the
property that do not provide utility
service to the structures on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Has the property been used as a
legal or illegal dumping site?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Has the property been used as an
illegal drug manufacturing site?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Are there any radio towers in the
area that cause interference with cellular
telephone reception?

8. MANUFACTURED AND
MOBILE HOMES

If the property includes a manufactured
or mobile home,

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Did you make any alterations to the
home? If yes, please describe the
alterations: . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Did any previous owner make any
alterations to the home?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. If alterations were made, were
permits or variances for these alterations
obtained?

9. FULL DISCLOSURE BY
SELLERS

A. Other conditions or defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any other existing material
defects affecting the property that a
prospective buyer should know about?

B. Verification:

The foregoing answers and attached
explanations (if any) are complete and
correct to the best of my/our knowledge
and I/we have received a copy hereof.
I/we authorize all of my/our real estate
licensees, if any, to deliver a copy of
this disclosure statement to other real
estate licensees and all prospective
buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .

NOTICE TO THE BUYER

INFORMATION REGARDING REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS MAY
BE OBTAINED FROM LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES. THIS
NOTICE IS INTENDED ONLY TO INFORM YOU OF WHERE TO OBTAIN
THIS INFORMATION AND IS NOT AN INDICATION OF THE PRESENCE OF
REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS.

II. BUYER'S ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A. Buyer hereby acknowledges that: Buyer has a duty to pay
diligent attention to any material defects that are known to
Buyer or can be known to Buyer by utilizing diligent
attention and observation.

B. The disclosures set forth in this statement and in any
amendments to this statement are made only by the Seller and
not by any real estate licensee or other party.

C. Buyer acknowledges that, pursuant to RCW 64.06.050(2),
real estate licensees are not liable for inaccurate information
provided by Seller, except to the extent that real estate
licensees know of such inaccurate information.

D. This information is for disclosure only and is not intended to
be a part of the written agreement between the Buyer and
Seller.

E. Buyer (which term includes all persons signing the "Buyer's
acceptance" portion of this disclosure statement below) has
received a copy of this Disclosure Statement (including
attachments, if any) bearing Seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT ARE PROVIDED BY
SELLER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME
SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. UNLESS BUYER AND SELLER
OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, BUYER SHALL HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS FROM
THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO
RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN
STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT. YOU MAY WAIVE THE
RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE
AGREEMENT.
BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE
OF THE SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
DATE . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . . . .

(2) If the disclosure statement is being completed for new
construction which has never been occupied, the disclosure statement is
not required to contain and the seller is not required to complete the
questions listed in item 4. Structural or item 5. Systems and
Fixtures.
(3) The seller disclosure statement shall be for disclosure only,
and shall not be considered part of any written agreement between the
buyer and seller of residential property. The seller disclosure
statement shall be only a disclosure made by the seller, and not any
real estate licensee involved in the transaction, and shall not be
construed as a warranty of any kind by the seller or any real estate
licensee involved in the transaction.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.06.013 and 2010 c 64 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a transaction for the sale of commercial real estate, the
seller shall, unless the buyer has expressly waived the right to
receive the disclosure statement under RCW 64.06.010, or unless the
transfer is otherwise exempt under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to the buyer
a completed seller disclosure statement in the following format and
that contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER
Please complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If
the question clearly does not apply to the property write "NA." If the
answer is "yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets.
Please refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide
your explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each
page of this disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the
disclosure statement must occur not later than five business days,
unless otherwise agreed, after mutual acceptance of a written contract
to purchase between a buyer and a seller.

NOTICE TO THE BUYER
THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES ARE MADE BY SELLER ABOUT THE CONDITION OF THE
PROPERTY LOCATED AT . . . . . . . . . . . .
("THE PROPERTY"), OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

SELLER MAKES THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES OF EXISTING MATERIAL FACTS OR
MATERIAL DEFECTS TO BUYER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE
PROPERTY AT THE TIME SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT.
UNLESS YOU AND SELLER OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, YOU HAVE THREE
BUSINESS DAYS FROM THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO YOU TO RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A
SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S
AGENT. IF THE SELLER DOES NOT GIVE YOU A COMPLETED DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT, THEN YOU MAY WAIVE THE RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER
THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE AGREEMENT.

THE FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY SELLER AND ARE NOT THE
REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY. THIS
INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF
ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN BUYER AND SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS
PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF
QUALIFIED EXPERTS TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE, WITHOUT
LIMITATION, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS,
ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, ON-SITE WASTEWATER
TREATMENT INSPECTORS, OR STRUCTURAL PEST INSPECTORS. THE PROSPECTIVE
BUYER AND SELLER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR INSPECTIONS
OF THE PROPERTY OR TO PROVIDE APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT
BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE, INSPECTION, DEFECTS, OR
WARRANTIES.

Seller . . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the property.

I. SELLER'S DISCLOSURES:

*If you answer "Yes" to a question with an asterisk (*), please explain your answer
and attach documents, if available and not otherwise publicly recorded. If
necessary, use an attached sheet.

1. TITLE AND LEGAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Do you have legal authority to sell
the property? If no, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is title to the property subject to
any of the following?

(1) First right of refusal

(2) Option

(3) Lease or rental agreement

(4) Life estate?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any encroachments,
boundary agreements, or boundary
disputes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Is there any leased parking?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Is there a private road or easement
agreement for access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any rights-of-way,
easements, shared use agreements, or
access limitations?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Are there any written agreements
for joint maintenance of an easement or
right-of-way?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there any zoning violations or
nonconforming uses?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Is there a survey for the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Are there any legal actions pending
or threatened that affect the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Is the property in compliance with
the Americans with Disabilities Act?

2. WATER

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any water rights for the
property, such as a water right permit,
certificate, or claim?

3. SEWER/ON-SITE SEWAGE
SYSTEM

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Is the property subject to any sewage
system fees or charges in addition to
those covered in your regularly billed
sewer or on-site sewage system
maintenance service?

4. STRUCTURAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Has the roof leaked within the last
five years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Has any occupied subsurface
flooded or leaked within the last five
years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Have there been any conversions,
additions, or remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(1) If yes, were all building permits
obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) If yes, were all final inspections
obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Has there been any settling,
slippage, or sliding of the property or its
improvements?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any defects with the
following: (If yes, please check
applicable items and explain.)

□ Foundations
□ Slab Floors

□ Doors □ Outbuildings

□ Ceilings □ Exterior Walls

□ Sidewalks □ Siding

□ Other

□ Interior Walls

□ Windows

5. SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know * Are there any defects in the following
systems? If yes, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Electrical system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (2) Plumbing system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (3) Heating and cooling systems

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (4) Fire and security system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (5) Carbon monoxide alarms

6. ENVIRONMENTAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Have there been any flooding,
standing water, or drainage problems on
the property that affect the property or
access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is there any material damage to the
property from fire, wind, floods, beach
movements, earthquake, expansive soils,
or landslides?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any shorelines, wetlands,
floodplains, or critical areas on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any substances,
materials, or products in or on the
property that may be environmental
concerns, such as asbestos,
formaldehyde, radon gas, lead-based
paint, fuel or chemical storage tanks, or
contaminated soil or water?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Is there any soil or groundwater
contamination?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Has the property been used as a
legal or illegal dumping site?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Has the property been used as an
illegal drug manufacturing site?

7. FULL DISCLOSURE BY
SELLERS

A. Other conditions or defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any other existing material
defects affecting the property that a
prospective buyer should know about?

B. Verification:

The foregoing answers and attached
explanations (if any) are complete and
correct to the best of my/our knowledge
and I/we have received a copy hereof.
I/we authorize all of my/our real estate
licensees, if any, to deliver a copy of
this disclosure statement to other real
estate licensees and all prospective
buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .

NOTICE TO BUYER

INFORMATION REGARDING REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS MAY BE
OBTAINED FROM LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES. THIS NOTICE
IS INTENDED ONLY TO INFORM YOU OF WHERE TO OBTAIN THIS
INFORMATION AND IS NOT AN INDICATION OF THE PRESENCE OF
REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS.

II. BUYER'S ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A. Buyer hereby acknowledges that: Buyer has a duty to pay
diligent attention to any material defects that are known to
Buyer or can be known to Buyer by utilizing diligent
attention and observation.

B. The disclosures set forth in this statement and in any
amendments to this statement are made only by the Seller
and not by any real estate licensee or other party.

C. Buyer acknowledges that, pursuant to RCW 64.06.050(2),
real estate licensees are not liable for inaccurate information
provided by Seller, except to the extent that real estate
licensees know of such inaccurate information.

D. This information is for disclosure only and is not intended to
be a part of the written agreement between the Buyer and
Seller.

E. Buyer (which term includes all persons signing the "Buyer's
acceptance" portion of this disclosure statement below) has
received a copy of this Disclosure Statement (including
attachments, if any) bearing Seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT ARE PROVIDED BY
SELLER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME
SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. UNLESS BUYER AND SELLER
OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, BUYER SHALL HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS FROM
THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO
RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN
STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT. YOU MAY WAIVE THE
RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE
AGREEMENT.
BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE
OF THE SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
DATE . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . . . .

(2) The seller disclosure statement shall be for disclosure only,
and shall not be considered part of any written agreement between the
buyer and seller of residential property. The seller disclosure
statement shall be only a disclosure made by the seller, and not any
real estate licensee involved in the transaction, and shall not be
construed as a warranty of any kind by the seller or any real estate
licensee involved in the transaction.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.27.530 and 2009 c 313 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2010, the building code council shall adopt rules
requiring that all buildings classified as residential occupancies, as
defined in the state building code in chapter 51-54 WAC, but excluding
owner-occupied single-family residences legally occupied before July
26, 2009, be equipped with carbon monoxide alarms.
(2)(a) The building code council may phase in the carbon monoxide
alarm requirements on a schedule that it determines reasonable,
provided that the rules require that by January 1, 2011, all newly
constructed buildings classified as residential occupancies will be
equipped with carbon monoxide alarms, and all other buildings
classified as residential occupancies will be equipped with carbon
monoxide alarms by January 1, 2013.
(b) Owner-occupied single-family residences legally occupied before
July 26, 2009, are exempt from the requirements of this subsection (2).
However, for any owner-occupied single-family residence that is sold on
or after July 26, 2009, the seller must equip the residence with carbon
monoxide alarms in accordance with the requirements of the state
building code before the buyer or any other person may legally occupy
the residence following such sale.
(3) The building code council may exempt categories of buildings
classified as residential occupancies if it determines that requiring
carbon monoxide alarms are unnecessary to protect the health and
welfare of the occupants.
(4) The rules adopted by the building code council under this
section must (a) consider applicable nationally accepted standards and
(b) require that the maintenance of a carbon monoxide alarm in a
building where a tenancy exists, including the replacement of
batteries, is the responsibility of the tenant, who shall maintain the
alarm as specified by the manufacturer.
(5) Real estate brokers licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW shall not
be liable in any civil, administrative, or other proceeding for the
failure of any seller or other property owner to comply with the
requirements of this section or rules adopted by the building code
council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act only apply to
real estate transactions for which a purchase and sale agreement is
entered into after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---