BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.60.010 and 1983 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to provide an economic climate conducive to the
retention of skilled workers in industries adversely affected by
general economic downturns and to supplement depressed buying power of
employees affected by such downturns, the legislature finds that the
public interest would be served by the enactment of laws providing
greater flexibility in the payment of unemployment compensation
benefits in situations where qualified employers elect to retain
employees at reduced hours rather than instituting layoffs.
(2) The legislature further finds that an expansion of shared work
through increased marketing will have a substantial positive effect on
employment in Washington and provide benefits to communities,
employers, and employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 50.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The employment security department must expand its efforts in
marketing shared work compensation plans with a goal of doubling the
number of employers with active plans by June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---