BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act is intended to reconcile and
conform amendments made in chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and chapter 171,
Laws of 2011 with other legislation passed during the 2010 and 2011
legislative sessions, as well as provide technical amendments to
codified sections affected by chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and chapter
171, Laws of 2011. Any statutory changes made by this act should be
interpreted as technical in nature and not be interpreted to have any
substantive policy or legal implications.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.80.530 and 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 24 are each amended
to read as follows:
The certified weight ticket shall be of a form approved by the
director and shall contain the following information:
(1) The date of issuance;
(2) The kind of commodity weighed, measured, or counted;
(3) The name of owner, agent, or consignee of the commodity
weighed;
(4) The name of seller, agent, or consignor;
(5) The accurate weight, measure, or count of the commodity
weighed, measured, or counted; including the entry of the gross, tare
and/or net weight, where applicable;
(6) The identifying numerals or symbols, if any, of each container
separately weighed and the ((motor vehicle)) license plate number of
each vehicle separately weighed;
(7) The means by which the commodity was being transported at the
time it was weighed, measured, or counted;
(8) The name of the city or town where such commodity was weighed;
(9) The complete signature of weighmaster or weigher who weighed,
measured, or counted the commodity; and
(10) Such other available information as may be necessary to
distinguish or identify the commodity.
Such weight certificates when so made and properly signed and
sealed shall be prima facie evidence of the accuracy of the weights,
measures, or count shown, as a certified weight, measure, or count.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.08.065 and 1998 c 111 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any public officer having charge of any
vehicle owned or controlled by any county, city, town, or public body
in this state other than the state of Washington and used in public
business to operate the same upon the public highways of this state
unless and until there shall be displayed upon such automobile or other
motor vehicle in letters of contrasting color not less than one and
one-quarter inches in height in a conspicuous place on the right and
left sides thereof, the name of such county, city, town, or other
public body, together with the name of the department or office upon
the business of which the said vehicle is used. This section shall not
apply to vehicles of a sheriff's office, local police department, or
any vehicles used by local peace officers under public authority for
special undercover or confidential investigative purposes. This
subsection shall not apply to: (a) Any municipal transit vehicle
operated for purposes of providing public mass transportation; (b) any
vehicle governed by the requirements of subsection (4) of this section;
nor to (c) any motor vehicle on loan to a school district for driver
training purposes. It shall be lawful and constitute compliance with
the provisions of this section, however, for the governing body of the
appropriate county, city, town, or public body other than the state of
Washington or its agencies to adopt and use a distinctive insignia
which shall be not less than six inches in diameter across its smallest
dimension and which shall be displayed conspicuously on the right and
left sides of the vehicle. Such insignia shall be in a color or colors
contrasting with the vehicle to which applied for maximum visibility.
The name of the public body owning or operating the vehicle shall also
be included as part of or displayed above such approved insignia in
colors contrasting with the vehicle in letters not less than one and
one-quarter inches in height. Immediately below the lettering
identifying the public entity and agency operating the vehicle or below
an approved insignia shall appear the words "for official use only" in
letters at least one inch high in a color contrasting with the color of
the vehicle. The appropriate governing body may provide by rule or
ordinance for marking of passenger motor vehicles as prescribed in
subsection (2) of this section or for exceptions to the marking
requirements for local governmental agencies for the same purposes and
under the same circumstances as permitted for state agencies under
subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Except as provided by subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
passenger motor vehicles owned or controlled by the state of
Washington, and purchased after July 1, 1989, must be plainly and
conspicuously marked on the lower left-hand corner of the rear window
with the name of the operating agency or institution or the words
"state motor pool," as appropriate, the words "state of Washington --
for official use only," and the seal of the state of Washington or the
appropriate agency or institution insignia, approved by the department
of ((general administration)) enterprise services. Markings must be on
a transparent adhesive material and conform to the standards
established by the department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services. For the purposes of this section, "passenger motor vehicles"
means sedans, station wagons, vans, light trucks, or other motor
vehicles under ten thousand pounds gross vehicle weight.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to vehicles used
by the Washington state patrol for general undercover or confidential
investigative purposes. Traffic control vehicles of the Washington
state patrol may be exempted from the requirements of subsection (2) of
this section at the discretion of the chief of the Washington state
patrol. The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services shall adopt general rules permitting other exceptions to the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section for other vehicles used
for law enforcement, confidential public health work, and public
assistance fraud or support investigative purposes, for vehicles leased
or rented by the state on a casual basis for a period of less than
ninety days, and those provided for in RCW 46.08.066(((3))). The
exceptions in this subsection, subsection (4) of this section, and
those provided for in RCW 46.08.066(((3))) shall be the only exceptions
permitted to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Any motorcycle, vehicle over 10,000 pounds gross vehicle
weight, or other vehicle that for structural reasons cannot be marked
as required by subsection (1) or (2) of this section that is owned or
controlled by the state of Washington or by any county, city, town, or
other public body in this state and used for public purposes on the
public highways of this state shall be conspicuously marked in letters
of a contrasting color with the words "State of Washington" or the name
of such county, city, town, or other public body, together with the
name of the department or office that owns or controls the vehicle.
(5) All motor vehicle markings required under the terms of this
chapter shall be maintained in a legible condition at all times.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.10.420 and 2010 c 161 s 231 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each dealer of snowmobiles in this state shall obtain a
snowmobile dealer license from the department in a manner prescribed by
the department. Upon receipt of an application for a snowmobile
dealer's license and the fee provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the dealer is licensed and a snowmobile dealer license number
must be assigned.
(2) The annual license fee for a snowmobile dealer is twenty-five
dollars, which covers all of the snowmobiles offered by a dealer for
sale and not rented on a regular, commercial basis. Snowmobiles rented
on a regular commercial basis by a snowmobile dealer must be registered
separately under RCW 46.10.310, 46.10.400, 46.10.430, and 46.10.440.
(3) Upon the issuance of a snowmobile dealer license, a snowmobile
dealer may purchase, at a cost to be determined by the department,
snowmobile dealer license plates of a size and color to be determined
by the department. The snowmobile dealer license plates must contain
the snowmobile license number assigned to the dealer. Each snowmobile
operated by a dealer, dealer representative, or prospective customer
for the purposes of demonstration or testing shall display snowmobile
dealer license plates in a clearly visible manner.
(4) Only a dealer, dealer representative, or prospective customer
may display a snowmobile dealer plate, and only a dealer, dealer
representative, or prospective customer may use a snowmobile dealer's
license plate for the purposes described in subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Snowmobile dealer licenses are nontransferable.
(6) It is unlawful for any snowmobile dealer to sell a snowmobile
at wholesale or retail, or to test or demonstrate any snowmobile,
within the state, unless the dealer has a snowmobile dealer license as
required under this section.
(7) When a snowmobile is sold by a snowmobile dealer, the dealer:
(a) Shall apply for licensing in the purchaser's name ((within
fifteen days following the sale)) as provided by rules adopted by the
department; and
(b) May issue a temporary license as provided by rules adopted by
the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.12.675 and 2010 c 161 s 316 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A security interest in a vehicle other than one held as
inventory by a manufacturer or a dealer and for which a certificate of
title is required is perfected only by:
(a) Complying with the requirements of RCW 46.12.660 or this
section;
(b) Receipt by the department, county auditor or other agent, or
subagent appointed by the director of:
(i) The existing certificate of title, if any;
(ii) An application for a certificate of title containing the name
and address of the secured party; and
(iii) Payment of the required fees.
(2) A security interest is perfected when it is created if the
secured party's name and address appear on the most recently issued
certificate of title or, if not, it is created when the department,
county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director
receives the certificate of title or an application for a certificate
of title and the fees required in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) If a vehicle is subject to a security interest when brought
into this state, perfection of the security interest is determined by
the law of the jurisdiction where the vehicle was when the security
interest was attached, subject to the following:
(a) The security interest continues perfected in this state if the
name of the secured party is shown on the existing certificate of title
issued by that jurisdiction. The name of the secured party must be
shown on the certificate of title issued for the vehicle by this state.
The security interest continues perfected in this state when the
department issues the certificate of title.
(b) If the security interest was not perfected under the law of the
jurisdiction where the vehicle was when the security interest was
attached, it may be perfected in this state. Perfection begins when
the department receives the information and fees required in subsection
(1) of this section.
(4)(a) After a certificate of title has been issued, the registered
owner or secured party must apply to the department, county auditor or
other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a new
certificate of title when a security interest is granted on a vehicle.
Within ten days after creating a security agreement, the registered
owner or secured party must submit:
(i) An application for a certificate of title;
(ii) The certificate of title last issued for the vehicle, or other
documentation required by the department; and
(iii) The fee required in RCW 46.17.100.
(b) If satisfied that a certificate of title should be reissued,
the department shall change the vehicle record and issue a new
certificate of title to the secured party.
(5) A secured party shall release the security interest when the
conditions within the security agreement have been met and there is no
further secured obligation. The secured party must either:
(a) Assign the certificate of title to the registered owner or the
registered owner's designee and send the certificate of title to the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director with the fee required in RCW 46.17.100; or
(b) Assign the certificate of title to the person acquiring the
vehicle from the registered owner with the registered owner's release
of interest.
(6) The department shall issue a new certificate of title to the
registered owner when the department receives the release of interest
and required fees as provided in subsection (5)(a) of this section.
(7) A secured party is liable for one hundred dollars payable to
the registered owner or person acquiring the vehicle from the
registered owner when:
(a) The secured party fails to either assign the certificate of
title to the registered owner or to the person acquiring the vehicle
from the registered owner or apply for a new certificate of title
within ten days after proper demand; and
(b) The failure of the secured party to act as described in (a) of
this subsection results in a loss to the registered owner or person
acquiring the vehicle from the registered owner.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.16A.090 and 2011 c 320 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall provide an opportunity for a vehicle
owner to make a voluntary donation as provided in this section when
applying for an initial or renewal vehicle registration.
(2)(a) A vehicle owner who registers a vehicle under this chapter
may donate one dollar or more to the organ and tissue donation
awareness account to promote the donation of organs and tissues under
the uniform anatomical gift act as described in chapter 68.64 RCW. The
donation of one or more dollars is voluntary and may be refused by the
vehicle owner.
(b) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall:
(i) Ask a vehicle owner applying for a vehicle registration if the
owner would like to donate one dollar or more;
(ii) Inform a vehicle owner of the option for organ and tissue
donations as required under RCW 46.20.113; and
(iii) Make information booklets or other informational material
available regarding the importance of organ and tissue donations to
vehicle owners.
(c) All reasonable costs associated with the creation of the
donation program created under this section must be paid proportionally
or by another agreement by a participating Washington state organ
procurement organization established for organ and tissue donation
awareness purposes by the Washington state organ procurement
organizations. For the purposes of this section, "reasonable costs"
and "Washington state organ procurement organization" have the same
meaning as in RCW 68.64.010.
(3) The department shall collect from a vehicle owner who pays a
vehicle license fee under RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (d), (e), (g), (h),
(j), (n), (o), or (q) or who registers a vehicle under RCW 46.16A.455
with a declared gross weight of ten thousand pounds or less a voluntary
donation of five dollars. The donation may not be collected from any
vehicle owner actively opting not to participate in the donation
program. The department shall ensure that the opt-out donation under
this section is clear, visible, and prominently displayed in both paper
and online vehicle registration renewals. Notification of intent to
not participate in the donation program must be provided annually at
the time of vehicle registration renewal. The donation must be
deposited in the state parks renewal and stewardship account
established in RCW 79A.05.215 to be used for the operation and
maintenance of state parks.
(4) Beginning with vehicle license fees that are due or will become
due on or after October 1, 2011, a vehicle owner who registers a
vehicle under this chapter may purchase a discover pass for a fee of
thirty dollars, as may be adjusted for inflation under RCW 79A.80.020.
Purchase of the discover pass is voluntary by the vehicle owner. The
discover pass fee must be deposited in the recreation access pass
account created in RCW 79A.80.090. The department, county auditor((,))
or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director is not
responsible for delivering a purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle
owner. The agencies, as defined in RCW 79A.80.010, must deliver the
purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.16A.320 and 2010 c 161 s 425 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A vehicle owner may operate an unregistered vehicle on
public highways under the authority of a trip permit issued by this
state. For purposes of trip permits, a vehicle is considered
unregistered if:
(i) Under reciprocal relations with another jurisdiction, the owner
would be required to register the vehicle in this state;
(ii) Not registered when registration is required under this
chapter;
(iii) The license tabs have expired; or
(((iii))) (iv) The current gross weight license is insufficient for
the load being carried. The licensed gross weight may not exceed
eighty thousand pounds for a combination of vehicles or forty thousand
pounds for a single unit vehicle with three or more axles.
(b) Trip permits are required to move mobile homes or park model
trailers and may only be issued if property taxes are paid in full.
(2) Trip permits may not be:
(a) Issued to vehicles registered under RCW 46.16A.455(5) in lieu
of further registration within the same registration year; or
(b) Used for commercial motor vehicles owned by a motor carrier
subject to RCW 46.32.080 if the motor carrier's department of
transportation number has been placed out of service by the Washington
state patrol. A violation of or a failure to comply with this
subsection is a gross misdemeanor, subject to a minimum monetary
penalty of two thousand five hundred dollars for the first violation
and five thousand dollars for each subsequent violation.
(3)(a) Each trip permit authorizes the operation of a single
vehicle at the maximum legal weight limit for the vehicle for a period
of three consecutive days beginning with the day of first use. No more
than three trip permits may be used for any one vehicle in any thirty
consecutive day period. No more than two trip permits may be used for
any one recreational vehicle, as defined in RCW 43.22.335, in a one-year period. Every trip permit must:
(i) Identify the vehicle for which it is issued;
(ii) Be completed in its entirety;
(iii) Be signed by the operator before operation of the vehicle on
the public highways of this state;
(iv) Not be altered or corrected. Altering or correcting data on
the trip permit invalidates the trip permit; and
(v) Be displayed on the vehicle for which it is issued as required
by the department.
(b) Vehicles operating under the authority of trip permits are
subject to all laws, rules, and regulations affecting the operation of
similar vehicles in this state.
(4) Prorate operators operating commercial vehicles on trip permits
in Washington shall retain the customer copy of each permit for four
years.
(5) Trip permits may be obtained from field offices of the
department of transportation, department of licensing, county auditors
or other agents, and subagents appointed by the department for the fee
provided in RCW 46.17.400(1)(h). Exchanges, credits, or refunds may
not be given for trip permits after they have been purchased.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, a
violation of or a failure to comply with this section is a gross
misdemeanor.
(7) The department may adopt rules necessary to administer this
section.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.17.350 and 2010 c 161 s 531 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to
pay the following vehicle license fee by vehicle type:

VEHICLE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Auto stage, six seats or less $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(b) Camper $ 4.90 $ 3.50 RCW 46.68.030

(c) Commercial trailer $ 34.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.035

(d) For hire vehicle, six seats
or less $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(e) Mobile home (if registered) $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(f) Moped $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(g) Motor home $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(h) Motorcycle $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(i) Off-road vehicle $ 18.00 $ 18.00 RCW 46.68.045

(j) Passenger car $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(k) Private use single-axle
trailer $ 15.00 $ 15.00 RCW 46.68.035(((2)))

(l) Snowmobile $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.350

(m) Snowmobile, vintage $ 12.00 $ 12.00 RCW 46.68.350

(n) Sport utility vehicle $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(o) Tow truck $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(p) Trailer, over 2000 pounds $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(q) Travel trailer $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(2) The vehicle license fee required in subsection (1) of this
section is in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005,
and any other fee or tax required by law.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.18.060 and 2011 c 367 s 703, 2011 c 229 s 5, 2011
c 225 s 4, and 2011 c 171 s 66 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department must process, review, and either approve or
reject special license plate applications submitted by sponsoring
organizations. The department must also confirm that the sponsoring
organization has submitted all required documentation. If an
incomplete application is received, the department must return it to
the sponsoring organization.
(2) Duties of the department include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) Compile, review, and approve the annual financial reports
submitted by sponsoring organizations with active special license plate
series and present those annual financial reports to the joint
transportation committee;
(b) Report annually to the joint transportation committee on the
special license plate applications that were considered by the
department;
(c) Issue approval and rejection notification letters to sponsoring
organizations, the executive committee of the joint transportation
committee, and the legislative sponsors identified in each application.
The letters must be issued within seven days of making a determination
on the status of an application; and
(d) Review annually the number of plates sold for each special
license plate series created after January 1, 2003. The department may
submit a recommendation to discontinue a special plate series to the
executive committee of the joint transportation committee.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.18.245, in order to assess the
effects and impact of the proliferation of special license plates, the
legislature declares a temporary moratorium on the issuance of any
additional plates until July 1, 2013. During this period of time, the
department is prohibited from accepting, reviewing, processing, or
approving any applications. Additionally, a special license plate may
not be enacted by the legislature during the moratorium, unless the
proposed license plate has been approved by the former special license
plate review board before February 15, 2005.
(4) ((The volunteer firefighters license plates created under RCW
46.18.200 are exempt from the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) The Music Matters license plates created under RCW 46.18.200
are exempt from the requirements of subsection (3) of this section))
The limitations under subsection (3) of this section do not apply to
the following special license plates:
(a) Music Matters license plates created under RCW 46.18.200;
(b) Volunteer firefighters license plates created under RCW
46.18.200.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.18.280 and 2011 c 332 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A registered owner who has been awarded a Purple Heart medal by
any branch of the United States armed forces, including the merchant
marines and the women's air forces service pilots may apply to the
department for special license plates for use on only one motor vehicle
required to display one or two license plates, excluding vehicles
registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions
established by the department, and owned by the qualified applicant.
The applicant must:
(a) Be a resident of this state;
(b) Have been wounded during one of this nation's wars or conflicts
identified in RCW 41.04.005;
(c) Have received an honorable discharge from the United States
armed forces;
(d) Provide a copy of the armed forces document showing the
recipient was awarded the Purple Heart medal;
(e) Be recorded as the registered owner of the motor vehicle on
which the Purple Heart ((survivor)) license plate or plates will be
displayed; and
(f) Pay all fees and taxes required by law for registering the
motor vehicle.
(2) Purple Heart license plates must be issued without the payment
of any special license plate fee.
(3) Purple Heart license plates may be issued to the surviving
spouse or domestic partner of a Purple Heart recipient who met the
requirements in subsection (1) of this section. The surviving spouse
or domestic partner must be a resident of this state. If the surviving
spouse remarries or the surviving domestic partner marries or enters
into a new domestic partnership, he or she must return the special
license plates to the department within fifteen days and apply for
regular license plates or another type of special license plate.
(4) A Purple Heart license plate or plates may be transferred from
one motor vehicle to another motor vehicle owned by the Purple Heart
recipient or the surviving spouse or domestic partner as described in
subsection (3) of this section upon application to the department,
county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.

Sec. 11 RCW 46.19.050 and 2011 c 171 s 74 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) False information. Knowingly providing false information in
conjunction with the application for special parking privileges for
persons with disabilities is a gross misdemeanor punishable under
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Unauthorized use. Any unauthorized use of the special placard,
special license, or identification card issued under this chapter is a
parking infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty
dollars. In addition to any penalty or fine imposed under this
subsection, two hundred dollars must be assessed.
(3) Inaccessible access. It is a parking infraction, with a
monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars, for a person to park in,
block, or otherwise make inaccessible the access aisle located next to
a space reserved for persons with physical disabilities. In addition
to any penalty or fine imposed under this subsection, two hundred
dollars must be assessed. The clerk of the court shall report all
violations related to this subsection to the department.
(4) Parking without placard/plate. It is a parking infraction,
with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars, for any person to
park a vehicle in a parking place provided on private property without
charge or on public property reserved for persons with physical
disabilities without a placard or special license plate issued under
this chapter. In addition to any penalty or fine imposed under this
subsection, two hundred dollars must be assessed. If a person is
charged with a violation, the person will not be determined to have
committed an infraction if the person produces in court or before the
court appearance the placard or special license plate issued under this
chapter as required under this chapter. A local jurisdiction providing
nonmetered, on-street parking places reserved for persons with physical
disabilities may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less than
four hours on the use of these parking places.
(5) Time restrictions. A local jurisdiction may impose by
ordinance time restrictions of no less than four hours on the use of
nonreserved, on-street parking spaces by vehicles displaying the
special parking placards or special license plates issued under this
chapter. All time restrictions must be clearly posted.
(6) Allocation and use of funds - reimbursement. (a) The
assessment imposed under subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section
must be allocated as follows:
(i) One hundred dollars must be deposited in the accessible
communities account created in RCW 50.40.071; and
(ii) One hundred dollars must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account under RCW 47.66.070 for the sole purpose of
supplementing a grant program for special needs transportation provided
by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of transportation that is
administered by the department of transportation.
(b) Any reduction in any penalty or fine and assessment imposed
under subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section must be applied
proportionally between the penalty or fine and the assessment. When a
reduced penalty is imposed under subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this
section, the amount deposited in the accounts identified in (a) of this
subsection must be reduced equally and proportionally.
(c) The penalty or fine amounts must be used by that local
jurisdiction exclusively for law enforcement. The court may also
impose an additional penalty sufficient to reimburse the local
jurisdiction for any costs that it may have incurred in the removal and
storage of the improperly parked vehicle.
(7) Illegal obtainment. Except as provided in subsection (1) of
this section, it is a traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars for any person willfully to obtain a special
license plate, placard, or identification card issued under this
chapter in a manner other than that established under this chapter.
(8) Volunteer appointment. A law enforcement agency authorized to
enforce parking laws may appoint volunteers, with a limited commission,
to issue notices of infractions for violations of ((RCW 46.19.010))
this section and RCW 46.19.030 or 46.61.581. Volunteers must be at
least twenty-one years of age. The law enforcement agency appointing
volunteers may establish any other qualifications that the agency deems
desirable.
(a) An agency appointing volunteers under this section must provide
training to the volunteers before authorizing them to issue notices of
infractions.
(b) A notice of infraction issued by a volunteer appointed under
this subsection has the same force and effect as a notice of infraction
issued by a police officer for the same offense.
(c) A police officer or a volunteer may request a person to show
the person's identification card or special parking placard when
investigating the possibility of a violation of this section. If the
request is refused, the person in charge of the vehicle may be issued
a notice of infraction for a violation of this section.
(9) Community restitution. For second or subsequent violations of
this section, in addition to a monetary penalty, the violator must
complete a minimum of forty hours of:
(a) Community restitution for a nonprofit organization that serves
persons with disabilities or disabling diseases; or
(b) Any other community restitution that may sensitize the violator
to the needs and obstacles faced by persons with disabilities.
(10) Fine suspension. The court may not suspend more than one-half
of any fine imposed under subsection (2), (3), (4), or (7) of this
section.

Sec. 12 RCW 46.20.220 and 2010 c 8 s 9020 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to rent a motor vehicle of
any kind including a motorcycle to any other person unless the latter
person is then duly licensed as a vehicle driver for the kind of motor
vehicle being rented in this state or, in case of a nonresident, then
that he or she is duly licensed as a driver under the laws of the state
or country of his or her residence except a nonresident whose home
state or country does not require that a motor vehicle driver be
licensed;
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person to rent a motor vehicle to
another person until he or she has inspected the vehicle driver's
license of such other person and compared and verified the signature
thereon with the signature of such other person written in his or her
presence;
(3) Every person renting a motor vehicle to another person shall
keep a record of the ((vehicle)) license plate number of the motor
vehicle so rented, the name and address of the person to whom the motor
vehicle is rented, the number of the vehicle driver's license of the
person renting the vehicle, and the date and place when and where such
vehicle driver's license was issued. Such record shall be open to
inspection by any police officer or anyone acting for the director.

Sec. 13 RCW 46.20.349 and 2010 c 8 s 9026 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any police officer who has received notice of the suspension or
revocation of a driver's license from the department of licensing may,
during the reported period of such suspension or revocation, stop any
motor vehicle identified by its ((vehicle)) license plate number as
being registered to the person whose driver's license has been
suspended or revoked. The driver of such vehicle shall display his or
her driver's license upon request of the police officer.

Sec. 14 RCW 46.30.020 and 2011 c 171 s 76 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to
registration under chapter 46.16A RCW in this state unless the person
is insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with liability limits
of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, is self-insured as
provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a certificate of deposit in
conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a liability bond of at
least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Written proof of
financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided
on the request of a law enforcement officer in the format specified
under RCW 46.30.030.
(b) A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be
registered in another state that requires drivers and owners of
vehicles in that state to maintain insurance or financial
responsibility shall, when requested by a law enforcement officer,
provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance as is
required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.
(c) When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to
display an insurance identification card as specified under RCW
46.30.030 creates a presumption that the person does not have motor
vehicle insurance.
(d) Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a
traffic infraction and is subject to penalties as set by the supreme
court under RCW 46.63.110 or community restitution.
(2) If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section appears in person before the court or a violations bureau and
provides written evidence that at the time the person was cited, he or
she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be dismissed and the
court or violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of
twenty-five dollars at the time of dismissal. In lieu of personal
appearance, a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section may, before the date scheduled for the person's appearance
before the court or violations bureau, submit by mail to the court or
violations bureau written evidence that at the time the person was
cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in which case the
citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court or
violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five
dollars at the time of dismissal.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not govern:
(a) The operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW 46.18.220
or 46.18.255, governed by RCW 46.16A.170, or registered with the
Washington utilities and transportation commission as common or
contract carriers; or
(b) The operation of a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a
motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined
in RCW 46.04.304.
(4) RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle
liability policies required by this chapter but only those certified
for the purposes stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 46.52.020 and 2002 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in
the injury to or death of any person or involving striking the body of
a deceased person shall immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of
such accident or as close thereto as possible but shall then forthwith
return to, and in every event remain at, the scene of such accident
until he or she has fulfilled the requirements of subsection (3) of
this section; every such stop shall be made without obstructing traffic
more than is necessary.
(2)(a) The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting
only in damage to a vehicle which is driven or attended by any person
or damage to other property must move the vehicle as soon as possible
off the roadway or freeway main lanes, shoulders, medians, and adjacent
areas to a location on an exit ramp shoulder, the frontage road, the
nearest suitable cross street, or other suitable location. The driver
shall remain at the suitable location until he or she has fulfilled the
requirements of subsection (3) of this section. Moving the vehicle in
no way affects fault for an accident.
(b) A law enforcement officer or representative of the department
of transportation may cause a motor vehicle, cargo, or debris to be
moved from the roadway; and neither the department of transportation
representative, nor anyone acting under the direction of the officer or
the department of transportation representative is liable for damage to
the motor vehicle, cargo, or debris caused by reasonable efforts of
removal.
(3) Unless otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section,
the driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury
to or death of any person, or involving striking the body of a deceased
person, or resulting in damage to any vehicle which is driven or
attended by any person or damage to other property shall give his or
her name, address, insurance company, insurance policy number, and
vehicle license plate number and shall exhibit his or her vehicle
driver's license to any person struck or injured or the driver or any
occupant of, or any person attending, any such vehicle collided with
and shall render to any person injured in such accident reasonable
assistance, including the carrying or the making of arrangements for
the carrying of such person to a physician or hospital for medical
treatment if it is apparent that such treatment is necessary or if such
carrying is requested by the injured person or on his or her behalf.
Under no circumstances shall the rendering of assistance or other
compliance with the provisions of this subsection be evidence of the
liability of any driver for such accident.
(4)(a) Any driver covered by the provisions of subsection (1) of
this section failing to stop or comply with any of the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section in the case of an accident resulting in
death is guilty of a class B felony and, upon conviction, is punishable
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b) Any driver covered by the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section failing to stop or comply with any of the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section in the case of an accident resulting in
injury is guilty of a class C felony and, upon conviction, is
punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(c) Any driver covered by the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section failing to stop or comply with any of the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section in the case of an accident involving
striking the body of a deceased person is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
(d) This subsection shall not apply to any person injured or
incapacitated by such accident to the extent of being physically
incapable of complying with this section.
(5) Any driver covered by the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section failing to stop or to comply with any of the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section under said circumstances shall be guilty
of a gross misdemeanor: PROVIDED, That this provision shall not apply
to any person injured or incapacitated by such accident to the extent
of being physically incapable of complying herewith.
(6) The license or permit to drive or any nonresident privilege to
drive of any person convicted under this section or any local ordinance
consisting of substantially the same language as this section of
failure to stop and give information or render aid following an
accident with any vehicle driven or attended by any person shall be
revoked by the department.
(7) If none of the persons specified are in condition to receive
the information to which they otherwise would be entitled under
subsection (3) of this section, and no police officer is present, the
driver of any vehicle involved in such accident after fulfilling all
other requirements of subsections (1) and (3) of this section insofar
as possible on his or her part to be performed, shall forthwith report
such accident to the nearest office of the duly authorized police
authority and submit thereto the information specified in subsection
(3) of this section.

Sec. 16 RCW 46.55.030 and 2010 c 8 s 9061 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Application for licensing as a registered tow truck operator
shall be made on forms furnished by the department, shall be
accompanied by an inspection certification from the Washington state
patrol, shall be signed by the applicant or an agent, and shall include
the following information:
(a) The name and address of the person, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation under whose name the business is to be
conducted;
(b) The names and addresses of all persons having an interest in
the business, or if the owner is a corporation, the names and addresses
of the officers of the corporation;
(c) The names and addresses of all employees who serve as tow truck
drivers;
(d) Proof of minimum insurance required by subsection (3) of this
section;
(e) The vehicle license plate and vehicle identification numbers of
all tow trucks of which the applicant is the registered owner;
(f) Any other information the department may require; and
(g) A certificate of approval from the Washington state patrol
certifying that:
(i) The applicant has an established place of business and that
mail is received at the address shown on the application;
(ii) The address of any storage locations where vehicles may be
stored is correctly stated on the application;
(iii) The place of business has an office area that is accessible
to the public without entering the storage area; and
(iv) The place of business has adequate and secure storage
facilities, as defined in this chapter and the rules of the department,
where vehicles and their contents can be properly stored and protected.
(2) Before issuing a registration certificate to an applicant, the
department shall require the applicant to file with the department a
surety bond in the amount of five thousand dollars running to the state
and executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this
state. The bond shall be approved as to form by the attorney general
and conditioned that the operator shall conduct his or her business in
conformity with the provisions of this chapter pertaining to abandoned
or unauthorized vehicles, and to compensate any person, company, or the
state for failure to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted
hereunder, or for fraud, negligence, or misrepresentation in the
handling of these vehicles. Any person injured by the tow truck
operator's failure to fully perform duties imposed by this chapter and
the rules adopted hereunder, or an ordinance or resolution adopted by
a city, town, or county is entitled to recover actual damages,
including reasonable attorneys' fees against the surety and the tow
truck operator. Successive recoveries against the bond shall be
permitted, but the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons
shall not exceed the amount of the bond. As a condition of authority
to do business, the operator shall keep the bond in full force and
effect. Failure to maintain the penalty value of the bond or
cancellation of the bond by the surety automatically cancels the
operator's registration.
(3) Before the department may issue a registration certificate to
an applicant, the applicant shall provide proof of minimum insurance
requirements of:
(a) One hundred thousand dollars for liability for bodily injury or
property damage per occurrence; and
(b) Fifty thousand dollars of legal liability per occurrence, to
protect against vehicle damage, including but not limited to fire and
theft, from the time a vehicle comes into the custody of an operator
until it is redeemed or sold.
Cancellation of or failure to maintain the insurance required by
(a) and (b) of this subsection automatically cancels the operator's
registration.
(4) The fee for each original registration and annual renewal is
one hundred dollars per company, plus fifty dollars per truck. The
department shall forward the registration fee to the state treasurer
for deposit in the motor vehicle fund.
(5) The applicant must submit an inspection certificate from the
state patrol before the department may issue or renew an operator's
registration certificate or tow truck permits.
(6) Upon approval of the application, the department shall issue a
registration certificate to the registered operator to be displayed
prominently at the operator's place of business.

Sec. 17 RCW 46.61.723 and 2011 c 171 s 82 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person
may operate a medium-speed electric vehicle upon a highway of this
state having a speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less, or
forty-five miles per hour or less as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, if:
(a) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
upon state highways that are listed in chapter 47.17 RCW;
(b) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first having obtained and having
in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle ((license))
registration and display vehicle license ((number)) plates in
compliance with chapter 46.16A RCW. The department must track medium-speed electric vehicles in a separate registration category for
reporting purposes;
(c) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first obtaining a valid driver's
license issued to Washington residents in compliance with chapter 46.20
RCW;
(d) The person does not operate a medium-speed electric vehicle
subject to registration under chapter 46.16A RCW on a highway of this
state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability
policy in compliance with chapter 46.30 RCW; and
(e) The person operating a medium-speed electric vehicle does not
cross a roadway with a speed limit in excess of thirty-five miles per
hour, or forty-five miles per hour as provided in subsection (4) of
this section, unless the crossing begins and ends on a roadway with a
speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less, or forty-five miles
per hour or less as provided in subsection (4) of this section, and
occurs at an intersection of approximately ninety degrees, except that
the operator of a medium-speed electric vehicle must not cross an
uncontrolled intersection of streets and highways that are part of the
state highway system subject to Title 47 RCW unless that intersection
has been authorized by local authorities under subsection (3) of this
section.
(2) Any person who violates this section commits a traffic
infraction.
(3) This section does not prevent local authorities, with respect
to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the
reasonable exercise of their police power, from regulating the
operation of medium-speed electric vehicles on streets and highways
under their jurisdiction by resolution or ordinance of the governing
body, if the regulation is consistent with this title, except that:
(a) Local authorities may not authorize the operation of medium-speed electric vehicles on streets and highways that are part of the
state highway system subject to Title 47 RCW;
(b) Local authorities may not prohibit the operation of medium-speed electric vehicles upon highways of this state having a speed
limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less; and
(c) Local authorities may not establish requirements for the
registration ((and licensing)) of medium-speed electric vehicles.
(4) In counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the
mainland are ferry routes, a person may operate a medium-speed electric
vehicle upon a highway of this state having a speed limit of forty-five
miles per hour or less. A person operating a medium-speed electric
vehicle as authorized under this subsection must not cross a roadway
with a speed limit in excess of forty-five miles per hour, unless the
crossing begins and ends on a roadway with a speed limit of forty-five
miles per hour or less and occurs at an intersection of approximately
ninety degrees, except that the operator of a medium-speed electric
vehicle must not cross an uncontrolled intersection of streets and
highways that are part of the state highway system subject to Title 47
RCW unless that intersection has been authorized by local authorities
under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Accidents must be recorded and tracked in compliance with
chapter 46.52 RCW. An accident report must indicate and be tracked
separately when any of the vehicles involved are a medium-speed
electric vehicle.

Sec. 18 RCW 46.61.725 and 2011 c 171 s 83 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Absent prohibition by local authorities authorized under this
section and except as prohibited elsewhere in this section, a person
may operate a neighborhood electric vehicle upon a highway of this
state having a speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less, or
forty-five miles per hour or less as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, if:
(a) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
upon state highways that are listed in chapter 47.17 RCW;
(b) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first having obtained and having
in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle ((license))
registration and display vehicle license ((number)) plates in
compliance with chapter 46.16A RCW. The department must track
neighborhood electric vehicles in a separate registration category for
reporting purposes;
(c) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first obtaining a valid driver's
license issued to Washington residents in compliance with chapter 46.20
RCW;
(d) The person does not operate a neighborhood electric vehicle
subject to registration under chapter 46.16A RCW on a highway of this
state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability
policy in compliance with chapter 46.30 RCW; and
(e) The person operating a neighborhood electric vehicle does not
cross a roadway with a speed limit in excess of thirty-five miles per
hour, or forty-five miles per hour as provided in subsection (4) of
this section, unless the crossing begins and ends on a roadway with a
speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less, or forty-five miles
per hour or less as provided in subsection (4) of this section, and
occurs at an intersection of approximately ninety degrees, except that
the operator of a neighborhood electric vehicle must not cross an
uncontrolled intersection of streets and highways that are part of the
state highway system subject to Title 47 RCW unless that intersection
has been authorized by local authorities provided elsewhere in this
section.
(2) Any person who violates this section commits a traffic
infraction.
(3) This section does not prevent local authorities, with respect
to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the
reasonable exercise of their police power, from regulating the
operation of neighborhood electric vehicles on streets and highways
under their jurisdiction by resolution or ordinance of the governing
body, if the regulation is consistent with the provisions of this
title, except that:
(a) Local authorities may not authorize the operation of
neighborhood electric vehicles on streets and highways that are part of
the state highway system subject to the provisions of Title 47 RCW;
(b) Local authorities may not prohibit the operation of
neighborhood electric vehicles upon highways of this state having a
speed limit of twenty-five miles per hour or less; and
(c) Local authorities are prohibited from establishing any
requirements for the registration ((and licensing)) of neighborhood
electric vehicles.
(4) In counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the
mainland are ferry routes, a person may operate a neighborhood electric
vehicle upon a highway of this state having a speed limit of forty-five
miles per hour or less. A person operating a neighborhood electric
vehicle as authorized under this subsection must not cross a roadway
with a speed limit in excess of forty-five miles per hour, unless the
crossing begins and ends on a roadway with a speed limit of forty-five
miles per hour or less and occurs at an intersection of approximately
ninety degrees, except that the operator of a neighborhood electric
vehicle must not cross an uncontrolled intersection of streets and
highways that are part of the state highway system subject to Title 47
RCW unless that intersection has been authorized by local authorities
under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Accidents must be recorded and tracked in compliance with
chapter 46.52 RCW. An accident report must indicate and be tracked
separately when any of the vehicles involved are a neighborhood
electric vehicle.

Sec. 19 RCW 46.63.060 and 2011 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A notice of traffic infraction represents a determination that
an infraction has been committed. The determination will be final
unless contested as provided in this chapter.
(2) The form for the notice of traffic infraction shall be
prescribed by rule of the supreme court and shall include the
following:
(a) A statement that the notice represents a determination that a
traffic infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice
and that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided
in this chapter;
(b) A statement that a traffic infraction is a noncriminal offense
for which imprisonment may not be imposed as a sanction; that the
penalty for a traffic infraction may include sanctions against the
person's driver's license including suspension, revocation, or denial;
that the penalty for a traffic infraction related to standing,
stopping, or parking may include nonrenewal of the vehicle ((license))
registration;
(c) A statement of the specific traffic infraction for which the
notice was issued;
(d) A statement of the monetary penalty established for the traffic
infraction;
(e) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(f) A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination
the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the person may
subpoena witnesses including the officer who issued the notice of
infraction;
(g) A statement that at any hearing requested for the purpose of
explaining mitigating circumstances surrounding the commission of the
infraction the person will be deemed to have committed the infraction
and may not subpoena witnesses;
(h) A statement that the person must respond to the notice as
provided in this chapter within fifteen days or the person's driver's
license or driving privilege will be suspended by the department until
any penalties imposed pursuant to this chapter have been satisfied; and
(i) A statement that failure to appear at a hearing requested for
the purpose of contesting the determination or for the purpose of
explaining mitigating circumstances will result in the suspension of
the person's driver's license or driving privilege, or in the case of
a standing, stopping, or parking violation, refusal of the department
to renew the vehicle ((license)) registration, until any penalties
imposed pursuant to this chapter have been satisfied.
(3) A form for a notice of traffic infraction printed after July
22, 2011, must include a statement that the person may be able to enter
into a payment plan with the court under RCW 46.63.110.

Sec. 20 RCW 46.68.425 and 2011 c 171 s 88 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW
46.17.220;
(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue
and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it; and
(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.
(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle fund until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate.
Upon determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special
license plate fees to the following accounts by special license plate
type:

SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE TYPE ACCOUNT CONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS

Armed forces RCW 43.60A.140 N/A

Endangered wildlife RCW 77.12.170 Must be used only for the department of
fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife
program activities

Keep kids safe RCW 43.121.100 As specified in RCW ((43.121.050))
43.121.100

Washington state parks RCW 79A.05.059 Provide public educational opportunities
and enhancement of Washington state
parks

Washington's wildlife collection RCW 77.12.170 Only for the department of fish and
wildlife's game species management
activities

Wild on Washington RCW 77.12.170 Dedicated to the department of fish and
wildlife's watchable wildlife activities, as
defined in RCW 77.32.560

Sec. 21 RCW 46.70.011 and 2010 c 161 s 1130 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Auction" means a transaction conducted by means of exchanges
between an auctioneer and the members of the audience, constituting a
series of oral invitations for offers for the purchase of vehicles made
by the auctioneer, offers to purchase by members of the audience, and
the acceptance of the highest or most favorable offer to purchase.
(2) "Auction company" means a sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, or other legal or commercial entity licensed under chapter
18.11 RCW that only sells or offers to sell vehicles at auction or only
arranges or sponsors auctions.
(3) "Buyer's agent" means any person, firm, partnership,
association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
or corporation retained or employed by a consumer to arrange for or to
negotiate, or both, the purchase or lease of a new motor vehicle on
behalf of the consumer, and who is paid a fee or receives other
compensation from the consumer for its services.
(4) "Department" means the department of licensing, which shall
administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(5) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(6) "Established place of business" means a location meeting the
requirements of RCW 46.70.023(1) at which a vehicle dealer conducts
business in this state.
(7) "Listing dealer" means a used mobile home dealer who makes
contracts with sellers who will compensate the dealer for obtaining a
willing purchaser for the seller's mobile home.
(8) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or
assembles new and unused vehicles or remanufactures vehicles in whole
or in part and further includes the terms:
(a) "Distributor," which means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in part
offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new and unused vehicle to
vehicle dealers or who maintains factory representatives.
(b) "Factory branch," which means a branch office maintained by a
manufacturer for the purpose of selling or offering for sale, vehicles
to a distributor, wholesaler, or vehicle dealer, or for directing or
supervising in whole or in part factory or distributor representatives,
and further includes any sales promotion organization, whether a
person, firm, or corporation, which is engaged in promoting the sale of
new and unused vehicles in this state of a particular brand or make to
vehicle dealers.
(c) "Factory representative," which means a representative employed
by a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch for the purpose of
making or promoting for the sale of their vehicles or for supervising
or contracting with their dealers or prospective dealers.
(9) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle which is self-propelled and
every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from
overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails, and which is
required to be registered and titled under this title.
(10) "New motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is self-propelled and is required to be registered and titled under this title,
has not been previously titled to a retail purchaser or lessee, and is
not a "used vehicle" as defined under RCW 46.04.660.
(11) "Principal place of business" means that dealer firm's
business location in the state, which place the dealer designates as
their principal place of business.
(12) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home,
truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily designed and used as
temporary living quarters, is either self-propelled or mounted on or
drawn by another vehicle, is transient, is not occupied as a primary
residence, and is not immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile
home lot.
(13) "Retail vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who may buy and
sell at both wholesale and retail.
(14) "Subagency" means any place of business of a vehicle dealer
within the state, which place is physically and geographically
separated from the principal place of business of the firm or any place
of business of a vehicle dealer within the state, at which place the
firm does business using a name other than the principal name of the
firm, or both.
(15) "Temporary subagency" means a location other than the
principal place of business or subagency within the state where a
licensed vehicle dealer may secure a license to conduct the business
and is licensed for a period of time not to exceed ten days for a
specific purpose such as auto shows, shopping center promotions, tent
sales, exhibitions, or similar merchandising ventures. No more than
six temporary subagency licenses may be issued to a licensee in any
twelve-month period.
(16) "Vehicle" means and includes every device capable of being
moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or
property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway,
excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively
upon stationary rails or tracks.
(17) "Vehicle dealer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, not excluded by subsection (18) of this section,
engaged in the business of buying, selling, listing, exchanging,
offering, brokering, leasing with an option to purchase, auctioning,
soliciting, or advertising the sale of new or used vehicles, or
arranging or offering or attempting to solicit or negotiate on behalf
of others, a sale, purchase, or exchange of an interest in new or used
motor vehicles, irrespective of whether the motor vehicles are owned by
that person. Vehicle dealers shall be classified as follows:
(a) A "motor vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals in new
or used motor vehicles, or both;
(b) A "mobile home and travel trailer dealer" is a vehicle dealer
that deals in mobile homes, park trailers, or travel trailers, or more
than one type of these vehicles;
(c) A "miscellaneous vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals
in motorcycles or vehicles other than motor vehicles or mobile homes
and travel trailers or any combination of such vehicles;
(d) A "recreational vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals
in travel trailers, motor homes, truck campers, or camping trailers
that are primarily designed and used as temporary living quarters, are
either self-propelled or mounted on or drawn by another vehicle, are
transient, are not occupied as a primary residence, and are not
immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile home lot.
(18) "Vehicle dealer" does not include, nor do the licensing
requirements of RCW 46.70.021 apply to, the following persons, firms,
associations, or corporations:
(a) Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or
other persons appointed by, or acting under a judgment or order of, any
court; or
(b) Public officers while performing their official duties; or
(c) Employees of vehicle dealers who are engaged in the specific
performance of their duties as such employees; or
(d) Any person engaged in an isolated sale of a vehicle in which
that person is the registered or legal owner, or both, thereof; or
(e) Any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, engaged
in the selling of equipment other than vehicles, subject to
registration, used for agricultural or industrial purposes; or
(f) A real estate broker licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW, or an
affiliated licensee, who, on behalf of another negotiates the purchase,
sale, lease, or exchange of a manufactured or mobile home in
conjunction with the purchase, sale, exchange, rental, or lease of the
land upon which the manufactured or mobile home is, or will be,
located; or
(g) Owners who are also operators of special highway construction
equipment, as defined in RCW 46.04.551, or of the highway construction
equipment for which a vehicle ((license)) registration and display of
vehicle license ((number)) plates is required; or
(h) Any bank, trust company, savings bank, mutual savings bank,
savings and loan association, credit union, and any parent, subsidiary,
or affiliate thereof, authorized to do business in this state under
state or federal law with respect to the sale or other disposition of
a motor vehicle owned and used in their business; or with respect to
the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the entity has acquired an interest as a lessor, lessee, or
secured party; or
(i) Any person who is regularly engaged in the business of
acquiring leases or installment contracts by assignment, with respect
to the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the person has acquired an interest as a result of the business.
(19) "Vehicle salesperson" means any person who for any form of
compensation sells, auctions, leases with an option to purchase, or
offers to sell or to so lease vehicles on behalf of a vehicle dealer.
(20) "Wholesale vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who buys and
sells other than at retail.

Sec. 22 RCW 46.71.080 and 2011 c 171 s 93 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever a vehicle ((license)) registration renewal form under RCW
46.16A.110 is given to the registered owner of any vehicle, the
department of licensing shall give to the owner written notice of the
provisions of this chapter in a manner prescribed by the director of
licensing.

Sec. 23 RCW 46.85.060 and 1987 c 142 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the absence of an agreement or arrangement with another
jurisdiction, the department may examine the laws and requirements of
such jurisdiction and declare the extent and nature of exemptions,
benefits and privileges to be extended to vehicles properly registered
or licensed in such other jurisdiction, or to the owners of such
vehicles, which shall, in the judgment of the department, be in the
best interest of this state and the citizens thereof and which shall be
fair and equitable to this state and the citizens thereof, and all of
the same shall be determined on the basis and recognition of the
benefits which accrue to the economy of this state from the
uninterrupted flow of commerce. Declarations of exemptions, benefits,
and privileges issued by the department shall include at least the
following exemptions:
(1) Nonresident persons not employed in this state may operate a
vehicle in this state that is currently licensed in another
jurisdiction for a period not to exceed six months in any continuous
twelve-month period.
(2) Nonresident persons employed in this state may operate vehicles
not to exceed twelve thousand pounds registered gross vehicle weight
that are currently licensed in another jurisdiction if no permanent,
temporary, or part-time residence is maintained in this state for a
period greater than six months in any continuous twelve-month period.
(3) A vehicle or a combination of vehicles, not exceeding a
registered gross or combined gross vehicle weight of twelve thousand
pounds, which is properly base licensed in another jurisdiction and
registered to a bona fide business in that jurisdiction is not required
to obtain a Washington vehicle ((license)) registration except when
such vehicle is owned or operated by a business or branch office of a
business located in Washington.
(4) The department of licensing, after consultation with the
department of revenue, shall adopt such rules as it deems necessary for
the administration of these exemptions, benefits, and privileges.

Sec. 24 RCW 46.87.070 and 2005 c 194 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Trailers, semitrailers, and pole trailers that are properly based
in jurisdictions other than Washington, and that display currently
registered license plates from such jurisdictions will be granted
vehicle ((license)) registration reciprocity in this state without the
need of further vehicle ((license)) registration. If pole trailers are
not required to be licensed separately by a member jurisdiction, such
vehicles may be operated in this state without displaying a current
base license plate.

Sec. 25 RCW 46.87.310 and 1996 c 91 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any owner whose application for proportional registration has been
accepted shall preserve the records on which the application is based
for a period of four years following the preceding year or period upon
which the application is based. These records shall be complete and
shall include, but not be limited to, the following: Copies of
proportional registration applications and supplements for all
jurisdictions in which the fleet is prorated; proof of proportional or
full registration with other jurisdictions; vehicle ((license))
registration or trip permits; temporary authorization permits;
documents establishing the latest purchase year and cost of each fleet
vehicle in ready-for-the-road condition; weight certificates indicating
the unladen, ready-for-the-road, weight of each vehicle in the fleet;
periodic summaries of mileage by fleet and by individual vehicles;
individual trip reports, driver's daily logs, or other source documents
maintained for each individual trip that provide trip dates, points of
origin and destinations, total miles traveled, miles traveled in each
jurisdiction, routes traveled, vehicle equipment number, driver's full
name, and all other information pertinent to each trip. Upon request
of the department, the owner shall make the records available to the
department at its designated office for audit as to accuracy of
records, computations, and payments. The department shall assess and
collect any unpaid fees and taxes found to be due the state and provide
credits or refunds for overpayments of Washington fees and taxes as
determined in accordance with formulas and other requirements
prescribed in this chapter. If the owner fails to maintain complete
records as required by this section, the department shall attempt to
reconstruct or reestablish such records. However, if the department is
unable to do so and the missing or incomplete records involve mileages
accrued by vehicles while they are part of the fleet, the department
may assess an amount not to exceed the difference between the
Washington proportional fees and taxes paid and one hundred percent of
the fees and taxes. Further, if the owner fails to maintain complete
records as required by this section, or if the department determines
that the owner should have registered more vehicles in this state under
this chapter, the department may deny the owner the right of any
further benefits provided by this chapter until any final audit or
assessment made under this chapter has been satisfied.
The department may audit the records of any owner and may make
arrangements with agencies of other jurisdictions administering motor
vehicle registration laws for joint audits of any such owner. No
assessment for deficiency or claim for credit may be made for any
period for which records are no longer required. Any fees, taxes,
penalties, or interest found to be due and owing the state upon audit
shall bear interest at the rate of one percent per month, or fraction
thereof, from the first day of the calendar month after the amount
should have been paid until the date of payment. If the audit
discloses a deliberate and willful intent to evade the requirements of
payment under RCW 46.87.140, a penalty of ten percent shall also be
assessed.
If the audit discloses that an overpayment to the state in excess
of ten dollars has been made, the department shall certify the
overpayment to the state treasurer who shall issue a warrant for the
overpayment to the vehicle operator. Overpayments shall bear interest
at the rate of eight percent per annum from the date on which the
overpayment is incurred until the date of payment.

Sec. 26 RCW 46.87.400 and 1987 c 244 s 53 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director, the state of Washington, and its political
subdivisions are immune from civil liability arising from the issuance
of a vehicle ((license)) registration to a nonroadworthy vehicle.
(2) No suit or action may be commenced or prosecuted against the
director or the state of Washington by reason of any act done or
omitted to be done in the administration of the duties and
responsibilities imposed upon the director under this chapter.

Sec. 27 RCW 69.43.010 and 2001 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A report to the state board of pharmacy shall be submitted in
accordance with this chapter by a manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer,
or other person who sells, transfers, or otherwise furnishes to any
person any of the following substances or their salts or isomers:
(a) Anthranilic acid;
(b) Barbituric acid;
(c) Chlorephedrine;
(d) Diethyl malonate;
(e) D-lysergic acid;
(f) Ephedrine;
(g) Ergotamine tartrate;
(h) Ethylamine;
(i) Ethyl malonate;
(j) Ethylephedrine;
(k) Lead acetate;
(l) Malonic acid;
(m) Methylamine;
(n) Methylformamide;
(o) Methylephedrine;
(p) Methylpseudoephedrine;
(q) N-acetylanthranilic acid;
(r) Norpseudoephedrine;
(s) Phenylacetic acid;
(t) Phenylpropanolamine;
(u) Piperidine;
(v) Pseudoephedrine; and
(w) Pyrrolidine.
(2) The state board of pharmacy shall administer this chapter and
may, by rule adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, add a substance to
or remove a substance from the list in subsection (1) of this section.
In determining whether to add or remove a substance, the board shall
consider the following:
(a) The likelihood that the substance is useable as a precursor in
the illegal production of a controlled substance as defined in chapter
69.50 RCW;
(b) The availability of the substance;
(c) The relative appropriateness of including the substance in this
chapter or in chapter 69.50 RCW; and
(d) The extent and nature of legitimate uses for the substance.
(3)(a) Any manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or other person
shall, before selling, transferring, or otherwise furnishing any
substance specified in subsection (1) of this section to any person,
require proper identification from the purchaser.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "proper identification"
means:
(i) A motor vehicle operator's license or other official state-issued identification of the purchaser containing a photograph of the
purchaser, and includes the residential or mailing address of the
purchaser, other than a post office box number;
(ii) The ((motor vehicle)) license plate number of any motor
vehicle owned or operated by the purchaser;
(iii) A letter of authorization from any business for which any
substance specified in subsection (1) of this section is being
furnished, which includes the business license number and address of
the business;
(iv) A description of how the substance is to be used; and
(v) The signature of the purchaser.
The person selling, transferring, or otherwise furnishing any
substance specified in subsection (1) of this section shall affix his
or her signature as a witness to the signature and identification of
the purchaser.
(c) A violation of or a failure to comply with this subsection is
a misdemeanor.
(4) Any manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or other person who
sells, transfers, or otherwise furnishes the substance specified in
subsection (1) of this section to any person shall, not less than
twenty-one days before delivery of the substance, submit a report of
the transaction, which includes the identification information
specified in subsection (3) of this section to the state board of
pharmacy. However, the state board of pharmacy may authorize the
submission of the reports on a monthly basis with respect to repeated,
regular transactions between the furnisher and the recipient involving
the same substance if the state board of pharmacy determines that
either of the following exist:
(a) A pattern of regular supply of the substance exists between the
manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or other person who sells,
transfers, or otherwise furnishes such substance and the recipient of
the substance; or
(b) The recipient has established a record of using the substance
for lawful purposes.
(5) Any person specified in subsection (4) of this section who does
not submit a report as required by subsection (4) of this section is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 28 RCW 70.160.070 and 2006 c 2 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person intentionally violating this chapter by smoking in
a public place or place of employment, or any person removing,
defacing, or destroying a sign required by this chapter, is subject to
a civil fine of up to one hundred dollars. Any person passing by or
through a public place while on a public sidewalk or public right-of-way has not intentionally violated this chapter. Local law enforcement
agencies shall enforce this section by issuing a notice of infraction
to be assessed in the same manner as traffic infractions. The
provisions contained in chapter 46.63 RCW for the disposition of
traffic infractions apply to the disposition of infractions for
violation of this subsection except as follows:
(a) The provisions in chapter 46.63 RCW relating to the provision
of records to the department of licensing in accordance with RCW
46.20.270 are not applicable to this chapter; and
(b) The provisions in chapter 46.63 RCW relating to the imposition
of sanctions against a person's driver's license or vehicle ((license))
registration are not applicable to this chapter.
The form for the notice of infraction for a violation of this
subsection shall be prescribed by rule of the supreme court.
(2) When violations of RCW 70.160.050 occur, a warning shall first
be given to the owner or other person in charge. Any subsequent
violation is subject to a civil fine of up to one hundred dollars.
Each day upon which a violation occurs or is permitted to continue
constitutes a separate violation.
(3) Local health departments shall enforce RCW 70.160.050 regarding
the duties of owners or persons in control of public places and places
of employment by either of the following actions:
(a) Serving notice requiring the correction of any violation; or
(b) Calling upon the city or town attorney or county prosecutor or
local health department attorney to maintain an action for an
injunction to enforce RCW 70.160.050, to correct a violation, and to
assess and recover a civil penalty for the violation.

Sec. 29 RCW 82.38.100 and 2010 c 161 s 907 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any special fuel user operating a motor vehicle in this state
for commercial purposes may apply for a special fuel trip permit. The
permit:
(a) Is good for a period of three consecutive days beginning and
ending on the dates shown on the face of the permit issued;
(b) Is valid only for the vehicle for which it is issued;
(c) Must identify, as the department may require, the vehicle for
which it is issued; and
(d) Must be completed in its entirety, signed, and dated by the
operator before operation of the vehicle on the public highways of this
state.
(2) Correction of data on the permit such as dates, vehicle license
plate number, or vehicle identification number invalidates the permit.
A violation of, or a failure to comply with, this subsection is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) Blank special fuel trip permits may be obtained from field
offices of the department of transportation, department of licensing,
county auditors or other agents, or subagents appointed by the
department for the fee provided in RCW 46.17.400 (1)(f) ((and (4))).
The fee is in lieu of the special fuel tax otherwise assessable against
the permit holder for importing and using special fuel in a motor
vehicle on the public highways of this state. A report of mileage may
not be required with respect to the motor vehicle. Special fuel trip
permits may not be issued if the applicant has outstanding fuel taxes,
penalties, or interest owing to the state or has had a special fuel
license revoked for cause and the cause has not been removed.
(4) Special fuel trip permits are not subject to exchange, refund,
or credit.

Sec. 30 RCW 88.02.530 and 2011 c 171 s 127 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A legal owner or the legal owner's authorized representative
shall promptly apply for a duplicate certificate of title if a
certificate of title is lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or
becomes illegible. The application for a duplicate certificate of
title must:
(a) Include information required by the department;
(b) Be accompanied by an affidavit of loss or destruction;
(c) Be accompanied by the fee required in RCW 88.02.640(1)(((k)))
(d).
(2) The duplicate certificate of title must contain the word
"duplicate." It must be mailed to the first priority secured party
named in it or, if none, to the registered owner.
(3) A person recovering a certificate of title for which a
duplicate has been issued shall promptly return the certificate of
title that has been recovered to the department.

Sec. 31 RCW 88.02.540 and 2011 c 326 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The application for a quick title of a vessel must be made by
the owner or the owner's representative to the department,
participating county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by
the director on a form furnished or approved by the department and must
contain:
(a) A description of the vessel, including make, model, hull
identification number, series, and body;
(b) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered
owner of the vessel and, if the vessel is subject to a security
interest, the name and address of the secured party; and
(c) Other information as may be required by the department.
(2) The application for a quick title must be signed by the person
applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that person in
the manner described under RCW 9A.72.085. The department must keep a
copy of the application.
(3) The application for a quick title must be accompanied by:
(a) All fees and taxes due for an application for a certificate of
title, including a quick title service fee under RCW 88.02.640(1)(j);
and
(b) The most recent certificate of title or other satisfactory
evidence of ownership.
(4) All applications for quick title must meet the requirements
established by the department.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "quick title" means a
certificate of title printed at the time of application.
(6) A subagent may process a quick title under this section only
after (a) the department has instituted a process in which blank
certificates of title can be inventoried; (b) the county auditor of the
county in which the subagent is located has processed quick titles for
a minimum of six months; and (c) the county auditor approves a request
from a subagent in its county to process quick titles.

Sec. 32 RCW 88.02.560 and 2011 c 171 s 129 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An application for a vessel registration must be made by the
owner or the owner's authorized representative to the department,
county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director on
a form furnished or approved by the department. The application must
contain:
(a) The name and address of each owner of the vessel;
(b) Other information the department may require; and
(c) The signature of at least one owner.
(2) The application for vessel registration must be accompanied by
the:
(a) Vessel registration fee required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(((i)))
(k);
(b) Derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee under RCW
88.02.640(3)(b) and derelict vessel removal surcharge required under
RCW 88.02.640(4);
(c) Filing fee required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(((e))) (f);
(d) License plate technology fee required under RCW
88.02.640(1)(((f))) (g);
(e) License service fee required under RCW 88.02.640(1)(((g))) (h);
and
(f) Watercraft excise tax required under chapter 82.49 RCW.
(3) Upon receipt of an application for vessel registration and the
required fees and taxes, the department shall assign a registration
number and issue a decal for each vessel. The registration number and
decal must be issued and affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed
by the department consistent with the standard numbering system for
vessels required in 33 C.F.R. Part 174. A valid decal affixed as
prescribed must indicate compliance with the annual registration
requirements of this chapter.
(4) Vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of one
year, except that the director may extend or diminish vessel
registration periods and vessel decals for the purpose of staggered
renewal periods. For registration periods of more or less than one
year, the department may collect prorated annual registration fees and
excise taxes based upon the number of months in the registration
period.
(5) Vessel registrations are renewable every year in a manner
prescribed by the department upon payment of the fees and taxes
described in subsection (2) of this section. Upon renewing a vessel
registration, the department shall issue a new decal to be affixed as
prescribed by the department.
(6) When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel
registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it
shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling
tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information must
be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation
commission in a form ready for distribution. The form must be
developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission
with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the
state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology
shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.
(7) A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already
validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the
acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department, county
auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for
transfer of the vessel registration, and the application must be
accompanied by a transfer fee as required in RCW 88.02.640(1)(((l)))
(n).

Sec. 33 RCW 88.02.590 and 2011 c 171 s 130 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registered owner or the registered owner's authorized
representative shall promptly apply for a duplicate registration
certificate when a registration certificate is lost, stolen, mutilated,
or destroyed, or becomes illegible. The application for a duplicate
registration certificate must:
(a) Be accompanied by an affidavit of loss or destruction;
(b) Include information required by the department; and
(c) Be accompanied by the fee required in RCW 88.02.640(1)(((d)))
(e), in addition to any other fees or taxes required for the
transaction.
(2) A person recovering a registration certificate for which a
duplicate has been issued shall promptly return the registration
certificate that has been recovered to the department.

Sec. 34 RCW 88.02.595 and 2011 c 171 s 131 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registered owner or the registered owner's authorized
representative shall promptly apply for a pair of replacement decals
when the decals are lost, stolen, mutilated, or destroyed, or become
illegible. The application for replacement decals must:
(a) Be accompanied by an affidavit of loss or destruction;
(b) Include information required by the department;
(c) Be accompanied by the fee required in RCW 88.02.640(1)(((j)))
(l), in addition to any other fees or taxes required for the
transaction.
(2) A person recovering decals for which a replacement has been
issued shall promptly return the decals that have been recovered to the
department.

Sec. 35 RCW 88.02.610 and 2011 c 171 s 132 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A vessel owner shall apply for a vessel visitor permit if the
vessel is:
(a) Currently registered or numbered under the laws of a country
other than the United States or has a valid United States customs
service cruising license issued under 19 C.F.R. Sec. 4.94; and
(b) Being used on Washington state waters for the personal use of
the owner for more than sixty days.
(2) A vessel visitor permit:
(a) May be obtained from the department, county auditor or other
agent, or subagent appointed by the director;
(b) Must show the date the vessel first came into Washington state;
and
(c) Is valid as long as the vessel remains currently registered or
numbered under the laws of a country other than the United States or
the United States customs service cruising license remains valid.
(3) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall collect the fee required in RCW
88.02.640(1)(((m))) (o) when issuing a vessel visitor permit.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section,
including rules on issuing and displaying the vessel visitor permit.

Sec. 36 RCW 88.02.620 and 2011 c 171 s 133 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A vessel owner who is a nonresident natural person shall apply
for a nonresident vessel permit on or before the sixty-first day of use
in Washington state if the vessel:
(a) Is currently registered or numbered under the laws of the state
of principal operation or has been issued a valid number under federal
law; and
(b) Has been brought into Washington state for personal use for not
more than six months in any continuous twelve-month period.
(2) A nonresident vessel permit:
(a) May be obtained from the department, county auditor or other
agent, or subagent appointed by the director;
(b) Must show the date the vessel first came into Washington state;
and
(c) Is valid for two months.
(3) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall collect the fee required in RCW
88.02.640(1)(((h))) (i) when issuing nonresident vessel permits.
(4) A nonresident vessel permit is not required under this section
if the vessel is used in conducting temporary business activity within
Washington state.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section,
including rules on issuing and displaying the nonresident vessel
permit.

Sec. 37 RCW 88.02.640 and 2011 c 326 s 5, 2011 c 171 s 134, and
2011 c 169 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall charge the following vessel fees and surcharge:

FEE AMOUNT AUTHORITY DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit $5.00 RCW 88.02.800(2) General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and
invasive species removal Subsection (3) of this
section Subsection (3) of this
section Subsection (3) of this
section

(c) Derelict vessel removal
surcharge $1.00 Subsection (4) of this
section Subsection (4) of this
section

(d) Duplicate certificate of
title $1.25 RCW 88.02.530(1)(c) General fund

(e) Duplicate registration $1.25 RCW 88.02.590(1)(c) General fund

(((e))) (f) Filing RCW 46.17.005 RCW ((46.17.005))
88.02.560(2) RCW 46.68.400

(((f))) (g) License plate
technology RCW 46.17.015 RCW ((46.17.015))
88.02.560(2) RCW 46.68.370

(((g))) (h) License service RCW 46.17.025 RCW ((46.17.025))
88.02.560(2) RCW 46.68.220

(((h))) (i) Nonresident
vessel permit $25.00 RCW 88.02.620(3) Subsection (5) of this
section

(((i))) (j) Quick title service $50.00 RCW 88.02.540(3) Subsection (7) of this
section

(((j))) (k) Registration $10.50 RCW 88.02.560(2) RCW 88.02.650

(((k))) (l) Replacement
decal $1.25 RCW 88.02.595(1)(c) General fund

(((l))) (m) Title application $5.00 RCW 88.02.515 General fund

(((m))) (n) Transfer $1.00 RCW 88.02.560(7) General fund

(((n))) (o) Vessel visitor
permit $30.00 RCW 88.02.610(3) Subsection (6) of this
section

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in
subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of
registration fees at the time application for registration is made.
(3)(a) The derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee
required in subsection (1) of this section is five dollars and must be
distributed as follows:
(i) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic
invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879;
(ii) One dollar must be deposited into the aquatic algae control
account created in RCW 43.21A.667;
(iii) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive
species enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400; and
(iv) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal
account created in RCW 79.100.100.
(b) If the department of natural resources indicates that the
balance of the derelict vessel removal account, not including any
transfer or appropriation of funds into the account or funds deposited
into the account collected under subsection (5) of this section reaches
one million dollars as of March 1st of any year, the collection of the
two dollars of the derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee
that is deposited into the derelict vessel removal account as
authorized in (a)(iv) of this subsection must be suspended for the
following fiscal year.
(4) Until January 1, 2014, an annual derelict vessel removal
surcharge of one dollar must be charged with each vessel registration.
The surcharge:
(a) Is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels
accumulated in Washington state waters that pose a threat to the health
and safety of the people and to the environment;
(b) Is to be used only for the removal of vessels that are less
than seventy-five feet in length; and
(c) Must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account
created in RCW 79.100.100.
(5) The twenty-five dollar nonresident vessel permit fee must be
paid by the vessel owner to the department for the cost of providing
the identification document by the department. Any moneys remaining
from the fee after the payment of costs must be allocated to counties
by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW
88.02.650.
(6) The thirty dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be distributed
as follows:
(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal
account created in RCW 79.100.100;
(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing
the vessel visitor permit;
(c) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by the state
treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650; and
(d) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.17.005 are
in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling and
registration of vessels.
(7)(a) The fifty dollar quick title service fee must be distributed
as follows:
(i) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited
to the general fund.
(ii) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or
other agent or subagent appointed by the director, twenty-five dollars
must be deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be retained
by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by
the county auditor.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "quick title" has the same
meaning as in RCW 88.02.540.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 RCW 46.04.622 is recodified as RCW
46.04.3812.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 RCW 46.04.62250 is recodified as RCW
46.04.541.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 RCW 46.04.630 is recodified as RCW
46.04.6203.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 RCW 46.04.650 is recodified as RCW
46.04.589.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 46.04.62240 (Share the Road license plates) and 2005 c 426
s 2;
(2) RCW 46.04.62260 (Ski & Ride Washington license plates) and 2011
c 171 s 18 & 2005 c 220 s 2; and
(3) RCW 46.18.050 (Department duties -- Applications, financial
reports) and 2011 c 171 s 65.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 This act takes effect June 30, 2012.

--- END ---