BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.015 and 1965 ex.s. c 133 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
All determinations of the prevailing rate of wage shall be made by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.
An employer who requests and obtains a written determination as to the
applicability of prevailing wages on a specific public works project,
or a specific determination as to the appropriate classification for
the work performed by the employees of the employer on a specific
public works project, is not subject to a wage complaint under chapter
49.48 RCW from an employee subject to the written determination
claiming the employer paid an incorrect rate of wage.

--- END ---