BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 INTENT. It is the intent of the
legislature to insure that the top one percent of citizens in our state
contribute to sustain the paramount duty of the state to educate our
children by requiring these wealthiest, those who have benefited
greatly in this great recession, to pay their fair share through a two
percent marginal tax on annual income exceeding one million dollars.

PART II
ESTABLISHING THE PARAMOUNT DUTY TRUST FUND FUNDED
BY AN EXCISE TAX ON INCOMES IN EXCESS OF ONE MILLION DOLLARS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 THE PARAMOUNT DUTY TRUST FUND. (1) A new
state trust fund is hereby established dedicated to meeting the
paramount duty for the education of all children. This trust is funded
by the excise tax assessed under this chapter.
(2) Revenue received by the trust must be devoted to education,
with the first priority being classroom size reduction in kindergarten
through fourth grade. In no case may this new revenue be used to
supplant current funding for these services.
(3) The office of financial management must prepare an annual audit
of the funds deposited in the paramount duty trust fund, reporting on
how funds have been spent, determining if the intent of reducing class
size has been met, and estimating the number of children benefited, as
well as all state residents benefited, and public and private jobs
created and/or maintained, including the multiplier effects of public
expenditures. Monthly disclosure of tax collection and spending under
this chapter must be posted on a web site maintained by the treasurer
and the office of financial management and such disclosure must, at a
minimum, include the information set forth in RCW 43.08.150.

PART III
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Adjusted gross income" means adjusted gross income as
determined under the federal internal revenue code.
(2) "Individual" means a natural person.
(3) "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal
revenue code of 1986 and amendments thereto, as existing and in effect
on January 1, 2012.
(4) "Resident" includes an individual who:
(a) Has resided in this state for the entire tax year; or
(b) Is domiciled in this state unless the individual:
(i) Maintains no permanent place of abode in this state; and
(ii) Does not maintain a permanent place of abode elsewhere; and
(iii) Spends in the aggregate not more than thirty days in the tax
year in this state; or
(c) Is not domiciled in this state, but maintains a permanent place
of abode in this state and spends in the aggregate more than one
hundred eighty-three days of the tax year in this state unless the
individual establishes to the satisfaction of the department that the
individual is in the state only for temporary or transitory purposes;
or
(d) Claims this state as the individual's tax home for federal
income tax purposes.
(5) "S corporation" means an S corporation as defined in section
1361 of the internal revenue code.
(6) "Tax" means the tax imposed in this chapter, unless the context
requires a different meaning.
(7) "Taxable income" means adjusted gross income as modified under
sections 502 and 601 of this act.
(8) "Taxable year" means the taxpayer's taxable year as defined
under the internal revenue code.
(9) "Taxpayer" means a person receiving income subject to tax under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 DEFINITION OF TERMS GENERALLY. Except as
provided in section 301 of this act and RCW 1.12.080, any term used in
this chapter has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context
in the internal revenue code.

PART IV
DETERMINATION OF EXCISE TAX
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 EXCISE TAX IMPOSED--RATES. An excise tax
is imposed on the receipt of adjusted gross income in excess of one
million dollars by residents or qualifying nonresidents deriving income
from sources within the state. The rate of tax is two percent
multiplied by the amount of adjusted gross income in excess of one
million dollars. An excise tax is not imposed on the assets held by a
person resulting from income after its receipt, but only upon the
receipt itself.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 CREDIT FOR INCOME TAXES DUE ANOTHER
JURISDICTION. (1) A resident individual is allowed a credit against
the tax imposed under this chapter for the amount of any income tax
imposed by another state or foreign country, or political subdivision
of the state or foreign country, on income taxed under this chapter,
subject to the following conditions, which must be imposed separately
with respect to each taxing jurisdiction:
(a) The credit is allowed only for taxes imposed by the other
jurisdiction on net income from sources within that jurisdiction; and
(b) The amount of the credit shall not exceed the smaller of:
(i) The amount of tax paid to the other jurisdiction on net income
from sources within the other jurisdiction; or
(ii) The amount of tax due under this chapter before application of
credits allowable by this chapter, multiplied by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the amount of the taxpayer's adjusted
gross income subject to tax in the other jurisdiction. The denominator
of the fraction is the taxpayer's total adjusted gross income as
modified by this chapter. The fraction may never be greater than one.
(2) If, in lieu of a credit similar to the credit allowed under
subsection (1) of this section, the laws of the other taxing
jurisdiction contain a provision exempting a resident of this state
from liability for the payment of income taxes on income earned for
personal services performed in such jurisdiction, then the director is
authorized to enter into a reciprocal agreement with such jurisdiction
providing a similar tax exemption on income earned for personal
services performed in this state.
(3) The amount of the tax credit received by any taxpayer under
this section may not exceed the total amount of tax due, and there may
be no carryback or carryforward of any unused excess credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 DUAL RESIDENCE. If an individual is
regarded as a resident both of this state and another jurisdiction for
state personal income tax purposes, the department must reduce the tax
on that portion of the taxpayer's income which is subjected to tax in
both jurisdictions solely by virtue of dual residence, if the other
taxing jurisdiction allows a similar reduction. The reduction must
equal the lower of the two taxes applicable to the income taxed twice,
multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the tax
imposed by this state on the income taxed twice. The denominator of
the fraction is the tax imposed by both jurisdictions on the income
taxed twice. The fraction must never be greater than one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 PARTNERSHIPS AND S CORPORATIONS. (1)
Partnerships are not subject to tax under this chapter. Partners are
subject to tax under this chapter in their separate or individual
capacities on their pro rata share.
(2) S corporations are not subject to tax under this chapter.
Shareholders of S corporations are subject to tax under this chapter in
their separate or individual capacities.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "S corporation income" includes both distributed and
undistributed federal taxable income of the S corporation.
(b) "Pro rata share" means pro rata share as determined under
section 1366(a) of the internal revenue code.

PART V
TAXABLE INCOME MODIFICATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 ABSOLUTE TAX THRESHOLD. It is the intent
of this act that in no event may excise tax be imposed upon adjusted
gross income below one million dollars. No provision of this chapter
may allow the imposition of tax upon adjusted gross income below one
million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FEDERAL OBLIGATIONS. From adjusted gross
income, deduct, to the extent included in adjusted gross income, income
derived from obligations of the United States which this state is
prohibited by federal law from subjecting to a net income tax.

PART VI
DIVISION OF INCOME FOR NONRESIDENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 APPORTIONMENT AND ALLOCATION OF INCOME.
(1) For resident individuals, all income must be apportioned and
allocated to this state.
(2) For nonresident individuals, income derived from sources within
this state must be apportioned and allocated to this state.
(3) For purposes of this chapter:
(a) The adjusted gross income of a nonresident derived from sources
within this state is the net amount of items of income, gain, loss, and
deduction of the nonresident's adjusted gross income that are derived
from or connected with sources in this state including any distributive
share of partnership income and deductions.
(b) Items of income, gain, loss, and deduction derived from or
connected with sources within this state are those items attributable
to the ownership or disposition of any interest in real or tangible
personal property in this state, and a business, trade, profession, or
occupation carried on within this state. The department must issue
rules to provide consistency of this section with other excise tax
provisions.
(c) Deduction with respect to expenses, capital losses, and net
operating losses must be based solely on income, gains, losses, and
deductions derived from or connected with sources in this state but
must otherwise be determined in the same manner as the corresponding
federal deduction except as provided in this chapter.
(d) Income from intangible personal property, including annuities,
dividends, interest, and gains from the disposition of intangible
personal property, constitutes income derived from sources within the
state of Washington only to the extent that such income is from
property employed in a business, trade, profession, or occupation
carried on within this state. However, distributed and undistributed
income of an electing S corporation for federal tax purposes derived
from or connected with sources within this state is income derived from
sources within this state for a nonresident shareholder. A net
operating loss of such corporation does constitute a loss or deduction
connected with sources within this state for a nonresident shareholder.
(e) Compensation paid by the United States for service in the armed
forces of the United States performed in this state by a nonresident
does not constitute income derived from sources within this state.
(f) If a business, trade, profession, or occupation is carried on
partly within and partly without this state, the determination of net
income derived or connected with sources within this state as provided
in this section must be made by apportionment and allocation of chapter
82.56 RCW.

PART VII
ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 METHOD OF ACCOUNTING. (1) A taxpayer's
method of accounting for purposes of the tax imposed under this chapter
is the same as the taxpayer's method of accounting for federal income
tax purposes. If no method of accounting has been regularly used by a
taxpayer for federal income tax purposes or if the method used does not
clearly reflect income, tax due under this chapter is computed by a
method of accounting which in the opinion of the department fairly
reflects income.
(2) If a person's method of accounting is changed for federal
income tax purposes, it must be similarly changed for purposes of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 PERSONS REQUIRED TO FILE RETURNS. (1)
Only taxpayers with adjusted gross income of one million dollars or
more are required to file a tax return with the department. The
department must utilize such taxpayer's federal tax returns as a
primary tool for obtaining taxpayers' information. The department may
prescribe a simple supplement of no more than two pages for computing
the excise tax owed under this chapter. Each person required to file
a return under this chapter must, without assessment, notice, or
demand, pay any tax due thereon to the department on or before the date
fixed for the filing of the return.
(2) The department may by rule require that certain taxpayers file,
on forms prescribed by the department, informational returns for any
period. Each person required by rule to file an informational return
must, without assessment, notice, or demand, pay any tax due thereon to
the department on or before the date fixed for the filing of the
informational return.
(3) If an adjustment to a taxpayer's federal return is made by the
taxpayer or the internal revenue service, the taxpayer must, within
ninety days of the final determination of the adjustment by the
internal revenue service or within thirty days of the filing of a
federal return adjusted by the taxpayer, file with the department on
forms prescribed by the department a corrected return reflecting the
adjustments as finally determined. The taxpayer must pay any
additional tax due resulting from the finally determined internal
revenue service adjustment or a taxpayer adjustment without notice and
assessment. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or any other
title to the contrary, the period of limitation for the collection of
the additional tax, interest, and penalty due as a result of an
adjustment by the taxpayer or a finally determined internal revenue
service adjustment must begin at the later of thirty days following the
final determination of the adjustment or the date of the filing of the
corrected return.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 DUE DATE FOR FILING A RETURN--EXTENSIONS--INTEREST AND PENALTIES. The due date of a return required to be filed
with the department is the due date of the federal income tax return or
informational return for federal income tax purposes. The department
must have the authority to grant extensions of times by which returns
required to be filed by this chapter may be submitted. The department
must also have the authority to grant extensions of time to pay tax
with regard to taxes imposed by this chapter. Interest at the rate as
specified in RCW 82.32.050 accrues during any extension period and the
interest and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to late
payments and deficiencies. Notwithstanding the limitation of RCW
82.32.090, in the case of the late filing of an informational return,
there is imposed a penalty the amount of which is established by the
department by rule. The penalty may not exceed fifty dollars per month
for a maximum of ten months. RCW 82.32.105 applies to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 JOINT RETURN. (1) If the federal income
tax liabilities of both spouses are determined on a joint federal
return for the taxable year, they must file a joint return under this
chapter unless one spouse is a resident and the other is a nonresident.
(2) If neither spouse is required to file a federal income tax
return for the taxable year, a joint return may be filed under this
chapter under the same conditions under which a joint return may be
filed for purposes of the federal income tax.
(3) If one spouse is a resident and the other is a nonresident,
they must file separate returns under this chapter, unless they elect
to determine their tax liabilities under this chapter on a joint return
as if they were both residents, and:
(a) Their federal tax liability for the taxable year was determined
on a joint federal tax return; or
(b) Neither spouse has filed a federal income tax return for the
taxable year and they would be permitted to file a joint federal tax
return for the taxable year.
(4) In any case in which a joint return is filed under this
section, the liability of the spouses is joint and several, unless the
spouse is relieved of liability under section 6013 of the internal
revenue code.
(5) The department must take action and adopt rules, forms, and
procedures to implement this act consistently with RCW 26.60.010 and
26.60.015, notwithstanding any term or provision of this section or
act, provided there is full compliance with section 501 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 RECORDS--RETURNS. (1) Every taxpayer with
adjusted gross income of one million dollars or more and all others
required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed under this chapter must
keep records, render statements, make returns, file reports, and
perform other acts as the department requires by rule. Each return
must be made under penalty of perjury and on forms prescribed by the
department. The department may require other statements and reports be
made under penalty of perjury and on forms prescribed by the
department. The department may require any taxpayer and any person
required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed under this chapter to
furnish to the department a correct copy of any return or document
which the taxpayer has filed with the internal revenue service or
received from the internal revenue service.
(2) All books and records and other papers and documents required
to be kept under this chapter are subject to inspection by the
department at all times during business hours of the day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 PROVISIONS OF INTERNAL REVENUE CODE
CONTROL. (1) To the extent possible without being inconsistent with
this chapter, all of the provisions of the internal revenue code
relating to the following subjects apply to the taxes imposed under
this chapter:
(a) Time of payment of tax deducted and withheld under sections 701
through 705 of this act and this section;
(b) Liability of transferees;
(c) Time and manner of making returns, extensions of time for
filing returns, verification of returns, and the time when a return is
deemed filed.
(2) The department by rule may provide modifications and exceptions
to the provisions listed in subsection (1) of this section, if
reasonably necessary to facilitate the prompt, efficient, and equitable
collection of tax under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 REFUNDS OF OVERPAYMENTS--OTHER
ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS. (1) The department must refund all taxes
improperly paid or collected.
(2) The following sections apply to the administration of taxes
imposed under this chapter: RCW 82.32.020, 82.32.050, 82.32.060,
82.32.070, 82.32.090, 82.32.100, 82.32.105, 82.32.110, 82.32.120,
82.32.130, 82.32.140, 82.32.150, 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180,
82.32.190, 82.32.200, 82.32.210, 82.32.220, 82.32.230, 82.32.235,
82.32.237, 82.32.240, 82.32.245, 82.32.265, 82.32.290, 82.32.300,
82.32.310, 82.32.320, 82.32.330, 82.32.340, 82.32.350, 82.32.360, and
82.32.380.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 RULES. The department may adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of this
chapter, including a phase-in for fiscal year taxpayers. The rules, to
the extent possible without being inconsistent with this chapter, must
follow the internal revenue code and the regulations and rulings of the
United States treasury department with respect to the federal income
tax. The department may adopt as a part of these rules any portions of
the internal revenue code and treasury department regulations and
rulings, in whole or in part.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 APPEALS. The board of tax appeals has
jurisdiction over appeals relating to tax deficiencies and refunds,
including penalties and interest, pursuant to this chapter. The
taxpayer may elect a formal or informal hearing pursuant to RCW
82.03.140.

PART VIII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 APPLICATION. This chapter applies to
taxes collectible in 2013 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 The excise tax rate in section 401 of this
act may not be increased for any income level without a majority vote
of the legislature and submission of the changes to the people for
approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 CODIFICATION. Sections 101 through 803 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---