BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.57.160 and 2011 c 204 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may adopt rules:
(a) Designating any point for mandatory inspection of cattle or
horses or the furnishing of proof that cattle or horses passing or
being transported through the point have been inspected or identified
and are lawfully being transported;
(b) Providing for issuance of individual horse and cattle
identification certificates or other means of horse and cattle
identification;
(c) Designating the documents that constitute other satisfactory
proof of ownership for cattle and horses. A bill of sale may not be
designated as documenting satisfactory proof of ownership for cattle;
and
(d) Designating when inspection certificates, certificates of
permit, or other transportation documents required by law or rule must
designate a physical address of a destination. Cattle and horses must
be delivered or transported directly to the physical address of that
destination.
(2) A self-inspection certificate may be accepted as satisfactory
proof of ownership for cattle if the director determines that the self-inspection certificate, together with other available documentation,
sufficiently establishes ownership. Self-inspection certificates
completed after June 10, 2010, are not satisfactory proof of ownership
for cattle.
(3) Individual private sales of unbranded dairy breeding cattle of
fifteen head or less where both the buyer and seller are milk producers
holding a current milk producer's license under chapter 15.36 RCW and
cattle are not being moved or transported out of Washington state are
exempt from mandatory livestock inspection under this chapter, however
this exemption from inspections does not exempt cattle sellers from
paying any other fees or assessments, including beef promotion fees,
owed to the Washington state beef commission under chapter 16.67 RCW
and animal disease traceability fees owed to the department under RCW
16.36.150.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.57.220 and 2010 c 66 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided for in RCW 16.65.090 and otherwise in this
section, the fee for livestock inspection is one dollar and sixty cents
per head for cattle and three dollars and fifty cents for horses or the
time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.
(2) When cattle are identified with the owner's brand or other form
of identification specified by the director by rule, the fee for
livestock inspection is one dollar and ten cents per head or the time
and mileage fee, whichever is greater.
(3) No inspection fee is charged for a calf that is inspected
before moving out-of-state under an official temporary grazing permit
if the calf is part of a cow-calf unit and the calf is identified with
the owner's Washington-recorded brand or other form of identification
specified by the director by rule.
(4) The fee for inspection of cattle at a processing plant with a
daily capacity of no more than five hundred head of cattle where the
United States department of agriculture maintains a meat inspection
program is four dollars per head.
(5) When a single inspection certificate issued for thirty or more
horses belonging to one person, the fee for livestock inspection is two
dollars per head or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.
(6) The fee for individual identification certificates is twenty
dollars for an annual certificate and sixty dollars for a lifetime
certificate or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.
However, the fee for an annual certificate listing thirty or more
animals belonging to one person is five dollars per head or the time
and mileage fee, whichever is greater. A lifetime certificate shall
not be issued until the fee has been paid to the director.
(7) The minimum fee for the issuance of an inspection certificate
by the director is five dollars. The minimum fee does not apply to
livestock consigned to a public livestock market or special sale or
inspected at a cattle processing plant.
(8) The department may not exempt payment of the fee under this
section where a mandatory livestock inspection is conducted under this
chapter.
(9) For purposes of this section, "the time and mileage fee" means
seventeen dollars per hour and the current mileage rate set by the
office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 16.57.303 (Proceeds from sale of
impounded dairy breed cattle -- Paid to seller) and 2003 c 326 s 37 are
each repealed.

--- END ---