BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in order to
encourage economic development and job growth, the state must create
the best environment possible for private employers to protect and
create jobs. The current economic situation, as well as discussions
and actions by federal and state governments, have created a high
degree of uncertainty for employers about the future. By enhancing
stability and predictability, as well as by reducing costs imposed on
employers, the state can facilitate the creation of jobs in Washington.
The legislature finds that it is important to shape a system where the
obligations of individuals, businesses, and governments are stable and
predictable. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to enact
reforms that create a more equitable distribution of liability based
upon one's proportionate share of fault.
The legislature also finds, notwithstanding the tort reform
measures it has enacted in the past, that in many instances defendants
continue to pay more than their proportionate share of a claimant's
total damages. The legislature in the 1986 tort reform act adopted as
the policy of this state that several, or proportionate, liability is
the general rule subject to certain exceptions. The legislature now
intends to limit further the exceptions to the general rule of several
or proportionate liability.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.22.015 and 1981 c 27 s 9 are each amended to read as
follows:
"Fault" includes acts or omissions, including misuse of a product,
that are in any measure negligent ((or)), reckless, or intentional
toward the person or property of the actor or others, or that subject
a person to strict tort liability or liability on a product liability
claim. The term also includes breach of warranty, unreasonable
assumption of risk, and unreasonable failure to avoid an injury or to
mitigate damages. Legal requirements of causal relation apply both to
fault as the basis for liability and to contributory fault.
A comparison of fault for any purpose under RCW 4.22.005 through
((4.22.060)) 4.22.070 shall involve consideration of both the nature of
the conduct of the parties to the action and the extent of the causal
relation between such conduct and the damages.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.22.070 and 1993 c 496 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all actions involving fault of more than one entity, the
trier of fact shall determine the percentage of the total fault which
is attributable to every entity which caused the claimant's damages
except entities immune from liability to the claimant under Title 51
RCW. The sum of the percentages of the total fault attributed to at-fault entities shall equal one hundred percent. The entities whose
fault shall be determined include the claimant or person suffering
personal injury or incurring property damage, defendants, third-party
defendants, entities released by the claimant, entities with any other
individual defense against the claimant, and entities immune from
liability to the claimant, but shall not include those entities immune
from liability to the claimant under Title 51 RCW. Judgment shall be
entered against each defendant except those who have been released by
the claimant or are immune from liability to the claimant or have
prevailed on any other individual defense against the claimant in an
amount which represents that party's proportionate share of the
claimant's total damages. The liability of each defendant shall be
several only and shall not be joint except((:
(a))) a party shall be responsible for the fault of another person
or for payment of the proportionate share of another party where both
were acting in concert or when a person was acting as an agent or
servant of the party.
(((b) If the trier of fact determines that the claimant or party
suffering bodily injury or incurring property damages was not at fault,
the defendants against whom judgment is entered shall be jointly and
severally liable for the sum of their proportionate shares of the
claimants [claimant's] total damages.))
(2) If a defendant is jointly and severally liable under ((one of))
the exception((s)) listed in subsection((s)) (1)(((a) or (1)(b))) of
this section, such defendant's rights to contribution against another
jointly and severally liable defendant, and the effect of settlement by
either such defendant, shall be determined under RCW 4.22.040,
4.22.050, and 4.22.060.
(3)(a) Nothing in this section affects any cause of action relating
to hazardous wastes or substances or solid waste disposal sites.
(b) Nothing in this section shall affect a cause of action arising
from the tortious interference with contracts or business relations.
(c) Nothing in this section shall affect any cause of action
arising from the manufacture or marketing of a fungible product in a
generic form which contains no clearly identifiable shape, color, or
marking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to all claims that have not
been reduced to judgment on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---