BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter
applies to postdoctoral and clinical employees as excluded in chapter
41.76 RCW at the University of Washington and at Washington State
University.

--- END ---