BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For a violation identified by any law enforcement entity on an
intermodal container chassis used to move intermodal containers, any
infraction, fine, or penalty assessed on the intermodal container
chassis must be assessed against the intermodal equipment provider
whose United States department of transportation number is indicated on
the intermodal container chassis. The intermodal container chassis may
be placed out of service by law enforcement until the violation is
corrected. The intermodal equipment provider of the intermodal
container is responsible for the cargo within and security of the
intermodal container and may move the intermodal container from an
intermodal container chassis that has been placed out of service to
another intermodal container chassis to complete the transport. A copy
of the infraction, fine, or penalty assessed must be provided to the
intermodal equipment provider. The intermodal equipment provider is
responsible for payment of the infraction, fine, or penalty when it
pertains to the intermodal container and intermodal container chassis
including, but not limited to, weight violations.
(2) Motor carrier drivers and intermodal equipment providers must
comply with federal intermodal container chassis inspection
regulations.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "intermodal container" means
a container that can be moved from one mode of transport to another
without unloading and reloading the contents of the container.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---