BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.88.127 and 2011 c 329 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A guardian or limited guardian may not act on behalf of the
incapacitated person without valid letters of guardianship. Upon
appointment and fulfilling all legal requirements to serve, as set
forth in the court's order, the clerk shall issue letters of
guardianship to a guardian or limited guardian appointed by the court.
All letters of guardianship must be in the following form, or a
substantially similar form:

(2) The court shall order the clerk to issue letters of
guardianship that are valid for a period of up to ((five)) six years
from the anniversary date of the appointment. When determining the
time period for which the letters will be valid, the court must
consider: The length of time the guardian has been serving the
incapacitated person; whether the guardian has timely filed all
required reports with the court; whether the guardian is monitored by
other state or local agencies; and whether there have been any
allegations of abuse, neglect, or a breach of fiduciary duty against
the guardian.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.92.040 and 2011 c 329 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It ((shall be)) is the duty of the guardian or limited guardian
of an estate:
(((1))) (a) To file within three months after the guardian's
appointment a verified inventory of all the property of the
incapacitated person which comes into the guardian's possession or
knowledge, including a statement of all encumbrances, liens, and other
secured charges on any item;
(((2))) (b) To file annually, within ninety days after the
anniversary date of the guardian's or limited guardian's appointment,
and also within ninety days after termination of the appointment,
unless the court for good cause orders a different deadline to file
following termination, a written verified account of the administration
for court approval, which account ((shall)) must contain at least the
following information:
(((a))) (i) Identification of property of the guardianship estate
as of the date of the last account or, in the case of the initial
account, as of the date of inventory;
(((b))) (ii) Identification of all additional property received
into the guardianship, including income by source;
(((c))) (iii) Identification of all expenditures made during the
account period by major categories;
(((d))) (iv) Any adjustments to the guardianship estate required to
establish its present fair market value, including gains or losses on
sale or other disposition and any mortgages, deeds of trust or other
encumbrances against the guardianship estate; and
(((e))) (v) Identification of all property held in the guardianship
estate as of the date of account, the assessed value of any real
property and the guardian's estimate of the present fair market values
of other property (including the basis on which such estimate is made),
and the total net fair market value of the guardianship estate. In
addition, immediately following such statement of present fair market
value, the account ((shall)) must set forth a statement of current
amount of the guardian's bond and any other court-ordered protection
for the security of the guardianship assets((;)).
(((3))) (2)(a) The court ((in its discretion)) may allow
((reports)) guardians or limited guardians of the estate to report at
review hearings at intervals of up to ((thirty-six months)):
(i) Three years for estates with assets (exclusive of real
property) having a value of not more than twice the homestead
exemption; and
(ii) Six years for estates with assets having a value of not more
than three thousand dollars.
(b) Notwithstanding contrary provisions of this section, the
guardian or limited guardian of an estate need not file an annual
report with the court if the funds of the guardianship are held for the
benefit of a minor in a blocked account unless the guardian requests a
withdrawal from such account, in which case the guardian shall provide
a written verified account of the administration of the guardianship
estate along with the guardian's petition for the withdrawal. The
guardian or limited guardian shall report any substantial change in
income or assets of the guardianship estate within thirty days of the
occurrence of the change. A hearing ((shall)) must be scheduled for
court review and determination of provision for increased bond or other
provision in accordance with RCW 11.88.100((;)).
(((4))) (3) All court orders approving accounts or reports filed by
a guardian or limited guardian must contain a guardianship summary
placed directly below the case caption or on a separate cover page in
the following form, or a substantially similar form, containing the
following information:

GUARDIANSHIP SUMMARY

Date Guardian Appointed: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Due Date for Report and
Accounting:
. . . . . . . . . . . .

Date of Next Review: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Letters Expire On: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Bond Amount: $ . . . . . . . . . . . .

Restricted Account:
Agreements Required:
. . . . . . . . . . . .

Incapacitated Person
(IP) Guardian of: [ ] Estate [ ] Person

Name: Name:

Address: Address:

Phone: Phone:

Facsimile: Facsimile:

Standby Guardian Address Relation to IP

Interested Parties Address Relation to IP

(((5))) (4) It is the duty of the guardian or limited guardian of
an estate:
(a) To protect and preserve the guardianship estate, to apply it as
provided in this chapter, to account for it faithfully, to perform all
of the duties required by law, and at the termination of the
guardianship or limited guardianship, to deliver the assets of the
incapacitated person to the persons entitled thereto. Except as
provided to the contrary herein, the court may authorize a guardian or
limited guardian to do anything that a trustee can do under the
provisions of RCW 11.98.070 for a period not exceeding one year from
the date of the order or for a period corresponding to the interval in
which the guardian's or limited guardian's report is required to be
filed by the court pursuant to subsection (((2))) (1)(b) of this
section, whichever period is longer;
(((6))) (b) To invest and reinvest the property of the
incapacitated person in accordance with the rules applicable to
investment of trust estates by trustees as provided in chapter 11.100
RCW, except that:
(((a))) (i) No investments ((shall)) may be made without prior
order of the court in any property other than unconditional interest
bearing obligations of this state or of the United States and in
obligations the interest and principal of which are unconditionally
guaranteed by the United States, and in share accounts or deposits
which are insured by an agency of the United States government. Such
prior order of the court may authorize specific investments, or, in the
discretion of the court, may authorize the guardian or limited guardian
to invest and reinvest as provided in chapter 11.100 RCW without
further order of the court;
(((b))) (ii) If it is for the best interests of the incapacitated
person that a specific property be used by the incapacitated person
rather than sold and the proceeds invested, the court may so order;
(((7))) (c) To apply to the court no later than the filing of the
inventory for an order authorizing disbursements on behalf of the
incapacitated person. However, the guardian or limited guardian of the
estate, or the person, department, bureau, agency, or charitable
organization having the care and custody of an incapacitated person,
may apply to the court for an order directing the guardian or limited
guardian of the estate to pay to the person, department, bureau,
agency, or charitable organization having the care and custody of an
incapacitated person, or if the guardian or limited guardian of the
estate has the care and custody of the incapacitated person, directing
the guardian or limited guardian of the estate to apply an amount
weekly, monthly, quarterly, semi-annually, or annually, as the court
may direct, to be expended in the care, maintenance, and education of
the incapacitated person and of his or her dependents. In proper
cases, the court may order payment of amounts directly to the
incapacitated person for his or her maintenance or incidental expenses.
The amounts authorized under this section may be decreased or increased
from time to time by direction of the court. If payments are made to
another under an order of the court, the guardian or limited guardian
of the estate is not bound to see to the application thereof;
(((8))) (d) To provide evidence of the guardian or limited
guardian's successful completion of any standardized training video or
web cast for guardians or limited guardians made available by the
administrative office of the courts and the superior court when the
guardian or limited guardian: (((a))) (i) Was appointed prior to July
22, 2011; (((b))) (ii) is not a certified professional guardian or
financial institution authorized under RCW 11.88.020; and (((c))) (iii)
has not previously completed the requirements of RCW 11.88.020(3). The
training video or web cast must be provided at no cost to the guardian
or limited guardian. The superior court may, upon (i) petition by the
guardian or limited guardian; or (ii) any other method as provided by
local court rule: (A) For good cause, waive this requirement for
guardians appointed prior to July 22, 2011. Good cause shall require
evidence that the guardian already possesses the requisite knowledge to
serve as a guardian without completing the training. When determining
whether there is good cause to waive the training requirement, the
court shall consider, among other facts, the length of time the
guardian has been serving the incapacitated person; whether the
guardian has timely filed all required reports with the court; whether
the guardian is monitored by other state or local agencies; and whether
there have been any allegations of abuse, neglect, or a breach of
fiduciary duty against the guardian; or (B) extend the time period for
completion of the training requirement for ninety days; and
(((9))) (e) To provide evidence of the guardian or limited
guardian's successful completion of any additional or updated training
video or web cast offered by the administrative office of the courts
and the superior court as is required at the discretion of the superior
court unless the guardian or limited guardian is a certified
professional guardian or financial institution authorized under RCW
11.88.020. The training video or web cast must be provided at no cost
to the guardian or limited guardian.

Sec. 3 RCW 11.92.043 and 2011 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It ((shall be)) is the duty of the guardian or limited guardian
of the person:
(((1))) (a) To file within three months after appointment a
personal care plan for the incapacitated person which ((shall)) must
include (((a))):
(i) An assessment of the incapacitated person's physical, mental,
and emotional needs and of such person's ability to perform or assist
in activities of daily living((,)); and
(((b))) (ii) The guardian's specific plan for meeting the
identified and emerging personal care needs of the incapacitated
person.
(((2))) (b) To file annually or, where a guardian of the estate has
been appointed, at the time an account is required to be filed under
RCW 11.92.040, a report on the status of the incapacitated person,
which ((shall)) must include:
(((a))) (i) The address and name of the incapacitated person and
all residential changes during the period;
(((b))) (ii) The services or programs which the incapacitated
person receives;
(((c))) (iii) The medical status of the incapacitated person;
(((d))) (iv) The mental status of the incapacitated person;
(((e))) (v) Changes in the functional abilities of the
incapacitated person;
(((f))) (vi) Activities of the guardian for the period;
(((g))) (vii) Any recommended changes in the scope of the authority
of the guardian;
(((h))) (viii) The identity of any professionals who have assisted
the incapacitated person during the period;
(((i)(i))) (ix)(A) Evidence of the guardian or limited guardian's
successful completion of any standardized training video or web cast
for guardians or limited guardians made available by the administrative
office of the courts and the superior court when the guardian or
limited guardian: (((A))) Was appointed prior to July 22, 2011;
(((B))) is not a certified professional guardian or financial
institution authorized under RCW 11.88.020; and (((C))) has not
previously completed the requirements of RCW 11.88.020(3). The
training video or web cast must be provided at no cost to the guardian
or limited guardian.
(((ii))) (B) The superior court may, upon (((A))) petition by the
guardian or limited guardian; or (((B))) any other method as provided
by local court rule:
(I) For good cause, waive this requirement for guardians appointed
prior to July 22, 2011. Good cause shall require evidence that the
guardian already possesses the requisite knowledge to serve as a
guardian without completing the training. When determining whether
there is good cause to waive the training requirement, the court shall
consider, among other facts, the length of time the guardian has been
serving the incapacitated person; whether the guardian has timely filed
all required reports with the court; whether the guardian is monitored
by other state or local agencies; and whether there have been any
allegations of abuse, neglect, or a breach of fiduciary duty against
the guardian; or
(II) Extend the time period for completion of the training
requirement for ninety days; and
(((j))) (x) Evidence of the guardian or limited guardian's
successful completion of any additional or updated training video or
web cast offered by the administrative office of the courts and the
superior court as is required at the discretion of the superior court
unless the guardian or limited guardian is a certified professional
guardian or financial institution authorized under RCW 11.88.020. The
training video or web cast must be provided at no cost to the guardian
or limited guardian.
(2) The court may allow guardians or limited guardians of the
person with corresponding estates having a value of not more than three
thousand dollars or guardians or limited guardians of the person where
there is no guardianship of the estate to report at review hearings at
intervals of up to six years if:
(a) The guardian or limited guardian files a declaration in lieu of
a report not more frequently than every three years stating there is no
substantial change of circumstances since the court's most recent
review hearing; and
(b) Attaches documentation of the court's most recent review
hearing to the declaration.
(3) To report to the court within thirty days any substantial
change in the incapacitated person's condition, or any changes in
residence of the incapacitated person.
(4) Consistent with the powers granted by the court, to care for
and maintain the incapacitated person in the setting least restrictive
to the incapacitated person's freedom and appropriate to the
incapacitated person's personal care needs, assert the incapacitated
person's rights and best interests, and if the incapacitated person is
a minor or where otherwise appropriate, to see that the incapacitated
person receives appropriate training and education and that the
incapacitated person has the opportunity to learn a trade, occupation,
or profession.
(5) Consistent with RCW 7.70.065, to provide timely, informed
consent for health care of the incapacitated person, except in the case
of a limited guardian where such power is not expressly provided for in
the order of appointment or subsequent modifying order as provided in
RCW 11.88.125 as now or hereafter amended, the standby guardian or
standby limited guardian may provide timely, informed consent to
necessary medical procedures if the guardian or limited guardian cannot
be located within four hours after the need for such consent arises.
No guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian may involuntarily
commit for mental health treatment, observation, or evaluation an
alleged incapacitated person who is unable or unwilling to give
informed consent to such commitment unless the procedures for
involuntary commitment set forth in chapter 71.05 or 72.23 RCW are
followed. Nothing in this section ((shall)) may be construed to allow
a guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian to consent to:
(a) Therapy or other procedure which induces convulsion;
(b) Surgery solely for the purpose of psychosurgery;
(c) Other psychiatric or mental health procedures that restrict
physical freedom of movement, or the rights set forth in RCW 71.05.217.
A guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian who believes
these procedures are necessary for the proper care and maintenance of
the incapacitated person shall petition the court for an order unless
the court has previously approved the procedure within the past thirty
days. The court may order the procedure only after an attorney is
appointed in accordance with RCW 11.88.045 if no attorney has
previously appeared, notice is given, and a hearing is held in
accordance with RCW 11.88.040.

--- END ---