BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.385 and 2011 c 293 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning January 1, 2009, any person licensed under this
chapter, or otherwise permitted under subsection (8) of this section,
who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an
equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance, or a violation
of RCW 46.61.520(1)(a) or 46.61.522(1)(b), or who has had or will have
his or her license suspended, revoked, or denied under RCW 46.20.3101,
may submit to the department an application for an ignition interlock
driver's license. The department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee
and upon determining that the petitioner is eligible to receive the
license, may issue an ignition interlock driver's license.
(b) A person may apply for an ignition interlock driver's license
anytime, including immediately after receiving the notices under RCW
46.20.308 or after his or her license is suspended, revoked, or denied.
A person receiving an ignition interlock driver's license waives his or
her right to a hearing or appeal under RCW 46.20.308.
(c) An applicant under this subsection shall provide proof to the
satisfaction of the department that a functioning ignition interlock
device has been installed on all vehicles operated by the person.
(i) The department shall require the person to maintain the device
on all vehicles operated by the person and shall restrict the person to
operating only vehicles equipped with the device, for the remainder of
the period of suspension, revocation, or denial. The installation of
an ignition interlock device is not necessary on vehicles owned,
leased, or rented by a person's employer and on those vehicles whose
care and/or maintenance is the temporary responsibility of the
employer, and driven at the direction of a person's employer as a
requirement of employment during working hours. The person must
provide the department with a declaration pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085
from his or her employer stating that the person's employment requires
the person to operate a vehicle owned by the employer or other persons
during working hours.
(ii) Subject to any periodic renewal requirements established by
the department under this section and subject to any applicable
compliance requirements under this chapter or other law, an ignition
interlock driver's license granted upon a suspension or revocation
under RCW 46.61.5055 or 46.20.3101 extends through the remaining
portion of any concurrent or consecutive suspension or revocation that
may be imposed as the result of administrative action and criminal
conviction arising out of the same incident.
(iii) The time period during which the person is licensed under
this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the
period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is required
under RCW 46.20.720 and 46.61.5055. Beginning with incidents occurring
on or after September 1, 2011, when calculating the period of time for
the restriction under RCW 46.20.720(3), the department must also give
the person a day-for-day credit for the time period, beginning from the
date of the incident, during which the person kept an ignition
interlock device installed on all vehicles the person operates. For
the purposes of this subsection (1)(c)(iii), the term "all vehicles"
does not include vehicles that would be subject to the employer
exception under RCW 46.20.720(3).
(2) An applicant for an ignition interlock driver's license who
qualifies under subsection (1) of this section is eligible to receive
a license only if the applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.
(3) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an ignition interlock
driver's license granted under this subsection no longer has a
functioning ignition interlock device installed on all vehicles
operated by the driver, the director shall give written notice by
first-class mail to the driver that the ignition interlock driver's
license shall be canceled. If at any time before the cancellation goes
into effect the driver submits evidence that a functioning ignition
interlock device has been installed on all vehicles operated by the
driver, the cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes
effective, the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new
ignition interlock driver's license upon submittal of evidence that a
functioning ignition interlock device has been installed on all
vehicles operated by the driver.
(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an ignition interlock driver's license may request a
hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(5) The director shall cancel an ignition interlock driver's
license after receiving notice that the holder thereof has been
convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of its
restrictions, no longer meets the eligibility requirements, or has been
convicted of or found to have committed a separate offense or any other
act or omission that under this chapter would warrant suspension or
revocation of a regular driver's license. The department must give
notice of the cancellation as provided under RCW 46.20.245. A person
whose ignition interlock driver's license has been canceled under this
section may reapply for a new ignition interlock driver's license if he
or she is otherwise qualified under this section and pays the fee
required under RCW 46.20.380.
(6)(a) Unless costs are waived by the ignition interlock company or
the person is indigent under RCW 10.101.010, the applicant shall pay
the cost of installing, removing, and leasing the ignition interlock
device and shall pay an additional fee of twenty dollars per month.
Payments shall be made directly to the ignition interlock company. The
company shall remit the additional twenty dollar fee to the department.
(b) The department shall deposit the proceeds of the twenty dollar
fee into the ignition interlock device revolving account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only to administer and operate the
ignition interlock device revolving account program. The department
shall adopt rules to provide monetary assistance according to greatest
need and when funds are available.
(7) The department shall adopt rules to implement ignition
interlock licensing. The department shall consult with the
administrative office of the courts, the state patrol, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, ignition interlock
companies, and any other organization or entity the department deems
appropriate.
(8)(a) A person who has not been licensed under this chapter, but
otherwise qualifies for an ignition interlock driver's license, may
apply for an ignition interlock driver's license by first meeting the
applicable qualifications and requirements, and paying the necessary
fees, for a driver's license under this chapter.
(b) A person who has had his or her driving privileges withheld for
reasons in addition to one or more of those listed in subsection (1) of
this section must also meet the qualifications and pay the required fee
for a temporary restricted driver's license under RCW 46.20.391 in
order to obtain an ignition interlock driver's license under this
section. An ignition interlock driver's license issued to a person who
has been issued a temporary restricted driver's license is subject to
any restrictions that have been imposed on the temporary restricted
driver's license.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.391 and 2010 c 269 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person licensed under this chapter or applying for an
ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 who is, or has
been, convicted of an offense relating to motor vehicles for which
suspension or revocation of the driver's license is mandatory, other
than vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or being in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, may submit to the department an
application for a temporary restricted driver's license. The
department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining
that the petitioner is eligible to receive the license, may issue a
temporary restricted driver's license and may set definite restrictions
as provided in RCW 46.20.394.
(2)(a) A person licensed under this chapter whose driver's license
is suspended administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic
ticket under RCW 46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility
laws under chapter 46.29 RCW; or for multiple violations within a
specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291, may apply to the
department for an occupational driver's license.
(b) If the suspension is for failure to respond, pay, or comply
with a notice of traffic infraction or conviction, the applicant must
enter into a payment plan with the court.
(c) An occupational driver's license issued to an applicant
described in (a) of this subsection shall be valid for the period of
the suspension or revocation.
(3) An applicant for an occupational or temporary restricted
driver's license who qualifies under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section is eligible to receive such license only if:
(a) Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the
offense that gave rise to the present conviction or incident, the
applicant has not committed vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520 or
vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; and
(b) The applicant demonstrates that it is necessary for him or her
to operate a motor vehicle because he or she:
(i) Is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential
that he or she operate a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is undergoing continuing health care or providing continuing
care to another who is dependent upon the applicant;
(iii) Is enrolled in an educational institution and pursuing a
course of study leading to a diploma, degree, or other certification of
successful educational completion;
(iv) Is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in
meetings of a twelve-step group such as Alcoholics Anonymous that
requires the petitioner to drive to or from the treatment or meetings;
(v) Is fulfilling court-ordered community service responsibilities;
(vi) Is in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a
WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully
employed and the program requires a driver's license;
(vii) Is in an apprenticeship, on-the-job training, or welfare-to-work program; or
(viii) Presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position
in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program for which a
driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect for no longer
than fourteen days; and
(c) The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW; and
(d) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational
driver's license granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in
an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program, the director shall
give written notice by first-class mail to the driver that the
occupational driver's license shall be canceled. If at any time
before the cancellation goes into effect the driver submits evidence of
continued enrollment in the program, the cancellation shall be stayed.
If the cancellation becomes effective, the driver may obtain, at no
additional charge, a new occupational driver's license upon submittal
of evidence of enrollment in another program that meets the criteria
set forth in this subsection; and
(e) The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license
under (b)(iv) of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive
transit services sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation
in the programs referenced under (b)(iv) of this subsection.
(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an occupational or temporary restricted driver's
license may request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(5) The director shall cancel an occupational or temporary
restricted driver's license after receiving notice that the holder
thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of
its restrictions, no longer meets the eligibility requirements, or has
been convicted of or found to have committed a separate offense or any
other act or omission that under this chapter would warrant suspension
or revocation of a regular driver's license. The department must give
notice of the cancellation as provided under RCW 46.20.245. A person
whose occupational or temporary restricted driver's license has been
canceled under this section may reapply for a new occupational or
temporary restricted driver's license if he or she is otherwise
qualified under this section and pays the fee required under RCW
46.20.380.

--- END ---