BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.070 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 1010, 2011 1st
sp.s. c 39 s 4, and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 22 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or
position in, the legislative branch of the state government including
members, officers, and employees of the legislative council, joint
legislative audit and review committee, statute law committee, and any
interim committee of the legislature;
(b) The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of
appeals, judges of the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to
any employee of, or position in the judicial branch of state
government;
(c) Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical
colleges;
(d) The officers of the Washington state patrol;
(e) Elective officers of the state;
(f) The chief executive officer of each agency;
(g) In the departments of employment security and social and health
services, the director and the director's confidential secretary; in
all other departments, the executive head of which is an individual
appointed by the governor, the director, his or her confidential
secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;
(h) In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee,
whether the members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or
other authority, serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:
(i) All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;
(ii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on
a part-time basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The
secretary of the board, commission, or committee; the chief executive
officer of the board, commission, or committee; and the confidential
secretary of the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve
on a full-time basis: The chief executive officer or administrative
officer as designated by the board, commission, or committee; and a
confidential secretary to the chair of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iv) If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex
officio: The chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary
of such chief executive officer;
(i) The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in
the immediate offices of the elective officers of the state;
(j) Assistant attorneys general;
(k) Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of
the state;
(l) Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel
resources board;
(m) Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit
commission;
(n) Officers and employees of the Washington apple commission;
(o) Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products
commission;
(p) Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research
commission;
(q) Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;
(r) Officers and employees of the Washington grain commission;
(s) Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter
15.66 RCW;
(t) Officers and employees of agricultural commissions formed under
chapter 15.65 RCW;
(u) Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor
relations in all state agencies employing such executive assistants
including but not limited to all departments, offices, commissions,
committees, boards, or other bodies subject to the provisions of this
chapter and this subsection shall prevail over any provision of law
inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is made in such law;
(v) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency
heads, assistant directors or division directors, and not more than
three principal policy assistants who report directly to the agency
head or deputy agency heads;
(w) Staff employed by the department of commerce to administer
energy policy functions;
(x) The manager of the energy facility site evaluation council;
(y) A maximum of ten staff employed by the department of commerce
to administer innovation and policy functions, including the three
principal policy assistants exempted under (v) of this subsection;
(z) Staff employed by Washington State University to administer
energy education, applied research, and technology transfer programs
under RCW 43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5);
(aa) Officers and employees of the consolidated technology services
agency created in RCW 43.105.006 that perform the following functions
or duties: Systems integration; data center engineering and
management; network systems engineering and management; information
technology contracting; information technology customer relations
management; and network and systems security. However, no more than
twenty-five percent of the employees within the consolidated technology
services agency may be exempt from this chapter.
(2) The following classifications, positions, and employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards are hereby exempted
from coverage of this chapter:
(a) Members of the governing board of each institution of higher
education and related boards, all presidents, vice presidents, and
their confidential secretaries, administrative, and personal
assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic personnel; and
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions employed
by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive
heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial
or professional employees in an institution or related board having
substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program
results, or for the formulation of institutional policy, or for
carrying out personnel administration or labor relations functions,
legislative relations, public information, development, senior computer
systems and network programming, or internal audits and investigations;
and any employee of a community college district whose place of work is
one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational
program operating outside of the state of Washington;
(b) The governing board of each institution, and related boards,
may also exempt from this chapter classifications involving research
activities, counseling of students, extension or continuing education
activities, graphic arts or publications activities requiring
prescribed academic preparation or special training as determined by
the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee engaged in office,
clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be exempted by
the board under this provision;
(c) Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the
University of Washington.
(3) In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this
chapter, the director may provide for further exemptions pursuant to
the following procedures. The governor or other appropriate elected
official may submit requests for exemption to the office of financial
management stating the reasons for requesting such exemptions. The
director shall hold a public hearing, after proper notice, on requests
submitted pursuant to this subsection. If the director determines that
the position for which exemption is requested is one involving
substantial responsibility for the formulation of basic agency or
executive policy or one involving directing and controlling program
operations of an agency or a major administrative division thereof, or
is a senior expert in enterprise information technology infrastructure,
engineering, or systems, the director shall grant the request. The
total number of additional exemptions permitted under this subsection
shall not exceed one percent of the number of employees in the
classified service not including employees of institutions of higher
education and related boards for those agencies not directly under the
authority of any elected public official other than the governor, and
shall not exceed a total of twenty-five for all agencies under the
authority of elected public officials other than the governor.
The salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or
hereafter exempted except for the chief executive officer of each
agency, full-time members of boards and commissions, administrative
assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office of an
elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (t) and (2) of this section, shall be determined by the
director. Changes to the classification plan affecting exempt salaries
must meet the same provisions for classified salary increases resulting
from adjustments to the classification plan as outlined in RCW
41.06.152.
From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, salaries for all
positions exempt from classification under this chapter are subject to
RCW 41.04.820.
From February 18, 2009, through June 30, 2013, a salary or wage
increase shall not be granted to any position exempt from
classification under this chapter, except that a salary or wage
increase may be granted to employees pursuant to collective bargaining
agreements negotiated under chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 47.64, or 41.76 RCW,
and except that increases may be granted for positions for which the
employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;
(b) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of
client services; and
(c) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including
institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by
the director of the office of financial management.
Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010,
through June 30, 2011, to a position exempt from classification under
this chapter shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature no later than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for
which salary increases were granted, the size of the increases, and the
reasons for giving the increases.
Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through
June 30, 2013, to a position exempt from classification under this
chapter shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by July 31, 2012, and July 31, 2013, detailing the
positions for which salary increases were granted during the preceding
fiscal year, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the
increases.
Any person holding a classified position subject to the provisions
of this chapter shall, when and if such position is subsequently
exempted from the application of this chapter, be afforded the
following rights: If such person previously held permanent status in
another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.
Any classified employee having civil service status in a classified
position who accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have
the right of reversion to the highest class of position previously
held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.
A person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the
position for gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of
reversion to a classified position as provided for in this section.
From February 15, 2010, until June 30, 2013, no monetary
performance-based awards or incentives may be granted by the director
or employers to employees covered by rules adopted under this section.
This subsection does not prohibit the payment of awards provided for in
chapter 41.60 RCW.
From July 1, 2011, until June 30, 2013, no performance-based awards
or incentives may be granted by the director or employers to employees
pursuant to a performance management confirmation granted by the
department of personnel under WAC 357-37-055.

--- END ---