BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to sustainably
improve the timeliness of services related to competency to stand trial
by setting performance expectations, establishing new mechanisms for
accountability, and enacting reforms to ensure that forensic resources
are expended in an efficient and clinically appropriate manner without
diminishing the quality of competency services, and to reduce the time
defendants with mental illness spend in jail awaiting evaluation and
restoration of competency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature establishes the following performance
targets for the timeliness of the completion of accurate and reliable
evaluations of competency to stand trial and admissions for inpatient
services related to competency to stand trial for adult criminal
defendants. The legislature recognizes that these targets may not be
achievable in all cases without compromise to quality of evaluation
services, but intends for the department to manage, allocate, and
request appropriations for resources in order to meet these targets
whenever possible without sacrificing the accuracy of competency
evaluations, and to otherwise make sustainable improvements and track
performance related to the timeliness of competency services:
(i) For a state hospital to extend an offer of admission to a
defendant in pretrial custody for legally authorized treatment or
evaluation services related to competency, or to extend an offer of
admission for legally authorized services following dismissal of
charges based on incompetent to proceed or stand trial, seven days or
less;
(ii) For completion of a competency evaluation in jail and
distribution of the evaluation report for a defendant in pretrial
custody, seven days or less;
(iii) For completion of a competency evaluation in the community
and distribution of the evaluation report for a defendant who is
released from custody and makes a reasonable effort to cooperate with
the evaluation, twenty-one days or less.
(b) The time periods measured in these performance targets shall
run from the date on which the state hospital receives the court
referral and charging documents, discovery, and criminal history
information related to the defendant. The targets in (a)(i) and (ii)
of this subsection shall be phased in over a six-month period from the
effective date of this section. The target in (a)(iii) of this
subsection shall be phased in over a twelve-month period from the
effective date of this section.
(c) The legislature recognizes the following nonexclusive list of
circumstances which may place achievement of targets for completion of
competency services described in (a) of this subsection out of the
department's reach in an individual case without aspersion to the
efforts of the department:
(i) Despite a timely request, the department has not received
necessary medical clearance information regarding the current medical
status of a defendant in pretrial custody for the purposes of admission
to a state hospital;
(ii) The individual circumstances of the defendant make accurate
completion of an evaluation of competency to proceed or stand trial
dependent upon review of medical history information which is in the
custody of a third party and cannot be immediately obtained by the
department. Completion of a competency evaluation shall not be
postponed for procurement of medical history information which is
merely supplementary to the competency determination;
(iii) Completion of the referral is frustrated by lack of
availability or participation by counsel, jail or court personnel,
interpreters, or the defendant; or
(iv) An unusual spike in the receipt of evaluation referrals or in
the number of defendants requiring restoration services has occurred,
causing temporary delays until the unexpected excess demand for
competency services can be resolved.
(2) The department shall:
(a) Develop, document, and implement procedures to monitor the
clinical status of defendants admitted to a state hospital for
competency services that allow the state hospital to accomplish early
discharge for defendants for whom clinical objectives have been
achieved or may be achieved before expiration of the commitment period;
(b) Investigate the extent to which patients admitted to a state
hospital under this chapter overstay time periods authorized by law and
take reasonable steps to limit the time of commitment to authorized
periods; and
(c) Establish written standards for the productivity of forensic
evaluators and utilize these standards to internally review the
performance of forensic evaluators.
(3) Following any quarter in which a state hospital has failed to
meet one or more of the performance targets in subsection (1) of this
section after full implementation of the performance target, the
department shall report the extent of this deviation to the executive
and legislature and describe any corrective action being taken to
improve performance. This report shall be made publicly available. An
average may be used to determine timeliness under this subsection.
(4) Beginning December 1, 2013, the department shall report
annually on the timeliness of services related to competency to proceed
or stand trial in a form which is accessible to the public and which
breaks down performance by county. The department shall also track the
timeliness by county with which court referrals accompanied by charging
documents, discovery, and criminal history information are provided to
the department relative to the signature date of the court order and
include this information in the annual report.
(5) This section does not create any new entitlement or cause of
action related to the timeliness of competency evaluations or admission
for inpatient services related to competency to proceed or stand trial,
nor can it form the basis for contempt sanctions under chapter 7.21 RCW
or a motion to dismiss criminal charges.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.77.060 and 2004 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) Whenever a defendant has pleaded not guilty by reason of
insanity, or there is reason to doubt his or her competency, the court
on its own motion or on the motion of any party shall either appoint or
request the secretary to designate ((at least two)) a qualified
expert((s)) or professional person((s)), ((one of whom)) who shall be
approved by the prosecuting attorney, to ((examine)) evaluate and
report upon the mental condition of the defendant.
(b) The signed order of the court shall serve as authority for the
((experts)) evaluator to be given access to all records held by any
mental health, medical, educational, or correctional facility that
relate to the present or past mental, emotional, or physical condition
of the defendant. ((At least one of the experts or professional
persons appointed shall be a developmental disabilities professional))
If the court is advised by any party that the defendant may ((be
developmentally disabled)) have a developmental disability, the
evaluation must be performed by a developmental disabilities
professional. ((Upon agreement of the parties, the court may designate
one expert or professional person to conduct the examination and report
on the mental condition of the defendant. For purposes of the
examination, the court may order))
(c) The evaluator shall assess the defendant in a jail, detention
facility, in the community, or in court to determine whether a period
of inpatient commitment will be necessary to complete an accurate
evaluation. If inpatient commitment is needed, the signed order of the
court shall serve as authority for the evaluator to request the jail or
detention facility to transport the defendant ((committed)) to a
hospital or ((other suitably)) secure ((public or private)) mental
health facility for a period of ((time necessary to complete the
examination, but)) commitment not to exceed fifteen days from the time
of admission to the facility. Otherwise, the evaluator shall complete
the evaluation.
(d) The court may commit the defendant for evaluation to a hospital
or secure mental health facility without an assessment if the defendant
is charged with murder in the first or second degree or if the court
finds that it is more likely than not that an evaluation in the jail
will be inadequate to complete an accurate evaluation. The court shall
not order an initial inpatient evaluation for any purpose other than a
competency evaluation. ((If the defendant is being held in jail or
other detention facility, upon agreement of the parties, the court may
direct that the examination be conducted at the jail or other detention
facility.
(b))) (e) The order shall indicate whether, in the event the
defendant is committed to a hospital or secure mental health facility
for evaluation, all parties agree to waive the presence of the
defendant or to the defendant's remote participation at a subsequent
competency hearing or presentation of an agreed order if the
recommendation of the evaluator is for continuation of the stay of
criminal proceedings, or if the opinion of the evaluator is that the
defendant remains incompetent and there is no remaining restoration
period, and the hearing is held prior to the expiration of the
authorized commitment period.
(f) When a defendant is ordered to be committed for inpatient
examination under this subsection (1), the court may delay granting
bail until the defendant has been evaluated for competency or sanity
and appears before the court. Following the evaluation, in determining
bail the court shall consider: (i) Recommendations of the ((expert or
professional persons)) evaluator regarding the defendant's competency,
sanity, or diminished capacity; (ii) whether the defendant has a recent
history of one or more violent acts; (iii) whether the defendant has
previously been acquitted by reason of insanity or found incompetent;
(iv) whether it is reasonably likely the defendant will fail to appear
for a future court hearing; and (v) whether the defendant is a threat
to public safety.
(2) The court may direct that a qualified expert or professional
person retained by or appointed for the defendant be permitted to
witness the examination authorized by subsection (1) of this section,
and that the defendant shall have access to all information obtained by
the court appointed experts or professional persons. The defendant's
expert or professional person shall have the right to file his or her
own report following the guidelines of subsection (3) of this section.
If the defendant is indigent, the court shall upon the request of the
defendant assist him or her in obtaining an expert or professional
person.
(3) The report of the examination shall include the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A diagnosis or description of the current mental ((condition))
status of the defendant;
(c) If the defendant suffers from a mental disease or defect, or
((is developmentally disabled)) has a developmental disability, an
opinion as to competency;
(d) If the defendant has indicated his or her intention to rely on
the defense of insanity pursuant to RCW 10.77.030, and an evaluation
and report by an expert or professional person has been provided
concluding that the defendant was criminally insane at the time of the
alleged offense, an opinion as to the defendant's sanity at the time of
the act, and an opinion as to whether the defendant presents a
substantial danger to other persons, or presents a substantial
likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or
security, unless kept under further control by the court or other
persons or institutions, provided that no opinion shall be rendered
under this subsection (3)(d) unless the evaluator or court determines
that the defendant is competent to stand trial;
(e) When directed by the court, if an evaluation and report by an
expert or professional person has been provided concluding that the
defendant lacked the capacity at the time of the offense to form the
mental state necessary to commit the charged offense, an opinion as to
the capacity of the defendant to have a particular state of mind which
is an element of the offense charged;
(f) An opinion as to whether the defendant should be evaluated by
a ((county)) designated mental health professional under chapter 71.05
RCW((, and an opinion as to whether the defendant is a substantial
danger to other persons, or presents a substantial likelihood of
committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security, unless
kept under further control by the court or other persons or
institutions)).
(4) The secretary may execute such agreements as appropriate and
necessary to implement this section and may choose to designate more
than one evaluator.

Sec. 4 RCW 10.77.065 and 2008 c 213 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a)(i) The ((facility)) expert conducting the evaluation shall
provide ((its)) his or her report and recommendation to the court in
which the criminal proceeding is pending. For a competency evaluation
of a defendant who is released from custody, if the evaluation cannot
be completed within twenty-one days due to a lack of cooperation by the
defendant, the evaluator shall notify the court that he or she is
unable to complete the evaluation because of such lack of cooperation.
(ii) A copy of the report and recommendation shall be provided to
the designated mental health professional, the prosecuting attorney,
the defense attorney, and the professional person at the local
correctional facility where the defendant is being held, or if there is
no professional person, to the person designated under (a)(((ii))) (iv)
of this subsection. Upon request, the ((facility)) evaluator shall
also provide copies of any source documents relevant to the evaluation
to the designated mental health professional. ((The report and
recommendation shall be provided not less than twenty-four hours
preceding the transfer of the defendant to the correctional facility in
the county in which the criminal proceeding is pending.
(ii))) (iii) Any facility providing inpatient services related to
competency shall discharge the defendant as soon as the facility
determines that the defendant is competent to stand trial. Discharge
shall not be postponed during the writing and distribution of the
evaluation report. Distribution of an evaluation report by a facility
providing inpatient services shall ordinarily be accomplished within
two working days or less following the final evaluation of the
defendant. If the defendant is detained in a local correctional
facility, the local correctional facility must continue the medication
regimen prescribed by the hospital, when clinically appropriate, unless
the defendant refuses to cooperate with medication.
(iv) If there is no professional person at the local correctional
facility, the local correctional facility shall designate a
professional person as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in cooperation with
the regional support network, a professional person at the regional
support network to receive the report and recommendation.
(((iii) When a defendant is transferred to the facility conducting
the evaluation, or)) (v) Upon commencement of a defendant's evaluation
in the local correctional facility, the local correctional facility
must notify the evaluator ((or the facility conducting the evaluation))
of the name of the professional person, or person designated under
(a)(((ii))) (iv) of this subsection, to receive the report and
recommendation.
(b) If the ((facility)) evaluator concludes, under RCW
10.77.060(3)(f), the person should be ((kept under further control, an
evaluation shall be conducted of such person)) evaluated by a
designated mental health professional under chapter 71.05 RCW((.)), the
court shall order ((an)) such evaluation be conducted ((by the
appropriate designated mental health professional: (i))) prior to
release from confinement ((for such person who is convicted, if
sentenced to confinement for twenty-four months or less; (ii) for any
person who is acquitted; or (iii) for any person: (A) Whose charges
are dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4); or (B) whose nonfelony
charges are dismissed)) when the person is acquitted, convicted and
sentenced to confinement for twenty-four months or less, or charges are
dismissed pursuant to a finding of incompetent to stand trial.
(2) The designated mental health professional shall provide written
notification within twenty-four hours of the results of the
determination whether to commence proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The notification shall be provided to the persons identified in
subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(3) The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the results of
any proceedings commenced by the designated mental health professional
under subsection (2) of this section to the ((facility conducting the
evaluation under this chapter)) secretary.
(4) The fact of admission and all information and records compiled,
obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services under this
chapter may also be disclosed to the courts solely to prevent the entry
of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any
order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 10.77.084 and 2007 c 375 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If at any time during the pendency of an action and prior to
judgment the court finds, following a report as provided in RCW
10.77.060, a defendant is incompetent, the court shall order the
proceedings against the defendant be stayed except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section.
(b) ((A defendant found incompetent shall be evaluated at the
direction of the secretary and a determination made whether the
defendant is an individual with a developmental disability. Such
evaluation and determination shall be accomplished as soon as possible
following the court's placement of the defendant in the custody of the
secretary.
(i) When appropriate, and subject to available funds, if the
defendant is determined to be an individual with a developmental
disability, he or she may be placed in a program specifically reserved
for the treatment and training of persons with developmental
disabilities where the defendant shall have the right to habilitation
according to an individualized service plan specifically developed for
the particular needs of the defendant. A copy of the evaluation shall
be sent to the program.
(A) The program shall be separate from programs serving persons
involved in any other treatment or habilitation program.
(B) The program shall be appropriately secure under the
circumstances and shall be administered by developmental disabilities
professionals who shall direct the habilitation efforts.
(C) The program shall provide an environment affording security
appropriate with the charged criminal behavior and necessary to protect
the public safety.
(ii) The department may limit admissions of such persons to this
specialized program in order to ensure that expenditures for services
do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by
the department for such services.
(iii) The department may establish admission priorities in the
event that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits set by the
department.
(c))) At the end of the mental health treatment and restoration
period, if any, or at any time a professional person determines
competency has been, or is unlikely to be, restored, the defendant
shall be returned to court for a hearing. The parties may agree to
waive the defendant's presence or to remote participation by the
defendant at a hearing or presentation of an agreed order if the
recommendation of the evaluator is for the continuation of the stay of
criminal proceedings, or if the opinion of the evaluator is that the
defendant remains incompetent and there is no remaining restoration
period, and the hearing is held prior to expiration of the defendant's
authorized period of commitment, in which case the department shall
promptly notify the court and parties of the date of the defendant's
admission and expiration of commitment so that a timely hearing date
may be scheduled. If, after notice and hearing, competency has been
restored, the stay entered under (a) of this subsection shall be
lifted. If competency has not been restored, the proceedings shall be
dismissed without prejudice. If the court concludes that competency
has not been restored, but that further treatment within the time
limits established by RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088 is likely to restore
competency, the court may order that treatment for purposes of
competency restoration be continued. Such treatment may not extend
beyond the combination of time provided for in RCW 10.77.086 or
10.77.088.
(((d))) (c) If at any time during the proceeding the court finds,
following notice and hearing, a defendant is not likely to regain
competency, the proceedings shall be dismissed without prejudice and
the defendant shall be evaluated for civil commitment proceedings.
(2) If the defendant is referred ((to the)) for evaluation by a
designated mental health professional ((for consideration of initial
detention proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW pursuant to)) under this
chapter, the designated mental health professional shall provide prompt
written notification of the results of the ((determination whether to
commence initial detention proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW))
evaluation and whether the person was detained. The notification shall
be provided to the court in which the criminal action was pending, the
prosecutor, the defense attorney in the criminal action, and the
facility that evaluated the defendant for competency.
(3) The fact that the defendant is unfit to proceed does not
preclude any pretrial proceedings which do not require the personal
participation of the defendant.
(4) A defendant receiving medication for either physical or mental
problems shall not be prohibited from standing trial, if the medication
either enables the defendant to understand the proceedings against him
or her and to assist in his or her own defense, or does not disable him
or her from so understanding and assisting in his or her own defense.
(5) At or before the conclusion of any commitment period provided
for by this section, the facility providing evaluation and treatment
shall provide to the court a written report of examination which meets
the requirements of RCW 10.77.060(3). For defendants charged with a
felony, the report following the second competency restoration period
or first competency restoration period if the defendant's incompetence
is determined to be solely due to a developmental disability or the
evaluator concludes that the defendant is not likely to regain
competency must include an assessment of the defendant's future
dangerousness which is evidence-based regarding predictive validity.

Sec. 6 RCW 10.77.086 and 2007 c 375 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If the defendant is charged with a felony and determined to
be incompetent, until he or she has regained the competency necessary
to understand the proceedings against him or her and assist in his or
her own defense, or has been determined unlikely to regain competency
pursuant to RCW 10.77.084(1)(((c))) (b), but in any event for a period
of no longer than ninety days, the court:
(((a))) (i) Shall commit the defendant to the custody of the
secretary who shall place such defendant in an appropriate facility of
the department for evaluation and treatment; or
(((b))) (ii) May alternatively order the defendant to undergo
evaluation and treatment at some other facility as determined by the
department, or under the guidance and control of a professional person.
(b) For a defendant whose highest charge is a class C felony, or a
class B felony which is not classified as violent under RCW 9.94A.030,
the maximum time allowed for the first competency restoration period is
forty-five days.
(2) On or before expiration of the initial ((ninety-day)) period of
commitment under subsection (1) of this section the court shall conduct
a hearing, at which it shall determine whether or not the defendant is
incompetent.
(3) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a
defendant charged with a felony is incompetent, the court shall have
the option of extending the order of commitment or alternative
treatment for an additional ((ninety-day)) period of ninety days, but
the court must at the time of extension set a date for a prompt hearing
to determine the defendant's competency before the expiration of the
second ((ninety-day)) restoration period. The defendant, the
defendant's attorney, or the prosecutor has the right to demand that
the hearing be before a jury. No extension shall be ordered for a
second ((ninety-day)) or third restoration period((, nor for any
subsequent period)) as provided in subsection (4) of this section((,))
if the defendant's incompetence has been determined by the secretary to
be solely the result of a developmental disability which is such that
competence is not reasonably likely to be regained during an extension.
(4) For persons charged with a felony, at the hearing upon the
expiration of the second ((ninety-day)) restoration period or at the
end of the first ((ninety-day)) restoration period, in the case of a
defendant with a developmental disability, if the jury or court finds
that the defendant is incompetent, the charges shall be dismissed
without prejudice, and ((either civil commitment proceedings shall be
instituted or)) the court shall either order the release of the
defendant or order the defendant be committed to a hospital or secure
mental health facility for up to seventy-two hours starting from
admission to the facility, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays,
for evaluation for the purpose of filing a civil commitment petition.
The criminal charges shall not be dismissed if the court or jury finds
that: (a) The defendant (i) is a substantial danger to other persons;
or (ii) presents a substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts
jeopardizing public safety or security; and (b) there is a substantial
probability that the defendant will regain competency within a
reasonable period of time. In the event that the court or jury makes
such a finding, the court may extend the period of commitment for up to
an additional six months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A defendant found incompetent by the court under RCW 10.77.084
must be evaluated at the direction of the secretary and a determination
made whether the defendant is an individual with a developmental
disability. Such evaluation and determination must be accomplished as
soon as possible following the court's placement of the defendant in
the custody of the secretary.
(2) When appropriate, and subject to available funds, if the
defendant is determined to be an individual with a developmental
disability, he or she may be placed in a program specifically reserved
for the treatment and training of persons with developmental
disabilities where the defendant has the right to habilitation
according to an individualized service plan specifically developed for
the particular needs of the defendant. A copy of the evaluation must
be sent to the program.
(a) The program must be separate from programs serving persons
involved in any other treatment or habilitation program.
(b) The program must be appropriately secure under the
circumstances and must be administered by developmental disabilities
professionals who shall direct the habilitation efforts.
(c) The program must provide an environment affording security
appropriate with the charged criminal behavior and necessary to protect
the public safety.
(3) The department may limit admissions of such persons to this
specialized program in order to ensure that expenditures for services
do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by
the department for such services.
(4) The department may establish admission priorities in the event
that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits set by the
department.

Sec. 8 RCW 71.05.310 and 2005 c 504 s 709 are each amended to
read as follows:
The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition for ninety-day
treatment within five judicial days of the first court appearance after
the probable cause hearing, or within ten judicial days for a petition
filed under RCW 71.05.280(3). The court may continue the hearing for
good cause upon the written request of the person named in the petition
or the person's attorney((,)). The court may continue for good cause
((shown, which continuance shall not exceed five additional judicial
days)) a petition filed under RCW 71.05.280(3) upon written request by
the person named in the petition, the person's attorney, or the
petitioner. If the person named in the petition requests a jury trial,
the trial shall commence within ten judicial days of the first court
appearance after the probable cause hearing. The burden of proof shall
be by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence and shall be upon the
petitioner. The person shall be present at such proceeding, which
shall in all respects accord with the constitutional guarantees of due
process of law and the rules of evidence pursuant to RCW 71.05.360 (8)
and (9).
During the proceeding, the person named in the petition shall
continue to be treated until released by order of the superior court.
If no order has been made within thirty days after the filing of the
petition, not including extensions of time requested by the detained
person or his or her attorney, or in the case of a petition filed under
RCW 71.05.280(3) the petitioner, the detained person shall be released.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall make an independent assessment of the performance of
the state hospitals with respect to provisions specified in section 2
of this act, but shall not be required to independently evaluate the
exercise of clinical judgment. A report shall be made to the
legislature reflecting the committee's findings and recommendations
both six and eighteen months following the effective date of this
section. The department of social and health services shall cooperate
in a timely manner with requests for data and assistance related to
this assessment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall study the benefit of standardizing protocols used for
treatment to restore competency to stand trial in Washington and during
what clinically appropriate time period said treatment may be expected
to be effective and report to the legislature. The department of
social and health services shall cooperate in a timely manner with data
requests in service of this study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
May 1, 2012.

--- END ---