BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.70.020 and 2008 c 313 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall:
(1) Administer all state-funded services in the following program
areas:
(a) Trial court criminal indigent defense, as provided in chapter
10.101 RCW;
(b) Appellate indigent defense, as provided in this chapter;
(c) Representation of indigent parents qualified for appointed
counsel in dependency and termination cases, as provided in RCW
13.34.090 and 13.34.092;
(d) Extraordinary criminal justice cost petitions, as provided in
RCW 43.330.190;
(e) Compilation of copies of DNA test requests by persons convicted
of felonies, as provided in RCW 10.73.170;
(f) Representation of indigent respondents qualified for appointed
counsel in sexually violent predator civil commitment cases, as
provided in chapter 71.09 RCW;
(2) Submit a biennial budget for all costs related to the office's
program areas;
(3) Establish administrative procedures, standards, and guidelines
for the office's program areas, including cost-efficient systems that
provide for authorized recovery of costs;
(4) Provide oversight and technical assistance to ensure the
effective and efficient delivery of services in the office's program
areas;
(5) Recommend criteria and standards for determining and verifying
indigency. In recommending criteria for determining indigency, the
director shall compile and review the indigency standards used by other
state agencies and shall periodically submit the compilation and report
to the legislature on the appropriateness and consistency of such
standards;
(6) Collect information regarding indigent defense services funded
by the state and report annually to the advisory committee, the
legislature, and the supreme court;
(7) Coordinate with the supreme court and the judges of each
division of the court of appeals to determine how appellate attorney
services should be provided.
The office of public defense shall not provide direct
representation of clients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In providing indigent defense services for sexually violent
predator civil commitment cases under chapter 71.09 RCW, the director
shall:
(1) In accordance with state contracting laws, contract with
persons admitted to practice law in this state and organizations
employing persons admitted to practice law in this state for the
provision of legal services to indigent persons;
(2) Establish annual contract fees for defense legal services
within amounts appropriated based on Washington state bar association
standards, attorney rules of professional conduct, court rules, court
orders, data gathered regarding current prosecution and defense
practices around the state, and the director's experience in providing
defense services in other types of cases;
(3) Consistent with Washington state bar association standards,
attorney rules of professional conduct, court rules, and court orders,
establish procedures for the reimbursement of expert witness and other
professional and investigative costs;
(4) Review and analyze existing caseload standards and make
recommendations for updating caseload standards to the Washington state
bar association as appropriate;
(5) Periodically, with the first report due December 1, 2013,
submit a report to the chief justice of the supreme court, the
governor, and the legislature, with all pertinent data on the operation
of indigent defense services for commitment proceedings under this
section, including:
(a) The costs and projected needs for maintaining adequate indigent
defense services;
(b) The time to trial for all commitment trial proceedings
including a list of the number of continuances granted, the party that
requested the continuance, the county where the proceeding is being
heard, and, if available, the reason the continuance was granted;
(c) Recommendations for policy changes, including changes in
statutes and changes in court rules, which may be appropriate for the
improvement of sexually violent predator civil commitment proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
department of social and health services and the special commitment
center pertaining to indigent defense under chapter 71.09 RCW are
transferred to the office of public defense.
(2)(a) The office of public defense may request any written
materials in the possession of the department of social and health
services and the special commitment center pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred, which shall be delivered to the
custody of the office of public defense. Materials may be transferred
electronically and/or in hard copy, as agreed by the agencies. All
funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the office of
public defense.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall, on July 1, 2012, be transferred and credited to the office of
public defense.
(3) Notwithstanding the effective date of this section, if
implementation of office of public defense contracts would result in
the substitution of counsel within one hundred eighty days of a
scheduled trial date, the director of the office of public defense may
continue defense services with existing counsel to facilitate
continuity of effective representation and avoid further continuance of
a trial. When existing counsel is maintained, payment to complete the
trial shall be prorated based on standard contract fees established by
the office of public defense under section 2 of this act and, at the
director's discretion, may include extraordinary compensation based on
attorney documentation and consistent with Washington state bar
association standards and attorney rules of professional conduct.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.09.040 and 2009 c 409 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of a petition under RCW 71.09.030, the judge
shall determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the
person named in the petition is a sexually violent predator. If such
determination is made the judge shall direct that the person be taken
into custody and notify the office of public defense of the potential
need for representation.
(2) Within seventy-two hours after a person is taken into custody
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court shall provide the
person with notice of, and an opportunity to appear in person at, a
hearing to contest probable cause as to whether the person is a
sexually violent predator. In order to assist the person at the
hearing, within twenty-four hours of service of the petition, the
prosecuting agency shall provide to the person or his or her counsel a
copy of all materials provided to the prosecuting agency by the
referring agency pursuant to RCW 71.09.025, or obtained by the
prosecuting agency pursuant to RCW 71.09.025(1) (c) and (d). At this
hearing, the court shall (a) verify the person's identity, and (b)
determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the person is
a sexually violent predator. At the probable cause hearing, the state
may rely upon the petition and certification for determination of
probable cause filed pursuant to RCW 71.09.030. The state may
supplement this with additional documentary evidence or live testimony.
The person may be held in total confinement at the county jail until
the trial court renders a decision after the conclusion of the seventy-two hour probable cause hearing. The county shall be entitled to
reimbursement for the cost of housing and transporting the person
pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary.
(3) At the probable cause hearing, the person shall have the
following rights in addition to the rights previously specified: (a)
To be represented by counsel, and if the person is indigent as defined
in RCW 10.101.010, to have office of public defense contracted counsel
appointed as provided in RCW 10.101.020; (b) to present evidence on his
or her behalf; (c) to cross-examine witnesses who testify against him
or her; (d) to view and copy all petitions and reports in the court
file. The court must permit a witness called by either party to
testify by telephone. Because this is a special proceeding, discovery
pursuant to the civil rules shall not occur until after the hearing has
been held and the court has issued its decision.
(4) If the probable cause determination is made, the judge shall
direct that the person be transferred to an appropriate facility for an
evaluation as to whether the person is a sexually violent predator.
The evaluation shall be conducted by a person deemed to be
professionally qualified to conduct such an examination pursuant to
rules developed by the department of social and health services. In
adopting such rules, the department of social and health services shall
consult with the department of health and the department of
corrections. In no event shall the person be released from confinement
prior to trial. A witness called by either party shall be permitted to
testify by telephone.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.09.050 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 28 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Within forty-five days after the completion of any hearing held
pursuant to RCW 71.09.040, the court shall conduct a trial to determine
whether the person is a sexually violent predator. The trial may be
continued upon the request of either party and a showing of good cause,
or by the court on its own motion in the due administration of justice,
and when the respondent will not be substantially prejudiced. ((The
department is responsible for the cost of one expert or professional
person to conduct an evaluation on the prosecuting agency's behalf.))
At all stages of the proceedings under this chapter, any person subject
to this chapter shall be entitled to the assistance of counsel, and if
the person is indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010, the court, as
provided in RCW 10.101.020, shall appoint office of public defense
contracted counsel to assist him or her. The person shall be confined
in a secure facility for the duration of the trial.
(2) Whenever any indigent person is subjected to an evaluation
under this chapter, the ((department)) office of public defense is
responsible for the cost of one expert or professional person to
conduct an evaluation on the person's behalf. When the person wishes
to be evaluated by a qualified expert or professional person of his or
her own choice, the expert or professional person must be permitted to
have reasonable access to the person for the purpose of such
evaluation, as well as to all relevant medical and psychological
records and reports. In the case of a person who is indigent, the
court shall, upon the person's request, assist the person in obtaining
an expert or professional person to perform an evaluation or
participate in the trial on the person's behalf. Nothing in this
chapter precludes the person from paying for additional expert services
at his or her own expense.
(3) The person, the prosecuting agency, or the judge shall have the
right to demand that the trial be before a twelve-person jury. If no
demand is made, the trial shall be before the court.

Sec. 6 RCW 71.09.080 and 2010 c 218 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person subjected to restricted liberty as a sexually
violent predator pursuant to this chapter shall not forfeit any legal
right or suffer any legal disability as a consequence of any actions
taken or orders made, other than as specifically provided in this
chapter, or as otherwise authorized by law.
(2)(a) Any person committed or detained pursuant to this chapter
shall be prohibited from possessing or accessing a personal computer if
the resident's individualized treatment plan states that access to a
computer is harmful to bringing about a positive response to a specific
and certain phase or course of treatment.
(b) A person who is prohibited from possessing or accessing a
personal computer under (a) of this subsection shall be permitted to
access a limited functioning personal computer capable of word
processing and limited data storage on the computer only that does not
have: (i) Internet access capability; (ii) an optical drive, external
drive, universal serial bus port, or similar drive capability; or (iii)
the capability to display photographs, images, videos, or motion
pictures, or similar display capability from any drive or port
capability listed under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(3) Any person committed pursuant to this chapter has the right to
adequate care and individualized treatment. The department of social
and health services shall keep records detailing all medical, expert,
and professional care and treatment received by a committed person, and
shall keep copies of all reports of periodic examinations made pursuant
to this chapter. All such records and reports shall be made available
upon request only to: The committed person, his or her attorney, the
prosecuting ((attorney)) agency, the court, the protection and advocacy
agency, or another expert or professional person who, upon proper
showing, demonstrates a need for access to such records.
(4) At the time a person is taken into custody or transferred into
a facility pursuant to a petition under this chapter, the professional
person in charge of such facility or his or her designee shall take
reasonable precautions to inventory and safeguard the personal property
of the persons detained or transferred. A copy of the inventory,
signed by the staff member making it, shall be given to the person
detained and shall, in addition, be open to inspection to any
responsible relative, subject to limitations, if any, specifically
imposed by the detained person. For purposes of this subsection,
"responsible relative" includes the guardian, conservator, attorney,
spouse, parent, adult child, or adult brother or sister of the person.
The facility shall not disclose the contents of the inventory to any
other person without consent of the patient or order of the court.
(5) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person presently committed
from exercising a right presently available to him or her for the
purpose of obtaining release from confinement, including the right to
petition for a writ of habeas corpus.
(6) No indigent person may be conditionally released or
unconditionally discharged under this chapter without suitable
clothing, and the secretary shall furnish the person with such sum of
money as is required by RCW 72.02.100 for persons without ample funds
who are released from correctional institutions. As funds are
available, the secretary may provide payment to the indigent persons
conditionally released pursuant to this chapter consistent with the
optional provisions of RCW 72.02.100 and 72.02.110, and may adopt rules
to do so.
(7) If a civil commitment petition is dismissed, or a trier of fact
determines that a person does not meet civil commitment criteria, the
person shall be released within twenty-four hours of service of the
release order on the superintendent of the special commitment center,
or later by agreement of the person who is the subject of the petition.

Sec. 7 RCW 71.09.090 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) If the secretary determines that the person's condition has so
changed that either: (a) The person no longer meets the definition of
a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the community, the
secretary shall authorize the person to petition the court for
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional
discharge. The petition shall be filed with the court and served upon
the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment. The
court, upon receipt of the petition for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge, shall within forty-five days order a hearing.
(2)(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the person
from otherwise petitioning the court for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge without the
secretary's approval. The secretary shall provide the committed person
with an annual written notice of the person's right to petition the
court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or
unconditional discharge over the secretary's objection. The notice
shall contain a waiver of rights. The secretary shall file the notice
and waiver form and the annual report with the court. If the person
does not affirmatively waive the right to petition, the court shall set
a show cause hearing to determine whether probable cause exists to
warrant a hearing on whether the person's condition has so changed
that: (i) He or she no longer meets the definition of a sexually
violent predator; or (ii) conditional release to a proposed less
restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community.
(b) The committed person shall have a right to have an attorney
represent him or her at the show cause hearing, which may be conducted
solely on the basis of affidavits or declarations, but the person is
not entitled to be present at the show cause hearing. At the show
cause hearing, the prosecuting ((attorney or attorney general)) agency
shall present prima facie evidence establishing that the committed
person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator
and that a less restrictive alternative is not in the best interest of
the person and conditions cannot be imposed that adequately protect the
community. In making this showing, the state may rely exclusively upon
the annual report prepared pursuant to RCW 71.09.070. The committed
person may present responsive affidavits or declarations to which the
state may reply.
(c) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that either:
(i) The state has failed to present prima facie evidence that the
committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent
predator and that no proposed less restrictive alternative is in the
best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that would
adequately protect the community; or (ii) probable cause exists to
believe that the person's condition has so changed that: (A) The
person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator;
or (B) release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be in
the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that
would adequately protect the community, then the court shall set a
hearing on either or both issues.
(d) If the court has not previously considered the issue of release
to a less restrictive alternative, either through a trial on the merits
or through the procedures set forth in RCW 71.09.094(1), the court
shall consider whether release to a less restrictive alternative would
be in the best interests of the person and conditions can be imposed
that would adequately protect the community, without considering
whether the person's condition has changed. The court may not find
probable cause for a trial addressing less restrictive alternatives
unless a proposed less restrictive alternative placement meeting the
conditions of RCW 71.09.092 is presented to the court at the show cause
hearing.
(3)(a) At the hearing resulting from subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the committed person shall be entitled to be present and to
the benefit of all constitutional protections that were afforded to the
person at the initial commitment proceeding. The prosecuting agency
shall represent the state and shall have a right to a jury trial and to
have the committed person evaluated by experts chosen by the state.
((The department is responsible for the cost of one expert or
professional person to conduct an evaluation on the prosecuting
agency's behalf.)) The committed person shall also have the right to
a jury trial and the right to have experts evaluate him or her on his
or her behalf and the court shall appoint an expert if the person is
indigent and requests an appointment.
(b) Whenever any indigent person is subjected to an evaluation
under (a) of this subsection, the ((department)) office of public
defense is responsible for the cost of one expert or professional
person conducting an evaluation on the person's behalf. When the
person wishes to be evaluated by a qualified expert or professional
person of his or her own choice, such expert or professional person
must be permitted to have reasonable access to the person for the
purpose of such evaluation, as well as to all relevant medical and
psychological records and reports. In the case of a person who is
indigent, the court shall, upon the person's request, assist the person
in obtaining an expert or professional person to perform an evaluation
or participate in the hearing on the person's behalf. Nothing in this
chapter precludes the person from paying for additional expert services
at his or her own expense.
(c) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
unconditionally discharged, the burden of proof shall be upon the state
to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the committed person's
condition remains such that the person continues to meet the definition
of a sexually violent predator. Evidence of the prior commitment trial
and disposition is admissible. The recommitment proceeding shall
otherwise proceed as set forth in RCW 71.09.050 and 71.09.060.
(d) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, the burden of
proof at the hearing shall be upon the state to prove beyond a
reasonable doubt that conditional release to any proposed less
restrictive alternative either: (i) Is not in the best interest of the
committed person; or (ii) does not include conditions that would
adequately protect the community. Evidence of the prior commitment
trial and disposition is admissible.
(4)(a) Probable cause exists to believe that a person's condition
has "so changed," under subsection (2) of this section, only when
evidence exists, since the person's last commitment trial, or less
restrictive alternative revocation proceeding, of a substantial change
in the person's physical or mental condition such that the person
either no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator or
that a conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the
person's best interest and conditions can be imposed to adequately
protect the community.
(b) A new trial proceeding under subsection (3) of this section may
be ordered, or a trial proceeding may be held, only when there is
current evidence from a licensed professional of one of the following
and the evidence presents a change in condition since the person's last
commitment trial proceeding:
(i) An identified physiological change to the person, such as
paralysis, stroke, or dementia, that renders the committed person
unable to commit a sexually violent act and this change is permanent;
or
(ii) A change in the person's mental condition brought about
through positive response to continuing participation in treatment
which indicates that the person meets the standard for conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative or that the person would be
safe to be at large if unconditionally released from commitment.
(c) For purposes of this section, a change in a single demographic
factor, without more, does not establish probable cause for a new trial
proceeding under subsection (3) of this section. As used in this
section, a single demographic factor includes, but is not limited to,
a change in the chronological age, marital status, or gender of the
committed person.
(5) The jurisdiction of the court over a person civilly committed
pursuant to this chapter continues until such time as the person is
unconditionally discharged.
(6) During any period of confinement pursuant to a criminal
conviction, or for any period of detention awaiting trial on criminal
charges, this section is suspended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The following activities are beyond the scope of representation of
an attorney under contract with the office of public defense pursuant
to chapter 2.70 RCW for the purposes of providing indigent defense
services in sexually violent predator civil commitment proceedings:
(1) Investigation or legal representation challenging the
conditions of confinement at the special commitment center or any
secure community transition facility;
(2) Investigation or legal representation for making requests under
the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW;
(3) Legal representation or advice regarding filing a grievance
with the department as part of its grievance policy or procedure;
(4) Legal representation during a period not covered as part of the
civil commitment process; and
(5) Such other activities as may be excluded by policy or contract
with the office of public defense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of public defense is responsible for the cost of one
expert or professional person conducting an evaluation on an indigent
person's behalf as provided in RCW 71.09.050, 71.09.070, or 71.09.090.
(2) Expert evaluations are capped at ten thousand dollars, to
include all professional fees, travel, per diem, and other costs.
Partial evaluations are capped at five thousand five hundred dollars
and expert services apart from an evaluation, exclusive of testimony at
trial or depositions, are capped at six thousand dollars.
(3) The office of public defense will pay for the costs related to
the evaluation of an indigent person by an additional examiner or in
excess of the stated fee caps only upon a finding by the superior court
that such appointment or extraordinary fees are for good cause.

Sec. 10 RCW 71.09.110 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 28 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall be responsible
for ((all)) the costs relating to the ((evaluation and)) treatment of
persons committed to their custody whether in a secure facility or
under a less restrictive alternative ((under any provision of)) as
provided in this chapter. ((The secretary shall adopt rules to contain
costs relating to reimbursement for evaluation services.))
Reimbursement may be obtained by the department for the cost of care
and treatment of persons committed to its custody whether in a secure
facility or under a less restrictive alternative pursuant to RCW
43.20B.330 through 43.20B.370.

Sec. 11 RCW 71.09.120 and 1990 c 3 s 1012 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other information required to be released
under this chapter, the department is authorized, pursuant to RCW
4.24.550, to release relevant information that is necessary to protect
the public, concerning a specific sexually violent predator committed
under this chapter.
(2) The department and the courts are authorized to release to the
office of public defense records needed to implement the office's
administration of public defense in these cases, including research,
reports, and other functions as required by RCW 2.70.020 and section 2
of this act. The office of public defense shall maintain the
confidentiality of all confidential information included in the
records.
(3) The inspection or copying of any nonexempt public record by
persons residing in a civil commitment facility for sexually violent
predators may be enjoined following procedures identified in RCW
42.56.565. The injunction may be requested by:
(a) An agency or its representative;
(b) A person named in the record or his or her representative;
(c) A person to whom the request specifically pertains or his or
her representative.

Sec. 12 RCW 71.09.140 and 1995 c 216 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At the earliest possible date, and in no event later than
thirty days before conditional release or unconditional discharge,
except in the event of escape, the department of social and health
services shall send written notice of conditional release,
unconditional discharge, or escape, to the following:
(a) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the person
will reside or in which placement will be made under a less restrictive
alternative;
(b) The sheriff of the county in which the person will reside or in
which placement will be made under a less restrictive alternative; and
(c) The sheriff of the county where the person was last convicted
of a sexually violent offense, if the department does not know where
the person will reside.
The department shall notify the state patrol of the release of all
sexually violent predators and that information shall be placed in the
Washington crime information center for dissemination to all law
enforcement.
(2) The same notice as required by subsection (1) of this section
shall be sent to the following if such notice has been requested in
writing about a specific person found to be a sexually violent predator
under this chapter:
(a) The victim or victims of any sexually violent offenses for
which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's next of kin
if the crime was a homicide. "Next of kin" as used in this section
means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and children;
(b) Any witnesses who testified against the person in his or her
commitment trial under RCW 71.09.060; and
(c) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting ((attorney))
agency.
Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting
the notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing
by the prosecuting ((attorney)) agency to receive the notice, and the
notice are confidential and shall not be available to the committed
person.
(3) If a person committed as a sexually violent predator under this
chapter escapes from a department of social and health services
facility, the department shall immediately notify, by the most
reasonable and expedient means available, the chief of police of the
city and the sheriff of the county in which the committed person
resided immediately before his or her commitment as a sexually violent
predator, or immediately before his or her incarceration for his or her
most recent offense. If previously requested, the department shall
also notify the witnesses and the victims of the sexually violent
offenses for which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's
next of kin if the crime was a homicide. If the person is recaptured,
the department shall send notice to the persons designated in this
subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working
days after the department learns of such recapture.
(4) If the victim or victims of any sexually violent offenses for
which the person was convicted in the past or the victim's next of kin,
or any witness is under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this
section shall be sent to the parents or legal guardian of the child.
(5) The department of social and health services shall send the
notices required by this chapter to the last address provided to the
department by the requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish
the department with a current address.
(6) Nothing in this section shall impose any liability upon a chief
of police of a city or sheriff of a county for failing to request in
writing a notice as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2012, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---