BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.030 and 1999 c 319 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child under the age of seventeen is required to attend
school under RCW 28A.225.010 and if the actions taken by a school
district under RCW 28A.225.020 are not successful in substantially
reducing an enrolled student's absences from public school, not later
than the seventh unexcused absence by a child within any month during
the current school year or not later than the tenth unexcused absence
during the current school year the school district shall file a
petition and supporting affidavit for a civil action with the juvenile
court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010: (a) By the parent; (b)
by the child; or (c) by the parent and the child. Except as provided
in this subsection, no additional documents need be filed with the
petition. Nothing in this subsection requires court jurisdiction to
terminate when a child turns seventeen or precludes a school district
from filing a petition for a child that is seventeen years of age.
(2) The district shall not later than the fifth unexcused absence
in a month:
(a) Enter into an agreement with a student and parent that
establishes school attendance requirements;
(b) Refer a student to a community truancy board, if available, as
defined in RCW 28A.225.025. The community truancy board shall enter
into an agreement with the student and parent that establishes school
attendance requirements and take other appropriate actions to reduce
the child's absences; or
(c) File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The petition may be filed by a school district employee who is
not an attorney.
(4) If the school district fails to file a petition under this
section, the parent of a child with five or more unexcused absences in
any month during the current school year or upon the tenth unexcused
absence during the current school year may file a petition with the
juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010.
(5) Petitions filed under this section may be served by certified
mail, return receipt requested. If such service is unsuccessful, or
the return receipt is not signed by the addressee, personal service is
required.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.035 and 2009 c 266 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 or
28A.225.015 shall consist of a written notification to the court
alleging that:
(a) The child has unexcused absences during the current school
year;
(b) Actions taken by the school district have not been successful
in substantially reducing the child's absences from school; and
(c) Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the
school district or parent to reduce the child's absences from school.
(2) The petition shall set forth the name, date of birth, school,
address, gender, race, and ethnicity of the child and the names and
addresses of the child's parents, and shall set forth whether the child
and parent are fluent in English ((and)), whether there is an existing
individualized education program, and the child's current academic
status in school.
(3) The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations
in this section and shall generally request relief available under this
chapter and provide information about what the court might order under
RCW 28A.225.090.
(4) When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015,
the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing at which the court shall
consider the petition, or if the court determines that a referral to an
available community truancy board would substantially reduce the
child's unexcused absences, the court may refer the case to a community
truancy board under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.
(5) If a referral is made to a community truancy board, the truancy
board must meet with the child, a parent, and the school district
representative and enter into an agreement with the petitioner and
respondent regarding expectations and any actions necessary to address
the child's truancy within twenty days of the referral. If the
petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, the child shall not be required
to attend and the agreement under this subsection shall be between the
truancy board, the school district, and the child's parent. The court
may permit the truancy board or truancy prevention counselor to provide
continued supervision over the student, or parent if the petition is
based on RCW 28A.225.015.
(6) If the truancy board fails to reach an agreement, or the parent
or student does not comply with the agreement, the truancy board shall
return the case to the juvenile court for a hearing.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (4) of this
section, a hearing shall not be required if other actions by the court
would substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences. When a
juvenile court hearing is held, the court shall:
(i) Separately notify the child, the parent of the child, and the
school district of the hearing. If the parent is not fluent in
English, the preferred practice is for notice to be provided in a
language in which the parent is fluent;
(ii) Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present
evidence at the hearing; and
(iii) Notify the parent and the child of the options and rights
available under chapter 13.32A RCW.
(b) If the child is not provided with counsel, the advisement of
rights must take place in court by means of a colloquy between the
court, the child if eight years old or older, and the parent.
(8)(a) The court may require the attendance of the child if eight
years old or older, the parents, and the school district at any hearing
on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.
(b) The court may not issue a bench warrant for a child for failure
to appear at a hearing on an initial truancy petition filed under RCW
28A.225.030. If there has been proper service, the court may instead
enter a default order assuming jurisdiction under the terms specified
in subsection (12) of this section.
(9) A school district is responsible for determining who shall
represent the school district at hearings on a petition filed under RCW
28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015.
(10) The court may permit the first hearing to be held without
requiring that either party be represented by legal counsel, and to be
held without a guardian ad litem for the child under RCW 4.08.050. At
the request of the school district, the court shall permit a school
district representative who is not an attorney to represent the school
district at any future hearings.
(11) If the child is in a special education program or has a
diagnosed mental or emotional disorder, the court shall inquire as to
what efforts the school district has made to assist the child in
attending school.
(12) If the allegations in the petition are established by a
preponderance of the evidence, the court shall grant the petition and
enter an order assuming jurisdiction to intervene for the period of
time determined by the court, after considering the facts alleged in
the petition and the circumstances of the juvenile, to most likely
cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school while the juvenile
is subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire before the
end of the school year in which it is entered.
(13)(a) If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district
shall ((regularly)) periodically report to the court any additional
unexcused absences by the child, actions taken by the school district,
and an update on the child's academic status in school at a schedule
specified by the court.
(b) The first report under this subsection (13) must be received no
later than three months from the date that the court assumes
jurisdiction.
(14) Community truancy boards and the courts shall coordinate, to
the extent possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who
are subject to truancy petitions and at-risk youth petitions in RCW
13.32A.191 or child in need of services petitions in RCW 13.32A.140.
(15) If after a juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county
the child relocates to another county, the juvenile court in the
receiving county shall, upon the request of a school district or
parent, assume jurisdiction of the petition filed in the previous
county.

--- END ---