BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For any bill introduced in either the house of representatives
or the senate that adopts a new tax preference or expands or extends an
existing tax preference, the bill must require that the tax preference
have a net benefit to the state.
(2) "Net benefit to the state" means the amount of economic benefit
to the state in jobs created or retained, if the stated legislative
intent of the tax preference was job creation or retention, plus the
amount of increased economic activity directly related to the tax
preference claimed, measured by the amount of taxes paid by the
increased economic activity claimed, minus the annual amount of
taxpayer savings.
(a) For purposes of this subsection (2), the amount of economic
benefit to the state in jobs created or retained must be measured by
state and local taxes paid by an employee, which must be calculated as
a percentage of the annual wage for each employment position as
follows:
(i) For an annual wage of less than twenty thousand dollars, the
percentage is 17.3 percent;
(ii) For an annual wage of more than twenty thousand dollars and
less than thirty-seven thousand dollars, the percentage is 12.7
percent;
(iii) For an annual wage of more than thirty-seven thousand dollars
and less than sixty-two thousand dollars, the percentage is 11.2
percent;
(iv) For an annual wage of more than sixty-two thousand dollars and
less than ninety-nine thousand dollars, the percentage is 9.5 percent;
and
(v) For an annual wage of more than ninety-nine thousand dollars,
the percentage is 7.6 percent.
(b) For purposes of this subsection (2), the amount of increased
economic activity directly related to the tax preference claimed must
be measured by the increased taxes paid by the taxpayer annually on the
activity directly related to the tax preference minus the annual amount
of taxpayer savings.
(3) For purposes of this section, "tax preference" has the same
meaning as in RCW 43.136.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any bill that is enacted without the net benefit to the state
provisions required by section 1 of this act does not take effect.
(2) The department of revenue must provide written notice that such
bill did not take effect to affected parties, the chief clerk of the
house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of
the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

--- END ---