BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.24.311 and 2011 c 349 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who desires to be a write-in candidate and have such
votes counted at a primary or election ((may)) must file a declaration
of candidacy with the officer designated in RCW 29A.24.070 not later
than ((the)) eighteen days ((ballots must be mailed according to RCW
29A.40.070)) before the primary or election. Declarations of candidacy
for write-in candidates must be accompanied by a filing fee in the same
manner as required of other candidates filing for the office as
provided in RCW 29A.24.091.
Votes cast for write-in candidates who have filed such declarations
of candidacy and write-in votes for persons appointed by major
political parties pursuant to RCW 29A.28.021 need only specify the name
of the candidate in the appropriate location on the ballot in order to
be counted. ((Write-in votes cast for any other candidate, in order to
be counted, must designate the office sought and position number or
political party, if the manner in which the write-in is done does not
make the office or position clear.))
No person may file as a write-in candidate where:
(1) At a general election, the person attempting to file either
filed as a write-in candidate for the same office at the preceding
primary or the person's name appeared on the ballot for the same office
at the preceding primary;
(2) The person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has
already filed a valid write-in declaration for that primary or
election, unless one or the other of the two filings is for the office
of precinct committeeperson;
(3) The name of the person attempting to file already appears on
the ballot as a candidate for another office, unless one of the two
offices for which he or she is a candidate is precinct committeeperson.
The declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required by
RCW 29A.24.031. No write-in candidate filing under this section may be
included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter 29A.32 RCW
unless that candidate qualifies to have his or her name printed on the
general election ballot. The legislative authority of any jurisdiction
producing a local voter's pamphlet under chapter 29A.32 RCW may
provide, by ordinance, for the inclusion of write-in candidates in such
pamphlets.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.60.021 and 2005 c 243 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For any office at any election or primary, any voter may write
in on the ballot the name of any person for an office who has filed as
a write-in candidate for the office in the manner provided by RCW
29A.24.311 and such vote shall be counted the same as if the name had
been printed on the ballot and marked by the voter. ((No)) Write-in
votes ((made)) for any person who has not filed a declaration of
candidacy pursuant to RCW 29A.24.311 ((is)) are not valid ((if that
person filed for the same office, either as a regular candidate or a
write-in candidate, at the preceding primary)). Any abbreviation used
to designate office or position will be accepted if the canvassing
board can determine, to its satisfaction, the voter's intent.
(2) The number of write-in votes cast for each office must be
recorded and reported with the canvass for the election.
(3) A write-in vote for an individual candidate for an office whose
name appears on the ballot for that same office is a valid vote for
that candidate as long as the candidate's name is clearly discernible,
even if other requirements of RCW 29A.24.311 are not satisfied and even
if the voter also marked a vote for that candidate such as to register
an overvote. These votes need not be tabulated unless: (a) The
difference between the number of votes cast for the candidate
apparently qualified to appear on the general election ballot or
elected and the candidate receiving the next highest number of votes is
less than the sum of the total number of write-in votes cast for the
office plus the overvotes and undervotes recorded by the vote
tabulating system; or (b) a manual recount is conducted for that
office.
(4) Write-in votes cast for an individual candidate for an office
whose name does not appear on the ballot need not be tallied unless the
total number of write-in votes and undervotes recorded by the vote
tabulation system for the office is greater than the number of votes
cast for the candidate apparently qualified to appear on the general
election ballot or elected.
(5) In the case of write-in votes for a statewide office or any
office whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, write-in
votes for an individual candidate must be tallied when the county
auditor is notified by either the secretary of state or another county
auditor in the multicounty jurisdiction that it appears that the write-in votes must be tabulated under the terms of this section. In all
other cases, the county auditor determines when write-in votes must be
tabulated. Any abstract of votes must be modified to reflect the
tabulation and certified by the canvassing board. Tabulation of write-in votes may be performed simultaneously with a recount.

--- END ---