BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any proposition to be submitted to the voters shall address
either the capital projects or the maintenance and operation expenses.
The two topics shall not be combined in one proposition.
(2) The proposition for capital projects shall state that the tax
will cease upon redemption of the bonds for the capital project, which
must not exceed twenty years.
(3) The proposition for maintenance and operation expenses shall
state that the tax is permanent.

--- END ---