BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.112.050 and 2010 c 19 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of formation, the area to be included within the
boundary of the authority shall be that area set forth in the system
plan adopted by the joint regional policy committee. Prior to
submitting the system and financing plan to the voters, the authority
may make adjustments to the boundaries as deemed appropriate but must
assure that, to the extent possible, the boundaries: (a) Include the
largest-population urban growth area designated by each county under
chapter 36.70A RCW; and (b) follow election precinct boundaries. If a
portion of any city is determined to be within the service area, the
entire city must be included within the boundaries of the authority.
Subsequent to formation, when territory is annexed to a city located
within the boundaries of the authority, the territory is simultaneously
included within the boundaries of the authority and subject to all
taxes and other liabilities and obligations applicable within the city
with respect to the authority as provided in RCW 35.13.500 and
35A.14.475 and notwithstanding any other provision of law.
(2) After voters within the authority boundaries have approved the
system and financing plan, elections to add areas contiguous to the
authority boundaries may be called by resolution of the regional
transit authority, after consultation with affected transit agencies
and with the concurrence of the legislative authority of the city or
town if the area is incorporated, or with the concurrence of the county
legislative authority if the area is unincorporated. Only those areas
that would benefit from the services provided by the authority may be
included and services or projects proposed for the area must be
consistent with the regional transportation plan. The election may
include a single ballot proposition providing for annexation to the
authority boundaries and imposition of the taxes at rates already
imposed within the authority boundaries.
(3) ((Upon receipt of a resolution requesting exclusion from the
boundaries of the authority from a city whose municipal boundaries
cross the boundaries of an authority and thereby result in only a
portion of the city being subject to local option taxes imposed by the
authority under chapters 81.104 and 81.112 RCW in order to implement a
high capacity transit plan, and where the vote to approve the city's
incorporation occurred simultaneously with an election approving the
local option taxes, then upon a two-thirds majority vote of the
governing board of the authority, the governing board shall redraw the
boundaries of the authority to exclude that portion of the city that is
located within the authority's boundaries, and the excluded area is no
longer subject to local option taxes imposed by the authority. This
subsection expires December 31, 1998.)) If an authority is unable to
complete the regional transit system plan as approved by the voters or
the plan exceeds either the original cost estimate or the time for
completion estimate by ten percent, the legislative authority of a city
may request to be excluded from the boundaries of the authority. Upon
receipt of a resolution from the legislative authority of a city
requesting exclusion from the boundaries of an authority, the
commission shall redraw the boundaries of the authority to exclude the
boundaries of the city and the excluded area is no longer subject to
any taxes imposed by the authority.

--- END ---