BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any proposition to be submitted to the voters shall address
either the capital projects or the maintenance and operation expenses.
The two topics shall not be combined in one proposition.
(2) The proposition for capital projects shall state that the tax
will cease upon redemption of the bonds for the capital project, which
must not exceed twenty years.
(3) The proposition for maintenance and operation expenses shall
state that the tax is permanent.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.36.071 and 2006 c 311 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided to the contrary in RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021,
or 82.80.090, the ballot title of any referendum filed on an enactment
or portion of an enactment of a local government and any other question
submitted to the voters of a local government consists of ((three))
four elements: (a) An identification of the enacting legislative body
and a statement of the subject matter; (b) a concise description of the
measure; ((and)) (c) the duration of the tax, if one is being proposed;
and (d) a question. The ballot title must conform with the
requirements and be displayed substantially as provided under RCW
29A.72.050, except that the concise description must not exceed
seventy-five words; however, a concise description submitted on behalf
of a proposed or existing regional transportation investment district
may exceed seventy-five words. If the local governmental unit is a
city or a town, the concise statement shall be prepared by the city or
town attorney. If the local governmental unit is a county, the concise
statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting attorney of the county.
If the unit is a unit of local government other than a city, town, or
county, the concise statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting
attorney of the county within which the majority area of the unit is
located.
(2) A referendum measure on the enactment of a unit of local
government shall be advertised in the manner provided for nominees for
elective office.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if another
provision of law specifies the ballot title for a specific type of
ballot question or proposition.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.32.241 and 2011 c 10 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
The local voters' pamphlet shall include but not be limited to the
following:
(1) Appearing on the cover, the words "official local voters'
pamphlet," the name of the jurisdiction producing the pamphlet, and the
date of the election or primary;
(2) A list of jurisdictions that have measures or candidates in the
pamphlet;
(3) Information on how a person may register to vote and obtain a
ballot;
(4) The text of each measure accompanied by an explanatory
statement prepared by the prosecuting attorney for any county measure
or by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure if other
than a county measure. All explanatory statements for city, town, or
district measures not approved by the attorney for the jurisdiction
submitting the measure shall be reviewed and approved by the county
prosecuting attorney or city attorney, when applicable, before
inclusion in the pamphlet. If the text of a measure references another
document, the explanatory statement shall contain the referenced
document in its entirety and may not make reference to any other
documents;
(5) The arguments for and against each measure submitted by
committees selected pursuant to RCW 29A.32.280; and
(6) For partisan primary elections, information on how to vote the
applicable ballot format and an explanation that minor political party
candidates and independent candidates will appear only on the general
election ballot.

--- END ---