BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.44.190 and 2005 c 176 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((If an employee subject to)) An employee noncompetition
agreement is void and unenforceable:
(a) When the employee subject to the noncompetition agreement is
terminated without just cause or laid off by action of the employer((,
the noncompetition agreement is void and unenforceable)); or
(b) Beyond the expiration of the employment contract containing the
noncompetition agreement when the employment relationship terminates
due to the expiration of the employment contract.
(2) Nothing in this section restricts the right of an employer to
protect trade secrets or other proprietary information by lawful means
in equity or under applicable law.
(3) Nothing in this section has the effect of terminating, or in
any way modifying, any rights or liabilities resulting from an employee
noncompetition agreement that was entered into before December 31,
2005.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Employee" means an employee of a broadcasting industry
employer other than a sales or management employee.
(b) "Employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
business trust, legal representative, or other entity which engages in
any business, industry, profession, or activity in this state and
employs one or more employees, and includes the state, counties,
cities, and all municipal corporations, public corporations, political
subdivisions of the state, and charitable organizations.
(c) "Employee noncompetition agreement" means an agreement, written
or oral, express or implied, between an employer and employee under
which the employee agrees not to compete, either alone or as an
employee of another, with the employer in providing services after
termination of employment.
(d) "Broadcasting industry" means employers that distribute or
transmit electronic signals to the public at large using television
(VHF or UHF), radio (AM, FM, or satellite), or cable television
technologies, or which prepare, develop, or create programs or messages
to be transmitted by electronic signal using television, radio, or
cable technology.

--- END ---