BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the ombudsman shall develop and promote an
educational program and materials to assist employees of self-insured
employers entering into claim resolution structured settlement
agreements pursuant to RCW 51.04.063.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.32.242 and 2008 c 280 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each
self-insured employer shall retain from the earnings of each of its
workers that amount as shall be fixed from time to time by the
director, the basis for measuring said amount to be determined by the
director. These moneys shall only be retained from employees and
remitted to the department in such manner and at such intervals as the
department directs and shall be placed in the self-insured employer
overpayment reimbursement fund. The moneys so collected shall be used
((exclusively)) for reimbursement to the reserve fund and to self-insured employers for benefits overpaid during the pendency of board or
court appeals in which the self-insured employer prevails and has not
recovered, and shall be no more than necessary to make such payments on
a current basis, and during fiscal year 2013 up to five hundred
thousand dollars for the purposes described in section 1 of this act.
(2) None of the amount assessed for the employer overpayment
reimbursement fund under this section may be retained from the earnings
of workers covered under RCW 51.16.210.

--- END ---