BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.08.180 and 2008 c 102 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Worker" means every person in this state who is engaged in the
employment of an employer under this title, whether by way of manual
labor or otherwise in the course of his or her employment; also every
person in this state who is engaged in the employment of or who is
working under an independent contract, the essence of which is his or
her personal labor for an employer under this title, whether by way of
manual labor or otherwise, in the course of his or her employment((,
or)).
(2) As ((an)) exceptions to the definition of worker, (a) a person
is not a worker if he or she meets the tests set forth in ((subsections
(1) through (6) of)) RCW 51.08.195 (1) through (6) or the separate
tests set forth in RCW 51.08.181 for work performed that requires
registration under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensing under chapter 19.28
RCW((: PROVIDED, That)); (b) a person is not a worker for the purpose
of this title, with respect to his or her activities attendant to
operating a truck which he or she owns, and which is leased to a common
or contract carrier; and (c) a person is not a worker when that person
is a franchisee under chapter 19.100 RCW.

--- END ---