BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
entry fees made by a nonprofit organization to persons participating in
an eligible basketball tournament or an eligible running event operated
by the nonprofit.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Eligible basketball tournament" means a basketball tournament
that:
(i) Is held in a county with a population of more than four hundred
thousand persons;
(ii) Is located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains; and
(iii) Has more than twenty thousand individuals participating; and
(b) "Eligible running event" means a running event that:
(i) Is held in a county with a population of more than four hundred
thousand persons;
(ii) Is located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains; and
(iii) Has more than forty thousand individuals participating.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to
entry fees for an eligible basketball tournament or an eligible running
event operated by a nonprofit organization.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---