BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.50.050 and 2008 c 287 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall order a hearing
which shall be held not later than fourteen days from the date of the
order. The court may schedule a hearing by telephone pursuant to local
court rule, to reasonably accommodate a disability, or in exceptional
circumstances to protect a petitioner from further acts of domestic
violence. The court shall require assurances of the petitioner's
identity before conducting a telephonic hearing. Except as provided in
RCW 26.50.085 and 26.50.123, personal service shall be made upon the
respondent not less than five court days prior to the hearing. If
timely personal service cannot be made, the court shall set a new
hearing date and shall either require an additional attempt at
obtaining personal service or permit service by publication as provided
in RCW 26.50.085 or service by mail as provided in RCW 26.50.123. The
court shall not require more than two attempts at obtaining personal
service and shall permit service by publication or by mail unless the
petitioner requests additional time to attempt personal service. If
the court permits service by publication or by mail, the court shall
set the hearing date not later than twenty-four days from the date of
the order. The court may issue an ex parte order for protection
pending the hearing as provided in RCW 26.50.070, 26.50.085, and
26.50.123.
(2) The rules of evidence shall be strictly observed in a hearing
on petition for a protection order under this chapter. The parties and
any witnesses shall be placed under oath prior to testimony. The judge
shall disclose to all parties any information other than personally
identifying information the judge reviews from any criminal or civil
database related to the petition.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.09.060 and 2008 c 6 s 1009 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a proceeding for:
(a) Dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership, legal
separation, or a declaration of invalidity; or
(b) Disposition of property or liabilities, maintenance, or support
following dissolution of the marriage or the domestic partnership by a
court which lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse or
absent domestic partner; either party may move for temporary
maintenance or for temporary support of children entitled to support.
The motion shall be accompanied by an affidavit setting forth the
factual basis for the motion and the amounts requested.
(2) As a part of a motion for temporary maintenance or support or
by independent motion accompanied by affidavit, either party may
request the court to issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary
injunction, providing relief proper in the circumstances, and
restraining or enjoining any person from:
(a) Transferring, removing, encumbering, concealing, or in any way
disposing of any property except in the usual course of business or for
the necessities of life, and, if so restrained or enjoined, requiring
him or her to notify the moving party of any proposed extraordinary
expenditures made after the order is issued;
(b) Molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party or of any
child;
(c) Going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or
school of the other party or the day care or school of any child upon
a showing of the necessity therefor;
(d) Knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a
specified distance from a specified location; and
(e) Removing a child from the jurisdiction of the court.
(3) Either party may request a domestic violence protection order
under chapter 26.50 RCW or an antiharassment protection order under
chapter 10.14 RCW on a temporary basis. The court may grant any of the
relief provided in RCW 26.50.060 except relief pertaining to
residential provisions for the children which provisions shall be
provided for under this chapter, and any of the relief provided in RCW
10.14.080: PROVIDED, That the rules of evidence shall be strictly
observed during any hearing on a protection order, any testimony shall
be provided under oath, and the judge shall disclose to all parties any
information other than personally identifying information the judge
reviews in a criminal or civil database related to the request for a
protection order. Ex parte orders issued under this subsection shall
be effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days, or upon
court order, not to exceed twenty-four days if necessary to ensure that
all temporary motions in the case can be heard at the same time.
(4) In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions
of RCW 9.41.800.
(5) The court may issue a temporary restraining order without
requiring notice to the other party only if it finds on the basis of
the moving affidavit or other evidence that irreparable injury could
result if an order is not issued until the time for responding has
elapsed.
(6) The court may issue a temporary restraining order or
preliminary injunction and an order for temporary maintenance or
support in such amounts and on such terms as are just and proper in the
circumstances. The court may in its discretion waive the filing of the
bond or the posting of security.
(7) Restraining orders issued under this section restraining the
person from molesting or disturbing another party, or from going onto
the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of the other
party or the day care or school of any child, or prohibiting the person
from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a
specified distance of a location, shall prominently bear on the front
page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL
NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.50 RCW AND
WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.
(8) The court shall order that any temporary restraining order
bearing a criminal offense legend, any domestic violence protection
order, or any antiharassment protection order granted under this
section be forwarded by the clerk of the court on or before the next
judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the
order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall
enter the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence
information system available in this state used by law enforcement
agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based
criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law
enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully
enforceable in any county in the state.
(9) If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is
modified or terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law
enforcement agency specified in the order on or before the next
judicial day. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been
terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from any
computer-based criminal intelligence system.
(10) A temporary order, temporary restraining order, or preliminary
injunction:
(a) Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are
to be adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding;
(b) May be revoked or modified;
(c) Terminates when the final decree is entered, except as provided
under subsection (11) of this section, or when the petition for
dissolution, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity is
dismissed;
(d) May be entered in a proceeding for the modification of an
existing decree.
(11) Delinquent support payments accrued under an order for
temporary support remain collectible and are not extinguished when a
final decree is entered unless the decree contains specific language to
the contrary. A support debt under a temporary order owed to the state
for public assistance expenditures shall not be extinguished by the
final decree if:
(a) The obligor was given notice of the state's interest under
chapter 74.20A RCW; or
(b) The temporary order directs the obligor to make support
payments to the office of support enforcement or the Washington state
support registry.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.10.040 and 2000 c 119 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In entering an order under this chapter, the court shall
consider, approve, or make provision for:
(a) Child custody, visitation, and the support of any child
entitled to support;
(b) The allocation of the children as a federal tax exemption;
(c) Any necessary continuing restraining orders, including the
provisions contained in RCW 9.41.800;
(d) A domestic violence protection order under chapter 26.50 RCW or
an antiharassment protection order under chapter 10.14 RCW. The court
may grant any of the relief provided in RCW 26.50.060 except relief
pertaining to residential provisions for the children which provisions
shall be provided for under this chapter, and any of the relief
provided in RCW 10.14.080: PROVIDED, That the rules of evidence shall
be strictly observed during any hearing on a protection order, any
testimony shall be provided under oath, and the judge shall disclose to
all parties any information other than personally identifying
information the judge reviews in a criminal or civil database related
to the request for a protection order;
(e) Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or
enjoining the person from molesting or disturbing another party, or
from going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or
school of the other party or the day care or school of any child, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, shall prominently
bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS
ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER
CHAPTER 26.50 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.
(2) The court shall order that any restraining order bearing a
criminal offense legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any
antiharassment protection order granted under this section, in addition
to the law enforcement information sheet or proof of service of the
order, be forwarded by the clerk of the court on or before the next
judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the
order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall
enter the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence
information system available in this state used by law enforcement
agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order is fully enforceable
in any county in the state.
(3) If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is
modified or terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law
enforcement agency specified in the order on or before the next
judicial day. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been
terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from any
computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.26.130 and 2011 c 283 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The judgment and order of the court determining the existence
or nonexistence of the parent and child relationship shall be
determinative for all purposes.
(2) If the judgment and order of the court is at variance with the
child's birth certificate, the court shall order that an amended birth
certificate be issued.
(3) The judgment and order shall contain other appropriate
provisions directed to the appropriate parties to the proceeding,
concerning the duty of current and future support, the extent of any
liability for past support furnished to the child if that issue is
before the court, the furnishing of bond or other security for the
payment of the judgment, or any other matter in the best interest of
the child. The judgment and order may direct one parent to pay the
reasonable expenses of the mother's pregnancy and childbirth. The
judgment and order may include a continuing restraining order or
injunction. In issuing the order, the court shall consider the
provisions of RCW 9.41.800.
(4) The judgment and order shall contain a provision that each
party must file with the court and the Washington state child support
registry and update as necessary the information required in the
confidential information form required by RCW 26.23.050.
(5) Support judgment and orders shall be for periodic payments
which may vary in amount. The court may limit the parent's liability
for the past support to the child to the proportion of the expenses
already incurred as the court deems just. The court shall not limit or
affect in any manner the right of nonparties including the state of
Washington to seek reimbursement for support and other services
previously furnished to the child.
(6) After considering all relevant factors, the court shall order
either or both parents to pay an amount determined pursuant to the
schedule and standards contained in chapter 26.19 RCW.
(7) On the same basis as provided in chapter 26.09 RCW, the court
shall make residential provisions with regard to minor children of the
parties, except that a parenting plan shall not be required unless
requested by a party. If a parenting plan or residential schedule was
not entered at the time the order establishing parentage was entered,
a parent may move the court for entry of a parenting plan or
residential schedule:
(a) By filing a motion and proposed parenting plan or residential
schedule and providing notice to the other parent and other persons who
have residential time with the child pursuant to a court order:
PROVIDED, That at the time of filing the motion less than twenty-four
months have passed since entry of the order establishing parentage and
that the proposed parenting plan or residential schedule does not
change the designation of the parent with whom the child spends the
majority of time; or
(b) By filing a petition for modification under RCW 26.09.260 or
petition to establish a parenting plan, residential schedule, or
residential provisions.
(8) In any dispute between the persons claiming parentage of a
child and a person or persons who have (a) commenced adoption
proceedings or who have been granted an order of adoption, and (b)
pursuant to a court order, or placement by the department of social and
health services or by a licensed agency, have had actual custody of the
child for a period of one year or more before court action is commenced
by the persons claiming parentage, the court shall consider the best
welfare and interests of the child, including the child's need for
situation stability, in determining the matter of custody, and the
parent or person who is more fit shall have the superior right to
custody.
(9) In entering an order under this chapter, the court may issue
any necessary continuing restraining orders, including the restraint
provisions of domestic violence protection orders under chapter 26.50
RCW or antiharassment protection orders under chapter 10.14 RCW:
PROVIDED, That the rules of evidence shall be strictly observed during
any hearing, any testimony shall be provided under oath, and the judge
shall disclose to all parties any information other than personally
identifying information the judge reviews in a criminal or civil
database related to the request for a protection order.
(10) Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or
enjoining the person from molesting or disturbing another party, from
going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of
the other party or the day care or school of any child, or prohibiting
the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within,
a specified distance of a location, shall prominently bear on the front
page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL
NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.50 RCW AND
WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.
(11) The court shall order that any restraining order bearing a
criminal offense legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any
antiharassment protection order granted under this section be forwarded
by the clerk of the court on or before the next judicial day to the
appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon
receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall forthwith enter
the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information
system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list
outstanding warrants. The order is fully enforceable in any county in
the state.
(12) If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is
modified or terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law
enforcement agency specified in the order on or before the next
judicial day. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been
terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from any
computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec. 5 RCW 10.14.070 and 2005 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the petition alleging a prima facie case of
harassment, other than a petition alleging a sex offense as defined in
chapter 9A.44 RCW, the court shall order a hearing which shall be held
not later than fourteen days from the date of the order. If the
petition alleges a sex offense as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW, the
court shall order a hearing which shall be held not later than fourteen
days from the date of the order. Except as provided in RCW 10.14.085,
personal service shall be made upon the respondent not less than five
court days before the hearing. If timely personal service cannot be
made, the court shall set a new hearing date and shall either require
additional attempts at obtaining personal service or permit service by
publication as provided by RCW 10.14.085. If the court permits service
by publication, the court shall set the hearing date not later than
twenty-four days from the date of the order. The court may issue an ex
parte order for protection pending the hearing as provided in RCW
10.14.080 and 10.14.085.
(2) The rules of evidence shall be strictly observed in a hearing
on petition for a protection order under this chapter. The parties and
any witnesses shall be placed under oath prior to testimony. The judge
shall disclose to all parties any information other than personally
identifying information the judge reviews from any criminal or civil
database related to the petition.

--- END ---