BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.325 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((For purposes of)) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this chapter((,)) unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Alternative learning experience program" means a course or set
of courses that is:
(((a))) (i) Provided in whole or in part independently from a
regular classroom setting or schedule, but may include some components
of direct instruction;
(((b))) (ii) Supervised, monitored, assessed, evaluated, and
documented by a certificated teacher employed by the school district or
under contract as permitted by applicable rules; and
(((c))) (iii) Provided in accordance with a written student
learning plan that is implemented pursuant to the school district's
policy and rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction
for alternative learning experiences.
(b) "Contract-based learning program" means a program that serves
students in grades nine through twelve where students receive an
average of at least five hours of classroom-based instruction per week.
The running start program established under RCW 28A.600.300 is not a
contract-based learning program.
(2)(a) For students in grades nine through twelve, all instruction
and activities in the student learning plan must generate credits that
meet state or local high school graduation requirements.
(b) For students in grades kindergarten through eight, all
instruction and activities in the student learning plan must be
directly related to one or more of the following core academic
subjects: English, reading and language arts, writing, science,
technology, engineering, mathematics, foreign languages, civics and
government, economics, the arts, history, and geography.
(c) "Dropout recovery program" means an alternative learning
experience program that provides a combination of social support and
academic interventions and exclusively serves students who have been
suspended or expelled, are pregnant or parenting teens, have dropped
out of school, or are significantly at risk of dropping out of school
as determined by the school district in which the student resides.
(3) The broad categories of alternative learning experience
programs include, but are not limited to:
(a) Online programs as defined in RCW 28A.150.262;
(b) Parent partnership programs that include significant
participation and partnership by parents and families in the design and
implementation of a student's learning experience; and
(c) Contract-based learning programs.
(((3))) (4) School districts that offer alternative learning
experience programs may not provide any compensation, reimbursement,
gift, reward, or gratuity to any parents, guardians, or students for
participation. School district employees are prohibited from receiving
any compensation or payment as an incentive to increase student
enrollment of out-of-district students in an alternative learning
experience program. This prohibition includes, but is not limited to,
providing funds to parents, guardians, or students for the purchase of
educational materials, supplies, experiences, services, or
technological equipment. A district may purchase educational
materials, equipment, or other nonconsumable supplies for students' use
in alternative learning experience programs if the purchase is
consistent with the district's approved curriculum, conforms to
applicable laws and rules, and is made in the same manner as such
purchases are made for students in the district's regular instructional
program. Items so purchased remain the property of the school district
upon program completion. School districts may not purchase or contract
for instructional or co- curricular experiences and services that are
included in an alternative learning experience written student learning
plan, including but not limited to lessons, trips, and other
activities, unless substantially similar experiences and services are
available to students enrolled in the district's regular instructional
program. School districts that purchase or contract for such
experiences and services for students enrolled in an alternative
learning experience program must submit an annual report to the office
of the superintendent of public instruction detailing the costs and
purposes of the expenditures. These requirements extend to contracted
providers of alternative learning experience programs, and each
district shall be responsible for monitoring the compliance of its
providers with these requirements. However, nothing in this section
shall prohibit school districts from contracting with online providers
approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
pursuant to chapter 28A.250 RCW.
(((4))) (5) Part-time enrollment in alternative learning
experiences is subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.150.350. Part-time
students who are enrolled in alternative learning experiences are not
exempt from participating in the statewide academic assessment system
under RCW 28A.655.070 in the same manner as full-time students.
Participation shall be based on a student's completion of the course
material that is the subject of the assessment. Nonresident students
in alternative learning experience programs may participate in
statewide student assessments in the district of residence, subject to
that district's planned testing schedule.
(((5))) (6) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt
rules defining minimum requirements and accountability for alternative
learning experience programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 9 and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) The total aggregate statewide allocations calculated under
subsections (4) through (12) of this section for full-time equivalent
student enrollment in alternative learning experience programs as
defined in RCW 28A.150.325 shall be reduced by fifteen percent for the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, except that such reductions do not
apply in the 2012-13 school year to student enrollment in contract-based learning programs or dropout recovery programs. The
superintendent of public instruction shall determine how to implement
this aggregate fifteen percent reduction among the different
alternative learning experience programs. No program may receive less
than a ten percent reduction and no program may receive greater than a
twenty percent reduction. In determining how to implement the
reductions among the alternative learning experience programs, the
superintendent of public instruction must look to both how a program is
currently operating as well as how it has operated in the past, to the
extent that data is available, and must give consideration to the
following criteria:
(i) The category of program;
(ii) The certificated instructional staffing ratio maintained by
the program;
(iii) The amount and type of direct personal student-to-teacher
contact used by the program on a weekly basis;
(iv) Whether the program uses any classroom-based instructional
time to meet requirements in the written student learning plan for
enrolled students; and
(v) For online programs, whether the program is approved by the
superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.250.020.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall report to the
legislature by December 31, 2011, regarding how the reductions in (b)
of this subsection were implemented.
(d) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
1.116
1.909

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

Parent involvement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00 0.00 0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.5156 hours per
week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning
assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this
subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to
provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2013.

--- END ---