BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.100 and 2011 c 336 s 739 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a board of trustees for each college
district as set forth in this chapter. Each board of trustees shall be
composed of five trustees, who shall be appointed by the governor for
terms commencing October 1st of the year in which appointed. In making
such appointments the governor shall give consideration to geographical
diversity, and representing labor, business, women, and racial and
ethnic minorities, in the membership of the boards of trustees. The
boards of trustees for districts containing technical colleges shall
include at least one member from business and one member from labor.
The boards of trustees in all other college districts shall include at
least one member from labor and one member from business, commencing
with the first appointment in each college district occurring after the
effective date of this section.
The successors of the trustees initially appointed shall be
appointed by the governor to serve for a term of five years except that
any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of any term shall be appointed only for the remainder of the
term. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and
qualified.
Every trustee shall be a resident and qualified elector of the
college district. No trustee may be an employee of the community and
technical college system, a member of the board of directors of any
school district, or a member of the governing board of any public or
private educational institution.
Each board of trustees shall organize itself by electing a chair
from its members. The board shall adopt a seal and may adopt such
bylaws, rules, and regulations as it deems necessary for its own
government. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum, but
a lesser number may adjourn from time to time and may compel the
attendance of absent members in such manner as prescribed in its
bylaws, rules, or regulations. The district president, or if there be
none, the president of the college, shall serve as, or may designate
another person to serve as, the secretary of the board, who shall not
be deemed to be a member of the board.
Members of the boards of trustees may be removed for misconduct or
malfeasance in office in the manner provided by RCW 28B.10.500.

--- END ---