BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that other states have
successfully implemented resident curator programs that preserve,
maintain, and restore historic and other significant state-owned
properties by allowing private parties to occupy or use the properties,
at no cost or reduced rent, in exchange for the tenant's maintenance,
rehabilitation, or restoration of the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
A state agency with statutory authority to lease state-owned
properties to private parties may negotiate a lease at a rate that is
less than fair market value in consideration of the lessee's occupancy
of the property and agreement to restore, maintain, rehabilitate, or
otherwise improve the leased property. Such an agreement must be in
writing and must clearly specify the terms of the agreement and the
improvements to be made to the property. No improvements to the
property may be made without the approval of the leasing agency. If
the property is listed, or is eligible to be listed, on the national
register of historic places, the Washington heritage register, or a
local historic register, the agency must consult with the department of
archaeology and historic preservation and all work performed on the
property must comply with the federal department of interior standards
for rehabilitation of historic properties.

--- END ---