BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 13 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2012)) 2013:
(1) RCW 70.190.005 (Purpose) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 301 & 1992 c 198
s 1;
(2) RCW 70.190.010 (Definitions) and 2009 c 565 s 52, 2009 c 479 s
58, 1996 c 132 s 2, 1995 c 399 s 200, & 1992 c 198 s 3;
(3) RCW 70.190.020 (Consolidate efforts of existing entities) and
1994 sp.s. c 7 s 315 & 1992 c 198 s 4;
(4) RCW 70.190.100 (Duties of council) and 2012 c ... s 2 (section
2 of this act), 2009 c 479 s 59, 1998 c 245 s 123, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s
307;
(5) RCW 70.190.110 (Program review) and 1998 c 245 s 124 & 1994
sp.s. c 7 s 308;
(6) RCW 70.190.120 (Interagency agreement) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s
309;
(7) RCW 70.190.130 (Comprehensive plan -- Approval process -- Network
expenditures -- Penalty for noncompliance with chapter) and 1998 c 314 s
13, 1996 c 132 s 8, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 310;
(8) RCW 70.190.150 (Federal restrictions on funds transfers,
waivers) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 312; and
(9) RCW 70.190.920 (Effective date -- 1992 c 198) and 1992 c 198 s
21.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.190.100 and 2009 c 479 s 59 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The family policy council shall:
(((1) Establish network boundaries no later than July 1, 1994.
There is a presumption that no county may be divided between two or
more community networks and no network shall have fewer than forty
thousand population. When approving multicounty networks, considering
dividing a county between networks, or creating a network with a
population of less than forty thousand, the council must consider: (a)
Common economic, geographic, and social interests; (b) historical and
existing shared governance; and (c) the size and location of population
centers. Individuals and groups within any area shall be given ample
opportunity to propose network boundaries in a manner designed to
assure full consideration of their expressed wishes;
(2) Develop a technical assistance and training program to assist
communities in creating and developing community networks and
comprehensive plans;
(3) Approve the structure, purpose, goals, plan, and performance
measurements of each community network;
(4) Identify all prevention and early intervention programs and
funds, including all programs set forth in RCW 70.190.110, which could
be transferred, in all or part, to the community networks, and report
their findings and recommendations to the governor and the legislature
regarding any appropriate program transfers by January 1 of each year;
(5) Reward community networks that show exceptional success as
provided in RCW 43.41.195;
(6) Seek every opportunity to maximize federal and other funding
that is consistent with the plans approved by the council for the
purpose and goals of this chapter;
(7) Review the state-funded out-of-home placement rate before the
end of each contract to determine whether the region has sufficiently
reduced the rate. If the council determines that there has not been a
sufficient reduction in the rate, it may reduce the immediately
succeeding grant to the network;
(8)(a) The council shall monitor the implementation of programs
contracted by participating state agencies by reviewing periodic
reports on the extent to which services were delivered to intended
populations, the quality of services, and the extent to which service
outcomes were achieved at the conclusion of service interventions.
This monitoring shall include provision for periodic feedback to
community networks;
(b) The legislature intends that this monitoring be used by the
Washington state institute for public policy, together with public
health data on at-risk behaviors and risk and protective factors, to
produce an external evaluation of the effectiveness of the networks and
their programs. For this reason, and to conserve public funds, the
council shall not conduct or contract for the conduct of control group
studies, quasi-experimental design studies, or other analysis efforts
to attempt to determine the impact of network programs on at-risk
behaviors or risk and protective factors; and
(9) Review the implementation of chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.
The report shall use measurable performance standards to evaluate the
implementation.))
(a) No later than October 31, 2012, develop a transition plan for
the oversight of and accountability to the public of the networks as
quasi-governmental entities after the council sunsets. The transition
plan may include the transfer of network authority to another viable
entity including another network, or the discontinuation of any
network;
(b) Partner with the private-public initiative established in RCW
70.305.020 to support continued community capacity development in the
state;
(c) Assist in identifying those community networks best positioned
to participate in activities contemplated by RCW 70.305.020;
(d) Assist the networks in: (i) Identifying and obtaining funding
opportunities that help achieve the network purposes; (ii)
participating in public-private partnerships; and (iii) building
community capacity; and
(e) Ensure that the transition plan is implemented no later than
June 30, 2013.
(2) The transition plan required in subsection (1)(a) of this
section shall be delivered to the appropriate committees of the
legislature no later than November 15, 2012.

--- END ---