BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A health care provider may deduct from the measure of tax the
value of medical services donated through a community-based health care
system, which is financed and supported solely through the charity care
of health care providers.
(2) This act applies to amounts received by a taxpayer on or after
August 1, 2012.

--- END ---