BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.21.310 and 1989 c 345 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each employer-sponsored group policy for comprehensive health
insurance which is entered into, or renewed, on or after ((twelve
months after July 23, 1989)) January 1, 2013, shall include coverage
for neurodevelopmental therapies for covered individuals age ((six))
fourteen and under.
(2) Benefits provided under this section shall cover the services
of those authorized to deliver occupational therapy, speech therapy,
and physical therapy. Benefits shall be payable only where the
services have been delivered pursuant to the referral and periodic
review of a holder of a license issued pursuant to chapter 18.71 or
18.57 RCW or where covered services have been rendered by such
licensee. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
negotiating rates with qualified providers.
(3) Benefits provided under this section shall be for medically
necessary services as determined by the ((insurer)) licensed medical
practitioner. Benefits shall be payable for services for the
maintenance of an insured in cases where ((significant)) deterioration
in the patient's condition would result without the service. Benefits
shall be payable to ((restore and)) improve function.
(4) It is the intent of this section that employers purchasing
comprehensive health insurance, including the benefits required by this
section, together with the insurer, retain authority to design and
employ utilization and cost controls. Therefore, benefits delivered
under this section may be subject to contractual provisions regarding
deductible amounts and/or copayments established by the employer
purchasing insurance and the insurer. Benefits provided under this
section may be ((subject to standard waiting periods for preexisting
conditions, and may be)) subject to the submission of written treatment
plans.
(5) In recognition of the intent expressed in subsection (4) of
this section, benefits provided under this section may be subject to
contractual provisions establishing annual and/or lifetime benefit
limits. Such limits may define the total dollar benefits available or
may limit the number of services delivered as agreed by the employer
purchasing insurance and the insurer.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.450 and 1989 c 345 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each employer-sponsored group contract for comprehensive health
care service which is entered into, or renewed, on or after ((twelve
months after July 23, 1989)) January 1, 2013, shall include coverage
for neurodevelopmental therapies for covered individuals age ((six))
fourteen and under.
(2) Benefits provided under this section shall cover the services
of those authorized to deliver occupational therapy, speech therapy,
and physical therapy. Benefits shall be payable only where the
services have been delivered pursuant to the referral and periodic
review of a holder of a license issued pursuant to chapter 18.71 or
18.57 RCW or where covered services have been rendered by such
licensee. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from requiring that covered services be delivered by a
provider who participates by contract with the health care service
contractor unless no participating provider is available to deliver
covered services. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care
service contractor from negotiating rates with qualified providers.
(3) Benefits provided under this section shall be for medically
necessary services as determined by the ((health care service
contractor)) licensed medical practitioner. Benefits shall be payable
for services for the maintenance of a covered individual in cases where
((significant)) deterioration in the patient's condition would result
without the service. Benefits shall be payable to ((restore and))
improve function.
(4) It is the intent of this section that employers purchasing
comprehensive group coverage including the benefits required by this
section, together with the health care service contractor, retain
authority to design and employ utilization and cost controls.
Therefore, benefits delivered under this section may be subject to
contractual provisions regarding deductible amounts and/or copayments
established by the employer purchasing coverage and the health care
service contractor. Benefits provided under this section may be
subject to ((standard waiting periods for preexisting conditions, and
may be subject to)) the submission of written treatment plans.
(5) In recognition of the intent expressed in subsection (4) of
this section, benefits provided under this section may be subject to
contractual provisions establishing annual and/or lifetime benefit
limits. Such limits may define the total dollar benefits available or
may limit the number of services delivered as agreed by the employer
purchasing coverage and the health care service contractor.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.46.520 and 1989 c 345 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each employer-sponsored group contract for comprehensive health
care service which is entered into, or renewed, on or after ((twelve
months after July 23, 1989)) January 1, 2013, shall include coverage
for neurodevelopmental therapies for covered individuals age ((six))
fourteen and under.
(2) Benefits provided under this section shall cover the services
of those authorized to deliver occupational therapy, speech therapy,
and physical therapy. Covered benefits and treatment must be rendered
or referred by the health maintenance organization, and delivered
pursuant to the referral and periodic review of a holder of a license
issued pursuant to chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or where treatment is
rendered by such licensee. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a
health maintenance organization from negotiating rates with qualified
providers.
(3) Benefits provided under this section shall be for medically
necessary services as determined by the ((health maintenance
organization)) licensed medical practitioner. Benefits shall be
provided for the maintenance of a covered enrollee in cases where
((significant)) deterioration in the patient's condition would result
without the service. Benefits shall be provided to ((restore and))
improve function.
(4) It is the intent of this section that employers purchasing
comprehensive group coverage including the benefits required by this
section, together with the health maintenance organization, retain
authority to design and employ utilization and cost controls.
Therefore, benefits provided under this section may be subject to
contractual provisions regarding deductible amounts and/or copayments
established by the employer purchasing coverage and the health
maintenance organization. Benefits provided under this section may be
subject to ((standard waiting periods for preexisting conditions, and
may be subject to)) the submission of written treatment plans.
(5) In recognition of the intent expressed in subsection (4) of
this section, benefits provided under this section may be subject to
contractual provisions establishing annual and/or lifetime benefit
limits. Such limits may define the total dollar benefits available, or
may limit the number of services delivered as agreed by the employer
purchasing coverage and the health maintenance organization.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.05.170 and 1989 c 345 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each health plan offered to public employees and their covered
dependents under this chapter which is not subject to the provisions of
Title 48 RCW and is established or renewed on or after ((twelve months
after July 23, 1989)) January 1, 2013, shall include coverage for
neurodevelopmental therapies for covered individuals age ((six))
fourteen and under.
(2) Benefits provided under this section shall cover the services
of those authorized to deliver occupational therapy, speech therapy,
and physical therapy. Benefits shall be payable only where the
services have been delivered pursuant to the referral and periodic
review of a holder of a license issued pursuant to chapter 18.71 or
18.57 RCW or where covered services have been rendered by such
licensee. Nothing in this section shall preclude a self-funded plan
authorized under this chapter from negotiating rates with qualified
providers.
(3) Benefits provided under this section shall be for medically
necessary services as determined by the ((self-funded plan authorized
under this chapter)) licensed medical practitioner. Benefits shall be
payable for services for the maintenance of a covered individual in
cases where ((significant)) deterioration in the patient's condition
would result without the service. Benefits shall be payable to
((restore and)) improve function.
(4) It is the intent of this section that the state, as an employer
providing comprehensive health coverage including the benefits required
by this section, retains the authority to design and employ utilization
and cost controls. Therefore, benefits delivered under this section
may be subject to contractual provisions regarding deductible amounts
and/or copayments established by the self-funded plan authorized under
this chapter. Benefits provided under this section may be subject to
((standard waiting periods for preexisting conditions, and may be
subject to)) the submission of written treatment plans.
(5) In recognition of the intent expressed in subsection (4) of
this section, benefits provided under this section may be subject to
contractual provisions establishing annual and/or lifetime benefit
limits. Such limits may define the total dollar benefits available, or
may limit the number of services delivered as established by the self-funded plan authorized under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---