BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that all parents need
better information when choosing quality child care and that licensed
child care providers need adequate support, training, and incentives to
improve the quality of child care they offer. The legislature further
finds that high-quality child care helps prepare children for success
in school, and that Washington state needs a common understanding of
what elements make up high-quality child care programs.
The legislature further finds that a two-year field test of a
voluntary quality rating and improvement system, administered by the
department of early learning private-public partnership, has prepared
our state to begin statewide implementation of such a system, to the
extent funds are available.
The legislature further finds that a voluntary quality rating and
improvement system is an important strategy to align early learning
programs, including licensed child care programs, the federal head
start program, and the state prekindergarten program.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.100 and 2007 c 394 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department, in collaboration with community and
statewide partners, shall implement a voluntary quality rating and
improvement system applicable to licensed or certified child care
centers and homes and early education programs. The purpose of the
voluntary quality rating and improvement system is to give parents
clear and easily accessible information about the quality of child care
and early education programs, support improvement in early learning
programs throughout the state, increase the readiness of children for
school, and close the disparity in access to quality care. Before
final implementation of the voluntary quality rating and improvement
system, the department shall report to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature. Nothing in this section changes
the department's responsibility to collectively bargain over mandatory
subjects.)) (1) To the extent funds are available for this purpose, the
department of early learning shall implement a voluntary quality rating
and improvement system for licensed and certified child care centers
and homes and other early learning programs as determined by the
department.
(2) The voluntary quality rating and improvement system must focus
on participation of all programs with targeted strategies for
increasing participation and quality of programs serving low-income
children.
(3) The purposes of the voluntary quality rating and improvement
system are to:
(a) Increase the readiness of children for school;
(b) Give families clear and easily accessible information about the
quality of early learning and school-age programs;
(c) Support improvement in child care throughout the state above
the minimum safety and health standards required for child care
licensure;
(d) Promote access to quality early learning programs for all
children; and
(e) Promote and support professional development and training for
early learning and school-age care professionals.
(4) Upon full implementation of the voluntary quality rating and
improvement system, the department shall, to the extent funds are
available:
(a) Assign ratings to participating early learning programs based
on research-based voluntary quality rating and improvement program
standards, which will include:
(i) Child outcomes;
(ii) Facility curriculum and learning environment;
(iii) Professional development and training; and
(iv) Family engagement and partnership;
(b) In support of high quality child care and success in school for
children, the department shall partner with community-based
organizations, higher education, and other key stakeholders to provide,
to the extent funds are available:
(i) Supports and incentives to voluntary quality rating and
improvement system participants including, but not limited to, highly
trained coaches with expertise in early childhood development,
professional development, training and facility improvement grants, in
partnership with the state child care resource and referral agency,
consistent with its responsibilities under RCW 43.215.545, or other
appropriate entities;
(ii) Professional development, training, and higher education
opportunities, including scholarships, for participating program staff
and directors linked to a career pathway in the field of early
childhood education;
(iii) Supports that expand family engagement and understanding of
quality early childhood education in ways that are inclusive and
respectful of the diversity of families and children with special
needs;
(iv) Incentives for early learning professionals for the attainment
of training and education; and
(v) Increased child care assistance reimbursement rates and
payments that reflect the cost of quality programs for participants
including compensation for staff in participating programs, and promote
affordability of high-quality early learning programs for all families;
(c) Evaluate the effectiveness of the quality rating and
improvement system every three years, and make the evaluation report
publicly available;
(d) By December 2015, make recommendations to the legislature about
adding additional incentives to support compensation increases based on
facility rating. The recommendations must recognize the role of
appropriate compensation in supporting education and retention and
promoting the affordability of high-quality early learning programs for
all families;
(e) In consultation with constituents, develop a plan for full
inclusion of licensed and certified school-age programs serving
children ages five through twelve years in the voluntary quality rating
and improvement system; and
(f) Report program ratings on a publicly accessible web site and
partner with the child care resource and referral agency or other
entities to expand parent awareness regarding the voluntary quality
rating and improvement system and its potential to improve child care
quality and help parents make child care decisions that meet family
needs and support the school readiness of children.
(5) Nothing in this section changes the department's responsibility
to collectively bargain over mandatory subjects.

--- END ---