BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.85.191 and 2008 c 23 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
Before receiving a license, every real estate broker, managing
broker, and firm must pay a license fee as prescribed by the director
by rule. A license issued under the provisions of this chapter expires
two years from the issuance date. Licenses issued to real estate firms
that are partnerships, limited liability partnerships, limited
liability companies, corporations, and other legally recognized
business entities expire on the date when the registration or
certificate of authority filed with the secretary of state expires.
Licenses must be renewed every two years on or before the date
established under this section and a biennial renewal license fee as
prescribed by the director by rule must be paid. A license is
considered expired when the licensee fails to meet the renewal
requirements as of the date of renewal for that license.
If the director does not receive the application for a renewal
license on or before the renewal date, a penalty fee as prescribed by
the director by rule shall be paid. Acceptance by the director of an
application for renewal after the renewal date shall not be a waiver of
the delinquency.
The license of a person whose license renewal fee is not received
within one year from the date of expiration is canceled. This person
may obtain a new license by satisfying the procedures and requirements
as prescribed by the director by rule.
The director may issue to each active licensee a license and a
pocket identification card in the form and size as prescribed by rule.
The director must develop by rule a procedure and a schedule to
ensure all active licensees and licensees applying for active status,
renewal, or reinstatement have a fingerprint and background check done
on a regular basis. Veterans who have been honorably discharged from
a branch of the United States armed forces are exempt from the
fingerprint and background check under this section upon presentation
of their DD-214 form with their initial or renewal application.

--- END ---