BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 86.15.025 and 1969 ex.s. c 195 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board is authorized to establish a countywide flood control
zone district incorporating the boundaries of any and all watersheds
located within the county which are not specifically organized into
flood control zone districts established pursuant to chapter 86.15 RCW.
Upon establishment of a countywide flood control zone district as
authorized by this section, the board is authorized and may divide any
or all of the zone so created into separately designated subzones and
such subzones shall then be operated and be legally established in the
same manner as any flood control zone district established pursuant to
chapter 86.15 RCW.
(2) Countywide flood control zone districts shall be established
pursuant to the requirements of RCW 86.15.020((,)) and 86.15.030 ((and
86.15.040 as now law of [or] hereafter amended)). Subzones established
from countywide flood control zone districts shall be established by
resolution of the board, and the provisions of RCW 86.15.020((,)) and
86.15.030 ((and)) shall not apply to the establishment of such subzone
as authorized by this section.
(3) Such subzones shall be operated and administered in the same
manner as any other flood control zone district in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 86.15 RCW.
(4) Such subzones shall have authority to exercise any and all
powers conferred by the provisions of RCW 86.15.080 ((as now law or
hereafter amended)).
(5) The board shall exercise the same power, authority, and
responsibility over such subzones as it exercises over flood control
zone districts in accordance with the provisions of chapter 86.15 RCW
((as now law or hereafter amended)), and without limiting the
generality of this subsection, the board may exercise over such
subzones, the powers granted to it by RCW 86.15.160, 86.15.170,
86.15.176 and 86.15.178 ((as now law or hereafter amended)).

--- END ---