BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.230 and 2010 c 235 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent and purpose of this section to guarantee that
each common school district board of directors, whether or not acting
through its respective administrative staff, be held accountable for
the proper operation of their district to the local community and its
electorate. In accordance with the provisions of this title ((28A RCW,
as now or hereafter amended)), each common school district board of
directors shall be vested with the final responsibility for the setting
of policies ensuring quality in the content and extent of its
educational program and that such program provide students with the
opportunity to achieve those skills which are generally recognized as
requisite to learning.
(2) In conformance with the provisions of this title ((28A RCW, as
now or hereafter amended)), it shall be the responsibility of each
common school district board of directors to adopt policies to:
(a) Establish performance criteria and an evaluation process for
its superintendent, classified staff, certificated personnel, including
administrative staff, and for all programs constituting a part of such
district's curriculum. Each district shall report annually to the
superintendent of public instruction the following for each employee
group listed in this subsection (2)(a): (i) Evaluation criteria and
rubrics; (ii) a description of each rating; and (iii) the number of
staff in each rating;
(b) Determine the final assignment of staff, certificated or
classified, according to board enumerated classroom and program needs
and data, based upon a plan to ensure that the assignment policy: (i)
Supports the learning needs of all the students in the district;
((and)) (ii) gives specific attention to high-need schools and
classrooms; and (iii) includes the following elements: (A)
Certifications and endorsements; (B) evaluation performance ratings;
(C) expertise related to the assignment; (D) seniority; and (E) other
appropriate variables as determined by the school board and set forth
in the policy;
(c) Use the staff assignment elements in (b) of this subsection in
staffing decisions made to implement reduction in force procedures due
to district enrollment decline or loss of revenue as well as the
implementation of assignments for staff returning to employment
following a reduction in force;
(d) Provide information to the local community and its electorate
describing the school district's policies concerning hiring, assigning,
terminating, and evaluating staff, including the criteria for
evaluating teachers and principals;
(((d))) (e) Determine the amount of instructional hours necessary
for any student to acquire a quality education in such district, in not
less than an amount otherwise required in RCW 28A.150.220, or rules of
the state board of education;
(((e))) (f) Determine the allocation of staff time, whether
certificated or classified;
(((f))) (g) Establish final curriculum standards consistent with
law and rules of the superintendent of public instruction, relevant to
the particular needs of district students or the unusual
characteristics of the district, and ensuring a quality education for
each student in the district; and
(((g))) (h) Evaluate teaching materials, including text books,
teaching aids, handouts, or other printed material, in public hearing
upon complaint by parents, guardians or custodians of students who
consider dissemination of such material to students objectionable.
(3) The inclusion of evaluation performance ratings under
subsection (2)(b) of this section in the district assignment policies
is not required until the school districts have implemented the
certificated classroom teacher and principal evaluation systems under
RCW 28A.405.100(7)(b).

--- END ---