BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that additional
flexibility may be needed for manufacturers who are selling mercury-containing lights for residential use in Washington to comply with the
requirements of chapter 70.275 RCW in order to provide a sustainable
funding mechanism and provide effective state protections to producer-operated programs under chapter 70.275 RCW.
(2) The legislature declares that collaboration among producers,
groups of producers, product stewardship organizations operated by the
producers, or product stewardship organizations contracted by the
department of ecology, or the mercury-containing light retailers, is
necessary and is in the best interest of the public in order to provide
a sustainable funding mechanism and otherwise comply with the
requirements of chapter 70.275 RCW. The legislature therefore intends
to exempt from state antitrust laws, and to provide immunity from
federal antitrust laws through the state action doctrine, for the
specific activities undertaken pursuant to efforts designed and
implemented under chapter 70.275 RCW that might otherwise be
constrained by such laws. The legislature does not intend and does not
otherwise authorize any person or entity to engage in activities or to
conspire to engage in activities that would constitute per se
violations of state and federal antitrust laws including, but not
limited to, agreements among competitors as to the final pricing of any
wholesale or retail product.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.275.030 and 2010 c 130 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every producer of mercury-containing lights sold in or into
Washington state for residential use must fully finance and participate
in a product stewardship program for that product, including the
department's costs for administering and enforcing this chapter.
(2) Every producer must:
(a) Participate in a product stewardship program approved by the
department and operated by a product stewardship organization
contracted by the department. All producers must finance and
participate in the plan operated by the product stewardship
organization, unless the producer obtains department approval for an
independent plan as described in (b) of this subsection; or
(b) Finance and operate, either individually or jointly with other
producers, a product stewardship program approved by the department.
(3)(a) A producer, group of producers, product stewardship
organization operated by producers, or product stewardship organization
contracted by the department is authorized to include financing
provisions that may include an environmental handling assessment that
is collected by the producer and remitted to the product stewardship
organization. Producers selling mercury-containing lights for
residential use may add an environmental handling assessment to the
cost of mercury-containing lights sold to wholesalers, retailers, and
distributors, who may add the environmental handling assessment to the
purchase price of mercury-containing lights sold in or into the state.
Funds collected using an environmental handling assessment may not
exceed the cost of the product stewardship program, but may include
reasonable reserves for mercury-containing lights that are projected to
be recycled in the state.
(b) A product stewardship organization must provide an annual
financial audit to the department when the product stewardship
organization implements an environmental handling assessment.
(4) A producer, group of producers, or product stewardship
organization funded by producers must pay all administrative and
operational costs associated with their program or programs, except for
the collection costs associated with curbside and mail-back collection
programs. For curbside and mail-back programs, a producer, group of
producers, or product stewardship organization shall finance the costs
of transporting mercury-containing lights from accumulation points and
for processing mercury-containing lights collected by curbside and
mail-back programs. For collection locations, including household
hazardous waste facilities, charities, retailers, government recycling
sites, or other suitable locations, a producer, group of producers, or
product stewardship organization shall finance the costs of collection,
transportation, and processing of mercury-containing lights collected
at the collection locations.
(((4))) (5) Product stewardship programs shall collect unwanted
mercury-containing lights delivered from covered entities for reuse,
recycling, processing, or final disposition, and not charge a fee when
lights are dropped off or delivered into the program.
(((5))) (6) Product stewardship programs shall provide, at a
minimum, no cost services in all cities in the state with populations
greater than ten thousand and all counties of the state on an ongoing,
year-round basis.
(((6))) (7) All product stewardship programs operated under
approved plans must recover their fair share of unwanted covered
products as determined by the department.
(((7))) (8) The department or its designee may inspect, audit, or
review audits of processing and disposal facilities used to fulfill the
requirements of a product stewardship program.
(((8))) (9) No product stewardship program required under this
chapter may use federal or state prison labor for processing unwanted
products.
(((9))) (10) Product stewardship programs for mercury-containing
lights must be fully implemented by January 1, 2013.

--- END ---