BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, employers may
take a credit for the costs of training interns, apprentices, or
permanent employees in high demand advanced manufacturing positions.
Employers receiving the credit may not have more than one hundred full-time equivalent employees on their payroll.
(2) The credit allowed under this section is equal to fifty percent
of the costs under subsection (1) of this section. The credit may not
exceed five thousand dollars per employee. The credit earned by an
employer in one calendar year may be carried over to be credited
against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. An employer may
not receive a credit in excess of two hundred thousand dollars per
year.
(3)(a) Employers claiming the credit provided in this section must:
(i) Have their training program certified by Impact Washington; and
(ii) File a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.

--- END ---