BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.630 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 14 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that state universities
((engage in)) promote the practical application and commercialization
of research and other economic development and workforce development
activities that benefit the ((intermediate and long-term)) economic
vitality of Washington. State universities are expected to develop and
strengthen university-industry relationships through the conduct of
research, the support of company formation and job generation, and
collaborative training. The state universities, using a collaborative
process that may include both in-house resources and independent
contractors with necessary technical expertise or innovative processes,
must perform one or more of the following functions:
(a) Provide collaborative research and technology transfer
opportunities;
(b) Publicize their commercialization processes and include an
explanation of how to access commercialization resources at the
((universities)) university;
(c) Develop mechanisms for pairing researchers, entrepreneurs, and
investors. Such mechanisms are to include, but are not limited to,
developing guides, web sites, or workshops on funding opportunities, on
entrepreneurship and the process of starting a company, and on
university-industry relations;
(d) Host events to connect researchers to entrepreneurs, investors,
and individuals from the state's technology-based industries; and
(e) Provide opportunities for training undergraduate and graduate
students through direct involvement in research and industry
interactions.
(2) In carrying out the functions in this section, the
universities:
(a) May provide university-administered facilities and other
resources to students, staff, and faculty for their use, including but
not limited to use in extramurally funded research, such as through
grants, contracts, or donations, consistent with the public mission of
the university, if the university does not impose a requirement to
assign intellectual property or other intangible assets that may
thereby be created, or assert a financial interest in such assets,
except as may be required by an extramural sponsor of research;
(b) May require assignment of, or have a financial interest in
intellectual property or other intangible assets developed by students,
staff, or faculty only through agreements entered into on a voluntary
basis;
(c) May not, in employment agreements with student or faculty
employees, require assignment of or assert a financial interest in
their inventions; and
(d) May work with and through the higher education coordinating
board.

--- END ---