BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.733 and 2010 c 271 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
The developmental disabilities endowment governing board is
established to design and administer the developmental disabilities
endowment. To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the
((secretary)) director of the department shall provide staff and
administrative support to the governing board.
(1) The governing board shall consist of seven members as follows:
(a) Three of the members, who shall be appointed by the governor,
shall be persons who have demonstrated expertise and leadership in
areas such as finance, actuarial science, management, business, or
public policy.
(b) Three members of the board, who shall be appointed by the
governor, shall be persons who have demonstrated expertise and
leadership in areas such as business, developmental disabilities
service design, management, or public policy, and shall be family
members of persons with developmental disabilities.
(c) The seventh member of the board, who shall serve as chair of
the board, shall be appointed by the remaining six members of the
board.
(2) Members of the board shall serve terms of four years and may be
appointed for successive terms of four years at the discretion of the
appointing authority. However, the governor may stagger the terms of
the initial six members of the board so that approximately one-fourth
of the members' terms expire each year.
(3) Members of the board shall be compensated for their service
under RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The board shall meet periodically as specified by the call of
the chair, or a majority of the board.
(5) Members of the governing board and the state investment board
shall not be considered an insurer of the funds or assets of the
endowment trust fund or the individual trust accounts. Neither of
these two boards or their members shall be liable for the action or
inaction of the other.
(6) Members of the governing board and the state investment board
are not liable to the state, to the fund, or to any other person as a
result of their activities as members, whether ministerial or
discretionary, except for willful dishonesty or intentional violations
of law. The department and the state investment board, respectively,
may purchase liability insurance for members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
department of health pertaining to the developmental disabilities
endowment are transferred to the department of commerce. All
references to the director or the department of health in the Revised
Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the
department of commerce when referring to the functions transferred in
this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
health pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the department of commerce. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other
tangible property employed by the department of health in carrying out
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available
to the department of commerce. All funds, credits, or other assets
held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be assigned to the department of commerce.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of health for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
department of commerce.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of health engaged in performing
the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department of commerce. All employees classified
under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to
the department of commerce to perform their usual duties upon the same
terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action
that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and
rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
health pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the department of commerce. All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall
be performed by the department of commerce.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of health shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the department of health assigned
to the department of commerce under this section whose positions are
within an existing bargaining unit description at the department of
commerce shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the
department of commerce and shall be considered an appropriate inclusion
or modification of the existing bargaining unit under the provisions of
chapter 41.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 43.330.906 (Transfer of powers, duties,
and functions pertaining to the developmental disabilities endowment)
and 2010 c 271 s 204 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 43.70.730, 43.70.731, 43.70.732,
43.70.733, 43.70.734, 43.70.735, 43.70.736, and 43.70.737 are each
recodified as sections in chapter 43.330 RCW.

--- END ---