BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.290 and 2009 c 565 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The microenterprise development program is established in the
department of commerce. In implementing the program, the department:
(1) Shall provide organizational support to a statewide
microenterprise association to the extent funds are appropriated by the
legislature for that purpose and shall contract with the association
for the delivery of services and distribution of grants;
(a) The association shall serve as the department's agent in
carrying out the purpose and service delivery requirements of this
section;
(b) The association's contract with the department shall specify
that in administering the funds provided for under subsection (3) of
this section, the association may use no greater than ten percent of
the funds to cover administrative expenses;
(2) Shall provide funds for capacity building for the statewide
microenterprise association and microenterprise development
organizations throughout the state;
(3) Shall provide grants to microenterprise development
organizations for the delivery of training and technical assistance
services;
(4) Shall identify and facilitate the availability of state,
federal, and private sources of funds which may enhance microenterprise
development in the state;
(5) Shall develop with the statewide microenterprise association
criteria for the distribution of grants to microenterprise development
organizations. Such criteria may include:
(a) The geographic representation of all regions of the state,
including both urban and rural communities;
(b) The ability of the microenterprise development organization to
provide business development services in low-income communities;
(c) The scope of services offered by a microenterprise development
organization and their efficiency in delivery of such services;
(d) The ability of the microenterprise development organization to
monitor the progress of its customers and identify technical and
financial assistance needs;
(e) The ability of the microenterprise development organization to
work with other organizations, public entities, and financial
institutions to meet the technical and financial assistance needs of
its customers;
(f) The sufficiency of operating funds for the microenterprise
development organization; and
(g) Such other criteria as agreed by the department and the
association;
(6) Shall require the statewide microenterprise association and any
microenterprise development organization receiving funds through the
microenterprise development program to raise and contribute to the
effort funded by the microenterprise development program an amount
equal to twenty-five percent of the microenterprise development program
funds received. Such matching funds may come from private foundations,
federal or local sources, financial institutions, or any other source
other than funds appropriated from the legislature;
(7) Shall require under its contract with the statewide
microenterprise association an annual accounting of program outcomes,
including job creation, access to capital, leveraging of nonstate
funds, and other outcome measures specified by the department((. By
January 1, 2012, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall
use these outcome data and other relevant information to evaluate the
program's effectiveness)); and
(8) May adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

--- END ---