BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.285.030 and 2009 c 565 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(4) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(5) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(6) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(7) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity
for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(8) "Department" means the department of commerce or its successor.
(9) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of such
facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts.
(10) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than freshwater that commences operation after March 31,
1999, where: (i) The facility is located in the Pacific Northwest; or
(ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into Washington
state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or integration
services; or
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation projects owned by a qualifying utility and located in the
Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation pipes
and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the additional
generation in either case does not result in new water diversions or
impoundments.
(11) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 19.29A.010.
(12) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity
delivered in the most recently completed year by a qualifying utility
to its Washington retail customers.
(13) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally related
characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and other
electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(14) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined for the
Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific Northwest
electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 839a).
(15) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.35C.010.
(16)(a) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term
"electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than
twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number
of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form
861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy
information administration, United States department of energy.
(b) "Qualifying utility" does not include an electric utility that
has an average of five or fewer retail electric customers per mile of
distribution line, as determined under section 2 of this act, and that
maintains an agreement under chapter 54.48 RCW with any qualifying
utility with which the electric utility has an adjoining service area.
(17) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility is not powered by freshwater, the
certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes associated with
that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the certificate is verified
by a renewable energy credit tracking system selected by the
department.
(18) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar
energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean, or
tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; and (i) biomass energy based
on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field
residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include (i) wood pieces
that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) black liquor by-product from paper production; (iii) wood from old growth forests; or
(iv) municipal solid waste.
(19) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other entity of
Washington state government to carry out the intent and purposes of
this chapter.
(20) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing January 1st
and ending December 31st.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.285 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2013, and every five years thereafter, the state
auditor's office shall: (a) Verify the number of distribution line
miles owned by an electric utility for the purposes of establishing
that the utility meets or does not meet the criteria for being a
qualifying utility; (b) refer to the latest data reported by the
utility in form 861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the
energy information administration, United States department of energy,
to confirm the utility's number of customers; and (c) perform a
calculation to determine the utility's number of customers per mile of
distribution line.
(2) An electric utility that is not a qualifying utility is deemed
as a matter of law to be a qualifying utility if at any time after the
effective date of this section the utility acquires service territory
or extends electric service to any customer of a qualifying utility
without the consent of the qualifying utility.
(3)(a) If an electric utility is found by the state auditor under
subsection (1) of this section to have more than five customers per
mile of distribution line, it is deemed as a matter of law to be a
qualifying utility and subject to the requirements of this chapter
pursuant to RCW 19.285.040(3).
(b) An electric utility that is deemed to be a qualifying utility
pursuant to subsection (2) of this subsection is subject to the
requirements of this chapter pursuant to RCW 19.285.040(3).

--- END ---