BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
human and financial impact of diabetes on the state, its budget, and
those living with the disease is significant. Today, more than five
hundred thousand of our citizens live with diabetes and over one
million six hundred thousand live with prediabetes. Yet, by 2025 it is
projected that more than nine hundred seventy-five thousand people will
live with diabetes and more than two million thirty-six thousand people
will be living with prediabetes. These same estimates also suggest
that the disease has a five billion dollar impact on the state economy
this year which will increase to about nine billion six hundred
thousand dollars in 2025. Yet, half of these costs are attributed to
inpatient hospital based care directly attributable to preventable and
manageable complications associated with diabetes including heart
attacks, strokes, blindness, kidney failure, and lower-leg amputations.
Families also experience financial challenges due to diabetes given
estimates documenting the per capita costs of the disease equaling
about twelve thousand dollars per year. Two out of three people living
with diabetes will die from a heart attack or stroke. Those living
with diabetes run a risk of a heart attack or stroke that is four times
greater than that for those without diabetes. It is expected that the
number of people experiencing blindness and vision trouble due to
diabetes in Washington will more than double to one hundred twenty-two
thousand six hundred in 2025 from fifty-nine thousand one hundred
today. The legislature also recognizes the devastating impact diabetes
and its complications place on families, as well as the
disproportionate impact of the disease on communities of color and
those living near or below the poverty level, newborns of mothers with
gestational diabetes, children living with type 1 diabetes, and those
with type 2 diabetes. The legislature further recognizes the damaging
effects of not properly preparing the state for the current and future
impact of the reach and scope of diabetes given its financial and human
impact on families, state-run health care financing and insurance
programs, private employer-financed insurance programs, and the
potential for a lower standard of living for Washington families
impacted by diabetes.
(2) The legislature finds that diabetes has the potential to
challenge all health services and financing programs serving the needs
of people living with and without the disease. The legislature further
finds that the purpose of the state's health, insurance, and disability
systems is to help those with or at risk for diabetes to acquire the
skills and knowledge they will need to prevent or manage diabetes via
proven medical evidence.
(3) The legislature further finds that responsible citizenship
includes an ability to make wise decisions when it comes to managing or
preventing diabetes. The legislature further finds that focusing
attention on the impact of diabetes on our health care, insurance, and
health financing systems is imperative to prepare these systems for the
future impact of the disease and its complications.
(4) The legislature intends to assist families impacted by
diabetes, employers, and government programs serving their interests in
developing reasonable strategies to contain the impact of diabetes
today and tomorrow. As a means to achieve this goal, the legislature
intends to assess the reach, scope, and impact of diabetes on
Washington's residents, taxpayers, and employers by creating a public-private partnership. This public-private partnership called the
diabetes action team will aim to generate important information on how
diabetes is impacting families and the state today while aiming to
prepare for the future reach and scope of diabetes of all forms
including type 1 diabetes, type 2 diabetes, gestational diabetes, and
prediabetes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A diabetes action team public-private
partnership is established to assess and determine the reach and impact
of type 1 diabetes, type 2 diabetes, gestational diabetes, and
prediabetes on the state. The diabetes action team must consist of
legislative, agency, and community membership.
(a) The legislative members must be: Two members of the senate,
one of whom is a member of the senate health and long-term care
committee, whom the president of the senate shall appoint; and two
members of the house of representatives, one of whom is a member of the
house committee on health care and wellness, whom the speaker of the
house of representatives shall appoint.
(b) The agency members must be: One member from and appointed by
the office of the health care authority; one member from and appointed
by the department of social and health services; one member from and
appointed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
one member from and appointed by the department of labor and
industries; and one member from and appointed by the department of
health.
(c) The governor shall appoint the community members as follows:
Two members from the private medical insurance industry; two members
from the hospital community that have expertise in the topic of
diabetes; four members from the pharmaceutical medical device and
biotechnology industry; two members from the physician community with
an expertise in epidemiological data specific to diabetes; two members
from the allied health professionals with an expertise in diabetes care
and management; one member representing diabetes patients; and three
members representing payors or employers based in Washington with a
workforce impacted by diabetes.
(d) The members of the partnership shall select the chair of the
partnership.
(2) To the extent funds are appropriated or are available for this
purpose, technical and logistical support may be provided by the state
government offices and entities named to the partnership, the
organizations composing the partnership, and other participants in the
diabetes action team public-private partnership. The office of the
health care authority shall compile the initial list of members and
convene the first meeting of the partnership.
(3) The members of the partnership must be appointed by August 1,
2012.
(4) Legislative members of the partnership must receive per diem
and travel under RCW 44.04.120.
(5) Travel and other expenses of members of the partnership must be
provided by the agency, association, or organization that member
represents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By December 1, 2012, the diabetes action
team public-private partnership shall finalize a set of charges and
action steps for the partnership to generate data and information
related to the impact of diabetes on health insurance-related programs,
health insurance financing efforts, employers, and public health
efforts in Washington.
(2) By April 1, 2013, the diabetes action team public-private
partnership shall identify the following:
(a) The financial impact and reach diabetes of all types is having
on the entity, the state, and localities. Items included in this
assessment must include the number of lives with diabetes impacted or
covered by the programs overseen by the state and whenever possible the
individual entities participating in the partnership, the number of
lives with diabetes and family members impacted by prevention and
diabetes control programs implemented and overseen by the state and
whenever possible the individual entities participating in the
partnership, the financial toll or impact diabetes and its
complications places on the state overseen programs participating in
the partnership, and whenever possible the individual entities
participating in the partnership and the financial toll or impact
diabetes and its complications places on the programs participating in
the partnership and whenever possible the individual entities
participating in the partnership in comparison to other chronic
diseases and conditions;
(b) An assessment of the benefits of implemented programs and
activities overseen by the state and whenever possible the individual
entities participating in the partnership aimed at controlling diabetes
and preventing the disease. This assessment must also document the
amount and source for any funding directed to agencies or entities from
the Washington legislature for programs and activities aimed at
reaching those with diabetes;
(c) A description of the level of coordination existing between the
entities participating in the partnership overseen by the state on
activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on managing,
treating, or preventing all forms of diabetes and its complications;
and
(d) A description of the level of coordination existing between the
state and nongovernmental entities participating in the partnership on
activities, programmatic activities, and messaging on managing,
treating, or preventing all forms of diabetes and its complications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The requirements of sections 1 through 3 of
this act are limited to the diabetes information, data, initiatives,
and programs within each agency overseen by the state participating in
the partnership before the effective date of this section, unless there
is unobligated funding for diabetes in each agency that may be used for
new research, data collection, reporting, or other requirements of
sections 1 through 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A preliminary report of the partnership's
findings must be presented to the governor and relevant senate and
house committees focused on health and health financing matters by July
1, 2013. A final report of the partnership must be submitted to the
same parties by December 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The diabetes action team public-private
partnership account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
The purpose of the account is to support the diabetes action team
public-private partnership and to identify the impact of diabetes of
all forms on the state. Revenues to the account may include gifts from
the private sector, federal funds, and any appropriations made by the
legislature or other sources. Grants and their administration must be
paid from the account. Only the director of the health care authority
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act expires January 1, 2014.

--- END ---