BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
The use of automated external defibrillators has been demonstrated
to save lives including those of young athletes pursuing athletic
activities. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to promote
the timely and appropriate use of automated external defibrillators in
settings where school athletic events occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
school districts, shall develop and implement an automated external
defibrillator program for each high school in the state.
(2) The automated external defibrillator program shall:
(a) Ensure that an automated external defibrillator is provided on-site; and
(b) An individual trained in the operation and use of an automated
external defibrillator is present at all school-sponsored athletic
events.
(3) The superintendent, in consultation with the department of
health, shall adopt rules that:
(a) Establish guidelines for periodic inspections and annual
maintenance of the automated external defibrillators;
(b) Assist districts in carrying out the provisions of this
section, including procedures to seek grants for the purchase of
automated external defibrillators or to seek donations of automated
external defibrillators. The superintendent may coordinate with local
health districts in seeking grants and donations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction and its
employees and agents are not liable for failures to comply with section
2 of this act or for injuries or accidents involving automated external
defibrillators.

--- END ---