BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.158 RCW
to read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person to maintain a machine at a
retail establishment that enables any person to process tobacco or a
product that is made or derived from tobacco into a roll or tube. This
section does not apply to the sale to consumers of roll your own
cigarette devices that are intended for personal use off the premises
of a retail establishment.

--- END ---