BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.92.010 and 2004 c 275 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are to establish the principles upon
which the state financial aid programs will be based and to establish
the state of Washington state need grant program, thus assisting
financially needy or disadvantaged students domiciled in Washington to
obtain the opportunity of attending an accredited institution of higher
education. State need grants under this chapter are available only to
students who are resident students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a)
through (((d))) (e).

--- END ---