BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.56.200 and 2002 c 261 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The lien of judgments upon the real estate of the judgment debtor
shall commence as follows:
(1) Judgments of the district court of the United States rendered
or filed in the county in which the real estate of the judgment debtor
is situated, ((and judgments of the superior court for the county in
which the real estate of the judgment debtor is situated,)) from the
time of the entry or filing thereof;
(2) Judgments of the superior court for the county in which the
real estate of the judgment debtor is situated, from the time of the
filing by the county clerk upon the execution docket in accordance with
RCW 4.64.030;
(3) Judgments of the district court of the United States rendered
in any county in this state other than that in which the real estate of
the judgment debtor to be affected is situated, judgments of the
supreme court of this state, judgments of the court of appeals of this
state, and judgments of the superior court for any county other than
that in which the real estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is
situated, from the time of the filing of a duly certified abstract of
such judgment with the county clerk of the county in which the real
estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is situated, as provided
in this act;
(((3))) (4) Judgments of a district court of this state rendered or
filed as a foreign judgment in a superior court in the county in which
the real estate of the judgment debtor is situated, from the time of
the filing of a duly certified transcript of the docket of the district
court with the county clerk of the county in which such judgment was
rendered or filed, and upon such filing said judgment shall become to
all intents and purposes a judgment of the superior court for said
county; and
(((4))) (5) Judgments of a district court of this state rendered or
filed in a superior court in any other county in this state than that
in which the real estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is
situated, a transcript of the docket of which has been filed with the
county clerk of the county where such judgment was rendered or filed,
from the time of filing, with the county clerk of the county in which
the real estate of the judgment debtor to be affected is situated, of
a duly certified abstract of the record of said judgment in the office
of the county clerk of the county in which the certified transcript of
the docket of said judgment of said district court was originally
filed.

--- END ---