BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that it is the
paramount duty of the state under Article IX of the state Constitution
to provide for the education of the children of the state. The state
supreme court recently ruled the legislature has not provided adequate
state funding from dependable and regular sources to comply with the
paramount duty. It is the intent of the legislature, therefore,
through this act to modify the state expenditure limit to ensure a
limit is placed on the rest of state government expenditures that will
enable the state to commit an increasing proportion of state tax
dollars and the state budget to the education of our children in
fulfillment of the state's paramount duty.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.025 and 2009 c 479 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund during any
fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state expenditure limit
established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
((43.135.035)) 43.135.034 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW
43.135.045(2), the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any check,
warrant, or voucher that will result in a state general fund
expenditure for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure
limit established under this chapter. A violation of this subsection
constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state
treasurer to the penalties provided in RCW 43.88.300. The state
expenditure limit established by this section does not apply to state
allocations to school districts and educational service districts under
chapter 28A.315 RCW.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, ((2009)) 2013, the phrase "the previous
fiscal year's state expenditure limit" means the total state
expenditures from the state general fund((, the public safety and
education account, the health services account, the violence reduction
and drug enforcement account, the student achievement fund, the water
quality account, and the equal justice subaccount, not including
federal funds,)) and related funds for the fiscal year beginning July
1, ((2008)) 2012, plus the fiscal growth factor.
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit
committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on ways and means. All actions of
the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter
require an affirmative vote of at least four members.
(6) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and
then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. If,
by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not adopted
the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his
or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as
necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average ((growth in state
personal income for the prior ten fiscal years)) of the sum of
inflation and population change for each of the prior three fiscal
years.
(8) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics.
(9) "Population change" means the percentage change in state
population for each fiscal year as reported by the office of financial
management.
(((8))) (10) "General fund" means the state general fund.
(11) "Related funds" means the Washington opportunity pathways
account and the education legacy trust account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---