BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a master contract for
centralized scheduling of all in-person spoken language interpreter
services for state executive agencies, except as provided in subsection
(2) of this section, no later than January 1, 2013. The scheduling
system shall:
(a) Require direct contracting with in-state language access
providers certified or authorized by the state. When a state-certified
or state-authorized in-state language access provider is not available,
the state may use a language access provider with other certifications
or qualifications deemed to meet state standards, including
interpreters in other states;
(b) Have a centralized, secure, web-based tool that providers or
state agencies will use to schedule appointments for interpreter
services; and
(c) Have the ability for language access providers to be scheduled
based on qualifications or previous experience.
Nothing in this subsection affects the ability to provide
interpretive services through employed staff. K-12 schools and courts
are exempt from the requirement to contract through the department.
All other state executive agencies are required to contract through the
department unless otherwise exempted.
(2) If the health care authority has completed a competitive
procurement of a system comparable to that described in subsection (1)
of this section prior to September 2013, it is exempt from the
requirement to contract through the department. State executive
agencies are also exempt from the requirement to contract through the
department if they have a contract with the health care authority for
language interpreter services prior to September 2013.
(3) If the health care authority has completed a competitive
procurement of such a system prior to September 2013, the system
procured for use by other state agencies shall, to the maximum extent
possible, be consistent and coordinated with that system.

--- END ---