BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the unemployment
and underemployment rate in the construction industry in Washington has
remained chronically high throughout the previous two biennia; that the
economic recovery of the state's construction industry is vital to the
economic recovery of the entire state; that the lack of employment
opportunities in the state's construction industry has substantially
contributed to serious social or economic problems in the state; that
a substantial number of in-state residents have experience or training
in occupations that would be employed on a public works project; and
that the employment of construction industry workers who are not
Washington residents is a peculiar source of unemployment and
underemployment of resident construction industry workers. The
legislature therefore intends to address the chronic unemployment and
underemployment of residents in the construction industry by
establishing a temporary employment preference on public works
contracts throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The preference established in this
section applies when the average quarterly employment figures in the
construction industry as determined by the employment security
department are twenty-five percent lower than the highest quarter
employment figures in the most recent five-year period.
(2) Eligible in-state residents must be given a minimum of fifty
percent employment preference on public works contracts throughout the
state. This hiring preference applies on a project-by-project and
craft-by-craft basis, and must be met each workweek by each contractor
and subcontractor for contracts that were subject to subsection (1) of
this section when they were entered into.
(3) A person is eligible for an employment preference under this
section if the person is a resident, and:
(a) Is receiving unemployment benefits or would be eligible to
receive benefits but has exhausted them;
(b) Is not working and has registered to find work with a public or
private employment agency or a local hiring hall;
(c) Is underemployed or marginally employed as defined by the
department; or
(d) Has completed a job-training program approved by the department
and is either not employed or is engaged in employment that does not
use the skills acquired in the job-training program.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "department" means the
employment security department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A contractor or subcontractor working on
a public works project subject to prevailing wage requirements under a
contract that was subject to subsection (1) of this section when it was
entered into must meet the employment preference established in section
2 of this act.
(2) An employer subject to a resident hiring requirement under this
chapter shall certify that persons employed as residents under the
preference were eligible for the preference at the time of hiring.
(3) A labor organization that dispatches members for work on a
public works project under a collective bargaining agreement shall
certify that persons dispatched as residents to meet a preference were
eligible for the preference at the time of dispatch.
(4) An employer or labor organization may request assistance from
the employment security department in verifying the eligibility of an
applicant for a hiring preference under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An employer subject to hiring
requirements under this chapter may request the employment security
department to assist in locating qualified, eligible employees. After
receiving a request for assistance, the department shall refer
qualified, eligible, available residents to the employer to fill the
employer's hiring needs. The employer shall cooperate with the
department.
(2) If the department is unable to refer a sufficient number of
qualified, eligible, available residents able to perform the work, the
department may approve the hiring of residents who are not eligible for
preference and nonresidents for the balance of the request.
(3) An employer obligated to meet resident hire requirements under
this chapter shall comply with the reporting provisions that the
director of the department determines are reasonably necessary to carry
out this chapter. Except for statistical data, all information
regarding specific employees is confidential and may not be released by
the department. However, confidential employee information may be
shared between public agencies for purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A contractor who violates a provision of
this chapter shall have deducted from amounts due to the contractor
under the contract the prevailing wages that should have been paid to
a displaced resident, and these amounts shall be retained by the
contracting agency.
(2) In addition to being subject to the penalties under subsection
(1) of this section, a contractor that knowingly and with intent to
defraud makes a false statement or fails to provide or conceals, or
attempts to conceal, material information for the purpose of obtaining,
or aiding another in obtaining, a preference under this section is
subject to a civil penalty of ten percent of the amount of the contract
involved or ten thousand dollars, whichever is greater.
(3) A contractor subject to sanction under this section may
request, within thirty days of the date of issuance of the notice of
sanction, a hearing conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) If a contractor fails to pay an assessment or civil penalty
after it has become final and not subject to further appeal, or after
the court has entered final judgment in favor of the state, the
attorney general may recover the assessment or penalty by action in the
appropriate superior court. In such action, the validity and
appropriateness of the final order imposing the assessment or penalty
is not subject to review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 In a contract involving expenditure of
federal aid funds, this chapter may not be enforced in a manner that
conflicts with federal statutes giving preference to veterans or
prohibiting other preferences or discriminations among United States
citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---