BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.38.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 38 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Any county may by ordinance enacted by its county legislative
authority, levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents
or fraction thereof to be paid for county purposes by persons who pay
an admission charge to any place, including a tax on persons who are
admitted free of charge or at reduced rates to any place for which
other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the same or
similar privileges or accommodations; and require that one who receives
any admission charge to any place must collect and remit the tax to the
county treasurer of the county. However, no county may impose such tax
on persons paying an admission to any activity of any elementary or
secondary school or any public facility of a public facility district
under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW for which a tax is imposed under RCW
35.57.100 or 36.100.210.
(2) As used in this chapter, the term "admission charge" includes
a charge made for season tickets or subscriptions, a cover charge, or
a charge made for use of seats and tables, reserved or otherwise, and
other similar accommodations; a charge made for food and refreshments
in any place where any free entertainment, recreation, or amusement is
provided; a charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities
for purpose of recreation or amusement, and where the rental of the
equipment or facilities is necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege
for which a general admission is charged, the combined charges must be
considered as the admission charge. Admission charge also includes any
automobile parking charge where the amount of such charge is determined
according to the number of passengers in any automobile.
(3) Subject to subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the tax
authorized in this section is not exclusive and does not prevent any
city or town within the taxing county, when authorized by law, from
imposing within its corporate limits a tax of the same or similar kind.
However, whenever the same or similar kind of tax is imposed by any
such city or town, no such tax may be levied within the corporate
limits of such city or town by the county.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the legislative
authority of a county with a population of one million or more may
exclusively levy taxes on events in baseball stadiums constructed on or
after January 1, 1995, that are owned by a public facilities district
under chapter 36.100 RCW and that have seating capacities over forty
thousand at the rates of:
(a) Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to
be used for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by a county to construct a baseball stadium as defined
in RCW 82.14.0485. If the revenue from the tax exceeds the amount
needed for that purpose, the excess must be placed in a contingency
fund which must be used exclusively by the public facilities district
to fund repair, reequipping, and capital improvement of the baseball
stadium; and
(b) Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to
be used for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by a county to construct a baseball stadium as defined
in RCW 82.14.0485. The tax imposed under this subsection (4)(b)
expires when the bonds issued for the construction of the baseball
stadium are retired, but not later than twenty years after the tax is
first collected.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the
legislative authority of a county that has created a public stadium
authority to develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW
36.102.050 may levy and fix a tax on charges for admission to events in
a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010,
constructed in the county on or after January 1, 1998, that is owned by
a public stadium authority under chapter 36.102 RCW.
(b) Except as provided otherwise in (c) of this subsection (5), the
tax is exclusive and precludes the city or town within which the
stadium and exhibition center is located from imposing a tax of the
same or similar kind on charges for admission to events in the stadium
and exhibition center, and precludes the imposition of a general county
admissions tax on charges for admission to events in the stadium and
exhibition center.
(c) A city within which the stadium and exhibition center is
located has the exclusive right to impose an admissions tax under the
authority of RCW 35.21.280 and the county is precluded from imposing an
admissions tax, for a sporting event conducted during calendar year
2012 by a state college or university, if such sporting event occurs:
(i) Due to the temporary closure of any similar facility owned by
that college or university; and
(ii) At a facility owned by a public stadium authority located
within a city with a population that exceeds five hundred thousand
people.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection (5), "charges for admission
to events" means only the actual admission charge, exclusive of taxes
and service charges and the value of any other benefit conferred by the
admission.
(e) The tax authorized under this subsection (5) is at the rate of
not more than one cent on ten cents or fraction thereof.
(f) Revenues collected under this subsection (5) must be deposited
in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060 until
the bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 for the construction of the
stadium and exhibition center are retired. After the bonds issued for
the construction of the stadium and exhibition center are retired, the
tax authorized under this section is used exclusively to fund repair,
reequipping, and capital improvement of the stadium and exhibition
center.
(g) The tax under this subsection (5) may be levied upon the first
use of any part of the stadium and exhibition center but may not be
collected at any facility already in operation as of July 17, 1997.

--- END ---