BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
From September 1, 2012, through August 31, 2015, the health care
authority shall provide a subsidy of two hundred fifty dollars per
month for health benefit premiums to any member of the teachers'
retirement system or the public employees' retirement system who:
(1) Is ineligible for medicare;
(2) Applies for retirement under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW between
June 1, 2012, and August 31, 2012;
(3) No later than October 31, 2012, receives the first installment
of a retirement allowance as provided under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW;
and
(4) Elects to continue participation in a health insurance plan
provided by the board immediately upon retirement.

--- END ---