BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.055 and 2012 c 2 s 105 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) There is a license for spirits distributors to (a) sell spirits
purchased from manufacturers, distillers, or suppliers including,
without limitation, licensed Washington distilleries, licensed spirits
importers, other Washington spirits distributors, or suppliers of
foreign spirits located outside of the United States, to spirits
retailers including, without limitation, spirits retail licensees,
special occasion license holders, interstate common carrier license
holders, restaurant spirits retailer license holders, spirits, beer,
and wine private club license holders, hotel license holders, sports
entertainment facility license holders, and spirits, beer, and wine
nightclub license holders, and to other spirits distributors; and (b)
export the same from the state.
(2) By January 1, 2012, the board must issue spirits distributor
licenses to all applicants who, upon December 8, 2011, have the right
to purchase spirits from a spirits manufacturer, spirits distiller, or
other spirits supplier for resale in the state, or are agents of such
supplier authorized to sell to licensees in the state, unless the board
determines that issuance of a license to such applicant is not in the
public interest.
(3)(a) As limited by (b) of this subsection and subject to (c) of
this subsection, each spirits distributor licensee must pay to the
board ((for deposit into the liquor revolving fund,)) a license
issuance fee ((calculated as follows:
(i) In each of the first two years of licensure,)) of ten percent
of the total revenue from all the licensee's sales of spirits made
during the year for which the fee is due((, respectively; and
(ii) In the third year of licensure and each year thereafter, five
percent of the total revenue from all the licensee's sales of spirits
made during the year for which the fee is due, respectively)). Fifty
percent of the funds collected under this subsection (3)(a) must be
deposited in the liquor revolving fund, thirty percent must be
deposited into the chemical dependency treatment account created in
section 3 of this act, and twenty percent must be deposited into the
criminal justice treatment account under RCW 70.96A.350.
(b) The fee required under this subsection (3) is calculated only
on sales of items which the licensee was the first spirits distributor
in the state to have received:
(i) In the case of spirits manufactured in the state, from the
distiller; or
(ii) In the case of spirits manufactured outside the state, from an
authorized out-of-state supplier.
(c) By March 31, 2013, all persons holding spirits distributor
licenses on or before March 31, 2013, must have paid collectively one
hundred fifty million dollars or more in spirits distributor license
fees. If the collective payment through March 31, 2013, totals less
than one hundred fifty million dollars, the board must, according to
rules adopted by the board for the purpose, collect by May 31, 2013, as
additional spirits distributor license fees the difference between one
hundred fifty million dollars and the actual receipts, allocated among
persons holding spirits distributor licenses at any time on or before
March 31, 2013, ratably according to their spirits sales made during
calendar year 2012. Any amount by which such payments exceed one
hundred fifty million dollars by March 31, 2013, must be credited to
future license issuance fee obligations of spirits distributor
licensees according to rules adopted by the board.
(d) A retail licensee selling for resale must pay a distributor
license fee under the terms and conditions in this section on resales
of spirits the licensee has purchased on which no other distributor
license fee has been paid. The board must establish rules setting
forth the frequency and timing of such payments and reporting of sales
dollar volume by the licensee, with payments due quarterly in arrears.
(e) No spirits inventory may be subject to calculation of more than
a single spirits distributor license issuance fee.
(4) In addition to the payment set forth in subsection (3) of this
section, each spirits distributor licensee renewing its annual license
must pay an annual license renewal fee of one thousand three hundred
twenty dollars for each licensed location.
(5) There is no minimum facility size or capacity for spirits
distributor licenses, and no limit on the number of such licenses
issued to qualified applicants. License applicants must provide
physical security of the product that is substantially as effective as
the physical security of the distribution facilities currently operated
by the board with respect to preventing pilferage. License issuances
and renewals are subject to RCW 66.24.010 and the regulations
promulgated thereunder, including without limitation rights of cities,
towns, county legislative authorities, the public, churches, schools,
and public institutions to object to or prevent issuance of local
liquor licenses. However, existing distributor premises licensed to
sell beer and/or wine are deemed to be premises "now licensed" under
RCW 66.24.010(9)(a) for the purpose of processing applications for
spirits distributor licenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The chemical dependency treatment account is created in the state
treasury, subject to appropriation. Funds from license fees for
spirits retailers and spirits distributors must be deposited into the
account, as provided in RCW 66.24.055. Expenditures from the account
may only be used for programs and services provided for in this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
March 1, 2012.

--- END ---