BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.73.065 and 2007 c 329 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, taxes,
fees, charges, and tolls may not be imposed by a district without
approval of a majority of the voters in the district voting on a
proposition at a general or special election. The proposition must
include a specific description of the transportation improvement or
improvements proposed by the district and the proposed taxes, fees,
charges, and the range of tolls imposed by the district to raise
revenue to fund the improvement or improvements.
(2) Voter approval under this section ((shall)) must be accorded
substantial weight regarding the validity of a transportation
improvement as defined in RCW 36.73.015.
(3) A district may not increase any taxes, fees, charges, or range
of tolls imposed under this chapter once the taxes, fees, charges, or
tolls take effect, unless authorized by the district voters pursuant to
RCW 36.73.160.
(4)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the
district, but not including territory in which a fee is currently being
collected under RCW 82.80.140, may impose by a majority vote of the
governing board of the district the following fees and charges:
(i) Up to ((twenty)) forty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in
RCW 82.80.140; or
(ii) A fee or charge in accordance with RCW 36.73.120.
(b) The vehicle fee authorized in (a) of this subsection may only
be imposed for a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement if the
vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within the
jurisdiction of the district.
(c)(i) A district solely comprised of a city or cities ((shall))
may not impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this subsection
within one hundred eighty days after July 22, 2007, unless the county
in which the city or cities reside, by resolution, declares that it
will not impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this
subsection within the one hundred eighty-day period; or
(ii) A district solely comprised of a city or cities identified in
RCW 36.73.020(6)(b) ((shall)) may not impose the fees or charges until
after May 22, 2008, unless the county in which the city or cities
reside, by resolution, declares that it will not impose the fees or
charges identified in (a) of this subsection through May 22, 2008.
(5) If the interlocal agreement in RCW 82.80.140(2)(a) cannot be
reached, a district that includes only the unincorporated territory of
a county may impose by a majority vote of the governing body of the
district up to ((twenty)) forty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized
in RCW 82.80.140.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.73.040 and 2008 c 122 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A transportation benefit district is a quasi-municipal
corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing
district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution.
(2) A transportation benefit district constitutes a body corporate
and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes
as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically
conferred by statute, including, but not limited to, the authority to
hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to
acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property, and to sue
and be sued. Public works contract limits applicable to the
jurisdiction that established the district apply to the district.
(3) To carry out the purposes of this chapter, and subject to the
provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a district is authorized to impose the
following taxes, fees, charges, and tolls:
(a) A sales and use tax in accordance with RCW 82.14.0455;
(b) A vehicle fee in accordance with RCW 82.80.140;
(c) A fee or charge in accordance with RCW 36.73.120. However, if
a county or city within the district area is levying a fee or charge
for a transportation improvement, the fee or charge ((shall)) must be
credited against the amount of the fee or charge imposed by the
district. Developments consisting of less than twenty residences are
exempt from the fee or charge under RCW 36.73.120; ((and))
(d) A motor vehicle excise tax in accordance with section 3 of this
act; and
(e)(i) Vehicle tolls on state routes, city streets, or county
roads, within the boundaries of the district, unless otherwise
prohibited by law. However, consistent with RCW 47.56.820, the vehicle
toll must first be authorized by the legislature if the toll is imposed
on a state route.
(ii) The department of transportation ((shall)) must administer the
collection of vehicle tolls authorized on state routes, unless
otherwise specified in law or by contract, and the state transportation
commission, or its successor, may approve, set, and impose the tolls in
amounts sufficient to implement the district's transportation
improvement finance plan. The district ((shall)) must administer the
collection of vehicle tolls authorized on city streets or county roads,
and ((shall)) must set and impose the tolls in amounts sufficient to
implement the district's transportation improvement plan. However,
consistent with RCW 47.56.850, the vehicle toll, including any change
in an existing toll rate, must first be reviewed and approved by the
tolling authority designated in RCW 47.56.850 if the toll, or change in
toll rate, would have a significant impact, as determined by the
tolling authority, on the operation of any state facility.
(4) A district may only impose the vehicle fee under RCW 82.80.140
or the motor vehicle excise tax under section 3 of this act and may not
impose both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may impose a motor vehicle
excise tax of up to one percent annually on the value of every motor
vehicle owned by a resident of the district based on the valuation
schedules in section 8 of this act.
(2) The tax under this section may not be imposed on vehicles
licensed under RCW 46.17.355, except vehicles with an unladen weight of
six thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16A.425, 46.17.335, or
46.17.350(1)(c).
(3) The department of licensing must administer and collect the
tax. The department must deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed one percent of the taxes collected, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The
department must remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the
state treasurer. The state treasurer must distribute the proceeds to
the district on a monthly basis.
(4) No tax imposed under this section may be collected until six
months after approval under RCW 36.73.065.
(5) The tax under this section applies only when renewing a vehicle
registration, and is effective upon the registration renewal date as
provided by the department of licensing.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.80.010 and 2003 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy,
by approval of its legislative body and a majority of the registered
voters of the county voting on the proposition at a general or special
election, additional excise taxes equal to ((ten percent of the
statewide motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025)) one cent,
two cents, or three cents on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel as
defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special fuel as defined
in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the county. Vehicles
paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the
county fuel excise tax. An election held under this section must be
held not more than twelve months before the date on which the proposed
tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth the proposition
((shall)) must state the tax rate that is proposed. The county's
authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section includes
the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. The
additional excise taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights
of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed
tax ((shall)) may not be levied less than one month from the date the
election results are certified by the county election officer. The
commencement date for the levy of any tax under this section ((shall
be)) is the first day of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county ((shall)) must contract with the
department of revenue for the administration and collection of the
taxes. The contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to
exceed one percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be
deposited into the local tax administration account created in the
custody of the state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend
money from this account, upon appropriation, for the administration of
the local taxes imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer ((shall)) must distribute monthly to the
levying county and cities contained therein the proceeds of the
additional excise taxes collected under this section, after the
deductions for payments and expenditures as provided in RCW
46.68.090(1) (a) and (b) and under the conditions and limitations
provided in RCW 82.80.080.
(8) The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied under this
section ((shall)) must be used strictly for transportation purposes in
accordance with RCW 82.80.070.
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are
levying the tax in RCW 82.80.110 or if they are a member of a regional
transportation investment district levying the tax in RCW 82.80.120.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.80.140 and 2010 c 161 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose an annual
vehicle fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars per vehicle registered
in the district, for each vehicle subject to vehicle license fees under
RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (c), (d), (e), (g), (h), (j), or (n) through (q)
and for each vehicle subject to gross weight license fees under RCW
46.17.355 with a scale weight of six thousand pounds or less.
(2)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the
district, but not including territory in which a fee is currently being
collected under this section, may impose by a majority vote of the
governing board of the district up to ((twenty)) forty dollars of the
vehicle fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section.
(i) If the district is countywide, the revenues of the fee
((shall)) must be distributed to each city within the ((county))
district by interlocal agreement that must be effective prior to
imposition of the fee. The interlocal agreement is effective when
approved by the ((county)) district and sixty percent of the cities
representing seventy-five percent of the population of the cities
within the ((county)) district in which the countywide fee is
collected.
(ii) If the district is less than countywide, the revenues of the
fee must be distributed to each city within the district by interlocal
agreement that must be effective prior to imposition of the fee.
(b) A district may not impose a fee under this subsection (2):
(i) For a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement unless
the vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within
the jurisdiction of the district; or
(ii) That, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another
district within its boundaries under RCW 36.73.065(4)(a)(i), exceeds
((twenty)) forty dollars.
If a district imposes or increases a fee under this subsection (2)
that, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another district
within its boundaries, exceeds ((twenty)) forty dollars, the district
((shall)) must provide a credit for the previously imposed fees so that
the combined vehicle fee does not exceed ((twenty)) forty dollars.
(3) The department of licensing ((shall)) must administer and
collect the fee. The department ((shall)) must deduct a percentage
amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed one percent of the fees
collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The department shall remit remaining proceeds to the custody of the
state treasurer. The state treasurer shall distribute the proceeds to
the district on a monthly basis.
(4) No fee under this section may be collected until six months
after approval under RCW 36.73.065.
(5) The vehicle fee under this section applies only when renewing
a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration renewal
date as provided by the department of licensing.
(6) The following vehicles are exempt from the fee under this
section:
(a) Campers, as defined in RCW 46.04.085;
(b) Farm tractors or farm vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181;
(c) Mopeds, as defined in RCW 46.04.304;
(d) Off-road and nonhighway vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.365;
(e) Private use single-axle trailer, as defined in RCW 46.04.422;
(f) Snowmobiles, as defined in RCW 46.04.546; and
(g) Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the
international registration plan.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.73.015 and 2010 c 251 s 2 and 2010 c 105 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "City" means a city or town.
(2) "District" means a transportation benefit district created
under this chapter.
(3) "Supplemental transportation improvement" or "supplemental
improvement" means any project, work, or undertaking to provide public
transportation service, in addition to a district's existing or planned
voter-approved transportation improvements, proposed by a participating
city member of the district under RCW 36.73.180.
(4) "Transportation improvement" means a project contained in the
transportation plan of the state, a regional transportation planning
organization, city, county, or eligible jurisdiction as identified in
RCW 36.73.020(2). A project may include, but is not limited to,
investment in new or existing highways of statewide significance,
principal arterials of regional significance, high capacity
transportation, public transportation, and other transportation
projects and programs of local, regional, or statewide significance
including transportation demand management. Projects may also include
the operation, preservation, and maintenance of these facilities or
programs.

POLICIES AND PURPOSES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If politicians impose a vehicle tax based on
the value of the vehicle, vehicle owners have a right to a valuation
schedule based on the vehicle's purchase price and not the
manufacturer's suggested retail price.

THE RIGHT TO HAVE VEHICLE TAXES BASED ON PURCHASE
PRICE, NOT THE MANUFACTURER'S SUGGESTED RETAIL PRICE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A motor vehicle excise tax must be calculated in an honest
and accurate way. For the purpose of determining any motor vehicle
excise tax otherwise authorized by law, any taxing district imposing a
motor vehicle excise tax must set a vehicle's taxable value by using
the depreciation schedule set forth in this section. The taxable value
equals the product of a percentage based on a vehicle's year of
service, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and the latest
purchase price of the vehicle. The purchase price for the first year
of service must be determined by the bill of sale provided by buyer and
seller, subject to the exemptions, exceptions, and definitions provided
by this section, and must be affirmed by declaration by both parties.
(b) The legislature intends that this section is to ensure an
honest and accurate calculation of the tax. It is further the intent
of the legislature that this section, when combined with the appeal
process in RCW 82.44.065, will ensure that vehicle owners are taxed
fairly.
(2) For the purpose of determining the tax under this chapter, the
value of a truck-type power or trailing unit, or motor vehicle,
including a passenger vehicle, motorcycle, motor home, sport-utility
vehicle, or light-duty truck must be the latest purchase price of the
vehicle, excluding applicable federal excise taxes, state and local
sales or use taxes, transportation or shipping costs, or preparatory or
delivery costs, multiplied by the following percentage based on year of
service of the vehicle since its most recent sale. The year the
vehicle is offered for sale as a new vehicle must be considered the
first year of service.

YEAR OF SERVICE PERCENTAGE

1 100

2 75

3 55

4 40

5 25

6 10

7 and over 5

(3) The reissuance of title and registration for a truck-type power
or trailing unit or motor vehicle, including a passenger vehicle,
motorcycle, motor home, sport-utility vehicle, or light-duty truck
because of the installation of body or special equipment must be
treated as a sale, and the latest purchase price of the truck-type
power or trailing unit or motor vehicle, including a passenger vehicle,
motorcycle, motor home, sport-utility vehicle, or light-duty truck at
that time, as determined by the department from such information as may
be available, must be considered its base value.
(4) If the purchase price is unavailable or otherwise
unascertainable or the reissuance of title and registration is the
result of a gift or inheritance, the department shall determine a value
equivalent to the latest purchase price by using any information that
may be available, including any guidebook, report, or compendium of
recognized standing in the automotive industry or the selling price and
year of sale of the vehicle. The department may use an appraisal by
the county assessor. In valuing a vehicle for which the current value
or selling price is not indicative of the value of similar vehicles of
the same year and model, the department must establish a value that
more closely represents the average value of similar vehicles of the
same year and model.
(5) For purposes of this chapter, "value" excludes value
attributable to modifications of a motor vehicle and equipment that are
designed to facilitate the use or operation of the motor vehicle by a
person with a disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 82.44.035 (Valuation of vehicles) and
2010 c 161 s 910 & 2006 c 318 s 1 are each repealed.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.44.065 and 2010 c 161 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department determines a value for a vehicle ((equivalent
to a manufacturer's base suggested retail price)) under section 8 of
this act or the value of a truck or trailer under ((RCW 82.44.035))
section 8 of this act, any person who pays a locally imposed tax for
that vehicle may appeal the valuation to the department under chapter
34.05 RCW. If the taxpayer is successful on appeal, the department
((shall)) must refund the excess tax in the manner provided in RCW
82.44.120.
(2) The legislature intends for this section to ensure an honest
and accurate calculation of the tax.

--- END ---