BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Many cities have planned under the growth management act,
chapter 36.70A RCW, and designated and zoned lands for industrial and
manufacturing use;
(2) Industrial and manufacturing use provide family living wage
jobs;
(3) In the current economic climate the creation of additional
family living wage jobs is essential;
(4) It is critical that Washington state promote its continued
strength in the fields of aerospace, technology, biomedical, and other
industries that will provide family living wage job growth; and
(5) Planning for industrial and manufacturing use is inadequate to
attract new industry and manufacturing and an incentive should be
created to stimulate the development of new industrial and
manufacturing uses in the existing inventory of lands zoned for
industrial and manufacturing use in targeted urban areas through a tax
incentive as provided by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 It is the purpose of this chapter to
encourage new manufacturing and industrial uses on undeveloped or
underutilized lands zoned for industrial and manufacturing uses in
targeted urban areas, thereby increasing employment opportunities for
family living wage jobs. Cities that plan under the growth management
act meeting the criteria of this chapter where the governing authority
of the affected city has found there is insufficient family living wage
jobs for its wage-earning population may designate a portion of the
city's industrial and manufacturing zoned and undeveloped land to
receive ad valorem tax exemption for the value of new construction of
industrial/manufacturing facilities within the designated area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "City" means a city located in a county planning under the
growth management act with a population of either (a) at least fifty
thousand or (b) the largest city or town, if there is no city or town
with a population of at least fifty thousand.
(2) "Family living wage job" means a wage that is sufficient to
raise a family on. This is defined in this chapter as an average wage
of eighteen dollars per hour or greater working two thousand eight
hours per year on the subject site, as adjusted annually for consumer
price index (CPI). This number may be increased by the local authority
based on regional factors and wage conditions.
(3) "Industrial/manufacturing facilities" means building
improvements ten thousand square feet or larger, representing a minimum
of eight hundred thousand dollars of improvement valuation for use by
division D: Manufacturing uses as defined by the United States
department of labor occupation safety and health administration
standard industrial classification manual.
(4) "Lands zoned for industrial and manufacturing uses" means lands
in a city zoned as of January 1, 2012, for an industrial or
manufacturing use consistent with the city's comprehensive plan where
such lands are designated for industry.
(5) "Undeveloped or underutilized" means that there are no existing
building improvements on the property or portions of the property
targeted for new or expanded industrial or manufacturing uses.
(6) "Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of
a city having jurisdiction over the property for which an exemption may
be applied for under this chapter.
(7) "Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.
(8) "Owner" means the property owner of record.
(9) "Targeted area" means an area of undeveloped lands zoned for
industrial and manufacturing uses in the city and designated for
possible exemption under the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The value of new construction of
industrial/manufacturing facilities qualifying under this chapter is
exempt from ad valorem property taxation, as follows:
(a) For properties for which applications for certificates of tax
exemption eligibility are submitted under this chapter before December
31, 2020, the value is exempt for ten successive years beginning
January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of
issuance of the certificate; and
(b) The exemptions provided in (a) of this subsection do not
include the value of land or nonindustrial/manufacturing-related
improvements not qualifying under this chapter.
(2) The incentive provided by this chapter is in addition to any
other incentives, tax credits, grants, or other incentives provided by
law.
(3) This chapter does not apply to increases in assessed valuation
made by the assessor on nonqualifying portions of buildings and value
of land nor to increases made by lawful order of a county board of
equalization, the department of revenue, or a county, to a class of
property throughout the county or specific area of the county to
achieve the uniformity of assessment or appraisal required by law.
(4) At the conclusion of the exemption period, the new
industrial/manufacturing facilities cost is considered as new
construction for the purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 An owner of property making application
under this chapter must meet the following requirements:
(1) The new construction of industrial/manufacturing facilities
must be located on land zoned for industrial and manufacturing uses,
undeveloped or underutilized, and targeted by the city.
(2) The new construction of industrial/manufacturing facilities
must meet all construction and development regulations of the city.
(3) The new construction of industrial/manufacturing facilities
must be completed within three years from the date of approval of the
application.
(4) The applicant must enter into a contract with the city approved
by the governing authority, or an administrative official or commission
authorized by the governing authority, under which the applicant has
agreed to the implementation of the development on terms and conditions
satisfactory to the governing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The following criteria must be met
before an area may be designated as a targeted area:
(a) The area must be lands zoned for industrial and manufacturing
uses; and
(b) The targeting of the area, as determined by the governing
authority, will assist in the new construction of
industrial/manufacturing facilities that will provide employment for
family living wage jobs.
(2) For the purpose of designating a targeted area or areas, the
governing authority may adopt a resolution of intention to so designate
an area as generally described in the resolution. The resolution must
state the time and place of a hearing to be held by the governing
authority to consider the designation of the area and may include such
other information pertaining to the designation of the area as the
governing authority determines to be appropriate to apprise the public
of the action intended.
(3) The governing authority must give notice of a hearing held
under this chapter by publication of the notice once each week for two
consecutive weeks, not less than seven days, nor more than thirty days
before the date of the hearing in a paper having a general circulation
in the city where the proposed targeted area is located. The notice
must state the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing and
generally identify the area proposed to be designated as a targeted
area.
(4) Following the hearing, or a continuance of the hearing, and
subject to the limit on the targeted area, the governing authority may
designate all or a portion of the area described in the resolution of
intent as a targeted area if it finds, in its sole discretion, that the
criteria in subsection (1) of this section have been met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 An owner of property seeking tax incentives
under this chapter must complete the following procedures:
(1) The owner must apply to the city on forms adopted by the
governing authority. The application must contain the following:
(a) Information setting forth the grounds supporting the requested
exemption including information indicated on the application form or in
the guidelines;
(b) A description of the project and site plan, and other
information requested;
(c) A statement of the expected number of new family living wage
jobs to be created; and
(d) A statement that the applicant is aware of the potential tax
liability involved when the property ceases to be eligible for the
incentive provided under this chapter;
(2) The applicant must verify the application by oath or
affirmation; and
(3) The application must be accompanied by the application fee, if
any, required under this chapter. The governing authority may permit
the applicant to revise an application before final action by the
governing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The duly authorized administrative official
or committee of the city may approve the application if it finds that:
(1) A minimum of twenty-five new family living wage jobs will be
created on the subject site as a result of new construction of
industrial/manufacturing facilities within one year of building
occupancy;
(2) The proposed project is or will be, at the time of completion,
in conformance with all local plans and regulations that apply at the
time the application is approved;
(3) The criteria of this chapter have been satisfied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The governing authority or an
administrative official or commission authorized by the governing
authority must approve or deny an application filed under this chapter
within ninety days after receipt of the application.
(2) If the application is approved, the city must issue the owner
of the property a conditional certificate of acceptance of tax
exemption. The certificate must contain a statement by a duly
authorized administrative official of the governing authority that the
property has complied with the required criteria of this chapter.
(3) If the application is denied by the authorized administrative
official or commission authorized by the governing authority, the
deciding administrative official or commission must state in writing
the reasons for denial and send the notice to the applicant at the
applicant's last known address within ten days of the denial.
(4) Upon denial by a duly authorized administrative official or
commission, an applicant may appeal the denial to the governing
authority within thirty days after receipt of the denial. The appeal
before the governing authority will be based upon the record made
before the administrative official with the burden of proof on the
applicant to show that there was no substantial evidence to support the
administrative official's decision. The decision of the governing body
in denying or approving the application is final.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The governing authority may establish an
application fee. This fee may not exceed an amount determined to be
required to cover the cost to be incurred by the governing authority
and the assessor in administering this chapter. The application fee
must be paid at the time the application for limited exemption is
filed. If the application is approved, the governing authority must
pay the application fee to the county assessor for deposit in the
county current expense fund, after first deducting that portion of the
fee attributable to its own administrative costs in processing the
application. If the application is denied, the governing authority may
retain that portion of the application fee attributable to its own
administrative costs and refund the balance to the applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Upon completion of the new construction
of industrial/manufacturing facilities for which an application for a
limited tax exemption under this chapter has been approved and after
issuance of the certificate of occupancy, the owner must file with the
city the following:
(a) A description of the work that has been completed and a
statement that the new construction on the owner's property qualifies
the property for limited exemption under this chapter;
(b) A statement of the new family living wage jobs to be offered as
a result of the new construction of industrial/manufacturing
facilities; and
(c) A statement that the work has been completed within three years
of the issuance of the conditional certificate of tax exemption.
(2) Within thirty days after receipt of the statements required
under subsection (1) of this section, the authorized representative of
the city must determine whether the work completed and the jobs to be
offered are consistent with the application and the contract approved
by the city and is qualified for a limited tax exemption under this
chapter.
(3) If the criteria of this chapter have been satisfied and the
owner's property is qualified for a limited tax exemption under this
chapter, the city must file the certificate of tax exemption with the
county assessor within ten days of the expiration of the thirty-day
period provided under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The authorized representative of the city must notify the
applicant that a certificate of tax exemption is not going to be filed
if the authorized representative determines that:
(a) The work was not completed within three years of the
application date;
(b) The work was not constructed consistent with the application or
other applicable requirements;
(c) The jobs offered are not consistent with the application and
criteria of this chapter;
(d) The owner's property is otherwise not qualified for limited
exemption under this chapter.
(5) If the authorized representative of the city finds that the
work was not completed within the required time period due to
circumstances beyond the control of the owner and that the owner has
been acting and could reasonably be expected to act in good faith and
with due diligence, the governing authority or the city official
authorized by the governing authority may extend the deadline for
completion of the work for a period not to exceed twenty-four
consecutive months.
(6) The governing authority may provide by ordinance for an appeal
of a decision by the deciding officer or authority that an owner is not
entitled to a certificate of tax exemption to the governing authority,
a hearing examiner, or other city officer authorized by the governing
authority to hear the appeal in accordance with such reasonable
procedures and time periods as provided by ordinance of the governing
authority. The owner may appeal a decision by the deciding officer or
authority that is not subject to local appeal or a decision by the
local appeal authority that the owner is not entitled to a certificate
of tax exemption in superior court under RCW 34.05.510 through
34.05.598, if the appeal is filed within thirty days of notification by
the city to the owner of the decision being challenged.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Thirty days after the anniversary of
the date of the certificate of tax exemption and each year for the tax
exemption period, the owner of the new industrial/manufacturing
facilities must file with a designated authorized representative of the
city an annual report indicating the following:
(a) A statement of the family living wage jobs at the facility as
of the anniversary date;
(b) A certification by the owner that the property has not changed
use;
(c) A description of changes or improvements constructed after
issuance of the certificate of tax exemption; and
(d) Any additional information requested by the city.
(2) All cities, which issue certificates of tax exemption under the
requirements of this chapter, must report annually by December 31st of
each year, beginning in 2013 to the department of commerce. The report
must include the following information:
(a) The number of tax exemption certificates granted;
(b) The total number and type of new industrial/manufacturing
facilities constructed;
(c) The number of family living wage jobs resulting from the new
industrial/manufacturing facilities; and
(d) The value of the tax exemption for each project receiving a tax
exemption and the total value of tax exemptions granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) If improvements have been exempted
under this chapter, the improvements continue to be exempted for the
applicable period under this chapter so long as they are not converted
to another use and continue to satisfy all applicable conditions
including but not limited to zoning, land use, building, and family
living wage job creation. If the owner intends to discontinue
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, the owner must notify
the assessor within sixty days of the change in use or intended
discontinuance. If, after a certificate of tax exemption has been
filed with the county assessor, the authorized representative of the
governing authority discovers that a portion of the property is changed
or will be changed to disqualify the owner for exemption under this
chapter, the tax exemption must be canceled and the following must
occur:
(a) Additional real property tax must be imposed upon the value of
the nonqualifying improvements in the amount that would normally be
imposed, plus a penalty must be imposed amounting to twenty percent.
This additional tax is calculated based upon the difference between the
property tax paid and the property tax that would have been paid if it
had included the value of the nonqualifying improvements dated back to
the date that the improvements were converted to a nonqualifying use;
(b) The tax must include interest upon the amounts of the
additional tax at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent
property taxes from the dates on which the additional tax could have
been paid without penalty if the improvements had been assessed at a
value without regard to this chapter; and
(c) The additional tax owed together with interest and penalty must
become a lien on the land and attach at the time the property or
portion of the property is removed from the qualifying use or the
amenities no longer meet applicable requirements, and has priority to
and must be fully paid and satisfied before a recognizance, mortgage,
judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land
may become charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property
taxes. An additional tax unpaid on its due date is delinquent. From
the date of delinquency until paid, interest must be charged at the
same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(2) Upon a determination that a tax exemption is to be canceled for
a reason stated in this section, the governing authority or authorized
representative must notify the record owner of the property as shown by
the tax rolls by mail, return receipt requested, of the determination
to cancel the exemption. The owner may appeal the determination to the
governing authority or authorized representative, within thirty days by
filing a notice of appeal with the clerk of the governing authority,
which notice must specify the factual and legal basis on which the
determination of cancellation is alleged to be erroneous. The
governing authority or a hearing examiner or other official authorized
by the governing authority may hear the appeal. At the hearing, all
affected parties may be heard and all competent evidence received.
After the hearing, the deciding body or officer must either affirm,
modify, or repeal the decision of cancellation of exemption based on
the evidence received. An aggrieved party may appeal the decision of
the deciding body or officer to the superior court under RCW 34.05.510
through 34.05.598.
(3) Upon determination by the governing authority or authorized
representative to terminate an exemption, the county officials having
possession of the assessment and tax rolls must correct the rolls in
the manner provided for omitted property under RCW 84.40.080. The
county assessor must make such a valuation of the property and
improvements as is necessary to permit the correction of the rolls.
The value of the new industrial/manufacturing facilities added to the
rolls are considered as new construction for the purposes of chapter
84.55 RCW. The owner may appeal the valuation to the county board of
equalization under chapter 84.48 RCW and according to the provisions of
RCW 84.40.038. If there has been a failure to comply with this
chapter, the property must be listed as an omitted assessment for
assessment years beginning January 1st of the calendar year in which
the noncompliance first occurred, but the listing as an omitted
assessment may not be for a period more than three calendar years
preceding the year in which the failure to comply was discovered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 84 RCW.

--- END ---