BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2011 c 320 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A discover pass is required for any motor vehicle to park or
operate on any recreation site or lands, except for short-term parking
as may be authorized under RCW 79A.80.070.
(2) The cost of the discover pass is thirty dollars ((per motor
vehicle)). Every four years the office of financial management must
review the cost of the discover pass and, if necessary, recommend to
the legislature an adjustment to the cost of the discover pass to
account for inflation.
(3) The discover pass is valid for one year from the date of
issuance.
(4) The discover pass must be made available for purchase
throughout the year through the department of fish and wildlife's
automated licensing system consistent with RCW 77.32.050.
(5) The discover pass must be made available for purchase through
the department of licensing as provided in RCW 46.16A.090. The
department of licensing, county auditor, or other agent or subagent
appointed by the director, is not responsible for delivering a
purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner. The agencies must
deliver the purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner.
(6)(a) The state parks and recreation commission may make the
discover pass available for purchase through its reservation system and
other outlets authorized by law to sell licenses, permits, or passes.
(b) If the discover pass is made available for sale at a state
park, the park manager may, at the park manager's discretion, impose a
surcharge of five dollars in addition to the fee specified in
subsection (2) of this section on all discover passes sold at that
park. The state parks and recreation commission shall maintain a
record of surcharge proceeds collected by a park.
(7) The discover pass must contain space for ((the)) two motor
vehicle license plate numbers. A discover pass is valid only for those
vehicle license plate numbers written on the pass.
(8) A complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer
who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned
volunteer projects in a year. The agency must provide vouchers to
volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided
for each project. The vouchers may be brought to an agency to be
redeemed for a discover pass.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.80.040 and 2011 c 320 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The vehicle access pass is created solely for access to the
department of fish and wildlife recreation sites or lands. The vehicle
access pass is only available to a person who purchases a current
valid: Big game hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.450; small game
hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.460; western Washington pheasant
permit issued under RCW 77.32.575; trapping license issued under RCW
77.65.450; watchable wildlife decal issued under RCW 77.32.560; or
combination, saltwater, or freshwater personal use fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470.
(2) One vehicle access pass must be issued per purchase pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The vehicle access pass is valid for the license year of the
license it is purchased with.
(4) The vehicle access pass must contain space for two motor
vehicle license plate numbers. A vehicle access pass is only valid for
those vehicle license plate numbers written on the pass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A state agency may not refund money for
a discover pass or vehicle access pass issued prior to the effective
date of this section.
(2) Each discover pass or vehicle access pass issued prior to the
effective date of this section is valid for two license plate numbers
written on the pass.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the terms "discover pass" and
"vehicle access pass" have the same meanings as provided under RCW
79A.80.010.

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.80.090 and 2011 c 320 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The recreation access pass account is created in the state
treasury. Except for moneys received under RCW 79A.80.020(6)(b), all
moneys received from the sale of discover passes and day-use permits
must be deposited into the account.
(2) Each fiscal biennium, the first seventy-one million dollars in
revenue must be distributed to the agencies in the following manner:
(a) Eight percent to the department of fish and wildlife and
deposited into the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170;
(b) Eight percent to the department of natural resources and
deposited into the park land trust revolving fund created in RCW
43.30.385; and
(c) Eighty-four percent to the state parks and recreation
commission and deposited into the state parks renewal and stewardship
account created in RCW 79A.05.215.
(3) Each fiscal biennium, revenues in excess of seventy-one million
dollars must be distributed equally among the agencies to the accounts
identified in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) All moneys received under RCW 79A.80.020(6)(b) must be
deposited in the state parks renewal and stewardship account created in
RCW 79A.05.215.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.05.215 and 2011 c 320 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all
receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, donations collected under
RCW 46.16A.090(3), and other state park-based activities shall be
deposited into the account. The proceeds from the recreation access
pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090 must be used for the purpose of
operating and maintaining state parks. Any proceeds received under RCW
79A.80.020(6)(b) must be used for the purpose of operating and
maintaining the state park from which the proceeds were collected.
Expenditures from the account may be used for operating state parks,
developing and renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred
maintenance, enhancing park stewardship, and other state park purposes.
Expenditures from the account may be made only after appropriation by
the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---