BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
An employee who is occupying a position that is reallocated to a
class with a lower salary range, or is appointed to a position due to
a layoff action, shall have his or her base salary determined according
to the employer's salary determination policy for the class and range
of the employee's new position without regard to the employee's base
salary in his or her previous position.

--- END ---