BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that allergies are
a serious medical disorder that affect more than one in five persons in
the United States and are the sixth leading cause of chronic disease.
Anaphylaxis is the most severe form of allergic reaction. Rapid and
appropriate administration of the drug epinephrine to a patient
suffering an anaphylaxis allergic reaction may make the difference
between the life and death of that patient.
(2) The legislature further finds that, on many days, as much as
twenty percent of the nation's combined adult and child population can
be found in a school, and schools need to be prepared to treat allergic
reactions in the event a student's personal epinephrine auto-injector
is not available or the student is having a reaction for the first
time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A school may maintain at a school in a locked, secure location
a supply of epinephrine auto-injectors based on the number of students
enrolled in the school.
(2) A physician may prescribe epinephrine auto-injectors in the
name of the school district or school to be maintained for use when
necessary.
(3) When a student does not have an epinephrine auto-injector or a
prescription for an epinephrine auto-injector on file, the school nurse
may utilize the school district or school supply of epinephrine
auto-injectors to respond to anaphylactic reaction, under a standing
protocol from a physician employed under RCW 28A.210.300 or any other
physician with which the district has contracted for medical services.
(4)(a) If a student is injured or harmed due to the administration
of epinephrine that a physician has prescribed to a school under this
section, the physician may not be held responsible for the injury
unless he or she issued the prescription with a conscious disregard for
safety.
(b) If a student is injured or harmed due to the administration of
epinephrine that a school employee has administered to a student, the
school employee may not be held responsible for the injury unless he or
she administered the epinephrine injection with a conscious disregard
for safety.
(c) A school, school district, or the office of the superintendent
of public instruction is not responsible for any injury that has
occurred under (a) or (b) of this subsection.

--- END ---