BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.048 and 2009 c 533 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The governing board of a public facilities district under
chapter 36.100 or 35.57 RCW may submit an authorizing proposition to
the voters of the district, and if the proposition is approved by a
majority of persons voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter.
(b) The legislative authority of any city entering into an
interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW to form a public
facilities district under chapter 35.57 RCW that qualifies as a
distressed public facilities district may submit an authorizing
proposition to the voters of the city and, if the proposition is
approved by a majority of the persons voting, impose a sales and use
tax in accordance with the requirements of this section. To impose the
tax authorized under this subsection (1)(b), the legislative body of
the city must submit the authorizing proposition to the voters by July
1, 2013. The tax authorized under this subsection (1)(b) expires on
December 31st of the year in which all outstanding indebtedness of the
distressed public facilities district has been paid or legally
defeased.
(2) The ((tax)) taxes authorized in this section ((shall be)) are
in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
public facilities district. The rate of tax shall not exceed two-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax,
or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax. A public
facilities district formed under RCW 35.57.010(1)(e) may not impose the
tax authorized under this subsection at a rate that exceeds two-tenths
of one percent minus the rate of the highest tax authorized by this
subsection that is imposed by any other public facilities district
within its boundaries. If a public facilities district formed under
RCW 35.57.010(1)(e) has imposed a tax under this subsection and issued
or incurred obligations pledging that tax, so long as those obligations
are outstanding no other public facilities district within its
boundaries may thereafter impose a tax under this subsection at a rate
that would reduce the rate of the tax that was pledged to the repayment
of those obligations. A public facilities district that imposes a tax
under this subsection is responsible f60; (4) The term local governments for purposes of this chapter
includes but is not limited to all counties, cities, and other
political subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal
corporations, however denominated.
(((4))) (5) The state auditor shall establish a schedule to govern
the auditing of local governments which shall include: A designation
of the various classifications of local governments; a designation of
the frequency for auditing each type of local government; and a
description of events which cause a more frequent audit to be
conducted.
(((5))) (6) On every such examination, inquiry shall be made as to
the financial condition and resources of the local government; whether
the Constitution and laws of the state, the ordinances and orders of
the local government, and the requirements of the state auditor have
been properly complied with; and into the methods and accuracy of the
accounts and reports.
(((6))) (7) A report of such examination shall be made and filed in
the office of state auditor, and one copy shall be transmitted to the
local government. A copy of any report containing findings of
noncompliance with state law shall be transmitted to the attorney
general. If any such report discloses malfeasance, misfeasance, or
nonfeasance in office on the part of any public officer or employee,
within thirty days from the receipt of his or her copy of the report,
the attorney general shall institute, in the proper county, such legal
action as is proper in the premises by civil process and prosecute the
same to final determination to carry into effect the findings of the
examination.
(((7))) (8) It shall be unlawful for any local government or the
responsible head thereof, to make a settlement or compromise of any
claim arising out of such malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance, or
any action commenced therefor, or for any court to enter upon any
compromise or settlement of such action, without the written approval
and consent of the attorney general and the state auditor.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.17.390 and 2009 c 564 s 931 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Starting in 2012, and at least once every three years
thereafter, each agency shall apply to the Washington state quality
award((, or similar organization,)) for an independent assessment of
its quality management, accountability, and performance system. The
assessment shall evaluate the effectiveness of all elements of its
management, accountability, and performance system, including:
Leadership, strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and
information, employee performance management, and process improvement.
The purpose of the assessment is to recognize best practice and
identify improvement opportunities.
(2) Each agency shall provide the governor's office with an
electronic copy of its independent assessment application and any
feedback provided by the independent assessor.
(3) Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, state agencies must
provide electronic copies of Washington state quality award
assessments, feedback reports, and corrective action plans to the
government management accountability and performance program, the joint
legislative audit and review committee, and the state auditor. Each of
these entities must post the assessments, feedback reports, and
corrective action plans on its web site.
(4) Agencies must track employees trained in performance management
and report to the government management accountability and performance
program.
(5) The government management accountability and performance
program must coordinate with the Washington state quality award to
develop an implementation plan with dates for all state agencies to
accomplish a full assessment by 2013 and every three years thereafter
until a score of sixty percent is obtained.
(6) The office of financial management must use the Washington
state quality award assessments as a measure for the priorities of
government program.
(7) A performance audit of the priorities of government program
must be completed by January 2013. The state auditor must review each
state agency's performance management system, Washington state quality
award assessment, annual self-assessments, and corrective action plans
for all performance audits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The house of representatives must complete a Washington state
quality award assessment by June 30, 2013, and every two years
thereafter until a score of sixty percent is obtained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2013, from the general fund to the Washington quality
award council for Washington state quality awards, or other quality
management training, as provided in section 2(4) of this act.
(2) The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2014,
from the general fund to the Washington quality award council for
Washington state quality awards, or other quality management training,
as provided in section 2(4) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2013, from the general fund to the state auditor
for a performance audit of the priorities of government program as
provided in section 2(7) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The auditor shall establish an annual assessment and performance
grading program. The program shall consist of conducting annual
performance assessments and grading state agency performance. Areas to
be assessed shall include quality management, productivity, fiscal
efficiency, program effectiveness, contract management and oversight,
internal audit, internal and external customer satisfaction, statutory
and regulatory compliance, and technology systems and online services.
As part of this program, the auditor shall:
(1) Consult with and seek input from elected officials, state
employees including front-line employees, and professionals with a
background in performance management for establishing the grading
standards. In developing the criteria, the auditor shall consider
already developed best practices and audit criteria used by government
or nongovernment organizations. Before the assessment, the agencies
must be given the criteria for the assessment and the standards for
grading;
(2) Contract or partner with public or private entities that have
expertise in either public sector reviews or technical expertise, or
both, in individual assessment areas to perform the assessments and
grading of all state agencies. The auditor may contract or partner
with more than one entity for different assessment areas; and
(3) Submit the results of the assessment and grading program to the
governor, the office of financial management, appropriate legislative
committees, and the public by December 15th of each year. The results
of the annual assessments and performance grading must be posted on the
internet.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.08.020 and 2011 c 171 s 120 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state
of:
(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically
excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services,
if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail
sale;
(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included
within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and
(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW
82.04.050 definition of retail sale.
(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this
state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The
revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365, nonhighway vehicles as
defined in RCW 46.09.310, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470
and the performance assessments and scorecard program in section 6 of
this act. The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited
in the performance audits of government account created in RCW
43.09.475.
(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to successive retail
sales of the same property.
(7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.12.0201 and 2006 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes collected
under RCW 82.12.020 based on the rate in RCW 82.08.020(1) shall be
dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits under RCW
43.09.470 and the performance assessments and scorecard program under
section 6 of this act. Revenue identified in this section shall be
deposited in the performance audits of government account created in
RCW 43.09.475.

--- END ---