BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the 2014 fiscal year or any subsequent fiscal year, the
legislature may not present to the governor for consideration, nor may
the governor sign into law, an appropriations bill that would
appropriate from the general fund for that fiscal year a total amount
that, when combined with all appropriations from the general fund for
that fiscal year made as of the date of the appropriation bill's
passage and the amount of any general fund moneys to be transferred to
the budget stabilization account, exceeds the prior fund balance and
any general fund revenues for that fiscal year as estimated by the
economic and revenue forecast council or successor entity as of the
date of the budget bill's passage.
(2) For the 2014 fiscal year or any subsequent fiscal year, the
legislature may not present to the governor for consideration, nor may
the governor sign into law, an appropriations bill that would require
for any of the subsequent five fiscal years general fund appropriations
necessary to maintain estimated program and service levels funded in
that appropriations bill, of a total amount that, when combined with
all projected appropriations from the general fund for that fiscal year
and the amount of any general fund moneys projected to be transferred
to the budget stabilization account, exceeds prior fund balances and
general fund revenues for that fiscal year as estimated by the economic
and revenue forecast council or successor entity as of the date of the
budget bill's passage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---