BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The Washington state arts commission shall conduct an
inventory of all works of art purchased and commissioned or under the
care of:
(i) The visual arts program that have become a part of the state
art collection under RCW 43.46.090, 43.17.200, 43.19.455, 28B.10.025,
or 28A.335.210; and
(ii) The department of enterprise services.
(b) The Washington state arts commission must complete the
inventory by October 1, 2012, and every two years thereafter.
(2)(a) The Washington state arts commission shall, in communication
with others, including, but not limited to, the directors of state
agencies, the superintendent of public instruction and the school
district boards of directors, the boards of regents of the University
of Washington and Washington State University, and with the boards of
trustees of the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and
the community college districts, determine appropriate works of art to
be made available for public auction.
(b) The Washington state arts commission must create a list of art
work with an estimated value of at least five million dollars to be
offered for sale at a public auction.
The Washington state arts commission may contract with an appraiser
to determine the value of the art work included on the list. The
appraisal, at a minimum, must be an estimate of the market value of the
piece of art work.
(c) The Washington state arts commission must incorporate on their
agency's web site a listing of all the works of art with their
appraised value. The art works' listing on the web site must be made
available to the public at least thirty days in advance of the public
auction. Notice of the public auction must be made at least thirty
days in advance of the event.
(d) Sales by public auction under this section shall be conducted
under the direction of the Washington state arts commission or by an
authorized representative selected by the commission.
(e) The works of art shall be sold to the highest bidder at public
auction. A minimum bid must be set for each item, if the bids are not
sufficient or appropriate, the art item may be withdrawn from the
auction.
(i) On or before the time specified in the auction notice, the
Washington state arts commission or authorized representative must
determine a preapproval process for prospective bidders that may
include a deposit in cash or by credit card, or certified check,
cashier's check, or money order made payable to the Washington state
arts commission.
(ii) If a deposit is required, the successful bidder's deposit must
be retained by the Washington state arts commission and the difference,
if any, between the deposit and the total amount due must on the day of
the sale be paid in cash, certified check, cashier's check, bank draft,
or money order, made payable to the commission. Other deposits, if
any, shall be returned to the respective bidders at the conclusion of
the sale.
(f) The Washington state arts commission must conduct an auction by
June 2013 and every two years thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington art work sales account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All moneys received from the sale of art work
under section 1 of this act must be deposited in the account.
(2) Moneys in the account may be used for the costs and expenses
necessarily incurred in the managing and administering of the public
auctions under section 1 of this act.
(3) Only the executive director of the Washington state arts
commission or their designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(4) Each fiscal year, after expenses have been deducted for:
(a) The managing and administering of the public auctions; and
(b) Any financial obligations to the artists, according to the
artist's contract;
the remaining revenue must be distributed as follows:
(i) Forty percent shall be retained in the account by the
Washington state arts commission to be used for the visual arts program
including, but not limited to, conservation of the state art
collection, art education, and encouraging aspiring professional
artists; and
(ii) Sixty percent shall be transferred to the Washington
opportunity pathways account under RCW 28B.76.526 to fund state need
grants for higher education students.

--- END ---