BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.480 and 1984 c 220 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following property ((shall be)) is exempt from taxation:
The real and personal property of a nonprofit fair association that
sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which receive support from
revenues collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and allocated by the
director of the department of agriculture. To be exempt under this
section, the property must be used exclusively for fair purposes,
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and in RCW
84.36.805. However, the loan or rental of property otherwise exempt
under this section to a private concessionaire or to any person for use
as a concession in conjunction with activities permitted under this
section ((shall)) do not nullify the exemption if the concession
charges are subject to agreement and the rental income, if any, is
reasonable and is devoted solely to the operation and maintenance of
the property.
(2) The exemption in subsection (1) of this section is not
nullified if property of a nonprofit fair association, which received
support from the fair fund created in RCW 15.76.115 that was allocated
by the director of the department of agriculture by the effective date
of this section, is used by entities not eligible for a property tax
exemption under this chapter for periods of not more than fifty days in
the calendar year.
(3) If the use described in subsection (2) of this section exceeds
fifty days in a calendar year and the use only occurs in a portion of
the property, then that portion of the property can be segregated and
made taxable without nullifying the exemption in subsection (1) of this
section for the remaining property of the qualified nonprofit fair
association.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.805 and 2006 c 319 s 1 and 2006 c 226 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In order to qualify for an exemption under this chapter, the
nonprofit organizations, associations, or corporations must satisfy the
conditions in this section.
(2) The property must be used exclusively for the actual operation
of the activity for which exemption is granted, unless otherwise
provided, and does not exceed an amount reasonably necessary for that
purpose, except:
(a) The loan or rental of the property does not subject the
property to tax if:
(i) The rents and donations received for the use of the portion of
the property are reasonable and do not exceed the maintenance and
operation expenses attributable to the portion of the property loaned
or rented; and
(ii) Except for the exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4), 84.36.037,
84.36.050, and 84.36.060(1) (a) and (b), and except as otherwise
provided in RCW 84.36.480 (2) and (3), the property would be exempt
from tax if owned by the organization to which it is loaned or rented;
(b) The use of the property for fund-raising activities does not
subject the property to tax if the fund-raising activities are
consistent with the purposes for which the exemption is granted.
(3) The facilities and services must be available to all regardless
of race, color, national origin or ancestry.
(4) The organization, association, or corporation must be duly
licensed or certified where such licensing or certification is required
by law or regulation.
(5) Property sold to organizations, associations, or corporations
with an option to be repurchased by the seller ((shall)) does not
qualify for exempt status. This subsection does not apply to property
sold to a nonprofit entity, as defined in RCW 84.36.560(7), by:
(a) A nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from
income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code;
(b) A governmental entity established under RCW 35.21.660,
35.21.670, or 35.21.730;
(c) A housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030;
(d) A housing authority meeting the definition in RCW
35.82.210(2)(a); or
(e) A housing authority established under RCW 35.82.300.
(6) The department ((shall)) must have access to its books in order
to determine whether the nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation is exempt from taxes under this chapter.
(7) This section does not apply to exemptions granted under RCW
84.36.020, 84.36.032, 84.36.250, and 84.36.260.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2013 and 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires January 1, 2015.

--- END ---