BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.031 and 2006 c 305 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section,
property leased, loaned, sold with the option to repurchase, or
otherwise made available to organizations described in RCW 84.36.030
((above shall)) is not ((be)) exempt from taxation. ((However,))
(2) Property ((that)) remains eligible for the exemption under RCW
84.36.030, if:
(a) The property is owned by an organization exempt under RCW
84.36.020 or 84.36.030 ((may)) that loans, leases, or rents the
property to another organization for the ((same)) exempt purposes ((as
set out)) provided in RCW 84.36.030; or
(b) The property is owned by an entity formed exclusively for the
purpose of leasing the property to an organization that will use the
property for the exempt purpose provided in RCW 84.36.030, if:
(i) The lessee uses the property for the exempt purposes provided
in RCW 84.36.030;
(ii) The immediate previous owner of the property had received an
exemption under RCW 84.36.020 or 84.36.030 for the property; and
(iii) The benefit of the exemption inures to the benefit of the
lessee organization.

--- END ---