BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Any child protective services worker who is directly engaged in:
(1) Investigation of reports of alleged child abuse or neglect,
(2) Assessment of risk of abuse or neglect to children, or
(3) Provision of and/or referral to services, including law
enforcement, to remedy conditions that endanger the health, safety, and
welfare of children,
must be licensed in good standing in a social work classification under
chapter 18.225 RCW, and bonded.

--- END ---