BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of the chief information officer, in consultation with
the department of enterprise services, shall develop a state policy on
the purchasing and use of cellular telephone communications devices and
services, to be applicable to all agencies of state government except
institutions of higher education. The department shall develop master
contracts for cellular communications that include the best available
cost-savings plans and improve statewide contractor reporting to lower
costs. To improve purchasing efficiencies, the state policy and master
contracts may authorize state agencies to purchase prepaid cellular
communications services.
The state policy and master contracts shall seek to reduce the
unnecessary use of cellular communications and minimize the costs
associated with such communications. The state policy shall establish
appropriate reduction goals and implement performance measurements.

Sec. 2 RCW 40.07.040 and 2005 c 274 s 276 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((governor or the governor's designee)) department of
enterprise services shall take such ((other)) action as may be
necessary to maximize the economy, efficiency, and effectiveness of
state publications and state mailings and to do so may eliminate,
consolidate, or simplify state agency publications and mailings.
(2) The department of enterprise services, in consultation with the
office of the chief information officer, shall develop a state policy
on the purchasing and use of state agency mailings, to be applicable to
all agencies of state government except institutions of higher
education. The state policy shall seek to reduce the unnecessary use
of state mailings, minimize the costs associated with such
communications, and replace state mailings with electronic
communications where possible and effective. The state policy shall
establish appropriate reduction goals and implement performance
measurements. In addition, the department shall periodically review
state statutes that mandate agency mailings and recommend reductions
where appropriate.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed in any way as
restricting public access to public records or the public right to copy
such records as provided by chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.19.742 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 312 are each
amended to read as follows:
To improve the efficiency and minimize the costs of agency-based
printing, the department shall establish rules and guidelines for all
agencies to use in managing their printing operations, including both
agency-based printing and those jobs that require the services of a
print shop, as based on the successes of implementation of existing
print management programs in state agencies. At a minimum, the rules
and guidelines must implement managed print strategies to track,
manage, and reduce agency-based printing.
The department shall develop a state policy on the use of agency-based printing, to be applicable to all agencies of state government
except institutions of higher education. The state policy shall seek
to reduce the unnecessary use of agency print shops and agency-based
printing and minimize the costs associated with state print operations.
The state policy shall establish appropriate reduction goals and
implement performance measurements.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.19.565 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 231 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department shall establish a motor vehicle transportation
service which is hereby empowered to:
(1) Provide suitable motor vehicle transportation services to state
agencies on either a temporary or permanent basis and upon such
demonstration of need as the department may require;
(2) Provide motor pools for the use of state agencies located in
the Olympia area and such additional motor pools at other locations in
the state as may be necessary to provide economic, efficient, and
effective motor vehicle transportation services to state agencies.
Such additional motor pools may be under either the direct control of
the department or under the supervision of another state agency by
agreement with the department;
(3) Establish an equitable schedule of rental and mileage charges
to agencies for motor vehicle transportation services furnished which
shall be designed to provide funds to recover the actual total costs of
motor pool operations including but not limited to vehicle operation
expense, depreciation expense, overhead, and nonrecoverable collision
or other damage to vehicles; and
(4) Establish guidelines, procedures, and standards for fleet
operations that other state agencies and institutions of higher
education may adopt. The guidelines, procedures, and standards shall
be consistent with and carry out the objectives of any general policies
adopted by the office of financial management under RCW 43.41.130.
The department shall develop a state policy on the acquisition of
motor vehicles, to be applicable to all agencies and institutions of
state government. The state policy shall seek to reduce the long-term
costs of motor vehicle ownership and operation by performing a life-cycle cost analysis that considers, among other factors, the initial
purchase cost and the costs of maintenance and operation including,
where appropriate and cost-effective, fuel efficiency. The state
policy shall establish appropriate cost reduction goals and implement
performance measurements.
Unless otherwise determined by the director after consultation with
the office of financial management, vehicles owned and managed by the
department of transportation, the department of natural resources, and
the Washington state patrol are exempt from the requirements of
subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The office of financial management and the
department of enterprise services shall jointly establish a work group
on central services rate methodology to examine the methods by which
the costs of state agency central services are allocated among the
agencies and institutions of state government. The objective of the
work group is to recommend a central services rate methodology that
achieves more efficient, cost-effective, and transparent use of state
resources for central services, including state agency legal services,
agency audits, archives and records management, and services provided
to state agencies by the department of enterprise services and the
consolidated technology services agency.
The joint work group shall include representatives of the office of
financial management, the department of enterprise services, the
attorney general's office, the office of the secretary of state, the
state auditor's office, the consolidated technology services agency,
and staff of the ways and means committees of the senate and house of
representatives. Administrative support of the work group shall be
provided by the department of enterprise services.
The joint work group shall report its findings to the governor and
the legislative fiscal committees by September 1, 2012.

--- END ---