BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.520 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 27 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The term "medical assistance" may include the following care
and services subject to rules adopted by the authority or department:
(a) Inpatient hospital services; (b) outpatient hospital services; (c)
other laboratory and X-ray services; (d) nursing facility services; (e)
physicians' services, which shall include prescribed medication and
instruction on birth control devices; (f) medical care, or any other
type of remedial care as may be established by the secretary or
director; (g) home health care services; (h) private duty nursing
services; (i) dental services; (j) physical and occupational therapy
and related services; (k) prescribed drugs, dentures, and prosthetic
devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in diseases
of the eye or by an optometrist, whichever the individual may select;
(l) personal care services, as provided in this section; (m) hospice
services; (n) other diagnostic, screening, preventive, and
rehabilitative services; and (o) like services when furnished to a
child by a school district in a manner consistent with the requirements
of this chapter. For the purposes of this section, neither the
authority nor the department may cut off any prescription medications,
oxygen supplies, respiratory services, or other life-sustaining medical
services or supplies.
"Medical assistance," notwithstanding any other provision of law,
shall not include routine foot care, or dental services delivered by
any health care provider, that are not mandated by Title XIX of the
social security act unless there is a specific appropriation for these
services.
(2) The department shall adopt, amend, or rescind such
administrative rules as are necessary to ensure that Title XIX personal
care services are provided to eligible persons in conformance with
federal regulations.
(a) These administrative rules shall include financial eligibility
indexed according to the requirements of the social security act
providing for medicaid eligibility.
(b) The rules shall require clients be assessed as having a medical
condition requiring assistance with personal care tasks. Plans of care
for clients requiring health-related consultation for assessment and
service planning may be reviewed by a nurse.
(c) The department shall determine by rule which clients have a
health-related assessment or service planning need requiring registered
nurse consultation or review. This definition may include clients that
meet indicators or protocols for review, consultation, or visit.
(3)(a) The department shall design and implement a means to assess
the level of functional disability of persons eligible for personal
care services under this section. ((The personal care services benefit
shall be provided to the extent funding is available according to the
assessed level of functional disability.)) The department shall operate
the medicaid personal care services program within the amounts
specifically appropriated in the biennial appropriations act. Any
reductions in services made necessary for funding reasons should be
accomplished in a manner that assures that priority for maintaining
services is given to persons with the greatest need as determined by
the assessment of functional disability.
(b) The personal care services benefit for child clients shall be
provided according the most current medicaid state plan.
(c) The personal care services benefit for adult clients must be
provided under section 1915(i) of the social security act, exclusively
using the option that allows for client self-direction of an
individualized budget.
(i) The department shall establish a matrix that provides an array
of client acuity levels.
(ii) The assessed level of functional disability must result in the
client's placement in an acuity level on the acuity matrix.
(iii) The department shall establish a budget amount that is
associated with each acuity level and must be used to assist the client
in securing services and supports to address their assessed needs.
(iv) This section does not require the department to establish the
per-client budget amount at a level that sufficiently meets all
assessed needs. Subject to any limits established by the department,
clients shall prioritize the use of their budget amount.
(v) The department shall establish the value of the per-client
budget amounts associated with each acuity level using a methodology
that:
(A) Is objective and evidence-based and uses valid, reliable cost
data;
(B) Includes a calculation of the expected cost of each service
available under this option; and
(C) Can be applied consistently to individuals.
(vi) Nothing in this section may be construed as creating a legal
right or entitlement of any individual to a prior personal care
services budget amount in the event individual budget amounts are
adjusted so the department can remain within the amounts specifically
appropriated in the biennial appropriations act.
(d) The department shall provide, or contract to have provided,
client care case management services to assist the client in developing
and executing a plan of care that allocates their personal care
services budget to appropriate providers, support services and
therapies, and equipment or other expenditures as necessary to address
the client's health and safety.
(e) The department shall contract for financial intermediary
services to assist adult clients in executing their spending plan and
managing their personal care services budget. The department may
deduct up to five percent from the value of each individual budget to
cover the associated costs.
(4) Effective July 1, 1989, the authority shall offer hospice
services in accordance with available funds.
(5) For Title XIX personal care services administered by aging and
disability services administration of the department, the department
shall contract with area agencies on aging:
(a) To provide case management services to individuals receiving
Title XIX personal care services in their own home; and
(b) To reassess and reauthorize Title XIX personal care services or
other home and community services as defined in RCW 74.39A.009 in home
or in other settings for individuals consistent with the intent of this
section:
(i) Who have been initially authorized by the department to receive
Title XIX personal care services or other home and community services
as defined in RCW 74.39A.009; and
(ii) Who, at the time of reassessment and reauthorization, are
receiving such services in their own home.
(6) In the event that an area agency on aging is unwilling to enter
into or satisfactorily fulfill a contract or an individual consumer's
need for case management services will be met through an alternative
delivery system, the department is authorized to:
(a) Obtain the services through competitive bid; and
(b) Provide the services directly until a qualified contractor can
be found.
(7) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the authority may offer medicare part D prescription
drug copayment coverage to full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries.

--- END ---