BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 To maximize the benefits to the public,
state government should be operated in an efficient and effective
manner. The purpose of this act is to transfer quality assurance
activities and responsibilities for programs funded under RCW 13.40.500
et seq. from the department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration to the administrative office of the
courts. The administrative office of the courts operates the
Washington state center for court research which has the experience and
expertise to align quality assurance activities and program outcome
measurements. This move will allow for the efficient and cost-effective management of quality assurance activities and program
outcome measurements at the state level. This move will also promote
individual program level improvements in juvenile courts, allowing
juvenile courts to more closely match individual offenders, programs,
and counselors for the most effective outcomes for individual juvenile
offenders.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.40.510 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 62 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) In order to receive funds under RCW 13.40.500 through
13.40.540, local governments may, through their respective agencies
that administer funding for consolidated juvenile services, submit
proposals that establish community juvenile accountability programs
within their communities. These proposals must be submitted to the
juvenile rehabilitation administration of the department of social and
health services and the administrative office of the courts for
certification.
(2) The proposals must:
(a) Demonstrate that the proposals were developed with the input of
the local law and justice councils established under RCW 72.09.300;
(b) Describe how local community groups or members are involved in
the implementation of the programs funded under RCW 13.40.500 through
13.40.540;
(c) Include a description of how the grant funds will contribute to
the expected outcomes of the program and the reduction of youth
violence and juvenile crime in their community. Data approaches are
not required to be replicated if the networks have information that
addresses risks in the community for juvenile offenders.
(3) A local government receiving a grant under this section shall
agree that any funds received must be used efficiently to encourage the
use of community-based programs that reduce the reliance on secure
confinement as the sole means of holding juvenile offenders accountable
for their crimes. The local government shall also agree to account for
the expenditure of all funds received under the grant and to submit to
audits for compliance with the grant criteria developed under RCW
13.40.520.
(4) The juvenile rehabilitation administration((, in consultation
with)) and the administrative office of the courts, in consultation
with the Washington association of juvenile court administrators ((and
the state law and justice advisory council)), shall establish
guidelines for programs that may be funded under RCW 13.40.500 through
13.40.540. The guidelines must:
(a) Target diverted and adjudicated juvenile offenders;
(b) Include assessment methods to determine services, programs, and
intervention strategies most likely to change behaviors and norms of
juvenile offenders;
(c) Provide maximum structured supervision in the community.
Programs should use natural surveillance and community guardians such
as employers, relatives, teachers, clergy, and community mentors to the
greatest extent possible;
(d) Promote good work ethic values and educational skills and
competencies necessary for the juvenile offender to function
effectively and positively in the community;
(e) Maximize the efficient delivery of treatment services aimed at
reducing risk factors associated with the commission of juvenile
offenses;
(f) Maximize the reintegration of the juvenile offender into the
community upon release from confinement;
(g) Maximize the juvenile offender's opportunities to make full
restitution to the victims and amends to the community;
(h) Support and encourage increased court discretion in imposing
community-based intervention strategies;
(i) Be compatible with research that shows which prevention and
early intervention strategies work with juvenile offenders;
(j) Be outcome-based in that it describes what outcomes will be
achieved or what outcomes have already been achieved;
(k) Include an evaluation component; and
(l) Recognize the diversity of local needs.
(((5) The state law and justice advisory council may provide
support and technical assistance to local governments for training and
education regarding community-based prevention and intervention
strategies.))

Sec. 3 RCW 13.40.520 and 1997 c 338 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state may make grants to local governments for the
provision of community-based programs for juvenile offenders. The
grants must be made under a grant formula developed by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the administrative office of the
courts, in consultation with the Washington association of juvenile
court administrators.
(2) Upon certification by the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the administrative office of the courts that a
proposal satisfies the application and selection criteria, grant funds
will be distributed to the local government agency that administers
funding for consolidated juvenile services.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.40.530 and 1997 c 338 s 63 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes the importance of evaluation and outcome
measurements of programs serving juvenile offenders in order to ensure
cost-effective use of public funds.
(1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall develop
standards for measuring the effectiveness of juvenile accountability
programs established and approved under RCW 13.40.510. The standards
must be developed and presented to the governor and legislature not
later than January 1, 1998. The standards must include methods for
measuring success factors following intervention. Success factors
include, but are not limited to, continued use of alcohol or controlled
substances, arrests, violations of terms of community supervision,
convictions for subsequent offenses, and restitution to victims.
(2) The administrative office of the courts, in consultation with
the Washington association of juvenile court administrators, shall
establish a state quality assurance program, and shall monitor the
implementation of programs that may be funded under RCW 13.40.500
through 13.40.540 and evaluate adherence to program model design and
program model outcomes based on approved guidelines set forth under RCW
13.40.510.

Sec. 5 RCW 13.40.540 and 1997 c 338 s 64 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each community juvenile accountability program approved and
funded under RCW 13.40.500 through 13.40.540 shall comply with the
information collection requirements in subsection (2) of this section
and the reporting requirements in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The information collected by each community juvenile
accountability program must include, at a minimum for each juvenile
participant: (a) The name, date of birth, gender, social security
number, and, when available, the juvenile information system (JUVIS)
control number; (b) an initial intake assessment of each juvenile
participating in the program; (c) a list of all juveniles who completed
the program; and (d) an assessment upon completion or termination of
each juvenile, including outcomes and, where applicable, reasons for
termination.
(3) The ((juvenile rehabilitation administration)) administrative
office of the courts shall annually compile the data and report to the
legislature on: (a) The programs funded under RCW 13.40.500 through
13.40.540; (b) the total cost for each funded program and cost per
juvenile; ((and)) (c) the essential elements of the program; (d)
program outcomes; and (e) recommendations regarding program
development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2012, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---