BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.18.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7034 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Taxes collected under this chapter ((shall)) must be held in
trust until paid to the state. Taxes received by the state ((shall))
must be deposited in the ((public works assistance account created in
RCW 43.155.050: PROVIDED, That during the fiscal year 2011, taxes
received by the state under this chapter must be deposited in the))
general fund ((for general purpose expenditures)). Any person
collecting the tax who appropriates or converts the tax collected
((shall be)) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the money required to
be collected is not available for payment on the date payment is due.
If a taxpayer fails to pay the tax imposed by this chapter to the
person charged with collection of the tax and the person charged with
collection fails to pay the tax to the department, the department may,
in its discretion, proceed directly against the taxpayer for collection
of the tax.
(2) The tax ((shall be)) is due from the taxpayer within twenty-five days from the date the taxpayer is billed by the person collecting
the tax.
(3) The tax ((shall be)) is due from the person collecting the tax
at the end of the tax period in which the tax is received from the
taxpayer. If the taxpayer remits only a portion of the total amount
billed for taxes, consideration, and related charges, the amount
remitted ((shall)) must be applied first to payment of the solid waste
collection tax and this tax ((shall have)) has priority over all other
claims to the amount remitted.

--- END ---