BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature is committed to public
elementary and secondary education in Washington state and further
recognizes its authority and responsibility to define and fund a
program of basic education as its paramount duty under the state
Constitution. In January 2012, the Washington state supreme court held
that the state has not complied with its Article IX, section 1
constitutional duty to make ample provision for the basic education
program for all children in Washington. The court did acknowledge the
recent enactment of sweeping reforms under chapter 548, Laws of 2009,
and acknowledged the current progress toward implementing those
reforms. The court also noted that, if fully funded, the reform
package will remedy deficiencies in the K-12 funding system.
Therefore, continuing to make vigorous progress in phasing in those
reforms must be the legislature's focused priority with regard to K-12
funding.
In November 2000, the voters of Washington state approved
Initiatives 728 and 732 to enhance per-student funding allocations to
school districts and provide annual cost-of-living salary increases to
education employees. The initiatives did not provide increased revenue
to fund the enhanced expenditures. Additionally, Initiative 728 is
designated for specific purposes including reducing class sizes in
grades kindergarten through four, making selected class size reductions
in grades five through twelve, providing extended learning for students
in grades kindergarten through twelve, providing additional
professional development for educators, providing early assistance for
children who need prekindergarten support, and providing improvements
or additions to school facilities that are directly related to class
size reductions and extended learning opportunities. In the most
recent year in which school districts received Initiative 728 funding,
and not counting amounts carried over to the following year, the
majority of funds were expended on class size reduction. Further, the
legislature has currently convened a compensation working group to make
recommendations regarding salaries. The Washington supreme court did
note that both Initiative 728 and Initiative 732 are considered not
part of basic education.
Given that a substantial portion of the purpose of the initiatives
will be incorporated as part of the focused work group created in this
act for phasing-in the reforms recently enacted under chapter 548, Laws
of 2009, and given that all K-12 funding efforts should be aimed toward
basic education, the separate initiative requirements must be set
aside.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.505.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 17 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Total distributions for the student achievement program from
the general fund to each school district shall be based upon the
average number of full-time equivalent students in the school district
during the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure
that moneys generated by skill center students are returned to skill
centers.
(2) The allocation rate per full-time equivalent student shall be
three hundred dollars in the 2005-06 school year, three hundred
seventy-five dollars in the 2006-07 school year, and four hundred fifty
dollars in the 2007-08 school year. For each subsequent school year,
the amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be adjusted
for inflation by the implicit price deflator as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics. However, ((for the 2011-12 and
2012-13 school years)) beginning with the 2012-13 school year, the
amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act. These allocations per full-time
equivalent student shall be supported from the distributions from the
education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 and the state
general fund.
(3) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.135.045 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 950 are each
amended to read as follows:
The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(1) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may
transfer from the education construction fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
(2) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(3) Funds for the student achievement program in RCW 28A.505.210
and 28A.505.220 shall be appropriated to the superintendent of public
instruction strictly for distribution to school districts to meet the
provisions set out in the student achievement act. Allocations shall
be made on an equal per full-time equivalent student basis to each
school district.
(((4) After July 1, 2010, the state treasurer shall transfer one
hundred two million dollars from the general fund to the education
construction fund by June 30th of each year.))

Sec. 4 2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
The legislature finds that institutions of higher education are key
to the future employment opportunities of Washington citizens and to
the economic well-being of the state. The legislature finds that the
recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers at institutions of higher
education and the formation of research innovation teams will further
enhance faculty recruitment and economic development. The legislature
further finds that current financial aid and early childhood education
programs are underfunded and subject to the unpredictability of the
state budget. It is the intent of the legislature to direct lottery
account moneys toward the Washington opportunity pathways account and
that those funds stabilize and increase existing resources for the
recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers, innovation partnership
zones and research teams, early childhood education, opportunity
grants, educational opportunity grants, get ready for math and science
scholarships, passport to college promise scholarships, college bound
scholarships, the state work study program, the state need grant,
Washington scholars awards, the Washington award for vocational
excellence, and Washington promise scholarships. ((It is also the
intent of the legislature to continue funding the education
construction fund by redirecting a portion of general state revenues to
that fund.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The basic education funding joint
legislative work group is established. The eight-member work group
comprises the chairs and the ranking minority members of the senate and
house of representatives ways and means committees and the senate and
house of representatives education policy committees. The work group
must consider the information available to date regarding the priority
order of phased-in funding enhancements and review the phase-in
schedule in light of any newly available research-based evidence. The
work group must develop a long-term financial plan that phases in
enhancements, and matches the expenditure plan with options for
existing or additional state revenue that may include shifting a
portion of school district excess levy authority to state property tax
levy. The plan must provide for progress in executing and funding the
education reforms while making realistic commitments. The financial
plan must take into account the objectives of Initiative 728 by
integrating the funding for that initiative with the implementation of
the prototypical school model, as recommended by the funding formula
technical working group. The financial plan must also consider
upcoming findings of the compensation working group and review that
group's recommendations regarding the objectives of Initiative 732 and
the state's larger education reform plan.
Staff support may be provided by senate committee services, house
of representatives office of program research, the Washington state
institute for public policy, or other state agencies as needed
including the department of revenue, the office of financial
management, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
The work group shall report to the legislative fiscal committees and
education policy committees by December 31, 2012, with a recommended
phase-in and financing plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.400.205 (Cost-of-living increases for employees) and
2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 1, 2009 c 573 s 1, 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 1, &
2001 c 4 s 2;
(2) RCW 28A.400.206 (Cost-of-living increases -- Duty of state) and
2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 2 & 2001 c 4 s 1;
(3) RCW 28B.50.465 (Cost-of-living increases -- Academic employees)
and 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 2, 2009 c 573 s 2, 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 3,
& 2001 c 4 s 3; and
(4) RCW 28B.50.468 (Cost-of-living increases -- Classified employees)
and 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 3, 2009 c 573 s 3, 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 4,
& 2001 c 4 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2012.

--- END ---