BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that all citizens
have the right to choose whether or not to contribute to a political
cause or candidate and should never be compelled to do so. The
legislature further recognizes that many public employees are
represented by labor organizations and because of laws enacted by the
legislature, as a condition of their employment, they are obligated to
pay dues and fees through payroll deductions. Labor organizations
often use these funds to influence elections without seeking approval
of those contributing the funds. The legislature intends to provide a
mechanism for an employee to choose to authorize wage deductions to be
used for political purposes. Through this mechanism, the legislature
intends to ensure that an employee in this state shall not be compelled
to contribute to political causes or candidates through deductions from
his or her wages without that employee's consent.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17A.495 and 2010 c 204 s 613 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No employer or labor organization may increase the salary of an
officer or employee, or compensate an officer, employee, or other
person or entity, with the intention that the increase in salary, or
the compensation, or a part of it, be contributed or spent to support
or oppose a candidate, state official against whom recall charges have
been filed, political party, or political committee.
(2) No employer or labor organization may discriminate against an
officer or employee in the terms or conditions of employment for (a)
the failure to contribute to, (b) the failure in any way to support or
oppose, or (c) in any way supporting or opposing a candidate, ballot
proposition, political party, or political committee. At least
annually, an employee from whom wages or salary are withheld under
subsection (3) of this section shall be notified of the provisions of
this subsection.
(3)(a) No employer or other person or entity responsible for the
disbursement of funds in payment of wages or salaries may withhold or
divert a portion of an employee's wages or salaries for contributions
to political committees ((or)), for use as political contributions
((except upon the)), or for expenditures to influence an election,
unless an assessment for such use is affirmatively authorized by
written request of the employee.
(b) A labor organization may not direct an employer to deduct and
may not accept from an employer any portion of an employee's wages or
salaries to operate a political committee, for use as political
contributions, or for expenditures to influence an election, unless an
assessment for such use is affirmatively authorized by written request
of the employee. There is a presumption that a labor organization
violates this section if such authorized assessments are commingled
with other dues, fees, or revenue. The presumption may be rebutted
through evidence of pro rata reductions in dues or fees collected from
nonconsenting dues payers and fee payers, refunds to nonconsenting dues
payers and fee payers, or other clear and adequate accounting controls.
(c) The written request must be made on a form prescribed by the
commission informing the employee of the prohibition against employer
and labor organization discrimination described in subsection (2) of
this section. The employee may revoke the request at any time. ((At
least annually, the employee shall be notified about the right to
revoke the request)) The request is valid for no more than twelve
months from the date it is made by the employee.
(4) Each person or entity who withholds contributions under
subsection (3)(a) of this section, and each labor organization that
directs an employer to deduct or accepts from an employer a portion of
an employee's wages or salaries under subsection (3)(b) of this section
shall maintain open for public inspection for a period of no less than
three years, during normal business hours, documents and books of
accounts that shall include a copy of each employee's request, the
amounts and dates ((funds)) assessments were actually withheld or
accepted, and the amounts and dates ((funds)) assessments were
transferred to a political committee, applied to the operation of a
political committee, or expended to influence an election. Copies of
such information shall be delivered to the commission upon request.
This subsection does not apply to a person or entity that withholds
contributions under subsection (3)(a) of this section if the person or
entity withholds contributions at the direction of a labor
organization.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Expenditures to influence an election" includes, but is not
limited to, expenditures for staff time spent on efforts to affect
elections; expenditures on communication efforts to advance or oppose
one or more candidates or ballot measures; expenditures to assist voter
turnout; expenditures for staff to aid in recruiting or training
candidates; expenditures for staff or materials to prepare ballot
measures; expenditures for staff or legal services to contest election
results; and donations of funds to organizations or individuals that
make expenditures to influence an election.
(b) "To operate a political committee" means expenditures on staff
work, promotional materials, professional services, and internal
communication efforts that aid in the operation and funding of a
political committee.
(6) In addition to the enforcement provisions of RCW 42.17A.765, an
individual from whose wages or salary a deduction was made has a
private cause of action to recover any portion of the funds allocated
or spent in violation of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.17A.500 and 2007 c 438 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A labor organization may not use agency shop fees paid by an
individual who is not a member of the organization to make
contributions or expenditures to influence an election or to operate a
political committee, unless affirmatively authorized by the individual.
(2) ((A labor organization does not use agency shop fees when it
uses its general treasury funds to make such contributions or
expenditures if it has sufficient revenues from sources other than
agency shop fees in its general treasury to fund such contributions or
expenditures.)) There is a presumption that a labor organization uses
agency shop fees when it uses funds from any account where agency shop
fees are commingled with any other fees, dues, or revenue. The
presumption may be rebutted through evidence of pro rata reductions in
fees collected from nonconsenting fee payers, refunds to nonconsenting
fee payers, or other clear and adequate accounting controls.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Affirmatively authorized" means that the individual signed a
declaration within the twelve-month period before the expenditure
indicating consent to the labor organization's use of the fees to
influence an election or to operate a political committee.
(b) "Agency shop fees" are fees paid by nonmember employees to a
labor organization for the costs related to collective bargaining,
contract administration, and activity related to matters affecting
wages, hours, and other conditions of employment done by the labor
organization on behalf of all employees.
(c) "Expenditures to influence an election" includes, but is not
limited to, expenditures for staff time spent on efforts to affect
elections; expenditures on communication efforts to advance or oppose
one or more candidates or ballot measures; expenditures to assist voter
turnout; expenditures for staff to aid in recruiting or training
candidates; expenditures for staff or materials to prepare ballot
measures; expenditures for staff or legal services to contest election
results; and donations of funds to organizations or individuals that
make expenditures to influence an election.
(d) "To operate a political committee" means expenditures on staff
work, promotional materials, professional services, and internal
communication efforts that aid in the operation and funding of a
political committee.
(4) In addition to the enforcement provisions of RCW 42.17A.765, an
individual from whose salary an agency fee was deducted has a private
cause of action to recover any portion of the fee allocated or spent in
violation of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---