BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
A family day care provider who as of the effective date of this
section has been licensed in operation for five years or longer and
against whom there has not been a complaint that resulted in an
enforcement action is exempt from any requirement to have a high school
diploma or equivalent education.

--- END ---