BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The use of automated external defibrillators has been
demonstrated to save lives including those of young athletes pursuing
athletic activities. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to
promote the timely and appropriate use of automated external
defibrillators in settings where school athletic events occur.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
school districts and stakeholder groups, shall develop and implement a
medical emergency response program to include an automated external
defibrillator program for each high school in the state.
(3) The medical emergency response program must:
(a) Work with existing community resources and stakeholders to
include evidence-based guidelines and training;
(b) Provide effective and efficient communication across the school
campus;
(c) Develop a coordinated and practiced response plan;
(d) Develop a plan for risk reduction;
(e) Implement a training program and provide equipment for first
aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation; and
(f) Implement a lay rescuer automated external defibrillator
program in schools with an established need, which may include:
(i) Medical provider oversight;
(ii) Appropriate training of anticipated rescuers in
cardiopulmonary resuscitation and use of the automated external
defibrillator;
(iii) Coordination with the emergency medical services system;
(iv) Appropriate device maintenance; and
(v) Ongoing quality improvement program.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and its
employees and agents are not liable for failures to comply with
subsections (2) and (3) of this section or for injuries or accidents
involving automated external defibrillators.

--- END ---