BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION. The legislature
declares it to be the public policy of the state and a recognized
governmental function to assist in securitizing the revenue stream from
the master settlement agreement between the state and tobacco product
manufacturers in order to provide a source of revenue for the state and
federal basic health plan and other medical care services. The purpose
of this subchapter is to issue nonrecourse revenue bonds to make funds
available for these medical care services as a bridge to full
implementation of the federal affordable care act in 2014. This
subchapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its
inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes
thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this subchapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the tobacco settlement authority created in
this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the governing board of the authority.
(3) "Bonds" means bonds, notes, and other obligations and financing
arrangements issued or entered into by the authority under this
subchapter.
(4) "Master settlement agreement" means the national master
settlement agreement and related documents entered into on November 23,
1998, by the state and the four principal United States tobacco product
manufacturers, as amended and supplemented, for the settlement of
litigation brought by the state against the tobacco product
manufacturers.
(5) "Sales agreement" means any agreement authorized under this
subchapter in which the state provides for the sale to the authority of
a portion of the payments required to be made by tobacco product
manufacturers to the state and the state's rights to receive such
payments, pursuant to the master settlement agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 BONDS NOT DEBT OF STATE. (1) Bonds issued
under this subchapter shall be issued in the name of the authority.
The bonds shall not be obligations of the state of Washington and shall
be obligations only of the authority, payable solely from the special
fund or funds created by the authority for their payment.
(2) Bonds issued under this subchapter shall contain a recital on
their face to the effect that payment of the principal of, interest on,
and prepayment premium, if any, on the bonds shall be a valid claim
only as against the special fund or funds relating thereto, that
neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any
municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency of the state, other than
the authority as set forth in this chapter, is pledged to the payment
of the principal of, interest on, and prepayment premium, if any, on
the bonds.
(3) Contracts entered into by the authority shall be entered into
in the name of the authority and not in the name of the state of
Washington. The obligations of the authority under the contracts shall
be obligations only of the authority and are not in any way obligations
of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 FINANCING POWERS. In addition to other
powers and duties prescribed in this chapter, the authority is
empowered to:
(1) Establish a stable source of revenue to be used for the
purposes designated in this subchapter;
(2) Enter into sales agreements with the state for purchase of a
portion of the amounts otherwise due to the state under the master
settlement agreement, and of the state's rights to receive such
amounts;
(3) Issue bonds, the interest and gain on which may or may not be
exempt from general federal income taxation, in one or more series, and
to refund or refinance its debt and obligations;
(4) Sell, pledge, or assign, as security, all or a portion of the
revenues derived by the authority under any sales agreement, to provide
for and secure the issuance of its bonds;
(5) Provide for the investment of any funds, including funds held
in reserve, not required for immediate disbursement, and provide for
the selection of investments;
(6) Manage its funds, obligations, and investments as necessary and
as consistent with its purpose; and
(7) Implement the purposes of this subchapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 GENERAL POWERS--RESTRICTIONS. (1) The
authority has all the general powers necessary to carry out its
purposes and duties and to exercise its specific powers under this
subchapter. In addition to other powers specified in this subchapter,
the authority may:
(a) Sue and be sued in its own name;
(b) Make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments,
with any public or private person, in accordance with this subchapter;
(c) Employ, contract with, or engage independent counsel, bond
counsel, other attorneys, financial advisors, investment bankers,
auditors, other technical or professional assistants, and such other
personnel as are necessary and recommended by the state housing finance
commission staff;
(d) Invest or deposit moneys of the authority in any manner
determined by the authority and enter into hedge agreements, swap
agreements, or other financial products, including payment agreements
defined under RCW 39.96.020(5). The authority is not a governmental
entity for purposes of chapter 39.96 RCW;
(e) Establish such special funds, and controls on deposits to and
disbursements from them, as it finds convenient for the implementation
of this subchapter;
(f) Procure insurance, other credit enhancements, and other
financing arrangements for its bonds to fulfill its purposes under this
subchapter, including but not limited to municipal bond insurance and
letters of credit;
(g) Accept appropriations, gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from
public or private entities;
(h) Adopt rules, consistent with this subchapter, as the board
determines necessary;
(i) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the
purposes of this subchapter; and
(j) Exercise any other power reasonably required to implement the
purposes of this subchapter.
(2) The authority does not have the power of eminent domain and
does not have the power to levy taxes of any kind.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 AUTHORIZATION OF THE SALE OF RIGHTS IN THE
MASTER SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT. (1) The governor is authorized to sell
and assign to the authority all of the state's right to receive a
portion of the state's annual share of the revenue derived from the
master settlement agreement for litigation brought by the state against
tobacco product manufacturers. The portion of the state's share sold
and assigned shall be determined by the governor in an amount necessary
to generate net proceeds to the state for deposit to the basic health
plan stabilization account under RCW 43.79.487 up to three hundred
fifty million dollars. The attorney general shall assist the governor
in the review of all necessary documentation to effect the sale. The
governor and the authority are authorized to take any action necessary
to facilitate and complete the sale.
(2) The sale made under this section is irrevocable so long as
bonds issued under this subchapter remain outstanding. The portion of
the revenue sold to the authority shall be pledged to the bondholders.
The sale and assignment shall constitute and be treated as a true sale
and absolute transfer of the revenue so transferred and not as a pledge
or other security interest granted by the state for any borrowing. The
characterization of such a sale as an absolute transfer shall not be
negated or adversely affected by the fact that only a portion of the
revenue from the master settlement agreement is being sold and
assigned, or by the state's acquisition or retention of an ownership
interest in the portion of the revenue from the master settlement
agreement not so assigned.
(3) In addition to such other terms, provisions, and conditions as
the governor and the authority may determine appropriate for inclusion
in the sale agreements, the sale agreements shall contain (a) a
covenant of the state that the state will not agree to any amendment of
the master settlement agreement that materially and adversely affects
the authority's ability to receive the portion of the state's share of
master settlement agreement payments that have been sold to the
authority; (b) a requirement that the state enforce, at its own
expense, the provisions of the master settlement agreement that require
the payment of the portion of the state's share of master settlement
agreement payments that have been sold to the authority; and (c) a
covenant that the state shall take no action that would adversely
affect the tax-exempt status of any tax-exempt bonds of the authority.
(4) On or after the effective date of the sale, the state shall not
have any right, title, or interest in the portion of the state's share
of the master settlement agreement revenue sold and such portion shall
be the property of the authority and not the state, and shall be owned,
received, held, and disbursed by the authority or its trustee or
assignee, and not the state.
(5) The terms of the state's sale to the authority of a portion of
the master settlement agreement revenue shall provide that the portion
shall be paid directly to the authority or its trustee or assignee.
The revenue sold and assigned shall not be received in the treasury of
the state and shall not be or deemed to be general state revenues as
that term is used in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 BONDS. (1) The authority may issue its
bonds in principal amounts which, in the opinion of the authority, are
necessary to provide sufficient funds for achievement of its purposes
under this subchapter, the payment of debt service on its bonds, the
establishment of reserves to secure the bonds, the costs of issuance of
its bonds and credit enhancements, if any, and all other expenditures
of the authority incident to and necessary to carry out its purposes or
powers. The authority may also issue refunding bonds, including
advance refunding bonds, for the purpose of refunding previously issued
bonds, and may issue other types of bonds, debt obligations, and
financing arrangements necessary to fulfill its purposes or the
purposes of this subchapter. The bonds are investment securities and
negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for the purposes of
the uniform commercial code.
(2) The authority's bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at
such time or times, be in such denominations, be in such form, be
registered or registrable in such manner, be made transferable,
exchangeable, and interchangeable, be payable in such medium of
payment, at such place or places, be subject to such terms of
redemption, bear such fixed or variable rate or rates of interest, be
taxable or tax exempt, be payable at such time or times, and be sold in
such manner and at such price or prices, as the authority determines.
The bonds shall be executed by one or more officers of the authority,
and by the trustee or paying agent if the authority determines to use
a trustee or paying agent for the bonds. Execution of the bonds may be
by manual or facsimile signature, provided that at least one signature
on the bond is manual.
(3) The bonds of the authority shall be subject to such terms,
conditions, covenants, and protective provisions as are found necessary
or desirable by the authority, including, but not limited to, pledges
of the authority's assets, setting aside of reserves, and other
provisions the authority finds are necessary or desirable for the
security of bondholders.
(4) Any revenue pledged by the authority to be received under the
sales agreement or in special funds created by the authority shall be
valid and binding at the time the pledge is made. Receipts so pledged
and then or thereafter received by the authority and any securities in
which such receipts may be invested shall immediately be subject to the
lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further
act. The lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against
all parties having claims of any kind against the authority, whether
such parties have notice of the lien. Notwithstanding any other
provision to the contrary, the resolution or indenture of the authority
or any other instrument by which a pledge is created need not be
recorded or filed pursuant to chapter 62A.9A RCW to perfect such
pledge. The authority shall constitute a governmental unit within the
meaning of RCW 62A.9A-102(a)(45).
(5) When issuing bonds, the authority may provide for the future
issuance of additional bonds or parity debt on a parity with
outstanding bonds, and the terms and conditions of their issuance. The
authority may issue refunding bonds in accordance with chapter 39.53
RCW or issue bonds with a subordinate lien against the fund or funds
securing outstanding bonds.
(6) The board and any person executing the bonds are not liable
personally on the indebtedness or subject to any personal liability or
accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.
(7) The authority may, out of any fund available therefor, purchase
its bonds in the open market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 LEGAL INVESTMENTS. Bonds issued under this
subchapter are hereby made securities in which all insurance companies,
trust companies in their commercial departments, savings banks,
cooperative banks, banking associations, investment companies,
executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons
whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in
obligations of the state may properly and legally invest funds,
including capital in their control or belonging to them.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 LIMITATION OF LIABILITY. Members of the
board and persons acting in the authority's behalf, while acting within
the scope of their employment or agency, are not subject to personal
liability resulting from carrying out the powers and duties conferred
on them under this subchapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 BANKRUPTCY. Prior to the date that is
three hundred sixty-six days after which the authority no longer has
any bonds outstanding, the authority is prohibited from filing a
voluntary petition under chapter 9 of the federal bankruptcy code or
such corresponding chapter or section as may, from time to time, be in
effect, and a public official or organization, entity, or other person
shall not authorize the authority to be or become a debtor under
chapter 9 or any successor or corresponding chapter or sections during
such periods. This section shall be part of any contractual obligation
owed to the holders of bonds issued under this subchapter. Any such
contractual obligation shall not subsequently be modified by state law
during the period of the contractual obligation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 DISSOLUTION OF THE AUTHORITY. The
authority shall dissolve no later than two years from the date of final
payment of all of its outstanding bonds and the satisfaction of all
outstanding obligations of the authority, except to the extent
necessary to remain in existence to fulfill any outstanding covenants
or provisions with bondholders or third parties made in accordance with
this subchapter. Upon dissolution of the authority, all assets of the
authority shall be returned to the state and shall be deposited in the
state general fund, and the authority shall execute any necessary
assignments or instruments, including any assignment of any right,
title, or ownership to the state for receipt of payments under the
master settlement agreement.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.79.487 and 2011 c 5 s 711 are each amended to read
as follows:
The basic health plan stabilization account is created in the state
treasury, to consist of such revenues, appropriations, and transfers as
may be directed by law. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used solely for
the support of the basic health plan under chapter 70.47 RCW and
medical care services under RCW 74.09.035(1) (a) and (c).

Sec. 13 RCW 74.09.035 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6 and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 15 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) To the extent of available funds, medical care services may be
provided to:
(a) Persons who:
(i) Are incapacitated from gainful employment by reason of bodily
or mental infirmity that will likely continue for a minimum of ninety
days as determined by the ((department)) authority. The standard for
incapacity in this subsection, as evidenced by the ninety-day duration
standard, is not intended to be as stringent as federal supplemental
security income disability standards;
(ii) Are citizens or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent
residence or otherwise residing in the United States under color of
law;
(iii) Have furnished the ((department)) authority their social
security number. If the social security number cannot be furnished
because it has not been issued or is not known, an application for a
number shall be made prior to authorization of benefits, and the social
security number shall be provided to the ((department)) authority upon
receipt;
(iv) Have countable income as described in RCW 74.04.005 at or
below four hundred twenty-eight dollars for a married couple or at or
below three hundred thirty-nine dollars for a single individual; and
(v) Do not have countable resources in excess of those described in
RCW 74.04.005.
(b) Persons eligible for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance
program authorized in RCW 74.62.030 and who are not eligible for
medicaid under RCW 74.09.510.
(c) Persons eligible for alcohol and drug addiction services
provided under chapter 74.50 RCW, in accordance with medical
eligibility requirements established by the ((department)) authority.
(d) The following persons are not eligible for medical care
services:
(i) Persons who are unemployable due primarily to alcohol or drug
addiction, except as provided in (c) of this subsection. These persons
shall be referred to appropriate assessment, treatment, shelter, or
supplemental security income referral services as authorized under
chapter 74.50 RCW. Referrals shall be made at the time of application
or at the time of eligibility review. This subsection shall not be
construed to prohibit the ((department)) authority from granting
medical care services benefits to alcoholics and drug addicts who are
incapacitated due to other physical or mental conditions that meet the
eligibility criteria for medical care services;
(ii) Persons who refuse or fail to cooperate in obtaining federal
aid assistance, without good cause;
(iii) Persons who refuse or fail without good cause to participate
in drug or alcohol treatment if an assessment by a certified chemical
dependency counselor indicates a need for such treatment. Good cause
must be found to exist when a person's physical or mental condition, as
determined by the ((department)) authority, prevents the person from
participating in drug or alcohol dependency treatment, when needed
outpatient drug or alcohol treatment is not available to the person in
the county of his or her residence or when needed inpatient treatment
is not available in a location that is reasonably accessible for the
person; and
(iv) Persons who are fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid
custody or confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt to
commit a felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the place
from which the person flees; or who are violating a condition of
probation, community supervision, or parole imposed under federal or
state law for a felony or gross misdemeanor conviction.
(e) For purposes of determining whether a person is incapacitated
from gainful employment under (a) of this subsection:
(i) The ((department)) authority shall adopt by rule medical
criteria for incapacity determinations to ensure that eligibility
decisions are consistent with statutory requirements and are based on
clear, objective medical information; and
(ii) The process implementing the medical criteria shall involve
consideration of opinions of the treating or consulting physicians or
health care professionals regarding incapacity, and any eligibility
decision which rejects uncontroverted medical opinion must set forth
clear and convincing reasons for doing so.
(f) For purposes of reviewing a person's continuing eligibility and
in order to remain eligible for the program, persons who have been
found to have an incapacity from gainful employment must demonstrate
that there has been no material improvement in their medical or mental
health condition. The ((department)) authority may discontinue
benefits when there was specific error in the prior determination that
found the person eligible by reason of incapacitation.
(2) Enrollment in medical care services may not result in
expenditures that exceed the amount that has been appropriated in the
operating budget. If it appears that continued enrollment will result
in expenditures exceeding the appropriated level for a particular
fiscal year, the ((department)) authority may freeze new enrollment and
establish a waiting list of persons who may receive benefits only when
sufficient funds are available.
(3) Determination of the amount, scope, and duration of medical
care services shall be limited to coverage as defined by the authority,
except that adult dental, and routine foot care shall not be included
unless there is a specific appropriation for these services.
(4) The authority shall enter into performance-based contracts with
one or more managed health care systems for the provision of medical
care services under this section. The contract must provide for
integrated delivery of medical and mental health services.
(5) The authority shall establish standards of assistance and
resource and income exemptions, which may include deductibles and co-insurance provisions. In addition, the authority may include a
prohibition against the voluntary assignment of property or cash for
the purpose of qualifying for assistance.
(6) Residents of skilled nursing homes, intermediate care
facilities, and intermediate care facilities for persons with
intellectual disabilities, as that term is described by federal law,
who are eligible for medical care services shall be provided medical
services to the same extent as provided to those persons eligible under
the medical assistance program.
(7) Eligibility for medical care services shall commence with the
date of certification for medical care services, date of eligibility
for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program provided under RCW
74.62.030, or the date or eligibility for alcohol and drug addiction
services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 11 of
this act shall be added as a new subchapter in chapter 43.340 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 REFERENDUM. The secretary of state shall
submit this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in
accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the
laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

--- END ---