BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.050 and 2009 c 469 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW
82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57
RCW, public transportation benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, regional
transportation investment districts, and transportation benefit
districts under chapter 36.73 RCW ((shall)) must contract, prior to the
effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use
tax, the administration and collection to the state department of
revenue, which ((shall)) must deduct a percentage amount, as provided
by contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is
collected by the department of revenue ((shall)) must be deposited by
the state department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account
hereby created in the state treasury. Beginning January 1, 2013, the
department of revenue must make deposits in the local sales and use tax
account on a monthly basis on the last business day of the month in
which distributions required in (a) of this subsection are due. Moneys
in the local sales and use tax account may be withdrawn only for:
(a) Distribution to counties, cities, transportation authorities,
public facilities districts, public transportation benefit areas,
regional transportation investment districts, and transportation
benefit districts imposing a sales and use tax; and
(b) Making refunds of taxes imposed under the authority of this
chapter and RCW 81.104.170 and exempted under RCW 82.08.962 and
82.12.962.
(2) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended,
((shall,)) insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes,
((be)) are applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(3) Counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities
districts, and regional transportation investment districts may not
conduct independent sales or use tax audits of sellers registered under
the streamlined sales tax agreement.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190 and subsection (5) of this
section, all earnings of investments of balances in the local sales and
use tax account ((shall)) must be credited to the local sales and use
tax account and distributed to the counties, cities, transportation
authorities, public facilities districts, public transportation benefit
areas, regional transportation investment districts, and transportation
benefit districts monthly.
(5) Beginning January 1, 2013, the state treasurer must determine
the amount of earnings on investments that would have been credited to
the local sales and use tax account if the collections had been
deposited in the account over the prior month. When distributions are
made under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the state treasurer must
transfer this amount from the state general fund to the local sales and
use tax account and must distribute such sums to the counties, cities,
transportation authorities, public facilities districts, public
transportation benefit areas, regional transportation investment
districts, and transportation benefit districts.

--- END ---