BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide state collective bargaining rights beginning in 2014 to
language access providers who provide spoken interpreter services for
department of labor and industries medical appointments.
It is also the intent of the legislature to clarify that state
collective bargaining rights of language access providers are limited
to providers paid, in whole or in part, with an expenditure of state
funds and to clarify that providers in legal proceedings are not
intended to be covered by chapter 41.56 RCW. As a clarification of
current law, the changes in this act relative to interpreters in legal
proceedings and the medicaid administrative match program are intended
to apply both prospectively and retroactively.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in RCW
70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded
long-term care programs.
(2) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(3) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a
child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340 or
74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor
program.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides
regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the
provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less
than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(8) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(9) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(10)(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor
who provides spoken language interpreter services, whether paid
directly by the respective department or by the respective department
through a broker or language access agency: (i) For department of
social and health services appointments or medicaid enrollee
appointments((, or provided these services on or after January 1, 2009,
and before June 10, 2010, whether paid by a broker, language access
agency, or the department)); or (ii) for department of labor and
industries medical appointments.
(b) "Language access provider" does not mean: An owner, manager,
or employee of a broker or a language access agency; an interpreter
appointed or required in legal proceedings pursuant to RCW 2.43.030; or
an interpreter under the medicaid administrative match program.
(c) "Department of social and health services appointment" does not
include legal proceedings of any nature, including criminal, civil, or
administrative proceedings at any level.
(d) "Medicaid enrollee appointment" does not include medicaid
administrative match program appointments or any other service provided
pursuant to that program.
(e) "Department of labor and industries medical appointment" does
not include legal proceedings of any nature, including criminal, civil,
or administrative proceedings at any level including proceedings
conducted by the board of industrial insurance appeals.
(11) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(12) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(13) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(9),
by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and who are
trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and
maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates
from other inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as
defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with
a population of one million or more; (d) security forces established
under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as that term is defined in RCW
41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district in a county with a
population of one million or more whose duties include crash fire
rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees of fire departments
of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or emergency
medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the several classes of
advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are
employed by a public employer.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.56.510 and 2010 c 296 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the governor with respect to language access
providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer of language access providers who,
solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public employees.
The governor or the governor's designee shall represent the public
employer for bargaining purposes.
(2) There shall be collective bargaining, as defined in RCW
41.56.030, between the governor and language access providers, except
as follows:
(a) ((A statewide unit of all language access providers is)) The
only units appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining under RCW
41.56.060 are:
(i) A statewide unit for language access providers who provide
spoken language interpreter services for department of social and
health services appointments or medicaid enrollee appointments; and
(ii) A statewide unit for language access providers who provide
spoken language interpreter services for department of labor and
industries medical appointments. The public employment relations
commission may not certify a bargaining unit under this subsection
(2)(a)(ii) before July 1, 2013;
(b) The exclusive bargaining representatives of language access
providers in the units specified in (a) of this subsection shall be the
representatives chosen in ((an)) elections conducted pursuant to RCW
41.56.070.
Bargaining authorization cards furnished as the showing of interest
in support of any representation petition or motion for intervention
filed under this section are exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW;
(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in
RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for language
access providers under this section is limited solely to: (i) Economic
compensation, such as the manner and rate of payments; (ii)
professional development and training; (iii) labor-management
committees; and (iv) grievance procedures. Retirement benefits are not
subject to collective bargaining. By such obligation neither party may
be compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession
unless otherwise provided in this chapter;
(d) In addition to the entities listed in the mediation and
interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and
41.56.480, the provisions apply to the governor or the governor's
designee and the exclusive bargaining representatives of language
access providers, except that:
(i) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall
consider the financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement;
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of
the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, the decision is not
binding on the state;
(e) Language access providers do not have the right to strike.
(3) Language access providers who are public employees solely for
the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this
section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any other
purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the collective
bargaining relationship between the employer and language access
providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Each party with whom the department of social and health
services and the department of labor and industries contract((s)) for
language access services and each of their subcontractors shall provide
to the respective department an accurate list of language access
providers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, including their names,
addresses, and other contact information, annually by January 30th,
except that initially for language access providers as defined in RCW
41.56.030(10)(a)(ii) the lists must be provided within thirty days of
((June 10, 2010)) July 1, 2013. The department shall, upon request,
provide a list of all language access providers, including their names,
addresses, and other contact information, to a labor union seeking to
represent language access providers.
(5) This section does not create or modify:
(a) The ((department's)) obligation of the department of social and
health services or the department of labor and industries to comply
with the federal statute and regulations; and
(b) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under chapter 74.04 RCW or Title 51 RCW.
The governor may not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under
this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights
described in this subsection.
(6) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (7) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered
into under this section or for legislation necessary to implement the
agreement.
(7) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and
benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into
under this section may not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless the request has been:
(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October
1st prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be
considered, except that, for initial negotiations under this section
for the unit defined in subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section, the
request may not be submitted before July 1, ((2011)) 2014; and
(b) Certified by the director of financial management as
financially feasible for the state or reflective of a binding decision
of an arbitration panel reached under subsection (2)(d) of this
section.
(8) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, any collective bargaining agreement must be
reopened for the sole purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to
implement the agreement.
(9) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(10) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and
conditions specified in the agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement.
(11) If an exclusive bargaining representative represents both
bargaining units defined in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the
governor and the exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate
one collective bargaining agreement on behalf of all language access
providers in both bargaining units.
(12) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide
state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the
joint activities of language access providers and their exclusive
bargaining representative to the extent the activities are authorized
by this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.04.025 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 63 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department, the authority, and the office of administrative
hearings shall ensure that bilingual services are provided to non-English speaking applicants and recipients. The services shall be
provided to the extent necessary to assure that non-English speaking
persons are not denied, or unable to obtain or maintain, services or
benefits because of their inability to speak English.
(2) If the number of non-English speaking applicants or recipients
sharing the same language served by any community service office client
contact job classification equals or exceeds fifty percent of the
average caseload of a full-time position in such classification, the
department shall, through attrition, employ bilingual personnel to
serve such applicants or recipients.
(3) Regardless of the applicant or recipient caseload of any
community service office, each community service office shall ensure
that bilingual services required to supplement the community service
office staff are provided through contracts with language access
providers, local agencies, or other community resources.
(4) The department shall certify, authorize, and qualify language
access providers as needed to maintain an adequate pool of providers.
(5) The department shall require compliance with RCW 41.56.113(2)
through its contracts with third parties.
(6) Initial client contact materials shall inform clients in all
primary languages of the availability of interpretation services for
non-English speaking persons. Basic informational pamphlets shall be
translated into all primary languages.
(7) To the extent all written communications directed to applicants
or recipients are not in the primary language of the applicant or
recipient, the department and the office of administrative hearings
shall include with the written communication a notice in all primary
languages of applicants or recipients describing the significance of
the communication and specifically how the applicants or recipients may
receive assistance in understanding, and responding to if necessary,
the written communication. The department shall assure that sufficient
resources are available to assist applicants and recipients in a timely
fashion with understanding, responding to, and complying with the
requirements of all such written communications.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor who
provides spoken language interpreter services for department
appointments or medicaid enrollee appointments((, or provided these
services on or after January 1, 2009, and before June 10, 2010)),
whether paid by a broker, language access agency, or the department.
"Language access provider" does not mean: An owner, manager, or
employee of a broker or a language access agency; an interpreter
appointed or required in legal proceedings pursuant to RCW 2.43.030; or
an interpreter under the medicaid administrative match program.
(b) "Department appointment" does not include legal proceedings of
any nature, including criminal, civil, or administrative proceedings at
any level.
(c) "Medicaid enrollee appointment" does not include medicaid
administrative match program appointments or any other service provided
pursuant to that program.
(d) "Primary languages" includes but is not limited to Spanish,
Vietnamese, Cambodian, Laotian, and Chinese.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act applies both prospectively and
retroactively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---