BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium and subsequent fiscal
biennia, the legislature shall enact an appropriations bill that
appropriates from the general fund and related funds for that fiscal
biennium a total amount that, when combined with all appropriations
from the general fund and related funds for that fiscal biennium made
as of the date of the appropriations bill's passage and the amount of
any general fund moneys to be transferred to the budget stabilization
account pursuant to Article VII, section 12 of the state Constitution,
does not exceed the beginning general fund and related funds balances
and any enacted general fund and related funds resources for that
fiscal biennium. For purposes of this subsection, resource estimates
must reflect the most recent revenue forecast of the economic and
revenue forecast council.
(2) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium and subsequent fiscal
biennia, the legislature shall enact an appropriations bill that
requires for the next ensuing fiscal biennium general fund and related
funds appropriations necessary to maintain the continuing costs of
program and service levels either funded in that appropriations bill or
mandated by other state law, of a total amount that, when combined with
all projected appropriations from the general fund and related funds
for that fiscal biennium and the amount of any general fund moneys
projected to be transferred to the budget stabilization account
pursuant to Article VII, section 12 of the state Constitution, does not
exceed the beginning general fund and related funds balance and any
enacted general fund and related funds resources for that fiscal
biennium. For purposes of this subsection, resource estimates must
reflect the most recent revenue forecast of the economic and revenue
forecast council.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to an
appropriations bill that makes net reductions in general fund and
related funds appropriations and is enacted between July 1st and
February 15th of any fiscal year.
(4) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to an
appropriations bill that is enacted by a favorable vote of three-fifths
of the members of each house of the legislature.
(5) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply in a fiscal
biennium in which money is appropriated from the budget stabilization
account.
(6) "Related funds," as used in this section, means the Washington
opportunity pathways account, the education legacy trust account, and
such other funds and accounts as deemed appropriate by the economic and
revenue forecast council under RCW 82.33.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.33.010 and 1990 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The economic and revenue forecast council is hereby created.
The council shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor
and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of
each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of
representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among
the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers
as the members deem necessary.
(2) The council shall employ an economic and revenue forecast
supervisor to supervise the preparation of all economic and revenue
forecasts and state budget outlooks. As used in this chapter,
"supervisor" means the economic and revenue forecast supervisor.
Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the council
is required for any decisions regarding employment of the supervisor.
Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each term of three
years. At the end of the first year of each three-year term the
council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by one year.
The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The supervisor
shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this
section.
(3) The economic and revenue forecast council shall oversee the
preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four
members, the official, optimistic, and pessimistic state economic and
revenue forecasts prepared under RCW 82.33.020. If the council is
unable to approve a forecast before a date required in RCW 82.33.020,
the supervisor shall submit the forecast without approval and the
forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by the council.
(4) The economic and revenue forecast council shall oversee the
preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four
members, the state budget outlook prepared under section 3 of this act.
If the council is unable to approve a state budget outlook before a
date required in section 3 of this act, the supervisor shall submit the
outlook without approval and the outlook shall have the same effect as
if approved by the council.
(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for
approval of the official economic and revenue forecast or the state
budget outlook may request, and the supervisor shall provide, an
alternative economic and revenue forecast or state budget outlook based
on assumptions specified by the member.
(((5))) (6) Members of the economic and revenue forecast council
shall serve without additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending
sessions of the council or on official business authorized by the
council. Nonlegislative members of the council shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.33 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To facilitate compliance with, and subject to the terms of,
section 1 of this act, four times each year the supervisor shall
prepare, subject to the approval of the economic and revenue forecast
council under RCW 82.33.010, an official state budget outlook for state
revenues and expenditures for the general fund and related funds. In
odd-numbered years, the period covered by the November state budget
outlook shall be the current fiscal biennium and the next ensuing
fiscal biennium. In even-numbered years, the period covered by the
November budget outlook shall be the next two ensuing fiscal biennia.
The revenue and caseload projections used in the outlook must reflect
the most recent official forecasts adopted by the economic and revenue
forecast council and the caseload forecast council for the years for
which those forecasts are available. The outlook shall clearly state
the assumptions used in the baseline expenditure estimates and any
adjustments made to those estimates. The outlook shall clearly state
the assumptions used in the baseline revenue estimates and any
adjustments to those estimates. The outlook must include the impact of
previously enacted legislation with a future implementation date.
(2) The supervisor shall submit state budget outlooks prepared
under this section, along with any unofficial state budget outlooks
provided under RCW 82.33.010, to the governor and the members of the
committees on ways and means of the senate and house of
representatives, including one copy to the staff of each of the
committees, on or before the dates specified in RCW 82.33.020(2).
(3) Each January, the supervisor shall also prepare, subject to the
approval of the economic and revenue forecast council, a state budget
outlook for state revenues and expenditures that reflects the
governor's proposed budget document submitted to the legislature under
chapter 43.88 RCW. Within thirty days following enactment of an
operating budget by the legislature, the supervisor shall prepare,
subject to the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council,
a state budget outlook for state revenues and expenditures that
reflects the enacted budget.
(4) All agencies of state government shall provide to the
supervisor immediate access to all information relating to state budget
outlooks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.33 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To promote the free flow of information and to promote
legislative input in the preparation of the state budget outlook,
immediate access to all information relating to the state budget
outlook shall be available to the state budget outlook work group,
hereby created. The state budget outlook work group shall consist of
one staff member selected by the executive head or chairperson of each
of the following agencies or committees:
(a) Office of financial management;
(b) Legislative evaluation and accountability program committee;
(c) Office of the state treasurer;
(d) Office of the state actuary;
(e) Ways and means committee of the senate; and
(f) Ways and means committee of the house of representatives.
(2) The state budget outlook work group shall provide technical
support to the economic and revenue forecast council. Meetings of the
state budget outlook work group may be called by any member of the
group for the purpose of assisting the economic and revenue forecast
council, reviewing the state budget outlook, or for any other purpose
which may assist the economic and revenue forecast council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---