BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88.110 and 2009 c 518 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section sets forth the expenditure programs and the allotment
and reserve procedures to be followed by the executive branch for
public funds.
(1) Allotments of an appropriation for any fiscal period shall
conform to the terms, limits, or conditions of the appropriation.
(2) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of operating and capital instructions for preparing
a statement of proposed expenditures at least thirty days before the
beginning of a fiscal period. The set of instructions need not include
specific appropriation amounts for the agency.
(3) Within forty-five days after the beginning of the fiscal period
or within forty-five days after the governor signs the omnibus biennial
appropriations act, whichever is later, all agencies shall submit to
the governor a statement of proposed expenditures at such times and in
such form as may be required by the governor.
(4) The office of financial management shall develop a method for
monitoring capital appropriations and expenditures that will capture at
least the following elements:
(a) Appropriations made for capital projects including
transportation projects;
(b) Estimates of total project costs including past, current,
ensuing, and future biennial costs;
(c) Comparisons of actual costs to estimated costs;
(d) Comparisons of estimated construction start and completion
dates with actual dates;
(e) Documentation of fund shifts between projects.
This data may be incorporated into the existing accounting system
or into a separate project management system, as deemed appropriate by
the office of financial management.
(5) The office of financial management, prior to approving
allotments for major capital construction projects valued over five
million dollars, shall institute procedures for reviewing such projects
at the predesign stage that will reduce long-term costs and increase
facility efficiency. The procedures shall include, but not be limited
to, the following elements:
(a) Evaluation of facility program requirements and consistency
with long-range plans;
(b) Utilization of a system of cost, quality, and performance
standards to compare major capital construction projects; and
(c) A requirement to incorporate value-engineering analysis and
constructability review into the project schedule.
(6) No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into for
such major capital construction projects including, without exception,
land acquisition, site development, predesign, design, construction,
and equipment acquisition and installation, until the allotment of the
funds to be expended has been approved by the office of financial
management. This limitation does not prohibit the continuation of
expenditures and obligations into the succeeding biennium for projects
for which allotments have been approved in the immediate prior
biennium.
(7)(a) Beginning January 1, 2013, if at any time during the fiscal
period the governor projects a cash deficit in a particular fund or
account as defined by RCW 43.88.050, the governor shall make across-the-board reductions in allotments for that particular fund or account
so as to prevent a cash deficit, unless the legislature has directed
the liquidation of the cash deficit over one or more fiscal periods.
(b)(i) From the effective date of this section until January 1,
2013, if at any time during the fiscal period the governor projects a
cash deficit in a particular fund or account as defined by RCW
43.88.050, then as set forth in (b) of this subsection the governor
shall make across-the-board reductions in the total amount allotted to
each agency from each appropriation from that fund or account so as to
prevent a cash deficit, unless the legislature has directed the
liquidation of the cash deficit over one or more fiscal periods.
(ii) The percentage reduction applied to individual allotments of
an agency's total allotments from each appropriation from that fund or
account may vary, but each agency's total allotments from each
appropriation from that fund or account must be uniformly reduced by
the percentage necessary to prevent a cash deficit. Where a portion of
an appropriation is provided solely for a particular purpose,
allotments of that portion of the appropriation may be reduced only by
the same percentage as the overall appropriation.
(iii) Allotments for the following programs may be reduced only by
a percentage equal to one-third of the percentage reduction applied to
total allotments of appropriations under (b)(ii) of this subsection:
(A) Direct custody in the department of corrections and the
juvenile rehabilitation administration;
(B) The special commitment center of the department of social and
health services; and
(C) State institutions of higher education and state appropriations
for financial aid.
(iv) Basic education programs, debt service on state bonds, state
contributions to retirement systems, and programs for which a defined
benefit is specifically mandated in statute are exempt from across-the-board allotment reductions under this subsection (7)(b) and allotments
for these purposes shall not be included when calculating the allotment
reductions.
(8) Except for the legislative and judicial branches and other
agencies headed by elective officials, the governor shall review the
statement of proposed operating expenditures for reasonableness and
conformance with legislative intent. The governor may request
corrections of proposed allotments submitted by the legislative and
judicial branches and agencies headed by elective officials if those
proposed allotments contain significant technical errors.
(9) Once the governor approves the proposed allotments, further
revisions may at the request of the office of financial management or
upon the agency's initiative be made on a quarterly basis and must be
accompanied by an explanation of the reasons for significant changes.
If the governor initiates across-the-board allotment revisions under
subsection (7)(b) of this section, the office of financial management
shall provide notice to the appropriate legislative fiscal committees
of the proposed revisions, including the explanation for the
significant changes, and the revisions may not take effect until ten
days after this notice is provided. However, changes in appropriation
level authorized by the legislature, changes required by across-the-board reductions mandated by the governor, changes caused by executive
increases to spending authority, and changes caused by executive
decreases to spending authority for failure to comply with the
provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW may require additional revisions.
Revisions shall not be made retroactively. However, the governor may
assign to a reserve status any portion of an agency appropriation
withheld as part of across-the-board reductions made by the governor
and any portion of an agency appropriation conditioned on a contingent
event by the appropriations act. The governor may remove these amounts
from reserve status if the across-the-board reductions are subsequently
modified or if the contingent event occurs. The director of financial
management shall enter approved statements of proposed expenditures
into the state budgeting, accounting, and reporting system within
forty-five days after receipt of the proposed statements from the
agencies. If an agency or the director of financial management is
unable to meet these requirements, the director of financial management
shall provide a timely explanation in writing to the legislative fiscal
committees.
(((8))) (10) It is expressly provided that all agencies shall be
required to maintain accounting records and to report thereon in the
manner prescribed in this chapter and under the regulations issued
pursuant to this chapter. Within ninety days of the end of the fiscal
year, all agencies shall submit to the director of financial management
their final adjustments to close their books for the fiscal year.
Prior to submitting fiscal data, written or oral, to committees of the
legislature, it is the responsibility of the agency submitting the data
to reconcile it with the budget and accounting data reported by the
agency to the director of financial management.
(((9))) (11) The director of financial management may exempt
certain public funds from the allotment controls established under this
chapter if it is not practical or necessary to allot the funds.
Allotment control exemptions expire at the end of the fiscal biennium
for which they are granted. The director of financial management shall
report any exemptions granted under this subsection to the legislative
fiscal committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---