BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Freedom of speech, freedom of petition, and freedom of assembly
are hollow rights if people feel unable to be heard.
(2) Freedom to be heard is not mentioned in the United States
Constitution and thus is a right reserved to the people under the ninth
amendment.
(3) The accounting profession has fully developed financial audits
of tangible accounting for fraud but has not yet developed ways to
measure intangible accounting of human assets such as the espirit de
corps and stakeholder interests and concerns of citizens in their
various roles as taxpayers, clients, patients, consumers, workers, and
constituent members of organizations.
(4) The economic collapse of Enron and WorldCom and other similar
economic experiences demonstrate that there is a need in society to
continue to develop intangible accounting procedures of "compliance
audits" and "performance audits," now performed by the state auditor,
and to develop new "social audits" and "internal audits" of intangible
accounting assets to allow all interested citizens to participate in
the legitimating of the free enterprise system and its economic and
political institutions.
(5) The forum foundation is a nonprofit, research corporation of
Washington state organized in 1970 to improve the functioning of
organizations and society based on futures research and administrative
theory conducted at the University of Washington from 1968-70,
continued at the church council of greater Seattle from 1971-90,
recognized partially by 1993 Senate Resolution 8636 and fully
documented in the book The Leadership of Civilization Building
(Administrative and Civilization Theory, Symbolic Dialogue, and Citizen
Skills for the 21st Century) by Richard J. Spady and Richard S. Kirby
in collaboration with Cecil H. Bell, Jr.), 2002, available in Seattle,
King County, University of Washington libraries and University and
Elliott Bay bookstores, Seattle, and the Cokesbury bookstore in
Kirkland.
(6) There is a need to create a citizen councilor network of small
discussion groups, open to all citizens, self-funded, and using
symbolic dialogue to communicate among political and economic leaders
and the people at large.
(7) Governments have been unable to discuss the merits of citizen
participation and zeitgeist communication in a substantive manner to
this date.
(8) The passage of Initiative Measure No. 695 in 1999, Initiative
Measure No. 776 in 2002, and the defeat of Referendum Measure No. 53 in
2002 are social indicators that governments, business, media, and
community organizations need improved listening skills in order to
substitute human responsibility for futile strife and hatreds.
(9) The governor has a constitutional responsibility to administer
state affairs, the legislature has a constitutional responsibility to
enact legislation in the state, and citizens have a political right to
be heard and enabled to participate viably with their opinions in their
organizations, institutions, and governments in the state in a process
of building social capital and improving community mental health and
happiness, one of the goals of all governments, for "life, liberty, and
the pursuit of happiness."
(10) The Washington state auditor has a constitutional
responsibility and independently serves the citizens of Washington by
promoting accountability, fiscal integrity, and openness in state and
local government. The approach of an auditor's work is constantly
professionally evolving through new administrative theories involving
the use of new symbolic dialogue, in social audits and internal audits
of intangible human assets along with regular financial, compliance,
and performance audits as done in Washington and other states.
Furthermore, in working with these governments in partnerships, the
auditor strives to ensure the proper use of public resources to enable
its citizens to more clearly envision their future in the theme,
"Washington, an inspirational state in pursuit of happiness!"
(11) More than two thousand four hundred local governments of
thirty-three different types and one hundred sixty-eight state
agencies, colleges, universities, boards, and commissions are
administered and audited for fiscal accountability of roughly eighty-
four billion dollars annually. Furthermore, as relationships are in
partnerships with governments, the state auditor reports are
constructive management tools for them to use.
(12) Accountability is a goal both of administration and auditing,
but accountability is fundamental to the work of the state auditor as
audits touch heavily on legal compliance with state laws and rules and
governmental entities' own policies and ordinances.
(13) Similar experiences in other states including Texas, Colorado,
Oregon, and Utah have been positive to create a public forum to restore
citizens' trust in their governments, expand social capital, and
improve community mental health.
(14) Washington has long been recognized as a precursor state in
social and economic innovation. It was the only state that emerged
from the national bicentennial celebration in 1976 to use the last of
its resources from royalties to fund ongoing programs in citizen
participation. Washington was able to discern that it was not quite
volunteerism they were after in the statement: "Give me your body,
your hands, your time." Rather Washington was more interested in the
theme, "give me your mind," which was significantly different.
Furthermore, our nation is now on the verge of major discoveries in
social science and some of the major discoveries have been occurring
here in Washington state and the greater Seattle area by the forum
foundation and was recognized as such in 1993 Senate Resolution No.
8636. This recognition has been further augmented by publication in
2002 by the forum foundation of (a) The Leadership of Civilization
Building (Administrative and Civilization Theory, Symbolic Dialogue,
and Citizen Skills for the 21st Century) by Richard J. Spady and
Richard S. Kirby with collaboration of Cecil H. Bell, Jr. in Seattle
and (b) Society's Breakthrough! (Releasing Essential Wisdom and Virtue
in All the People) by Jim Rough in Port Townsend, and (c) acceptance of
the fast forum technique by the Washington association of churches to
inaugurate research in a youth religious councilor network.
(15) It is natural in our democratic republic that the citizens of
Washington state be invited to participate in its governing processes
within their time and energy levels in the exercise of their political
rights whenever possible and help the governor, legislature, and the
state auditor in their constitutional responsibilities to administer,
legislate, and monitor all governments, public entities, and public
funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature recognizes that some
citizens have difficulty accessing political processes that rely on
public hearings held at locations that are often distant or held at
inappropriate times from their residence or workplace. To increase
public participation in the political process, the legislature intends
to establish and support a self-funding pilot process in cooperation
with the state auditor and the secretary of state by which citizens can
receive information about public issues and provide feedback to elected
officials in a convenient, timely manner and local setting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The office of citizen councilor is
created in accordance with section 13 of this act. Any citizen
registered to vote, or who lives or works in Washington but is not a
registered voter, who volunteers to act as an official government
advisor may become a citizen councilor on request by sending a letter
to the state auditor or by calling a special toll-free number and
subscribing to a nominal fee as set by the state auditor to recover
substantially the direct costs from citizen participation in the
program. The indirect costs of public officials, university, and
government employee participation to provide information to citizen
councilors in their dialogues and deliberations shall be borne by the
government entity or university participating. Citizen councilors
shall act collectively as official advisors or a sounding board for the
governor, the legislature, the state auditor, or other public officials
and agencies such as the department of community, trade, and economic
development on issues of public interest or concern. Conveners of
citizen councilor groups shall be those designated by the citizen
councilor coordinator or deputy citizen councilor coordinator under
sections 7 and 8 of this act from among citizen councilors who
volunteer to host a group. Every effort shall be made to assign
citizen councilors to a group that meets at a convenient time and place
for those participating. Meetings will usually be in small groups
meeting in related resident or work area zip codes.
(2) Citizen councilors may participate:
(a) In a citizen councilor group of approximately eight to twelve
persons organized by residence or work area zip code with the
assistance of the citizen councilor coordinator;
(b) In a citizen councilor organizational group under sections 9
and 10 of this act; or
(c) As an individual if the individual is unable to attend meetings
in groups due to age, disability, remote location, or personality
conflict.
(3) Citizen councilors will be reassigned a group on request to
assure that their group meeting place, time, and makeup is convenient
and compatible, or the citizen councilor coordinator may make
individual assignments of a councilor when deemed necessary.
(4) For the purposes of this section and sections 4 through 13 of
this act, "councilor" means an official advisor to a sovereign or chief
magistrate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The state auditor shall prepare by March
1st of each year a citizen councilor network opinionnaire as a social
audit using the fast forum technique as developed by forum foundation
research. This initial opinionnaire shall be based on the state of the
union address of the president of the United States together with a few
"performance audit" questions posed by the state auditor and consist of
four pages of approximately twenty-three to thirty questions. In
addition, legislators from each legislative district may submit to the
state auditor by February 1st a list of approximately twenty to twenty-seven questions to be appended to the state of the union questions for
response of citizen councilors in their own district. The state
auditor may append questions in a district if the legislators of a
district do not do so. If district legislators cannot agree together
on the questions to be submitted, then each senator shall get one-half
the space available as determined by the state auditor and each
representative shall be given one quarter. The state auditor or the
state auditor's representative may edit all questions submitted for
grammar and style with the overall opinionnaire format.
(2) The governor may prepare by March 15th of each year a citizen
councilor network opinionnaire to be administered by the state auditor
and using the fast forum technique as developed by forum foundation's
research. The opinionnaire shall be based on the state of the state
address or other concerns of the governor and consist of four pages of
approximately twenty-three to thirty questions with editing by the
state auditor to assure a style consistent with the state of the union
address or typical yes/no, multiple choice, Likert, or end-anchor value
questions used by the fast forum technique. In addition, legislators
from each legislative district may submit to the state auditor by the
end of April a list of approximately twenty to twenty-seven questions
to be appended to the state of the state questions for response of
citizen councilors in their district. The state auditor may append
questions in a district if the legislators of a district do not do so.
If district legislators cannot agree together on the questions to be
submitted, then each senator shall get one-half the space available as
determined by the state auditor and each representative shall be given
one-quarter. The state auditor or the state auditor's representative
may edit all questions submitted for grammar and style with the overall
opinionnaire. If the governor does not prepare a citizen councilor
network opinionnaire by March 15th, the state auditor will convene a
citizen's wisdom council to select the issue or issues for
consideration partially based on concepts in the book Society's
Breakthrough! (Releasing Essential Wisdom and Virtue in All the
People), 2002, by Jim Rough of Port Townsend in accordance with
sections of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) On request of the state auditor, the
secretary of state shall select a citizen's wisdom council composed of
twelve statewide registered voters selected randomly by lot using
public lotto-type mechanical drawing procedures to symbolically
represent the people of the state of Washington and ascertain that all
selected are willing to participate and to make random replacements if
necessary.
(2) In any event, the state auditor shall convene a citizen's
wisdom council annually and appoint a facilitator to the council who is
experienced in helping diverse people reach unanimous conclusions on
difficult topics. The purpose of the citizen's wisdom council is to
create the next agenda for the citizen councilor network. Before
adjournment, the citizens wisdom council will prioritize their
statements generated concerning the agenda for the state auditor by
consensus or failing that by majority rule. The state auditor shall
establish policies and procedures for convening the citizen's wisdom
council, and will promote widespread media coverage of the event.
Results of the citizen's wisdom council at its conclusion will be
presented in a public ceremony.
(3) The expenses and standard per diem allowances for legislators
will be provided to the members of the citizen's wisdom council for
their work and a professional honorarium will be paid to the
facilitator under sections 11, 12, and 13 of this act.
(4) The state auditor will assign the topics and priority of the
citizen's wisdom council to the citizen councilor coordinator for
development of an opinionnaire and supportive materials by one or more
value reporters in accordance with section 6(2) of this act and effect
the social audit and symbolic dialogue network.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Other than the state of the union, state
of the state, and citizen's wisdom council opinionnaire and materials,
the state auditor shall determine suggested issues for public dialogue
and deliberation in a social audit approximately quarterly but not more
than monthly from suggestions received from the governor, the
legislature, state and local public officials, agencies, counties,
municipalities, and individual citizen councilors and recommend an
appropriate issue or issues for consideration by the citizen councilor
network to a steering committee and under subsection (2) of this
section. An advisory citizen councilor steering committee shall be
composed of the following nonvoting members: (a) A representative from
the governor's office; (b) legislative members: One member of the
minority party and one member of the majority party from each house of
the legislature; (c) a representative from the superintendent of public
instruction; (d) a representative from each county; (e) a
representative from each regional government; (f) a representative of
higher education; (g) a representative from the association of
Washington cities; (h) a representative from any organization
participating with over fifty groups of eight to twelve persons under
section 10 of this act; (i) the citizen councilor coordinator and
deputy citizen councilor coordinator selected as provided in section 7
of this act; and (j) others invited by the state auditor. All will
serve without remuneration except if expenses are provided otherwise by
law by their own agency to public persons attending. Travel expenses
may be provided on request to steering committee members if funds are
available at the sole discretion of the citizen councilor coordinator
or deputy citizen councilor coordinator.
(2) After consideration and advice by the members of the steering
committee, the state auditor, as an elected public official, shall
determine and assign the issue or issues approved for discussion to the
volunteer citizen councilor coordinator for preparation and
implementation by value reporters and others, except that the first
meeting of a group will be an orientation meeting prepared by the state
auditor unless the group was organized and already functioning under
the auspices of the Washington association of churches or others before
the effective date of this act. Value reporters assigned to gather
information on issues shall be careful to present all issues as
evenhandedly as possible, taking care to present the generally
prevailing viewpoints surrounding an issue or issues from experts,
officials, scholars, and others in an effort to provide the public with
information needed for discussion. Value reporters shall represent the
people's right to know and will conduct interviews of experts,
officials, scholars, and others to solicit their various viewpoints and
record such interviews on audio or videotape for later reproduction and
distribution to citizen councilor groups. Before any materials are
released to citizen councilor groups, however, persons interviewed and
taped shall approve their taped interview for release or complete
another interview to their satisfaction, otherwise their statement
shall not be included in materials sent to citizens.
(3) The state auditor shall refer the public information material
prepared by the citizen councilor coordinator, deputy citizen councilor
coordinator, and their staffs to the steering committee for its review
and recommendations. The governor for his state of the state address
and the state auditor for all other opinionnaire materials shall make
the final determination of all materials distributed to citizen
councilors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The offices of citizen councilor coordinator
and deputy citizen councilor coordinator are created within the office
of the state auditor. The state auditor shall appoint the citizen
councilor coordinator and deputy citizen councilor coordinator with the
advice of the steering committee, if available. The citizen councilor
coordinator and deputy citizen councilor coordinator shall serve at the
pleasure of the state auditor, until terminated with the approval of
the steering committee, and shall be citizen volunteers and serve
without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses
incurred in carrying out their duties under sections 1 through 13 of
this act as funds for subscriptions and donations are available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The citizen councilor coordinator and deputy
citizen councilor coordinator shall:
(1) Promote to the citizens of the state and northwest region the
citizen councilor program and its contribution to public and private
planning processes;
(2) Oversee preparation, tabulation, summarization, and
dissemination of data and information by the government and volunteer
staff;
(3) Receive, on behalf of the citizen councilor revolving fund,
gifts and donations of real or personal property, including cash and
in-kind services;
(4) Hire a value reporter and other paid staff to assist the
volunteer staff if funds are available;
(5) Contract for any services including without limitation a toll-
free telephone number and answering service, keying, optical scanning,
computer tabulation, recording, reporting, research, consulting,
printing, and mailing to carry out sections 1 through 13 of this act;
(6) Solicit volunteers to assist in administering the program from
community service, educational, civic, business, religious, and other
organizations;
(7) Solicit citizen councilor groups from existing organizations;
(8) Solicit individual citizen councilors to participate in local
groups organized by mutual convenience usually within the same
residence or work zip code area;
(9) Assign value reporters to interview scholars, experts, public
officials, planners, leaders, and others on tape concerning topics of
discussion assigned by the state auditor;
(10) Produce audio or video cassette tapes, or both, and printed
materials as evenhandedly as possible;
(11) Mail or distribute by e-mail public information materials to
citizen councilor communicators for conveners or individual citizen
councilors, or both, after final approval by the state auditor;
(12) Provide, at cost, group mailing labels of its own conveners on
request of an organization participating or to a county, regional
government, municipality, or school district if a private iteration of
their own constituents is desired at their own time and expense;
(13) Machine-scan or key, or both, citizen councilor response
sheets and tabulate data;
(14) Mail organizational, community, school, business, or church
profiles to the leaders of such participating organizations for their
information and without cost when they have over fifty groups
responding statewide. Such information shall be filed for public
review;
(15) Prepare summary reports of data generated and press releases
and post the data for public analysis on a web site when the technology
is available;
(16) Mail summary reports and other information to all citizen
councilor conveners for their groups and to participating
organizations, and to those public officials who have indicated to the
citizen councilor coordinator that they are interested; and
(17) Maintain data generated for public and media reference in the
state auditor's office and/or posted on a web site for public access.
The secretary of state will cooperate with the state auditor on
request by providing information on initiatives, referendums, and the
Washington state voters' pamphlet for the consideration of the citizen
councilor network in their dialogues and deliberations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The citizen councilor coordinator shall
actively encourage citizen councilor groups to form throughout the
state. Citizen councilor groups shall usually consist of a minimum of
eight and a maximum of twelve regularly assigned members and meet on
call of their convener at times and places they deem most appropriate
during a thirty-day or other designated time period. Citizen councilor
groups might normally meet approximately two or three times per year on
state issues, one or two times on county or municipal issues, and one
time on federal issues in response to the president of the United
States through the state of the union address. They shall have the
opportunity to listen to audio or videotapes articulating an issue of
public interest or concern and study other materials prepared or
authorized as described in section 4 of this act. Citizen councilors
shall have the opportunity to respond anonymously making their opinions
known on individual mark-sense response sheets for return to the
citizen councilor coordinator for keying or optical scanning,
tabulation, and analysis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Eight through twelve citizens from
organizations such as, but not limited to, community service, civic
associations, cooperatives, unions, religious, business, or school
district groups may enroll as an organizational group with their own
communicator and convener designated. An organizational profile report
shall be provided the leaders of organizations with fifty or more
groups without cost to inform them of how their members responded to
public issues posed as approved by the state auditor and others and
shall be open to public inspection in the office of the state auditor
or posted on a web site for public analysis. If additional profiles or
services are requested by an organization of its own constituents, the
policy, rules, and fees to cover such costs shall be paid separately.
Organizations with fifty or more groups may purchase mailing labels of
their group conveners from the state auditor and prepare and mail their
own group materials for tabulation at their own effort and expense.
These data shall not be tabulated by the citizen councilor coordinator
and shall not be combined with the public data nor available for public
inspection at the office of the state auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Each citizen councilor shall be asked
to make donations from time to time to help cover the costs of the
citizen councilor program estimated at fifteen to twenty dollars per
person per year at present costs. It is also the intention of the
state auditor that donations and gifts be solicited from public-spirited individuals, businesses, and foundations to assist in the
funding of the program and to provide scholarships to unemployed or
low-income citizens. However, since all direct costs of this program
are provided by donations and subscriptions with no funds from public
sources, the citizen councilor coordinator shall use his or her
discretion in determining the scale and the scope of the program so
that expenses do not exceed available funds.
(2) Libraries will be encouraged to participate and allow citizens
who are not members of a citizen councilor group to respond to the
state of the union opinionnaire with appended questions by district
legislators as well as state of the state with appended questions and
wisdom council opinionnaires. A citizen may purchase a machine-scannable response sheet from a library at a price to cover the direct
costs to the library plus an amount to cover indirect costs. Current
costs are twenty-five cents per sheet direct cost to an organization
that includes scanning and tabulation of data plus twenty-five cents to
the library to cover indirect costs of administration which results in
fifty cents per sheet for the citizen.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A citizen councilor revolving fund is
created and shall consist of donations and subscriptions collected
under sections 1 through 13 of this act and any moneys appropriated to
it by law for specific purposes. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund
shall be on authorization of the citizen councilor coordinator or
deputy citizen councilor coordinator. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, the citizen councilor
revolving fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The state auditor will establish the
office of citizen councilor and may provide the citizen councilor
coordinator and his or her volunteer staff with space in existing
offices and with clerical services from existing staff to assist in
establishing and conducting the citizen councilor program.
Appropriations are not required, but the state auditor may consider the
services provided under this section in submitting its budget.
(2) The citizen councilor coordinator shall seek donations from
citizen councilor organizational groups, citizen councilors, public-spirited individuals, community service organizations, businesses, and
foundations to help cover the costs of the program. When ten thousand
dollars in donations have been received, the state auditor shall
authorize the citizen councilor coordinator to establish a toll-free
telephone number and answering service to develop a list of the names,
addresses, and telephone numbers of persons and groups interested in
serving as citizen councilors, citizen councilor communicators and/or
conveners, and communicators and conveners in citizen councilor
organizational groups, or in making donations. Whenever possible, the
names, addresses, and legislative districts of registered voters
maintained by the secretary of state shall be copied to reduce costs of
the state auditor while increasing accuracy of the citizen councilor
records. When ten thousand dollars in additional donations have been
received, the citizen councilor coordinator may initiate the new
communication process contemplated in sections 1 through 13 of this act
and continue it at a scope and scale that is supportable by the
resources available.
(3) In the event the program under sections 1 through 13 of this
act fails to support its direct costs and is necessary to be terminated
by the state auditor, funds remaining after payment of all outstanding
expenses and disposal of equipment and supplies owned shall be
deposited in the general fund.
(4) The theory, programming, and procedures in this act are
pioneering and have never been used at the state level before in an
effort to design new audit processes to measure intangible human assets
of esprit de corps and the concerns and interests of stakeholder
citizens. The state auditor, as an elected public official and
constitutionally charged to monitor state government and perform
appropriate tangible asset financial audits and intangible asset
compliance, performance, social, and internal audits, should be given
the widest discretion possible in resolving problems that might arise
in administration of this new professional technology project if
necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 13 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.09 RCW.

--- END ---