BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.01.244 and 1979 ex.s. c 109 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
All state lands hereafter leased for grazing or agricultural
purposes shall be open and available to the public for purposes of
hunting and fishing, and for nonconsumptive wildlife activities, as
defined by the board of natural resources, unless closed to public
entry because of fire hazard or unless the department of natural
resources gives prior written approval and the area is lawfully posted
by lessee to prohibit hunting and fishing, and nonconsumptive wildlife
activities, thereon in order to prevent damage to crops or other land
cover, to improvements on the land, to livestock, to the lessee, or to
the general public, or closure is necessary to avoid undue interference
with carrying forward a departmental or agency program. In the event
any such lands are so posted it shall be unlawful for any person to
hunt or fish, or pursue nonconsumptive wildlife activities, on any such
posted lands. Such lands shall not be open and available for wildlife
activities when access could endanger crops on the land or when access
could endanger the person accessing the land.
The department of natural resources shall insert the provisions of
this section in all grazing and agricultural leases hereafter issued.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.68.050 and 1971 ex.s. c 234 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Multiple uses additional to and compatible with those basic
activities necessary to fulfill the financial obligations of trust
management may include but are not limited to:
(1) Recreational areas;
(2) Recreational trails for both vehicular and nonvehicular uses;
(3) Special educational or scientific studies;
(4) Experimental programs by the various public agencies;
(5) Special events;
(6) Hunting and fishing and other sports activities;
(7) Nonconsumptive wildlife activities as defined by the board of
natural resources;
(8) Maintenance of scenic areas;
(((8))) (9) Maintenance of historical sites;
(((9))) (10) Municipal or other public watershed protection;
(((10))) (11) Greenbelt areas;
(((11))) (12) Public rights of way;
(((12))) (13) Other uses or activities by public agencies;
If such additional uses are not compatible with the financial
obligations in the management of trust land they may be permitted only
if there is compensation from such uses satisfying the financial
obligations.

--- END ---