BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The western Washington center for
agriculture and garden research is created. The purpose of the western
Washington center for agriculture and garden research is to provide
statewide leadership in research and extension programs in agriculture
and gardening. The western Washington center for agriculture and
garden research exists as a quasi-administrative unit of Washington
State University, but must be a nonprofit, self-supporting membership
organization in its own right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The western Washington center for
agriculture and garden research must require membership dues and accept
those gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests, whether real
or personal property, in trust or otherwise, for the use or benefit of
the western Washington center for agriculture and garden research; and
sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds,
rents, profits, and income thereof except as limited by the terms of
the gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises; and adopt proper
rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds
of all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of all gifts,
grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The western Washington center for
agriculture and garden research is to work cooperatively with
Washington State University to maximize the use of financial resources
in addressing agriculture and gardening issues and enhancing
agricultural productivity and environmental stewardship for improved
quality of life, including, but not limited to:
(a) Urban plant health care;
(b) Environmental studies;
(c) Organic farm and food systems; and
(d) Human and community development.
(2) All assets at Washington State University's research and
extension centers located in Puyallup and Mt. Vernon must be
transferred to the western Washington center for agriculture and garden
research created in section 1 of this act by June 30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The governance of the western Washington
center for agriculture and garden research is vested in a board of
directors to consist of ten members. For the first six years of the
existence of the western Washington center for agriculture and garden
research, the directors must be appointed by the governor, with the
consent of the senate. The directors hold their offices for a term of
six years, beginning October 1, 2003. The directors hold their office
until their successors are elected by the membership of the western
Washington center for agriculture and garden research.
(2) Six members of the board of directors constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy, the governor
must fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the director
whose position has been vacated.
(3) Each director must, before entering upon the discharge of his
or her respective duties as such, execute a good and sufficient bond to
the state of Washington, with two or more sufficient sureties,
residents of the state, or with a surety company licensed to do
business within the state, in the sum of not less than five thousand
dollars, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties
as a director. However, the western Washington center for agriculture
and garden research must pay any fees incurred for such a bond for the
board members. Members of the board must be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The western Washington center for
agriculture and garden research must be managed by an administrator
hired by the board of directors.
(1) The board of directors created in section 4 of this act must
advise the administrator.
(2) It is the responsibility of the administrator, in consultation
with the board of directors, to:
(a) Recommend research and extension priorities for the western
Washington center for agriculture and garden research;
(b) Conduct a competitive grants process to solicit, review, and
prioritize research and extension proposals; and
(c) Advise Washington State University on the progress of the
development and implementation of research, teaching, and extension
programs.
(3) The western Washington center for agriculture and garden
research must cooperate with public and private laboratories.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---