BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington state's production of
baccalaureate degrees is still behind most other states. It is the
intent of the legislature to remove any systemic barriers to degree
completion for students who attend any of the state's five branch
campuses. The legislature finds that the branch campuses created in
1989 are designed to meet the needs of communities and students by
providing access to degree programs specific to the requirements of
local businesses. By offering access to lower-division coursework
required for completion of specific degree programs in particular
branch campus locations, the branch campuses will provide an even
greater opportunity to local communities and placebound students.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.45.020 and 1994 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the
expansion of upper-division and graduate educational programs in the
central Puget Sound area under rules or guidelines adopted by the
higher education coordinating board. The branch campus may offer
lower-division coursework. The University of Washington shall meet
that responsibility through the operation of at least two branch
campuses. One branch campus shall be located in the Tacoma area.
Another branch campus shall be collocated with Cascadia Community
College in the Bothell-Woodinville area.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.45.030 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
Washington State University is responsible for providing upper-division and graduate level higher education programs to the citizens
of the Tri-Cities area, under rules or guidelines adopted by the higher
education coordinating board. The branch campus may offer lower-division coursework. Washington State University shall meet that
responsibility through the operation of a branch campus in the Tri-Cities area. The branch campus shall replace and supersede the Tri-Cities university center. All land, facilities, equipment, and
personnel of the Tri-Cities university center shall be transferred from
the University of Washington to Washington State University.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.45.040 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
Washington State University is responsible for providing upper-division and graduate level higher education programs to the citizens
of the southwest Washington area, under rules or guidelines adopted by
the higher education coordinating board. The branch campus may offer
lower-division coursework. Washington State University shall meet that
responsibility through the operation of a branch campus in the
southwest Washington area.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.45.050 and 1991 c 205 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Washington State University and Eastern Washington University are
responsible for providing upper-division and graduate level programs to
the citizens of the Spokane area, under rules or guidelines adopted by
the joint center for higher education. The branch campuses may offer
lower-division coursework. However, before any degree is authorized
under this section it shall be subject to the review and approval of
the higher education coordinating board. Washington State University
shall meet its responsibility through the operation of a branch campus
in the Spokane area. Eastern Washington University shall meet its
responsibility through the operation of programs and facilities in
Spokane.

--- END ---