BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall manage wildlife programs in a manner that
provides for public opportunities to view wildlife and supports
wildlife viewing tourism without impairing the state's wildlife
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The departments of fish and wildlife and
community, trade, and economic development shall host a working
conference on promoting wildlife viewing tourism. The objective of the
conference shall be to adopt a strategic plan and specific implementing
actions to promote wildlife viewing tourism in Washington in a manner
that both provides sustainable economic development in the state's
rural areas and supports maintaining the state's wildlife diversity.
(2) The departments shall work with interested local governments,
state agencies, visitor and convention bureaus, the hospitality
industry, tourism development organizations, and tour operators and
wildlife conservation organizations in preparing for and conducting the
conference. The departments shall guide preparation for the conference
by surveying programs and activities in other states and compiling
information on current programs, infrastructure, and promotional
activities regarding wildlife viewing tourism in Washington. To
enhance the effectiveness of the conference and its products, the
departments shall seek to frame issues and outline options for
improvement through white papers and preliminary meetings with interest
groups.
(3) Among the topics that the departments and interest groups
should address at the conference are:
(a) Strategies to increase revenues and benefits to Washington
communities with wildlife viewing resources that have identified
tourism as part of their economic development strategy;
(b) Strengthening the wildlife viewing tourism elements of gateway
community partnerships among state and local transportation, economic
development, and parks and wildlife agencies;
(c) Providing leadership and services by state agencies to assist
local communities to assess their local wildlife viewing resources and
to market tourism centered upon such resources;
(d) Developing proposals to increase state funding to local
communities to implement local wildlife viewing tourism plans,
including assessing resources, providing infrastructure specific to
wildlife viewing tourism, festival development, and marketing; and
(e) Promoting wildlife viewing tourism as an element of tourism
related to the Lewis and Clark bicentennial commemoration.
(4) The departments shall schedule the conference at a time
sufficient to prepare a summary of the conference proceedings and
proposals for legislative funding to be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than December 15, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2004, from the general fund to the department of
fish and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---