BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature intends to
authorize the establishment of public charter schools within the
general and uniform system of public schools for the primary purpose of
providing more, high quality learning environments to assist
educationally disadvantaged students and other students in meeting the
state's academic standards. The legislature intends for charter
schools to function as an integral element of the public school system
maintained at public expense, free from discrimination, and open to all
students in the state, and to be subject to the same academic standards
and performance outcomes as other public schools. The legislature
intends to encourage school districts to consider using the chartering
process as an optional tool for achieving state and federal
accountability goals. The legislature finds that in addition to
providing more, high quality public school choices for families,
teachers, and students, public charter schools may be a tool for the
improvement of schools in which significant numbers of students
persistently fail to meet state standards. The legislature also
intends to authorize the use of the chartering process as a state
intervention strategy, consistent with the provisions of the federal no
child left behind act of 2001, to provide assistance to schools in
which significant numbers of students persistently fail to meet state
standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Alternate sponsor" means either: (a) The board of directors
of the educational service district in which the proposed charter
school will be located; or (b) the governing board of a state or
regional university as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or of The Evergreen
State College, when such board has approved a charter.
(2) "Applicant" means a nonprofit corporation that has submitted an
application to a sponsor or an alternate sponsor to obtain approval to
operate a charter school. The nonprofit corporation must be either a
public benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.490, or a
nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.005 that has applied for
tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code
of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)). The nonprofit corporation may not
be a sectarian or religious organization and must meet all of the
requirements for a public benefit nonprofit corporation before
receiving any funding under section 12 of this act.
(3) "Board of directors" means the board of directors appointed or
elected by the applicant to manage and operate the charter school.
(4) "Charter" means a five-year contract between an applicant and
a sponsor or an alternate sponsor. The charter establishes, in
accordance with this chapter, the terms and conditions for the
management, operation, and educational program of the charter school.
(5) "Charter school" means a public school managed by an
applicant's board of directors and operating independently of any
school district board under a charter approved in accordance with this
chapter.
(6) "Conversion charter school" means a public school converted to
a charter public school through the chartering process in accordance
with this chapter.
(7) "Educationally disadvantaged students" includes students with
limited English proficiency; students with special needs, including
students with disabilities; economically disadvantaged students,
including students who qualify for free and reduced priced meals;
students exercising choice options under the federal no child left
behind act of 2001; and other students who may be at risk of failing to
meet state and federal academic performance standards.
(8) "Sponsor" means the board of directors of the school district
in which the proposed charter school will be located, when such board
has approved a charter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 CHARTER SCHOOLS -- POWERS. (1) In carrying
out its duty to manage and operate the charter school, the board of
directors of a charter school may:
(a) Hire, manage, and discharge any charter school employee in
accordance with the terms of this chapter and that school's charter;
(b) Enter into a contract with any school district, or any other
public or private entity, also empowered to enter into contracts, for
any and all real property, equipment, goods, supplies, and services,
including educational instructional services;
(c) Rent, lease, or own property, but may not acquire property by
eminent domain. All charters and charter school contracts with other
public and private entities must include provisions regarding the
disposition of the property if the charter school fails to open as
planned, closes, or the charter is revoked or not renewed;
(d) Issue secured and unsecured debt to manage cash flow, improve
operations, or finance the acquisition of real property or equipment.
Such an issuance does not constitute an obligation, either general,
special, or moral of the state, the charter school sponsor, the school
district in which the charter school is located or any other political
subdivision or agency of the state. Neither the full faith and credit
nor the taxing power of the state, the charter school sponsor, the
school district in which the charter school is located, or any other
political subdivision or agency of the state may be pledged for the
payment of such debt;
(e) Accept and administer for the benefit of the charter school and
its students gifts, grants, and donations from other governmental and
private entities, excluding sectarian or religious organizations.
Charter schools may not accept any gifts or donations the conditions of
which violate this chapter.
(2) A charter school may not charge tuition, levy taxes, or issue
tax-backed bonds, however it may charge fees for optional noncredit
extracurricular events.
(3) Neither a charter school sponsor, an alternate sponsor, nor the
school district in which the charter school is located is liable for
acts or omissions of a charter school, including but not limited to
acts or omissions related to the application, the charter, the
operation, the performance, and the closure of the charter school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 LEGAL STATUS. A charter school is a public
school including one or more of grades kindergarten through twelve,
operated by a board of directors appointed or elected by a charter
school applicant, according to the terms of a renewable five-year
contract granted by a sponsor or an alternate sponsor. A charter
school may offer any program or course of study that another public
school may offer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 CHARTER SCHOOLS -- EXEMPTIONS. (1) A charter
school shall operate independently of any school district board, under
a charter approved by a sponsor or an alternate sponsor under this
chapter.
(2) Charter schools are exempt from all state statutes and rules
applicable to school districts and school district boards of directors
except those statutes and rules as provided for and made applicable to
charter schools in accordance with this chapter and in the school's
approved charter.
(3) A charter school's board of directors is encouraged to
implement a quality management system and to conduct an annual self-assessment.
(4) All approved charter schools shall:
(a) Comply with state and federal health, safety, parents' rights,
civil rights, and nondiscrimination laws, including, but not limited
to, chapter 28A.640 RCW (sexual equality) and Title IX of the education
amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) applicable to school
districts, and to the same extent as school districts;
(b) Participate in free and reduced priced meal programs to the
same extent as is required for other public schools;
(c) Participate in nationally normed standardized achievement tests
as required in RCW 28A.230.190, 28A.230.193, and 28A.230.230 and the
elementary, middle school, and high school standards, requirements, and
assessment examinations as required in chapter 28A.655 RCW;
(d) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW
28A.410.010, however charter schools may hire noncertificated
instructional staff of unusual competence and in exceptional cases as
specified in RCW 28A.150.260;
(e) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW
28A.400.303;
(f) Be subject to the same financial and audit requirements as a
school district, as determined by the state auditor, including annual
audits for legal and fiscal compliance;
(g) Be subject to periodic independent performance audits conducted
by or at the direction of a competent state authority to the same
extent as other public agencies, however, a charter school is not
required to bear the expense of such a performance audit;
(h) Comply with the annual performance report under RCW
28A.655.110;
(i) Follow the performance improvement goals and requirements
adopted by the academic achievement and accountability commission by
rule under RCW 28A.655.030;
(j) Be subject to the accountability requirements of the federal no
child left behind act of 2001, including Title I requirements;
(k) Comply with and be subject to the requirements under the
individuals with disabilities education act, as amended in 1997;
(l) Report at least annually to the board of directors of the
school district in which the charter school is located, to the school's
alternate sponsor if the school is not sponsored by a school district,
and to parents of children enrolled at the charter school on progress
toward the student performance goals specified in the charter;
(m) Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW
and open public records requirements in RCW 42.17.250; and
(n) Be subject to and comply with legislation enacted after the
effective date of this section governing the operation and management
of charter schools.
(5) A member of a board of directors of a charter school shall be
considered the equivalent of a board member of a school district for
the purposes of public disclosure requirements and must comply with the
reporting requirements in RCW 42.17.240.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 ADMISSION REQUIREMENTS. (1) To effectuate
the primary purpose for which the legislature established charter
schools, a charter school must be willing to enroll educationally
disadvantaged students and may not limit admission on any basis other
than age group and grade level. Consistent with the legislative intent
of this chapter, a charter school shall conduct timely outreach and
marketing efforts to educationally disadvantaged students in the school
district in which the charter school will be located.
(2) A conversion charter school must be structured to provide
sufficient capacity to enroll all students who wish to remain enrolled
in the school after its conversion to a charter school, and may not
displace students enrolled before the chartering process. If, after
enrollment of these students, capacity is insufficient to enroll all
other students remaining who have submitted a timely application, the
charter school must give enrollment priority to siblings of students
who are currently enrolled in the school. Students selected to fill
any remaining spaces must be selected only through an equitable
selection process, such as a lottery.
(3) A new charter school must enroll all students who submit a
timely application if capacity is sufficient. If capacity is
insufficient to enroll all students who apply, students must be
selected to fill any remaining spaces only through an equitable
selection process, such as a lottery. Siblings of enrolled students
and of students selected through an equitable selection process must be
given priority in enrollment if requested by a parent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CHARTER APPLICATION--CHARTERING PROCESS.
(1) An applicant may apply to a sponsor or an alternate sponsor to
establish a charter school in accordance with this section.
(2) An application for a charter school must be submitted first to
the board of directors of the school district in which the proposed
charter school will be located, allowing for the board's consideration
of the application in accordance with subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, before the application may be submitted to an alternate
sponsor.
(3) The school district board of directors must decide, within
forty-five days of receipt of the application, whether to hold a public
hearing in the school district for the purpose of taking public comment
on the application and, if a hearing is to be held, must schedule such
a hearing within seventy-five days of receipt of the application. If
the school board intends to accept the application, one or more public
hearings must be held prior to the granting of a charter; however a
school board is not required to hold a public hearing prior to
rejecting an application. The school board must either accept or
reject the application within one hundred five days after receipt of
the application. The one hundred five-day deadline for acceptance or
rejection of the charter school application may be extended for an
additional thirty days if both parties agree in writing.
(4) If the school board elects not to hold a public hearing or
rejects the application after holding one or more public hearings, the
school board must notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for
that decision. The applicant may submit a revised application for the
school board's reconsideration and the school board may provide
assistance to improve the application. If the school board rejects the
application after submission of a revised application, the school board
must notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the rejection.
(5) Applications for the conversion of a public school to a charter
public school may not be submitted to an alternate sponsor without the
prior consent of the school district board of directors. At the
request of the applicant, the sponsor, or the alternate sponsor, the
superintendent of public instruction may review the charter application
and provide technical assistance.
(6) Alternate sponsors must comply with the procedures in
subsections (1) through (4) of this section for consideration of the
charter application. An alternate sponsor is not bound by a school
district's or another alternate sponsor's findings or decision to deny
the application.
(7) The governing board of an institution of higher education that
has approved a charter application may, after exercising due diligence,
assign authority for the administration of the charter and the
oversight and monitoring of the charter school to an agency or official
designated by and accountable to the governing board of the
institution. In all cases, the governing board of the institution is
responsible for ensuring that the duties of the alternate sponsor under
this chapter are fulfilled.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall maintain copies
of all approved charter applications. An applicant may obtain copies
of those applications from the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(9) Educational service districts and the superintendent of public
instruction are encouraged to assist schools and school districts in
which significant numbers of students persistently fail to meet state
standards with completing the chartering process. Assistance from an
educational service district or from the superintendent of public
instruction may include, but is not limited to, identifying potential
eligible applicants and assisting with the charter application and
approval processes.
(10) Consistent with the corrective action provisions in the
federal no child left behind act of 2001, the superintendent of public
instruction may use the chartering process as an intervention strategy
for the purpose of meeting federal student achievement and
accountability requirements. The superintendent may require a local
school district board of directors to convert a public school to a
charter public school or, if the superintendent determines it would be
more appropriate, may require a local school district board of
directors to consent to conversion of the school to a charter school by
the board of directors of the local educational service district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS. The charter
school application is a proposed contract and must include:
(1) The identification and description of the nonprofit corporation
submitting the application, including the names, descriptions,
curriculum vitae, and qualifications, which shall be subject to
verification and review, of the individuals who will operate the
school;
(2) The nonprofit corporation's proposed articles of incorporation,
bylaws, and most recent financial statement and balance sheet;
(3) A mission statement for the proposed school, consistent with
the description of legislative intent in this chapter, including a
statement of whether the proposed charter school's primary purpose is
to serve educationally disadvantaged students;
(4) A description of the school's educational program, curriculum,
and instructional strategies, including but not limited to how the
charter school will assist its students, including educationally
disadvantaged students, in meeting the state's academic standards;
(5) A description of the school's admissions policy and marketing
program, and its deadlines for applications and admissions, including
its program for community outreach to families of educationally
disadvantaged students;
(6) A description of the school's student performance standards and
requirements that must meet those determined under chapter 28A.655 RCW,
and be measured according to the assessment system determined under
chapter 28A.655 RCW;
(7) A description of the school's plan for evaluating student
performance and the procedures for taking corrective action in the
event that student performance at the charter school falls below
standards established in its charter;
(8) A description of the financial plan for the school. The plan
shall include: (a) A proposed five-year budget of projected revenues
and expenditures; (b) a plan for starting the school; (c) a five-year
facilities plan; (d) evidence supporting student enrollment projections
of at least twenty students; and (e) a description of major contracts
planned for administration, management, equipment, and services,
including consulting services, leases, improvements, purchases of real
property, and insurance;
(9) A description of the proposed financial management procedures
and administrative operations, which shall meet or exceed generally
accepted standards of management and public accounting;
(10) An assessment of the school's potential legal liability and a
description of the types and limits of insurance coverage the nonprofit
corporation plans to obtain. For purposes of this subsection, a
liability insurance policy of five million dollars is required;
(11) A description of the procedures to discipline, suspend, and
expel students;
(12) A description of procedures to assure the health and safety of
students, employees, and guests of the school and to comply with
applicable federal and state health and safety laws and regulations;
(13) A description of the school's program for parent involvement
in the charter school;
(14) Documentation sufficient to demonstrate that the charter
school will have the liquid assets available to operate the school on
an ongoing and sound financial basis; and
(15) Supporting documentation for any additional requirements that
are appropriate and reasonably related to the operation of a charter
school that a sponsor or alternate sponsor may impose as a condition of
approving the charter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 APPROVAL CRITERIA. A sponsor or alternate
sponsor may approve an application for a charter school, if in the
sponsor's or alternate sponsor's reasonable judgment, after exercising
due diligence and good faith, the sponsor or alternate sponsor finds:
(1) The applicant is an eligible public benefit nonprofit
corporation and the individuals it proposes to manage and operate the
school are qualified to operate a charter school and implement the
proposed educational program that is free from religious or sectarian
influence;
(2) The public benefit nonprofit corporation has been approved or
conditionally approved by the internal revenue service for tax exempt
status under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3));
(3) The mission statement is consistent with the description of
legislative intent and restrictions on charter school operations in
this chapter. The sponsor or alternate sponsor must make a finding of
whether or not the charter school's primary purpose is to serve
educationally disadvantaged students;
(4) The school's educational program, including its curriculum and
instructional strategies, is likely to assist its students, including
its educationally disadvantaged students, in meeting the state's
academic standards;
(5) The school's admissions policy and marketing program is
consistent with state and federal law, and includes community outreach
to families of educationally disadvantaged students;
(6) The school's proposed educational program includes student
academic performance standards and requirements that meet those
determined under chapter 28A.655 RCW and are measured according to the
assessment system determined under chapter 28A.655 RCW;
(7) The application includes a viable plan for evaluating pupil
performance and procedures for taking appropriate corrective action in
the event that pupil performance at the charter school falls below
standards established in its charter;
(8) The financial plan for the school is designed to reasonably
support the charter school's educational program based on a review of
the proposed five-year budget of projected revenues, expenditures, and
facilities;
(9) The school's financial and administrative operations, including
its audits, meet or exceed generally accepted standards of accounting
and management;
(10) The assessment of the school's potential legal liability, and
the types and limits of insurance coverage the school plans to obtain,
are adequate. For purposes of this subsection, a liability insurance
policy of five million dollars is required;
(11) The procedures the school plans to follow for discipline,
suspension, and expulsion of students are reasonable and comply with
state and federal law;
(12) The procedures the school plans to follow to assure the health
and safety of students, employees, and guests of the school comply with
applicable state and federal health and safety laws and regulations;
(13) The school has developed a program for parent involvement in
the charter school;
(14) The charter school will have the liquid assets available to
operate the school on an ongoing and sound financial basis; and
(15) The applicant has met any additional requirements that are
appropriate and reasonably related to the operation of a charter school
that a sponsor or alternate sponsor imposed as a condition for approval
of the charter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 CHARTER AGREEMENT -- AMENDMENT. (1) A
charter application approved by a sponsor or an alternate sponsor with
any changes or additions, and signed by an authorized representative of
the applicant and the sponsor or alternate sponsor, constitutes a
charter. A charter for the conversion of a public school must include
provisions for the disposition, including assignment or reassignment,
of the employees of the school prior to its conversion and after
conversion.
(2) A charter may be amended during its term at the request of the
charter school board of directors and on the approval of the sponsor or
alternate sponsor.
(3) A charter may not prohibit and must provide for application of
laws applicable to charter schools or to charter school boards of
directors enacted after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CHARTER RENEWAL AND REVOCATION. (1) An
approved plan to establish a charter school is effective for five years
from the first day of operation. At the conclusion of the first three
years of operation, the charter school may apply to the original
sponsor or alternate sponsor for renewal. A request for renewal must
be submitted no later than six months before the expiration of the
charter.
(2) A charter school renewal application must include:
(a) A report on the progress of the charter school in achieving the
goals; student performance standards, including the student performance
standards adopted by rule by the academic achievement and
accountability commission in accordance with RCW 28A.655.030; the
number and percentage of educationally disadvantaged students served;
and other terms of the charter;
(b) A financial statement that discloses the costs of
administration, instruction, and other expenditure objects and
activities of the charter school; and
(c) All audit information from independent sources regarding the
charter school, if available.
(3) The sponsor or alternate sponsor shall reject the application
for renewal if the academic progress of students in the charter school,
as measured by the standards and assessments in chapter 28A.655 RCW, is
inferior, for the most recent two consecutive years, to the average
progress of students in the district in which the charter school is
located when similar student populations are compared.
(4) The sponsor or alternate sponsor may reject the application for
renewal if any of the following occurred:
(a) The charter school materially violated its charter with the
sponsor or alternate sponsor;
(b) The students enrolled in the charter school failed to meet
student performance standards identified in the charter, including the
student performance standards adopted by rule by the academic
achievement and accountability commission in accordance with RCW
28A.655.030;
(c) The charter school failed to meet generally accepted standards
of fiscal management; or
(d) The charter school violated provisions in law that have not
been waived in accordance with this chapter.
(5) A sponsor or alternate sponsor shall give written notice of its
intent not to renew the charter school's request for renewal to the
charter school within three months of the request for renewal to allow
the charter school an opportunity to correct identified deficiencies in
its operation. At the request of the board of directors of the charter
school, the sponsor or alternate sponsor shall review its decision for
nonrenewal within forty-five days of receiving a request for review and
supporting documentation sufficient to demonstrate that any
deficiencies have been corrected from the board of directors of the
charter school.
(6)(a) The sponsor or alternate sponsor may revoke a previously
approved charter before the expiration of the term of the charter, and
before application for renewal, if any of the following occurred:
(i) The charter school materially violated its charter with the
sponsor or alternate sponsor;
(ii) The charter school failed to meet generally accepted standards
of fiscal management; or
(iii) The charter school violated provisions in law that have not
been waived in accordance with this chapter.
(b) Except in cases of emergency where the health and safety of
children are at risk, a charter may not be revoked unless the sponsor
or alternate sponsor first provides:
(i) Written notice to the charter school of the specific violations
alleged;
(ii) One or more public hearings in the school district in which
the charter school is located; and
(iii) A reasonable opportunity and a sufficient period of time for
the charter school to correct the identified deficiencies.
(c) If, after following the procedures in (b) of this subsection,
the sponsor or alternate sponsor determines that revocation of the
charter is necessary to further the intent of this chapter, the sponsor
or alternate sponsor may revoke the charter. The sponsor or alternate
sponsor shall provide for an appeal process upon such a determination.
(d) If a sponsor or alternate sponsor elects to revoke the charter,
the sponsor or alternate sponsor, upon a request by the charter school,
shall provide technical assistance to the charter school in completing
the plan required and carrying out the tasks identified in subsection
(7) of this section.
(7) A charter school planning to close or anticipating revocation
or nonrenewal of its charter shall provide a plan setting forth a
timeline and the responsible parties for disposition of students and
student records and disposition of finances.
(a) Immediately following the decision to close a school, the
school must:
(i) Submit to the sponsor or alternate sponsor a list of parent
addresses and proof that the school has communicated the impending
closure of the school to all parents and staff;
(ii) Assign staff responsible for transition of student records and
for providing assistance to students and parents in transferring from
the charter school to the district public, private, or home school
chosen by the family;
(iii) Provide the names and contact information for staff
responsible for transfer of student records, as well as the projected
transition tasks and timelines to the sponsor or alternate sponsor, and
upon completion of student transition, provide a list of students and
a brief description of the disposition of their student records to the
sponsor or alternate sponsor.
(b) Prior to closing the charter school the charter school board of
directors shall:
(i) Identify a trustee who will, through the process of closing the
school and for a term of ten years thereafter, assume responsibility
for school and student records, and notify the sponsor or alternate
sponsor of the name and contact information for the trustee;
(ii) Determine the amount of anticipated revenue due to the school
as well as anticipated liabilities, and provide a complete asset and
liability report to the sponsor or alternate sponsor;
(iii) Create a current and projected payroll and payroll benefits
commitment;
(iv) List each employee, job, and the funds necessary to complete
the educational calendar balance of the year, the transition of
students and records, and the administrative close-down tasks;
(v) Determine the total moneys required to complete contracts;
(vi) Schedule an audit and set aside funds to cover costs; and
(vii) Provide the sponsor or alternate sponsor with a plan for the
closure of the school and final disposition of all property owned by
the charter school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 FUNDING. (1) For charter schools sponsored
by a school district:
(a) For purposes of funding, students in charter schools shall be
considered students of the sponsoring district for state apportionment
purposes. Without violating section 13 of this act, the sponsoring
school district shall provide prompt and timely funding for charter
schools in amounts the schools would have generated if the students
were enrolled in a noncharter public school in the district except that
a charter school shall not generate eligibility for small school
assistance. Funding for charter schools shall include regular
apportionment, categorical, student achievement, and nonbasic education
moneys, as appropriate and shall be based on enrollment, staffing, and
other financial information submitted by the charter school to the
school district as required to determine state apportionment amounts;
(b) Local levy moneys approved by the voters before the effective
date of a charter between a school district and an applicant shall not
be allocated to a new charter school; however, the school district
shall allocate levy moneys to a conversion charter school. For levies
approved after the effective date of a charter, charter schools shall
be included in levy planning, budgets, and funding distribution in the
same manner as other district-sponsored public schools in the district;
and
(c) A charter school is eligible for state matching funds for
common school construction if a sponsoring school district determines
it has received voter approval of local capital funds for the project.
(2) For charter schools sponsored by an educational service
district or an institution of higher education:
(a) For purposes of funding, the charter school shall be considered
a separate school district only for state apportionment purposes and
safety net eligibility. Without violating section 13 of this act, the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide prompt and timely
funding for charter schools through the apportionment funding formulas
in amounts the schools would have generated if the students were
enrolled in a school district except that a charter school shall not
generate eligibility for small school assistance. The funding shall
include regular apportionment, categorical, student achievement, and
nonbasic education moneys and shall be based on enrollment, staffing,
and other financial information submitted by the charter school to the
superintendent of public instruction, as required to determine state
apportionment amounts. Those allocations to charter schools that are
included in RCW 84.52.0531(3) (a) through (c) shall be included in the
levy base of the district in which the charter school is located.
(b) No local levy money may be allocated to a charter school if the
charter school is sponsored by an educational service district or an
institution of higher education.
(3) To be eligible to receive state categorical program funding, a
charter school must serve students who would be eligible for program
funding if served by the school district.
(4) Sponsors and alternate sponsors shall submit, by November 1st
of each year, to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
annual year-end financial information, as prescribed by the
superintendent, for each charter school sponsored in the previous
school year.
(5) A conversion charter school shall be entitled to the continued
rent-free use of its existing facility, regardless of whether the
conversion school is sponsored by the local school district, or by an
alternate sponsor if the district has consented to such alternate
sponsorship. The district shall remain responsible for major repairs
and safety upgrades that may be required for the continued use of the
facility as a public school. The charter school shall be responsible
for routine maintenance of the facility, including but not limited to
cleaning, painting, gardening, and landscaping.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 ADMINISTRATION FEE. To offset costs of
oversight and administering the charter, a sponsor or an alternate
sponsor may retain up to three percent of state funding and local
excess levy funding, if applicable, that is being driven to the charter
school. Except for the administration fee in this section, no other
offsets or deductions are allowed, whether for central administration
or other off-site support services, from a charter school's per-pupil
share of state appropriations, local levies, or other funds, unless the
charter school has contracted with a school district to obtain specific
additional services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 LEAVES OF ABSENCE. If a school district
employee makes a written request for an extended leave of absence to
work at a charter school, the school district shall grant the request.
The school district may require that the request for a leave be made up
to ninety days before the employee would otherwise have to report for
duty. The leave shall be granted for any request for up to two years.
If the employee returns to the school district within the two-year
period, the employee shall be hired before the district hires anyone
else with fewer years of statewide service, with respect to any
position for which the returning employee is certificated or otherwise
qualified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 STUDY OF CHARTER SCHOOLS. Subject to
funding, the Washington institute for public policy shall study the
implementation and effectiveness of this act. The institute shall
report to the legislature on the effectiveness of charter schools in
raising student achievement and the impact of charter schools. The
institute also shall examine and discuss whether and how charter
schools have enhanced education reform efforts and recommend whether
relaxing or eliminating certain regulatory requirements for other
public schools could result in improved school performance at those
schools. The institute shall recommend changes to this chapter
including improvements that could be made to the application and
approval process. A preliminary report of the study is due to the
legislature by March 1, 2006, and a final report is due September 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 NUMBER OF CHARTER SCHOOLS. (1)
Applications for charter schools may begin on the effective date of
this section. The maximum number of new charter schools that may be
established under a charter approved in accordance with this chapter
is:
(a) In the first year commencing July 1, 2003, and in the second
year commencing July 1, 2004, not more than five per year; and
(b) In each of the next four years, commencing July 1st of each
year beginning in 2005 and ending in 2008, not more than fifteen per
year.
(2) These annual allocations shall be cumulative so that if the
maximum number of allowable new charters is not reached in any given
year the maximums shall be increased accordingly for the successive
years.
(3) Consistent with the legislative intent of this chapter, a
majority of the annual allowable new charter schools that may be
established under subsection (1) of this section shall be reserved
until the 31st day after the effective date of this section, and until
April 1st of each year beginning in 2004 and ending in 2008, for the
implementation of charter schools established for the primary purpose
of serving educationally disadvantaged students, and that are located
in, or accessible to students who live in, geographic areas in which a
large proportion of the students have difficulty meeting state academic
content and student achievement standards, or geographic areas,
including urban and rural areas, in which a large proportion or number
of public schools have been identified for improvement, corrective
action, or restructuring under the federal no child left behind act of
2001.
(4) Sponsors and alternate sponsors shall promptly notify the
superintendent of public instruction when a charter is approved, and
shall indicate whether the charter school's primary purpose is to serve
educationally disadvantaged students. In order to ensure compliance
with the annual limits for the establishment of new charter schools,
authorization from the superintendent of public instruction must be
obtained before implementing an approved charter for a new school. If
the maximum number of new charters under subsections (1) and (3) of
this section has not been reached when the sponsor notifies the
superintendent of the approval, the superintendent shall authorize the
implementation of the approved charter and the establishment of the
school. If the charters reserved under subsection (3) of this section
are not authorized within thirty days of the effective date of this
section, or by March 31st of each year thereafter and ending in 2008,
the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the sponsors and
alternate sponsors of any other approved charters for which
authorization has not been granted, and shall authorize the
implementation of those charters within the annual limits, regardless
of whether those charters meet the requirements of subsection (3) of
this section.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall notify eligible
sponsors and eligible alternate sponsors when the maximum allowable
number of new charters is approved each year. If the maximum number is
not reached by the 31st day after the effective date of this section,
or by March 31st of each year thereafter, the superintendent shall
report on the number of charters approved.
(6) If the superintendent receives simultaneous notification of
approved charters that exceed the annual allowable limits in
subsections (1) and (3) of this section, the superintendent shall
select approved charters for authorization under subsection (4) of this
section through a lottery process, and shall assign implementation
dates accordingly.
(7) The maximum number of charter schools allowed under this
section does not include public schools converting to charter public
schools; however, conversion charter schools shall be considered
charter schools for the purpose of notice to the superintendent of
public instruction required under subsection (4) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
This section applies to charter schools as defined in section 2 of
this act and the charter school's employees included in the bargaining
unit. The bargaining unit of employees of charter schools must be
limited to the employees of the charter school and must be separate
from other bargaining units in the school district or educational
service district unless the charter school is a public school that has
converted to a charter school. The employees of public schools that
have converted to a charter school shall remain members of the
bargaining units in the school district.
This section, designating charter schools as employers and charter
school employees as members under the teachers' retirement systems, the
school employees' retirement systems, and the public employees'
retirement systems, applies only if the department of retirement
systems receives determinations from the internal revenue service and
the United States department of labor that such participation does not
jeopardize the status of these retirement systems as governmental plans
under the federal employees' retirement income security act and the
internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to collective bargaining agreements
between charter schools and the employees of charter schools included
in the bargaining unit.
(a) The bargaining unit of employees of conversion charter schools
must be limited to the employees of the charter school and must be
separate from other bargaining units in the school district or
educational service district for at least the first five years of
operation of the charter school, after which the employees of a
conversion charter school may indicate by a majority vote they desire
to become members of the bargaining unit in the school district in
which the charter school is located.
(b) The bargaining unit of employees of new charter schools must be
limited to the employees of the charter school and must be separate
from other bargaining units in the school district or educational
service district for at least the first five years of operation of the
charter school, after which the employees of a new charter school may
indicate by a majority vote they desire to become members of the
bargaining unit in the school district in which the charter school is
located.
(2) This section, designating charter schools as employers and
charter school employees as members under the teachers' retirement
systems, the school employees' retirement systems, and the public
employees' retirement systems, takes effect only if the department of
retirement systems receives determinations from the internal revenue
service and the United States department of labor that such
participation does not jeopardize the status of these retirement
systems as governmental plans under the federal employees' retirement
income security act and the internal revenue code.

Sec. 19 RCW 41.59.080 and 1998 c 244 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission, upon proper application for certification as an
exclusive bargaining representative or upon petition for change of unit
definition by the employer or any employee organization within the time
limits specified in RCW 41.59.070(3), and after hearing upon reasonable
notice, shall determine the unit appropriate for the purpose of
collective bargaining. In determining, modifying or combining the
bargaining unit, the commission shall consider the duties, skills, and
working conditions of the educational employees; the history of
collective bargaining; the extent of organization among the educational
employees; and the desire of the educational employees; except that:
(1) A unit including nonsupervisory educational employees shall not
be considered appropriate unless it includes all such nonsupervisory
educational employees of the employer; and
(2) A unit that includes only supervisors may be considered
appropriate if a majority of the employees in such category indicate by
vote that they desire to be included in such a unit; and
(3) A unit that includes only principals and assistant principals
may be considered appropriate if a majority of such employees indicate
by vote that they desire to be included in such a unit; and
(4) A unit that includes both principals and assistant principals
and other supervisory employees may be considered appropriate if a
majority of the employees in each category indicate by vote that they
desire to be included in such a unit; and
(5) A unit that includes supervisors and/or principals and
assistant principals and nonsupervisory educational employees may be
considered appropriate if a majority of the employees in each category
indicate by vote that they desire to be included in such a unit; and
(6) A unit that includes only employees in vocational-technical
institutes or occupational skill centers may be considered to
constitute an appropriate bargaining unit if the history of bargaining
in any such school district so justifies; and
(7) Notwithstanding the definition of collective bargaining, a unit
that contains only supervisors and/or principals and assistant
principals shall be limited in scope of bargaining to compensation,
hours of work, and the number of days of work in the annual employment
contracts; and
(8) The bargaining unit of certificated employees of school
districts, educational service districts, or institutions of higher
education that are education providers under chapter 28A.193 RCW must
be limited to the employees working as education providers to juveniles
in each adult correctional facility maintained by the department of
corrections and must be separate from other bargaining units in school
districts, educational service districts, or institutions of higher
education; and
(9) Except as provided in sections 17 and 18 of this act, the
bargaining unit for employees of charter schools as defined in section
2 of this act must be limited to the employees of the charter school
and must be separate from other bargaining units in the school district
or educational service district.

Sec. 20 RCW 28A.150.010 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.055 are
each amended to read as follows:
Public schools shall mean the common schools as referred to in
Article IX of the state Constitution and those schools and institutions
of learning having a curriculum below the college or university level
as now or may be established by law and maintained at public expense,
including charter schools under chapter 28A.-- RCW (sections 1 through
16 and 21 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
chapter do not constitute any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec.22 Sections 1 through 16 and 21 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---