BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Rules dealing with musculoskeletal disorders, filed on May 26,
2000, by the director, and codified as WAC 296-62-05101 through 296-62-05176, are repealed. The director shall not adopt any new or amended
rules dealing with musculoskeletal disorders that are substantially the
same as these rules until and unless required by congress or the
federal occupational safety and health administration.

--- END ---