BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.120 and 2002 c 149 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the other provisions of this title, benefits shall
be payable to any eligible individual during the individual's benefit
year in a maximum amount equal to the lesser of thirty times the weekly
benefit amount (determined hereinafter) or one-third of the
individual's base year wages under this title: PROVIDED, That as to
any week beginning on and after March 31, 1981, which falls in an
extended benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010(1), as now or
hereafter amended, an individual's eligibility for maximum benefits in
excess of twenty-six times his or her weekly benefit amount will be
subject to the terms and conditions set forth in RCW 50.22.020, as now
or hereafter amended.
(2) An individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal
to one twenty-fifth of the average quarterly wages of the individual's
total wages during the ((two quarters of the)) individual's base year
((in which such total wages were highest)). The maximum and minimum
amounts payable weekly shall be determined as of each June 30th to
apply to benefit years beginning in the twelve-month period immediately
following such June 30th. Except as provided in RCW 50.20.125, the
maximum amount payable weekly shall be seventy percent of the "average
weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June 30th. The
minimum amount payable weekly shall be fifteen percent of the "average
weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June 30th. If any
weekly benefit, maximum benefit, or minimum benefit amount computed
herein is not a multiple of one dollar, it shall be reduced to the next
lower multiple of one dollar.

--- END ---