BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c 316 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
ground water right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
ground waters may, without losing the holder's priority of right, add
existing wells or construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new
location in substitution for or in addition to those at the original
location, or the holder may change the ((manner)) purpose or the place
of use of the water.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (5) of this section,
an amendment to add an existing well or wells or construct replacement
or a new additional well or wells at a location outside of the location
of the original well or wells or to change the ((manner)) purpose or
place of use of the water shall be issued only after publication of
notice of the application and findings as prescribed in the case of an
original application. Such amendment shall be issued by the department
only on the conditions that: (a) The additional or replacement well or
wells shall ((tap the same body of public ground water)) be located
within the same water resource inventory area, as defined in chapter
173-500 WAC, or an adjoining water resource inventory area as the
original well or wells; (b) where a replacement well or wells is
approved, the use of the original well or wells shall be discontinued
and the original well or wells shall be properly decommissioned as
required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where an additional well or
wells is added or constructed, the original well or wells may continue
to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the original and
additional well or wells shall not ((enlarge the right)) increase the
annual or instantaneous quantity conveyed by the original permit or
certificate; and (d) other existing rights shall not be impaired. The
department may specify an approved manner of construction and shall
require a showing of compliance with the terms of the amendment, as
provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of an original permit.
(3) The addition or construction of a replacement or new additional
well or wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be
allowed without application to the department for an amendment.
However, the following apply to such a replacement or new additional
well: (a) The well shall tap the same body of public ground water as
the original well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed,
the use of the original well or wells shall be discontinued and the
original well or wells shall be properly decommissioned as required
under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) if a new additional well is added or
constructed, the original well or wells may continue to be used, but
the combined total withdrawal from the original and additional well or
wells shall not ((enlarge the right)) increase the annual or
instantaneous quantity conveyed by the original water use permit or
certificate; (d) the addition or construction and use of the well shall
not interfere with or impair water rights with an earlier date of
priority than the water right or rights for the original well or wells;
(e) the replacement or additional well shall be located no closer than
the original well to a well it might interfere with; (f) the department
may specify an approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the
department shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of
this subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the larger of: (a) The area described as the point of
withdrawal in the original public notice published for the application
for the water right for the well; or (b) the area up to one-quarter
mile radius from the current well or wells.
(5) A water right holder may add or construct a replacement or new
additional well or wells at a location outside the location of the
original well or wells but not more than two miles from the current
well or wells without application to the department for an amendment
under the following conditions:
(a) The provisions of subsection (3)(a) through (g) of this section
are met;
(b) The water right holder shall publish a legal notice describing
the intention to add or construct the replacement or additional well or
wells, the location of the proposed well or wells, and the amount or
amounts of water to be withdrawn;
(c) The notice must be published once a week for two consecutive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the
well or wells would be located;
(d) The notice shall further state as follows: A water right
holder wishing to assert a claim of potential quantity impairment may
do so by filing a claim with the department of ecology within twenty
days of the second publication date of the notice. The claim must
describe how the addition or construction of a replacement or new
additional well will cause potential quantity impairment to the water
right holder's right;
(e) Upon receipt of a claim under (d) of this subsection, the
department shall investigate the claim and issue in writing a technical
opinion limited to whether or not the quantity of the claimant's water
right is likely to be impaired. The opinion is advisory only, is not
binding, and is not appealable;
(f) Following a claim investigation in accordance with (e) of this
subsection, the person filing the claim and the water right holder
shall attempt to resolve any potential impairment issues raised in the
claim;
(g) After a claimant has attempted to resolve any potential
impairment issues in accordance with (f) of this subsection, the
claimant may bring an action before the superior court in the county
where the proposed new or additional well is to be located; and
(h) The addition or construction of a replacement or new additional
well or wells may begin sixty days after the publication date of the
first notice under (c) of this subsection.

--- END ---