BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.14.010 and 1967 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The future growth and development of the state is dependent upon
effective management and efficient use of the state's water resources.
The purpose of this chapter is to provide adequate records for
efficient administration of the state's waters((, and to cause a return
to the state of any water rights which are no longer exercised by
putting said waters to beneficial use)).

Sec. 2 RCW 90.14.130 and 1987 c 109 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Until the effective date of this section, when it appears to
the department of ecology that a person entitled to the use of water
has not beneficially used his or her water right or some portion
thereof, and it appears that said right has or may have reverted to the
state because of such nonuse, as provided by RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170,
or 90.14.180, the department of ecology shall notify such person by
order: PROVIDED, That where a company, association, district, or the
United States has filed a blanket claim under the provisions of RCW
90.14.060 for the total benefits of those served by it, the notice
shall be served on such company, association, district or the United
States and not upon any of its individual water users who may not have
used the water or some portion thereof which they were entitled to use.
The order shall contain: (((1))) (a) A description of the water right,
including the approximate location of the point of diversion, the
general description of the lands or places where such waters were used,
the water source, the amount involved, the purpose of use, and the
apparent authority upon which the right is based; (((2))) (b) a
statement that unless sufficient cause be shown on appeal the water
right will be declared relinquished; and (((3))) (c) a statement that
such order may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board.
Any person aggrieved by such an order may appeal it to the pollution
control hearings board pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310. The order shall be
served by registered or certified mail to the last known address of the
person and be posted at the point of division or withdrawal. The order
by itself shall not alter the recipient's right to use water, if any.
(2) After the effective date of this section, the department of
ecology has no authority to issue by order a notice of reversion or
otherwise limit a water right under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.14.160 and 1981 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state
through any appropriation authorized by enactments of the legislature
prior to enactment of chapter 117, Laws of 1917, or by custom, or by
general adjudication, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails,
without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said
right to divert or withdraw for any period of five successive years
after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and
said right or portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters
affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in
accordance with RCW 90.03.250.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any person
after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.14.170 and 1967 c 233 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state
by virtue of his or her ownership of land abutting a stream, lake, or
watercourse, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails, without
sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said right to
withdraw or divert said water for any period of five successive years
after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and
such right or portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters
affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 90.03.250.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any person
after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.14.180 and 1987 c 109 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person hereafter entitled to divert or withdraw waters of
the state through an appropriation authorized under RCW 90.03.330,
90.44.080, or 90.44.090 who abandons the same, or who voluntarily
fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of
said right to withdraw for any period of five successive years shall
relinquish such right or portion thereof, and such right or portion
thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters affected by said
right shall become available for appropriation in accordance with RCW
90.03.250. ((All certificates hereafter issued by the department of
ecology pursuant to RCW 90.03.330 shall expressly incorporate this
section by reference.))
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any person
after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.14.210 and 1967 c 233 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Until the effective date of this section, the provisions of this
chapter shall apply to all rights to withdraw ground waters of the
state, whether authorized by chapter 90.44 RCW or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---