BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state is obligated to pay for damage to livestock caused by
the state's wildlife. For the purposes of this section, "livestock"
means horses, mules, donkeys, cattle, sheep, goats, swine, and ratite.
(2)(a) The division of risk management in the office of financial
management must develop procedures to verify loss and provide
compensation to people who have had livestock damaged by the state's
wildlife. The division of risk management must ensure that people
receive full value for the damaged livestock. Full value means the
value of the livestock at slaughter or as sold at a public livestock
market.
(b) The procedures developed by the division of risk management
must include a process for people to submit claims for damage to
livestock caused by the state's wildlife, and must include provisions
that require a submission of evidence of the damage, such as video,
photographs, or other viable means of proving that the damage to the
livestock was caused by the state's wildlife.

--- END ---