BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the courts have rendered decisions
in Elkhorn (Public Utility District No. 1 v. Washington Department of
Ecology, 511 U.S. 700, 114 S. Ct. 1900, 128 L.Ed. 2d 716 (1994)) and
Sullivan Creek (Public Utility District No. 1 of Pend Oreille County v.
Washington Department of Ecology, 146 Wn.2d 778, 51 P.3d 744 (2002))
related to water quality certifications issued under section 401 of the
clean water act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq. Enactment of this legislation
does not expand or contract the legal holdings of these decisions and
does not affect in any way the application of these holdings to any
future case or fact pattern related to water quality certifications
issued for federally licensed hydropower facilities under section 401
of the clean water act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.
(2) When a water quality standard cannot be reasonably met through
the issuance of permits or regulatory orders issued under the authority
of this chapter, the department may use voluntary, incentive-based
methods including funding of water conservation projects, lease and
purchase of water rights, development of new storage projects, or
habitat restoration projects in an attempt to meet water quality
standards.
(3) The department may not abrogate, supersede, impair, or
condition the ability of a water right holder to fully divert or
withdraw water under a water right permit, certificate, statutory
exemption, or claim granted or recognized under chapter 90.03, 90.14,
or 90.44 RCW through the authority granted to the department in this
chapter. However, nothing in this act shall be construed to affect the
department's authority related to the issuance of certifications under
section 401 of the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.,
with respect to the application of federally authorized water quality
standards, for federal energy regulatory commission licensed hydropower
projects as provided under this chapter and chapter 90.74 RCW. With
respect to federal energy regulatory commission licensed hydropower
projects, the department may only require a person to mitigate or
remedy a water quality violation or problem to the extent there is
substantial evidence such person has caused such violation or problem.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.400 and 2003 c 53 s 418 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The unauthorized use of water to which another person is
entitled or the willful or negligent waste of water to the detriment of
another, is a misdemeanor.
(b) For instances of the waste of water under this subsection, the
department may alternatively follow the sequence of enforcement actions
as provided in RCW 90.03.605.
(2) The possession or use of water without legal right shall be
prima facie evidence of the guilt of the person using it.
(3) It is also a misdemeanor to use, store, or divert any water
until after the issuance of permit to appropriate such water.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.03.600 and 1995 c 403 s 635 are each amended to
read as follows:
In determining the amount of a penalty to be levied, the department
shall consider the seriousness of the violation, whether the violation
is repeated or continuous after notice of the violation is given, and
whether any damage has occurred to the health or property of other
persons. Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080 and
43.05.150, ((the power is granted to)) the department of ecology ((to))
may levy civil penalties ((of up to)) ranging from one hundred dollars
to five thousand dollars per day for violation of any of the provisions
of this chapter and chapters 43.83B, 90.22, and 90.44 RCW, and rules,
permits, and similar documents and regulatory orders of the department
of ecology adopted or issued pursuant to such chapters. The procedures
of RCW 90.48.144 shall be applicable to all phases of the levying of a
penalty as well as review and appeal of the same.

--- END ---