BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.130 and 1998 c 190 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful taking of protected fish or
wildlife if:
(a) The person hunts, fishes, possesses, or maliciously kills
protected fish or wildlife, or the person possesses or maliciously
destroys the eggs or nests of protected fish or wildlife, and the
taking has not been authorized by rule of the commission; or
(b) The person violates any rule of the commission regarding the
taking, harming, harassment, possession, or transport of protected fish
or wildlife.
(2) Unlawful taking of protected fish or wildlife is ((a
misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be cited and punished as provided under
chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.140 and 1998 c 190 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful taking of unclassified fish or
wildlife if:
(a) The person kills, hunts, fishes, takes, holds, possesses,
transports, or maliciously injures or harms fish or wildlife that is
not classified as big game, game fish, game animals, game birds, food
fish, shellfish, protected wildlife, or endangered wildlife; and
(b) The act violates any rule of the commission or the director.
(2) Unlawful taking of unclassified fish or wildlife is ((a
misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be cited and punished as provided under
chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.170 and 1999 c 258 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of waste of fish and wildlife in the second
degree if:
(a) The person kills, takes, or possesses fish, shellfish, or
wildlife and the value of the fish, shellfish, or wildlife is greater
than twenty dollars but less than two hundred fifty dollars; and
(b) The person recklessly allows such fish, shellfish, or wildlife
to be wasted.
(2) A person is guilty of waste of fish and wildlife in the first
degree if:
(a) The person kills, takes, or possesses fish, shellfish, or
wildlife having a value of two hundred fifty dollars or more or
wildlife classified as big game; and
(b) The person recklessly allows such fish, shellfish, or wildlife
to be wasted.
(3)(a) Waste of fish and wildlife in the second degree is ((a
misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be cited and punished as provided under
chapter 7.84 RCW.
(b) Waste of fish and wildlife in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the department shall revoke any license
or tag used in the crime and shall order suspension of the person's
privileges to engage in the activity in which the person committed
waste of fish and wildlife in the first degree for a period of one
year.
(4) It is prima facie evidence of waste if a processor purchases or
engages a quantity of food fish, shellfish, or game fish that cannot be
processed within sixty hours after the food fish, game fish, or
shellfish are taken from the water, unless the food fish, game fish, or
shellfish are preserved in good marketable condition.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.15.180 and 2001 c 253 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful interference with fishing or
hunting gear in the second degree if the person:
(a) Takes or releases a wild animal from another person's trap
without permission;
(b) Springs, pulls up, damages, possesses, or destroys another
person's trap without the owner's permission; or
(c) Interferes with recreational gear used to take fish or
shellfish.
(2) Unlawful interference with fishing or hunting gear in the
second degree is ((a misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be cited and
punished as provided under chapter 7.84 RCW.
(3) A person is guilty of unlawful interference with fishing or
hunting gear in the first degree if the person:
(a) Takes or releases fish or shellfish from commercial fishing
gear without the owner's permission; or
(b) Intentionally destroys or interferes with commercial fishing
gear.
(4) Unlawful interference with fishing or hunting gear in the first
degree is a gross misdemeanor.
(5) A person is not in violation of unlawful interference with
fishing or hunting gear if the person removes a trap placed on property
owned, leased, or rented by the person.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.15.190 and 1999 c 258 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful trapping if the person:
(a) Sets out traps that are capable of taking wild animals, game
animals, or furbearing mammals and does not possess all licenses, tags,
or permits required under this title;
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding
seasons, bag or possession limits, closed areas including game
reserves, closed times, or any other rule governing the trapping of
wild animals; or
(c) Fails to identify the owner of the traps or devices by neither
(i) attaching a metal tag with the owner's department-assigned
identification number or the name and address of the trapper legibly
written in numbers or letters not less than one-eighth inch in height
nor (ii) inscribing into the metal of the trap such number or name and
address.
(2) Unlawful trapping is ((a misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be
cited and punished as provided under chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.15.220 and 1998 c 190 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful posting if the individual posts
signs preventing hunting or fishing on any land not owned or leased by
the individual, or without the permission of the person who owns,
leases, or controls the land posted.
(2) Unlawful posting is ((a misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be
cited and punished as provided under chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.15.230 and 1999 c 258 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of department lands or
facilities if the person enters upon, uses, or remains upon department-owned or department-controlled lands or facilities in violation of any
rule of the department.
(2) Unlawful use of department lands or facilities is ((a
misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be cited and punished as provided under
chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.15.240 and 1998 c 190 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of dogs if the person:
(a) Negligently fails to prevent a dog under the person's control
from pursuing or injuring deer, elk, or an animal classified as
endangered under this title;
(b) Uses the dog to hunt deer or elk; or
(c) During the closed season for a species of game animal or game
bird, negligently fails to prevent the dog from pursuing such animal or
destroying the nest of a game bird.
(2) Unlawful use of dogs is ((a misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be
cited and punished as provided under chapter 7.84 RCW. A dog that is
the basis for a violation of this section may be declared a public
nuisance.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.15.280 and 1998 c 190 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of violating rules requiring reporting of
fish or wildlife harvest in the first degree if the person:
(((a))) (i) Fails to make a harvest log report of a commercial fish
or shellfish catch in violation of any rule of the commission or the
director; or
(((b))) (ii) Fails to maintain a trapper's report or taxidermist
ledger in violation of any rule of the commission or the director((;
(c) Fails to submit any portion of a big game animal for a required
inspection required by rule of the commission or the director; or
(d) Fails to return a catch record card or wildlife harvest report
to the department as required by rule of the commission or director)).
(((2))) (b) Violating rules requiring reporting of fish or wildlife
harvest in the first degree is a misdemeanor.
(2)(a) A person is guilty of violating rules requiring reporting of
fish or wildlife harvest in the second degree if the person:
(i) Fails to submit any portion of a big game animal for a required
inspection required by rule of the commission or the director; or
(ii) Fails to return a catch record card or wildlife harvest report
to the department as required by rule of the commission or director.
(b) Violating rules requiring reporting of fish or wildlife harvest
in the second degree is an infraction, to be cited and punished as
provided under chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.15.290 and 2002 c 281 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful transportation of fish or
wildlife in the second degree if the person:
(a) Knowingly imports, moves within the state, or exports fish,
shellfish, or wildlife in violation of any rule of the commission or
the director governing the transportation or movement of fish,
shellfish, or wildlife and the transportation does not involve big
game, endangered fish or wildlife, deleterious exotic wildlife, or
fish, shellfish, or wildlife having a value greater than two hundred
fifty dollars; or
(b) Possesses but fails to affix or notch a big game transport tag
as required by rule of the commission or director.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful transportation of fish or
wildlife in the first degree if the person:
(a) Knowingly imports, moves within the state, or exports fish,
shellfish, or wildlife in violation of any rule of the commission or
the director governing the transportation or movement of fish,
shellfish, or wildlife and the transportation involves big game,
endangered fish or wildlife, deleterious exotic wildlife, or fish,
shellfish, or wildlife with a value of two hundred fifty dollars or
more; or
(b) Knowingly transports shellfish, shellstock, or equipment used
in commercial culturing, taking, handling, or processing shellfish
without a permit required by authority of this title.
(3)(a) Unlawful transportation of fish or wildlife in the second
degree is ((a misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be cited and punished as
provided under chapter 7.84 RCW.
(b) Unlawful transportation of fish or wildlife in the first degree
is a gross misdemeanor.
(4) A person is guilty of unlawful transport of aquatic plants if
the person transports aquatic plants on any state or public road,
including forest roads, except as provided in this section.
(5) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, a person may transport
aquatic plants:
(a) To the department, or to another destination designated by the
director, in a manner designated by the department, for purposes of
identifying a species or reporting the presence of a species;
(b) When legally obtained for aquarium use, wetland or lakeshore
restoration, or ornamental purposes;
(c) When transporting a commercial aquatic plant harvester to a
suitable location for purposes of removing aquatic plants;
(d) In a manner that prevents their unintentional dispersal, to a
suitable location for disposal, research, or educational purposes; or
(e) As the commission may otherwise prescribe.
(6) Unlawful transport of aquatic plants is ((a misdemeanor)) an
infraction, to be cited and punished as provided under chapter 7.84
RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 77.15.330 and 2001 c 253 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawfully holding a hunting or fishing
contest if the person:
(a) Conducts, holds, or sponsors a hunting contest, a fishing
contest involving game fish, or a competitive field trial using live
wildlife without the permit required by RCW 77.65.480; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to a hunting contest, fishing contest involving game fish, or a
competitive field trial using live wildlife.
(2) Unlawfully holding a hunting or fishing contest is ((a
misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be cited and punished as provided under
chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 77.15.380 and 2001 c 253 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful recreational fishing in the
second degree if the person fishes for, takes, possesses, or harvests
fish or shellfish and:
(a) The person does not have and possess the license or the catch
record card required by chapter 77.32 RCW for such activity; or
(b) The action violates any rule of the commission or the director
regarding seasons, bag or possession limits but less than two times the
bag or possession limit, closed areas, closed times, or any other rule
addressing the manner or method of fishing or possession of fish,
except for use of a net to take fish as provided for in RCW 77.15.580.
(2) Unlawful recreational fishing in the second degree is ((a
misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be cited and punished as provided under
chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 77.15.400 and 2001 c 253 s 41 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the
second degree if the person:
(a) Hunts for, takes, or possesses a wild bird and the person does
not have and possess all licenses, tags, stamps, and permits required
under this title;
(b) Maliciously destroys, takes, or harms the eggs or nests of a
wild bird except when authorized by permit;
(c) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding
seasons, bag or possession limits but less than two times the bag or
possession limit, closed areas, closed times, or other rule addressing
the manner or method of hunting or possession of wild birds; or
(d) Possesses a wild bird taken during a closed season for that
wild bird or taken from a closed area for that wild bird.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the
first degree if the person takes or possesses two times or more than
the possession or bag limit for wild birds allowed by rule of the
commission or director.
(3)(a) Unlawful hunting of wild birds in the second degree is ((a
misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be cited and punished as provided under
chapter 7.84 RCW.
(b) Unlawful hunting of wild birds in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 14 RCW 77.15.430 and 1999 c 258 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild animals in the
second degree if the person:
(a) Hunts for, takes, or possesses a wild animal that is not
classified as big game, and does not have and possess all licenses,
tags, or permits required by this title;
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding
seasons, bag or possession limits but less than two times the bag or
possession limit, closed areas including game reserves, closed times,
or other rule addressing the manner or method of hunting or possession
of wild animals not classified as big game; or
(c) Possesses a wild animal that is not classified as big game
taken during a closed season for that wild animal or from a closed area
for that wild animal.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild animals in the
first degree if the person takes or possesses two times or more than
the possession or bag limit for wild animals that are not classified as
big game animals as allowed by rule of the commission or director.
(3)(a) Unlawful hunting of wild animals in the second degree is ((a
misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be cited and punished as provided under
chapter 7.84 RCW.
(b) Unlawful hunting of wild animals in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 15 RCW 77.15.440 and 1998 c 190 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of weapons, traps, or dogs
on game reserves if:
(a) The person uses firearms, other hunting weapons, or traps on a
game reserve; or
(b) The person negligently allows a dog upon a game reserve.
(2) This section does not apply to persons on a public highway or
if the conduct is authorized by rule of the department.
(3) This section does not apply to a person in possession of a
handgun if the person in control of the handgun possesses a valid
concealed pistol license and the handgun is concealed on the person.
(4) Unlawful use of weapons, traps, or dogs on game reserves is ((a
misdemeanor)) an infraction, to be cited and punished as provided under
chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec. 16 RCW 77.15.460 and 1999 c 258 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of unlawful possession of a loaded
firearm in a motor vehicle if:
(((a))) (i) The person carries, transports, conveys, possesses, or
controls a rifle or shotgun in or on a motor vehicle; and
(((b))) (ii) The rifle or shotgun contains shells or cartridges in
the magazine or chamber, or is a muzzle-loading firearm that is loaded
and capped or primed.
(b) Unlawful possession of a loaded firearm in a motor vehicle is
an infraction, to be cited and punished as provided under chapter 7.84
RCW.
(2)(a) A person is guilty of unlawful use of a loaded firearm if
the person negligently shoots a firearm from, across, or along the
maintained portion of a public highway.
(((3))) (b) Unlawful ((possession of a loaded firearm in a motor
vehicle or unlawful)) use of a loaded firearm is a misdemeanor.
(((4))) (3) This section does not apply if the person:
(a) Is a law enforcement officer who is authorized to carry a
firearm and is on duty within the officer's respective jurisdiction;
(b) Possesses a disabled hunter's permit as provided by RCW
77.32.237 and complies with all rules of the department concerning
hunting by persons with disabilities.
(((5))) (4) For purposes of this section, a firearm shall not be
considered loaded if the detachable clip or magazine is not inserted in
or attached to the firearm.

--- END ---