BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.070 and 2000 c 107 s 231 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Fish and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife
officers may seize without warrant boats, airplanes, vehicles,
motorized implements, conveyances, gear, appliances, or other articles
they have probable cause to believe have been held with intent to
violate or used in violation of this title ((or rule of the commission
or director)). However, fish and wildlife officers or ex officio fish
and wildlife officers may not seize any item or article, other than for
evidence, if under the circumstances, it is reasonable to conclude that
the violation was inadvertent. The property seized is subject to
forfeiture to the state under this section regardless of ownership.
Property seized may be recovered by its owner by depositing into court
a cash bond equal to the fair market value of the seized property but
not more than twenty-five thousand dollars. Such cash bond is subject
to forfeiture in lieu of the property. Forfeiture of property seized
under this section is a civil forfeiture against property and is
intended to be a remedial civil sanction.
(2) In the event of a seizure of property under this section,
jurisdiction to begin the forfeiture proceedings shall commence upon
seizure. Within fifteen days following the seizure, the seizing
authority shall serve a written notice of intent to forfeit property on
the owner of the property seized and on any person having any known
right or interest in the property seized. Notice may be served by any
method authorized by law or court rule, including service by certified
mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail is deemed complete
upon mailing ((within the fifteen-day period following the seizure)).
(3) Persons claiming a right of ownership or right to possession of
property are entitled to a hearing to contest forfeiture. Such a claim
shall specify the claim of ownership or possession and shall be made in
writing and served on the director within forty-five days of the
seizure. The claim may be served by any method authorized by law or
court rule, including service by certified mail with return receipt
requested. Service by mail is deemed complete upon mailing. If the
seizing authority has complied with notice requirements and there is no
claim made within forty-five days, then the property shall be forfeited
to the state.
(4) If any person timely serves the director with a claim to
property, the person shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard as to
the person's claim or right. The hearing shall be ((before the
director or director's designee, or)) before an administrative law
judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that a person asserting
a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of competent
jurisdiction if the aggregate value of the property seized is more than
five thousand dollars. Removal may only be accomplished according to
the rules of civil procedure.
(5) The hearing to contest forfeiture and any subsequent appeal
shall be as provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW((, the administrative
procedure act)). The seizing authority has the burden ((to demonstrate
that it had reason to believe)) of production and proof by a
preponderance of the evidence that the property was held with intent to
violate or was used in violation of this title ((or rule of the
commission or director. The person contesting forfeiture has the
burden of production and proof by a preponderance of evidence)). It is
a defense that the person owns or has a right to possess the property
and:
(a) That the property was not held with intent to violate or used
in violation of this title; or
(b) ((If the property is a boat, airplane, or vehicle,)) That the
illegal use or planned illegal use of the ((boat, airplane, or
vehicle)) property occurred without the owner's knowledge or consent,
and that the owner acted reasonably to prevent illegal uses of ((such
boat, airplane, or vehicle)) the property.
(6) A forfeiture of ((a conveyance)) property encumbered by a
perfected security interest is subject to the interest of the secured
party if the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to
the act or omission. No security interest in seized property may be
perfected after seizure.
(7) If seized property is forfeited under this section, the
department ((may retain it for official use unless the)) shall destroy
property that is required to be destroyed, ((or upon application by any
law enforcement agency of the state, release such property to the
agency for the use of enforcing this title, or)) sell ((such)) all
other forfeited property, and deposit the proceeds to the wildlife
fund, as provided for in RCW 77.12.170.
(8) The department shall promptly return all property to the
claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or court
that the claimant is the present owner or is legally entitled to
possession of the seized property.
(9) In any proceeding to forfeit property under this title, where
the claimant substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to
reasonable attorneys' fees reasonably incurred by the claimant.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.100 and 2000 c 107 s 235 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided in this title, fish, shellfish, or
wildlife unlawfully taken or possessed, or involved in a violation
shall be forfeited to the state upon conviction. Unless already held
by, sold, destroyed, or disposed of by the department, the court shall
order such fish or wildlife to be delivered to the department. Where
delay will cause loss to the value of the property and a ready
wholesale buying market exists, the department may sell property to a
wholesale buyer at a fair market value.
(2) When seized property is forfeited to the department, the
department ((may retain it for official use unless the)) shall destroy
property that is required to be destroyed, ((or upon application by any
law enforcement agency of the state, release the property to the agency
for the use of enforcing this title, or)) sell ((such)) all other
forfeited property, and deposit the proceeds into the state wildlife
fund established under RCW 77.12.170. Any sale of other property shall
be at public auction or after public advertisement reasonably designed
to obtain the highest price. The time, place, and manner of holding
the sale shall be determined by the director. The director may
contract for the sale to be through the department of general
administration as state surplus property, or, except where not
justifiable by the value of the property, the director shall publish
notice of the sale once a week for at least two consecutive weeks
before the sale in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the
county in which the sale is to be held.

--- END ---