BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state patrol shall provide law enforcement radio
dispatch and communication services to any state agency with law
enforcement authority upon written request from such agency in
accordance with chapter 39.34 RCW, the Interlocal Cooperation Act. The
Washington state patrol shall charge the agency for radio dispatch and
communication services on a cost-added basis per agency. That basis
may include only communications personnel and equipment costs expended
above any appropriation provided by the legislature to the Washington
state patrol for communications, and only costs that are directly
attributable to the agency making the request. Charges to the agency
may not include depreciation, indirect costs, or any costs outside the
Washington state patrol communications division.

--- END ---