BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.158.110 and 1989 c 20 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within the first minute of the telephone call, a commercial
telephone solicitor or salesperson shall:
(a) Identify himself or herself, the company on whose behalf the
solicitation is being made, the property, goods, or services being
sold; and
(b) Terminate the telephone call within ten seconds if the
purchaser indicates he or she does not wish to continue the
conversation.
(2) If at any time during the telephone contact, the purchaser
states or indicates that he or she does not wish to be called again by
the commercial telephone solicitor or wants to have his or her name and
individual telephone number removed from the telephone lists used by
the commercial telephone solicitor:
(a) The commercial telephone solicitor shall not make any
additional commercial telephone solicitation of the called party at
that telephone number within a period of at least one year; and
(b) The commercial telephone solicitor shall not sell or give the
called party's name and telephone number to another commercial
telephone solicitor: PROVIDED, That the commercial telephone
solicitor may return the list, including the called party's name and
telephone number, to the company or organization from which it received
the list.
(3) The utilities and transportation commission shall by rule
ensure that telecommunications companies inform their residential
customers of the provisions of this section and section 2 of this act.
The notification may be made by:
(a) Annual inserts in the billing statements mailed to residential
customers; or
(b) Conspicuous publication of the notice in the consumer
information pages of local telephone directories.
(4) If a sale or an agreement to purchase is completed, the
commercial telephone solicitor must inform the purchaser of his or her
cancellation rights as enunciated in this chapter, state the
registration number issued by the department of licensing, and give the
street address of the seller.
(5) If, at any time prior to sale or agreement to purchase, the
commercial telephone solicitor's registration number is requested by
the purchaser, it must be provided.
(6) All oral disclosures required by this section shall be made in
a clear and intelligible manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.158 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department of licensing shall provide for the
establishment and operation of a list of telephone numbers of persons
who object to receiving commercial telephone solicitations. The list
shall be called the do not call list. The department shall update the
list quarterly, and shall provide the list, in written or electronic
form, to commercial telephone solicitors for a reasonable fee. The
department shall establish a fee sufficient to support the costs of
administering and enforcing this section. Each commercial telephone
solicitor registered under this chapter must purchase the list after
every quarterly update.
(b) Persons wishing to have their phone numbers placed on the list
must notify the department of licensing. A listing shall be effective
for two years, after which the person may renew the listing for
successive two-year periods by notifying the department of licensing.
The department of licensing shall determine the notification
requirements.
(c) All fees collected by the department of licensing under this
section, and civil penalties and attorneys' fees collected by the
attorney general in enforcing this section, shall be deposited in the
commercial telephone solicitation account created in section 3 of this
act, and used solely for the administration and enforcement of this
section.
(2) No commercial telephone solicitor may make a commercial
telephone solicitation to any telephone number more than sixty days
after the number appears on the current do not call list. Except that
no commercial telephone solicitor may be liable if the solicitor
demonstrates that: (a) The solicitor established and implemented
written procedures and trained its employees to follow such procedures
to comply with this section; (b) the solicitor deleted from its call
list any listing of a number on the then current quarterly do not call
list; and (c) the call was made inadvertently.
(3) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. In
addition to any other penalties or remedies available under this
chapter or chapter 19.86 RCW, a person injured by a violation of
subsection (2) of this section may bring an action for recovery of
liquidated damages in the amount of one thousand dollars per violation,
plus court costs and attorneys' fees.
(4) The director of the department of licensing may make rules,
create forms, and issue orders as necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.158 RCW
to read as follows:
The commercial telephone solicitation account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received by the department
under section 2 of this act and civil penalties and attorneys' fees
collected by the attorney general in enforcing section 2 of this act
shall be deposited in the commercial telephone solicitation account and
used solely for the administration and enforcement of section 2 of this
act. Only the director of the department of licensing or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
no appropriation is required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---