BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Applications for annual license tab fees, gross weight fees,
and additional fees for recreational vehicles, as authorized in this
chapter, must permit applicants to voluntarily contribute funds in
whole dollar increments to assist persons with special transportation
needs. The department shall provide a space on the application for the
contributions. Proceeds will be remitted to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the special needs transportation
account created in section 2 of this act. Funds must be expended as
provided in section 2 of this act.
(2) The department of transportation must coordinate with the
internal revenue service to work to achieve tax deductible status for
voluntary contributions made under this section.
(3) The department shall discontinue the voluntary contribution and
distribution of associated proceeds if the agency council on
coordinated transportation established in chapter 47.06B RCW no longer
exists or if the agency council on coordinated transportation has
stopped providing services that are authorized to be funded from the
voluntary contributions. The agency council on coordinated
transportation shall notify the department immediately to stop warrants
for voluntary contributions if either of the conditions in this
subsection exist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.06B RCW
to read as follows:
The special needs transportation account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from voluntary contributions as
provided in section 1 of this act must be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only by the agency council on
coordinated transportation for developing, testing, and facilitating
the implementation of efficient coordinated systems to increase
transportation services to persons with special transportation needs.
Only the chair of the agency council on coordinated transportation may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.06B.901 and 1999 c 385 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2008:
(1) RCW 47.06B.010 and 1999 c 385 § 1 & 1998 c 173 § 1;
(2) RCW 47.06B.012 and 1999 c 385 § 2;
(3) RCW 47.06B.015 and 1999 c 385 § 3;
(4) RCW 47.06B.020 and ((1999 c 385 § 4 &)) 1998 c 173 § 2;
(5) RCW 47.06B.030 and 1999 c 385 § 5, 1999 c 372 § 13, & 1998 c
173 § 3; ((and))
(6) RCW 47.06B.040 and 1999 c 385 § 6;
(7) Section 1 of this act; and
(8) Section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect with registrations
that are due or become due January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2003, in the omnibus transportation appropriations act, this
act is null and void.

--- END ---