BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.18.190 and 1995 c 236 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department of labor and industries or a self-insurer
pays compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW on behalf of or on account of
the child or children of the injured worker for whom the injured worker
owes a duty of child support, the amount of compensation the department
or self-insurer pays on behalf of the child or children shall be
treated for all purposes as if the injured worker paid the compensation
toward satisfaction of the injured worker's child support obligations.
(2) When the social security administration pays social security
disability dependency benefits, retirement benefits, or survivors
insurance benefits on behalf of or on account of the child or children
of a disabled person, a retired person, or a deceased person, the
amount of benefits paid for the child or children shall be treated for
all purposes as if the disabled person, the retired person, or the
deceased person paid the benefits toward the satisfaction of that
person's child support obligation ((for that period for which benefits
are paid)).
(3) Under no circumstances shall the person who has the obligation
to make the transfer payment have a right to reimbursement of any
compensation paid under subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

--- END ---