BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of health shall seek and accept funding from
federal and private sources, including grants, to design a state plan
for the prevention and management of hepatitis C by July 1, 2004. In
developing the plan, the secretary shall consider the recommendations
of:
(a) The University of Washington medical center;
(b) The public;
(c) Patient groups and organizations;
(d) The department of social and health services, the department of
corrections, the department of labor and industries, and the board of
health;
(e) Local health departments;
(f) Public health and clinical laboratories;
(g) Providers of services to persons with hepatitis C;
(h) Research scientists; and
(i) The centers for disease control and prevention, or other
advisory body that addresses issues related to hepatitis C.
(2) The plan shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Assessment and development of standards for educational
programs, including public school education, to heighten awareness and
enhance knowledge and understanding of hepatitis C;
(b) Assessment and development of standards for education curricula
for health and health-related providers covered by the uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;
(c) Assessment and development of standards for a training course
for persons providing hepatitis C counseling, which shall include
information relating to the special needs of persons with positive
hepatitis C test results, including the importance of early
intervention and treatment and recognition of psychosocial needs;
(d) Assessment and development of standards for a training course
for public health clinic staff regarding the treatment, detection, and
methods of transmission of hepatitis C;
(e) Assessment of capacity for voluntary hepatitis C testing
programs to be performed at facilities providing voluntary HIV testing
under chapter 70.24 RCW, with anonymous and confidential hepatitis C
testing, and pretest and posttest counseling available;
(f) Strategies for the prevention and management of hepatitis C in
injection drug users and persons incarcerated in Washington
correctional institutions;
(g) Guidelines for health care professionals to use to prevent
further transmission of the hepatitis C virus and to prevent the onset
of chronic liver disease caused by hepatitis C by detecting and
managing chronic hepatitis C infection;
(h) A comprehensive model, developed by the University of
Washington medical center, for an evidence-based process for the
prevention and management of hepatitis C and applicable to other
diseases;
(i) Recommendations that would facilitate the prevention and
management of hepatitis C in Washington; and
(j) An estimated cost for each item in this subsection if
implemented.
(3) The department of health shall develop the state plan described
in subsection (2) of this section only to the extent that, and for as
long as, federal or private funds are available for that purpose,
including grants. Funding for this act shall not come from state
sources.
(4) The board of health may adopt rules necessary to implement
subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
(5) The department of health shall submit the completed state plan
to the legislature by July 1, 2004. After the initial state plan is
submitted, the department shall update the state plan biennially and
shall submit a report on the progress of any actions facilitating the
prevention and management of hepatitis C in Washington to the governor,
lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives by
October 1st of each even-numbered year.
(6) The state plan described in subsection (2) of this section
shall be implemented by the department of health only to the extent
that, and for as long as, federal or private funds are available for
that purpose, including grants. Funding for this act shall not come
from state sources. If available funds from nonstate sources are
inadequate to finance the entire plan, then the plan shall be
implemented in stages. The legislature intends by enacting this act
that educational efforts regarding hepatitis C be a priority.
(7) This section does not create a private right of action.
(8) This section expires June 30, 2007.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.172 and 1988 c 206 s 903 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person may require an individual to take an HIV test, as
defined in chapter 70.24 RCW, or hepatitis C test, as a condition of
hiring, promotion, or continued employment unless the absence of HIV or
hepatitis C infection is a bona fide occupational qualification for the
job in question.
(2) No person may discharge or fail or refuse to hire any
individual, or segregate or classify any individual in any way which
would deprive or tend to deprive that individual of employment
opportunities or adversely affect his or her status as an employee, or
otherwise discriminate against any individual with respect to
compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment on the
basis of the results of an HIV test or hepatitis C test unless the
absence of HIV or hepatitis C infection is a bona fide occupational
qualification of the job in question.
(3) The absence of HIV or hepatitis C infection as a bona fide
occupational qualification exists when performance of a particular job
can be shown to present a significant risk, as defined by the board of
health by rule, of transmitting HIV or hepatitis C infection to other
persons, and there exists no means of eliminating the risk by
restructuring the job.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, any person who is actually
infected with HIV or hepatitis C, but is not disabled as a result of
the infection, shall not be eligible for any benefits under the
affirmative action provisions of chapter 49.74 RCW solely on the basis
of such infection.
(5) Employers are immune from civil action for damages arising out
of transmission of HIV or hepatitis C to employees or to members of the
public unless such transmission occurs as a result of the employer's
gross negligence.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.60.174 and 1997 c 271 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of determining whether an unfair practice
under this chapter has occurred, claims of discrimination based on
actual or perceived HIV or hepatitis C infection shall be evaluated in
the same manner as other claims of discrimination based on sensory,
mental, or physical disability; or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to transactions
with insurance entities, health service contractors, or health
maintenance organizations subject to RCW 49.60.030(1)(e) or 49.60.178
to prohibit fair discrimination on the basis of actual HIV or actual
hepatitis C infection status when bona fide statistical differences in
risk or exposure have been substantiated.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter((,)):
(a) "HIV" means the human immunodeficiency virus, and includes all
HIV and HIV-related viruses which damage the cellular branch of the
human immune system and leave the infected person immunodeficient; and
(b) "Hepatitis C" means the hepatitis C virus of any genotype.

--- END ---