BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.90.480 and 1998 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, annual rent rates for
the lease of state-owned aquatic lands for water-dependent uses shall
be determined as follows:
(1)(a) The assessed land value, exclusive of improvements, as
determined by the county assessor, of the upland tax parcel used in
conjunction with the leased area or, if there are no such uplands, of
the nearest upland tax parcel used for water-dependent purposes divided
by the parcel area equals the upland value.
(b) The upland value times the area of leased aquatic lands times
thirty percent equals the aquatic land value.
(2) As of July 1, 1989, and each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the real capitalization rate to be applied
to water-dependent aquatic land leases commencing or being adjusted
under subsection (3)(a) of this section in that fiscal year. The real
capitalization rate shall be the real rate of return, except that until
June 30, 1989, the real capitalization rate shall be five percent and
thereafter it shall not change by more than one percentage point in any
one year or be more than seven percent or less than three percent.
(3) The annual rent shall be:
(a) Determined initially, and redetermined every four years or as
otherwise provided in the lease, by multiplying the aquatic land value
times the real capitalization rate; and
(b) Adjusted by the inflation rate each year in which the rent is
not determined under subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(4) If the upland parcel used in conjunction with the leased area
is not assessed or has an assessed value inconsistent with the purposes
of the lease, the nearest comparable upland parcel used for similar
purposes shall be substituted and the lease payment determined in the
same manner as provided in this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "upland tax parcel" is a tax
parcel, some portion of which has upland characteristics. Filled
tidelands or shorelands with upland characteristics which abut state-owned aquatic land shall be considered as uplands in determining
aquatic land values.
(6) The annual rent for filled state-owned aquatic lands that have
the characteristics of uplands shall be determined in accordance with
RCW 79.90.500 in those cases in which the state owns the fill and has
a right to charge for the fill.
(7) ((For leases for marina uses only, beginning on June 11, 1998,
the annual rental rates in effect on December 31, 1997, shall remain in
effect until July 1, 1999, at which time the annual water-dependent
rent shall be determined by the method in effect at that time. In
order to be eligible for the rate to remain at this level, a marina
lease must be in good standing, meaning that the lessee must be current
with payment of rent, the lease not expired or in approved holdover
status, and the lessee not in breach of other terms of the agreement.))
Annual rent rates for the lease of state-owned aquatic lands for
qualifying marinas must be determined in the following manner:
(a) For the purposes of this section, a qualifying marina is
defined as a facility that is principally designed and operated to
provide in-water vessel moorage that is available for lease or rent to
the general public. It may include mixed commercial and general public
uses, provided that at least seventy-five percent of the lineal feet of
moorage is available for use by the general public to moor vessels. It
does not include moorage facilities that allocate slip spaces to
members or owners rather than the general public. Unqualified
facilities include, but are not limited to, moorage associated with
apartments, yacht clubs, moorage condominiums, and associations formed
to provide moorage to a limited or defined group. Marinas must have
leases that are in good standing in order to qualify.
(b)(i) Annual rent for qualified marinas must be determined
initially using a base rent. Thereafter, base rent shall be adjusted
as provided in (c) of this subsection.
(ii) For the purposes of this section, the base year's rent is the
water-dependent rent in effect for the year the marina qualifies. For
qualifying marinas in existence as of the effective date of this
section, the base year's rent is the rent that was charged by the
department on June 30, 2002, adjusted from that date in the manner
provided in (c) of this subsection. For qualifying marinas that are
first constructed after the effective date of this section, the base
year's rent per square foot must be computed as the average rent per
square foot of the five closest qualifying marinas. Rent computed
under this section shall be applied on the first anniversary date of
the lease after the marina qualifies or at the start of any new lease
for a qualifying marina.
(iii) Any qualifying marinas that cease to qualify by allowing
their lease to fall out of good standing, or by otherwise failing to
operate as described in (a) of this subsection, must have their rent
computed in accordance with the provisions of subsections (1) and (3)
of this section, or RCW 79.90.500, as applicable, beginning with the
next billing period for the lease. A marina that subsequently
requalifies must use a new base rent equal to the water-dependent rent
computed under subsection (1) of this section at that date.
(c)(i) The department must adjust the rent for qualifying marinas
on the anniversary date established by the lease based upon any
increase in the consumer price index for Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton as
published by the United States department of labor. If the United
States department of labor ceases to publish the Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton index the department must use the most appropriate price
index available.
(ii) The annual adjustment to rent is capped at five percent in any
given year. Any percentage increase in the consumer price index that
exceeds five percent must be carried forward and added to the consumer
price index in subsequent years when the consumer price index increase
is less than five percent until the rental rate charged incorporates
all potential adjustments arising from increases in the consumer price
index.
(d) In those cases where a portion of an otherwise qualified marina
is utilized for nonwater-dependent purposes, or is used for some
purpose not directly related to qualified vessel moorage, the portion
of the leased premises associated with this activity must be
apportioned and rent must be computed in accordance with RCW 79.90.500,
or with subsections (1) and (3) of this section, as applicable.
(e) For the purposes of this section, a marina lease is in good
standing if it is within its term or under a holdover agreement, the
rent has been properly revalued in accordance with subsections (1) and
(3) of this section, the rental computations are current, all lease
payments due under the properly valued lease have been paid, and there
are no other outstanding defaults under the lease.
(f) The provisions of this subsection (7) are intended to apply
where the department's direct lessee operates the qualifying marina to
provide moorage to the general public. In those cases where the
department's direct lessee subleases the leased premises to another
entity, or otherwise contracts with a concessionaire, to operate the
qualified marina, rent for that facility is the rent computed in
accordance with (b) and (c) of this subsection, and thirty percent of
the portion of the gross rents or fees that the department's direct
lessee charges to the sublessee or concessionaire that is greater than
the computed rent.
(g) To maintain the public benefit of generating revenue consistent
with RCW 79.90.455, at a rate greater than the cost of management of
these lands, qualifying marinas must pay a rent of no less than five
hundred dollars. This minimum amount must be adjusted annually in the
manner described in (c) of this subsection.
(h) If the rent of a qualifying marina is revalued between July 1,
2002, and the effective date of this section pursuant to subsection
(3)(a) of this section, and if that revaluation results in an increase
in the rental rate by more than ten percent, the amount of the rental
increase that is in excess of ten percent must be computed and applied
as a rental credit against future rental payments. The rental credit
must be applied against any future rental amounts billed by the
department in equal amounts over the next ten years of the lease for so
long as the lease is in good standing. If the lease terminates without
renewal, if the lease terminates early for cause, if the marina no
longer qualifies under (a) of this subsection, or if the lease is not
maintained in good standing, any unused rent credit lapses.
(i) The rate and annual adjustments provided in this subsection (7)
must be used to determine the change in rent between the end of a lease
term and the beginning of a renewed lease. If the lease is not in good
standing at the time of renewal the base rent upon renewal shall be
computed in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section.
(8) For all new leases for marinas, or any other water-dependent
use, issued after December 31, 1997, the initial annual water-dependent
rent shall be determined by the methods in subsections (1) through (6)
of this section.

--- END ---