BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.30.130 and 1965 c 8 s 43.30.130 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall exercise all of the powers, duties, and
functions now vested in the commissioner of public lands and such
powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the
department((: PROVIDED, That)). However, nothing ((herein)) contained
in this section shall effect ((his)) the commissioner's ex officio
membership on any committee provided by law. Subject to the
limitations of RCW 4.24.115, the department, in the exercise of any of
its powers, may include in any authorized contract a provision for
indemnifying the other contracting party against loss or damages.

--- END ---