BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.200 and 1979 ex.s. c 70 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) When premises are rented for an indefinite time, with
monthly or other periodic rent reserved, such tenancy shall be
construed to be a tenancy from month to month, or from period to period
on which rent is payable, and shall be terminated by written notice of
twenty days or more, preceding the end of any of ((said)) the months or
periods of tenancy, given by either party to the other.
(b) Any tenant who is a member of the armed forces, including the
national guard and armed forces reserves, or that tenant's spouse or
dependant, may terminate a rental agreement with less than twenty days'
notice if the tenant receives reassignment or deployment orders that do
not allow a twenty-day notice.
(2) Whenever a landlord plans to change any apartment or apartments
to a condominium form of ownership or plans to change to a policy of
excluding children, the landlord shall give a written notice to a
tenant at least ninety days before termination of the tenancy to
effectuate such change in policy. Such ninety-day notice shall be in
lieu of the notice required by subsection (1) of this section((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, if after giving the ninety-day notice the
change in policy is delayed, the notice requirements of subsection (1)
of this section shall apply unless waived by the tenant.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.220 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 207 s 22 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In all cases where premises are rented for a specified time, by
express or implied contract, the tenancy shall be deemed terminated at
the end of such specified time.
(2) Any tenant who is a member of the armed forces, including the
national guard and armed forces reserves, or that tenant's spouse or
dependent, may terminate a tenancy for a specified time if the tenant
receives reassignment or deployment orders. The tenant shall provide
notice of the reassignment or deployment order to the landlord no later
than seven days after receipt.

Sec. 3 RCW 59.20.090 and 1998 c 118 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise agreed rental agreements shall be for a term
of one year. Any rental agreement of whatever duration shall be
automatically renewed for the term of the original rental agreement,
unless a different specified term is agreed upon.
(2) A landlord seeking to increase the rent upon expiration of the
term of a rental agreement of any duration shall notify the tenant in
writing three months prior to the effective date of any increase in
rent.
(3) A tenant shall notify the landlord in writing one month prior
to the expiration of a rental agreement of an intention not to renew.
(4)(a) The tenant may terminate the rental agreement upon thirty
days written notice whenever a change in the location of the tenant's
employment requires a change in his residence, and shall not be liable
for rental following such termination unless after due diligence and
reasonable effort the landlord is not able to rent the mobile home lot
at a fair rental. If the landlord is not able to rent the lot, the
tenant shall remain liable for the rental specified in the rental
agreement until the lot is rented or the original term ends;
(b) Any tenant who is a member of the armed forces, including the
national guard and armed forces reserves, or that tenant's spouse or
dependent, may terminate a rental agreement with less than thirty days
notice if ((he)) the tenant receives reassignment or deployment orders
which do not allow greater notice. The tenant shall provide notice of
the reassignment or deployment order to the landlord no later than
seven days after receipt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---