BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.52.010 and 2002 c 341 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency management"
means the preparation for and the carrying out of all emergency
functions, other than functions for which the military forces are
primarily responsible, to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and
recover from emergencies and disasters, and to aid victims suffering
from injury or damage, resulting from disasters caused by all hazards,
whether natural, technological, or human caused, and to provide support
for search and rescue operations for persons and property in distress.
However, "emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency management"
does not mean preparation for emergency evacuation or relocation of
residents in anticipation of nuclear attack.
(2) "Local organization for emergency services or management" means
an organization created in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter by state or local authority to perform local emergency
management functions.
(3) "Political subdivision" means any county, city or town.
(4) "Emergency worker" means any person, including but not limited
to an architect registered under chapter 18.08 RCW or a professional
engineer registered under chapter 18.43 RCW, who is registered with a
local emergency management organization or the department and holds
((an)) a state emergency worker identification card issued by the local
emergency management director or the department for the purpose of
engaging in authorized emergency management activities or is an
employee of the state of Washington or any political subdivision
thereof who is called upon to perform emergency management activities.
(5) "Injury" as used in this chapter shall mean and include
accidental injuries and/or occupational diseases arising out of
emergency management activities.
(6)(a) "Emergency or disaster" as used in all sections of this
chapter except RCW 38.52.430 shall mean an event or set of
circumstances which: (I) Demands immediate action to preserve public
health, protect life, protect public property, or to provide relief to
any stricken community overtaken by such occurrences, or (ii) reaches
such a dimension or degree of destructiveness as to warrant the
governor declaring a state of emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.010.
(b) "Emergency" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means an incident that
requires a normal police, coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response as a result of a violation of one of the
statutes enumerated in RCW 38.52.430.
(7) "Search and rescue" means the acts of searching for, rescuing,
or recovering by means of ground, marine, or air activity any person
who becomes lost, injured, or is killed while outdoors or as a result
of a natural, technological, or human caused disaster, including
instances involving searches for downed aircraft when ground personnel
are used. Nothing in this section shall affect appropriate activity by
the department of transportation under chapter 47.68 RCW.
(8) "Executive head" and "executive heads" means the county
executive in those charter counties with an elective office of county
executive, however designated, and, in the case of other counties, the
county legislative authority. In the case of cities and towns, it
means the mayor in those cities and towns with mayor-council or
commission forms of government, where the mayor is directly elected,
and it means the city manager in those cities and towns with council
manager forms of government. Cities and towns may also designate an
executive head for the purposes of this chapter by ordinance.
(9) "Director" means the adjutant general.
(10) "Local director" means the director of a local organization of
emergency management or emergency services.
(11) "Department" means the state military department.
(12) "Emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means a public
agency's use of emergency services during an emergency or disaster as
defined in subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(13) "Expense of an emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430
means reasonable costs incurred by a public agency in reasonably making
an appropriate emergency response to the incident, but shall only
include those costs directly arising from the response to the
particular incident. Reasonable costs shall include the costs of
providing police, coroner, fire fighting, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response at the scene of the incident, as well as
the salaries of the personnel responding to the incident.
(14) "Public agency" means the state, and a city, county, municipal
corporation, district, town, or public authority located, in whole or
in part, within this state which provides or may provide fire fighting,
police, ambulance, medical, or other emergency services.
(15) "Incident command system" means: (a) An all-hazards, on-scene
functional management system that establishes common standards in
organization, terminology, and procedures; provides a means (unified
command) for the establishment of a common set of incident objectives
and strategies during multiagency/multijurisdiction operations while
maintaining individual agency/jurisdiction authority, responsibility,
and accountability; and is a component of the national interagency
incident management system; or (b) an equivalent and compatible all-hazards, on-scene functional management system.
(16) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning
ascribed to it in RCW 82.14B.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 38.52.180 and 1987 c 185 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be no liability on the part of anyone including any
person, partnership, corporation, the state of Washington or any
political subdivision thereof who owns or maintains any building or
premises which have been designated by a local organization for
emergency management as a shelter from destructive operations or
attacks by enemies of the United States for any injuries sustained by
any person while in or upon said building or premises, as a result of
the condition of said building or premises or as a result of any act or
omission, or in any way arising from the designation of such premises
as a shelter, when such person has entered or gone upon or into said
building or premises for the purpose of seeking refuge therein during
destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the United States or
during tests ordered by lawful authority, except for an act of wilful
negligence by such owner or occupant or his servants, agents, or
employees.
(2) All legal liability for damage to property or injury or death
to persons (except an emergency worker, regularly ((enrolled))
registered and acting as such), caused by acts done, or attempted,
under the color of this chapter in a bona fide attempt to comply
therewith shall be the obligation of the state of Washington. Suits
may be instituted and maintained against the state for the enforcement
of such liability, or for the indemnification of persons appointed and
regularly ((enrolled)) registered as emergency workers while actually
engaged in emergency management duties, or as members of any agency of
the state or political subdivision thereof engaged in emergency
management activity, or their dependents, for damage done to their
private property, or for any judgment against them for acts done in
good faith in compliance with this chapter: PROVIDED, That the
foregoing shall not be construed to result in indemnification in any
case of wilful misconduct, gross negligence or bad faith on the part of
any agent of emergency management: PROVIDED, That should the United
States or any agency thereof, in accordance with any federal statute,
rule or regulation, provide for the payment of damages to property
and/or for death or injury as provided for in this section, then and in
that event there shall be no liability or obligation whatsoever upon
the part of the state of Washington for any such damage, death, or
injury for which the United States government assumes liability.
(3) Any requirement for a license to practice any professional,
mechanical or other skill shall not apply to any authorized emergency
worker who shall, in the course of performing his duties as such,
practice such professional, mechanical or other skill during an
emergency described in this chapter.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of
any person to receive benefits to which he would otherwise be entitled
under this chapter, or under the workers' compensation law, or under
any pension or retirement law, nor the right of any such person to
receive any benefits or compensation under any act of congress.

Sec. 3 RCW 38.52.310 and 1986 c 266 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall establish by rule ((and regulation)) various
classes of emergency workers, the scope of the duties of each class,
((and)) the conditions under which said workers shall be deemed to be
on duty and covered by the provisions of this chapter((. The
department shall also adopt rules and regulations prescribing the
manner in which emergency workers of each class are to be registered)),
and the size, color, and format of the state emergency worker
registration card. The department shall also establish by rule the
size, shape, and all design elements of the state emergency worker
decal that contains the words, "state emergency worker."
Registration of emergency workers of any class requires the name,
photograph, residential address, and birthdate of the registrant.
Registration may occur at the state office of emergency management
either in the jurisdiction of the registrant's residence or in the
jurisdiction where the registrant's volunteer organization is
headquartered. All completed registration forms must be reviewed by
the local emergency management agency director or by the director of
the department of emergency management, or by the director's designee,
and shall be accepted unless there is cause for rejection. A criminal
history and driving record background check shall be made, at the
discretion of the state or local emergency management agency director,
of all persons whose registration is accepted.
A registrant becomes a registered emergency worker upon his or her
receipt of the state emergency worker registration card. All emergency
workers who hold an identification card that was issued prior to the
effective date of this act shall reregister prior to January 1, 2007.
After January 1, 2007, only those persons holding a valid state
emergency worker registration card are emergency workers as defined by
this chapter.

--- END ---