BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county auditor is guilty of lying about an election in the
first degree if the auditor in an official capacity makes a materially
false statement that he or she knows to be false concerning the conduct
of an election in the auditor's county.
(2) Lying about an election in the first degree is a class C felony
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who is the immediate subordinate of the county auditor
for election functions is guilty of lying about an election in the
second degree if the person in an official capacity makes a materially
false statement that he or she knows to be false concerning the conduct
of an election in the auditor's county.
(2) Lying about an election in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

--- END ---