BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the orca
whale, Orcinus orca, also known as the killer whale, is a magnificent
free-roaming marine creature of the Pacific Northwest, and is an icon
of the marine ecosystem. The state of Washington has designated an
official state tree, grass, flower, fruit, bird, fossil, fish, insect,
song, folk song, and dance, but not an official state mammal. The orca
is an integral part of Northwest Indian tribal culture, and no living
creature would be more appropriate as an official state mammal than an
orca whale. Children of our state are keenly aware of the importance
of the orca as a symbol of wildness and freedom. The legislature finds
that the orca are state treasures, and are deserving of recognition as
the official state mammal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The orca whale, Orcinus orca, is designated the official mammal of
the state of Washington.

--- END ---