BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.244 and 1998 c 126 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one
hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of
malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.
(2) Any microbrewery license under this section may also act as a
distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own
production. Any microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws
and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers.
(3) The board may issue an endorsement to this license allowing for
on-premises consumption of beer, including strong beer, wine, or both
of other manufacture if purchased from a Washington state-licensed
distributor. Each endorsement shall cost two hundred dollars per year,
or four hundred dollars per year allowing the sale and service of both
beer and wine.
(4) The microbrewer obtaining such endorsement must determine, at
the time the endorsement is issued, whether the licensed premises will
be operated either as a tavern with persons under twenty-one years of
age not allowed as provided for in RCW 66.24.330, or as a beer and/or
wine restaurant as described in RCW 66.24.320.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.250 and 1997 c 321 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a license for beer distributors to sell beer and
strong beer, purchased from licensed Washington breweries, beer
certificate of approval holders (B5), licensed beer importers, or
suppliers of foreign beer located outside the state of Washington, to
licensed beer retailers and other beer distributors and to export same
from the state of Washington; fee six hundred sixty dollars per year
for each distributing unit.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.24.261 and 1997 c 321 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a license for beer importers that authorizes the
licensee to import beer and strong beer manufactured within the United
States by certificate of approval holders (B5) into the state of
Washington. The licensee may also import beer and strong beer
manufactured outside the United States.
(1) Beer and strong beer so imported may be sold to licensed beer
distributors or exported from the state.
(2) Every person, firm, or corporation licensed as a beer importer
shall establish and maintain a principal office within the state at
which shall be kept proper records of all beer and strong beer imported
into the state under this license.
(3) No beer importer's license shall be granted to a nonresident of
the state nor to a corporation whose principal place of business is
outside the state until such applicant has established a principal
office and agent within the state upon which service can be made.
(4) As a requirement for license approval, a beer importer shall
enter into a written agreement with the board to furnish on or before
the twentieth day of each month, a report under oath, detailing the
quantity of beer and strong beer sold or delivered to each licensed
beer distributor. Failure to file such reports may result in the
suspension or cancellation of this license.
(5) Beer and strong beer imported under this license must conform
to the provisions of RCW 66.28.120 and have received label approval
from the board. The board shall not certify beer or strong beer
labeled with names which may be confused with other nonalcoholic
beverages whether manufactured or produced from a domestic brewery or
imported nor shall it certify beer or strong beer which fails to meet
quality standards established by the board.
(6) The license fee shall be one hundred sixty dollars per year.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.24.270 and 1997 c 321 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person, firm or corporation, holding a license to
manufacture malt liquors or strong beer within the state of Washington,
shall, on or before the twentieth day of each month, furnish to the
Washington state liquor control board, on a form to be prescribed by
the board, a statement showing the quantity of malt liquors and strong
beer sold for resale during the preceding calendar month to each beer
distributor within the state of Washington.
(2) A United States brewery or manufacturer of beer or strong beer,
located outside the state of Washington, must hold a certificate of
approval (B5) to allow sales and shipment of the certificate of
approval holder's beer or strong beer to licensed Washington beer
distributors or importers. The certificate of approval shall not be
granted unless and until such brewer or manufacturer of beer or strong
beer shall have made a written agreement with the board to furnish to
the board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a report under
oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the quantity of
beer and strong beer sold or delivered to each licensed beer
distributor or importer during the preceding month, and shall further
have agreed with the board, that such brewer or manufacturer of beer or
strong beer and all general sales corporations or agencies maintained
by them, and all of their trade representatives, corporations, and
agencies, shall and will faithfully comply with all laws of the state
of Washington pertaining to the sale of intoxicating liquors and all
rules and regulations of the Washington state liquor control board. A
violation of the terms of this agreement will cause the board to take
action to suspend or revoke such certificate.
(3) The fee for the certificate of approval, issued pursuant to the
provisions of this title, shall be one hundred dollars per year, which
sum shall accompany the application for such certificate.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.24.290 and 1999 c 281 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor
licensed under this title may sell and deliver beer and strong beer to
holders of authorized licenses direct, but to no other person, other
than the board; and every such brewery or beer distributor shall report
all sales to the board monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and shall
pay to the board as an added tax for the privilege of manufacturing and
selling the beer and strong beer within the state a tax of one dollar
and thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees
within the state and on sales to licensees within the state of bottled
and canned beer, including strong beer, shall pay a tax computed in
gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons. Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable
tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month
of sale will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month
or fraction thereof. Beer and strong beer shall be sold by breweries
and distributors in sealed barrels or packages. The moneys collected
under this subsection shall be distributed as follows: (a) Three-tenths of a percent shall be distributed to border areas under RCW
66.08.195; and (b) of the remaining moneys: (i) Twenty percent shall
be distributed to counties in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.200;
and (ii) eighty percent shall be distributed to incorporated cities and
towns in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.210.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of thirty-one gallons. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(3)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons thereafter.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of this
exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (3) shall be deposited in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer that
is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in the
first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries that
are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as
existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by
the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption under
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal to one
dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of the following month, three percent
of the revenues collected from this additional tax shall be distributed
to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining moneys shall be
transferred to the state general fund.
(5) The board may make refunds for all taxes paid on beer and
strong beer exported from the state for use outside the state.
(6) The board may require filing with the board of a bond to be
approved by it, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the
payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to pay the tax when due, the
board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her license until all
taxes are paid.
(((7) The tax imposed under this section shall not apply to "strong
beer" as defined in this title.))

Sec. 6 RCW 66.24.320 and 1998 c 126 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and/or wine restaurant license to sell beer,
including strong beer, or wine, or both, at retail, for consumption on
the premises. A patron of the licensee may remove from the premises,
recorked or recapped in its original container, any portion of wine
that was purchased for consumption with a meal.
(1) The annual fee shall be two hundred dollars for the beer
license, two hundred dollars for the wine license, or four hundred
dollars for a combination beer and wine license.
(2) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this license to
allow the licensee to remove from the liquor stocks at the licensed
premises, only those types of liquor that are authorized under the on-premises license privileges for sale and service at special occasion
locations at a specified date and place not currently licensed by the
board. The privilege of selling and serving liquor under the
endorsement is limited to members and guests of a society or
organization as defined in RCW 66.24.375. Cost of the endorsement is
three hundred fifty dollars.
(a) The holder of this license with catering endorsement shall, if
requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date,
time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the
licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested
information concerning the society or organization that will be holding
the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.
(b) If attendance at the function will be limited to members and
invited guests of the sponsoring society or organization, the
requirement that the society or organization be within the definition
of RCW 66.24.375 is waived.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.24.330 and 1997 c 321 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and wine retailer's license to be designated
as a tavern license to sell beer, including strong beer, or wine, or
both, at retail, for consumption on the premises. Such licenses may be
issued only to a person operating a tavern that may be frequented only
by persons twenty-one years of age and older.
The annual fee for such license shall be two hundred dollars for
the beer license, two hundred dollars for the wine license, or four
hundred dollars for a combination beer and wine license. Licensees who
have a fee increase of more than one hundred dollars as a result of
this change shall have their fees increased fifty percent of the amount
the first renewal year and the remaining amount beginning with the
second renewal period. New licensees obtaining a license after July 1,
1998, shall pay the full amount of four hundred dollars.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.24.360 and 1997 c 321 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a grocery store license to sell beer, strong beer, and/or
wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original containers, not to be
consumed upon the premises where sold, at any store other than the
state liquor stores.
(1) Licensees obtaining a written endorsement from the board may
also sell malt liquor in kegs or other containers capable of holding
less than five and one-half gallons of liquid.
(2) The annual fee for the grocery store license is one hundred
fifty dollars for each store.
(3) The board shall issue a restricted grocery store license
authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if the board
finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that the sale of strong
beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest. In
determining the public interest, the board shall consider at least the
following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(4) Licensees holding a grocery store license must maintain a
minimum three thousand dollar inventory of food products for human
consumption, not including pop, beer, strong beer, or wine.
(5) Upon approval by the board, the grocery store licensee may also
receive an endorsement to permit the international export of beer,
strong beer, and wine.
(a) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this endorsement must
have been purchased from a licensed beer or wine distributor licensed
to do business within the state of Washington.
(b) Any beer, strong beer, and wine sold under this endorsement
must be intended for consumption outside the state of Washington and
the United States and appropriate records must be maintained by the
licensee.
(c) A holder of this special endorsement to the grocery store
license shall be considered not in violation of RCW 66.28.010.
(d) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this license must be
sold at a price no less than the acquisition price paid by the holder
of the license.
(e) The annual cost of this endorsement is five hundred dollars and
is in addition to the license fees paid by the licensee for a grocery
store license.

Sec. 9 RCW 66.24.371 and 1997 c 321 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a beer and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer,
strong beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, at any
store other than the state liquor stores. Licensees obtaining a
written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or
other containers capable of holding less than five and one-half gallons
of liquid. The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty shop
license is one hundred dollars for each store.
(2) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a charge,
single-serving samples of two ounces or less to customers for the
purpose of sales promotion. Sampling activities of licensees under
this section are subject to RCW 66.28.010 and 66.28.040 and the cost of
sampling under this section may not be borne, directly or indirectly,
by any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of liquor.
(3) The board shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty
shop license, authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table
wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that
the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider
at least the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(4) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license
must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of
beer, strong beer, and/or wine.

Sec. 10 RCW 66.24.452 and 2001 c 199 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and wine license to be issued to a
private club for sale of beer, strong beer, and wine for on-premises
consumption.
(2) Beer, strong beer, and wine sold by the licensee may be on tap
or by open bottles or cans.
(3) The fee for the private club beer and wine license is one
hundred eighty dollars per year.
(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the private club beer and
wine license that allows the holder of a private club beer and wine
license to sell for off-premises consumption wine vinted and bottled in
the state of Washington and carrying a label exclusive to the license
holder selling the wine. Spirits, strong beer, and beer may not be
sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The annual fee
for the endorsement under this ((chapter [section])) section is one
hundred twenty dollars.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.08.150 and 1998 c 126 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each retail
sale of spirits((, or strong beer)) in the original package at the rate
of fifteen percent of the selling price. The tax imposed in this
subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales by the
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but excluding sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(2) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each sale of
spirits((, or strong beer)) in the original package at the rate of ten
percent of the selling price on sales by Washington state liquor stores
and agencies to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(3) There is levied and shall be collected an additional tax upon
each retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of one
dollar and seventy-two cents per liter. The additional tax imposed in
this subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales by
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(4) An additional tax is imposed equal to fourteen percent
multiplied by the taxes payable under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(5) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of seven cents per liter. The
additional tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and
including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(6)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in
the original package at the rate of one and seven-tenths percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, two and six-tenths percent of the
selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and
three and four-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This additional
tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington state
liquor stores and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licensees.
(b) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the
original package at the rate of one and one-tenth percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, one and seven-tenths percent of
the selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and two and three-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales to spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licensees.
(c) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of twenty cents per liter through
June 30, 1995, thirty cents per liter for the period July 1, 1995,
through June 30, 1997, and forty-one cents per liter thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington
state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant licensees.
(d) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited in the health services account
created under RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(7) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
spirits ((or strong beer)) in the original package.
(8) The taxes imposed in this section shall be paid by the buyer to
the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full
amount of the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale under this
section. The taxes required by this section to be collected by the
seller shall be stated separately from the selling price and for
purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller, it
shall be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any
price list does not include the taxes imposed by this section.
(9) As used in this section, the terms, "spirits((," "strong
beer,))" and "package" shall have the meaning ascribed to them in
chapter 66.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The liquor control board shall study the
impacts of strong beer sales, and report its findings to the
legislature by December 31, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---