BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
After January 1, 2004, no agency may adopt a rule that exceeds a
federal standard without specific legislative authority. The
legislature may grant such authority pursuant to a request by an
agency. A requesting agency shall present to the appropriate standing
committees of the house of representatives and the senate:
(1) A written justification detailing the unique reasons why
Washington state policy must exceed federal policy; and
(2) A cost-benefit analysis that clearly outlines the economic
impacts for Washington's business or other regulated entities.

--- END ---