BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many businesses
in the state are frustrated by the complexity of the regulatory system.
The Washington Administrative Code containing agency rules now fills
twelve volumes, and appears to be growing each year. While the vast
majority of businesses make a good faith attempt to comply with
applicable laws and rules, many find it extremely difficult to keep up
with agencies' issuance of new rules and requirements. Therefore,
state agencies are directed to make a good faith attempt to notify
businesses affected by rule changes that may subject noncomplying
businesses to penalties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Within two hundred days of the effective date of a rule that
imposes additional requirements on businesses the violation of which
subjects the business to a penalty, assessment, or administrative
sanction, an agency shall make a good faith effort to notify businesses
affected by the rule of the requirements of the rule and how to obtain
technical assistance to comply. For purposes of this section, "good
faith" means: (1) The agency at least notifies businesses in the
standard industrial classifications or their successor identified in
the rule-making file as businesses affected by the rule that are
registered with the department of revenue; or (2) for rules imposing
additional requirements only on persons or firms licensed, registered,
or operating under a permit, the agency notifies those persons or firms
holding the license, registration, or permit. The notification shall
announce the rule change, briefly summarize the rule change, and
include a contact for more information. Notification may be by
individual notice, agency bulletins or newsletters, or any other means
that will reasonably inform affected businesses. Failure to notify a
specific business under this section does not invalidate a rule or
waive the requirement to comply with the rule. The requirements of
this section do not apply to emergency rules adopted under RCW
34.05.350.

--- END ---