BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4451 and 1997 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter, as
provided in this section. The maximum credit for a taxpayer for a
reporting period is ((thirty-five)) seventy dollars multiplied by the
number of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW
82.32.045.
(2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter is
equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is allowed equal to
the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter.
(3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter exceeds
the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed equal to twice the
maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due under this chapter, but not
less than zero.
(4) The department may prepare a tax credit table consisting of tax
ranges using increments of no more than five dollars and a
corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax ranges. The table
shall be prepared in such a manner that no taxpayer will owe a greater
amount of tax by using the table than would be owed by performing the
calculation under subsections (1) through (3) of this section. A table
prepared by the department under this subsection shall be used by all
taxpayers in taking the credit provided in this section.
(5) Beginning in calendar year 2004, the department shall increase
the monthly dollar amount under subsection (1) of this section in use
for that calendar year by the consumer price index. If any increase
under this subsection is not a multiple of one dollar, the increase
shall be rounded to the next lowest multiple of one dollar. The
monthly amount determined under this subsection shall be used for
reporting periods in the next calendar year.
(6) As used in this section, "consumer price index" means the
consumer price index compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United
States department of labor for the state of Washington. If the bureau
of labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index for
areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of
people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state,
and including all items shall be used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---