BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.168.040 and 2002 c 371 s 922 are each amended to
read as follows:
The emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account
is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys shall be transferred
to the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account
from the public safety education account or other sources as
appropriated, and as collected under RCW 46.63.110(((6))) (7) and
46.12.042. Disbursements shall be made by the department subject to
legislative appropriation. Expenditures may be made only for the
purposes of the state trauma care system under this chapter, including
emergency medical services, trauma care services, rehabilitative
services, and the planning and development of related services under
this chapter and for reimbursement by the department of social and
health services for trauma care services provided by designated trauma
centers. ((During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the emergency medical services and trauma care system
trust account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account.)) Money in the account shall not
be transferred to any other fund or account.

--- END ---