BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.105.010 and 1998 c 245 s 157 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created within the department of fish and wildlife the
Puget Sound recreational salmon and marine fish enhancement program.
The department of fish and wildlife shall identify a coordinator for
the program who shall act as spokesperson for the program and shall:
(1) Coordinate the activities of the Puget Sound recreational
salmon and marine fish enhancement program, including the Lake
Washington salmon fishery; and
(2) Work within and outside of the department to achieve the goals
stated in this chapter, including coordinating with the Puget Sound
recreational fisheries enhancement oversight committee established in
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Puget Sound recreational fisheries enhancement oversight
committee is created. The director shall appoint at least seven
members representing sport fishing organizations to the committee from
a list of applicants, ensuring broad representation from the sport
fishing community. Each member shall serve for a term of two years,
and may be reappointed for subsequent two-year terms at the discretion
of the director. Members of the committee serve without compensation.
(2) The Puget Sound recreational fisheries enhancement oversight
committee has the following duties:
(a) Advise the department on all aspects of the Puget Sound
recreational fisheries enhancement program;
(b) Review and provide guidance on the annual budget for the
recreational fisheries enhancement account;
(c) Select a chair of the committee. It is the chair's duty to
coordinate with the department on all issues related to the Puget Sound
recreational fisheries enhancement program;
(d) Meet at least quarterly with the department's coordinator of
the Puget Sound recreational fisheries enhancement program;
(e) Review and comment on program documents and proposed production
of salmon and other species; and
(f) Address other issues related to the purposes of the Puget Sound
recreational fisheries enhancement program that are of interest to
recreational fishers in Puget Sound.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.105.150 and 2000 c 107 s 120 are each amended to
read as follows:
The recreational fisheries enhancement account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from RCW 77.105.140 shall be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
recreational fisheries enhancement programs identified in this chapter.
Under no circumstances may moneys from the account be used to backfill
shortfalls in other state funding sources.

--- END ---