BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 86.15.050 and 1961 c 153 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of county commissioners of each county shall be ex
officio, by virtue of their office, supervisors of the zones created in
each county. In any zone with more than two thousand residents, an
election of supervisors other than the board of county commissioners
may be held as provided in this section.
(2) When proposed by citizen petition or by resolution of the board
of county commissioners, a ballot proposition authorizing election of
the supervisors of a zone shall be submitted by ordinance to the voters
residing in the zone at any general election, or at any special
election which may be called for that purpose.
(3) The ballot proposition shall be submitted (a) if the board of
county supervisors enacts an ordinance submitting the proposition after
adopting a resolution proposing the election of supervisors of a zone;
or (b) if a petition proposing the election of supervisors of a zone is
submitted to the county auditor of the county in which the zone is
located that is signed by registered voters within the zone, numbering
at least fifteen percent of the votes cast in the last county general
election by registered voters within the zone.
(4) Upon receipt of a citizen petition under subsection (3)(b) of
this section, the county auditor shall determine whether the petition
is signed by a sufficient number of registered voters, using the
registration records and returns of the preceding general election,
and, no later than forty-five days after receipt of the petition, shall
attach to the petition the auditor's certificate stating whether or not
sufficient signatures have been obtained. If the signatures are found
by the auditor to be insufficient, the petition shall be returned to
the person filing it.
(5) The ballot proposition authorizing election of supervisors of
zones shall appear on the ballot of the next general election or at the
next special election date specified under RCW 29.13.020 occurring
sixty or more days after the last resolution proposing election of
supervisors or the date the county auditor certifies that the petition
proposing such election contains sufficient valid signatures.
(6) The petition proposing the election of zone supervisors, or the
ordinance submitting the question to the voters, shall describe the
proposed election process. The ballot proposition shall include the
following:

"For the direct election of flood control zone district
supervisors."
"Against the direct election of flood control zone district
supervisors."

(7) The ordinance or petition submitting the ballot proposition
shall designate the proposed composition of the supervisors of zones,
which shall be clearly described in the ballot proposition. The ballot
proposition shall state that the zone supervisors shall thereafter be
selected by election, and, at the same election at which the
proposition is submitted to the voters as to whether to elect zone
supervisors, three zone supervisors shall be elected. The election of
zone supervisors is null and void if the voters, by a simple majority,
do not approve the direct election of the zone supervisors. Candidates
shall run for specific supervisor positions. No primary may be held to
nominate candidates. The person receiving the greatest number of votes
for each position shall be elected as a supervisor. The staggering of
the terms of office shall occur as follows: (a) The person who is
elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a
six-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year
or a five-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; (b) the person who is elected receiving the second
greatest number of votes shall be elected to a four-year term of office
if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a three-year term of
office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (c) the
other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of
office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year
term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The
initial supervisors shall take office immediately when they are elected
and qualified, and for purposes of computing their terms of office the
terms shall be assumed to commence on the first day of January in the
year after they are elected. Thereafter, all supervisors shall be
elected to six-year terms of office. All supervisors shall serve until
their respective successors are elected and qualified and assume office
in accordance with RCW 29.04.170. Vacancies may occur and shall be
filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.
(8) The costs and expenses directly related to the election of zone
supervisors shall be borne by the zone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---