BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.100 and 1992 c 93 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except for a person who is not qualified for jury service under
RCW 2.36.070, no person may be excused from jury service by the court
except upon a showing of undue hardship, extreme inconvenience, public
necessity, or any reason deemed sufficient by the court for a period of
time the court deems necessary. Unless the public need for juries in
the court outweighs the individual circumstances of the person
summoned, a judge of the court or clerk of the court will excuse a
person from acting as a juror upon the request of that person if the
person is the sole caregiver for a child or other dependent during the
court's normal hours of operation, the person is unable to afford day
care or make other arrangements for the care of the dependent, and the
person personally attends to the dependent during the court's normal
hours of operation.
(2) At the discretion of the court's designee, after a request by
a prospective juror to be excused, a prospective juror excused from
juror service for a particular time may be assigned to another jury
term within the twelve-month period. If the assignment to another jury
term is made at the time a juror is excused from the jury term for
which he or she was summoned, a second summons under RCW 2.36.095 need
not be issued.
(3) When the jury source list has been fully summoned within a
consecutive twelve-month period and additional jurors are needed,
jurors who have already served during the consecutive twelve-month
period may be summoned again for service. A juror who has previously
served may only be excused if he or she served at least two weeks of
juror service within the preceding twelve months. An excuse for prior
service shall be granted only upon the written request of the
prospective juror, which request shall certify the terms of prior
service. Prior jury service may include service in superior court, in
a court of limited jurisdiction, in the United States District Court,
or on a jury of inquest.

--- END ---