BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.220.060 and 2000 c 253 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to become a licensed geologist, an applicant must meet the
following requirements:
(1) The applicant shall be of good moral and ethical character as
attested to by letters of reference submitted by the applicant or as
otherwise determined by the board;
(2) The applicant shall have graduated from a course of study in
geology satisfactory to the board or satisfy educational equivalents
determined by the board;
(3) The applicant shall have a documented record of a minimum of
five years of experience in geology or a specialty of geology, obtained
subsequent to completion of the academic requirements specified in this
section, in geological work of a character satisfactory to the board,
demonstrating that the applicant is qualified to assume responsible
charge of such work upon licensing as a geologist. The board shall
require that three years of the experience be gained under the
supervision of a geologist licensed in this or any other state, or
under the supervision of others who, in the opinion of the board, are
qualified to have responsible charge of geological work;
(4) The applicant shall have passed an examination covering the
fundamentals and practice of geology prescribed or accepted by the
board;
(5) The applicant shall meet other general or individual
requirements established by the board pursuant to its authority under
this chapter;
(6) For licensing in any geological specialty recognized under this
chapter, an applicant must first be a licensed geologist under this
chapter, and then meet the following requirements:
(a) In addition to the educational requirements for licensing as a
geologist defined in subsection (2) of this section, an applicant for
licensing in any specialty of geology established by the board shall
have successfully completed advanced study pertinent to their
specialty, or equivalent seminars or on-the-job training acceptable to
the board;
(b) The applicant's experience shall include a documented record of
five years of experience, after completion of the academic requirements
specified in this subsection, in geological work in the applicable
specialty of a character satisfactory to the board, and demonstrating
that the applicant is qualified to assume responsible charge of the
specialty work upon licensing in that specialty of geology. The board
shall require that three years of the experience be gained under the
supervision of a geologist licensed in the specialty in this or any
other state, or under the supervision of others who, in the opinion of
the board, are qualified to have responsible charge of geological work
in the specialty; and
(c) The applicant must pass an examination in the applicable
specialty prescribed or accepted by the board;
(7) The following standards are applicable to experience in the
practice of geology or a specialty required under subsections (3) and
(6) of this section:
(a) Each year of professional practice of a character acceptable to
the board, carried out under the direct supervision of a geologist who
(i) is licensed in this state or is licensed in another state with
licensing standards substantially similar to those under this chapter;
or (ii) meets the educational and experience requirements for
licensing, but who is not required to be licensed under the limitations
of this chapter, qualifies as one year of professional experience in
geology;
(b) Each year of professional specialty practice of a character
acceptable to the board, carried out under the direct supervision of a
(i) geologist who is licensed in a specialty under this chapter, or who
is licensed as a specialty geologist in another state that has
licensing requirements that are substantially similar to this chapter;
or (ii) specialty geologist who meets the educational and experience
requirements for licensing, but who is not required to be licensed
under the limitations of this chapter, qualifies as one year of
practice in the applicable specialty of geology; and
(c) Experience in professional practice, of a character acceptable
to the board and acquired prior to one year after July 1, 2001,
qualifies if the experience (i) was acquired under the direct
supervision of a geologist who meets the educational and experience
requirements for licensing under this chapter, or who is licensed in
another state that has licensing requirements that are substantially
similar to this chapter; or (ii) would constitute responsible charge of
professional geological work, as determined by the board;
(8) Each year of full-time graduate study in the geological
sciences or in a specialty of geology shall qualify as one year of
professional experience in geology or the applicable specialty of
geology, up to a maximum of two years. The board may accept geological
research, teaching of geology, or a geological specialty at the college
or university level as qualifying experience, provided that such
research or teaching, in the judgment of the board, is comparable to
experience obtained in the practice of geology or a specialty thereof;
(9) An applicant who applies for licensing ((within one year after
July 1, 2001)) before July 1, 2003, shall be considered to be qualified
for licensing, without further written examination, if the applicant
possesses the following qualifications:
(a)(i) A specific record of graduation with a bachelor of science
or bachelor of arts or higher degree, with a major in geology granted
by an approved institution of higher education acceptable to the board;
or
(ii) Graduation from an approved institution of higher education in
a four-year academic degree program other than geology, but with the
required number of course hours as defined by the board to qualify as
a geologist or engineering geologist; and
(b) Experience consisting of a minimum of five years of
professional practice in geology or a specialty thereof as required
under subsections (3) and (7) of this section, of a character
acceptable to the board;
(10) An applicant who applies for licensing in a specialty within
one year after recognition of the specialty under this chapter shall be
considered qualified for licensing in that specialty, without further
written examination, if the applicant:
(a) Is qualified for licensing as a geologist in this state; and
(b) Has experience consisting of a minimum five years of
professional practice in the applicable specialty of geology as
required under subsections (3) and (7) of this section, of a character
acceptable to the board; and
(11) The geologists initially appointed to the board under RCW
18.220.030 shall be qualified for licensing under subsections (7) and
(8) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---