BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that taking legal
action against a landlord or tenant for violations of the
manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act can be a costly and
lengthy process, and that many people cannot afford to pursue this
process.
(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide a
less costly and lengthy way for manufactured/mobile home landlords and
tenants to resolve disputes, and to provide a mechanism for state
authorities to quickly locate managers and owners of manufactured
housing communities. The legislature further intends to authorize the
department of licensing to register manufactured housing community
managers, conduct investigations, issue citations, and impose fines for
violations of the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Manufactured housing community" has the same meaning as in RCW
59.20.030.
(3) "Manufactured housing community manager" means a person who
performs manufactured housing community management duties and does not
include resident owners of manufactured housing communities who perform
management duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Upon receiving complaints alleging
violations of chapter 59.20 RCW by either landlords or tenants, the
department may investigate the alleged violations and issue citations.
(2) If after an investigation the department finds a violation of
chapter 59.20 RCW, the department must deliver a citation to the person
who has committed the violation either by certified mail or in person.
The citation must specify the violation, the corrective action to be
taken, the time within which the corrective action must be taken, the
penalties that will result if corrective action is not taken within the
specified time period, and the process for contesting the citation
through a hearing.
(3) Citations for all violations other than those deemed imminently
life-threatening may be contested through an administrative hearing
under chapter 34.05 RCW. In order to obtain a hearing a person must,
within fifteen days of receiving a citation from the department,
request that the department conduct a hearing. If a hearing is not
requested within this time period, the citation constitutes a final
order of the department and is not subject to review by any court or
agency. If an administrative law judge decides that a person has
violated chapter 59.20 RCW, that person shall pay for the cost incurred
by the department in conducting the hearing.
(4) For violations that are imminently life-threatening, corrective
action must take place within twenty-four hours of the receipt of the
department's citation. For all other violations, corrective action
must take place within fifteen days of the receipt of the department's
citation.
(5) If a person fails to take corrective action within the required
time period and the department has not received a timely request for an
administrative hearing, the department may impose a fine for every day
that the violation remains uncorrected. The department shall establish
a schedule of fines by rule.
(6) Upon application by a person showing that a good faith effort
to comply with the corrective action requirements of the citation has
been made and that the corrective action has not been completed because
of factors beyond the person's control, the department may extend the
time period in which corrective action must be taken before fines are
imposed.
(7) This section does not limit the right of landlords or tenants
to take legal action against another party as provided in chapter 59.20
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A person cannot be a manager of a
manufactured housing community consisting of more than twenty-five lots
until a certificate of registration certifying him or her as a
manufactured housing community manager has been issued by the
department.
(2) A corporation, partnership, trust, association, sole
proprietor, or other like organization may own or operate a
manufactured housing community or engage in the business of
manufactured housing community management without being certified if it
employs, retains, or contracts with certified natural persons who are
registered manufactured housing community managers subject to this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) To apply for registration an applicant
must file with the department an application for registration on a form
prescribed by the department. The department may adopt rules to
prescribe the contents of the application. The application must
include, but is not limited to:
(a) The name and address of the manufactured housing community
owner;
(b) The name and address of the manufactured housing community
manager; and
(c) The number of lots within the manufactured housing community
that are subject to chapter 59.20 RCW.
(2) Certificates of registration are effective on the date issued
by the department and must be renewed annually.
(3) The department may adopt fees to cover the administrative costs
of park manager registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) By July 1, 2004, the department must:
(a) Compile the most accurate list possible of all the manufactured
housing communities in the state, the number of lots subject to chapter
59.20 RCW located in each manufactured housing community, and the names
and addresses of the owners of these parks. The department is
encouraged to work with groups including, but not limited to: The
office of community development, mobile home owners' associations,
tenant advocacy groups, park owners' associations, and county assessors
to generate the list. The list must be updated annually;
(b) Send out notifications to all known manufactured housing
community owners that the first annual fees pursuant to section 9 of
this act are due. These notifications must include information about
late fees, liens, and passing costs on to tenants; and
(c) Collect the first annual fees due from all park owners, and
allow sixty days to pass during which late fees and lien notices are
sent to noncomplying mobile home park owners as provided in this
chapter.
(2) Fees pursuant to section 9 of this act must be collected by the
department on an annual basis thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 By January 1, 2005, the department must have
properly trained employees in place to administer this chapter. The
department is encouraged to work with persons who have knowledge of
manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant disputes to properly train its
employees to implement this chapter. These knowledgeable persons may
be employees of the office of community development or employees of
other states' manufactured housing divisions, when those states have a
similar model of manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant dispute
resolution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The manufactured/mobile home investigations
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
from the imposition of fines for violations of chapter 59.20 RCW and
the fees collected under sections 3 and 9 of this act must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
the administrative costs associated with administering this chapter.
Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Each owner of a mobile home park shall
pay to the department an annual registration fee to fund the
administrative costs of the investigation of violations of the
manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act as provided in this
chapter. The fee must be determined annually by the department, and
may not exceed ten dollars for each lot within a park that is subject
to chapter 59.20 RCW. Park owners may pass on the cost of this fee to
tenants. The first annual fees must be collected at a date determined
by the department, but no later than July 1, 2004, as provided in
section 6 of this act.
(2) If an owner fails to pay the fee within thirty days after
receiving written notice of the amount due, a penalty of fifty percent
of the amount of the fee is added to the amount due. The owner is not
entitled to any reimbursement of this penalty from his or her tenants.
(3) If an owner fails to pay the required fees within sixty days
after receiving written notice of the amount due:
(a) The amount due under this section becomes a lien in favor of
the state upon the owner's property. The lien is superior to all other
liens and encumbrances except general taxes and local and special
assessments, and bears interest computed monthly and compounded
annually at a rate of eight percent; or
(b) Tenants may voluntarily submit their lot fees to the
department.
(4) All fees collected by the department under subsection (1) of
this section must be deposited into the manufactured/mobile home
investigations account.

Sec. 10 RCW 59.22.050 and 1991 c 327 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to provide general assistance to mobile home resident
organizations, park owners, and landlords and tenants, the department
shall establish an office of mobile home affairs which will serve as
the coordinating office within state government for matters relating to
mobile homes or manufactured housing.
This office will ((provide an ombudsman service to mobile home park
owners and mobile home tenants with respect to problems and disputes
between park owners and park residents and to)) provide technical
assistance to resident organizations or persons in the process of
forming a resident organization pursuant to chapter 59.22 RCW. The
office will keep records of its activities in this area.
(2) The office shall perform all the consumer complaint and related
functions of the state administrative agency that are required for
purposes of complying with the regulations established by the federal
department of housing and urban development for manufactured housing,
including the preparation and submission of the state administrative
plan.
(3) The office shall administer the mobile home relocation
assistance program established in chapter 59.21 RCW, including
verifying the eligibility of tenants for relocation assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The office of community development is
directed to work with the department of licensing in order to
facilitate an orderly transition from the mobile home park ombudsman
program to the registration and enforcement system created by this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1, 2, 5 through 9, and 11 of this
act take effect August 1, 2003. Sections 3, 4, and 10 of this act take
effect January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 9 and 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

--- END ---