BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.13A.020 and 1999 c 153 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) Whenever all or part of the territory of a district is
included within the corporate boundaries of a city, the city
legislative body may adopt a resolution or ordinance to assume
jurisdiction over all or part of the district. Upon adoption of a
resolution or ordinance to assume jurisdiction of all or part of the
district, the city shall petition the district to initiate the
conveyance process contained in RCW 57.08.020.
(((2) Upon the assumption, all real and personal property,
franchises, rights, assets, taxes levied but not collected for the
district for other than indebtedness, water, sewer, and drainage
facilities, and all other facilities and equipment of the district
shall become the property of the city subject to all financial,
statutory, or contractual obligations of the district for the security
or performance of which the property may have been pledged. The city,
in addition to its other powers, shall have the power to manage,
control, maintain, and operate the property, facilities and equipment
and to fix and collect service and other charges from owners and
occupants of properties so served by the city, subject, however, to any
outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, of the district payable
from taxes, assessments, or revenues of any kind or nature and to any
other contractual obligations of the district.
(3) The city may by resolution or ordinance of its legislative
body, assume the obligation of paying such district indebtedness and of
levying and of collecting or causing to be collected the district
taxes, assessments, and utility rates and charges of any kind or nature
to pay and secure the payment of the indebtedness, according to all of
the terms, conditions and covenants incident to the indebtedness, and
shall assume and perform all other outstanding contractual obligation
of the district in accordance with all of their terms, conditions, and
covenants. An assumption shall not be deemed to impair the obligation
of any indebtedness or other contractual obligation. During the period
until the outstanding indebtedness of the district has been discharged,
the territory of the district and the owners and occupants of property
therein, shall continue to be liable for its and their proportionate
share of the indebtedness, including any outstanding assessments levied
within any local improvement district or utility local improvement
district thereof. The city shall assume the obligation of causing the
payment of the district's indebtedness, collecting the district's
taxes, assessments, and charges, and observing and performing the other
district contractual obligations. The legislative body of the city
shall act as the officers of the district for the purpose of certifying
the amount of any property tax to be levied and collected therein, and
causing service and other charges and assessments to be collected from
the property or owners or occupants thereof, enforcing the collection
and performing all other acts necessary to ensure performance of the
district's contractual obligations in the same manner and by the same
means as if the territory of the district had not been included within
the boundaries of a city.
When a city assumes the obligation of paying the outstanding
indebtedness, and if property taxes or assessments have been levied and
service and other charges have accrued for this purpose but have not
been collected by the district prior to the assumption, the same when
collected shall belong and be paid to the city and be used by the city
so far as necessary for payment of the indebtedness of the district
existing and unpaid on the date the city assumes the indebtedness. Any
funds received by the city which have been collected for the purpose of
paying any bonded or other indebtedness of the district, shall be used
for the purpose for which they were collected and for no other purpose.
Any outstanding indebtedness shall be paid as provided in the terms,
conditions, and covenants of the indebtedness. All funds of the
district on deposit with the county treasurer at the time of title
transfer shall be used by the city solely for the benefit of the
assumed utility and shall not be transferred to or used for the benefit
of the city's general fund.))

Sec. 2 RCW 57.08.020 and 1933 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) That water-sewer districts duly organized under the laws of the
state of Washington shall have the following powers in addition to
those conferred by existing statutes. Whenever any water-sewer
district shall have installed a distributing system of mains and
laterals and as a source of supply of water shall be purchasing or
intending to purchase water from any city or town, and whenever it
shall appear to be advantageous to the water or sewer consumers in
((said)) the water-sewer district that such city or town shall take
over the water system of the water-sewer district and supply water to
the ((said)) water users, the commissioners of ((said)) the water-sewer
district, upon being authorized as provided in RCW 57.08.030, shall
have the right to convey such distributing system to any such city or
town: PROVIDED, Such city or town is willing to accept, maintain and
repair the same: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That all bonded and other
indebtedness of ((said)) the water-sewer district except local
improvement district bonds shall have been paid.
(2) If a city or town has passed an ordinance or resolution
indicating its desire to assume jurisdiction of all or part of a water-
sewer district, the water-sewer district board of commissioners shall
initiate the conveyance process contained in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 35.13A.030 (Assumption of control if sixty percent or more
of area or valuation within city) and 1999 c 153 s 29 & 1971 ex.s. c 95
s 3;
(2) RCW 35.13A.0301 (Assumption of water-sewer district before July
1, 1999 -- Limitations) and 1998 c 326 s 3;
(3) RCW 35.13A.040 (Assumption of control if less than sixty
percent of area or valuation within city) and 1999 c 153 s 30 & 1971
ex.s. c 95 s 4;
(4) RCW 35.13A.050 (Territory containing facilities within or
without city -- Duties of city or district -- Rates and charges -- Assumption
of responsibility -- Outstanding indebtedness -- Properties and rights) and
1971 ex.s. c 95 s 5;
(5) RCW 35.13A.060 (District in more than one city -- Assumption of
responsibilities -- Duties of cities) and 1999 c 153 s 31 & 1971 ex.s. c
95 s 6;
(6) RCW 35.13A.070 (Contracts) and 1997 c 426 s 2 & 1971 ex.s. c 95
s 7;
(7) RCW 35.13A.080 (Dissolution of water district or sewer
district) and 1997 c 426 s 3 & 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 8;
(8) RCW 35.13A.090 (Employment and rights of district employees)
and 1999 c 153 s 32 & 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 9;
(9) RCW 35.13A.100 (Assumption of substandard water system -- Limited
immunity from liability) and 1994 c 292 s 5; and
(10) RCW 35.13A.900 (Severability -- 1971 ex.s. c 95) and 1971 ex.s.
c 95 s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 57.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If the board of commissioners of a water-sewer district find
it more conducive to the public health, safety, welfare, or convenience
that water-sewer services be provided by a cooperative or mutual
association or corporation organized under Title 24 RCW or chapter
23.86 RCW, the board may adopt a resolution calling for
disincorporation of the district and the transfer to such association
or corporation of all the property constituting its system of sewerage,
system of water, or combined water and sewerage system, together with
any of its other real or personal property used or useful in connection
with the operation, maintenance, repair, or replacement of that system,
and the association or corporation may acquire such property on such
terms as may be mutually agreed upon by the association or corporation
and the board of commissioners. Such resolution shall contain the
written agreement setting forth the terms and conditions of the
transfer and shall be filed with the county.
(b) In consideration of a transfer of property by a district to an
association or corporation in a manner provided in this section, the
association or corporation must assume and agree to pay or provide for
the payment of all of the indebtedness of a district including the
payment and retirement of outstanding general obligation and revenue
bonds issued by a district. The association or corporation may cause
service and other charges to be collected from such property or owners
or occupants thereof and enforce such collection.
The association or corporation and the district must execute a
written agreement setting forth the terms and conditions upon which
they have agreed and finding the transfer and acquisition of property
pursuant to such agreement to be in the public interest and conducive
to the public health, safety, welfare, or convenience. Such written
agreement may include provisions, by way of description and not by way
of limitation, for the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of such
association or corporation and district with regard to the use and
ownership of property, the providing of services, the maintenance and
operation of facilities, the disposition of liabilities and
indebtedness, the performance of contractual obligations, and any other
matters relating to the proposed transfer of property. The agreement
may provide for a period of time during which the district may continue
to exercise certain rights, privileges, powers, and functions
authorized to it by law. Such agreement must be presented to the
registered voters of the district as part of the resolution to transfer
and disincorporate the district. Upon passage of the resolution, the
president of the board of commissioners of the district and the person
or persons vested with the management of the affairs of the association
shall sign and formalize the agreement.
(2)(a) Upon the filing with the county in which the district is
located of the resolution calling for the disincorporation of the
district and transfer of functions to an association or corporation,
the county legislative authority shall hold a public hearing to
determine whether or not the best interests of all persons concerned
will be served by the proposed disincorporation of the district and
transfer of functions to an association or corporation.
(b) If the county legislative authority finds that the best
interests of all persons concerned will be served by disincorporating
the district and transferring functions to an association or
corporation, it shall order an election under subsection (4) of this
section, specify the manner in which it is to be accomplished, and
supervise the liquidation of any assets and the satisfaction of any
outstanding indebtedness.
(3) After all transfers to the association or corporation have been
made as required by the written agreement, and the district has been
disincorporated, any remaining property shall be sold or liquidated and
the proceeds of the sale, together with money on hand in the treasury
of the district, shall, after payment of all costs and expenses and all
outstanding indebtedness, be placed to the credit of the school
district, or districts, in which such district is situated.
(4) Upon entry of the findings of the hearing by the county that
the proposed disincorporation and transfer of assets will be conducive
to the public health, welfare, and convenience and will benefit the
land therein, the county legislative authority shall present a
resolution to the county auditor calling for a special election to be
held at a date specified under RCW 29.13.020, that occurs forty-five or
more days after the resolution is presented, at which a ballot
proposition authorizing the transfer of assets and disincorporation of
the district shall be submitted to voters for their approval or
rejection. The commissioners shall cause to be published a notice of
the election for four successive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in the district, which notice shall state the hours during
which the polls will be open and the object of the election, and the
notice shall also be posted ten days in ten public places in the
district. The transfer of assets shall be executed as provided in the
written agreement and the district shall be disincorporated if the
ballot proposition is approved by a majority of the voters voting on
the proposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---