BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.431 and 1986 c 261 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 82.04.4297, the term "health or social
welfare organization" means an organization, including any community
action council, which renders health or social welfare services as
defined in subsection (2) of this section, which is a not-for-profit
corporation under chapter 24.03 RCW and which is managed by a governing
board of not less than ((eight)) seven individuals none of whom is a
paid employee of the organization or which is a corporation sole under
chapter 24.12 RCW. Health or social welfare organization does not
include a corporation providing professional services as authorized in
chapter 18.100 RCW. In addition a corporation in order to be exempt
under RCW 82.04.4297 shall satisfy the following conditions:
(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its
members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the
form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its
purposes and bylaws;
(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must
be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the
salary or compensation of like positions within the public service of
the state;
(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the
activities for which the exemption is granted and, on the liquidation,
dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly
or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation which also would be
entitled to the exemption;
(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified where
licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;
(e) The amounts received qualifying for exemption must be used for
the activities for which the exemption is granted;
(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national
origin, or ancestry; and
(g) The director of revenue shall have access to its books in order
to determine whether the corporation is exempt from taxes within the
intent of RCW 82.04.4297 and this section.
(2) The term "health or social welfare services" includes and is
limited to:
(a) Mental health, drug, or alcoholism counseling or treatment;
(b) Family counseling;
(c) Health care services;
(d) Therapeutic, diagnostic, rehabilitative, or restorative
services for the care of the sick, aged, or physically,
developmentally, or emotionally-disabled individuals;
(e) Activities which are for the purpose of preventing or
ameliorating juvenile delinquency or child abuse, including
recreational activities for those purposes;
(f) Care of orphans or foster children;
(g) Day care of children;
(h) Employment development, training, and placement;
(i) Legal services to the indigent;
(j) Weatherization assistance or minor home repair for low-income
homeowners or renters;
(k) Assistance to low-income homeowners and renters to offset the
cost of home heating energy, through direct benefits to eligible
households or to fuel vendors on behalf of eligible households; and
(l) Community services to low-income individuals, families, and
groups, which are designed to have a measurable and potentially major
impact on causes of poverty in communities of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies retroactively to July 1,
1996.

--- END ---