BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.90 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to accept gifts of aquatic land
within the state, including tidelands, shorelands, harbor areas, and
the beds of navigable waters, which shall become part of the state-owned aquatic land base. Consistent with RCW 79.90.455, the department
must develop procedures and criteria that state the manner in which
gifts of aquatic land, received after the effective date of this
section, may occur. No gift of aquatic land may be accepted until:
(a) An appraisal of the value of the land has been prepared; (b) an
environmental site assessment has been conducted; and (c) the title
property report has been examined and approved by the attorney general
of the state. The results of the appraisal, the site assessment, and
the examination of the title property report must be submitted to the
board of natural resources before the department may accept a gift of
aquatic land.
(2) The authorization to accept gifts of aquatic land within the
state extends to aquatic land accepted as gifts prior to the effective
date of this section.

--- END ---