BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that this act is
necessary for the economic health and well-being of Washington citizens
and rural communities that depend upon the thousands of jobs created by
agricultural and livestock operations. In accordance with the
longstanding interpretation of the intent of the original act in 1945,
the legislature deems it necessary to clarify and reaffirm that the
ability and right to use water as provided for in RCW 90.44.050(2)
remains exempt from the requirements of obtaining a permit under the
ground water code.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.44.050 and 1987 c 109 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public ground waters of
the state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as ((herein)) provided((: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That)) in this section.
(2) However, any small withdrawal of public ground waters is exempt
from the provisions of this section. Small withdrawal means: (a) Any
amount of water for stock-watering purposes((, or)); (b) any amount of
water for the watering of a lawn or of a noncommercial garden not
exceeding one-half acre in area((, or for)); (c) single or group
domestic uses in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a
day((,)); or ((for)) (d) an industrial purpose in an amount not
exceeding five thousand gallons a day((, is and shall be exempt from
the provisions of this section, but,)). To the extent that ((it)) a
small withdrawal is regularly used beneficially, the withdrawal shall
be entitled to a right equal to that established by a permit issued
under the provisions of this chapter((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)).
For the purposes of this section, "stock" means livestock as defined in
RCW 16.36.005.
(3) The department from time to time may require the person or
agency making any such small withdrawal to furnish information as to
the means for and the quantity of that withdrawal((: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That)).
(4) At the option of the party making withdrawals of ground waters
of the state ((not exceeding five thousand gallons per day)) in
accordance with subsection (2) of this section, applications under this
section or declarations under RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and permits
and certificates obtained in the same manner and under the same
requirements as ((is in this chapter provided in the case of))
withdrawals in ((excess of five thousand gallons a day)) accordance
with subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---