BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.58.320 and 1993 c 240 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A metropolitan municipal corporation shall have power to
acquire by purchase and condemnation all lands and property rights,
both within and without ((the metropolitan area, which are necessary
for its purposes)) its component county boundaries which are necessary
for its purposes, subject to the provisions under subsection (2) of
this section. Such right of eminent domain shall be exercised by the
metropolitan council in the same manner and by the same procedure as is
or may be provided by law for cities, except insofar as such laws may
be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) A metropolitan municipal corporation shall not condemn lands
for an essential public facility, provided for in RCW 36.70A.200, at a
location outside its component county boundaries without first
completing the city or county siting process for an essential public
facility where the proposed facility is to be located, consistent with
RCW 36.70A.200.

--- END ---