BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Effective, natural science, wildlife,
and environmental education programs provide the foundation for the
development of literate children and adults, setting the stage for
lifelong learning. Furthermore, integrating the basic subject areas of
the common school curriculum in chapter 28A.230 RCW through natural
science, wildlife, and environmental education offers many
opportunities for achieving excellence in our schools. Well-designed
programs, aligned with the state's essential academic learning
requirements, contribute to the state's educational reform goals.
(2) Washington is fortunate to have institutions and programs that
currently provide quality natural science, wildlife, and environmental
education and teacher training that is already aligned with the state's
essential academic learning requirements.
(3) The legislature intends to further the development of natural
science, wildlife, and environmental education by establishing a
competitive grant program, funded through state moneys to the extent
those moneys are appropriated, or made available through other sources,
for proven natural science, wildlife, and environmental education
programs that are fully aligned with the state's essential academic
learning requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The Washington natural science, wildlife, and environmental
education partnership account is hereby created in the custody of the
state treasurer to provide natural science, wildlife, and environmental
education opportunities for teachers and students to help achieve the
highest quality of excellence in education through compliance with the
essential academic learning requirements. Revenues to the account
shall consist of appropriations made by the legislature or other
sources. Grants and their administration shall be paid from the
account. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The natural science, wildlife, and environmental education
grant program is hereby created, subject to the availability of funds
in the natural science, wildlife, and environmental education
partnership account. The program is created to promote proven and
innovative natural science, wildlife, and environmental education
programs that are fully aligned with the state's essential academic
learning requirements and includes but is not limited to instruction
about renewable resources, responsible use of resources, and
conservation.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish and
publish funding criteria for environmental, natural science, wildlife,
forestry, and agricultural education grants. The office of
superintendent of public instruction shall involve a cross-section of
stakeholder groups to develop socially, economically, and
environmentally balanced funding criteria. These criteria shall be
based on compliance with the essential academic learning requirements
and use methods that encourage critical thinking. The criteria must
also include environmental, natural science, wildlife, forestry, and
agricultural education programs with one or more of the following
features:
(a) Interdisciplinary approaches to environmental, natural science,
wildlife, forestry, and agricultural issues;
(b) Programs that target underserved, disadvantaged, and
multicultural populations;
(c) Programs that reach out to schools across the state that would
otherwise not have access to specialized environmental, natural
science, wildlife, forestry, and agricultural education programs;
(d) Proven programs offered by innovative community partnerships
designed to improve student learning and strengthen local communities.
(3) Eligible uses of grants include, but are not limited to:
(a) Continuing in-service and preservice training for educators
with materials specifically developed to enable educators to teach
essential academic learning requirements in a compelling and effective
manner;
(b) Proven, innovative programs that align the basic subject areas
of the common school curriculum in chapter 28A.230 RCW with the
essential academic learning requirements; the basic subject areas
should be integrated by using environmental education, natural science,
wildlife, forestry, agricultural, and natural environment curricula to
meet the needs of various learning styles; and
(c) Support and equipment needed for the implementation of the
programs in this section.
(4) Grants may only be disbursed to nonprofit organizations exempt
from income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue
code that can provide matching funds or in-kind services.
(5) Grants may not be used for any partisan or political
activities.

--- END ---