BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) Except under subsection (2) of this
section, the number of employees employed by cabinet-level agencies of
the executive branch of state government may not exceed the actual
employment level of the agency on March 1, 2003, for all employee
positions paid for in full or in part with funds from the state general
fund. This section does not apply to executive branch agencies managed
by statewide elected officials.
(b) "Cabinet-level agency" as used in this section, refers to those
agencies listed on the Washington state government organization chart
posted on the internet by the office of financial management, where
these agencies are listed under the category headings: Environment and
natural resources, general government, transportation, health and human
services, education, and community and economic development.
(c) Except under subsection (2) of this section, beginning March 1,
2003, each cabinet-level agency is prohibited from hiring replacements
for employees who leave the agency regardless of the reason an employee
left. This prohibition attaches to all employee positions paid for in
full or in part with funds from the state general fund.
(d) This section does not apply to internal reallocations of staff,
contracting of services, or contracting work out. Agencies may fill
newly vacated positions with existing staff.
(2) The only exceptions to subsection (1) of this section are as
follows:
(a) Positions in state agencies with less than twenty full-time
equivalents;
(b) Service positions within correctional facilities and state
hospitals that are necessary to maintain full security or service
levels;
(c) The following agencies or portions of agencies: (i) Department
of revenue, (ii) state school for the blind, (iii) state school for the
deaf, (iv) military department, (v) faculty at the state's institutions
of higher education (program 010 in LEAP), and (vi) nonprogram support
positions (program 110 and category 9000 in LEAP) in the department of
social and health services that provide direct service operations in
the divisions of children's administration, juvenile rehabilitation,
developmental disabilities, long-term care, alcohol and substance
abuse, medical assistance, and vocational rehabilitation; and
(d) Temporary employee positions including, but not limited to,
seasonal fish and wildlife biologist and technician positions in the
department of fish and wildlife and seasonal employee positions in the
state parks and recreation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires June 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
March 1, 2003.

--- END ---