BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.031 and 2002 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall not issue a driver's license to a person:
(1) Who is under the age of sixteen years;
(2) Whose driving privilege has been withheld unless and until the
department may authorize the driving privilege under RCW 46.20.311;
(3) Who has been classified as an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol
abuser, or drug abuser by a program approved by the department of
social and health services. The department may, however, issue a
license if the person:
(a) Has been granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05
RCW; or
(b) Is satisfactorily participating in or has successfully
completed an alcohol or drug abuse treatment program approved by the
department of social and health services and has established control of
his or her alcohol or drug abuse problem;
(4) Who has previously been adjudged to be mentally ill or insane,
or to be incompetent due to a mental disability or disease. The
department shall, however, issue a license to the person if he or she
otherwise qualifies and:
(a) Has been restored to competency by the methods provided by law;
or
(b) The superior court finds the person able to operate a motor
vehicle with safety upon the highways during such incompetency;
(5) Who has not passed the driver's licensing examination required
by RCW 46.20.120 and 46.20.305, if applicable;
(6) Who is required under the laws of this state to deposit proof
of financial responsibility and who has not deposited such proof;
(7) Who is unable to safely operate a motor vehicle upon the
highways due to a physical or mental disability. The department's
conclusion that a person is barred from licensing under this subsection
must be reasonable and be based upon good and substantial evidence.
This determination is subject to review by a court of competent
jurisdiction; or
(8) Who has not proven that he or she is lawfully within the United
States.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.055 and 2002 c 352 s 10 and 2002 c 195 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee of fifteen dollars, and meets the following
requirements:
(a) Proves that he or she is lawfully within the United States; and
(b) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(((b))) (c) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction or
offered by a ((driving [driver])) driver training school licensed and
inspected by the department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW, that
includes practice driving.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280(1).
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit; and
(b) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue or until the date the
applicant's authorization to be within the United States expires,
whichever occurs sooner.
(a) The department may issue one additional ((one-year)) permit,
valid for a like period.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.070 and 2002 c 352 s 11 and 2002 c 195 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Agricultural driving permit authorized. The director may issue
a juvenile agricultural driving permit to a person under the age of
eighteen years if:
(a) The application is signed by the applicant and the applicant's
father, mother, or legal guardian;
(b) The applicant has passed the driving examination required by
RCW 46.20.120;
(c) The department has investigated the applicant's need for the
permit and determined that the need justifies issuance;
(d) The department has determined the applicant is capable of
operating a motor vehicle without endangering himself or herself or
other persons and property; ((and))
(e) The applicant proves that he or she is lawfully within the
United States; and
(f) The applicant has paid a fee of fifteen dollars.
The permit must contain a photograph of the person.
(2) Effect of agricultural driving permit. (a) The permit
authorizes the holder to:
(i) Drive a motor vehicle on the public highways of this state in
connection with farm work. The holder may drive only within a
restricted farming locality described on the permit; and
(ii) Participate in the classroom portion of a traffic safety
education course authorized under RCW 28A.220.030 or the classroom
portion of a traffic safety education course offered by a driver
training school licensed and inspected by the department of licensing
under chapter 46.82 RCW offered in the community where the holder
resides.
(b) The director may transfer the permit from one farming locality
to another. A transfer is not a renewal of the permit.
(3) Term and renewal of agricultural driving permit. An
agricultural driving permit expires one year from the date of issue or
until the date the applicant's authorization to be within the United
States expires, whichever occurs sooner.
(a) A person under the age of eighteen who holds a permit may renew
the permit by paying a fee of fifteen dollars.
(b) An agricultural driving permit is invalidated when a permittee
attains age eighteen. In order to drive a motor vehicle on a highway
he or she must obtain a motor vehicle driver's license under this
chapter.
(4) Suspension, revocation, or cancellation. The director has sole
discretion to suspend, revoke, or cancel a juvenile agricultural
driving permit if:
(a) The permittee has been found to have committed an offense that
requires mandatory suspension or revocation of a driver's license;
((or))
(b) The department has determined that the holder's authorization
to be within the United States has expired or has been withdrawn; or
(c) The director is satisfied that the permittee has violated the
permit's restrictions.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.117 and 2002 c 352 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing
a picture, if the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035;
((and))
(c) Proves that he or she is lawfully within the United States; and
(d) Pays the required fee. The fee is fifteen dollars unless an
applicant is a recipient of continuing public assistance grants under
Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary of social and
health services. For those persons the fee must be the actual cost of
production of the identicard.
(2) Design and term. The identicard must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the
official driver's license; and
(b) Expire on the fifth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate
after issuance or on the date the applicant's authorization to be
within the United States expires, whichever occurs sooner.
(3) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if:
(a) The holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to
use the card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921; or
(b) The department has determined that the holder's authorization
to be within the United States has expired or has been withdrawn.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.181 and 1999 c 308 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, every
driver's license expires on the fifth anniversary of the licensee's
birthdate following the issuance of the license or on the date the
licensee's authorization to be within the United States expires,
whichever occurs sooner.
(2) A person may renew his or her license on or before the
expiration date by submitting an application as prescribed by the
department and paying a fee of twenty-five dollars. This fee includes
the fee for the required photograph.
(3) A person renewing his or her driver's license more than sixty
days after the license has expired shall pay a penalty fee of ten
dollars in addition to the renewal fee, unless his or her license
expired when:
(a) The person was outside the state and he or she renews the
license within sixty days after returning to this state; or
(b) The person was incapacitated and he or she renews the license
within sixty days after the termination of the incapacity.
(4) During the period from July 1, 2000, to July 1, 2006, the
department may issue or renew a driver's license for a period other
than five years, or may extend by mail a license that has already been
issued, in order to evenly distribute, as nearly as possible, the
yearly renewal rate of licensed drivers. The fee for a driver's
license issued or renewed for a period other than five years, or that
has been extended by mail, is five dollars for each year that the
license is issued, renewed, or extended. The department may adopt any
rules as are necessary to carry out this subsection.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.207 and 1993 c 501 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to cancel any driver's license or
permit upon determining that the licensee or permit holder was not
entitled to the issuance of the license or permit, or that the licensee
or permit holder failed to give the required or correct information in
his or her application, or that the licensee or permit holder is
incompetent to drive a motor vehicle for any of the reasons under RCW
46.20.031 (4) and (7), or that the licensee's or permit holder's
authorization to be within the United States has expired or has been
withdrawn.
(2) Upon such cancellation, the licensee or permit holder must
surrender the license or permit so canceled to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may adjust the term of a license, permit, or
identicard that has been issued to expire on the expiration date of an
applicant's authorization to be within the United States upon receiving
satisfactory proof that the applicant's presence in the United States
has been reauthorized or extended. The expiration date of a license,
permit, or identicard may be adjusted under this section up to the date
the applicant's authorization to be within the United States has been
extended, or up to the full term for which the license, permit, or
identicard could originally have been issued, whichever occurs sooner.
There is no additional fee for a license, permit, or identicard
adjusted under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may adopt rules to establish procedures for: (1)
Verifying that a driver's license, permit, or identicard applicant's
presence in the United States is authorized under federal law,
including appropriate documentation of that status; (2) issuance of
temporary licenses or permits pending verification of status; and (3)
appeals hearings from denials and cancellation of licenses, permits, or
identicards based on the requirement that a licensee, permit holder, or
identicard holder be lawfully within the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---