BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.030 and 2001 c 187 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
All property shall be valued at one hundred percent of its true and
fair value in money and assessed on the same basis unless specifically
provided otherwise by law.
Taxable leasehold estates shall be valued at such price as they
would bring at a fair, voluntary sale for cash without any deductions
for any indebtedness owed including rentals to be paid.
The true and fair value of real property for taxation purposes
(including property upon which there is a coal or other mine, or stone
or other quarry) shall be based upon the following criteria:
(1) Any sales of the property being appraised or similar properties
with respect to sales made within the past five years. The appraisal
shall be consistent with the comprehensive land use plan, development
regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW, zoning, and any other
governmental policies or practices in effect at the time of appraisal
that affect the use of property, as well as physical and environmental
influences. An assessment may not be determined by a method that
assumes a land usage not permitted, for that property being appraised,
under existing zoning or land use planning ordinances or statutes. The
appraisal shall also take into account: (a) The amounts expended on
mitigation fees, impact fees, or system improvement charges since the
last appraisal, for purposes of reducing the value by those amounts;
(b) in the use of sales by real estate contract as similar sales, the
extent, if any, to which the stated selling price has been increased by
reason of the down payment, interest rate, or other financing terms;
and (((b))) (c) the extent to which the sale of a similar property
actually represents the general effective market demand for property of
such type, in the geographical area in which such property is located.
Sales involving deed releases or similar seller-developer financing
arrangements shall not be used as sales of similar property.
(2) In addition to sales as defined in subsection (1) of this
section, consideration may be given to cost, cost less depreciation,
reconstruction cost less depreciation, or capitalization of income that
would be derived from prudent use of the property. In the case of
property of a complex nature, or being used under terms of a franchise
from a public agency, or operating as a public utility, or property not
having a record of sale within five years and not having a significant
number of sales of similar property in the general area, the provisions
of this subsection shall be the dominant factors in valuation. When
provisions of this subsection are relied upon for establishing values
the property owner shall be advised upon request of the factors used in
arriving at such value.
(3) In valuing any tract or parcel of real property, the true and
fair value of the land, exclusive of structures thereon shall be
determined; also the true and fair value of structures thereon, but the
valuation shall not exceed the true and fair value of the total
property as it exists. In valuing agricultural land, growing crops
shall be excluded.

--- END ---