BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A person licensed to carry a handgun in a state the laws of
which recognize and give effect in that state to a concealed pistol
license issued under the laws of the state of Washington is authorized
to carry a pistol in this state if:
(i) The licensing state does not issue concealed pistol licenses to
persons under twenty-one years of age; and
(ii) The licensing state requires mandatory background checks for
all persons who apply for a concealed pistol license.
(b) This section applies to a license holder from another state
only while the license holder is not a resident of this state. A
license holder from another state must carry the handgun in compliance
with the laws of this state.
(2) The attorney general shall periodically publish a list of
states the laws of which recognize and give effect in that state to a
concealed pistol license issued under the laws of the state of
Washington.

--- END ---