BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature no longer finds it necessary
to regulate water recreation facilities in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 70.90.101 (Legislative findings) and 1987 c 222 s 1;
(2) RCW 70.90.110 (Definitions) and 1991 c 3 s 352, 1987 c 222 s 2,
& 1986 c 236 s 2;
(3) RCW 70.90.120 (Adoption of rules governing safety, sanitation,
and water quality -- Exceptions) and 1987 c 222 s 5 & 1986 c 236 s 3;
(4) RCW 70.90.125 (Regulation by local boards of health) and 1987
c 222 s 6;
(5) RCW 70.90.140 (Enforcement) and 1986 c 236 s 5;
(6) RCW 70.90.150 (Fees) and 1986 c 236 s 6;
(7) RCW 70.90.160 (Modification or construction of facility -- Permit
required -- Submission of plans) and 1987 c 222 s 7 & 1986 c 236 s 7;
(8) RCW 70.90.170 (Operating permit -- Renewal) and 1987 c 222 s 8 &
1986 c 236 s 8;
(9) RCW 70.90.180 (State and local health jurisdictions -- Chapter
not basis for liability) and 1987 c 222 s 9 & 1986 c 236 s 9;
(10) RCW 70.90.190 (Reporting of injury, disease, or death) and
1987 c 222 s 10 & 1986 c 236 s 10;
(11) RCW 70.90.200 (Civil penalties) and 1986 c 236 s 11;
(12) RCW 70.90.205 (Criminal penalties) and 1987 c 222 s 11;
(13) RCW 70.90.210 (Adjudicative proceeding -- Notice) and 1991 c 3
s 354, 1989 c 175 s 130, & 1986 c 236 s 12;
(14) RCW 70.90.230 (Insurance required) and 1986 c 236 s 14;
(15) RCW 70.90.240 (Sale of spas, pools, and tubs -- Operating
instructions and health caution required) and 1987 c 222 s 4;
(16) RCW 70.90.250 (Application of chapter) and 1987 c 222 s 3;
(17) RCW 70.90.910 (Severability -- 1986 c 236) and 1986 c 236 s 17;
and
(18) RCW 70.90.911 (Severability -- 1987 c 222) and 1987 c 222 s 13.

--- END ---