BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by a water
quantity decision may appeal the decision to the pollution control
hearings board under RCW 43.21B.310, or to the superior court where the
land is located upon which the water is or would be used. Any appeal
to the superior court shall be de novo.
(2) A person who appeals a decision to the pollution control
hearings board under subsection (1) of this section may appeal the
board's decision directly to the court of appeals.
(3) For purposes of this section, a "water quantity decision"
includes the following:
(a) A decision to grant or deny a permit or certificate for a right
to the beneficial use of water or to amend, change, or transfer such a
right; and
(b) A decision to enforce the conditions of a permit for, or right
to, the beneficial use of water or to require any person to discontinue
the use of water.

--- END ---