BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
critical need to provide for two regional elective officers, an eastern
Washington water commissioner and a western Washington water
commissioner, to administer Washington's water resource laws.
The legislature further finds that there is a growing necessity to
provide for the increasing needs of the state and its citizens for
water for industrial, agricultural, residential, social, economic,
recreational, environmental, and other needs and to plan, coordinate,
restore, and regulate the use of our water resources.
The offices of eastern Washington water commissioner and western
Washington water commissioner created by this chapter must initially be
funded entirely from appropriations made to the department of ecology
for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties that are transferred
to the commissioners pursuant to section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commissioners" means the eastern Washington water commissioner
and the western Washington water commissioner, or, when used in the
singular, either the eastern Washington water commissioner or the
western Washington water commissioner.
(2) "Public interest" means all uses of the water resources of the
state and its impact on the state of Washington and its citizens,
including use of water for domestic, industrial, commercial,
agricultural, irrigation, hydroelectric power production, mining,
thermal power production, recreation, and preservation of environmental
values and all other uses compatible with enjoyment of the public
waters of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 There are created two offices of state
government to be known as the eastern Washington water commissioner and
the western Washington water commissioner. Each commissioner has the
following powers, duties, and functions concerning water resources
within the region that the commissioner serves:
(1) Supervising public waters and their appropriation, diversion,
and use, and the various officers and employees of the state connected
therewith;
(2) Supervising the construction and inspection of all water works
to reasonably secure safety to life and property;
(3) Determining the discharge of streams and springs and other
sources of water supply, and the capacities of lakes and of reservoirs
whose waters are being or may be utilized for beneficial purposes;
(4) Providing assistance to applicants for a water right in
obtaining or developing an adequate and appropriate supply of water
consistent with the land use permitted for the area in which the water
is to be used and the population forecast for the area under RCW
43.62.035;
(5) Maintaining records necessary for the recording of financial
transactions and related statistical data;
(6) Making written reports of their work to the governor and the
legislature with recommendations for legislation the commissioners deem
advisable;
(7) Exercising all the powers and duties prescribed by law with
respect to flood control;
(8) Adopting rules for the administration of Washington water
resource laws;
(9) Supervising Washington water resource laws to ensure that the
administration of the laws and the use and conservation of water
resources benefits the public interest; and
(10) Performing other duties as may be prescribed by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Each commissioner created in section 3
of this act must be a registered voter and resident of the region that
the commissioner serves. Each commissioner must be elected at the time
and in the manner that other state officers are elected.
(2) The eastern Washington water commissioner must be elected from
and serve that region of the state encompassing Adams, Asotin, Benton,
Chelan, Columbia, Douglas, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grant, Kittitas,
Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, Walla
Walla, Whitman, and Yakima Counties.
(3) The western Washington water commissioner must be elected from
and serve that region of the state encompassing Clallam, Clark,
Cowlitz, Grays Harbor, Island, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Lewis, Mason,
Pacific, Pierce, San Juan, Skagit, Skamania, Snohomish, Thurston,
Wahkiakum, and Whatcom Counties.
(4) Each commissioner shall serve four-year terms commencing on the
Wednesday after the second Monday of January following their election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
department of ecology pertaining to those powers and duties set out in
section 3 of this act are transferred to the eastern Washington water
commissioner and western Washington water commissioner. All references
to the director or the department of ecology in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the commissioners when referring
to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
ecology pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the commissioners. All cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department of ecology in carrying out the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to
the commissioners. All funds, credits, or other assets held in
connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
assigned to the commissioners.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of ecology for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
commissioners.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of ecology engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the commissioners. All employees
classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are
assigned to the commissioners to perform their usual duties upon the
same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any
action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws
and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
ecology pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the commissioners. All existing
contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the commissioners.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of ecology shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

Sec. 6 RCW 29.15.030 and 2002 c 140 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Declarations of candidacy shall be filed with the following filing
officers:
(1) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for
statewide offices, United States senate, and United States house of
representatives;
(2) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for
eastern Washington water commissioner, western Washington water
commissioner, the state legislature, the court of appeals, and the
superior court when voters from a district comprising more than one
county vote upon the candidates;
(3) The county auditor for all other offices. For any nonpartisan
office, other than eastern Washington water commissioner, western
Washington water commissioner, judicial offices, and school director in
joint districts, where voters from a district comprising more than one
county vote upon the candidates, a declaration of candidacy shall be
filed with the county auditor of the county in which a majority of the
registered voters of the district reside. For school directors in
joint school districts, the declaration of candidacy shall be filed
with the county auditor of the county designated by the state board of
education as the county to which the joint school district is
considered as belonging under RCW 28A.323.040.
Each official with whom declarations of candidacy are filed under
this section, within one business day following the closing of the
applicable filing period, shall transmit to the public disclosure
commission the information required in RCW 29.15.010 (1) through (4)
for each declaration of candidacy filed in his or her office during
such filing period or a list containing the name of each candidate who
files such a declaration in his or her office during such filing period
together with a precise identification of the position sought by each
such candidate and the date on which each such declaration was filed.
Such official, within three days following his or her receipt of any
letter withdrawing a person's name as a candidate, shall also forward
a copy of such withdrawal letter to the public disclosure commission.

Sec. 7 RCW 29.21.070 and 1990 c 59 s 91 are each amended to read
as follows:
The offices of superintendent of public instruction, eastern
Washington water commissioner, western Washington water commissioner,
justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of
the superior court, and judge of the district court shall be
nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and elected
as such.
All city, town, and special purpose district elective offices shall
be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such.

Sec. 8 RCW 29.30.020 and 2001 c 30 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The positions or offices on a primary ballot shall be arranged
in substantially the following order: United States senator; United
States representative; governor; lieutenant governor; secretary of
state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general; commissioner
of public lands; superintendent of public instruction; insurance
commissioner; eastern Washington water commissioner, western
Washington water commissioner; state senator; state representative;
county officers; justices of the supreme court; judges of the court of
appeals; judges of the superior court; and judges of the district
court. For all other jurisdictions on the primary ballot, the offices
in each jurisdiction shall be grouped together and be in the order of
the position numbers assigned to those offices, if any.
(2) The order of the positions or offices on an election ballot
shall be substantially the same as on a primary ballot except that the
offices of president and vice president of the United States shall
precede all other offices on a presidential election ballot. State
ballot issues shall be placed before all offices on an election ballot.
The positions on a ballot to be assigned to ballot measures regarding
local units of government shall be established by the secretary of
state by rule.
(3) The political party or independent candidacy of each candidate
for partisan office shall be indicated next to the name of the
candidate on the primary and election ballot. A candidate shall file
a written notice with the filing officer within three business days
after the close of the filing period designating the political party to
be indicated next to the candidate's name on the ballot if either: (a)
The candidate has been nominated by two or more minor political parties
or independent conventions; or (b) the candidate has both filed a
declaration of candidacy declaring an affiliation with a major
political party and been nominated by a minor political party or
independent convention. If no written notice is filed the filing
officer shall give effect to the party designation shown upon the first
document filed. A candidate may be deemed nominated by a minor party
or independent convention only if all documentation required by chapter
29.24 RCW has been timely filed.

Sec. 9 RCW 29.30.085 and 1992 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 29.30.086 and in subsection (2) of
this section, on the ballot at the general election for a nonpartisan
office for which a primary was held, only the names of the candidate
who received the greatest number of votes and the candidate who
received the next greatest number of votes for that office shall appear
under the title of that office, and the names shall appear in that
order. If a primary was conducted, no candidate's name may be printed
on the subsequent general election ballot unless he or she receives at
least one percent of the total votes cast for that office at the
preceding primary. On the ballot at the general election for any other
nonpartisan office for which no primary was held, the names of the
candidates shall be listed in the order determined under RCW 29.30.025.
(2) On the ballot at the general election for the office of justice
of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the
superior court, ((or)) state superintendent of public instruction,
eastern Washington water commissioner, or western Washington water
commissioner, if a candidate in a contested primary receives a majority
of all the votes cast for that office or position, only the name of
that candidate may be printed under the title of the office for that
position.

Sec. 10 RCW 29.81.220 and 1999 c 260 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The voters' pamphlet must contain:
(1) Information about each ballot measure initiated by or referred
to the voters for their approval or rejection as required by RCW
29.81.250;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, advocating
the candidacies of nominees for the office of president and vice-president of the United States, United States senator, United States
representative, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state,
state treasurer, state auditor, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, superintendent of public instruction, insurance
commissioner, eastern Washington water commissioner, western
Washington water commissioner, state senator, state representative,
justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge
of the superior court. Candidates may also submit a campaign mailing
address and telephone number and a photograph not more than five years
old and of a size and quality that the secretary of state determines to
be suitable for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) In even-numbered years, a section explaining how voters may
participate in the election campaign process; the address and telephone
number of the public disclosure commission established under RCW
42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements that apply when
contributions are made to candidates and political committees;
(5) In even-numbered years the name, address, and telephone number
of each political party with nominees listed in the pamphlet, if filed
with the secretary of state by the state committee of a major political
party or the presiding officer of the convention of a minor political
party;
(6) In each odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected,
information explaining the precinct caucus and convention process used
by each major political party to elect delegates to its national
presidential candidate nominating convention. The pamphlet must also
provide a description of the statutory procedures by which minor
political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;
(7) In even-numbered years, a description of the office of precinct
committee officer and its duties;
(8) An application form for an absentee ballot;
(9) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language for proposed measures under RCW 29.81.260;
(10) Any additional information pertaining to elections as may be
required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is deemed
informative to the voters.

Sec. 11 RCW 42.17.020 and 2002 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(2) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(3) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29.01.110, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency prior to its
circulation for signatures.
(4) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(5) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter 29.24 RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29.01.090, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(6) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(7) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(8) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(9) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(10) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(11) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.
(12) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(13) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(14)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising prepared by a candidate, a
political committee, or its authorized agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(15) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(16) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(17) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(18) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of December after the date of the last previous general election for
the office that the candidate seeks and ending on November 30th after
the next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on November 30th
after the special election.
(19) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(20) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17.080(2).
(21) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
election that results in the election of a person to a state office.
It does not include a primary.
(22) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(23) "Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent children,
and other dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the
purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means
an individual's spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister
of the individual and the spouse of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and the
spouse of any such person.
(24) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each
of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(25)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a
contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the
contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(26) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of
the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the
subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature
and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are
pending approval by the governor.
(27) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the
passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate,
or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.
(28) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or
her own or another's behalf.
(29) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a
lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated
for acting as a lobbyist.
(30) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture,
public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local
governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(31) "Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a
record or any representative designated by that person, except that if
that person is under a legal disability, the term "person in interest"
means and includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.
(32) "Political advertising" includes any advertising displays,
newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids,
flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other means of
mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing, directly or
indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support in any election
campaign.
(33) "Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or
an individual dealing with his or her own funds or property) having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in
support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.
(34) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for nominating a candidate to state office under chapter
29.18 or 29.21 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in
large measure, the procedures established in chapter 29.18 or 29.21
RCW.
(35) "Public office" means any federal, state, county, city, town,
school district, port district, special district, or other state
political subdivision elective office.
(36) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(37) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the
date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29.82.015 and ending
thirty days after the recall election.
(38) "State legislative office" means the office of a member of the
state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state
senate.
(39) "State office" means state legislative office or the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of
public instruction, state auditor, ((or)) state treasurer, eastern
Washington water commissioner, or western Washington water
commissioner.
(40) "State official" means a person who holds a state office.
(41) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or
candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession
or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election
for which the contributions were received, and that are in excess of
the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the committee
or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a continuing
political committee, "surplus funds" mean those contributions remaining
in the possession or control of the committee that are in excess of the
amount necessary to pay all remaining debts when it makes its final
report under RCW 42.17.065.
(42) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.01.010 and 1965 c 8 s 43.01.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, treasurer,
auditor, attorney general, superintendent of public instruction,
commissioner of public lands, ((and)) insurance commissioner, eastern
Washington water commissioner, and western Washington water
commissioner, shall hold office for the term of four years, and until
their successors are elected and qualified; and the term shall commence
on the Wednesday after the second Monday of January following their
election.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.01.020 and 1965 c 8 s 43.01.020 are each amended
to read as follows:
The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, treasurer,
auditor, attorney general, superintendent of public instruction,
commissioner of public lands, ((and)) insurance commissioner, eastern
Washington water commissioner, and western Washington water
commissioner, shall, before entering upon the duties of their
respective offices, take and subscribe an oath or affirmation in
substance as follows: I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will
support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution and
laws of the state of Washington, and that I will faithfully discharge
the duties of the office of (name of office) to the best of my ability.
The oath or affirmation shall be administered by one of the
justices of the supreme court at the capitol. A certificate shall be
affixed thereto by the person administering the oath, and the oath or
affirmation so certified shall be filed in the office of the secretary
of state before the officer shall be qualified to discharge any
official duties: PROVIDED, That the oath of the secretary of state
shall be filed in the office of the state auditor.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.03.010 and 1989 c 10 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The annual salaries of the following named state elected officials
shall be prescribed by the Washington citizens' commission on salaries
for elected officials: Governor; lieutenant governor: PROVIDED, That
in arriving at the annual salary of the lieutenant governor the
commission shall prescribe a fixed amount plus a sum equal to 1/260th
of the difference between the annual salary of the lieutenant governor
and the annual salary of the governor for each day that the lieutenant
governor is called upon to perform the duties of the governor by reason
of the absence from the state, removal, resignation, death, or
disability of the governor; secretary of state; state treasurer; state
auditor; attorney general; superintendent of public instruction;
commissioner of public lands; ((and)) state insurance commissioner;
eastern Washington water commissioner, and western Washington water
commissioner. Members of the legislature shall receive for their
service per annum the amount prescribed by the Washington citizens'
commission on salaries for elected officials; and in addition,
reimbursement for mileage for travel to and from legislative sessions
as provided in RCW 43.03.060.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.17.320 and 1993 c 279 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of RCW 43.17.320 through 43.17.340, "state agency"
means:
(1) Any agency for which the executive officer is listed in RCW
42.17.2401(1); and
(2) The office of the secretary of state; the office of the state
treasurer; the office of the state auditor; the department of natural
resources; the office of the insurance commissioner; ((and)) the office
of the superintendent of public instruction; and the offices of the
eastern Washington water commissioner and the western Washington water
commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

--- END ---