BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in 1907, by
legislative enactment, the state of Washington dedicated certain lands
within the city of Tacoma for street, park, and boulevard purposes, and
provided that the interest would revert to the state in the event the
lands were used for other purposes. The legislature further finds that
a portion of such lands is adjacent to Jefferson elementary school, and
that Tacoma public schools, by permission from the city of Tacoma, has
utilized these lands for park and playground purposes in conjunction
with the operation of the school. The legislature further finds that
Tacoma public schools plan to renovate the elementary school, and that
the renovation will result in a small portion of the footprint of the
school buildings being located on the above-mentioned lands dedicated
by the state to the city of Tacoma. The legislature finds that the
renovation and uses of the lands dedicated to the city of Tacoma will
include within the project public access and recreational use of the
elementary school playgrounds. Therefore, the legislature finds that
it is appropriate that this act allow an additional dedicated use of
these lands.

Sec. 2 1907 c 123 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
That the following described lands, as shown in the amended map of
second school land addition to the city of Tacoma, to-wit: Blocks 280,
279, 278, 277, 276, 275, 274 and 273, being a part of school section
36, township 21 north, range 2 east, W. M., Pierce county, Washington,
be and the same are hereby dedicated to the city of Tacoma, a municipal
corporation of the State of Washington, to be used for street, park and
boulevard purposes, and on block 279, for the additional purpose of the
expansion of public school facilities: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if the
said city of Tacoma shall ever use or permit the use of said lands for
any purpose other than in this act provided, the same shall at once
revert to the State of Washington without any suit or action in any
court and without any action on the part of the State whatsoever; and
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That as one of the conditions of this grant, it is
expressly provided, that if the streets, or any portion of the streets,
bordering on said blocks described in this section be vacated by said
city, said blocks in this section dedicated shall at once revert to the
State of Washington without the act of any court or courts whatsoever
and without any act on the part of the State of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---