BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2,
and plan 3" to read as follows:
Upon attainment of age seventy and one-half, an employed member
may, subject to this section, apply for the retirement benefit the
member is otherwise eligible to receive and remain employed without
reduction in their pension. The retirement benefit begins to accrue on
the first day of the calendar month following the month that a member
applies for a retirement benefit and has attained age seventy and one-half. The benefit shall be calculated in accordance with the rules of
the member's plan, except that the member may continue to be employed.
Upon retirement, the retiree is no longer an active member and may not
make contributions, nor receive service credit, for future periods of
employment while receiving his or her retirement allowance.
This section does not apply to any member who is a state elected
official on the effective date of this act, unless that member leaves
elected office or is reappointed or reelected after the effective date
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 2 and plan
3" to read as follows:
Upon attainment of age seventy and one-half, an employed member
may, subject to this section, apply for the retirement benefit the
member is otherwise eligible to receive and remain employed without
reduction in their pension. The retirement benefit begins to accrue on
the first day of the calendar month following the month that a member
applies for a retirement benefit and has attained age seventy and one-half. The benefit is calculated in accordance with the rules of the
member's plan, except that the member may continue to be employed.
Upon retirement, the retiree is no longer an active member and may not
make contributions, nor receive service credit, for future periods of
employment while receiving his or her retirement allowance.
This section does not apply to any member who is a state elected
official on the effective date of this act, unless that member leaves
elected office or is reappointed or reelected after the effective date
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2,
and plan 3" to read as follows:
Upon attainment of age seventy and one-half, an employed member
may, subject to this section, apply for the retirement benefit the
member is otherwise eligible to receive and remain employed without
reduction in their pension. The retirement benefit begins to accrue on
the first day of the calendar month following the month that a member
applies for a retirement benefit and has attained age seventy and one-half. The benefit shall be calculated in accordance with the rules of
the member's plan, except that the member may continue to be employed.
Upon retirement, the retiree is no longer an active member and may not
make contributions, nor receive service credit, for future periods of
employment while receiving his or her retirement allowance.
This section does not apply to any member who is a state elected
official on the effective date of this act, unless that member leaves
elected office or is reappointed or reelected after the effective date
of this act.

--- END ---