BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.40.025 and 1991 c 200 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An onshore or offshore facility shall demonstrate financial
responsibility in an amount determined by the department, and
established in rule by January 1, 2006, as necessary to compensate the
state and affected counties and cities for damages that might occur
during a reasonable worst case spill of oil from that facility into the
navigable waters of the state and for civil penalties and fines
imposed. The department shall consider such matters as: (a) The
amount of oil that could be spilled into the navigable waters from the
facility((,)); (b) the cost of cleaning up the spilled oil((,)); (c)
the frequency of operations at the facility((,)); (d) the amount of
civil penalties and fines that could be imposed; (e) the damages that
could result from the spill; and (f) the commercial availability and
affordability of financial responsibility for both large and small
facilities.
(2) This section shall not apply to an onshore or offshore facility
owned or operated by the federal government or by the state or local
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 To assist the department of ecology in
determining the proper levels of financial responsibility for onshore
and offshore facilities, as required under RCW 88.40.025, the
department shall contract for an independent economic analysis
regarding adequate levels of financial responsibility. The analysis
shall include consideration of the matters identified in RCW 88.40.025.
The analysis must be completed and delivered to the legislature and
governor by September 1, 2004.

--- END ---