BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current
financial responsibility laws for vessels are in need of update and
revision. These changes are necessary due to the increased risks of
spills, the length of time that has passed since the current standards
were put in place, the recent changes that have occurred in federal
statutory and case law, the comparative standards of other western
states, and the recent experiences of other states with spills. The
legislature intends that, whenever possible, the standards set for
Washington state provide the highest level of protection consistent
with other western states and to ultimately achieve a more uniform
system of financial responsibility on the Pacific Coast.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.40.011 and 2000 c 69 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cargo vessel" means a self-propelled ship in commerce, other
than a tank vessel or a passenger vessel, of three hundred or more
gross tons((, including but not limited to, commercial fish processing
vessels and freighters)).
(2) "Bulk" means material that is stored or transported in a loose,
unpackaged liquid, powder, or granular form capable of being conveyed
by a pipe, bucket, chute, or belt system.
(3) "Covered vessel" means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, or
passenger vessel.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(6)(a) "Facility" means any structure, group of structures,
equipment, pipeline, or device, other than a vessel, located on or near
the navigable waters of the state that transfers oil in bulk to or from
a tank vessel or pipeline, that is used for producing, storing,
handling, transferring, processing, or transporting oil in bulk.
(b) A facility does not include any: (i) Railroad car, motor
vehicle, or other rolling stock while transporting oil over the
highways or rail lines of this state; (ii) retail motor vehicle motor
fuel outlet; (iii) facility that is operated as part of an exempt
agricultural activity as provided in RCW 82.04.330; (iv) underground
storage tank regulated by the department or a local government under
chapter 90.76 RCW; or (v) marine fuel outlet that does not dispense
more than three thousand gallons of fuel to a ship that is not a
covered vessel, in a single transaction.
(7) "Fishing vessel" means a self-propelled commercial vessel of
three hundred or more gross tons that is used for catching or
processing fish.
(8) "Hazardous substances" means any substance listed as of March
1, 2003, in Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted ((August 14,
1989,)) under section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive
environmental response, compensation, and liability act of 1980, as
amended by P.L. 99-499. The following are not hazardous substances for
purposes of this chapter:
(a) Wastes listed as F001 through F028 in Table 302.4; ((and))
(b) Wastes listed as K001 through K136 in Table 302.4; and
(c) The noncompound metals antimony, arsenic, beryllium, cadmium,
chromium, copper, lead, nickel, selenium, silver, thallium, and zinc,
when in solid form in a particle larger than one hundred micrometers
(0.004 inches) in diameter.
(((8) "Inland barge" means any barge operating on the waters of the
state and certified by the coast guard as an inland barge.))
(9) "Navigable waters of the state" means those waters of the
state, and their adjoining shorelines, that are subject to the ebb and
flow of the tide and/or are presently used, have been used in the past,
or may be susceptible for use to transport intrastate, interstate, or
foreign commerce.
(10) "Oil" or "oils" means any naturally occurring liquid
hydrocarbons at atmospheric temperature and pressure coming from the
earth, including condensate and natural gasoline, and any fractionation
thereof, including, but not limited to, crude oil, petroleum, gasoline,
fuel oil, diesel oil, oil sludge, oil refuse, and oil mixed with wastes
other than dredged spoil. Oil does not include any substance listed as
of March 1, 2003, in Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted ((August
14, 1989,)) under section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive
environmental response, compensation, and liability act of 1980, as
amended by P.L. 99-499.
(11) "Offshore facility" means any facility located in, on, or
under any of the navigable waters of the state, but does not include a
facility any part of which is located in, on, or under any land of the
state, other than submerged land.
(12) "Onshore facility" means any facility any part of which is
located in, on, or under any land of the state, other than submerged
land, that because of its location, could reasonably be expected to
cause substantial harm to the environment by discharging oil into or on
the navigable waters of the state or the adjoining shorelines.
(13)(a) "Owner or operator" means (i) in the case of a vessel, any
person owning, operating, or chartering by demise, the vessel; (ii) in
the case of an onshore or offshore facility, any person owning or
operating the facility; and (iii) in the case of an abandoned vessel or
onshore or offshore facility, the person who owned or operated the
vessel or facility immediately before its abandonment.
(b) "Operator" does not include any person who owns the land
underlying a facility if the person is not involved in the operations
of the facility.
(14) "Passenger vessel" means a ship of three hundred or more gross
tons with a fuel capacity of at least six thousand gallons carrying
passengers for compensation.
(15) "Ship" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating
craft of any kind.
(16) "Spill" means an unauthorized discharge of oil into the waters
of the state.
(17) "Tank vessel" means a ship that is constructed or adapted to
carry, or that carries, oil in bulk as cargo or cargo residue, and
that:
(a) Operates on the waters of the state; or
(b) Transfers oil in a port or place subject to the jurisdiction of
this state.
(18) "Waters of the state" includes lakes, rivers, ponds, streams,
inland waters, underground water, salt waters, estuaries, tidal flats,
beaches and lands adjoining the seacoast of the state, sewers, and all
other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington.

Sec. 3 RCW 88.40.020 and 2000 c 69 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any ((inland)) barge that transports hazardous substances in
bulk as cargo, using any port or place in the state of Washington or
the navigable waters of the state shall establish evidence of financial
responsibility in the amount of the greater of ((one)) five million
dollars, or ((one)) three hundred ((fifty)) dollars per gross ton of
such vessel.
(b) The director by rule may establish a lesser standard of
financial responsibility for barges, transporting hazardous substances,
of three hundred gross tons or less. The standard shall set the level
of financial responsibility based on the quantity of cargo and type of
cargo the barge is capable of carrying.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (6) of this section, a tank vessel that carries oil as cargo
in bulk shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay at least five
hundred million dollars. The amount of financial responsibility
required under this subsection is one billion dollars after January 1,
2004.
(b) The director by rule may establish a lesser standard of
financial responsibility for tank vessels or barges of three hundred
gross tons or less. The standard shall set the level of financial
responsibility based on the quantity of cargo the tank vessel or barge
is capable of carrying. The director shall not set the standard for
tank vessels or barges of three hundred gross tons or less below that
required under federal law.
(c) The owner or operator of a tank vessel who is a member of an
international protection and indemnity mutual organization and is
covered for oil pollution risks up to the amounts required under this
section is not required to demonstrate financial responsibility under
this chapter. The director ((may)) shall require the owner or operator
of a tank vessel to prove membership in such an organization.
(3)(a) A cargo vessel or passenger vessel that carries more than
six thousand five hundred barrels of oil as fuel shall demonstrate
financial responsibility to pay ((the greater of at least six hundred
dollars per gross ton or five hundred thousand)), except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, at least three hundred million dollars.
(b) A cargo vessel or passenger vessel, as defined in RCW
88.40.011, that carries: (i) Between one and ten barrels of oil shall
demonstrate financial responsibility to pay at least two million
dollars; (ii) between eleven and fifty barrels of oil shall demonstrate
financial responsibility to pay at least five million dollars; (iii)
between fifty-one and five hundred barrels of oil shall demonstrate
financial responsibility to pay at least ten million dollars; (iv)
between five hundred one and one thousand barrels of oil shall
demonstrate financial responsibility to pay at least twenty million
dollars; and (v) between one thousand one and six thousand five hundred
barrels of oil shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay at
least twenty million dollars for the first one thousand barrels and
five million for each additional one thousand barrels.
(c) The owner or operator of a cargo or passenger vessel who is a
member of an international protection and indemnity mutual organization
and is covered for oil pollution risks up to the amounts required under
this section is not required to demonstrate financial responsibility
under this chapter. The director shall require the owner or operator
of a tank vessel to prove membership in such an organization.
(4) A fishing vessel while on the navigable waters of the state
must demonstrate financial responsibility in the amount of the greater
of five million dollars, or one million dollars for each employee on
the vessel.
(5) The documentation of financial responsibility shall demonstrate
the ability of the document holder to meet state and federal financial
liability requirements for the actual costs for removal of oil or
hazardous substance spills, for natural resource damages, for civil
penalties and fines imposed, for removal of shipwrecks and ship debris
from the lands and waters of the state, and for necessary expenses
related to a spill, or substantial threat of a spill, involving oil or
a hazardous substance.
(((5))) (6) The department may by rule set a lesser amount of
financial responsibility for a tank vessel, cargo vessel, or passenger
vessel that meets safety performance or other standards ((for
construction, propulsion, equipment, and personnel)) established by the
department. The department shall require as a minimum level of
financial responsibility under this subsection the same level of
financial responsibility required under federal law.
(((6))) (7) This section shall not apply to a covered vessel owned
or operated by the federal government or by a state or local
government.
(8) The department shall review the statutory financial
responsibility requirements established in this section and make
recommendations regarding the sufficiency of the requirements to the
legislature and the governor at least every five years with the first
report due November 1, 2007.

Sec. 4 RCW 88.40.040 and 2000 c 69 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The department shall deny entry to the waters of the state to
any vessel that does not meet the financial responsibility requirements
of this chapter)) It is unlawful for any vessel required to have
financial responsibility under this chapter to enter or operate on
Washington waters without meeting the requirements of this chapter or
rules adopted under this chapter, except when necessary to avoid injury
to the vessel's crew or passengers. Any vessel owner or operator that
does not meet the financial responsibility requirements of this chapter
and any rules prescribed thereunder or the federal oil pollution act of
1990 shall be reported by the department to the United States coast
guard.
(2) The department shall enforce section 1016 of the federal oil
pollution act of 1990 as authorized by section 1019 of the federal act.

--- END ---