BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
professional educator standards board has advisory responsibilities on
certain educational issues, including certification issues. The
legislature further finds that there is currently no requirement for
educational interpreters for deaf and hard of hearing students to be
certified or to meet standardized qualifications or competencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By November 30, 2004, the Washington
professional educator standards board shall conduct a comprehensive
review and analysis of the following options and make recommendations
to the governor, the legislature, the superintendent of public
instruction, and the state board of education regarding the following
options:
(1) Requiring national or state certification for all educational
interpreters for deaf students and hard of hearing students;
(2) Designating educational interpreters as educational staff
associates;
(3) Requiring the state board of education to establish
competencies for educational interpreters;
(4) Requiring the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, in cooperation with institutions of higher education that
have a deaf studies program, to provide a training program for
educational sign language interpreters. The goal of the training
program would be a four-year degree in educational interpreting. The
pilot program would be accessible to all areas of Washington through a
combination of interactive video conferences, online courses, and face-to-face classes; and
(5) Any other option that the Washington professional educator
standards board deems viable to increase and maintain the quality and
availability of educational interpreters in a fiscally responsible
manner.

--- END ---