BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.380 and 2001 c 237 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows((,
averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right)).
The annual consumptive quantity of a water right may not be deemed to
be less than the actual peak historic use of a water right, even if the
right is not being fully exercised at the time of change or transfer,
if: (a) The reduced use is due to cropping patterns or system
efficiencies; (b) the water right holder intends to fully exercise the
right; and (c) the water right holder has the facilities in place to
make beneficial use of the full right. Before any transfer of such
right to use water or change of the point of diversion of water or
change of purpose of use can be made, any person having an interest in
the transfer or change, shall file a written application therefor with
the department, and the application shall not be granted until notice
of the application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it
shall appear that such transfer or such change may be made without
injury or detriment to existing rights, the department shall issue to
the applicant a certificate in duplicate granting the right for such
transfer or for such change of point of diversion or of use. The
certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a record with the
department and the duplicate certificate issued to the applicant may be
filed with the county auditor in like manner and with the same effect
as provided in the original certificate or permit to divert water.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The right to use water for any beneficial use within the
general category of an agricultural use includes the right to use the
water, without applying to the department or any other governmental
entity for approval, for any other beneficial use within the general
category of an agricultural use. The general category of an
agricultural use of water includes, but is not limited to, the
beneficial use of water for stock watering, agricultural irrigation,
agricultural frost control, processing agricultural commodities into
agricultural products, and other agricultural uses.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c 316 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
ground water right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
ground waters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public ground water as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public ground water as the original
well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5) The right to use water for any beneficial use within the
general category of an agricultural use includes the right to use the
water, without applying to the department or any other governmental
entity for approval, for any other beneficial use within the general
category of an agricultural use. The general category of an
agricultural use of water includes, but is not limited to, the
beneficial use of water for stock watering, agricultural irrigation,
agricultural frost control, processing agricultural commodities into
agricultural products, and other agricultural uses.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.14.010 and 1967 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The future growth and development of the state is dependent upon
effective management and efficient use of the state's water resources.
The purpose of this chapter is to provide adequate records for
efficient administration of the state's waters((, and to cause a return
to the state of any water rights which are no longer exercised by
putting said waters to beneficial use)).

Sec. 4 RCW 90.14.130 and 1987 c 109 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Until the effective date of this section, when it appears to
the department of ecology that a person entitled to the use of water
has not beneficially used his or her water right or some portion
thereof, and it appears that said right has or may have reverted to the
state because of such nonuse, as provided by RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170,
or 90.14.180, the department of ecology shall notify such person by
order: PROVIDED, That where a company, association, district, or the
United States has filed a blanket claim under the provisions of RCW
90.14.060 for the total benefits of those served by it, the notice
shall be served on such company, association, district or the United
States and not upon any of its individual water users who may not have
used the water or some portion thereof which they were entitled to use.
The order shall contain: (((1))) (a) A description of the water right,
including the approximate location of the point of diversion, the
general description of the lands or places where such waters were used,
the water source, the amount involved, the purpose of use, and the
apparent authority upon which the right is based; (((2))) (b) a
statement that unless sufficient cause be shown on appeal the water
right will be declared relinquished; and (((3))) (c) a statement that
such order may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board.
Any person aggrieved by such an order may appeal it to the pollution
control hearings board pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310. The order shall be
served by registered or certified mail to the last known address of the
person and be posted at the point of division or withdrawal. The order
by itself shall not alter the recipient's right to use water, if any.
(2) After the effective date of this section, the department of
ecology has no authority to issue by order a notice of reversion or
otherwise limit a water right under this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.14.160 and 1981 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state
through any appropriation authorized by enactments of the legislature
prior to enactment of chapter 117, Laws of 1917, or by custom, or by
general adjudication, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails,
without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said
right to divert or withdraw for any period of five successive years
after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and
said right or portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters
affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in
accordance with RCW 90.03.250.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any person
after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.14.170 and 1967 c 233 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state
by virtue of his or her ownership of land abutting a stream, lake, or
watercourse, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails, without
sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said right to
withdraw or divert said water for any period of five successive years
after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and
such right or portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters
affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 90.03.250.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any person
after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.14.180 and 1987 c 109 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person hereafter entitled to divert or withdraw waters of
the state through an appropriation authorized under RCW 90.03.330,
90.44.080, or 90.44.090 who abandons the same, or who voluntarily
fails, without sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of
said right to withdraw for any period of five successive years shall
relinquish such right or portion thereof, and such right or portion
thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters affected by said
right shall become available for appropriation in accordance with RCW
90.03.250. ((All certificates hereafter issued by the department of
ecology pursuant to RCW 90.03.330 shall expressly incorporate this
section by reference.))
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any person
after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.14.210 and 1967 c 233 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Until the effective date of this section, the provisions of this
chapter shall apply to all rights to withdraw ground waters of the
state, whether authorized by chapter 90.44 RCW or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---