BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.12.140 and 1982 c 85 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in this title shall prevent the use of beer, wine,
and/or spirituous liquor, for cooking purposes only, in conjunction
with a culinary or restaurant course offered by a college, university,
community college, area vocational technical institute, or private
vocational school. Further, nothing in this title shall prohibit the
making of beer or wine in food fermentation courses offered by a
college, university, community college, area vocational technical
institute, or private vocational school.
(2) "Culinary or restaurant course" as used in this section means
a course of instruction which includes practical experience in food
preparation, enology, or viticulture under the supervision of an
instructor who is twenty-one years of age or older.
(3) Persons under twenty-one years of age participating in culinary
or restaurant courses may handle beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for
purposes of participating in the courses, but nothing in this section
shall be construed to authorize consumption of liquor by persons under
twenty-one years of age or to authorize possession of liquor by persons
under twenty-one years of age at any time or place other than while
preparing food under the supervision of the course instructor.
(4) Beer, wine, and/or spirituous liquor to be used in culinary or
restaurant courses shall be purchased at retail from the board or a
retailer licensed under this title. All such liquor shall be securely
stored in the food preparation area and shall not be displayed in an
area open to the general public.
(5) Colleges, universities, community colleges, area vocational
technical institutes, and private vocational schools shall obtain the
prior written approval of the board for use of beer, wine, and/or
spirituous liquor for cooking purposes in their culinary or restaurant
courses.

--- END ---