BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that the people of
this state have a right to a reasonable expectation of privacy on their
private property. The legislature finds, however, that over time
statutory authority for entry onto private property has expanded to the
point where the people no longer feel secure from the unreasonable
intrusion of government officials and others who have been granted
special immunity from prosecution for trespass. The legislature
further finds that this unnecessary erosion of the right of privacy
creates dangerous tension between the people of the state and their
government and jeopardizes the orderly resolution of issues.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.52.010 and 1985 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following definitions apply in this chapter:
(1) "Premises" includes any building, dwelling, structure used for
commercial aquaculture, or any real property;
(2) "Enter". The word "enter" when constituting an element or part
of a crime, shall include the entrance of the person, or the insertion
of any part of his or her body, or any instrument or weapon held in his
or her hand and used or intended to be used to threaten or intimidate
a person or to detach or remove property;
(3) "Enters or remains unlawfully". A person "enters or remains
unlawfully" in or upon premises when he or she is not then licensed,
invited, or otherwise privileged to so enter or remain.
A license or privilege to enter or remain in a building which is
only partly open to the public is not a license or privilege to enter
or remain in that part of a building which is not open to the public.
A person who enters or remains upon unimproved and apparently unused
land, which is neither fenced nor otherwise enclosed in a manner
designed to exclude intruders, does so with license and privilege
unless notice against trespass is personally communicated to him or her
by the owner of the land or some other authorized person, or unless
notice is given by posting in a conspicuous manner. Land that is used
for commercial aquaculture or for growing an agricultural crop or
crops, other than timber, is not unimproved and apparently unused land
if a crop or any other sign of cultivation is clearly visible or if
notice is given by posting in a conspicuous manner. Similarly, a field
fenced in any manner is not unimproved and apparently unused land;
(4) "Data" means a representation of information, knowledge, facts,
concepts, or instructions that are being prepared or have been prepared
in a formalized manner and are intended for use in a computer;
(5) "Computer program" means an ordered set of data representing
coded instructions or statements that when executed by a computer cause
the computer to process data;
(6) "Access" means to approach, instruct, communicate with, store
data in, retrieve data from, or otherwise make use of any resources of
a computer, directly or by electronic means;
(7) "Law enforcement officer" means a "general authority Washington
peace officer," or "specially commissioned Washington peace officer,"
or "federal peace officer" as defined in RCW 10.93.020;
(8) "State public official or employee of the state" means any
elected or appointed official or employee of a state agency or
department.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.52.070 and 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal trespass in the first degree if
he or she knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in a building.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a state public official or
employee of the state "enters or remains unlawfully" under the same
circumstances as any other person, except that it is not unlawful for
such an official or employee to enter or remain in a building:
(a) When necessary to do so in response to a law enforcement, fire,
or medical emergency;
(b) When acting under authority of a warrant or other court order
that was obtained after a reasonable attempt to notify the owner and
after a reasonable attempt to obtain the consent of such owner or the
resident agent of any nonresident owner to allow the official or the
employee to enter or remain in the building; or
(c) When the state public official, employee of the state, or law
enforcement officer enters or remains in a building in a manner and
under circumstances that are lawful pursuant to statutory authority or
applicable case law. Even if such legal authority exists, prior to
carrying out the purpose for which entry is made, the official or
employee making such entry or someone on his or her behalf shall make
a reasonable attempt to notify the owner of the building as to the
purpose and need for the entry.
(3) Criminal trespass in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.52.080 and 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal trespass in the second degree if
he or she knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in or upon premises of
another under circumstances not constituting criminal trespass in the
first degree.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a state public official or
employee of the state "enters or remains unlawfully" under the same
circumstances as any other person, except that it is not unlawful for
such an official or employee to enter or remain in or upon premises of
another:
(a) When necessary to do so in response to a law enforcement, fire,
or medical emergency;
(b) When acting under authority of a warrant or other court order
that was obtained after a reasonable attempt to notify the owner and
after a reasonable attempt to obtain the consent of such owner or the
resident agent of any nonresident owner to allow the official or the
employee to enter or remain in or upon premises of another; or
(c) When the state public official, employee of the state, or law
enforcement officer enters or remains in or upon premises of another in
a manner and under circumstances that are lawful pursuant to statutory
authority or applicable case law. Even if such legal authority exists,
prior to carrying out the purpose for which entry is made, the official
or employee making such entry or someone on his or her behalf shall
make a reasonable attempt to notify the owner of the property as to the
purpose and need for the entry.
(3) Criminal trespass in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---