BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.15.050 and 1999 c 379 s 941 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter to the outdoor recreation
account shall be distributed in the following way:
(a) Not less than twenty-five percent to the state parks and
recreation commission for the acquisition and development of state
parks, with at least ((seventy-five)) fifty percent of this money for
acquisition costs((. However, during the 1999-2001 biennium,
distributions for acquisition and development of state parks shall not
exceed four million two hundred fifty thousand dollars, and the
proportion for acquisition costs shall be determined by the
commission));
(b) Not less than twenty-five percent for the acquisition,
development, and renovation of local parks, with at least fifty percent
of this money for acquisition costs;
(c) Not less than fifteen percent for the acquisition and
development of trails;
(d) Not less than ten percent for the acquisition and development
of water access sites, with at least seventy-five percent of this money
for acquisition costs; and
(e) The remaining amount shall be considered unallocated and shall
be distributed by the committee to state and local agencies to fund
high priority acquisition and development needs for parks, trails, and
water access sites.
(2) In distributing these funds, the committee retains discretion
to meet the most pressing needs for state and local parks, trails, and
water access sites, and is not required to meet the percentages
described in subsection (1) of this section in any one biennium.
(3) Only local agencies may apply for acquisition, development, or
renovation funds for local parks under subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(4) State and local agencies may apply for funds for trails under
subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(5) State and local agencies may apply for funds for water access
sites under subsection (1)(d) of this section.

--- END ---