BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of mail consisting solely of unbound sheets of paper, the primary
purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services for
multiple businesses that are unrelated to the person creating the
mailer, which is printed outside the state for the person and mailed
directly to Washington residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2003.

--- END ---