BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.720 and 2001 c 247 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court may order that after a period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of driving privileges, and for up to as long as
the court has jurisdiction, any person convicted of any offense
involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while
operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with
a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical
device.
(2) ((If a)) (a) The department shall require that, after any
applicable period of suspension, revocation, or denial of driving
privileges, a person may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical device
if the person is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
or an equivalent local ordinance and it is:
(((a))) (i) The person's first conviction or a deferred prosecution
under chapter 10.05 RCW and his or her alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the
person's alcohol concentration; ((or (b)))
(ii) The person's second or subsequent conviction; or (((c)))
(iii) The person's first conviction and the person has a previous
deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW or it is a deferred
prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW and the person has a previous
conviction((, the court shall order that after any applicable period of
suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges, the person may
drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device. The requirement to
drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device may not be
suspended)).
(b) The ((court)) department may waive the requirement for the use
of such a device if ((the court makes a specific finding in writing))
it concludes that such devices are not reasonably available in the
local area. Nothing in this section may be interpreted as entitling a
person to more than one deferred prosecution.
(3) In the case of a person under subsection (1) of this section,
the court shall establish a specific calibration setting at which the
ignition interlock or other biological or technical device will prevent
the motor vehicle from being started and the period of time that the
person shall be subject to the restriction. In the case of a person
under subsection (2) of this section, the ignition interlock or other
biological or technical device shall be calibrated to prevent the motor
vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided has an
alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more, and the period of time of the
restriction will be as follows:
(a) For a person (i) who is subject to RCW 46.61.5055 (1)(b), (2),
or (3), or who is subject to a deferred prosecution program under
chapter 10.05 RCW((,)); and (ii) who has not previously been restricted
under this section, a period of ((not less than)) one year;
(b) For a person who has previously been restricted under (a) of
this subsection, a period of ((not less than)) five years;
(c) For a person who has previously been restricted under (b) of
this subsection, a period of ((not less than)) ten years.
For purposes of this section, "convicted" means being found guilty
of an offense or being placed on a deferred prosecution program under
chapter 10.05 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.311 and 2001 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall not suspend a driver's license or
privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed
period of more than one year, except as specifically permitted under
RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of law. Except for a
suspension under RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5), 46.61.740, or
74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is
suspended by reason of a conviction, a finding that a traffic
infraction has been committed, pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or
pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the suspension shall remain in
effect until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29
RCW. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502
or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility
for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism agency
or probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny
reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program
has been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the
suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
or is the result of administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, and the
person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a motor
vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other
biological or technical device, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by
an ignition interlock company doing business in the state of Washington
of installment of the required device on a vehicle owned and/or
operated by the person seeking reinstatement. Whenever the license or
driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result of
certification of noncompliance with a child support order under chapter
74.20A RCW or a residential or visitation order, the suspension shall
remain in effect until the person provides a release issued by the
department of social and health services stating that the person is in
compliance with the order.
(b)(i) The department shall not issue to the person a new,
duplicate, or renewal license until the person pays a reissue fee of
twenty dollars.
(ii) If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of administrative action under
RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.
(2)(a) Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor
vehicle on the public highways has been revoked, unless the revocation
was for a cause which has been removed, is not entitled to have the
license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After the
expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive
was revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation
period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the
expiration of two years for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or
(iv) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided
by RCW 46.20.265.
(b)(i) After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person
may make application for a new license as provided by law together with
a reissue fee in the amount of twenty dollars.
(ii) If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW
46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one
hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the result of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by
the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege
to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the
revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
or is the result of administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, and the
person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a motor
vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other
biological or technical device, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by
an ignition interlock company doing business in the state of Washington
of installment of the required device on a vehicle owned and/or
operated by the person applying for a new license.
(c) Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department
shall not then issue a new license unless it is satisfied after
investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe
to grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public
highways, and until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29
RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person
the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.
(3)(a) Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended
pursuant to Article IV of the nonresident violators compact or RCW
46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or 46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue
to the person any new or renewal license until the person pays a
reissue fee of twenty dollars.
(b) If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of
this or any other state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i)
the operation or physical control of a motor vehicle upon the public
highways while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or
(ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test of the driver's blood
alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

--- END ---