BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 23B.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A corporation has provided notice or any other record to
shareholders of record who share a common address if all of the
following requirements are met:
(a) The corporation delivers the notice or other record to the
common address;
(b) The corporation addresses the notice or other record to the
shareholders who share that address either as a group or to each of the
shareholders individually; and
(c) Each shareholder consents in a record to delivery of a single
copy of such a notice or other record to the shareholders' common
address, and the corporation notifies each shareholder of the duration
of that shareholder's consent, and explains the manner by which the
shareholder can revoke the consent.
(2) For purposes of this section, "address" means a street address,
a post office box number, a facsimile telephone number, a common
address, location, or system for electronic transmissions, or another
similar destination to which records are delivered.
(3) If a shareholder revokes consent to delivery of a single copy
of any notice or other record to a common address, or notifies the
corporation that the shareholder wishes to receive an individual copy
of any notice or other record, the corporation shall begin sending
individual copies to that shareholder within thirty days after the
corporation receives the revocation of consent or notice.
(4) Prior to the delivery of notice by electronic transmission to
a common address, location, or system for electronic transmissions
under this section, each shareholder consenting to receive notice under
this section must also have consented to the receipt of notices by
electronic transmission as provided in RCW 23B.01.410.

Sec. 2 RCW 23B.07.260 and 1989 c 165 s 74 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the articles of incorporation or this title provide for
voting ((by)) on a matter by all shares entitled to vote thereon,
voting together as a single voting group ((on a matter)) and do not
provide for separate voting by any other voting group or groups with
respect to that matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon
by that single voting group as provided in RCW 23B.07.250.
(2) If the articles of incorporation or this title provide for
voting by two or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter
is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups ((counted
separately)) as provided in RCW 23B.07.250. ((Action may be taken by
one voting group on a matter even though no action is taken by another
voting group entitled to vote on the matter.))

Sec. 3 RCW 23B.10.020 and 1989 c 165 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a
corporation's board of directors may adopt one or more amendments to
the corporation's articles of incorporation without shareholder action:
(1) If the corporation has only one class of shares outstanding, to
provide, change, or eliminate any provision with respect to the par
value of any class of shares;
(2) To delete the names and addresses of the initial directors;
(3) To delete the name and address of the initial registered agent
or registered office, if a statement of change is on file with the
secretary of state;
(4) If the corporation has only one class of shares outstanding,
solely to:
(a) Effect a forward split of, or change the number of authorized
shares of that class in proportion to ((effectuate)) a forward split
of, or stock dividend in, the corporation's ((own)) outstanding
shares((, or solely to do so and to change the number of authorized
shares in proportion thereto)); or
(b) Effect a reverse split of the corporation's outstanding shares
and the number of authorized shares of that class in the same
proportions;
(5) To change the corporate name; or
(6) To make any other change expressly permitted by this title to
be made without shareholder action.

Sec. 4 RCW 23B.10.030 and 1989 c 165 s 122 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A corporation's board of directors may propose one or more
amendments to the articles of incorporation for submission to the
shareholders.
(2) For the amendment to be adopted:
(a) The board of directors must recommend the amendment to the
shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of
conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no
recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the
shareholders with the amendment; and
(b) The shareholders entitled to vote on the amendment must approve
the amendment as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(3) The board of directors may condition its submission of the
proposed amendment on any basis, including the affirmative vote of
holders of a specified percentage of shares held by any group of
shareholders not otherwise entitled under this title or the articles of
incorporation to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed
amendment.
(4) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not
entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance
with RCW 23B.07.050. The notice of meeting must also state that the
purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the
proposed amendment and contain or be accompanied by a copy of the
amendment.
(5) ((Unless this title, the articles of incorporation, or)) In
addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board of
directors((, acting pursuant to)) under subsection (3) of this section,
((require a greater vote or a vote by voting groups,)) the amendment to
be adopted must be approved ((by each voting group entitled to vote
thereon)) by two-thirds, or, in the case of a public company, a
majority, of the voting group comprising all the votes entitled to be
cast ((by that voting group)) on the proposed amendment, and of each
other voting group entitled under RCW 23B.10.040 or the articles of
incorporation to vote separately on the proposed amendment. The
articles of incorporation may require a greater vote than that provided
for in this subsection. The articles of incorporation of a corporation
other than a public company may ((provide for)) require a lesser vote
than that provided for in this subsection, or ((for)) may require a
lesser vote by separate voting groups, so long as the required vote
((provided for each voting group entitled to vote separately on the
amendment)) is not less than a majority of all the votes entitled to be
cast on the proposed amendment ((by that voting group)) and of each
other voting group entitled to vote separately on the proposed
amendment. Separate voting by additional voting groups is required on
a proposed amendment under the circumstances described in RCW
23B.10.040.

Sec. 5 RCW 23B.10.040 and 1989 c 165 s 123 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise required by subsection (3) of this section
or otherwise permitted by subsection (4) of this section, the holders
of the outstanding shares of a class or series are entitled to vote as
a separate voting group((,)) on a proposed amendment if shareholder
voting is otherwise required by this title((, on a proposed amendment))
and if the amendment would:
(a) Increase ((or decrease)) the aggregate number of authorized
shares of the class or series;
(b) Effect an exchange or reclassification of all or part of the
issued and outstanding shares of the class or series into shares of
another class or series, thereby adversely affecting the holders of the
shares so exchanged or reclassified;
(c) ((Effect an exchange or reclassification, or create the right
of exchange, of all or part of the shares of another class into shares
of the class;
(d))) Change the ((designation,)) rights, preferences, or
limitations of all or part of the issued and outstanding shares of the
class or series, thereby adversely affecting the holders of shares of
the class or series;
(((e))) (d) Change ((the shares of)) all or part of the issued and
outstanding shares of the class or series into a different number of
shares of the same class or series, thereby adversely affecting the
holders of shares of the class or series;
(((f))) (e) Create a new class or series of shares having rights or
preferences with respect to distributions or to dissolution that are,
or upon designation by the board of directors in accordance with RCW
23B.06.020 may be, prior, superior, or substantially equal to the
shares of the class or series;
(((g))) (f) Increase the rights((,)) or preferences with respect to
distributions or to dissolution, or the number of authorized shares of
any class or series that, after giving effect to the amendment,
((have)) has rights or preferences with respect to distributions or to
dissolution that are, or upon designation by the board of directors in
accordance with RCW 23B.06.020 may be, prior, superior, or
substantially equal to the shares of the class or series;
(((h))) (g) Limit or deny an existing preemptive right of all or
part of the shares of the class or series; ((or
(i))) (h) Cancel or otherwise adversely affect rights to
distributions or dividends that have accumulated but not yet been
declared on all or part of the shares of the class or series; or
(i) Effect a redemption or cancellation of all or part of the
shares of the class or series in exchange for cash or any other form of
consideration other than shares of the corporation.
(2) If a proposed amendment would affect only a series of a class
of shares in one or more of the ways described in subsection (1) of
this section, only the shares of that series are entitled to vote as a
separate voting group on the proposed amendment. A voting group
entitled to vote separately under this section may never comprise a
group of holders smaller than the holders of a single class or series
authorized and designated as a class or series in the articles of
incorporation, unless otherwise provided in the articles of
incorporation or unless the board of directors conditions its
submission of the proposed amendment on a separate vote by one or more
smaller voting groups.
(3) If a proposed amendment, that ((entitles)) would otherwise
entitle two or more classes or series of shares ((within a class)) to
vote as separate voting groups under this section, would affect those
two or more classes or series in the same or a substantially similar
way, then instead of voting as separate voting groups the shares of all
((the)) similarly affected classes or series ((within the class so
affected must)) shall vote together as a single voting group on the
proposed amendment, unless otherwise provided in the articles of
incorporation or unless the board of directors conditions its
submission of the proposed amendment on a separate vote by one or more
classes or series.
(4) A class or series of shares is entitled to the voting group
rights granted by this section although the articles of incorporation
((provide that)) generally describe the shares ((are)) of the class or
series as nonvoting shares. The articles of incorporation may,
however, limit or deny the voting group rights granted by subsection
(1)(a), (e), or (f) of this section as to any class or series of issued
or unissued shares, by means of a provision that makes explicit
reference to the limitation or denial of voting group rights that would
otherwise apply under subsection (1)(a), (e), or (f) of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 23B.11.030 and 1989 c 165 s 133 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After adopting a plan of merger or share exchange, the board of
directors of each corporation party to the merger, and the board of
directors of the corporation whose shares will be acquired in the share
exchange, shall submit the plan of merger, except as provided in
subsection (7) of this section, or share exchange for approval by its
shareholders.
(2) For a plan of merger or share exchange to be approved:
(a) The board of directors must recommend the plan of merger or
share exchange to the shareholders, unless the board of directors
determines that because of conflict of interest or other special
circumstances it should make no recommendation and communicates the
basis for its determination to the shareholders with the plan; and
(b) The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the plan, except
as provided in subsection (7) of this section.
(3) The board of directors may condition its submission of the
proposed plan of merger or share exchange on any basis, including the
affirmative vote of holders of a specified percentage of shares held by
any group of shareholders not otherwise entitled under this title or
the articles of incorporation to vote as a separate voting group on the
proposed plan of merger or share exchange.
(4) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not
entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance
with RCW 23B.07.050. The notice must also state that the purpose, or
one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan of merger
or share exchange and must contain or be accompanied by a copy or
summary of the plan.
(5) ((Unless this title, the articles of incorporation, or)) In
addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board of
directors((, acting pursuant to)) under subsection (3) of this section,
((require a greater vote or a vote by voting groups,)) the plan of
merger to be authorized must be approved by ((each voting group
entitled to vote separately on the plan by)) two-thirds of the voting
group comprising all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan ((by
that voting group)), and of each other voting group entitled under
section 7 of this act or the articles of incorporation to vote
separately on the plan, unless shareholder action is not required under
subsection (7) of this section. The articles of incorporation may
((provide for a)) require a greater or lesser vote than that provided
in this subsection, or ((for)) a greater or lesser vote by separate
voting groups, so long as the required vote ((provided for each voting
group entitled to vote separately on the plan of merger)) is not less
than a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan of
merger ((by that voting group)) and of each other voting group entitled
to vote separately on the plan. Separate voting by additional voting
groups is required on a plan of merger ((if the plan contains a
provision that, if contained in a proposed amendment to articles of
incorporation, would require action by one or more separate voting
groups on the proposed amendment under RCW 23B.10.040)) under the
circumstances described in section 7 of this act.
(6) ((Unless this title, the articles of incorporation, or)) In
addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board of
directors((, acting pursuant to)) under subsection (3) of this section,
((require a greater vote or a vote by voting groups,)) the plan of
share exchange to be authorized must be approved by ((each voting group
entitled to vote separately on the plan by)) two-thirds of the voting
group comprising all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan ((by
that voting group)), and of each other voting group entitled under
section 7 of this act or the articles of incorporation to vote
separately on the plan. The articles of incorporation may ((provide
for a)) require a greater or lesser vote than that provided in this
subsection, or ((for)) a greater or lesser vote by separate voting
groups, so long as the required vote ((provided for each voting group
entitled to vote separately on the plan of share exchange)) is not less
than a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan of
share exchange ((by that voting group)) and of each other voting group
entitled to vote separately on the plan. Separate voting by additional
voting groups is required on a plan of share exchange ((by each class
or series of shares included in the exchange, with each class or series
constituting a separate voting group)) under the circumstances
described in section 7 of this act.
(7) Action by the shareholders of the surviving corporation on a
plan of merger is not required if:
(a) The articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation will
not differ, except for amendments enumerated in RCW 23B.10.020, from
its articles of incorporation before the merger;
(b) Each shareholder of the surviving corporation whose shares were
outstanding immediately before the effective date of the merger will
hold the same number of shares, with identical designations,
preferences, limitations, and relative rights, immediately after the
merger;
(c) The number of voting shares outstanding immediately after the
merger, plus the number of voting shares issuable as a result of the
merger, either by the conversion of securities issued pursuant to the
merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued pursuant to the
merger, will not exceed the total number of voting shares of the
surviving corporation authorized by its articles of incorporation
immediately before the merger; and
(d) The number of participating shares outstanding immediately
after the merger, plus the number of participating shares issuable as
a result of the merger, either by the conversion of securities issued
pursuant to the merger or the exercise of rights and warrants issued
pursuant to the merger, will not exceed the total number of
participating shares authorized by its articles of incorporation
immediately before the merger.
(8) As used in subsection (7) of this section:
(a) "Participating shares" means shares that entitle their holders
to participate without limitation in distributions.
(b) "Voting shares" means shares that entitle their holders to vote
unconditionally in elections of directors.
(9) After a merger or share exchange is authorized, and at any time
before articles of merger or share exchange are filed, the planned
merger or share exchange may be abandoned, subject to any contractual
rights, without further shareholder action, in accordance with the
procedure set forth in the plan of merger or share exchange or, if none
is set forth, in the manner determined by the board of directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 23B.11 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise required by subsection (3) of this section
or otherwise permitted by subsection (4) of this section, the holders
of the outstanding shares of a class or series are entitled to vote as
a separate voting group on a proposed plan of merger or plan of share
exchange if shareholder voting is otherwise required by this title and
if, as a result of the proposed plan, holders of part or all of the
class or series would hold or receive:
(a) Shares of any class or series of the surviving or acquiring
corporation, or of any parent corporation of the surviving corporation,
and either (i) that class or series has a greater number of authorized
shares than the class or series held by the holders prior to the merger
or share exchange, or (ii) the proposed plan effects a change in the
number of shares held by the holders, or in the rights, preferences, or
limitations of the shares they hold, or in the class or series of
shares they hold, and such change adversely affects the holders;
(b) Shares of any class or series of the surviving or acquiring
corporation, or of any parent corporation of the surviving corporation,
and the holders who hold or receive shares of that class or series are
adversely affected under the proposed plan, as compared to their
circumstances prior to the proposed merger or share exchange, by the
creation, existence, number of authorized shares, or rights or
preferences with respect to distributions or to dissolution, of another
class or series of shares of the surviving, acquiring, or parent
corporation having rights or preferences with respect to distributions
or to dissolution that are, or upon designation by the surviving,
acquiring, or parent corporation's board of directors may be, prior,
superior, or substantially equal to the shares of the class or series
held or to be received by the holders in the proposed merger or share
exchange; or
(c) Cash or any other form of consideration other than shares of
the surviving or acquiring corporation or of any parent corporation of
the surviving corporation, received upon redemption or cancellation of
all or part of their shares pursuant to the proposed plan of merger or
share exchange.
(2) If a proposed plan of merger or share exchange would affect
only a series of a class of shares in one or more of the ways described
in subsection (1) of this section, only the shares of that series are
entitled to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed plan. A
voting group entitled to vote separately under this section may never
comprise a group of holders smaller than the holders of a single class
or series authorized and designated as a class or series in the
articles of incorporation, unless otherwise provided in the articles of
incorporation or unless the board of directors conditions its
submission of the proposed plan on a separate vote by one or more
smaller voting groups.
(3) If a proposed plan of merger or share exchange, that would
otherwise entitle two or more classes or series of shares to vote as
separate voting groups under this section, would affect those two or
more classes or series in the same or a substantially similar way, then
instead of voting as separate voting groups, the shares of all
similarly affected classes or series shall vote together as a single
voting group on the proposed plan of merger or share exchange, unless
otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or unless the board
of directors conditions its submission of the proposed plan on a
separate vote by one or more classes or series. Holders of shares of
two or more classes or series of shares who will, under a proposed
plan, receive the same type of consideration in the form of shares of
the surviving or acquiring corporation or of any parent corporation of
the surviving corporation, cash or other form of consideration, or the
same combination thereof, but in differing amounts resulting solely
from application of provisions in the corporation's articles of
incorporation governing distribution of consideration received in a
merger or share exchange, are affected in the same or a substantially
similar way and are not, by reason of receiving the same types or
differing amounts of consideration, entitled to vote as separate voting
groups on the proposed plan, unless the articles of incorporation
expressly require otherwise or the board of directors conditions its
submission of the proposed plan on a separate vote by one or more
classes or series.
(4) A class or series of shares is entitled to the voting group
rights granted by this section although the articles of incorporation
generally describe the shares of the class or series as nonvoting
shares. The articles of incorporation may, however, limit or deny the
voting group rights granted by this section as to any class or series
of issued or unissued shares, by means of a provision that makes
explicit reference to the limitation or denial of voting group rights
that would otherwise apply under this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 23B.12.020 and 1989 c 165 s 139 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose
of all, or substantially all, of its property, otherwise than in the
usual and regular course of business, on the terms and conditions and
for the consideration determined by the corporation's board of
directors, if the board of directors proposes and its shareholders
approve the proposed transaction.
(2) For a transaction to be authorized:
(a) The board of directors must recommend the proposed transaction
to the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that
because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it
should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its
determination to the shareholders with the submission of the proposed
transaction; and
(b) The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the transaction.
(3) The board of directors may condition its submission of the
proposed transaction on any basis, including the affirmative vote of
holders of a specified percentage of shares held by any group of
shareholders not otherwise entitled under this title or the articles of
incorporation to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed
transaction.
(4) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not
entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance
with RCW 23B.07.050. The notice must also state that the purpose, or
one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease,
exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the
property of the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a
description of the transaction.
(5) ((Unless the articles of incorporation or)) In addition to any
other voting conditions imposed by the board of directors((, acting
pursuant to)) under subsection (3) of this section, ((require a greater
vote or a vote by voting groups,)) the transaction to be authorized
must be approved by two-thirds of the voting group comprising all the
votes entitled to be cast on the transaction, and of each other voting
group entitled under the articles of incorporation to vote separately
on the transaction. The articles of incorporation may ((provide for
a)) require a greater or lesser vote than ((that)) provided ((for)) in
this subsection, or ((for)) a greater or lesser vote by any separate
voting groups provided for in the articles of incorporation, so long as
the required vote ((provided for each voting group entitled to vote
separately on the transaction)) is not less than a majority of all the
votes entitled to be cast on the transaction ((by that voting group))
and of each other voting group entitled to vote separately on the
transaction.
(6) After a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of property
is authorized, the transaction may be abandoned, subject to any
contractual rights, without further shareholder action, in a manner
determined by the board of directors.
(7) A transaction that constitutes a distribution is governed by
RCW 23B.06.400 and not by this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 23B.13.020 and 1991 c 269 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A shareholder is entitled to dissent from, and obtain payment
of the fair value of the shareholder's shares in the event of, any of
the following corporate actions:
(a) Consummation of a plan of merger to which the corporation is a
party (i) if shareholder approval is required for the merger by RCW
23B.11.030, 23B.11.080, or the articles of incorporation, and the
shareholder is entitled to vote on the merger, or (ii) if the
corporation is a subsidiary that is merged with its parent under RCW
23B.11.040;
(b) Consummation of a plan of share exchange to which the
corporation is a party as the corporation whose shares will be
acquired, if the shareholder is entitled to vote on the plan;
(c) Consummation of a sale or exchange of all, or substantially
all, of the property of the corporation other than in the usual and
regular course of business, if the shareholder is entitled to vote on
the sale or exchange, including a sale in dissolution, but not
including a sale pursuant to court order or a sale for cash pursuant to
a plan by which all or substantially all of the net proceeds of the
sale will be distributed to the shareholders within one year after the
date of sale;
(d) An amendment of the articles of incorporation ((that materially
reduces the number of shares owned by the shareholder to a fraction of
a share if the fractional share so created is to be acquired for cash
under RCW 23B.06.040)), whether or not the shareholder was entitled to
vote on the amendment, if the amendment effects a redemption or
cancellation of all of the shareholder's shares in exchange for cash or
other consideration other than shares of the corporation; or
(e) Any corporate action taken pursuant to a shareholder vote to
the extent the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of
the board of directors provides that voting or nonvoting shareholders
are entitled to dissent and obtain payment for their shares.
(2) A shareholder entitled to dissent and obtain payment for the
shareholder's shares under this chapter may not challenge the corporate
action creating the shareholder's entitlement unless the action fails
to comply with the procedural requirements imposed by this title, RCW
25.10.900 through 25.10.955, the articles of incorporation, or the
bylaws, or is fraudulent with respect to the shareholder or the
corporation.
(3) The right of a dissenting shareholder to obtain payment of the
fair value of the shareholder's shares shall terminate upon the
occurrence of any one of the following events:
(a) The proposed corporate action is abandoned or rescinded;
(b) A court having jurisdiction permanently enjoins or sets aside
the corporate action; or
(c) The shareholder's demand for payment is withdrawn with the
written consent of the corporation.

Sec. 10 RCW 23B.14.020 and 1989 c 165 s 155 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A corporation's board of directors may propose dissolution for
submission to the shareholders.
(2) For a proposal to dissolve to be adopted:
(a) The board of directors must recommend dissolution to the
shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of
conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no
recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the
shareholders; and
(b) The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the proposal to
dissolve as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(3) The board of directors may condition its submission of the
proposal for dissolution on any basis, including the affirmative vote
of holders of a specified percentage of shares held by any group of
shareholders not otherwise entitled under this title or the articles of
incorporation to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed
dissolution.
(4) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not
entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance
with RCW 23B.07.050. The notice must also state that the purpose, or
one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving the
corporation.
(5) ((Unless the articles of incorporation or)) In addition to any
other voting conditions imposed by the board of directors((, acting
pursuant to)) under subsection (3) of this section, ((require a greater
vote or a vote by voting groups,)) the proposal to dissolve must be
approved by two-thirds of the voting group comprising all the votes
entitled to be cast on ((that)) the proposal ((in order to be
adopted)), and of each other voting group entitled under the articles
of incorporation to vote separately on the proposal. The articles of
incorporation may ((provide for a)) require a greater or lesser vote
than ((that)) provided ((for)) in this subsection, or ((for)) a greater
or lesser vote by any separate voting groups provided for in the
articles of incorporation, so long as the required vote ((provided for
each voting group entitled to vote separately on the proposal to
dissolve)) is not less than a majority of all the votes entitled to be
cast on the proposal ((by that voting group)) and of each other voting
group entitled to vote separately on the proposal.

--- END ---