BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the trust water
rights program is an important tool in meeting the state's current and
future needs for water, both instream and out-of-stream. However, the
legislature finds that the existing procedures for establishing trust
water rights are unnecessarily complex, and are difficult to explain
and administer. Further, the legislature finds that groups currently
developing local watershed plans and regional water management programs
are seeking an effective means to facilitate multiple, voluntary
transfers of existing water rights to address presently unmet needs and
future needs.
It is the intent of this act to enhance the effectiveness of the
trust water rights program by improving existing incentives, removing
disincentives, and clarifying and consolidating procedures for
establishing trust water rights.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.42.005 and 1991 c 347 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to recognize and
preserve water rights in accordance with RCW 90.03.010 and the
beneficial uses of water described in RCW 90.54.020(1).
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) The state of Washington is faced with a shortage of water with
which to meet existing and future needs, particularly during the summer
and fall months and in dry years when the demand is greatest;
(b) Consistent with RCW 90.54.180, conservation and water use
efficiency programs, ((including)) storage, and water right transfers
should be the preferred methods ((of addressing water uses because they
can relieve)) to address current critical water situations, provide for
presently unmet needs, and assist in meeting future water needs.
Presently unmet needs or current needs includes the water required to
increase the frequency of occurrence of base or minimum flow levels in
streams of the state, the water necessary to satisfy existing water
rights, or the water necessary to provide full supplies to existing
water systems with current supply deficiencies, or as otherwise needed
to meet the needs of growing communities for adequate and reliable
water supplies, and to provide the water necessary to satisfy existing
water rights for other beneficial uses listed in RCW 90.54.020(1);
((and))
(c) The interests of the state will be served by developing
programs and regional water resource plans, in cooperation with local
governments, federally recognized tribal governments, appropriate
federal agencies, private citizens, and the various water users and
water interests in the state, that increase the overall ability to
manage the state's waters in order to resolve conflicts and to better
satisfy both present and future needs for water, both instream and
out-of-stream;
(d) A state trust water rights program is an effective means to
facilitate the voluntary transfer of water and water rights,
established through conservation, purchase, lease, or donation, to
secure and preserve water rights and provide water for presently unmet
needs and emerging needs; and
(e) The trust water rights program improves the ability of the
state to work with the United States and the various water users in the
ongoing program to satisfy both existing rights and other presently
unmet as well as future needs of the Yakima basin, through improvements
to the existing federal water project in the Yakima river basin,
authorized under P.L. 96-162.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.42.020 and 1991 c 347 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Impairment" means detriment or injury to existing rights as
that phrase is used in RCW 90.03.380(1).
(3) "Net water savings" means the amount of water that is
determined to be conserved and usable within or from a specified
((stream reach or reaches)) surface or ground water body for other
purposes without impairment ((or detriment)) to water rights existing
at the time that a water conservation project is ((undertaken, reducing
the ability to deliver water, or reducing the supply of water that
otherwise would have been available to other existing water uses))
funded.
(((3))) (4) "Trust water right" means any existing water right
((acquired)) transferred to or managed by the state under this chapter
((for management in)) and the state's trust water rights program.
(((4) "Pilot planning areas" means the geographic areas designated
under RCW 90.54.045(2).
(5) "Water conservation project" means any project or program that
achieves physical or operational improvements that provide for
increased water use efficiency in existing systems of diversion,
conveyance, application, or use of water under water rights existing on
July 28, 1991.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All trust water established by the state must be placed in the
state trust water rights program to be held in trust by the department.
Trust water rights established by the state must be held or authorized
for use by the department for any beneficial use described in RCW
90.54.020(1). Trust water rights may also be established for the
protection of water rights secured for mitigation purposes and for
preservation of water rights for future needs.
(2) Trust water rights may only be established from existing water
rights, including rights to divert or withdraw water under existing
certificates, claims, and permits, and rights to storage and use of
stored water from existing reservoir and secondary use rights, or other
appropriate means other than by condemnation.
(3) Trust water rights must be administered by the department.
Each trust water right must be administered in strict accordance with
the terms under which the trust water right was established, including
any agreement between the parties executed at the time the trust water
right was established, or as subsequently modified by mutual agreement
of the parties. For example, a trust water right established by the
state expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream flows must be
managed as a trust water right in compliance with that condition.
(4) To the extent practicable and subject to legislative
appropriation, trust water rights established in a watershed with an
approved watershed plan developed under chapter 90.82 RCW must be used
in a manner consistent with that plan.
(5) The department may make arrangements, including entry into
contracts with other persons or entities as appropriate, to ensure that
trust water rights established in accordance with this chapter can be
exercised to the fullest possible extent consistent with applicable
state laws.
(6) The department shall cooperate fully with the United States in
the implementation of this chapter. Trust water rights may be
established through expenditure of funds provided by the United States
and must be treated in the same manner as trust water rights
established as a result of the expenditure of state funds.
(7) All trust water rights must be managed to ensure that
attributes of each water right, such as its priority date, status as a
certificate, permit, or claim, names or numbers used to identify the
water right, and previously authorized uses remain distinct for each
water right established as a trust water right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A trust water right may be established on a temporary or
permanent basis. To establish a permanent trust water right, the water
right must be conveyed to the state of Washington. A water right
transferred to the trust water program on a temporary basis may not be
conveyed to the state of Washington and remains the property of the
water right holder while managed by the department in the trust water
program consistent with the terms of any agreement between the water
right holder and the department.
(2) All or a portion of a water right perfected through actual
beneficial use or an unperfected water right in good standing can be
established as a trust water right. Once established by the state,
such a right is a trust water right.
(3) The department shall develop forms for use in the establishment
of trust water rights to gather information pertaining to the water
right including, but not limited to, the existing purpose, place of
use, and point of diversion or withdrawal of the right, extent of water
use under the right, and the use or uses proposed for the right as a
trust water right.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.380(4) and 90.44.100(5), the
provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100 apply to trust water right
transfers under this chapter.
(5) Acceptance of an existing right as a temporary trust water
right under this chapter does not constitute a determination of the
validity and extent of an existing water right.
(6) If the holder of a right to water from a body of water chooses
to donate all or a portion of the person's water right to the trust
water program to assist in providing instream flows on a temporary or
permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation on such terms
as the person may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the
applicable requirements of this chapter, and the terms prescribed are
relevant and material to protecting any interest in the water right
retained by the donor. Once accepted, such rights are trust water
rights within the conditions prescribed by the donor.
(7) The department shall establish expedited notice provisions to
provide notice and opportunity for comment on proposals to establish
trust water rights during a formally declared drought.
(8)(a) The quantity of water that may be approved for transfer to
the trust water program represents the extent to which water use under
the original right is reduced or foregone under the trust transfer,
resulting in a net benefit to the water body as a result of
establishing the trust water right, and resulting from:
(i) Reduced diversion or withdrawal of water under the original
right as a result of a water conservation project;
(ii) A reduction in the number of acres irrigated under the right,
or a long-term change in the type of crop grown that will require less
water;
(iii) A reduction in the period of use of the right, on a seasonal
basis, during periods of low stream flows, or according to conditions
prescribed for the trust water right;
(iv) The elimination of water use under the original right;
(v) A downstream change in point of diversion of a water right that
results in increased flows in the reach of the stream affected by the
change;
(vi) The temporary or permanent use of different source of supply
to meet all or a portion of the water needs under the original right;
or
(vii) Other appropriate changes in activities under the original
right, as agreed to between the water right holder and the department.
(b) Where the state establishes a trust water right from a portion
of an existing water right, only the portion of the right to be placed
in the trust water rights program is subject to the provisions of this
chapter. In the case of a trust transfer, the quantity of the trust
water right and the water right remaining with the water right holder
is reflected in the superseding document issued to the water right
holder by the department, and the superseding document issued by the
department must be conditioned to ensure that the reduced water use is
achieved.
(9) Where the department provides funding for a water conservation
project as a means of establishing a trust water right, a trust water
right must be established for the period of time during which the
conservation project will result in establishment of a trust water
right. For example, a conservation project with a functional life of
fifteen years would result in a trust transfer of fifteen years.
Before the expenditure of state funds for a water conservation project,
the state and the water right holder shall agree on the terms and
duration of the trust water transfer as a result of a conservation
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
temporary trust water right is established after the following actions
occur:
(a) The water right holder provides written notice to the
department of their intention to establish a temporary trust water
right;
(b) The water right holder publishes a legal notice prescribed by
the department describing the temporary trust transfer and other
details deemed necessary by the department. The legal notice must
state that a water right holder wishing to assert a claim of impairment
of their water right may do so by filing the claim with the department,
and shall specify the deadline for doing so. The legal notice must be
published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the area in which the temporary trust water
right would be established; and
(c) Within thirty days of the last date of publication of the legal
notice, no claims of impairment are filed with the department relating
to the proposed temporary trust water right. If any claims of
impairment are filed with the department, the department shall make a
determination regarding the impairment claim or claims and shall issue
its determination in writing, stating either that it finds that there
will be impairment (a "finding of impairment") or that it finds there
will not be impairment (a "finding of no impairment"). The
department's written determination may be appealed to the pollution
control hearings board as provided in chapter 43.21B RCW or other
applicable law.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, a temporary trust water right may be established by a superior
court conducting a water rights adjudication under chapter 90.03 RCW.
(3) Upon the expiration of the period of time for which a temporary
trust water right is established, the full perfected and unperfected
quantities of water established as a temporary trust water right revert
to the water right holder, with the priority date of the original water
right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) After notice and consideration of comments received, the
department shall issue a final decision regarding the establishment of
a permanent trust water right.
(b) The department shall provide copies of its final decision to
the applicant and to any person or entity who provided comments on the
proposed permanent trust water right transfer. The department's final
decision on establishment of a permanent trust water right is
appealable to the pollution control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230
or other applicable law.
(2) The department shall issue a certificate of change or transfer
as required under RCW 90.03.380(1) for any water right established as
a permanent trust water right and order approving a trust water right
transfer. Certificates of change or transfer issued under RCW
90.03.380 must be filed and made a record with the department of
ecology, and a duplicate certificate must be issued to the applicant,
which may be filed with the appropriate county auditor in like manner
and with the same effect as provided in the original authorization to
divert water.
(3) The department may require a final investigation prior to
issuing a superseding certificate for water rights for which the
department has issued a certificate of change or transfer under this
section and under RCW 90.03.380(1), and shall issue a superseding
certificate for such water right only when and to the extent water has
been applied to actual beneficial use as described in the certificate
of change or transfer issued under RCW 90.03.380(1).
(4) Where only a portion of an existing right is established as a
permanent trust water right, the department shall issue a superseding
certificate or permit to the original water right holder or, with
respect to water claims, issue a superseding certificate or permit only
for the perfected portion of a claim as demonstrated through actual
beneficial use of water. The superseding document must indicate the
quantity of water remaining with the original right holder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
No state funds may be expended to establish trust water rights by
the state under this chapter unless specifically appropriated for this
purpose by the legislature. Prior to expending state or federal funds
for a trust water right, the department shall exercise appropriate due
diligence, as practiced by other water right purchasers, to ensure the
validity of the water right or portion thereof for which the funds will
be expended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
A water right conveyed to the trust water right program as a
donation that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream
purposes must be managed by the department for public purposes to
ensure that it qualifies as a donation that is deductible for federal
income taxation purposes for the person or entity conveying the water
right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
The water right relinquishment provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.230 do not apply to trust water rights as of the date the trust
water right is established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter authorizes the impairment of, or operates
to impair, any existing water rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When water is proposed to be provided to the department as a
trust water right by an irrigation district, evidence of the district's
authority to represent the water right holders must be submitted to,
and for the satisfaction of, the department.
(2) The department may not establish a trust water right from an
individual's water right under this chapter that is appurtenant to land
lying within an irrigation district without the approval of the board
of directors of the irrigation district.

Sec. 13 RCW 90.03.380 and 2001 c 237 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows,
averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point
of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any
person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as
provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such transfer or
such change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights,
the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate
granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be
made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued
to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner
and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or
permit to divert water.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) The requirements of this section ((shall)) do not apply to
trust water rights ((acquired by the state through the funding of water
conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through
90.42.070)) established on a temporary basis under chapter 90.42 RCW
unless such rights are transferred to another person.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

Sec. 14 RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c 316 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
ground water right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
ground waters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public ground water as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public ground water as the original
well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5) The requirements of this section do not apply to trust water
rights established on a temporary basis under chapter 90.42 RCW unless
such rights are transferred to another person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 90.38.005 (Findings -- Purpose) and 1989 c 429 s 1;
(2) RCW 90.38.010 (Definitions) and 1989 c 429 s 2;
(3) RCW 90.38.020 (Acquisition or donation of trust water rights)
and 2002 c 329 s 7, 2001 c 237 s 28, & 1989 c 429 s 3;
(4) RCW 90.38.030 (Water conservation projects -- Contracts for
financial assistance) and 1989 c 429 s 4;
(5) RCW 90.38.040 (Trust water rights program) and 2001 c 237 s 29,
1994 c 264 s 90, & 1989 c 429 s 5;
(6) RCW 90.38.050 (Rules) and 1989 c 429 s 6;
(7) RCW 90.38.900 (Existing policies not replaced) and 1989 c 429
s 7;
(8) RCW 90.38.901 (Transfer of rights between irrigation districts
not intended) and 1989 c 429 s 8;
(9) RCW 90.38.902 (Existing rights not impaired) and 1989 c 429 s
9;
(10) RCW 90.42.010 (Findings -- Intent) and 1998 c 245 s 173;
(11) RCW 90.42.030 (Contracts to finance water conservation
projects -- Public benefits -- Trust water rights) and 1993 c 98 s 2 & 1991
c 347 s 7;
(12) RCW 90.42.040 (Trust water rights program -- Water right
certificate -- Notice of creation or modification) and 2002 c 329 s 8,
2001 c 237 s 30, 1993 c 98 s 3, & 1991 c 347 s 8;
(13) RCW 90.42.050 (Guidelines governing trust water rights--Submission of guidelines to joint select committee) and 1991 c 347 s 9;
(14) RCW 90.42.070 (Involuntary impairment of existing water rights
not authorized) and 1991 c 347 s 11; and
(15) RCW 90.42.080 (Trust water rights -- Acquisition, donation,
exercise, and transfer -- Appropriation required for expenditure of
funds) and 2002 c 329 s 9, 2001 c 237 s 31, 1993 c 98 s 4, & 1991 c 347
s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---