BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.300 and 1997 c 429 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a final order that shall be based
exclusively on whether or not a state agency, county, or city is in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs, or
chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development
regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the final
order shall be issued within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the
petition for review, or, if multiple petitions are filed, within one
hundred eighty days of receipt of the last petition that is
consolidated.
(b) The board may extend the period of time for issuing a decision
to enable the parties to settle the dispute if additional time is
necessary to achieve a settlement, and (i) an extension is requested by
all parties, or (ii) an extension is requested by the petitioner and
respondent and the board determines that a negotiated settlement
between the remaining parties could resolve significant issues in
dispute. The request must be filed with the board not later than seven
days before the date scheduled for the hearing on the merits of the
petition. The board may authorize one or more extensions for up to
ninety days each, subject to the requirements of this section.
(3) In the final order, the board shall either:
(a) Find that the state agency, county, or city is in compliance
with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates
to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter
43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development regulations,
and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or
(b) Find that the state agency, county, or city is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs,
or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development
regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW, in which case the board shall remand the matter to the
affected state agency, county, or city. The board shall specify a
reasonable time not in excess of one hundred eighty days, or such
longer period as determined by the board in cases of unusual scope or
complexity, within which the state agency, county, or city shall comply
with the requirements of this chapter. The board may require periodic
reports to the board on the progress the jurisdiction is making towards
compliance.
(4) Unless the board makes a determination of invalidity as
provided in RCW 36.70A.302, a finding of noncompliance and an order of
remand shall not affect the validity of comprehensive plans and
development regulations during the period of remand.
(5) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the hearings board
may appeal the decision to superior court as provided in RCW 34.05.514
or 36.01.050 within thirty days of the final order of the board.
Judicial review of any decision of the hearings board shall be de novo.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21B.170 and 1995 c 382 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
All proceedings before the hearings board or any of its members
shall be conducted in accordance with such rules of practice and
procedure as the hearings board may prescribe. The rules must include
the following provisions: (1) The department must furnish the hearings
board and the party appealing the department's decision a copy of all
evidence relied upon by the department in making its decision. The
party appealing the department's decision must be provided this
information at least one day prior to the hearing before the hearings
board; (2) the department may only submit evidence to the hearings
board which supports the findings set forth in the department's
decision being appealed; and (3) if the department relied upon the
observations of individuals in making its decision, those individuals
must be identified and made available for examination and cross-examination before the hearings board. The department has the burden
of proof in all proceedings before the hearings board that its decision
is justified, including the burden of moving forward with the evidence.
The hearings board shall publish such rules and arrange for the
reasonable distribution thereof.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.21B.180 and 1994 c 253 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Judicial review of a decision of the hearings board may be obtained
only pursuant to RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, except that judicial
review of a decision of the hearings board in superior court shall be
de novo with the burden of proof placed on the department. The
director shall have the same right of review from a decision made
pursuant to RCW 43.21B.110 as does any person.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.55.180 and 1995 c 382 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all appeals, the hydraulic appeals board shall have all
powers relating to administration of oaths, issuance of subpoenas, and
taking of depositions, but such powers shall be exercised in conformity
with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) In all appeals, the hydraulic appeals board, and each member
thereof, shall be subject to all duties imposed upon and shall have all
powers granted to, an agency by those provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW
relating to adjudicative proceedings.
(3) All proceedings before the hydraulic appeals board or any of
its members shall be conducted in accordance with such rules of
practice and procedure as the board may prescribe. Such rules shall be
published and distributed.
(4) Judicial review of a decision of the hydraulic appeals board
may be obtained only pursuant to RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(5) Judicial review of a decision of the hydraulic appeals board
shall be de novo with the burden of proof placed upon the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.09.230 and 1994 c 253 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all appeals over which the appeals board has jurisdiction,
upon request of one or more parties and with the consent of all
parties, the appeals board shall promptly schedule a conference for the
purpose of attempting to mediate the case. The mediation conference
shall be held prior to the hearing on not less than seven days' advance
written notice to all parties. All other proceedings pertaining to the
appeal shall be stayed until completion of mediation, which shall
continue so long as all parties consent: PROVIDED, That this shall not
prevent the appeals board from deciding motions filed by the parties
while mediation is ongoing: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That discovery may be
conducted while mediation is ongoing if agreed to by all parties.
Mediation shall be conducted by an administrative appeals judge or
other duly authorized agent of the appeals board who has received
training in dispute resolution techniques or has a demonstrated history
of successfully resolving disputes, as determined by the appeals board.
A person who mediates in a particular appeal shall not participate in
a hearing on that appeal or in writing the decision and order in the
appeal. Documentary and other physical evidence presented and evidence
of conduct or statements made during the course of mediation shall be
treated by the mediator and the parties in a confidential manner and
shall not be admissible in subsequent proceedings in the appeal except
in accordance with the provisions of the Washington rules of evidence
pertaining to compromise negotiations.
(2) In all appeals the appeals board shall have all powers relating
to administration of oaths, issuance of subpoenas, and taking of
depositions, but such powers shall be exercised in conformity with
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) In all appeals the appeals board, and each member thereof,
shall be subject to all duties imposed upon and shall have all powers
granted to, an agency by those provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW relating
to adjudicative proceedings.
(4) All proceedings before the appeals board or any of its members
shall be conducted in accordance with such rules of practice and
procedure as the board may prescribe. The appeals board shall publish
such rules and arrange for the reasonable distribution thereof.
(5) Judicial review of a decision of the appeals board may be
obtained only pursuant to RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, except that
judicial review of a decision of the appeals board shall be de novo
with the burden of proof placed upon the department.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.58.180 and 1997 c 199 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person aggrieved by the granting, denying, or rescinding of
a permit on shorelines of the state pursuant to RCW 90.58.140 may seek
review from the shorelines hearings board by filing a petition for
review within twenty-one days of the date of filing as defined in RCW
90.58.140(6).
Within seven days of the filing of any petition for review with the
board as provided in this section pertaining to a final decision of a
local government, the petitioner shall serve copies of the petition on
the department, the office of the attorney general, and the local
government. The department and the attorney general may intervene to
protect the public interest and ((insure)) ensure that the provisions
of this chapter are complied with at any time within fifteen days from
the date of the receipt by the department or the attorney general of a
copy of the petition for review filed pursuant to this section. ((The
shorelines hearings board shall schedule review proceedings on the
petition for review without regard as to whether the period for the
department or the attorney general to intervene has or has not
expired.))
(2) The department or the attorney general may obtain review of any
final decision granting a permit, or granting or denying an application
for a permit issued by a local government by filing a written petition
with the shorelines hearings board and the appropriate local government
within twenty-one days from the date the final decision was filed as
provided in RCW 90.58.140(6).
(3) The review proceedings authorized in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section are subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW
pertaining to procedures in adjudicative proceedings. Judicial review
of such proceedings of the shorelines hearings board is governed by
chapter 34.05 RCW, except that judicial review of a decision by the
board shall be de novo with the burden of proof on the department. The
board shall issue its decision on the appeal authorized under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section within one hundred eighty days
after the date the petition is filed with the board or a petition to
intervene is filed by the department or the attorney general, whichever
is later. The time period may be extended by the board for a period of
thirty days upon a showing of good cause or may be waived by the
parties.
(4) Any person may appeal any rules, regulations, or guidelines
adopted or approved by the department within thirty days of the date of
the adoption or approval. The board shall make a final decision within
sixty days following the hearing held thereon.
(5) The board shall find the rule, regulation, or guideline to be
valid and enter a final decision to that effect unless it determines
that the rule, regulation, or guideline:
(a) Is clearly erroneous in light of the policy of this chapter; or
(b) Constitutes an implementation of this chapter in violation of
constitutional or statutory provisions; or
(c) Is arbitrary and capricious; or
(d) Was developed without fully considering and evaluating all
material submitted to the department during public review and comment;
or
(e) Was not adopted in accordance with required procedures.
(6) If the board makes a determination under subsection (5)(a)
through (e) of this section, it shall enter a final decision declaring
the rule, regulation, or guideline invalid, remanding the rule,
regulation, or guideline to the department with a statement of the
reasons in support of the determination, and directing the department
to adopt, after a thorough consultation with the affected local
government and any other interested party, a new rule, regulation, or
guideline consistent with the board's decision.
(7) A decision of the board on the validity of a rule, regulation,
or guideline shall be subject to review in superior court, if
authorized pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. A petition for review of the
decision of the shorelines hearings board on a rule, regulation, or
guideline shall be filed within thirty days after the date of final
decision by the shorelines hearings board.

--- END ---