BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.170 and 1985 c 341 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The study of the Constitution of the United States and the
Constitution of the state of Washington shall be a condition
prerequisite to graduation from the public and private high schools of
this state. The state board of education acting upon the advice of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide by rule ((or
regulation)) for the implementation of this section.
Students in kindergarten through grade twelve shall receive at
least one school day per year of instruction in the United States
Constitution and the Declaration of Independence.

--- END ---