BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 77.15.192 (Definitions) and 2001 c 1 s 2;
(2) RCW 77.15.194 (Unlawful traps) and 2001 c 1 s 3;
(3) RCW 77.15.196 (Unlawful poison) and 2001 c 1 s 4;
(4) RCW 77.15.198 (Violation of RCW 77.15.194 or 77.15.196--Penalty) and 2001 c 1 s 5;
(5) 2001 c 1 s 1 (uncodified); and
(6) 2001 c 1 s 6 (uncodified).

--- END ---