BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state parks and
state recreation areas are a valuable asset of the state of Washington,
contributing to the health and well-being of the people of the state,
and contributing to the economies of surrounding communities.
Increasing use of state parks and other recreation areas coupled with
limited resources is creating a crisis for the parks and recreation
system. Maintenance of state facilities is being deferred, and
selected parks are being closed.
The legislature further finds that sponsorship of selected parks or
other natural resource facilities by a private entity could decrease
costs and contribute to the improvement of services and facilities.
Therefore, the legislature encourages state agencies that manage
recreation lands and natural resource facilities to enter into
agreements with private entities as appropriate to improve the
operation of our parks, recreation areas, or other natural resource
facilities. Further, the legislature strongly encourages the state
natural resource agencies to use all available means to avoid closure
of state-owned or leased parks and facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.030 and 1999 c 249 s 302, 1999 c 155 s 1, and
1999 c 59 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks
and parkways acquired or set aside by the state for park or parkway
purposes.
(2) Adopt policies, and adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining
to the use, care, and administration of state parks and parkways. The
commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted in a
conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but
failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any
prosecution for the violation thereof.
(3) Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under
such rules as shall be adopted.
(4) Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify
parks and parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and
comfort stations and build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways
through or on parks and parkways.
(5) Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways, upon
such rentals, fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such
terms, in no event longer than fifty years, and upon such conditions as
shall be approved by the commission: PROVIDED, That leases exceeding
a twenty-year term shall require a unanimous vote of the commission:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if, during the term of any concession or lease,
it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best
interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the
concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of
such concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station
leases shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085, only:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the rates of such concessions or leases shall be
renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession shall be granted
which will prevent the public from having free access to the scenic
attractions of any park or parkway.
(6) Contract with private sponsors for individual parks when the
commission determines that sponsorship would decrease costs, improve
service, avoid park closures, or otherwise be in the best interest of
the park system. Sponsors may provide support to existing commission
employees for park management, including routine building and grounds
maintenance, security, parks operations, park renovations, or
development of new facilities. Sponsorship should augment but not
replace the functions of current commission employees. The commission
shall recognize the efforts of any participating sponsor by erecting
and maintaining signs with the sponsor's name at the park entry,
information kiosk, or other appropriate location.
(7) Employ such assistance as it deems necessary. Commission
expenses relating to its use of volunteer assistance shall be limited
to premiums or assessments for the insurance of volunteers by the
department of labor and industries, compensation of staff who assist
volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized volunteer
projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to
volunteer recognition. The commission, at its discretion, may waive
commission fees otherwise applicable to volunteers. The commission
shall not use volunteers to replace or supplant classified positions.
The use of volunteers may not lead to the elimination of any employees
or permanent positions in the bargaining unit.
(((7))) (8) By majority vote of its authorized membership select
and purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for
and in the name of the state such tracts of land, including shore and
tide lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper. If the
commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it
may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title
thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by
the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights of way
for state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this
subsection shall be valid only if:
(a) The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar;
and
(b) Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from
(i) funds appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for
undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission
to be in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which they
were appropriated; and
(c) The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of
the option does not exceed the appraised value of the property.
(8) Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this
state, in any matter pertaining to the acquisition, development,
redevelopment, renovation, care, control, or supervision of any park or
parkway, and enter into contracts in writing to that end. All parks or
parkways, to which the state contributed or in whose care, control, or
supervision the state participated pursuant to the provisions of this
section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.04.055 and 2000 c 107 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In establishing policies to preserve, protect, and perpetuate
wildlife, fish, and wildlife and fish habitat, the commission shall
meet annually with the governor to:
(a) Review and prescribe basic goals and objectives related to
those policies; and
(b) Review the performance of the department in implementing fish
and wildlife policies.
The commission shall maximize fishing, hunting, and outdoor
recreational opportunities compatible with healthy and diverse fish and
wildlife populations.
(2) The commission shall establish hunting, trapping, and fishing
seasons and prescribe the time, place, manner, and methods that may be
used to harvest or enjoy game fish and wildlife.
(3) The commission shall establish provisions regulating food fish
and shellfish as provided in RCW 77.12.047.
(4) The commission shall have final approval authority for tribal,
interstate, international, and any other department agreements relating
to fish and wildlife.
(5) The commission shall adopt rules to implement the state's fish
and wildlife laws.
(6) The commission shall have final approval authority for the
department's budget proposals.
(7) The commission shall select its own staff and shall appoint the
director of the department. The director and commission staff shall
serve at the pleasure of the commission.
(8) The commission may contract with private sponsors for any
commission access site or facility, including hatcheries, when the
commission finds that sponsorship would decrease costs, improve
service, avoid site or facility closure, or otherwise be in the best
interest of the state. Sponsors may assume responsibility for any
aspect of fish and wildlife facility management, including routine
building and grounds maintenance, security, operations, renovations, or
development of new facilities. Sponsorship should augment but not
replace the functions of current employees. The commission shall
recognize the efforts of any participating sponsor by erecting and
maintaining signs with the sponsor's name at the facility entry,
information kiosk, or other appropriate location.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may contract with private sponsors for any
recreation site managed by the department when the department
determines that sponsorship would decrease costs, improve service,
avoid recreation site closure, or otherwise be in the best interest of
the state. Sponsors may assume responsibility for any aspect of
recreation site management, including routine building and grounds
maintenance, security, operations, renovations, or development of new
facilities. Sponsorship should augment but not replace the functions
of current employees. The department shall recognize the efforts of
any participating sponsor by erecting and maintaining signs with the
sponsor's name at the recreation site entry, information kiosk, or
other appropriate location.

--- END ---