BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some library
patrons are using computers to access material depicting minors engaged
in sexually explicit conduct. The state has a compelling interest in
curbing this type of material and has no other reasonable means of
obtaining the identity of these library patrons other than to obtain
access to the computers and library records indicating who used the
library computers when the web sites or files were accessed. The
legislature further finds that this access can be facilitated without
violating the constitutional guarantees of privacy.
Therefore, the legislature finds that, with prior judicial
approval, records containing the identities of patrons using public
library computers to access material depicting minors engaged in
sexually explicit conduct must be available to adequately enforce laws
preventing the sexual exploitation of children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.73 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An ex parte order authorizing the seizure of library computers
used to access web sites or files depicting minors engaged in sexually
explicit conduct and other library records containing the identity of
library patrons who had access to library computers that were used to
access these web sites or files may be issued by any superior court
judge in the state upon a verified application of either the state
attorney general or any county prosecuting attorney setting forth fully
facts and circumstances upon which the application is based and stating
that:
(a) There are reasonable grounds to believe that the library
computers were used to access computer web sites or files containing
depictions of minors engaged in sexually explicit conduct as defined in
chapter 9.68A RCW; and
(b) There are no other means readily available for obtaining the
identity of library patrons who used the library computers that were
used to access the web sites or files.
(2) Where statements are solely upon the information and belief of
the applicant, the grounds for the belief must be given.
(3) The application and any order issued under this section shall
identify as fully as possible the particular equipment, files, or
records from which the information is to be obtained.
(4) The court may examine upon oath or affirmation the applicant
and any witness the applicant desires to produce or the court requires
to be produced.
(5) Order issued under this section are effective for fifteen days,
after which period the court which issued the order may upon
application of the officer who secured the original order renew or
continue the order for an additional period not to exceed fifteen days.
(6) Libraries providing computer access to patrons shall notify all
users of the provision of this section.

--- END ---