BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Internet-access terminals located in the children's area of a
library shall be provided with filtering software that blocks, to the
extent technically possible, access to potentially offensive material
including adult-oriented, sexually explicit internet sites. In
libraries where there is no internet-access terminal in the children's
area, a terminal located near the children's area shall be provided
with the filtering software. Library staff shall not monitor the use
of internet-access terminals in any way other than as directed by
library policy or state law.
Internet access provided by a library to minors shall be filtered
by filtering software as required by this section unless a parent or
guardian notifies the library staff that the parent or guardian selects
unfiltered access as an alternative choice for his or her minor child.
Any adult user may select filtered access.

--- END ---