BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.80.805 and 2002 c 130 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that certain tuition policies in Oregon
state are more responsive to the needs of students living in economic
regions that cross the state border than the Washington state policies.
Under Oregon policy, students who are Washington residents may enroll
at Portland State University for eight credits or less and pay the same
tuition as Oregon residents. Further, the state of Oregon passed
legislation in 1997 to begin providing to its community colleges the
same level of state funding for students residing in bordering states
as students residing in Oregon.
(2) The legislature intends to build on the recent Oregon
initiatives regarding tuition policy for students in bordering states
and to facilitate regional planning for higher education delivery by
creating a ((pilot)) project on resident tuition rates in Washington
counties that border Oregon state.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.80.806 and 2002 c 130 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The border county higher education opportunity ((pilot))
project is created. The purpose of the ((pilot)) project is to allow
Washington institutions of higher education that are located in
counties on the Oregon border to implement tuition policies that
correspond to Oregon policies. Under the border county ((pilot))
project, Columbia Basin Community College, Clark College, Lower
Columbia Community College, Grays Harbor Community College, and Walla
Walla Community College may enroll students who reside in the bordering
Oregon counties of Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop,
Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco, and
Washington at resident tuition rates. The Tri-Cities and Vancouver
branches of Washington State University may enroll students who reside
in the bordering Oregon counties of Columbia, Multnomah, Clatsop,
Clackamas, Morrow, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, and Washington for eight
credits or less at resident tuition rates.
(2) Washington institutions of higher education participating in
the ((pilot)) project shall give priority program enrollment to
Washington residents.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.80.807 and 2002 c 130 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The higher education coordinating board shall administer
Washington's participation in the border county higher education
opportunity ((pilot)) project.
(((2) By December 1, 2003, the board shall report to the governor
and appropriate committees of the legislature on the results of the
pilot project. For each participating Washington institution of higher
education, the report shall analyze, by program, the impact of the
pilot project on: Enrollment levels, distribution of students by
residency, and enrollment capacity. The report shall also include a
recommendation on the extent to which border county tuition policies
should be revised or expanded.))

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.15.0139 and 2002 c 130 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of determining resident tuition rates, "resident
student" includes a resident of Oregon, residing in Columbia, Gilliam,
Hood River, Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla,
Union, Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington county, who meets the following
conditions:
(1) The student is eligible to pay resident tuition rates under
Oregon laws and has been domiciled in Columbia, Gilliam, Hood River,
Multnomah, Clatsop, Clackamas, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union,
Wallowa, Wasco, or Washington county for at least ((one year)) ninety
days immediately before enrollment at a community college located in
Asotin, Benton, Clark, Columbia, Cowlitz, Franklin, Garfield,
Klickitat, Pacific, Skamania, Wahkiakum, or Walla Walla county,
Washington; or
(2) The student is enrolled in courses located at the Tri-Cities or
Vancouver branch of Washington State University for eight credits or
less.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) 2002 c 130 s 7 (uncodified);
(2) 2002 c 130 s 6 & 1999 c 320 s 6 (uncodified); and
(3) 2002 c 130 s 5 & 2000 c 160 s 4 (uncodified).

--- END ---