BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "cost of instruction" means
the average instructional support in state general funds and operating
fees per full-time equivalent undergraduate, at each respective
institution for the prior academic year, as disclosed by the higher
education coordinating board under RCW 28B.10.044.
(2) Credits earned through advance placement programs shall not be
applied to the total accumulated for the purposes of this section.
(3)(a) For resident undergraduate students who have accumulated
more than one hundred twenty-five percent of the number of credits
required to complete their respective baccalaureate degree at a state
university, regional university, or The Evergreen State College,
tuition fees shall equal a sum not less than the cost of instruction.
(b) For resident undergraduate students who have accumulated more
than one hundred twenty-five percent of the number of credits required
to complete their respective associate degree or certificate programs
at a state community or technical college, tuition fees shall equal a
sum not less than the cost of instruction.
(4)(a) For nonresident undergraduate students who have accumulated
more than one hundred twenty-five percent of the number of credits
required to complete their respective baccalaureate degree at a state
university, regional university, or The Evergreen State College,
tuition fees shall equal a sum not less than twice the cost of
instruction.
(b) For nonresident undergraduate students who have accumulated more
than one hundred twenty-five percent of the number of credits required
to complete their respective associate degree or certificate programs
at a state community or technical college, tuition fees shall equal a
sum not less than twice the cost of instruction.
(5) It is presumed that increased tuition fees will apply to all
students described in subsections (3) and (4) of this section unless
the student presents to his or her registrar evidence that one or more
of the following exemptions apply:
(a) The student is a dislocated worker as defined by RCW 50.04.075
or a person engaging in a job training program under the purview of the
work force training and education coordinating board;
(b) The student participates in the border county higher education
opportunity project under RCW 28B.80.806;
(c) The student is a certificated teacher of the K-12 school system
pursuing continuing education credits according to certification
requirements;
(d) The student has not been enrolled in an institution of higher
education during the preceding five years.
(6) Students who believe they are under extraordinary or unforeseen
academic or personal circumstances or were unable to complete their
baccalaureate degree program within the number of credits specified due
to institutional constraints may petition the higher education
coordinating board for a special waiver from the tuition provision of
subsections (3) and (4) of this section. The board shall create a
process through which student petitions may be fairly processed, heard,
and determined. The process shall include a one hundred dollar
administrative fee. The entire amount of the fee shall be refunded for
those students who make a successful petition.
(7) For students unable to enroll in a class required for the
student's major due to the sequencing of courses, if the student
enrolls in the class the next time it is offered, the institution must
waive the tuition and fees for that class.
(8) The general fund--state appropriation to an institution of
higher education may not be reduced by the additional amount of
operating fees revenue collected as a result of this section.

--- END ---