BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.80.390 and 2002 c 348 s 1 and 2002 c 129 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The board shall consist of ((ten)) eleven members((, one of whom
shall be a student, who are)) as follows: Nine shall be representative
of the public, including women and the racial minority community; one
shall be a student; and one shall be the superintendent of public
instruction, serving ex officio. Except for the superintendent of
public instruction, all members shall be appointed at large by the
governor and approved by the senate. Following the term of the chair
serving on June 13, 2002, the board shall select from its membership a
chair and a vice-chair who shall each serve a one-year term. The chair
and vice-chair may serve more than one term if selected to do so by the
membership.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.80.400 and 2002 c 129 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The members of the board, except the chair ((and)), the student
member, and the superintendent of public instruction, shall serve for
terms of four years, the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year
of the term except that in the case of initial members, two shall be
appointed to two-year terms, three shall be appointed to three-year
terms, and three shall be appointed to four-year terms. The student
member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the
first day of July. The term of the superintendent of public
instruction shall be concurrent with the term of office.

--- END ---