BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.090 and 1991 c 238 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
The college board shall have general supervision and control over
the state system of community and technical colleges. In addition to
the other powers and duties imposed upon the college board by this
chapter, the college board shall be charged with the following powers,
duties and responsibilities:
(1) Review the budgets prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare
a single budget for the support of the state system of community and
technical colleges and adult education, and submit this budget to the
governor as provided in RCW 43.88.090;
(2) Establish guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive
and disburse such funds for adult education and maintenance and
operation and capital support of the college districts in conformance
with the state and district budgets, and in conformance with chapter
43.88 RCW;
(3) Ensure, through the full use of its authority:
(a) That each college district shall offer thoroughly comprehensive
educational, training and service programs to meet the needs of both
the communities and students served by combining high standards of
excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and practical
courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; and
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and work force literacy programs and services. However,
technical colleges, and college districts containing only technical
colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational education,
basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and
services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding May 17,
1991;
(b) That each college district shall maintain an open-door policy,
to the end that no student will be denied admission because of the
location of the student's residence or because of the student's
educational background or ability; that, insofar as is practical in the
judgment of the college board, curriculum offerings will be provided to
meet the educational and training needs of the community generally and
the students thereof; and that all students, regardless of their
differing courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized
equally as members of the student body: PROVIDED, That the
administrative officers of a community or technical college may deny
admission to a prospective student or attendance to an enrolled student
if, in their judgment, the student would not be competent to profit
from the curriculum offerings of the college, or would, by his or her
presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere within the college
not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This subsection
(b) shall not apply to competency, conduct, or presence associated with
a disability in a person twenty-one years of age or younger attending
a technical college;
(4) Prepare a comprehensive master plan for the development of
community and technical college education and training in the state;
and assist the office of financial management in the preparation of
enrollment projections to support plans for providing adequate college
facilities in all areas of the state;
(5) Define and administer criteria and guidelines for the
establishment of new community and technical colleges or campuses
within the existing districts;
(6) Establish criteria and procedures for modifying district
boundary lines consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended and in accordance therewith make such
changes as it deems advisable;
(7) Establish minimum standards to govern the operation of the
community and technical colleges with respect to:
(a) Qualifications and credentials of instructional and key
administrative personnel, except as otherwise provided in the state
plan for vocational education((,));
(b) Internal budgeting, accounting, auditing, and financial
procedures as necessary to supplement the general requirements
prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW((,));
(c) The content of the curriculums and other educational and
training programs, and the requirement for degrees and certificates
awarded by the colleges((,));
(d) Standard admission policies, which shall include the
requirement that when a student meets the standard on the reading and
math components of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning the student shall be deemed to have met the general admissions
requirements; and
(e) Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support;
(8) Establish and administer criteria and procedures for all
capital construction including the establishment, installation, and
expansion of facilities within the various college districts;
(9) Encourage innovation in the development of new educational and
training programs and instructional methods; coordinate research
efforts to this end; and disseminate the findings thereof;
(10) Exercise any other powers, duties and responsibilities
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(11) Authorize the various community and technical colleges to
offer programs and courses in other districts when it determines that
such action is consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended;
(12) Notwithstanding any other law or statute regarding the sale of
state property, sell or exchange and convey any or all interest in any
community and technical college real and personal property, except such
property as is received by a college district in accordance with RCW
28B.50.140(8), when it determines that such property is surplus or that
such a sale or exchange is in the best interests of the community and
technical college system;
(13) In order that the treasurer for the state board for community
and technical colleges appointed in accordance with RCW 28B.50.085 may
make vendor payments, the state treasurer will honor warrants drawn by
the state board providing for an initial advance on July 1, 1982, of
the current biennium and on July 1 of each succeeding biennium from the
state general fund in an amount equal to twenty-four percent of the
average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium expenditures for
the state board for community and technical colleges as certified by
the office of financial management; and at the conclusion of such
initial month and for each succeeding month of any biennium, the state
treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and reported monthly by
the state board treasurer in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW:
PROVIDED, That the reimbursement to the state board for actual
expenditures incurred in the final month of each biennium shall be less
the initial advance made in such biennium;
(14) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (12) of this
section, may receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs and may sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the
same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to
the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income
thereof;
(15) The college board shall have the power of eminent domain;
(16) Provide general supervision over the state's technical
colleges. The president of each technical college shall report
directly to the director of the state board for community and technical
colleges, or the director's designee, until local control is assumed by
a new or existing board of trustees as appropriate, except that a
college president shall have authority over program decisions of his or
her college until the establishment of a board of trustees for that
college. The directors of the vocational-technical institutes on March
1, 1991, shall be designated as the presidents of the new technical
colleges.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.80.350 and 1993 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall coordinate educational activities among all
segments of higher education taking into account the educational
programs, facilities, and other resources of both public and
independent two and four-year colleges and universities. The four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
shall coordinate information and activities with the board. The board
shall have the following additional responsibilities:
(1) Promote interinstitutional cooperation;
(2) Establish minimum admission standards for four-year
institutions, ((including a requirement)) which shall include the
following requirements:
(a) When a student meets the standard on the reading and math
components of the high school Washington assessment of student learning
the student shall be deemed to have met the general undergraduate
admissions requirements; and
(b) That coursework in American sign language or an American Indian
language shall satisfy any requirement for instruction in a language
other than English that the board or the institutions may establish as
a general undergraduate admissions requirement;
(3) Establish transfer policies;
(4) Adopt rules implementing statutory residency requirements;
(5) Develop and administer reciprocity agreements with bordering
states and the province of British Columbia;
(6) Review and recommend compensation practices and levels for
administrative employees, exempt under chapter 28B.16 RCW, and faculty
using comparative data from peer institutions;
(7) Monitor higher education activities for compliance with all
relevant state policies for higher education;
(8) Arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions or
between and among four-year institutions and community colleges at the
request of one or more of the institutions involved, or at the request
of the governor, or from a resolution adopted by the legislature. The
decision of the board shall be binding on the participants in the
dispute;
(9) Establish and implement a state system for collecting,
analyzing, and distributing information;
(10) Recommend to the governor and the legislature ways to remove
any economic incentives to use off-campus program funds for on-campus
activities; and
(11) Make recommendations to increase minority participation, and
monitor and report on the progress of minority participation in higher
education.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.600.310 and 1994 c 205 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are eligible
to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may apply to a participating
institution of higher education to enroll in courses or programs
offered by the institution of higher education. However, students are
eligible to enroll in courses or programs in participating universities
only if the board of directors of the student's school district has
decided to participate in the program. Participating institutions of
higher education, in consultation with school districts, may establish
admission standards for these students. The admission standards shall
permit a student who has met the standard on the reading and math
components of the high school Washington assessment of student learning
to enroll in the program at a participating institution of higher
education. If the institution of higher education accepts a secondary
school pupil for enrollment under this section, the institution of
higher education shall send written notice to the pupil and the pupil's
school district within ten days of acceptance. The notice shall
indicate the course and hours of enrollment for that pupil.
(2) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution
of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college
student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational
students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately
calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under
RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such
payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to
offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall
be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time
equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260,
excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted
under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, the
higher education coordinating board, and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and
distribution of the funds. The institution of higher education shall
not require the pupil to pay any other fees. The funds received by the
institution of higher education from the school district shall not be
deemed tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution
of higher education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall
not be counted for the purpose of determining any enrollment
restrictions imposed by the state on the institution of higher
education.

--- END ---