BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.119.010 and 2002 c 204 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
promise scholarship program based on the following parameters:
(1) Scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW
((and)), students participating in home-based instruction as provided
in chapter 28A.200 RCW, and persons twenty-one years of age or younger
receiving a GED certificate, who meet both an academic and a financial
eligibility criteria.
(a) Academic eligibility criteria shall be defined as follows:
(i) ((Beginning with the graduating class of 2002,)) Students
graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW must be in the top ((fifteen)) ten percent of their
graduating class, as identified by each respective high school at the
completion of the first term of the student's senior year; or
(ii) Students graduating from public high schools, approved private
high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, and students participating in
home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW must equal or
exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test I score of twelve
hundred on their first attempt or must equal or exceed a composite
American college test score of twenty-seven on their first attempt; or
(iii) Any student who exceeds the standard on the reading and math
components and meets the standard on the writing component of the high
school Washington assessment of student learning the first time he or
she takes the assessment.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state
median family income adjusted for family size, as determined by the
higher education coordinating board for each graduating class.
Students not meeting the eligibility requirements for the first year of
scholarship benefits may reapply for the second year of benefits, but
must still meet the income standard set by the board for the student's
graduating class.
(2) Promise scholarships are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the
board finds that promise scholarships supplant or reduce any grant,
scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the board
shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
scholarship to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.
(3) Within available funds, each qualifying student shall receive
two consecutive annual awards, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition rates charged by Washington's
community colleges. The higher education coordinating board shall
award scholarships to as many students as possible from among those
qualifying under this section.
(4) By October 15th of each year, the board shall determine the
award amount of the scholarships, after taking into consideration the
availability of funds.
(5) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of
Washington.
(6) The scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at
Oregon institutions of higher education that are part of the border
county higher education opportunity project in RCW 28B.80.806 when
those institutions offer programs not available at accredited
institutions of higher education in Washington state.
(7) The scholarships may be used for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and
materials.
(8) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(9) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
promise scholarship.
(10) The higher education coordinating board shall establish the
time frame within which the student must use the scholarship.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.195.010 and 1993 c 336 s 1101 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be
subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to insure the
health and safety of all the students in the state and to insure a
sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation requirements. The
state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate
any specific educational or other programs for private schools except
as hereinafter in this section provided.
Principals of private schools or superintendents of private school
districts shall file each year with the state superintendent of public
instruction a statement certifying that the minimum requirements
hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. After
review of the statement, the state superintendent will notify schools
or school districts of those deviations which must be corrected. In
case of major deviations, the school or school district may request and
the state board of education may grant provisional status for one year
in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the
requirements. Minimum requirements shall be as follows:
(1) The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall
consist of no less than one hundred eighty school days or the
equivalent in annual minimum program hour offerings as prescribed in
RCW 28A.150.220.
(2) The school day shall be the same as that required in RCW
28A.150.030 and 28A.150.220, except that the percentages of total
program hour offerings as prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220 for basic
skills, work skills, and optional subjects and activities shall not
apply to private schools or private sectarian schools.
(3) All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state
certification except as follows:
(a) Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no
counterpart exists in public schools shall not be required to obtain a
state certificate to teach those courses.
(b) In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without
certification may teach students so long as a certified person
exercises general supervision. Annual written statements shall be
submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
reporting and explaining such circumstances.
(4) An approved private school may operate an extension program for
parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach
children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a
minimum that:
(a) The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of
an employee of the approved private school who is certified under
chapter 28A.410 RCW;
(b) The planning by the certified person and the parent, guardian,
or person having legal custody include objectives consistent with this
subsection and subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;
(c) The certified person spend a minimum average each month of one
contact hour per week with each student under his or her supervision
who is enrolled in the approved private school extension program;
(d) Each student's progress be evaluated by the certified person;
and
(e) The certified employee shall not supervise more than thirty
students enrolled in the approved private school's extension program.
(5) Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent
records against loss or damage.
(6) The physical facilities of the school or district shall be
adequate to meet the program offered by the school or district:
PROVIDED, That each school building shall meet reasonable health and
fire safety requirements. ((However, the state board shall not require
private school students to meet the student learning goals, obtain a
certificate of mastery to graduate from high school, to master the
essential academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to
RCW 28A.630.885. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary
basis, to have their students master these essential academic learning
requirements, take these assessments, and obtain certificates of
mastery.)) A residential dwelling of the parent, guardian, or
custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical facility when a
parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is instructing his or
her child under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the
basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language,
social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the
development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units
for meeting state board of education graduation requirements.
(8) Each school or school district shall be required to maintain
up-to-date policy statements related to the administration and
operation of the school or school district.
(9) The state board shall not require private school students to
meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of mastery to
graduate from high school, to master the essential academic learning
requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW 28A.655.060. However,
private schools may choose, on a voluntary basis, to have their
students master the essential academic learning requirements, take the
assessments, and obtain certificates of mastery. Additionally, a
student enrolled in a private school shall be permitted to take the
assessments at an educational service district for the purpose of
qualifying for a promise scholarship or any other purpose.
All decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching
material, curriculum, except as in subsection (7) above provided,
school rules and administration, or other matters not specifically
referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility of the
administration and administrators of the particular private school
involved.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.200.010 and 1995 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction under
RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall have the duty to:
(1) File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is
planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction.
The statement shall include the name and age of the child, shall
specify whether a certificated person will be supervising the
instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the
superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the
statement by September 15 of the school year or within two weeks of the
beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the
superintendent of the public school district within which the parent
resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the student
shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district.
Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220;
(2) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments
and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept
relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are
forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child
transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the
superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls
may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and
shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course
level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review
of the child's records; and
(3) Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the
state board of education is administered annually to the child by a
qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's
academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently
working in the field of education. ((The state board of education
shall not require these children to meet the student learning goals,
master the essential academic learning requirements, to take the
assessments, or to obtain a certificate of mastery pursuant to RCW
28A.630.885.)) The standardized test administered or the annual
academic progress assessment written shall be made a part of the
child's permanent records. If, as a result of the annual test or
assessment, it is determined that the child is not making reasonable
progress consistent with his or her age or stage of development, the
parent shall make a good faith effort to remedy any deficiency.
(4) The state board of education shall not require these children
to meet the student learning goals, master the essential academic
learning requirements, to take the assessments, or to obtain a
certificate of mastery pursuant to RCW 28A.655.060. However, a student
receiving home-based instruction shall be permitted to take the
Washington assessment of student learning at an educational service
district for the purpose of qualifying for a promise scholarship or any
other purpose.
Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this section shall
be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend school without
valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who do comply with
the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed to be providing
home-based instruction as set forth in RCW 28A.225.010(4).

--- END ---