BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some students who
have recently graduated from high school must immediately enroll in one
or more remedial or precollege classes at Washington's public colleges
and universities before they proceed with college-level courses. The
legislature also finds that these students should have received basic
skills in English; reading; writing, including spelling and grammar;
study skills; and mathematics before graduating from high school. It
is the intent of the legislature that current trisector initiatives be
continued and strengthened to communicate with parents and students
about what students need to do to gain and maintain the appropriate
math, writing, and reading skills to assure they can start immediately
in college-level work. Before the beginning of the 2005 session, the
K-20 community will engage in an organized strategy aimed at reducing
the need for remediation of recent high school graduates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Subject to funding, the Washington institute
for public policy shall report the extent to which school districts are
able to provide enough sections of the courses needed for students to
gain and maintain appropriate math, writing, and reading skills that
will prepare them for college-level work. The institute shall make
recommendations about how to fill any gaps revealed through its
research. A preliminary report of the study is due to the legislature
by September 1, 2004, and a final report is due December 1, 2004.

--- END ---