BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.230 and 1995 c 318 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Conservation futures are a useful tool for counties to preserve
lands of public interest for future generations. Counties are
encouraged to use some conservation futures as one tool for salmon
restoration purposes.
For the purpose of acquiring conservation futures ((as well as))
and other rights and interests in real property pursuant to RCW
84.34.210 and 84.34.220, and for maintaining and operating any property
acquired, a county may levy an amount not to exceed ((six and one-quarter)) ten cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation against
the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the county. The
limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax levy authorized
in this section. Any rights or interests in real property acquired
under this section must be located within the assessing county.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.34.240 and 1971 ex.s. c 243 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Conservation futures are a useful tool for counties to preserve
lands of public interest for future generations. Counties are
encouraged to use some conservation futures as one tool for salmon
restoration purposes.
(1) Any board of county commissioners may establish by resolution
a special fund which may be termed a conservation futures fund to which
it may credit all taxes levied pursuant to RCW 84.34.230. Amounts
placed in this fund ((may)) shall be used ((solely)) for the purpose of
acquiring rights and interests in real property pursuant to the terms
of RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220, and for the maintenance and operation
of any property acquired. The amount of revenue used for maintenance
and operations of parks and recreational facilities may not exceed
twenty-five percent of the total amount collected from the tax levied
under RCW 84.34.230 in the preceding calendar year. Revenues from this
tax may not be used to supplant existing maintenance and operation
funding. Any rights or interests in real property acquired under this
section must be located within the assessing county.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting in any
manner methods and funds otherwise available to a county for financing
the acquisition of such rights and interests in real property.
(3) In counties with a population of five hundred thousand or more,
the board of county commissioners or county legislative authority shall
develop a process to ensure a distribution of conservation futures
funds, over time, throughout the county.

--- END ---