BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.225 and 1999 c 198 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for students who reside out-of-state, a district shall
accept applications from nonresident students who are the children of
full-time certificated and classified school employees, and those
children shall be permitted to enroll:
(a) At the school to which the employee is assigned; or
(b) At a school forming the district's K through 12 continuum which
includes the school to which the employee is assigned.
(2) A district may reject applications under this section if:
(a) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of
convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or
gang membership;
(b) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for
readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection
(2)(b) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident
applicants; or
(c) Enrollment of a child under this section would displace a child
who is a resident of the district, except that if a child is admitted
under subsection (1) of this section, that child shall be permitted to
remain enrolled at that school, or in that district's kindergarten
through twelfth grade continuum, until he or she has completed his or
her schooling.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, all
districts accepting applications from nonresident students or from
students receiving home-based instruction for admission to the
district's schools shall consider equally all applications received.
Each school district shall adopt a policy establishing rational, fair,
and equitable standards for acceptance and rejection of applications by
June 30, 1990. The policy may include rejection of a nonresident
student if:
(a) Acceptance of a nonresident student would result in the
district experiencing a financial hardship;
(b) The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of
convictions for offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or
gang membership; or
(c) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for
readmission of expelled or suspended students under this subsection
(((1))) (3)(c) must apply uniformly to both resident and nonresident
applicants.
For purposes of subsections (((1))) (2)(a) and (3)(b) of this
section, "gang" means a group which: (i) Consists of three or more
persons; (ii) has identifiable leadership; and (iii) on an ongoing
basis, regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for criminal
purposes.
(((2))) (4) The district shall provide to applicants written
notification of the approval or denial of the application in a timely
manner. If the application is rejected, the notification shall include
the reason or reasons for denial and the right to appeal under RCW
28A.225.230(3).

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.270 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 205 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Each school district in the state shall adopt and implement a
policy allowing intradistrict enrollment options no later than June 30,
1990. Each district shall establish its own policy establishing
standards on how the intradistrict enrollment options will be
implemented.
(2) A district shall permit the children of full-time certificated
and classified school employees to enroll at:
(a) The school to which the employee is assigned; or
(b) A school forming the district's K through 12 continuum which
includes the school to which the employee is assigned.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "full-time employees" means
employees who are employed for the full number of hours and days for
their job description.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Each school district shall report to the superintendent of public
instruction the number of students that apply for enrollment under RCW
28A.225.225(1) or 28A.225.270(2) and the number of total students
applying for transfers that were denied enrollment. The superintendent
of public instruction shall compile the data and report it to the
legislature by December 1, 2004.

--- END ---