BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
commission, the department of natural resources, and the fish and
wildlife commission have difficulty maintaining recreation sites they
own and operate because of insufficient funds. The legislature also
finds that the lack of funds to operate, maintain, and repair these
recreation sites is resulting in the closure of some of these sites to
the public at a time when the demand for outdoor recreation areas
continues to increase.
(2) The legislature recognizes that many state residents and
visitors to Washington enjoy visiting state-owned and operated
recreation sites throughout different parts of the state, and that many
people visit lands owned and operated by more than one state agency.
The legislature is aware that the commission is instituting a statewide
parking fee, the fish and wildlife commission has an annual pass for
parking at their access sites, and the department of natural resources
currently does not charge a parking fee at their recreation sites, nor
does the department of natural resources charge any other fees for
outdoor recreation activities.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that state recreation
facilities be kept open and that there be a single basic pass available
to the citizens of the state of Washington that would provide, for a
single fee, access to the parking, day-use, trailhead and trail, and
primitive overnight camping facilities owned and operated by the
commission, the fish and wildlife commission, and the department of
natural resources, with a single deluxe pass that would provide boat
launch access in addition to the access provided in the basic pass. It
is further the intent of the legislature that a similar nonresident
pass be made available, at a higher cost, to visitors to the state of
Washington.
(4) It is also the intent of the legislature to encourage
coordination with federal natural resource recreational land managers
and neighboring states to develop a regional outdoor recreation pass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the state parks and recreation commission.
(2) "Committee" means the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation.
(3) "Pass" means the evergreen recreation pass, created in section
3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The evergreen recreation pass is created
and administered by the committee. The committee may provide for the
sale of the pass by the various state agencies and their vendors, and
by other vendors.
(2) The pass must also be available for purchase through the
department of licensing. The department of licensing shall include a
notice of the availability of the pass, including the opportunity to
renew the pass, in each notice of motor vehicle registration renewal.
The department of licensing shall also encourage private vendors to
distribute the pass and to make the pass available for persons renewing
motor vehicle registrations on-line.
(3) The committee shall: (a) Determine the form of the pass; (b)
determine the term of the pass, be it calendar year or some other term;
and (c) beginning June 30, 2006, and no later than June 30th of each
even-numbered year, recommend to the governor and the legislature how
the proceeds from the sale of the pass should be distributed to the
committee, the commission, the fish and wildlife commission, and the
department of natural resources, for the cost of developing and
administering the pass and the support of the agencies' recreation and
recreation access programs.
(4) The committee may enter into agreements with federal agencies
and neighboring state natural resource agencies to develop a regional
recreation pass. The committee shall evaluate and develop a proposal
for implementing a regional recreation pass that includes access to
state and federal recreation lands by December 1, 2004, and report
their findings to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature.
(5) The committee may develop and authorize premium passes that
combine additional licenses and services that include but are not
limited to camping, boat moorage, hunting, and fishing. The committee
may also develop and authorize marketing proposals that include
offering discounts to the cost of the pass for private vendors that
distribute premium passes. When authorizing any premium passes or
marketing proposals that include offering discounts, the committee
shall indicate how revenues will be allocated between the evergreen
recreation account, created in section 4 of this act, and any other
account to which revenues from any bundled licenses or services would
otherwise be dedicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The evergreen recreation pass must be
available for purchase by January 1, 2004, at a cost not to exceed
thirty-five dollars for residents or sixty-five dollars for
nonresidents for the basic pass, or fifty dollars for residents or
ninety-five dollars for nonresidents for the deluxe pass. Up to five
dollars from the sale of each pass may be retained by the vendors or
the agencies to cover the cost of processing the sale of the pass, as
determined by the committee. Eighty percent of the net proceeds from
the sale of the pass must be deposited in the state parks renewal and
stewardship account until June 30, 2007, or until fifteen million
dollars in net proceeds from the sale of the pass have been deposited
in the state parks renewal and stewardship account, whichever occurs
first.
(2) All other net proceeds from the sale of the pass must be
deposited in the evergreen recreation account, hereby created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Money may be appropriated only for the cost of
developing and administering the pass and the support of the recreation
and recreation access programs of the commission, the fish and wildlife
commission, and the department of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A premium version of the pass, entitled the
corps of discovery pass, may be created, administered, and sold by the
commission until June 30, 2007. The commission is authorized to seek
private sponsorship of the corps of discovery pass, to arrange for
merchandising and sponsorship programs in connection with the corps of
discovery pass, and may use any Lewis and Clark trail logos owned by
the state of Washington in support of the corps of discovery pass and
related merchandising and sponsorship programs. All costs of
developing and administering the corps of discovery pass must be borne
by the commission. All net proceeds from the sale of the corps of
discovery pass and related merchandising and sponsorship programs must
be deposited in the state parks renewal and stewardship account and
used first to cover the costs associated with renewing the leases of,
and operating and maintaining, state parks along the Lewis and Clark
trail through the bicentennial activities celebrating the corps of
discovery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The cost of all versions of the pass may
be adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management on an
annual basis subject to the limitation contained in RCW 43.135.055(1).
(2) On January 1st following any biennial operating or supplemental
operating budget proposal submitted by the governor that does not
propose general fund appropriations to the commission, the fish and
wildlife commission, and the department of natural resources for the
support of outdoor recreation programs at least equal to the general
fund appropriation for fiscal year 2002 adjusted for inflation, the
office of financial management must reduce the cost of all versions of
the pass to five dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The commission, the fish and wildlife
commission, and the department of natural resources shall accept the
pass in lieu of any fee charged for access to the parking, day-use,
trailhead and trail, and unsupervised primitive overnight camping
facilities owned or operated by the commission, the fish and wildlife
commission, and the department of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) When using the pass in lieu of payment
of parking or vehicle access fees otherwise required by the commission,
the fish and wildlife commission, or the department of natural
resources, the pass must be displayed so that it is clearly visible
from outside of the motor vehicle.
(2) Annual passes must be available during any month of the year,
but the committee may choose to authorize discounting of the cost of
the evergreen recreation pass during the latter part of the period
established for the pass, if the committee chooses to establish a
single, year-long term.
(3) Failure to display the pass, or the equivalent daily or annual
parking or vehicle access permit required by the commission, the fish
and wildlife commission, or the department of natural resources, in
accordance with this section is a natural resource infraction under
chapter 7.84 RCW. Employees of the commission, the fish and wildlife
commission, the department of natural resources, and general authority
law enforcement officers may issue a notice of infraction to the
registered owner of any motor vehicle parking or otherwise accessing
recreation lands without either the pass or the equivalent daily or
annual parking or vehicle access permit. The penalty for failure to
clearly display the required pass or permit is sixty-six dollars. This
penalty is reduced to ten dollars if the registered owner provides
proof to the court that he or she purchased either a pass or the
equivalent annual parking or vehicle access permit within fifteen days
after the issuance of the notice of violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall require an evergreen recreation pass for the
use of the parking, day-use, trailhead and trail, and primitive
overnight camping facilities owned or operated by the department.

Sec. 10 RCW 4.24.210 and 1997 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
any public or private landowners or others in lawful possession and
control of any lands whether designated resource, rural, or urban, or
water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels,
who allow members of the public to use them for the purposes of outdoor
recreation, which term includes, but is not limited to, the cutting,
gathering, and removing of firewood by private persons for their
personal use without purchasing the firewood from the landowner,
hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking, bicycling,
skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities,
hanggliding, paragliding, the riding of horses or other animals, clam
digging, pleasure driving of off-road vehicles, snowmobiles, and other
vehicles, boating, nature study, winter or water sports, viewing or
enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites,
without charging a fee ((of any kind therefor)), shall not be liable
for unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
any public or private landowner or others in lawful possession and
control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water areas or channels
and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who offer or allow such
land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife cooperative project,
or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter or other solid
waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to any volunteer
group or to any other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land. Nothing in this section shall prevent the
liability of such a landowner or others in lawful possession and
control for injuries sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous
artificial latent condition for which warning signs have not been
conspicuously posted. Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and 4.24.210 limits or
expands in any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance. Usage by
members of the public, volunteer groups, or other users is permissive
and does not support any claim of adverse possession.
(4) For purposes of this section, a license or permit issued for
statewide use under authority of ((chapter 43.51 RCW, Title 75, or))
Title 77 RCW, chapter 79A.05 RCW, or the evergreen recreation pass
created in sections 1 through 8 of this act is not a fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The sum of four hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general fund to the
state parks and recreation commission for the purposes of this act. Of
that sum, no more than fifty thousand dollars may be spent developing
the corps of discovery pass, and the remainder must be spent solely for
the reopening, operating, and maintaining of Chief Timothy, Central
Ferry, Lyons Ferry, and Crow Butte state parks in anticipation of
sufficient revenues from the corps of discovery pass being generated
during the 2003-2005 biennium for the maintenance and operation of
these state parks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---