BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.035 and 2000 c 98 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology;
(2) "Director" means the director of ecology;
(3) "Ground waters" means all waters that exist beneath the land
surface or beneath the bed of any stream, lake or reservoir, or other
body of surface water within the boundaries of this state, whatever may
be the geological formation or structure in which such water stands or
flows, percolates or otherwise moves. There is a recognized
distinction between natural ground water and artificially stored ground
water;
(4) "Natural ground water" means water that exists in underground
storage owing wholly to natural processes;
(5) "Artificially stored ground water" means water that is made
available in underground storage artificially, either intentionally, or
incidentally to irrigation and that otherwise would have been
dissipated by natural processes; ((and))
(6) "Underground artificial storage and recovery project" means any
project in which it is intended to artificially store water in the
ground through injection, surface spreading and infiltration, or other
department-approved method, and to make subsequent use of the stored
water. However, (a) this subsection does not apply to irrigation
return flow, or to operational and seepage losses that occur during the
irrigation of land, or to water that is artificially stored due to the
construction, operation, or maintenance of an irrigation district
project, or to projects involving water reclaimed in accordance with
chapter 90.46 RCW; and (b) RCW 90.44.130 applies to those instances of
claimed artificial recharge occurring due to the construction,
operation, or maintenance of an irrigation district project or
operational and seepage losses that occur during the irrigation of
land, as well as other forms of claimed artificial recharge already
existing at the time a ground water subarea is established; and
(7) "Single or group domestic use" means any beneficial use of
ground water for individual homesites, regardless of whether the
homesite was or is to be developed individually or as part of a larger
project, and regardless of whether the means of withdrawal is shared
with other homesites.

--- END ---