BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.22.005 and 1993 c 242 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Automobile" means a passenger car as defined in RCW 46.04.382
registered or principally garaged in this state other than:
(a) A farm-type tractor or other self-propelled equipment designed
for use principally off public roads;
(b) A vehicle operated on rails or crawler-treads;
(c) A vehicle located for use as a residence;
(d) A motor home as defined in RCW 46.04.305; or
(e) A moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304.
(2) "Bodily injury" means bodily injury, sickness, or disease,
including death at any time resulting from the injury, sickness, or
disease.
(3) "Income continuation benefits" means payments ((of at least
eighty-five percent of)) for the insured's loss of income from work,
because of bodily injury sustained by ((him or her)) the insured in
((the)) an automobile accident, less income earned during the benefit
payment period. The combined weekly payment an insured may receive
under personal injury protection coverage, worker's compensation,
disability insurance, or other income continuation benefits may not
exceed eighty-five percent of the insured's weekly income from work.
The benefit payment period begins fourteen days after the date of the
automobile accident and ends at the earliest of the following:
(a) The date on which the insured is reasonably able to perform the
duties of his or her usual occupation;
(b) ((The expiration of not more than fifty-two weeks from the
fourteenth day)) Fifty-four weeks from the date of the automobile
accident; or
(c) The date of the insured's death.
(4) "Insured automobile" means an automobile described on the
declarations page of the policy.
(5) "Insured" means:
(a) The named insured or a person who is a resident of the named
insured's household and is either related to the named insured by
blood, marriage, or adoption, or is the named insured's ward, foster
child, or stepchild; or
(b) A person who sustains bodily injury caused by accident while:
(i) Occupying or using the insured automobile with the permission of
the named insured; or (ii) a pedestrian accidentally struck by the
insured automobile.
(6) "Loss of services benefits" means reimbursement for payment to
others, not members of the insured's household, for expenses reasonably
incurred for services in lieu of those the insured would usually have
performed for his or her household without compensation, provided the
services are actually rendered((, and ending)). The maximum benefit is
forty dollars per day. Reimbursement for loss of services ends the
earliest of the following:
(a) The date on which the insured person is reasonably able to
perform those services;
(b) ((The expiration of fifty-two weeks)) Fifty-two weeks from the
date of the automobile accident; or
(c) The date of the insured's death.
(7) "Medical and hospital benefits" means payments for all
reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by or on behalf of the
insured for injuries sustained as a result of an automobile accident
for health care services provided by persons licensed under Title 18
RCW, including pharmaceuticals, prosthetic devices and eye glasses, and
necessary ambulance, hospital, and professional nursing service.
Medical and hospital benefits are payable for expenses incurred within
three years from the date of the automobile accident.
(8) "Automobile liability insurance policy" means a policy insuring
against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury,
death, or property damage suffered by any person and arising out of the
ownership, maintenance, or use of an insured automobile. An automobile
liability policy does not include:
(a) Vendors single interest or collateral protection coverage;
(b) General liability insurance; or
(c) Excess liability insurance, commonly known as an umbrella
policy, where coverage applies only as excess to an underlying
automobile policy.
(9) "Named insured" means the individual named in the declarations
of the policy and includes his or her spouse if a resident of the same
household.
(10) "Occupying" means in or upon or entering into or alighting
from.
(11) "Pedestrian" means a natural person not occupying a motor
vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.320.
(12) "Personal injury protection" means the benefits described in
this section and RCW 48.22.085 through 48.22.100. Payments made under
personal injury protection coverage are limited to the actual amount of
loss or expense incurred.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.22.085 and 1993 c 242 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No new automobile liability insurance policy or renewal of such
an existing policy may be issued unless personal injury protection
coverage ((benefits at limits established in this chapter for medical
and hospital expenses, funeral expenses, income continuation, and loss
of services sustained by an insured because of bodily injury caused by
an automobile accident are)) is offered as an optional coverage.
(2) A named insured may reject, in writing, personal injury
protection coverage and the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section shall not apply. If a named insured ((has rejected)) rejects
personal injury protection coverage((,)):
(a) That rejection ((shall be)) is valid and binding as to all
levels of coverage and on all persons who might have otherwise been
insured under such coverage((. If a named insured has rejected
personal injury protection coverage, such coverage shall not be
included)); and
(b) The insurer is not required to include personal injury
protection coverage in any supplemental, renewal, or replacement policy
unless a named insured subsequently requests such coverage in writing.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.22.090 and 1993 c 242 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) Personal injury protection coverage need not be provided for
vendor's single interest policies, general liability policies, or other
policies, commonly known as umbrella policies, that apply only as
excess to the automobile liability policy directly applicable to the
insured motor vehicle.
(2) Personal injury protection coverage need not be provided)) An
insurer is not required to provide personal injury protection coverage
to or on behalf of:
(((a))) (1) A person who intentionally causes injury to himself or
herself;
(((b))) (2) A person who is injured while participating in a
prearranged or organized racing or speed contest or in practice or
preparation for such a contest;
(((c))) (3) A person whose bodily injury is due to war, whether or
not declared, or to an act or condition incident to such circumstances;
(((d))) (4) A person whose bodily injury results from the
radioactive, toxic, explosive, or other hazardous properties of nuclear
material;
(((e))) (5) The named insured or a relative while occupying a motor
vehicle owned by the named insured or furnished for the named insured's
regular use, if such motor vehicle is not described on the declaration
page of the policy under which a claim is made;
(((f))) (6) A relative while occupying a motor vehicle owned by the
relative or furnished for the relative's regular use, if such motor
vehicle is not described on the declaration page of the policy under
which a claim is made; or
(((g))) (7) An insured whose bodily injury results or arises from
the insured's use of an automobile in the commission of a felony.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.22.095 and 1993 c 242 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Insurers providing automobile insurance policies must offer minimum
personal injury protection coverage for each insured with ((maximum))
benefit limits as follows:
(1) Medical and hospital benefits of ten thousand dollars ((for
expenses incurred within three years of the automobile accident));
(2) ((Benefits for funeral expenses in an amount)) A funeral
expense benefit of two thousand dollars;
(3) Income continuation benefits ((covering income losses incurred
within one year after the date of the insured's injury in an amount))
of ten thousand dollars, subject to a limit of ((the lesser of)) two
hundred dollars per week ((or eighty-five percent of the weekly income.
The combined weekly payment receivable by the insured under any
workers' compensation or other disability insurance benefits or other
income continuation benefit and this insurance may not exceed eighty-five percent of the insured's weekly income)); and
(4) Loss of services benefits ((in an amount)) of five thousand
dollars, subject to a limit of ((forty dollars per day not to exceed))
two hundred dollars per week((; and
(5) Payments made under personal injury protection coverage are
limited to the amount of actual loss or expense incurred)).

Sec. 5 RCW 48.22.100 and 1993 c 242 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
((In lieu of minimum coverage required under RCW 48.22.095)) If
requested by a named insured, an insurer providing automobile liability
insurance policies ((shall)) must offer ((and provide, upon request,))
personal injury protection coverage for each insured with benefit
limits ((for each insured of)) as follows:
(1) ((Up to)) Medical and hospital benefits of thirty-five thousand
dollars ((for medical and hospital benefits incurred within three years
of the automobile accident));
(2) ((Up to)) A funeral expense benefit of two thousand dollars
((for funeral expenses incurred));
(3) ((Up to)) Income continuation benefits of thirty-five thousand
dollars ((for one year's income continuation benefits)), subject to a
limit of ((the lesser of)) seven hundred dollars per week ((or eighty-five percent of the weekly income)); and
(4) ((Up to forty dollars per day for loss of services benefits,
for up to one year from the date of the automobile accident.
Payments made under personal injury protection coverage are limited
to the amount of actual loss or expense incurred)) Loss of services
benefits of fourteen thousand six hundred dollars.

--- END ---