BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.02.065 and 2001 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Documents, materials, or other information as described in
subsection (5) of this section are confidential by law and privileged,
are not subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW, and are
not subject to subpoena directed to the commissioner or any person who
received documents, materials, or other information while acting under
the authority of the commissioner. The commissioner is authorized to
use such documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance
of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the
commissioner's official duties. The confidentiality and privilege
created by this section and RCW 42.17.31916 applies only to the
commissioner, any person acting under the authority of the
commissioner, the national association of insurance commissioners and
its affiliates and subsidiaries, regulatory and law enforcement
officials of other states and nations, the federal government, and
international authorities.
(2) Neither the commissioner nor any person who received documents,
materials, or other information while acting under the authority of the
commissioner is permitted or required to testify in any private civil
action concerning any confidential and privileged documents, materials,
or information subject to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The commissioner:
(a) May share documents, materials, or other information, including
the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information
subject to subsection (1) of this section, with (i) the national
association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries, and (ii) regulatory and law enforcement officials of
other states and nations, the federal government, and international
authorities, if the recipient agrees to maintain the confidentiality
and privileged status of the document, material, or other information;
(b) May receive documents, materials, or information, including
otherwise either confidential or privileged, or both, documents,
materials, or information, from (i) the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and (ii)
regulatory and law enforcement officials of other states and nations,
the federal government, and international authorities and shall
maintain as confidential and privileged any document, material, or
information received that is either confidential or privileged, or
both, under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the
document, material, or information; and
(c) May enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of
information consistent with this subsection.
(4) No waiver of an existing privilege or claim of confidentiality
in the documents, materials, or information may occur as a result of
disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a result of
sharing as authorized in subsection (3) of this section.
(5)(a) Documents, materials, or information, which is either
confidential or privileged, or both, which has been provided to the
commissioner by (((a))) (i) the national association of insurance
commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, (((b))) (ii)
regulatory or law enforcement officials of other states and nations,
the federal government, or international authorities, or (((c))) (iii)
agencies of this state, is confidential and privileged only if the
documents, materials, or information is protected from disclosure by
the applicable laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the
document, material, or information.
(b) Working papers, documents, materials, or information produced
by, obtained by, or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person
in the course of a financial or market conduct examination are not
required to be disclosed by the commissioner unless cited by the
commissioner in connection with an agency action. The commissioner
shall notify a party that produced documents, materials, or information
five days before disclosure in connection to an agency action. The
notified party may seek injunctive relief to prevent disclosure of any
documents, materials, or information it believes is confidential or
privileged in a court of competent jurisdiction. A waiver of existing
privilege or claim of confidentiality may not occur as a result of a
disclosure to the commissioner under this section.

--- END ---