BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.62.090 and 2000 c 106 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) A person is not eligible to receive a credit under this
chapter if the person is receiving credit for the same position under
RCW 82.04.44525 or 82.04.4456.
(((2) This section expires December 31, 2003.))

--- END ---