BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.12.190 and 1982 c 123 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The management and control of a library shall be vested in a
board of either five or seven trustees as hereinafter in this section
provided. In cities and towns five trustees shall be appointed by the
mayor with the consent of the legislative body. In counties, rural
county library districts, and island library districts, five trustees
shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners. In a regional
library district a board of either five or seven trustees shall be
appointed by the joint action of the legislative bodies concerned. In
intercounty rural library districts a board of either five or seven
trustees shall be appointed by the joint action of the boards of county
commissioners of each of the counties included in a district. The
first appointments for boards comprised of but five trustees shall be
for terms of one, two, three, four, and five years respectively, and
thereafter a trustee shall be appointed annually to serve for five
years. The first appointments for boards comprised of seven trustees
shall be for terms of one, two, three, four, five, six, and seven years
respectively, and thereafter a trustee shall be appointed annually to
serve for seven years. No person shall be appointed to any board of
trustees for more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies shall be
filled for unexpired terms as soon as possible in the manner in which
members of the board are regularly chosen.
(2) A library trustee shall not receive a salary or other
compensation for services as trustee, but necessary expenses actually
incurred shall be paid from the library funds.
(3) A library trustee in the case of a city or town may be removed
((only)) by vote of the legislative body or by the process described in
subsection (4) of this section. A trustee of a county library, a rural
county library district library, or an island library district library
may be removed for just cause by the county commissioners after a
public hearing upon a written complaint stating the ground for removal,
which complaint, with a notice of the time and place of hearing, shall
have been served upon the trustee at least fifteen days before the
hearing or by the process described in subsection (4) of this section.
A trustee of an intercounty rural library district may be removed by
the joint action of the board of county commissioners of the counties
involved in the same manner as provided herein for the removal of a
trustee of a county library or by the process described in subsection
(4) of this section.
(4) The citizens may by petition provide for a ballot measure to
determine whether a library trustee should be removed from his or her
position as trustee.
(a) The ballot measure shall be submitted if a petition proposing
the measure is submitted to the county auditor of the county in which
the library district, city, town, or county is located or the most
populous county in a multicounty library district that is signed by
registered voters within the city, town, or county that made the
appointment in question, numbering at least ten percent of the votes
cast in the last primary election by registered voters within the
district, city, town, or county.
(b) Upon receipt of a citizen petition under (a) of this
subsection, the county auditor shall determine whether the petition is
signed by a sufficient number of registered voters, using the
registration records and returns of the preceding general election,
and, no later than forty-five days after receipt of the petition, shall
attach to the petition the auditor's certificate stating whether or not
sufficient signatures have been obtained. If the signatures are found
by the auditor to be insufficient, the petition shall be returned to
the person filing it.
(c) The ballot proposition addressing the removal of a library
trustee from his or her position as trustee shall appear on the ballot
of the next general election or at the next special election date
specified under RCW 29.13.020 occurring sixty or more days after the
date the county auditor certifies that the petition proposing such
election contains sufficient valid signatures.

--- END ---