BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
All meetings of the governing body of a public agency shall be open
and public and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting of
the governing body of a public agency, except as otherwise provided in
this chapter.
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, an agenda must
be posted at least seventy-two hours before each regular meeting and
twenty-four hours before each special meeting. Each agenda item must
be described with enough specificity to indicate the subject matter or
action to be considered, but need not exceed twenty words per agenda
item.
(b) In the case of a subject matter raised by a citizen during a
regular or special meeting, the matter may be heard. However, in no
event may final action be taken on any matter about which the public
has not received notice as provided in (a) of this subsection.
(2) The governing body shall accept written comments in addition to
spoken comments.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.30.040 and 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
A member of the public shall not be required, as a condition to
attendance at a meeting of a governing body, to register his or her
name and other information, to complete a questionnaire, or otherwise
to fulfill any condition precedent to his or her attendance.
The governing body may require persons desiring to speak or present
written comments to identify himself or herself.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.30.060 and 1989 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No)) A governing body of a public agency ((shall)) may adopt
((any)) an ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation, order, or
directive((, except in)) only when:
(a) The action is taken at a meeting (i) open to the public ((and
then only at a meeting,)) and (ii) for which the date ((of which)) is
fixed by law or rule((,)) or ((at a meeting of which)) notice has been
given according to the provisions of this chapter; and
(b) The agenda for the meeting clearly indicates that the governing
body may take final action on the matter.
Any action taken at meetings failing to comply with the provisions
of this subsection shall be null and void.
(2) No governing body of a public agency at any meeting required to
be open to the public shall vote by secret ballot. Any vote taken in
violation of this subsection shall be null and void, and shall be
considered an "action" under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.30.070 and 1983 c 155 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governing body of a public agency shall provide the time for
holding regular meetings by ordinance, resolution, bylaws, or by
whatever other rule is required for the conduct of business by that
body. ((Unless otherwise provided for in the act under which the
public agency was formed,)) Meetings of ((the)) a governing body need
not be held within the boundaries of the territory over which the
public agency exercises jurisdiction unless final action is taken on
any matter. If final action is taken on a matter, then meetings of a
public agency defined under RCW 42.30.020(1)(a) must be held within the
state; and meetings of a governing body of a public agency defined
under RCW 42.30.020(1) (b), (c), or (d) must be held within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction if possible, or within the boundaries of
the county, or of the county of largest population if there is more
than one county within which lies the territory over which the public
agency, or the subagency or policy group serving the public agency,
exercises jurisdiction. If at any time any regular meeting falls on a
holiday, such regular meeting shall be held on the next business day.
((If, by reason of fire, flood, earthquake, or other emergency, there
is a need for expedited action by a governing body to meet the
emergency, the presiding officer of the governing body may provide for
a meeting site other than the regular meeting site and the notice
requirements of this chapter shall be suspended during such
emergency.)) It shall not be a violation of the requirements of this
chapter for a majority of the members of a governing body to travel
together or gather for purposes other than a regular meeting or a
special meeting as these terms are used in this chapter: PROVIDED,
That they take no action as defined in this chapter.
Any actions taken at meetings failing to comply with this section
are null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The governing body of the public agency may waive the requirements
of this chapter in the event of an emergency.
For purposes of this section, "emergency" means unforeseen
circumstances beyond the control of the public agency.

--- END ---