BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.97 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission may not issue a land use decision that prohibits
reasonable development of a property or parcel unless the commission
compensates the owner for the loss in value due to the inability to
reasonably develop the property or parcel. The loss in value shall be
determined by the assessor of the county in which the property or
parcel is located.
(2) The commission shall not serve as an adjudicatory body and may
not hear any appeals of land use or building permit decisions. All
such appeals within the commission's jurisdiction shall be heard by the
superior court of competent jurisdiction.

--- END ---