BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.32.050 and 1963 c 4 s 36.32.050 are each amended to
read as follows:
County commissioners shall be elected by:
(1) The qualified voters of the county ((and)); or
(2) The qualified voters of the commissioner district, pursuant to
section 2 of this act.
The person receiving the highest number of votes for the office of
commissioner for the district in which he or she resides shall be
declared duly elected from that district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board of commissioners of any noncharter county may cause
a ballot proposition to be submitted at a general election to the
voters of the county authorizing the board of commissioners to be
elected by district.
(2) As an alternative procedure, a ballot proposition shall be
submitted to the voters of a noncharter county authorizing the board of
commissioners to be elected by district, upon petition of the county
voters equal to at least ten percent of the voters voting at the last
county general election. At least twenty percent of the signatures on
the petition must come from each of the existing commissioner
districts.
Any petition requesting that such an election be held must be
submitted to the county auditor for verification of the signatures
thereon. Within no more than thirty days after the submission of the
petition, the auditor shall determine if the petition contains the
requisite number of valid signatures. The auditor shall certify
whether or not the petition has been signed by the requisite number of
county voters and forward such petition to the board of county
commissioners. If the petition has been signed by the requisite number
of county voters, the board of county commissioners shall submit such
a proposition to the voters for their approval or rejection at the next
general election held at least sixty days after the proposition has
been certified by the auditor.

--- END ---