BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that under existing
landlord tenant laws, persons who are renting or leasing properties, as
well as their agencies and neighbors of the properties, do not have
means to immediately evict tenants involved in criminal actions.
The legislature further finds that with the absence of an immediate
legal means to remove disruptive tenants, the property owners, agents,
and neighbors suffer significant losses in the property and quiet
enjoyment of their residence. These losses continue when disruptive
tenants are allowed to remain on the premises pending court action,
under existing unlawful detainer law.
The legislature intends to protect property owners, agents, and
neighbors from further mental anguish, threats, physical harm, and
financial loss by providing for the immediate eviction of persons
participating in criminal actions or unlawful civil disruptions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A landlord or neighbor petitioner, with supporting evidence and
documentation, may request a court having jurisdiction to authorize the
immediate eviction of a tenant, if the tenant has:
(a) Misbranded drugs by misleading representation under RCW
69.04.530;
(b) Possessed drugs in violation of the uniform controlled
substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW;
(c) Committed a violation involving methamphetamine under RCW
69.50.401 or 69.50.440;
(d) Committed malicious destruction under RCW 43.06.230;
(e) Possessed stolen property under RCW 9A.56.140; or
(f) Committed acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010.
(2) Following a request under subsection (1) of this section, a
court will convene a hearing attended by the tenant and petitioner to
determine whether the tenant should be immediately removed from the
property. The court may request attendance of a social services agency
for temporary relocation assistance. The court may issue a writ of
restitution for the eviction of the tenant.
(3)(a) Upon eviction, the tenant as well as all persons and animals
living with the tenant must be removed from the premises. Personal
property must be retrieved within three days, accompanied by a judicial
representative.
(b) The eviction and writ of restitution must take place on the
same day signed by the court. If scheduling does not permit for issue
of the writ of eviction and writ of restitution the same day, the writs
must be served by noon the following day.
(c) To enforce the court-ordered eviction, the petitioner must be
accompanied by the sheriff.
(d) Persons giving false statements or testimony may be prosecuted
by law under RCW 9.72.090 and 5.28.060.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to reduce the
requirements of the landlord or owner having to post a bond under RCW
59.12.090.

--- END ---