BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state combined fund drive's powers and duties
include but are not limited to the following:
(1) Raising money for charity and reducing the disruption to
government through multiple fund drives;
(2) Establishing criteria by which a public or private nonprofit
organization may participate in the combined fund drive;
(3) Engaging in or encouraging fund-raising activities including
the solicitation of charitable gifts, grants, and donations from state
employees, retired public employees, corporations, foundations, and
other individuals for the benefit of the beneficiaries of the
Washington state combined fund drive;
(4) Requesting the appointment of employees from state agencies and
institutions of higher education to lead and manage workplace
charitable giving campaigns within state government;
(5) Engaging in educational activities, including classes,
exhibits, seminars, workshops, and conferences related to the basic
purpose of the combined fund drive;
(6) Accepting gifts and grants from private institutions, persons,
firms, or corporations, and engaging in appropriate fund-raising and
advertising activities to increasing the self-support of the
administrative duties of the Washington state combined fund drive; and
(7) Charging an administrative fee to the beneficiaries of the
Washington state combined fund drive to fund the administrative duties
of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state combined fund drive committee may enter into
contracts and partnerships with private institutions, persons, firms,
or corporations for the benefit of the beneficiaries of the Washington
state combined fund drive.

--- END ---