BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.92.021 and 1983 c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is created a Washington state veterinary board of
governors consisting of six members, five of whom shall be licensed
veterinarians, and one of whom shall be a lay member.
(2) The licensed members shall be appointed by the governor. At
the time of their appointment the licensed members of the board must be
actual residents of the state in active practice as licensed
practitioners of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry and must
be citizens of the United States. Not more than one licensed member
shall be from the same congressional district. At least two licensed
members shall be from eastern Washington. At least one licensed member
shall be in active practice with a speciality in the practice of
veterinary medicine on agricultural animals raised for commercial
purposes. The board shall not be deemed to be unlawfully constituted
and a member of the board shall not be deemed ineligible to serve the
remainder of the member's unexpired term on the board solely by reason
of the establishment of new or revised boundaries for congressional
districts.
The terms of the first licensed members of the board shall be as
follows: One member for five, four, three, two, and one years
respectively. Thereafter the terms shall be for five years and until
their successors are appointed and qualified.
(3) The lay member shall be appointed by the governor for a five
year term and until the lay member's successor is appointed.
(4) A member may be appointed to serve a second term, if that term
does not run consecutively. Vacancies in the board shall be filled by
the governor, the appointee to hold office for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
(5) Officers of the board shall be a chairman and a secretary-treasurer to be chosen by the members of the board from among its
members.
(6) Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum at meetings
of the board.

--- END ---