BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington state's rural economies are
experiencing particularly difficult fiscal times as the state's economy
remains weak and recovery lags behind national economic improvement.
Further, some rural counties were already struggling to provide an
increasing share of government services and comply with state mandates,
including planning for and accommodating growth. State general fund
assistance to support local governments has declined over the last two
biennia, further exacerbating the fiscal difficulties experienced by
these counties. The legislature finds that these forces have been a
severe burden and without relief at least one county will be forced to
consider dissolution. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature
to permit a county that has a population of less than ten thousand, has
a privately owned taxable land base of less than eighteen percent, and
includes no more than one incorporated city to withdraw from the state
growth management act and all the requirements thereof.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.040 and 2000 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each county that has both a population of fifty thousand or
more and, until May 16, 1995, has had its population increase by more
than ten percent in the previous ten years or, on or after May 16,
1995, has had its population increase by more than seventeen percent in
the previous ten years, and the cities located within such county, and
any other county regardless of its population that has had its
population increase by more than twenty percent in the previous ten
years, and the cities located within such county, shall conform with
all of the requirements of this chapter. However, the county
legislative authority of such a county with a population of less than
fifty thousand population may adopt a resolution removing the county,
and the cities located within the county, from the requirements of
adopting comprehensive land use plans and development regulations under
this chapter if this resolution is adopted and filed with the
department by December 31, 1990, for counties initially meeting this
set of criteria, or within sixty days of the date the office of
financial management certifies that a county meets this set of criteria
under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section. For the purposes of this
subsection, a county not currently planning under this chapter is not
required to include in its population count those persons confined in
a correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections that is located in the county.
(b) Once a county meets either of these sets of criteria and the
county has not removed itself from the requirement to plan under this
section pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the requirement to
conform with all of the requirements of this chapter remains in effect,
even if the county no longer meets one of these sets of criteria.
(2) The county legislative authority of any county that does not
meet either of the sets of criteria established under subsection (1) of
this section may adopt a resolution indicating its intention to have
subsection (1) of this section apply to the county. Each city, located
in a county that chooses to plan under this subsection, shall conform
with all of the requirements of this chapter. Once such a resolution
has been adopted, the county and the cities located within the county
remain subject to all of the requirements of this chapter unless the
county removes itself from the requirement to plan under this section
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(3) A county that (a) has a population of less than ten thousand,
(b) has a privately owned taxable land base of less than eighteen
percent, and (c) includes no more than one incorporated city may adopt
a resolution removing the county, and the city located within the
county, from the requirement to plan under this section if the
resolution is adopted and filed with the department. Removal shall
occur on the date the resolution is filed with the department.
(4) Any county or city that is initially required to conform with
all of the requirements of this chapter under subsection (1) of this
section and has not removed itself under subsection (3) of this section
shall take actions under this chapter as follows: (a) The county
legislative authority shall adopt a county-wide planning policy under
RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city located within the county
shall designate critical areas, agricultural lands, forest lands, and
mineral resource lands, and adopt development regulations conserving
these designated agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource
lands and protecting these designated critical areas, under RCW
36.70A.170 and 36.70A.060; (c) the county shall designate and take
other actions related to urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; (d)
if the county has a population of fifty thousand or more, the county
and each city located within the county shall adopt a comprehensive
plan under this chapter and development regulations that are consistent
with and implement the comprehensive plan on or before July 1, 1994,
and if the county has a population of less than fifty thousand, the
county and each city located within the county shall adopt a
comprehensive plan under this chapter and development regulations that
are consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan by January 1,
1995, but if the governor makes written findings that a county with a
population of less than fifty thousand or a city located within such a
county is not making reasonable progress toward adopting a
comprehensive plan and development regulations the governor may reduce
this deadline for such actions to be taken by no more than one hundred
eighty days. Any county or city subject to this subsection may obtain
an additional six months before it is required to have adopted its
development regulations by submitting a letter notifying the department
of community, trade, and economic development of its need prior to the
deadline for adopting both a comprehensive plan and development
regulations.
(((4))) (5) Any county or city that is required to conform with all
the requirements of this chapter, as a result of the county legislative
authority adopting its resolution of intention under subsection (2) of
this section and the county has not removed itself pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section, shall take actions under this chapter
as follows: (a) The county legislative authority shall adopt a county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city
that is located within the county shall adopt development regulations
conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands
it designated under RCW 36.70A.060 within one year of the date the
county legislative authority adopts its resolution of intention; (c)
the county shall designate and take other actions related to urban
growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city
that is located within the county shall adopt a comprehensive plan and
development regulations that are consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan not later than four years from the date the county
legislative authority adopts its resolution of intention, but a county
or city may obtain an additional six months before it is required to
have adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter
notifying the department of community, trade, and economic development
of its need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive
plan and development regulations.
(((5))) (6) If the office of financial management certifies that
the population of a county that previously had not been required to
plan under subsection (1) or (2) of this section has changed
sufficiently to meet either of the sets of criteria specified under
subsection (1) of this section, and where applicable, the county
legislative authority has not adopted a resolution removing the county
from these requirements as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
the county and each city within such county shall take actions under
this chapter as follows: (a) The county legislative authority shall
adopt a county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the
county and each city located within the county shall adopt development
regulations under RCW 36.70A.060 conserving agricultural lands, forest
lands, and mineral resource lands it designated within one year of the
certification by the office of financial management; (c) the county
shall designate and take other actions related to urban growth areas
under RCW 36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city located within
the county shall adopt a comprehensive land use plan and development
regulations that are consistent with and implement the comprehensive
plan within four years of the certification by the office of financial
management, but a county or city may obtain an additional six months
before it is required to have adopted its development regulations by
submitting a letter notifying the department of community, trade, and
economic development of its need prior to the deadline for adopting
both a comprehensive plan and development regulations.
(((6))) (7) A copy of each document that is required under this
section shall be submitted to the department at the time of its
adoption.
(((7))) (8) Cities and counties planning under this chapter must
amend the transportation element of the comprehensive plan to be in
compliance with this chapter and chapter 47.80 RCW no later than
December 31, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---