BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Rules dealing with musculoskeletal disorders, filed on May 26,
2000, by the director, and codified as WAC 296-62-05101 through 296-62-05176, shall have no force and effect, but shall remain in place for
use only as voluntary guidelines for employers. The director shall not
adopt any new or amended rules dealing with musculoskeletal disorders
that are substantially the same as these rules until and unless
required by congress or the federal occupational safety and health
administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of labor and industries shall:
(1) Establish an ergonomics resource center, to provide expertise
and assistance to employers within the state of Washington who seek
training, consultation, and technical assistance to comply with the
ergonomics rule adopted by the department. To make ergonomics
information widely available, the center shall partner with economic
development councils, local chambers of commerce, and the Washington
manufacturing service. The center shall develop industry-by-industry
best-practices guides to assist businesses and workers in applying
ergonomics in the workplace. The department shall consult with the
Washington industrial safety and health act advisory committee and
determine whether the resource center should rely upon a public-private
partnership as its permanent organizational home;
(2) Create an ergonomics clearinghouse, to encourage businesses and
workers to share proven methods of reducing hazards and preventing
injuries. The clearinghouse shall expand the internet-based ergonomics
ideas bank, and include compliance guides, checklists, tip sheets, and
demonstration projects. The department shall encourage businesses,
workers, and health and safety professionals to: (a) Provide
information regarding hazard reduction and injury prevention for
inclusion by the clearinghouse, and (b) apply such information in the
workplace;
(3) Establish a small business ergonomics task force, in
consultation with the governor's small business improvement council.
The department and the task force shall produce a small business
ergonomics assistance guide, make it readily available to businesses,
and evaluate the effectiveness of the guide;
(4) Appoint an ergonomics ombudsman. Working with safety and
health professionals, the ombudsman shall assist employers and
employees with problems implementing the ergonomics rule in the
workplace; and
(5) Establish by administrative rule a two-year demonstration
project, providing ergonomic assistance awards as approved by the
director, up to five thousand dollars per award, to small businesses
seeking to reduce hazards and prevent injuries through application of
the ergonomics rule, to wholly or partially offset the cost of
ergonomics workplace improvement. The department shall provide up to
one million dollars out of existing resources to fund the awards. The
department shall require an outside evaluation of the demonstration.

--- END ---