BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.66.010 and 1996 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section shall apply throughout
this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Corporation" means a corporation, company, association, or
joint stock association.
(2) "Person" means an individual, firm, or a copartnership.
(3) "Private((,)) or private nonprofit transportation provider"
means any private((,)) or private nonprofit corporation providing
transportation services for compensation ((solely)) primarily to
persons with special transportation needs.
(4) "Persons with special transportation needs" means those
persons, including their personal attendants, who because of physical
or mental disability, income status, or age are unable to transport
themselves or to purchase appropriate transportation.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.66.020 and 1979 c 111 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person or corporation, their lessees, trustees, receivers, or
trustees appointed by any court, may operate as a private((,)) or
private nonprofit transportation provider except in accordance with
this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.66.030 and 1998 c 173 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall regulate every private((,)) or private
nonprofit transportation provider in this state but has authority only
as follows: To issue certificates to such providers; to set forth
insurance requirements; to adopt reasonable rules to insure that any
vehicles used by such providers will be adequate for the proposed
service; and to inspect the vehicles and otherwise regulate the safety
of operations of each provider. The commission may charge fees to
private((,)) or private nonprofit transportation providers, which shall
be approximately the same as the reasonable cost of regulating such
providers.

Sec. 4 RCW 81.66.040 and 1979 c 111 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
No private((,)) or private nonprofit transportation provider may
operate in this state without first having obtained from the commission
under the provisions of this chapter a certificate, but a certificate
shall be granted to any private((,)) or private nonprofit
transportation provider holding an auto transportation company
certificate on September 1, 1979, upon surrender of the auto
transportation company certificate. Any right, privilege, or
certificate held, owned, or obtained by a private((,)) or private
nonprofit transportation provider may be sold, assigned, leased,
transferred, or inherited as other property only upon authorization by
the commission. The commission shall issue a certificate to any person
or corporation who files an application, in a form to be determined by
the commission, which sets forth:
(1) Satisfactory proof of its status as a private((,)) or private
nonprofit corporation;
(2) The kind of service to be provided;
(3) The number and type of vehicles to be operated, together with
satisfactory proof that the vehicles are adequate for the proposed
service and that drivers of such vehicles will be adequately trained
and qualified;
(4) Any proposed rates, fares, or charges;
(5) Satisfactory proof of insurance or surety bond, in accordance
with RCW 81.66.050.
The commission may deny a certificate to a provider who does not meet
the requirements of this section. Each vehicle of a private((,)) or
private nonprofit transportation provider shall carry a copy of the
provider's certificate.

Sec. 5 RCW 81.66.050 and 1979 c 111 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall, in the granting of certificates to operate
any private((,)) or private nonprofit transportation provider, require
the owner or operator to first procure liability and property damage
insurance from a company licensed to make liability insurance in the
state of Washington or a surety bond of a company licensed to write
surety bonds in the state of Washington on each vehicle used or to be
used in transporting persons for compensation. The commission shall
fix the amount of the insurance policy or policies or surety bond,
giving due consideration to the character and amount of traffic, the
number of persons affected, and the degree of danger which the proposed
operation involves. Such liability and property damage insurance or
surety bond shall be maintained in force on each vehicle while so used.
Each policy for liability of property damage insurance or surety bond
required herein, shall be filed with the commission and kept in full
force and effect, and failure to do so shall be cause for the
revocation of the certificate.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.72.010 and 1996 c 87 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this chapter:
(1) The term "for hire vehicle" includes all vehicles used for the
transportation of passengers for compensation, except auto stages,
school buses operating exclusively under a contract to a school
district, ride-sharing vehicles under chapter 46.74 RCW, limousine
carriers licensed under chapter 46.72A RCW, vehicles used by private or
private nonprofit transportation providers for elderly or handicapped
persons and their attendants under chapter 81.66 RCW, vehicles used by
auto transportation companies licensed under chapter 81.68 RCW,
vehicles used to provide courtesy transportation at no charge to and
from parking lots, hotels, and rental offices, and vehicles used by
charter party carriers of passengers and excursion service carriers
licensed under chapter 81.70 RCW;
(2) The term "for hire operator" means and includes any person,
concern, or entity engaged in the transportation of passengers for
compensation in for hire vehicles.

--- END ---