BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to improve the
safety of law enforcement officers and the public by providing
consistent education and training for officers in the matter of vehicle
pursuit. The legislature recognizes there are a multitude of factors
which enter into the determination of pursuit and intends that the
criminal justice training commission be given the responsibility of
identifying those factors and developing appropriate standards for
training of law enforcement officers in this area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2003, the Washington state criminal justice
training commission, the Washington state patrol, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and organizations
representing state and local law enforcement officers shall develop a
written model policy on vehicular pursuits.
(2) The model policy must meet all of the following minimum
standards:
(a) Provide for supervisory control, if available, of the pursuit;
(b) Provide procedures for designating the primary pursuit vehicle
and for determining the total number of vehicles to be permitted to
participate at one time in the pursuit;
(c) Provide procedures for coordinating operations with other
jurisdictions; and
(d) Provide guidelines for determining when the interests of public
safety and effective law enforcement justify a vehicular pursuit and
when a vehicular pursuit should not be initiated or should be
terminated.
(3) By June 1, 2004, every state, county, and municipal law
enforcement agency shall adopt and implement a written vehicular
pursuit policy. The policy adopted may, but need not, be the model
policy developed under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
However, any policy adopted must address the minimum requirements
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By June 30, 2006, every new full-time law enforcement officer
employed, after the effective date of this act, by a state, county, or
municipal law enforcement agency shall be trained on vehicular
pursuits.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2006, every new full-time law enforcement
officer employed by a state, county, or municipal law enforcement
agency shall be trained on vehicular pursuits, within six months of
employment.
(3) Nothing in this act requires training on vehicular pursuit of
any law enforcement officer who is employed in a state, county, or city
law enforcement agency on the effective date of this act beyond that
which he or she has received prior to the effective date of this act.

--- END ---