BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.82.090 and 1995 c 291 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, financial
obligations imposed in a judgment shall bear interest from the date of
the judgment until payment, at the rate applicable to civil judgments.
All nonrestitution interest retained by the court shall be split
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the public
safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
county current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county
current expense fund to fund local courts.
(2) The court may, on motion by the offender, following the
offender's release from total confinement, reduce or waive the interest
on legal financial obligations levied as a result of a criminal
conviction. The court may reduce or waive the interest only as an
incentive for the offender to meet his or her legal financial
obligations. The court may not waive the interest on the restitution
portion of the legal financial obligation and may only reduce the
interest on the restitution portion of the legal financial obligation
if the principal of the restitution has been paid in full. The
offender must show that he or she has personally made a good faith
effort to pay, that the interest accrual is causing a significant
hardship, and that he or she will be unable to pay the principal and
interest in full and that reduction or waiver of the interest will
likely enable the offender to pay the full principal and any remaining
interest thereon. For purposes of this section, "good faith effort"
means that the offender has either (a) paid the principal amount in
full; or (b) made twenty-four consecutive monthly payments, excluding
any payments mandatorily deducted by the department of corrections, on
his or her legal financial obligations under his or her payment
agreement with the court. The court may grant the motion, establish a
payment schedule, and retain jurisdiction over the offender for
purposes of reviewing and revising the reduction or waiver of interest.
This section applies to persons convicted as adults or in juvenile
court.

--- END ---