BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 8.26.020 and 1988 c 90 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) The term "state" means any department, commission, agency, or
instrumentality of the state of Washington.
(2) The term "local public agency" applies to any county, city or
town, or other municipal corporation or political subdivision of the
state and any person who has the authority to acquire property by
eminent domain under state law, or any instrumentality of any of the
foregoing.
(3) The term "person" means any individual, partnership,
corporation, or association.
(4)(a) The term "displaced person" means, except as provided in
(((b))) (c) of this subsection, any person who moves from real
property, or moves his personal property from real property:
(i) As a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire, or
the acquisition of, such real property in whole or in part for a
program or project undertaken by a displacing agency; or
(ii) On which the person is a residential tenant or conducts a
small business, a farm operation, or a business defined in this
section, as a direct result of rehabilitation, demolition, or such
other displacing activity as the lead agency may prescribe, under a
program or project undertaken by a displacing agency in any case in
which the displacing agency determines that the displacement is
permanent.
(b) Solely for the purposes of RCW 8.26.035 (1) and (2) and
8.26.065, the term "displaced person" includes any person who moves
from real property, or moves his personal property from real property:
(i) As a direct result of a written notice of intent to acquire, or
the acquisition of, other real property in whole or in part on which
the person conducts a business or farm operation, for a program or
project undertaken by a displacing agency; or
(ii) As a direct result of rehabilitation, demolition, or such
other displacing activity as the lead agency may prescribe, of other
real property on which the person conducts a business or a farm
operation, under a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency
where the displacing agency determines that the displacement is
permanent.
(((b))) (c) The term "displaced person" does not include:
(i) A person who has been determined, according to criteria
established by the lead agency, to be either unlawfully occupying the
displacement dwelling or to have occupied the dwelling for the purpose
of obtaining assistance under this chapter; or
(ii) In any case in which the displacing agency acquires property
for a program or project, any person (other than a person who was an
occupant of the property at the time it was acquired) who occupies the
property on a rental basis for a short term or a period subject to
termination when the property is needed for the program or project.
(5) The term "business" means any lawful activity, excepting a farm
operation, conducted primarily:
(a) For the purchase, sale, lease, and rental of personal and real
property, and for the manufacture, processing, or marketing of
products, commodities, or other personal property;
(b) For the sale of services to the public;
(c) By a nonprofit organization; or
(d) Solely for the purposes of RCW 8.26.035, for assisting in the
purchase, sale, resale, manufacture, processing, or marketing of
products, commodities, personal property, or services by the erection
and maintenance of an outdoor advertising display or displays, whether
or not such display or displays are located on the premises on which
any of the above activities are conducted.
(6) The term "farm operation" means any activity conducted solely
or primarily for the production of one or more agricultural products or
commodities, including timber, for sale or for home use, and
customarily producing such products or commodities in sufficient
quantity to be capable of contributing materially to the operator's
support.
(7) The term "comparable replacement dwelling" means any dwelling
that is (a) decent, safe, and sanitary; (b) adequate in size to
accommodate the occupants; (c) within the financial means of the
displaced person; (d) functionally equivalent; (e) in an area not
subject to unreasonably adverse environmental conditions; and (f) in a
location generally not less desirable than the location of the
displaced person's dwelling with respect to public utilities,
facilities, services, and the displaced person's place of employment.
(8) For purposes of RCW 8.26.180 through 8.26.200, the term
"acquiring agency" means:
(a) A state agency or local public agency that has the authority to
acquire property by eminent domain under state law; or
(b) Any state agency, local public agency, or person that (i) does
not have the authority to acquire property by eminent domain under
state law and (ii) has been designated an "acquiring agency" under
rules adopted by the lead agency. However, the lead agency may only
designate a state agency, local public agency, or a person as an
"acquiring agency" to the extent that it is necessary in order to
qualify for federal financial assistance.
(9) The term "displacing agency" means the state agency, local
public agency, or any person carrying out a program or project, with
federal or state financial assistance, that causes a person to be a
displaced person.
(10) The term "federal financial assistance" means a grant, loan,
or contribution provided by the United States, except any federal
guarantee or insurance and any interest reduction payment to an
individual in connection with the purchase and occupancy of a residence
by that individual.
(11) The term "mortgage" means such classes of liens as are
commonly given to secure advances on, or the unpaid purchase price of,
real property, under the laws of this state, together with the credit
instruments, if any, secured thereby.
(12) The term "lead agency" means the Washington state department
of transportation.
(13) The term "appraisal" means a written statement independently
and impartially prepared by a qualified appraiser setting forth an
opinion of defined value of an adequately described property as of a
specific date, supported by the presentation and analysis of relevant
market information.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Corrects subparagraph lettering. As it exists now, RCW
8.26.020 has two versions of subparagraphs (4)(a)(i) and (ii).
To correct this, the second version of subparagraphs (4)(a)(i)
and (ii) have been relettered as subparagraphs (4)(b)(i) and
(ii).

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.731 and 2000 c 28 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender sentenced to a term of partial confinement shall be
confined in the facility for at least eight hours per day or, if
serving a work crew sentence shall comply with the conditions of that
sentence as set forth in RCW 9.94A.030(((30))) (31) and 9.94A.725. The
offender shall be required as a condition of partial confinement to
report to the facility at designated times. During the period of
partial confinement, an offender may be required to comply with crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions imposed by the court or
the department pursuant to this chapter.
(2) An offender in a county jail ordered to serve all or part of a
term of less than one year in work release, work crew, or a program of
home detention who violates the rules of the work release facility,
work crew, or program of home detention or fails to remain employed or
enrolled in school may be transferred to the appropriate county
detention facility without further court order but shall, upon request,
be notified of the right to request an administrative hearing on the
issue of whether or not the offender failed to comply with the order
and relevant conditions. Pending such hearing, or in the absence of a
request for the hearing, the offender shall serve the remainder of the
term of confinement as total confinement. This subsection shall not
affect transfer or placement of offenders committed to the department.
(3) Participation in work release shall be conditioned upon the
offender attending work or school at regularly defined hours and
abiding by the rules of the work release facility.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 9.94A.030 was amended by 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 301,
changing subsection (30) to subsection (31).

Sec. 3 RCW 11.68.090 and 1997 c 252 s 66 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any personal representative acting under nonintervention powers
may borrow money on the general credit of the estate and may mortgage,
encumber, lease, sell, exchange, convey, and otherwise have the same
powers, and be subject to the same limitations of liability, that a
trustee has under RCW 11.98.070 and chapters 11.100 and 11.102 RCW with
regard to the assets of the estate, both real and personal, all without
an order of court and without notice, approval, or confirmation, and in
all other respects administer and settle the estate of the decedent
without intervention of court. Except as otherwise specifically
provided in this title or by order of court, a personal representative
acting under nonintervention powers may exercise the powers granted to
a personal representative under chapter 11.76 RCW but is not obligated
to comply with the duties imposed on personal representatives by that
chapter. A party to such a transaction and the party's successors in
interest are entitled to have it conclusively presumed that the
transaction is necessary for the administration of the decedent's
estate.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in chapter 11.108 RCW or elsewhere
in order to preserve a marital deduction from estate taxes, a testator
may by a will relieve the personal representative from any or all of
the duties, restrictions, and liabilities imposed: Under common law;
by chapters 11.54, 11.56, 11.100, 11.102, and ((11.104)) 11.104A RCW;
or by RCW 11.28.270 and 11.28.280, 11.68.095, and 11.98.070. In
addition, a testator may likewise alter or deny any or all of the
privileges and powers conferred by this title, and may add duties,
restrictions, liabilities, privileges, or powers to those imposed or
granted by this title. If any common law or any statute referenced
earlier in this subsection is in conflict with a will, the will
controls whether or not specific reference is made in the will to this
section. However, notwithstanding the rest of this subsection, a
personal representative may not be relieved of the duty to act in good
faith and with honest judgment.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Changes a reference to chapter 11.104 RCW, which has been
replaced by chapter 11.104A RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 11.97.010 and 1993 c 339 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The trustor of a trust may by the provisions of the trust relieve
the trustee from any or all of the duties, restrictions, and
liabilities which would otherwise be imposed by chapters 11.95, 11.98,
11.100, and ((11.104)) 11.104A RCW and RCW 11.106.020, or may alter or
deny any or all of the privileges and powers conferred by those
provisions; or may add duties, restrictions, liabilities, privileges,
or powers to those imposed or granted by those provisions. If any
specific provision of those chapters is in conflict with the provisions
of a trust, the provisions of the trust control whether or not specific
reference is made in the trust to any of those chapters, except as
provided in RCW 11.98.200 through 11.98.240 and 11.95.100 through
11.95.150. In no event may a trustee be relieved of the duty to act in
good faith and with honest judgment.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Changes a reference to chapter 11.104 RCW, which has been
replaced by chapter 11.104A RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 11.97.900 and 1985 c 30 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter applies to the provisions of chapters 11.95, 11.98,
11.100, and ((11.104)) 11.104A RCW and to RCW 11.106.020.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Changes a reference to chapter 11.104 RCW, which has been
replaced by chapter 11.104A RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 29.81.310 and 1999 c 260 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The maximum number of words for statements submitted by
candidates is as follows: State representative, one hundred words;
state senator, judge of the superior court, judge of the court of
appeals, justice of the supreme court, and all state offices voted upon
throughout the state, except that of governor, two hundred words;
president and vice-president, United States senator, United States
representative, and governor, three hundred words.
(2) Arguments written by committees under RCW ((29.81.230))
29.81.240 may not exceed two hundred fifty words in length.
(3) Rebuttal arguments written by committees may not exceed
seventy-five words in length.
(4) The secretary of state shall allocate space in the pamphlet
based on the number of candidates or nominees for each office.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 29.81.240 covers arguments in the voters' pamphlet written
by committees.

--- END ---