BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.22.434 and 2002 c 268 s 3 and 2002 c 268 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The director or the director's authorized representative may
conduct such inspections, investigations, and audits as may be
necessary to adopt or enforce manufactured and mobile home, commercial
coach, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicle,
park trailer, factory built housing, and factory built commercial
structure rules adopted under the authority of this chapter or to carry
out the director's duties under this chapter.
(2) For purposes of enforcement of this chapter, persons duly
designated by the director upon presenting appropriate credentials to
the owner, operator, or agent in charge may:
(a) At reasonable times and without advance notice enter any
factory, warehouse, or establishment in which manufactured and mobile
homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units,
recreational vehicles, park trailers, factory built housing, and
factory built commercial structures are manufactured, stored, or held
for sale;
(b) At reasonable times, within reasonable limits, and in a
reasonable manner inspect any factory, warehouse, or establishment as
required to comply with the standards adopted by the secretary of
housing and urban development under the national manufactured home
construction and safety standards act of 1974. Each inspection shall
be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness; and
(c) As requested by an owner of a conversion vending unit or
medical unit, inspect an alteration.
(3) For purposes of determining compliance with this chapter's
permitting requirements for alterations of mobile and manufactured
homes, the department may audit the records of a contractor as defined
in chapter 18.27 RCW or RCW 18.106.020(1) or an electrical contractor
as defined in RCW 19.28.006 when the department has reason to believe
that a violation of the permitting requirements has occurred. The
department shall adopt rules implementing the auditing procedures.
Information obtained from a contractor through an audit authorized by
this subsection is confidential and not open to public inspection under
chapter 42.17 RCW.
(4)(a) The department shall set a schedule of fees by rule which
will cover the costs incurred by the department in the administration
of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.490.
(b)(i) Until April 1, 2004, subject to (a) of this subsection, and
for the purposes of implementing the pilot project approved by the
mobile/manufactured home alteration task force, the department may
adopt by rule a temporary statewide fee schedule that decreases fees
for mobile/manufactured home alteration permits and increases fees for
factory-built housing and commercial structures plan review and
inspection services. Under the temporary fee schedule, the department
may waive mobile/manufactured home alteration permit fees for indigent
permit applicants. The department may increase fees for factory-built
housing and commercial structures plan review and inspection services
in excess of the fiscal growth factor under chapter 43.135 RCW, if the
increases are necessary to fund the cost of administering RCW 43.22.335
through 43.22.490. In no instance shall any fee that applies to the
factory-built housing and commercial plan review and inspection
services be increased in excess of forty percent.
(ii) Effective April 1, 2004, the department must adopt a new fee
schedule that is the same as the fee schedule that was in effect
immediately prior to the temporary fee schedule authorized in ((section
2(4)(b), chapter 268, Laws of 2002)) (b)(i) of this subsection.
However, the new fee schedule must be adjusted by the fiscal growth
factors not applied during the period that the temporary fee schedule
was in effect.
(((5) This section expires April 1, 2004.))

Sec. 2 2002 c 268 s 10 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(((1))) Sections 1, 2, and 4 through 9 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.
(((2) Section 3 of this act takes effect April 1, 2004.))

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 43.22.434 was amended twice by chapter 268, Laws of 2002.
Both versions added identical language as a new subsection (3).
One version added a new subsection (4) and expired the entire
RCW April 1, 2004, in a new subsection (5). The other version
also added a new subsection (4), with provisions effective
April 1, 2004. The purpose of this bill is to retain the RCW
and allow for certain of its provisions to be effective until
April 1, 2004, and other of its provisions to be given effect
April 1, 2004.

--- END ---