BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.66.060 and 2000 c 111 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The district court shall have jurisdiction: (1) Concurrent with
the superior court of all misdemeanors and gross misdemeanors committed
in their respective counties and of all violations of city ordinances.
It shall in no event impose a greater punishment than a fine of five
thousand dollars, or imprisonment for one year in the county or city
jail as the case may be, or both such fine and imprisonment, unless
otherwise expressly provided by statute. It may suspend and revoke
vehicle operators' licenses in the cases provided by law; (2) to sit as
a committing magistrate and conduct preliminary hearings in cases
provided by law; (3) concurrent with the superior court of a proceeding
to keep the peace in their respective counties; (4) concurrent with the
superior court of all violations under Title ((75)) 77 RCW; (5) to hear
and determine traffic infractions under chapter 46.63 RCW; and (6) to
take recognizance, approve bail, and arraign defendants held within its
jurisdiction on warrants issued by other courts of limited jurisdiction
when those courts are participating in the program established under
RCW 2.56.160.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Title 75 RCW was recodified, repealed, and/or decodified in its
entirety by 2000 c 107.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.24.210 and 1997 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
any public or private landowners or others in lawful possession and
control of any lands whether designated resource, rural, or urban, or
water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels,
who allow members of the public to use them for the purposes of outdoor
recreation, which term includes, but is not limited to, the cutting,
gathering, and removing of firewood by private persons for their
personal use without purchasing the firewood from the landowner,
hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking, bicycling,
skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities,
hanggliding, paragliding, the riding of horses or other animals, clam
digging, pleasure driving of off-road vehicles, snowmobiles, and other
vehicles, boating, nature study, winter or water sports, viewing or
enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites,
without charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall not be liable for
unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
any public or private landowner or others in lawful possession and
control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water areas or channels
and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who offer or allow such
land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife cooperative project,
or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter or other solid
waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to any volunteer
group or to any other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land. Nothing in this section shall prevent the
liability of such a landowner or others in lawful possession and
control for injuries sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous
artificial latent condition for which warning signs have not been
conspicuously posted. Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and 4.24.210 limits or
expands in any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance. Usage by
members of the public, volunteer groups, or other users is permissive
and does not support any claim of adverse possession.
(4) For purposes of this section, a license or permit issued for
statewide use under authority of chapter ((43.51)) 79A.05 RCW((, Title
75,)) or Title 77 RCW is not a fee.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 43.51 RCW was recodified as chapter 79A.05 RCW pursuant
to 1999 c 249 § 1601.

Title 75 RCW was recodified, repealed, and/or decodified in its
entirety by 2000 c 107.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.84.020 and 1999 c 249 s 503 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definition in
this section applies throughout this chapter.
"Infraction" means an offense which, by the terms of Title ((75,))
76, 77, 79, or 79A RCW or chapter 43.30 RCW and rules adopted under
these titles and chapters, is declared not to be a criminal offense and
is subject to the provisions of this chapter.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Title 75 RCW was recodified, repealed, and/or decodified in its
entirety by 2000 c 107.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.84.040 and 1987 c 380 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Infraction proceedings may be heard and determined by a
district court.
(2) Infraction proceedings shall be brought in the district court
district in which the infraction occurred. If an infraction takes
place in the offshore waters, as defined in RCW ((75.08.011))
77.08.010, the infraction proceeding may be brought in any county
bordering on the Pacific Ocean.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.08.011 was repealed by 2000 c 107 § 125. RCW 77.08.010
has the same definition of "offshore waters" that appeared in
RCW 75.08.011.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.41.098 and 1996 c 295 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The superior courts and the courts of limited jurisdiction of
the state may order forfeiture of a firearm which is proven to be:
(a) Found concealed on a person not authorized by RCW 9.41.060 or
9.41.070 to carry a concealed pistol: PROVIDED, That it is an absolute
defense to forfeiture if the person possessed a valid Washington
concealed pistol license within the preceding two years and has not
become ineligible for a concealed pistol license in the interim.
Before the firearm may be returned, the person must pay the past due
renewal fee and the current renewal fee;
(b) Commercially sold to any person without an application as
required by RCW 9.41.090;
(c) In the possession of a person prohibited from possessing the
firearm under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045;
(d) In the possession or under the control of a person at the time
the person committed or was arrested for committing a felony or
committing a nonfelony crime in which a firearm was used or displayed;
(e) In the possession of a person who is in any place in which a
concealed pistol license is required, and who is under the influence of
any drug or under the influence of intoxicating liquor, as defined in
chapter 46.61 RCW;
(f) In the possession of a person free on bail or personal
recognizance pending trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony or for
a nonfelony crime in which a firearm was used or displayed, except that
violations of Title 77 RCW shall not result in forfeiture under this
section;
(g) In the possession of a person found to have been mentally
incompetent while in possession of a firearm when apprehended or who is
thereafter committed pursuant to chapter 10.77 or 71.05 RCW;
(h) Used or displayed by a person in the violation of a proper
written order of a court of general jurisdiction; or
(i) Used in the commission of a felony or of a nonfelony crime in
which a firearm was used or displayed.
(2) Upon order of forfeiture, the court in its discretion may order
destruction of any forfeited firearm. A court may temporarily retain
forfeited firearms needed for evidence.
(a) Except as provided in (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection,
firearms that are: (i) Judicially forfeited and no longer needed for
evidence; or (ii) forfeited due to a failure to make a claim under RCW
63.32.010 or 63.40.010; may be disposed of in any manner determined by
the local legislative authority. Any proceeds of an auction or trade
may be retained by the legislative authority. This subsection (2)(a)
applies only to firearms that come into the possession of the law
enforcement agency after June 30, 1993.
By midnight, June 30, 1993, every law enforcement agency shall
prepare an inventory, under oath, of every firearm that has been
judicially forfeited, has been seized and may be subject to judicial
forfeiture, or that has been, or may be, forfeited due to a failure to
make a claim under RCW 63.32.010 or 63.40.010.
(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, of the
inventoried firearms a law enforcement agency shall destroy illegal
firearms, may retain a maximum of ten percent of legal forfeited
firearms for agency use, and shall either:
(i) Comply with the provisions for the auction of firearms in RCW
9.41.098 that were in effect immediately preceding May 7, 1993; or
(ii) Trade, auction, or arrange for the auction of, rifles and
shotguns. In addition, the law enforcement agency shall either trade,
auction, or arrange for the auction of, short firearms, or shall pay a
fee of twenty-five dollars to the state treasurer for every short
firearm neither auctioned nor traded, to a maximum of fifty thousand
dollars. The fees shall be accompanied by an inventory, under oath, of
every short firearm listed in the inventory required by (a) of this
subsection, that has been neither traded nor auctioned. The state
treasurer shall credit the fees to the firearms range account
established in RCW ((77.12.720)) 79A.25.210. All trades or auctions of
firearms under this subsection shall be to licensed dealers. Proceeds
of any auction less costs, including actual costs of storage and sale,
shall be forwarded to the firearms range account established in RCW
((77.12.720)) 79A.25.210.
(c) Antique firearms and firearms recognized as curios, relics, and
firearms of particular historical significance by the United States
treasury department bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms are exempt
from destruction and shall be disposed of by auction or trade to
licensed dealers.
(d) Firearms in the possession of the Washington state patrol on or
after May 7, 1993, that are judicially forfeited and no longer needed
for evidence, or forfeited due to a failure to make a claim under RCW
63.35.020, must be disposed of as follows: (i) Firearms illegal for
any person to possess must be destroyed; (ii) the Washington state
patrol may retain a maximum of ten percent of legal firearms for agency
use; and (iii) all other legal firearms must be auctioned or traded to
licensed dealers. The Washington state patrol may retain any proceeds
of an auction or trade.
(3) The court shall order the firearm returned to the owner upon a
showing that there is no probable cause to believe a violation of
subsection (1) of this section existed or the firearm was stolen from
the owner or the owner neither had knowledge of nor consented to the
act or omission involving the firearm which resulted in its forfeiture.
(4) A law enforcement officer of the state or of any county or
municipality may confiscate a firearm found to be in the possession of
a person under circumstances specified in subsection (1) of this
section. After confiscation, the firearm shall not be surrendered
except: (a) To the prosecuting attorney for use in subsequent legal
proceedings; (b) for disposition according to an order of a court
having jurisdiction as provided in subsection (1) of this section; or
(c) to the owner if the proceedings are dismissed or as directed in
subsection (3) of this section.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 77.12.720 was recodified as RCW 79A.25.210 pursuant to 1999
c 249 § 1601.

Sec. 6 RCW 10.105.900 and 1994 c 218 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to property subject to forfeiture under
chapter 66.32 RCW, RCW 69.50.505, 9.41.098, 9.46.231, 9A.82.100,
9A.83.030, 7.48.090, or ((77.12.101)) 77.15.070.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 77.12.101 was repealed by 2000 c 107 § 273. RCW 77.15.070,
amended by 2000 c 107 § 231, is now the fish and wildlife
forfeiture statute.

Sec. 7 RCW 15.85.020 and 1989 c 176 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Aquaculture" means the process of growing, farming, or
cultivating private sector cultured aquatic products in marine or
freshwaters and includes management by an aquatic farmer.
(2) "Aquatic farmer" is a private sector person who commercially
farms and manages the cultivating of private sector cultured aquatic
products on the person's own land or on land in which the person has a
present right of possession.
(3) "Private sector cultured aquatic products" are native,
nonnative, or hybrids of marine or freshwater plants and animals that
are propagated, farmed, or cultivated on aquatic farms under the
supervision and management of a private sector aquatic farmer or that
are naturally set on aquatic farms which at the time of setting are
under the active supervision and management of a private sector aquatic
farmer. When produced under such supervision and management, private
sector cultured aquatic products include, but are not limited to, the
following plants and animals:

Scientific Name Common Name

Enteromorpha green nori

Monostroma awo-nori

Ulva sea lettuce

Laminaria konbu

Nereocystis bull kelp

Porphyra nori

Iridaea

Haliotis abalone

Zhlamys pink scallop

Hinnites rock scallop

Tatinopecten Japanese or weathervane
scallop

Protothaca native littleneck clam

Tapes manila clam

Saxidomus butter clam

Mytilus mussels

Crassostrea Pacific oysters

Ostrea Olympia and European oysters

Pacifasticus crayfish

Macrobrachium freshwater prawn

Salmo and Salvelinus trout, char, and Atlantic
salmon

Oncorhynchus salmon

Ictalurus catfish

Cyprinus carp

Acipenseridae Sturgeon

Private sector cultured aquatic products do not include herring
spawn on kelp and other products harvested under a herring spawn on
kelp permit issued in accordance with RCW ((75.28.245)) 77.70.210.
(4) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(5) "Director" means the director of agriculture.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.28.245 was recodified as RCW 75.30.270 pursuant to 1993
c 340 § 54, effective January 1, 1994. RCW 75.30.270 was
subsequently recodified as RCW 77.70.210 pursuant to 2000 c 107
§ 132.

Sec. 8 RCW 15.85.060 and 1994 c 264 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall establish identification requirements for
private sector cultured aquatic products to the extent that identifying
the source and quantity of the products is necessary to permit the
department of fish and wildlife to administer and enforce ((Titles 75
and)) Title 77 RCW effectively. The rules shall apply only to those
private sector cultured aquatic products the transportation, sale,
processing, or other possession of which would otherwise be required to
be licensed under Title ((75 or)) 77 RCW if they were not cultivated by
aquatic farmers. The rules shall apply to the transportation or
possession of such products on land other than aquatic lands and may
require that they be: (1) Placed in labeled containers or accompanied
by bills of lading or sale or similar documents identifying the name
and address of the producer of the products and the quantity of the
products governed by the documents; or (2) both labeled and accompanied
by such documents.
The director shall consult with the director of fish and wildlife
to ensure that such rules enable the department of fish and wildlife to
enforce the programs administered under those titles. If rules adopted
under chapter 69.30 RCW satisfy the identification required under this
section for shellfish, the director shall not establish different
shellfish identification requirements under this section.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Title 75 RCW was recodified, repealed, and/or decodified in its
entirety by 2000 c 107.

Sec. 9 RCW 16.36.005 and 1998 c 8 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
As used in this chapter:
"Animal" means all members of the animal kingdom except humans,
fish, and insects. However, "animal" does not mean noncaptive wildlife
as defined in RCW 77.08.010(16), except as used in RCW 16.36.050(1) and
16.36.080 (1), (2), (3), and (5).
"Animal reproductive product" means sperm, ova, fertilized ova, and
embryos from animals.
"Farm-raised fish" means fish raised by aquaculture as defined in
RCW 15.85.020. Farm-raised fish are considered to be a part of animal
agriculture; however, disease inspection, prevention, and control
programs and related activities for farm-raised fish are administered
by the department of fish and wildlife under chapter ((75.58)) 77.115
RCW.
"Communicable disease" means a disease due to a specific infectious
agent or its toxic products transmitted from an infected person,
animal, or inanimate reservoir to a susceptible host, either directly
or indirectly through an intermediate plant or animal host, vector, or
the environment.
"Contagious disease" means a communicable disease that is capable
of being easily transmitted from one animal to another animal or a
human.
"Director" means the director of agriculture of the state of
Washington or his or her authorized representative.
"Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of
Washington.
"Deputized state veterinarian" means a Washington state licensed
and accredited veterinarian appointed and compensated by the director
according to state law and department policies.
"Garbage" means the solid animal and vegetable waste and offal
together with the natural moisture content resulting from the handling,
preparation, or consumption of foods in houses, restaurants, hotels,
kitchens, markets, meat shops, packing houses and similar
establishments or any other food waste containing meat or meat
products.
"Herd or flock plan" means a written management agreement between
the owner of a herd or flock and the state veterinarian, with possible
input from a private accredited veterinarian designated by the owner
and the area veterinarian-in-charge of the United States department of
agriculture, animal and plant health inspection service, veterinary
services in which each participant agrees to undertake actions
specified in the herd or flock plan to control the spread of
infectious, contagious, or communicable disease within and from an
infected herd or flock and to work toward eradicating the disease in
the infected herd or flock.
"Hold order" means an order by the director to the owner or agent
of the owner of animals or animal reproductive products which restricts
the animals or products to a designated holding location pending an
investigation by the director of the disease, disease exposure, well-being, movement, or import status of the animals or animal reproductive
products.
"Infectious agent" means an organism including viruses, rickettsia,
bacteria, fungi, protozoa, helminthes, or prions that is capable of
producing infection or infectious disease.
"Infectious disease" means a clinical disease of ((man)) humans or
animals resulting from an infection with an infectious agent that may
or may not be communicable or contagious.
"Livestock" means horses, mules, donkeys, cattle, bison, sheep,
goats, swine, rabbits, llamas, alpacas, ratites, poultry, waterfowl,
game birds, and other species so designated by statute. "Livestock"
does not mean free ranging wildlife as defined in Title 77 RCW.
"Person" means a person, persons, firm, or corporation.
"Quarantine" means the placing and restraining of any animal or its
reproductive products by the owner or agent of the owner within a
certain described and designated enclosure or area within this state,
or the restraining of any animal or its reproductive products from
entering this state, as may be directed in an order by the director.
"Reportable disease" means a disease designated by rule by the
director as reportable to the department by veterinarians and others
made responsible to report by statute.
"Veterinary biologic" means any virus, serum, toxin, and analogous
product of natural or synthetic origin, or product prepared from any
type of genetic engineering, such as diagnostics, antitoxins, vaccines,
live microorganisms, killed microorganisms, and the antigenic or
immunizing components intended for use in the diagnosis, treatment, or
prevention of diseases in animals.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 75.58 RCW was recodified as chapter 77.115 RCW by 2000
c 107. The section is also made gender neutral.

Sec. 10 RCW 17.26.020 and 1995 c 255 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Facilitating the control of spartina and purple loosestrife is
a high priority for all state agencies.
(2) The department of natural resources is responsible for spartina
and purple loosestrife control on state-owned aquatic lands managed by
the department of natural resources.
(3) The department of fish and wildlife is responsible for spartina
and purple loosestrife control on state-owned aquatic lands managed by
the department of fish and wildlife.
(4) The state parks and recreation commission is responsible for
spartina and purple loosestrife control on state-owned aquatic lands
managed by the state parks and recreation commission.
(5) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this chapter, RCW 90.48.020,
90.58.030, and ((75.20.108)) 77.55.150:
(a) "Spartina" means Spartina alterniflora, Spartina anglica,
Spartina x townsendii, and Spartina patens.
(b) "Purple loosestrife" means Lythrum salicaria and Lythrum
virgatum.
(c) "Aquatic noxious weed" means an aquatic weed on the state
noxious weed list adopted under RCW 17.10.080.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.108 was recodified as RCW 77.55.150 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 11 RCW 19.27.490 and 1998 c 249 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
A fish habitat enhancement project meeting the criteria of RCW
((75.20.350(1))) 77.55.290(1) is not subject to grading permits,
inspections, or fees and shall be reviewed according to the provisions
of RCW ((75.20.350)) 77.55.290.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.350 was recodified as RCW 77.55.290 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 12 RCW 19.158.020 and 1989 c 20 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) A "commercial telephone solicitor" is any person who engages in
commercial telephone solicitation, including service bureaus.
(2) "Commercial telephone solicitation" means:
(a) An unsolicited telephone call to a person initiated by a
salesperson and conversation for the purpose of inducing the person to
purchase or invest in property, goods, or services;
(b) Other communication with a person where:
(i) A free gift, award, or prize is offered to a purchaser who has
not previously purchased from the person initiating the communication;
and
(ii) A telephone call response is invited; and
(iii) The salesperson intends to complete a sale or enter into an
agreement to purchase during the course of the telephone call;
(c) Other communication with a person which misrepresents the
price, quality, or availability of property, goods, or services and
which invites a response by telephone or which is followed by a call to
the person by a salesperson;
(d) For purposes of this section, "other communication" means a
written or oral notification or advertisement transmitted through any
means.
(3) A "commercial telephone solicitor" does not include any of the
following:
(a) A person engaging in commercial telephone solicitation where:
(i) The solicitation is an isolated transaction and not done in the
course of a pattern of repeated transactions of like nature; or
(ii) Less than sixty percent of such person's prior year's sales
were made as a result of a commercial telephone solicitation as defined
in this chapter. Where more than sixty percent of a seller's prior
year's sales were made as a result of commercial telephone
solicitations, the service bureau contracting to provide commercial
telephone solicitation services to the seller shall be deemed a
commercial telephone solicitor.
(b) A person making calls for religious, charitable, political, or
other noncommercial purposes.
(c) A person soliciting business solely from purchasers who have
previously purchased from the business enterprise for which the person
is calling.
(d) A person soliciting:
(i) Without the intent to complete or obtain provisional acceptance
of a sale during the telephone solicitation; and
(ii) Who does not make the major sales presentation during the
telephone solicitation; and
(iii) Who only makes the major sales presentation or arranges for
the major sales presentation to be made at a later face-to-face meeting
between the salesperson and the purchaser.
(e) A person selling a security which is exempt from registration
under RCW 21.20.310;
(f) A person licensed under RCW 18.85.090 when the solicited
transaction is governed by that law;
(g) A person registered under RCW 18.27.060 when the solicited
transaction is governed by that law;
(h) A person licensed under RCW 48.17.150 when the solicited
transaction is governed by that law;
(i) Any person soliciting the sale of a franchise who is registered
under RCW 19.100.140;
(j) A person primarily soliciting the sale of a newspaper of
general circulation, a magazine or periodical, or contractual plans,
including book or record clubs: (i) Under which the seller provides
the consumer with a form which the consumer may use to instruct the
seller not to ship the offered merchandise; and (ii) which is regulated
by the federal trade commission trade regulation concerning "use of
negative option plans by sellers in commerce";
(k) Any supervised financial institution or parent, subsidiary, or
affiliate thereof. As used in this section, "supervised financial
institution" means any commercial bank, trust company, savings and loan
association, mutual savings banks, credit union, industrial loan
company, personal property broker, consumer finance lender, commercial
finance lender, or insurer, provided that the institution is subject to
supervision by an official or agency of this state or the United
States;
(l) A person soliciting the sale of a prearrangement funeral
service contract registered under RCW 18.39.240 and 18.39.260;
(m) A person licensed to enter into prearrangement contracts under
RCW 68.05.155 when acting subject to that license;
(n) A person soliciting the sale of services provided by a cable
television system operating under authority of a franchise or permit;
(o) A person or affiliate of a person whose business is regulated
by the utilities and transportation commission or the federal
communications commission;
(p) A person soliciting the sale of agricultural products, as
defined in RCW 20.01.010 where the purchaser is a business;
(q) An issuer or subsidiary of an issuer that has a class of
securities that is subject to section 12 of the securities exchange act
of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 781) and that is either registered or exempt
from registration under paragraph (A), (B), (C), (E), (F), (G), or (H)
of subsection (g) of that section;
(r) A commodity broker-dealer as defined in RCW 21.30.010 and
registered with the commodity futures trading commission;
(s) A business-to-business sale where:
(i) The purchaser business intends to resell the property or goods
purchased, or
(ii) The purchaser business intends to use the property or goods
purchased in a recycling, reuse, remanufacturing or manufacturing
process;
(t) A person licensed under RCW 19.16.110 when the solicited
transaction is governed by that law;
(u) A person soliciting the sale of food intended for immediate
delivery to and immediate consumption by the purchaser;
(v) A person soliciting the sale of food fish or shellfish when
that person is licensed pursuant to the provisions of Title ((75)) 77
RCW.
(4) "Purchaser" means a person who is solicited to become or does
become obligated to a commercial telephone solicitor.
(5) "Salesperson" means any individual employed, appointed, or
authorized by a commercial telephone solicitor, whether referred to by
the commercial telephone solicitor as an agent, representative, or
independent contractor, who attempts to solicit or solicits a sale on
behalf of the commercial telephone solicitor.
(6) "Service bureau" means a commercial telephone solicitor who
contracts with any person to provide commercial telephone solicitation
services.
(7) "Seller" means any person who contracts with any service bureau
to purchase commercial telephone solicitation services.
(8) "Person" includes any individual, firm, association,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, or any
other business entity.
(9) "Free gift, award, or prize" means a gratuity which the
purchaser believes of a value equal to or greater than the value of the
specific product, good, or service sought to be sold to the purchaser
by the seller.
(10) "Solicit" means to initiate contact with a purchaser for the
purpose of attempting to sell property, goods or services, where such
purchaser has expressed no previous interest in purchasing, investing
in, or obtaining information regarding the property, goods, or services
attempted to be sold.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Title 75 RCW was recodified, repealed, and/or decodified in its
entirety by 2000 c 107. Provisions concerning the licensing of
persons to sell food fish or shellfish now appear in Title 77
RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 34.05.328 and 1997 c 430 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall:
(a) Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific
objectives of the statute that the rule implements;
(b) Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and
analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not
adopting the rule;
(c) Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater
than its probable costs, taking into account both the qualitative and
quantitative benefits and costs and the specific directives of the
statute being implemented;
(d) Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule
and the analysis required under (b) and (c) of this subsection, that
the rule being adopted is the least burdensome alternative for those
required to comply with it that will achieve the general goals and
specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;
(e) Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it
applies to take an action that violates requirements of another federal
or state law;
(f) Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent
performance requirements on private entities than on public entities
unless required to do so by federal or state law;
(g) Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or
statute applicable to the same activity or subject matter and, if so,
determine that the difference is justified by the following:
(i) A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ
from federal standards; or
(ii) Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of
this subsection; and
(h) Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with
other federal, state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or
subject matter.
(2) In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b)
through (g) of this section, the agency shall place in the rule-making
file documentation of sufficient quantity and quality so as to persuade
a reasonable person that the determinations are justified.
(3) Before adopting rules described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall place in the rule-making file a rule
implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting order. The
plan shall describe how the agency intends to:
(a) Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the
resources the agency intends to use;
(b) Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;
(c) Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and
(d) Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was
adopted, including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of
interim milestones to assess progress and the use of objectively
measurable outcomes.
(4) After adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section regulating the same activity or subject matter as another
provision of federal or state law, an agency shall do all of the
following:
(a) Provide to the business assistance center a list citing by
reference the other federal and state laws that regulate the same
activity or subject matter;
(b) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the
other federal and state entities regulating the same activity or
subject matter by making every effort to do one or more of the
following:
(i) Deferring to the other entity;
(ii) Designating a lead agency; or
(iii) Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying
how the agency and entities will coordinate implementation and
enforcement.
If the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (4)(b), the
agency shall report to the legislature pursuant to (c) of this
subsection;
(c) Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:
(i) The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or
state laws, any differences from federal law, and any known overlap,
duplication, or conflict with local laws; and
(ii) Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary
to eliminate or mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap,
duplication, or difference.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section
applies to:
(i) Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology,
labor and industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and
natural resources, the employment security department, the forest
practices board, the office of the insurance commissioner, and to the
legislative rules of the department of fish and wildlife implementing
chapter ((75.20)) 77.55 RCW; and
(ii) Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made
applicable to the rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule
by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee
within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(i) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(ii) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(iii) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(iv) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(v) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(vi) Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards; or
(vii) Rules of the department of social and health services
relating only to client medical or financial eligibility and rules
concerning liability for care of dependents.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals
(A) any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency
hearings; (B) any filing or related process requirement for making
application to an agency for a license or permit; or (C) any policy
statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations of an
agency.
(ii) An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does
not subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the
agency's interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.
(iii) A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a
procedural or interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions
of law pursuant to delegated legislative authority, the violation of
which subjects a violator of such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B)
establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard for the
issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit; or (C)
adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or
regulatory program.
(d) In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an
agency shall state whether this section applies to the proposed rule
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or if the agency will apply this
section voluntarily.
(6) By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered
year thereafter, the office of financial management, after consulting
with state agencies, counties, and cities, and business, labor, and
environmental organizations, shall report to the governor and the
legislature regarding the effects of this section on the regulatory
system in this state. The report shall document:
(a) The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the
extent possible, how compliance with this section affected the
substance of the rule, if any, that the agency ultimately adopted;
(b) The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this
section;
(c) Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of
any agency to comply with this section, the costs to the state of such
action, and the result;
(d) The extent to which this section has adversely affected the
capacity of agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;
(e) The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability
of state rules to those regulated; and
(f) Any other information considered by the office of financial
management to be useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 75.20 RCW was recodified as chapter 77.55 RCW by 2000
c 107.

Sec. 14 RCW 35.21.404 and 1998 c 249 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A city or town is not liable for adverse impacts resulting from a
fish enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW ((75.20.350))
77.55.290 and has been permitted by the department of fish and
wildlife.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.350 was recodified as RCW 77.55.290 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 15 RCW 35.63.230 and 1998 c 249 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A permit required under this chapter for a watershed restoration
project as defined in RCW 89.08.460 shall be processed in compliance
with RCW 89.08.450 through 89.08.510. A fish habitat enhancement
project meeting the criteria of RCW ((75.20.350(1))) 77.55.290(1) shall
be reviewed and approved according to the provisions of RCW
((75.20.350)) 77.55.290.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.350 was recodified as RCW 77.55.290 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 16 RCW 35A.21.290 and 1998 c 249 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
A code city is not liable for adverse impacts resulting from a fish
enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW ((75.20.350))
77.55.290 and has been permitted by the department of fish and
wildlife.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.350 was recodified as RCW 77.55.290 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 17 RCW 35A.63.250 and 1998 c 249 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
A permit required under this chapter for a watershed restoration
project as defined in RCW 89.08.460 shall be processed in compliance
with RCW 89.08.450 through 89.08.510. A fish habitat enhancement
project meeting the criteria of RCW ((75.20.350(1))) 77.55.290(1) shall
be reviewed and approved according to the provisions of RCW
((75.20.350)) 77.55.290.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.350 was recodified as RCW 77.55.290 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 18 RCW 35A.69.010 and 1999 c 291 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every code city shall have the powers, perform the functions and
duties and enforce the regulations prescribed by general laws relating
to food and drugs for any class of city as provided by Title 69 RCW;
relating to water pollution control as provided by chapter 90.48 RCW;
and relating to food fish and shellfish as provided by Title ((75)) 77
RCW.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Title 75 RCW was recodified, repealed, and/or decodified in its
entirety by 2000 c 107. Laws concerning food fish and
shellfish are now codified in Title 77 RCW.

Sec. 19 RCW 36.70.982 and 1998 c 249 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A county is not liable for adverse impacts resulting from a fish
enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW ((75.20.350))
77.55.290 and has been permitted by the department of fish and
wildlife.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.350 was recodified as RCW 77.55.290 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 20 RCW 36.70.992 and 1998 c 249 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A permit required under this chapter for a watershed restoration
project as defined in RCW 89.08.460 shall be processed in compliance
with RCW 89.08.450 through 89.08.510. A fish habitat enhancement
project meeting the criteria of RCW ((75.20.350(1))) 77.55.290(1) shall
be reviewed and approved according to the provisions of RCW
((75.20.350)) 77.55.290.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.350 was recodified as RCW 77.55.290 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 21 RCW 36.70A.460 and 1998 c 249 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
A permit required under this chapter for a watershed restoration
project as defined in RCW 89.08.460 shall be processed in compliance
with RCW 89.08.450 through 89.08.510. A fish habitat enhancement
project meeting the criteria of RCW ((75.20.350(1))) 77.55.290(1) shall
be reviewed and approved according to the provisions of RCW
((75.20.350)) 77.55.290.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.350 was recodified as RCW 77.55.290 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 22 RCW 43.21B.005 and 1999 c 125 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created an environmental hearings office of the state
of Washington. The environmental hearings office shall consist of the
pollution control hearings board created in RCW 43.21B.010, the forest
practices appeals board created in RCW 76.09.210, the shorelines
hearings board created in RCW 90.58.170, and the hydraulic appeals
board created in RCW ((75.20.130)) 77.55.170. The ((chairman)) chair
of the pollution control hearings board shall be the chief executive
officer of the environmental hearings office. Membership, powers,
functions, and duties of the pollution control hearings board, the
forest practices appeals board, the shorelines hearings board, and the
hydraulic appeals board shall be as provided by law.
(2) The chief executive officer of the environmental hearings
office may appoint an administrative appeals judge who shall possess
the powers and duties conferred by the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, in cases before the boards comprising the office.
The administrative appeals judge shall have a demonstrated knowledge of
environmental law, and shall be admitted to the practice of law in the
state of Washington. Additional administrative appeals judges may also
be appointed by the chief executive officer on the same terms.
Administrative appeals judges shall not be subject to chapter 41.06
RCW.
(3) The administrative appeals judges appointed under subsection
(2) of this section are subject to discipline and termination, for
cause, by the chief executive officer. Upon written request by the
person so disciplined or terminated, the chief executive officer shall
state the reasons for such action in writing. The person affected has
a right of review by the superior court of Thurston county on petition
for reinstatement or other remedy filed within thirty days of receipt
of such written reasons.
(4) The chief executive officer may appoint, discharge, and fix the
compensation of such administrative or clerical staff as may be
necessary.
(5) The chief executive officer may also contract for required
services.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.130 was recodified as RCW 77.55.170 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129. The section is also made gender neutral.

Sec. 23 RCW 43.21C.0382 and 1998 c 249 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Decisions pertaining to watershed restoration projects as defined
in RCW 89.08.460 are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c). Decisions pertaining to fish habitat enhancement
projects meeting the criteria of RCW ((75.20.350(1))) 77.55.290(1) and
being reviewed and approved according to the provisions of RCW
((75.20.350)) 77.55.290 are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c).

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.350 was recodified as RCW 77.55.290 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 24 RCW 43.21C.260 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 1201 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Decisions pertaining to the following kinds of actions under
chapter 4, Laws of 1999 sp. sess. are not subject to any procedural
requirements implementing RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c): (a) Approval of forest
road maintenance and abandonment plans under chapter 76.09 RCW and
RCW ((75.20.100)) 77.55.100; (b) approval by the department of natural
resources of future timber harvest schedules involving east-side clear
cuts under rules implementing chapter 76.09 RCW; (c) acquisitions of
forest lands in stream channel migration zones under RCW 76.09.040; and
(d) acquisitions of conservation easements pertaining to forest lands
in riparian zones under RCW 76.13.120.
(2) For purposes of the department's threshold determination on a
watershed analysis, the department shall not make a determination of
significance unless the prescriptions themselves, compared to rules or
prescriptions in place prior to the analysis, will cause probable
significant adverse impact on elements of the environment other than
those addressed in the watershed analysis process. Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to effect the outcome of pending
litigation regarding the department's authority in making a threshold
determination on a watershed analysis.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.100 was recodified as RCW 77.55.100 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 25 RCW 43.21K.010 and 1997 c 381 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "State, regional, or local agency" means an agency, board,
department, authority, or commission that administers environmental
laws.
(2) "Coordinating agency" means the state, regional, or local
agency with the primary regulatory responsibility for the proposed
environmental excellence program agreement. If multiple agencies have
jurisdiction to administer state environmental laws affected by an
environmental excellence agreement, the department of ecology shall
designate or act as the coordinating agency.
(3) "Director" means the individual or body of individuals in whom
the ultimate legal authority of an agency is vested by any provision of
law. If the agency head is a body of individuals, a majority of those
individuals constitutes the director.
(4) "Environmental laws" means chapters 43.21A, 70.94, 70.95,
70.105, 70.119A, ((75.20)) 77.55, 90.48, 90.52, 90.58, 90.64, and 90.71
RCW, and RCW 90.54.020(3)(b) and rules adopted under those chapters and
section. The term environmental laws as used in this chapter does not
include any provision of the Revised Code of Washington, or of any
municipal ordinance or enactment, that regulates the selection of a
location for a new facility.
(5) "Facility" means a site or activity that is regulated under any
of the provisions of the environmental laws.
(6) "Legal requirement" includes any provision of an environmental
law, rule, order, or permit.
(7) "Sponsor" means the owner or operator of a facility, including
a municipal corporation, subject to regulation under the environmental
laws of the state of Washington, or an authorized representative of the
owner or operator, that submits a proposal for an environmental
excellence program agreement.
(8) "Stakeholder" means a person who has a direct interest in the
proposed environmental excellence program agreement or who represents
a public interest in the proposed environmental excellence program
agreement. Stakeholders may include communities near the project,
local or state governments, permittees, businesses, environmental and
other public interest groups, employees or employee representatives, or
other persons.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 75.20 RCW was recodified as chapter 77.55 RCW by 2000
c 107.

Sec. 26 RCW 43.52.440 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 178 are each
amended to read as follows:
Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to amend,
modify or repeal in any manner RCW ((75.20.110)) 77.55.160, commonly
known as the "Columbia River Sanctuary Act", and all matter herein
contained shall be expressly subject to such act.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.110 was recodified as RCW 77.55.160 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 27 RCW 43.101.010 and 2001 c 167 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
When used in this chapter:
(1) The term "commission" means the Washington state criminal
justice training commission.
(2) The term "boards" means the education and training standards
boards, the establishment of which are authorized by this chapter.
(3) The term "criminal justice personnel" means any person who
serves in a county, city, state, or port commission agency engaged in
crime prevention, crime reduction, or enforcement of the criminal law.
(4) The term "law enforcement personnel" means any public employee
or volunteer having as a primary function the enforcement of criminal
laws in general or any employee or volunteer of, or any individual
commissioned by, any municipal, county, state, or combination thereof,
agency having as its primary function the enforcement of criminal laws
in general as distinguished from an agency possessing peace officer
powers, the primary function of which is the implementation of
specialized subject matter areas. For the purposes of this subsection
"primary function" means that function to which the greater allocation
of resources is made.
(5) The term "correctional personnel" means any employee or
volunteer who by state, county, municipal, or combination thereof,
statute has the responsibility for the confinement, care, management,
training, treatment, education, supervision, or counseling of those
individuals whose civil rights have been limited in some way by legal
sanction.
(6) A peace officer is "convicted" at the time a plea of guilty has
been accepted, or a verdict of guilty or finding of guilt has been
filed, notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings,
including but not limited to sentencing, posttrial or postfact-finding
motions and appeals. "Conviction" includes a deferral of sentence and
also includes the equivalent disposition by a court in a jurisdiction
other than the state of Washington.
(7) "Discharged for disqualifying misconduct" means terminated from
employment for: (a) Conviction of (i) any crime committed under color
of authority as a peace officer, (ii) any crime involving dishonesty or
false statement within the meaning of Evidence Rule 609(a), (iii) the
unlawful use or possession of a controlled substance, or (iv) any other
crime the conviction of which disqualifies a Washington citizen from
the legal right to possess a firearm under state or federal law; (b)
conduct that would constitute any of the crimes addressed in (a) of
this subsection; or (c) knowingly making materially false statements
during disciplinary investigations, where the false statements are the
sole basis for the termination.
(8) A peace officer is "discharged for disqualifying misconduct"
within the meaning of subsection (7) of this section under the ordinary
meaning of the term and when the totality of the circumstances support
a finding that the officer resigned in anticipation of discipline,
whether or not the misconduct was discovered at the time of
resignation, and when such discipline, if carried forward, would more
likely than not have led to discharge for disqualifying misconduct
within the meaning of subsection (7) of this section.
(9) When used in context of proceedings referred to in this
chapter, "final" means that the peace officer has exhausted all
available civil service appeals, collective bargaining remedies, and
all other such direct administrative appeals, and the officer has not
been reinstated as the result of the action. Finality is not affected
by the pendency or availability of state or federal administrative or
court actions for discrimination, or by the pendency or availability of
any remedies other than direct civil service and collective bargaining
remedies.
(10) "Peace officer" means any law enforcement personnel subject to
the basic law enforcement training requirement of RCW 43.101.200 and
any other requirements of that section, notwithstanding any waiver or
exemption granted by the commission, and notwithstanding the statutory
exemption based on date of initial hire under RCW 43.101.200.
Commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol, whether they have
been or may be exempted by rule of the commission from the basic
training requirement of RCW 43.101.200, are included as peace officers
for purposes of this chapter. Fish and wildlife officers with
enforcement powers for all criminal laws under RCW ((77.12.055))
77.15.075 are peace officers for purposes of this chapter.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 77.12.055 was recodified as RCW 77.15.075 by 2001 c 253 §
61.

Sec. 28 RCW 69.04.930 and 1999 c 291 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person to sell at retail or display
for sale at retail any food fish as defined in RCW 77.08.022 or
shellfish as defined in RCW ((75.08.011)) 77.08.010, any meat, or any
meat food product which has been frozen at any time, without having the
package or container in which the same is sold bear a label clearly
discernible to a customer that such product has been frozen and whether
or not the same has since been thawed. No such food fish or shellfish,
meat or meat food product shall be sold unless in such a package or
container bearing said label: PROVIDED, That this section shall not
include any of the aforementioned food or food products that have been
frozen prior to being smoked, cured, cooked or subjected to the heat of
commercial sterilization.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.08.011 was repealed by 2000 c 107 § 125. The section
updates the citations for the correct definitions of food fish
and shellfish.

Sec. 29 RCW 69.04.934 and 1993 c 282 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
With the exception of a commercial fisher engaged in sales of fish
to a fish buyer, no person may sell at wholesale or retail any fresh or
frozen:
(1) Private sector cultured aquatic salmon without identifying the
product as farm-raised salmon; or
(2) Commercially caught salmon designated as food fish under Title
((75)) 77 RCW without identifying the product as commercially caught
salmon.
Identification of the products under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section shall be made to the buyer at the point of sale such that
the buyer can make an informed decision in purchasing.
A person knowingly violating this section is guilty of misbranding
under this chapter. A person who receives misleading or erroneous
information about whether the salmon is farm-raised or commercially
caught, and subsequently inaccurately identifies salmon shall not be
guilty of misbranding. This section shall not apply to salmon that is
minced, pulverized, coated with batter, or breaded.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Title 75 RCW was recodified, repealed, and/or decodified in its
entirety by 2000 c 107.

Sec. 30 RCW 70.105D.090 and 1994 c 257 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person conducting a remedial action at a facility under a
consent decree, order, or agreed order, and the department when it
conducts a remedial action, are exempt from the procedural requirements
of chapters 70.94, 70.95, 70.105, ((75.20)) 77.55, 90.48, and 90.58
RCW, and the procedural requirements of any laws requiring or
authorizing local government permits or approvals for the remedial
action. The department shall ensure compliance with the substantive
provisions of chapters 70.94, 70.95, 70.105, ((75.20)) 77.55, 90.48,
and 90.58 RCW, and the substantive provisions of any laws requiring or
authorizing local government permits of approvals. The department
shall establish procedures for ensuring that such remedial actions
comply with the substantive requirements adopted pursuant to such laws,
and shall consult with the state agencies and local governments charged
with implementing these laws. The procedures shall provide an
opportunity for comment by the public and by the state agencies and
local governments that would otherwise implement the laws referenced in
this section. Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit
implementing agencies from charging a fee to the person conducting the
remedial action to defray the costs of services rendered relating to
the substantive requirements for the remedial action.
(2) An exemption in this section or in RCW 70.94.335, 70.95.270,
70.105.116, ((75.20.025)) 77.55.030, 90.48.039, and 90.58.355 shall not
apply if the department determines that the exemption would result in
loss of approval from a federal agency necessary for the state to
administer any federal law, including the federal resource conservation
and recovery act, the federal clean water act, the federal clean air
act, and the federal coastal zone management act. Such a determination
by the department shall not affect the applicability of the exemptions
to other statutes specified in this section.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 75.20 RCW was recodified as chapter 77.55 RCW by 2000
c 107.

RCW 75.20.025 was recodified as RCW 77.55.030 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 31 RCW 72.63.040 and 1989 c 185 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The costs of implementation of the projects prescribed by this
chapter shall be supported to the extent that funds are available under
the provisions of chapter ((75.52)) 77.100 RCW, and from correctional
industries funds.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 75.52 RCW was recodified as chapter 77.100 RCW by 2000
c 107.

Sec. 32 RCW 76.09.030 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 1001 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the forest practices board of the state
of Washington as an agency of state government consisting of members as
follows:
(a) The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's
designee;
(b) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the director's designee;
(c) The director of the department of agriculture or the director's
designee;
(d) The director of the department of ecology or the director's
designee;
(e) The director of the department of fish and wildlife or the
director's designee;
(f) An elected member of a county legislative authority appointed
by the governor: PROVIDED, That such member's service on the board
shall be conditioned on the member's continued service as an elected
county official; and
(g) Six members of the general public appointed by the governor,
one of whom shall be an owner of not more than five hundred acres of
forest land, and one of whom shall be an independent logging
contractor.
(2) The director of the department of fish and wildlife's service
on the board may be terminated two years after August 18, 1999, if the
legislature finds that after two years the department has not made
substantial progress toward integrating the laws, rules, and programs
governing forest practices, chapter 76.09 RCW, and the laws, rules, and
programs governing hydraulic projects, chapter ((75.20)) 77.55 RCW.
Such a finding shall be based solely on whether the department of fish
and wildlife makes substantial progress as defined in this subsection,
and will not be based on other actions taken as a member of the board.
Substantial progress shall include recommendations to the legislature
for closer integration of the existing rule-making authorities of the
board and the department of fish and wildlife, and closer integration
of the forest practices and hydraulics permitting processes, including
exploring the potential for a consolidated permitting process. These
recommendations shall be designed to resolve problems currently
associated with the existing dual regulatory and permitting processes.
(3) The members of the initial board appointed by the governor
shall be appointed so that the term of one member shall expire December
31, 1975, the term of one member shall expire December 31, 1976, the
term of one member shall expire December 31, 1977, the terms of two
members shall expire December 31, 1978, and the terms of two members
shall expire December 31, 1979. Thereafter, each member shall be
appointed for a term of four years. Vacancies on the board shall be
filled in the same manner as the original appointments. Each member of
the board shall continue in office until his or her successor is
appointed and qualified. The commissioner of public lands or the
commissioner's designee shall be the chairman of the board.
(4) The board shall meet at such times and places as shall be
designated by the chairman or upon the written request of the majority
of the board. The principal office of the board shall be at the state
capital.
(5) Members of the board, except public employees and elected
officials, shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250. Each
member shall be entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses incurred
in the performance of their duties as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(6) The board may employ such clerical help and staff pursuant to
chapter 41.06 RCW as is necessary to carry out its duties.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 75.20 RCW was recodified as chapter 77.55 RCW by 2000
c 107.

Sec. 33 RCW 76.09.063 and 1997 c 425 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a private landowner is applying for a forest practices permit
under this chapter and that landowner has entered into a habitat
incentives agreement with the department and the department of fish and
wildlife as provided in RCW ((77.12.830)) 77.55.300, the department
shall comply with the terms of that agreement when evaluating the
permit application.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 77.12.830 was recodified as RCW 77.55.300 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 34 RCW 76.09.350 and 1997 c 290 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes the importance of providing the greatest
diversity of habitats, particularly riparian, wetland, and old growth
habitats, and of assuring the greatest diversity of species within
those habitats for the survival and reproduction of enough individuals
to maintain the native wildlife of Washington forest lands. The
legislature also recognizes the importance of long-term habitat
productivity for natural and wild fish, for the protection of hatchery
water supplies, and for the protection of water quality and quantity to
meet the needs of people, fish, and wildlife. The legislature
recognizes the importance of maintaining and enhancing fish and
wildlife habitats capable of sustaining the commercial and
noncommercial uses of fish and wildlife. The legislature further
recognizes the importance of the continued growth and development of
the state's forest products industry which has a vital stake in the
long-term productivity of both the public and private forest land base.
The development of a landscape planning system would help achieve
these goals. Landowners and resource managers should be provided
incentives to voluntarily develop long-term multispecies landscape
management plans that will provide protection to public resources.
Because landscape planning represents a departure from the use of
standard baseline rules and may result in unintended consequences to
both the affected habitats and to a landowner's economic interests, the
legislature desires to establish up to seven experimental pilot
programs to gain experience with landscape planning that may prove
useful in fashioning legislation of a more general application.
(1) Until December 31, 2000, the department in cooperation with the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when
relating to water quality protection, is granted authority to select
not more than seven pilot projects for the purpose of developing
individual landowner multispecies landscape management plans.
(a) Pilot project participants must be selected by the department
in cooperation with the department of fish and wildlife, and the
department of ecology when relating to water quality protection, no
later than October 1, 1997.
(b) The number and the location of the pilot projects are to be
determined by the department in cooperation with the department of fish
and wildlife, and the department of ecology when relating to water
quality protection, and should be selected on the basis of risk to the
habitat and species, variety and importance of species and habitats in
the planning area, geographic distribution, surrounding ownership,
other ongoing landscape and watershed planning activities in the area,
potential benefits to water quantity and quality, financial and
staffing capabilities of participants, and other factors that will
contribute to the creation of landowner multispecies landscape planning
efforts.
(c) Each pilot project shall have a landscape management plan with
the following elements:
(i) An identification of public resources selected for coverage
under the plan and measurable objectives for the protection of the
selected public resources;
(ii) A termination date of not later than 2050;
(iii) A general description of the planning area including its
geographic location, physical and biological features, habitats, and
species known to be present;
(iv) An identification of the existing forest practices rules that
will not apply during the term of the plan;
(v) Proposed habitat management strategies or prescriptions;
(vi) A projection of the habitat conditions likely to result from
the implementation of the specified management strategies or
prescriptions;
(vii) An assessment of habitat requirements and the current habitat
conditions of representative species included in the plan;
(viii) An assessment of potential or likely impacts to
representative species resulting from the prescribed forest practices;
(ix) A description of the anticipated benefits to those species or
other species as a result of plan implementation;
(x) A monitoring plan;
(xi) Reporting requirements including a schedule for review of the
plan's performance in meeting its objectives;
(xii) Conditions under which a plan may be modified, including a
procedure for adaptive management;
(xiii) Conditions under which a plan may be terminated;
(xiv) A procedure for adaptive management that evaluates the
effectiveness of the plan to meet its measurable public resources
objectives, reflects changes in the best available science, and
provides changes to its habitat management strategies, prescriptions,
and hydraulic project standards to the extent agreed to in the plan and
in a timely manner and schedule;
(xv) A description of how the plan relates to publicly available
plans of adjacent federal, state, tribal, and private timberland
owners; and
(xvi) A statement of whether the landowner intends to apply for
approval of the plan under applicable federal law.
(2) Until December 31, 2000, the department, in agreement with the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when the
landowner elects to cover water quality in the plan, shall approve a
landscape management plan and enter into a binding implementation
agreement with the landowner when such departments find, based upon the
best scientific data available, that:
(a) The plan contains all of the elements required under this
section including measurable public resource objectives;
(b) The plan is expected to be effective in meeting those
objectives;
(c) The landowner has sufficient financial resources to implement
the management strategies or prescriptions to be implemented by the
landowner under the plan;
(d) The plan will:
(i) Provide better protection than current state law for the public
resources selected for coverage under the plan considered in the
aggregate; and
(ii) Compared to conditions that could result from compliance with
current state law:
(A) Not result in poorer habitat conditions over the life of the
plan for any species selected for coverage that is listed as threatened
or endangered under federal or state law, or that has been identified
as a candidate for such listing, at the time the plan is approved; and
(B) Measurably improve habitat conditions for species selected for
special consideration under the plan;
(e) The plan shall include watershed analysis or provide for a
level of protection that meets or exceeds the protection that would be
provided by watershed analysis, if the landowner selects fish or water
quality as a public resource to be covered under the plan. Any
alternative process to watershed analysis would be subject to timely
peer review;
(f) The planning process provides for a public participation
process during the development of the plan, which shall be developed by
the department in cooperation with the landowner.
The management plans must be submitted to the department and the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when the
landowner elects to cover water quality in the plan, no later than
March 1, 2000. The department shall provide an opportunity for public
comment on the proposed plan. The comment period shall not be less
than forty-five days. The department shall approve or reject plans
within one hundred twenty days of submittal by the landowner of a final
plan. The decision by the department, in agreement with the department
of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when the landowner
has elected to cover water quality in the plan, to approve or
disapprove the management plan is subject to the environmental review
process of chapter 43.21C RCW, provided that any public comment period
provided for under chapter 43.21C RCW shall run concurrently with the
public comment period provided in this subsection (2).
(3) After a landscape management plan is adopted:
(a) Forest practices consistent with the plan need not comply with:
(i) The specific forest practices rules identified in the plan; and
(ii) Any forest practice rules and policies adopted after the
approval of the plan to the extent that the rules:
(A) Have been adopted primarily for the protection of a public
resource selected for coverage under the plan; or
(B) Provide for procedural or administrative obligations
inconsistent with or in addition to those provided for in the plan with
respect to those public resources; and
(b) If the landowner has selected fish as one of the public
resources to be covered under the plan, the plan shall serve as the
hydraulic project approval for the life of the plan, in compliance with
RCW ((75.20.100)) 77.55.100.
(4) The department is authorized to issue a single landscape level
permit valid for the life of the plan to a landowner who has an
approved landscape management plan and who has requested a landscape
permit from the department. Landowners receiving a landscape level
permit shall meet annually with the department and the department of
fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology where water quality
has been selected as a public resource to be covered under the plan, to
review the specific forest practices activities planned for the next
twelve months and to determine whether such activities are in
compliance with the plan. The departments will consult with the
affected Indian tribes and other interested parties who have expressed
an interest in connection with the review. The landowner is to provide
ten calendar days' notice to the department prior to the commencement
of any forest practices authorized under a landscape level permit. The
landscape level permit will not impose additional conditions relating
to the public resources selected for coverage under the plan beyond
those agreed to in the plan. For the purposes of chapter 43.21C RCW,
forest practices conducted in compliance with an approved plan are
deemed not to have the potential for a substantial impact on the
environment as to any public resource selected for coverage under the
plan.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in a plan, the agreement
implementing the landscape management plan is an agreement that runs
with the property covered by the approved landscape management plan and
the department shall record notice of the plan in the real property
records of the counties in which the affected properties are located.
Prior to its termination, no plan shall permit forest land covered by
its terms to be withdrawn from such coverage, whether by sale,
exchange, or other means, nor to be converted to nonforestry uses
except to the extent that such withdrawal or conversion would not
measurably impair the achievement of the plan's stated public resource
objectives. If a participant transfers all or part of its interest in
the property, the terms of the plan still apply to the new landowner
for the plan's stated duration unless the plan is terminated under its
terms or unless the plan specifies the conditions under which the terms
of the plan do not apply to the new landowner.
(6) The departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife, and
ecology shall seek to develop memorandums of agreements with federal
agencies and affected Indian tribes relating to tribal issues in the
landscape management plans. The departments shall solicit input from
affected Indian tribes in connection with the selection, review, and
approval of any landscape management plan. If any recommendation is
received from an affected Indian tribe and is not adopted by the
departments, the departments shall provide a written explanation of
their reasons for not adopting the recommendation.
(7) The department is directed to report to the forest practices
board annually through the year 2000, but no later than December 31st
of each year, on the status of each pilot project. The department is
directed to provide to the forest practices board, no later than
December 31, 2000, an evaluation of the pilot projects including a
determination if a permanent landscape planning process should be
established along with a discussion of what legislative and rule
modifications are necessary.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.100 was recodified as RCW 77.55.100 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 35 RCW 76.09.910 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 200 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
Nothing in RCW 76.09.010 through 76.09.280 as now or hereafter
amended shall modify any requirements to comply with the Shoreline
Management Act of 1971 except as limited by RCW 76.09.240 as now or
hereafter amended, or the hydraulics act (((RCW 75.20.100))) (RCW
77.55.100), other state statutes in effect on January 1, 1975, and any
local ordinances not inconsistent with RCW 76.09.240 as now or
hereafter amended.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.100 was recodified as RCW 77.55.100 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 36 RCW 76.13.100 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 501 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that increasing regulatory requirements
continue to diminish the economic viability of small forest landowners.
The concerns set forth in RCW ((75.46.300)) 77.85.180 about the
importance of sustaining forestry as a viable land use are particularly
applicable to small landowners because of the location of their
holdings, the expected complexity of the regulatory requirements, and
the need for significant technical expertise not readily available to
small landowners. The further reduction in harvestable timber owned by
small forest landowners as a result of the rules to be adopted under
RCW 76.09.055 will further erode small landowners' economic viability
and willingness or ability to keep the lands in forestry use and,
therefore, reduce the amount of habitat available for salmon recovery
and conservation of other aquatic resources, as defined in RCW
76.09.020.
(2) The legislature finds that the concerns identified in
subsection (1) of this section should be addressed by establishing
within the department of natural resources a small forest landowner
office that shall be a resource and focal point for small forest
landowner concerns and policies. The legislature further finds that a
forestry riparian easement program shall be established to acquire
easements from small landowners along riparian and other areas of value
to the state for protection of aquatic resources. The legislature
further finds that small forest landowners should have the option of
alternate management plans or alternate harvest restrictions on smaller
harvest units that may have a relatively low impact on aquatic
resources. The small forest landowner office should be responsible for
assisting small landowners in the development and implementation of
these plans or restrictions.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.46.300 was recodified as RCW 77.85.180 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 135.

Sec. 37 RCW 76.42.060 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 601 are each amended
to read as follows:
It shall be unlawful to dispose of wood debris by depositing such
material into any of the navigable waters of this state, except as
authorized by law including any discharge or deposit allowed to be made
under and in compliance with chapter 90.48 RCW and any rules duly
adopted thereunder or any deposit allowed to be made under and in
compliance with chapter 76.09 or ((75.46)) 77.85 RCW and any rules duly
adopted under those chapters. Violation of this section shall be a
misdemeanor.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 75.46 RCW was recodified as chapter 77.85 RCW by 2000
c 107.

Sec. 38 RCW 77.15.310 and 2000 c 107 s 240 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful failure to use or maintain an
approved fish guard on a diversion device if the person owns, controls,
or operates a device used for diverting or conducting water from a
lake, river, or stream and:
(a) The device is not equipped with a fish guard, screen, or bypass
approved by the director as required by RCW 77.55.040 or ((77.16.220))
77.55.320; or
(b) The person knowingly fails to maintain or operate an approved
fish guard, screen, or bypass so as to effectively screen or prevent
fish from entering the intake.
(2) Unlawful failure to use or maintain an approved fish guard,
screen, or bypass on a diversion device is a gross misdemeanor.
Following written notification to the person from the department that
there is a violation, each day that a diversion device is operated
without an approved or maintained fish guard, screen, or bypass is a
separate offense.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 77.16.220 was recodified as RCW 77.55.320 pursuant to 2001
c 253 § 61.

Sec. 39 RCW 78.44.050 and 1997 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall have the exclusive authority to regulate
surface mine reclamation. No county, city, or town may require for its
review or approval a separate reclamation plan or application. The
department may, however, delegate some or all of its enforcement
authority by contractual agreement to a county, city, or town that
employs personnel who are, in the opinion of the department, qualified
to enforce plans approved by the department. All counties, cities, or
towns shall have the authority to zone surface mines and adopt
ordinances regulating operations as provided in this chapter, except
that county, city, or town operations ordinances may be preempted by
the department during the emergencies outlined in RCW 78.44.200 and
related rules.
This chapter shall not alter or preempt any provisions of the state
((fisheries laws (Title 75 RCW), the state)) water allocation and use
laws (chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW), the state water pollution control
laws (chapter 90.48 RCW), the state fish and wildlife laws (Title 77
RCW), state noise laws or air quality laws (Title 70 RCW), shoreline
management (chapter 90.58 RCW), the state environmental policy act
(chapter 43.21C RCW), state growth management (chapter 36.70A RCW),
state drinking water laws (chapters 43.20 and 70.119A RCW), or any
other state statutes.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Title 75 RCW was recodified, repealed, and/or decodified in its
entirety by 2000 c 107.

Sec. 40 RCW 79.76.060 and 1974 ex.s. c 43 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter is intended to preempt local regulation of the
drilling and operation of wells for geothermal resources but shall not
be construed to permit the locating of any well or drilling when such
well or drilling is prohibited under state or local land use law or
regulations promulgated thereunder. Geothermal resources, byproducts
and/or waste products which have escaped or been released from the
energy transfer system and/or a mineral recovery process shall be
subject to provisions of state law relating to the pollution of ground
or surface waters (Title 90 RCW), provisions of the state fisheries law
(((Title 75 RCW),)) and the state game laws (Title 77 RCW), and any
other state environmental pollution control laws. Authorization for
use of byproduct water resources for all beneficial uses, including but
not limited to greenhouse heating, warm water fish propagation, space
heating plants, irrigation, swimming pools, and hot springs baths,
shall be subject to the appropriation procedure as provided in Title 90
RCW.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Title 75 RCW was recodified, repealed, and/or decodified in its
entirety by 2000 c 107.

Sec. 41 RCW 79.90.150 and 1991 c 337 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When gravel, rock, sand, silt or other material from any aquatic
lands is removed by any public agency or under public contract for
channel or harbor improvement, or flood control, use of such material
may be authorized by the department of natural resources for a public
purpose on land owned or leased by the state or any municipality,
county, or public corporation: PROVIDED, That when no public land site
is available for deposit of such material, its deposit on private land
with the landowner's permission is authorized and may be designated by
the department of natural resources to be for a public purpose. Prior
to removal and use, the state agency, municipality, county, or public
corporation contemplating or arranging such use shall first obtain
written permission from the department of natural resources. No
payment of royalty shall be required for such gravel, rock, sand, silt,
or other material used for such public purpose, but a charge will be
made if such material is subsequently sold or used for some other
purpose: PROVIDED, That the department may authorize such public
agency or private landowner to dispose of such material without charge
when necessary to implement disposal of material. No charge shall be
required for any use of the material obtained under the provisions of
this chapter when used solely on an authorized site. No charge shall
be required for any use of the material obtained under the provisions
of this chapter if the material is used for public purposes by local
governments. Public purposes include, but are not limited to,
construction and maintenance of roads, dikes, and levies. Nothing in
this section shall repeal or modify the provisions of RCW ((75.20.100))
77.55.100 or eliminate the necessity of obtaining a permit for such
removal from other state or federal agencies as otherwise required by
law.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.100 was recodified as RCW 77.55.100 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 42 RCW 79.94.390 and 1994 c 264 s 66 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following described tidelands, being public lands of the state,
are withdrawn from sale or lease and reserved as public areas for
recreational use and for the taking of fish and shellfish for personal
use as defined in RCW ((75.08.011)) 77.08.010:
Parcel No. 1. (Point Whitney) The tidelands of the second class,
owned by the state of Washington, situate in front of, adjacent to or
abutting upon lots 3, 4, and 5, section 7, township 26 north, range 1
west, W.M., with a frontage of 72.45 lineal chains, more or less.
Excepting, however, those portions of the above described tidelands
of the second class conveyed to the state of Washington, department of
fish and wildlife through deed issued May 14, 1925, under application
No. 8136, records of department of public lands.
Parcel No. 2. (Point Whitney) The tidelands of the second class
lying below the line of mean low tide, owned by the state of
Washington, situate in front of lot 1, section 6, township 26 north,
range 1 west, W.M., with a frontage of 21.00 lineal chains, more or
less; also
The tidelands of the second class, owned by the state of
Washington, situate in front of, adjacent to or abutting upon lots 6
and 7, and that portion of lot 5, section 1, township 26 north, range
1 west, W.M., lying south of a line running due west from a point on
the government meander line which is S 22° E 1.69 chains from an angle
point in said meander line which is S 15° W 1.20 chains, more or less,
from the point of intersection of the north line of said lot 5 and said
meander line, with a frontage of 40.31 lineal chains, more or less.
Parcel No. 3. (Toandos Peninsula) The tidelands of the second
class, owned by the state of Washington, situate in front of, adjacent
to, or abutting upon lots 1, 2, and 3, section 5, lots 1, 2, and 3,
section 4, and lot 1, section 3, all in township 25 north, range 1
west, W.M., with a frontage of 158.41 lineal chains, more or less.
Parcel No. 4. (Shine) The tidelands of the second class, owned by
the state of Washington, situate in front of, adjacent to, or abutting
upon lots 1, 2, 3 and that portion of lot 4 lying north of the south
8.35 chains thereof as measured along the government meander line, all
in section 35, township 28 north, range 1 east, W.M., with a frontage
of 76.70 lineal chains, more or less.
Subject to an easement for right of way for county road granted to
Jefferson county December 8, 1941 under application No. 1731, records
of department of public lands.
Parcel No. 5. (Lilliwaup) The tidelands of the second class, owned
by the state of Washington, lying easterly of the east line of vacated
state oyster reserve plat No. 133 produced southerly and situate in
front of, adjacent to or abutting upon lot 9, section 30, lot 8,
section 19 and lot 5 and the south 20 acres of lot 4, section 20, all
in township 23 north, range 3 west, W.M., with a frontage of 62.46
lineal chains, more or less.
Subject to easements for rights of way for state road granted
through the filing of state road plats No. 374 December 15, 1930, No.
661, March 29, 1949, and No. 666 August 25, 1949, records of department
of public lands.
Parcel No. 6. (Nemah) Those portions of the tidelands of the
second class, owned by the state of Washington, situate in front of,
adjacent to, or abutting upon lots 5, 6, and 7, section 3 and lots 1,
2, and 3, section 4, township 12 north, range 10 west, W.M., lots 1, 2,
3, and 4, section 34, section 27 and lots 1, 2, 3 and 4, section 28,
township 13 north, range 10 west, W.M., lying easterly of the easterly
line of the Nemah Oyster reserve and easterly of the easterly line of
a tract of tidelands of the second class conveyed through deed issued
July 28, 1938, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 24, Laws of 1895,
under application No. 9731, with a frontage of 326.22 lineal chains,
more or less.
Parcels No. 7 and 8. (Penn Cove) The unplatted tidelands of the
first class, and tidelands of the second class, owned by the state of
Washington, situate in front of, adjacent to, or abutting upon lots 1
and 2, section 33, lots 1, 2, 3, and 4, section 32, lots 2 and 3 and
the B.P. Barstow D.L.C. No. 49, sections 30 and 31 and that portion of
the R.H. Lansdale D.L.C. No. 54 in section 30, lying west of the east
3.00 chains thereof as measured along the government meander line, all
in township 32 north, range 1 east, W.M., with a frontage of 260.34
lineal chains, more or less.
Excepting, however, the tidelands above the line of mean low tide
in front of said lot 1, section 32 which were conveyed as tidelands of
the second class through deed issued December 29, 1908, application No.
4957, records of department of public lands.
Subject to an easement for right of way for transmission cable line
granted to the United States of America Army Engineers June 7, 1943,
under application No. 17511, records of department of public lands.
Parcel No. 9. (South of Penn Cove) The tidelands of the second
class, owned by the state of Washington, situate in front of, adjacent
to, or abutting upon lots 2, 3 and 4, section 17 and lots 1, 2 and 3,
section 20, township 31 north, range 2 east, W.M., with a frontage of
129.97 lineal chains, more or less.
Parcel No. 10. (Mud Bay--Lopez Island) The tidelands of the second
class, owned by the state of Washington situate in front of, adjacent
to, or abutting upon lots 5, 6 and 7, section 18, lot 5, section 7 and
lots 3, 4, and 5, section 8, all in township 34 north, range 1 west,
W.M., with a frontage of 172.11 lineal chains, more or less.
Excepting, however, any tideland of the second class in front of
said lot 3, section 8 conveyed through deeds issued April 14, 1909,
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 24, Laws of 1895, under
application No. 4985, records of department of public lands.
Parcel No. 11. (Cattle Point) The tidelands of the second class,
owned by the state of Washington, situate in front of, adjacent to, or
abutting upon lot 1, section 6, lots 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, and 10,
section 7, lots 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6 and 7, section 8 and lot 1, section 5,
all in township 34 north, range 2 west, W.M., with a frontage of 463.88
lineal chains, more or less.
Excepting, however, any tidelands of the second class in front of
said lot 10, section 7 conveyed through deed issued June 1, 1912, under
application No. 6906, records of department of public lands.
Parcel No. 12. (Spencer Spit) The tidelands of the second class,
owned by the state of Washington, situate in front of, adjacent to, or
abutting upon lots 1, 3, and 4, section 7, and lot 5, section 18 all in
township 35 north, range 1 west, W.M., with a frontage of 118.80 lineal
chains, more or less.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.08.011 was repealed by 2000 c 107 § 125. RCW 77.08.010
has the same definition of "personal use" that appeared in RCW
75.08.011.

Sec. 43 RCW 79.96.080 and 1990 c 163 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Geoducks shall be sold as valuable materials under the
provisions of chapter 79.90 RCW. After confirmation of the sale, the
department of natural resources may enter into an agreement with the
purchaser for the harvesting of geoducks. The department of natural
resources may place terms and conditions in the harvesting agreements
as the department deems necessary. The department of natural resources
may enforce the provisions of any harvesting agreement by suspending or
canceling the harvesting agreement or through any other means contained
in the harvesting agreement. Any geoduck harvester may terminate a
harvesting agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection if
actions of a governmental agency, beyond the control of the harvester,
its agents, or its employees, prohibit harvesting, for a period
exceeding thirty days during the term of the harvesting agreement,
except as provided within the agreement. Upon such termination of the
agreement by the harvester, the harvester shall be reimbursed by the
department of natural resources for the cost paid to the department on
the agreement, less the value of the harvest already accomplished by
the harvester under the agreement.
(2) Harvesting agreements under this title for the purpose of
harvesting geoducks shall require the harvester and the harvester's
agent or representatives to comply with all applicable commercial
diving safety standards and regulations promulgated and implemented by
the federal occupational safety and health administration established
under the federal occupational safety and health act of 1970 as such
law exists or as hereafter amended (84 Stat. 1590 et seq.; 29 U.S.C.
Sec. 651 et seq.): PROVIDED, That for the purposes of this section and
RCW ((75.24.100)) 77.60.070 as now or hereafter amended, all persons
who dive for geoducks are deemed to be employees as defined by the
federal occupational safety and health act. All harvesting agreements
shall provide that failure to comply with these standards is cause for
suspension or cancellation of the harvesting agreement: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That for the purposes of this subsection if the harvester
contracts with another person or entity for the harvesting of geoducks,
the harvesting agreement shall not be suspended or canceled if the
harvester terminates its business relationship with such entity until
compliance with this subsection is secured.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.24.100 was recodified as RCW 77.60.070 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 130.

Sec. 44 RCW 79A.25.240 and 2000 c 11 s 78 are each amended to
read as follows:
The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall provide
necessary grants and loan administration support to the salmon recovery
funding board as provided in RCW ((75.46.160)) 77.85.120. The
committee shall also be responsible for tracking salmon recovery
expenditures under RCW ((75.46.180)) 77.85.140. The committee shall
provide all necessary administrative support to the board, and the
board shall be located with the committee. The committee shall provide
necessary information to the salmon recovery office.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.46.160 and 75.46.180 were recodified as RCW 77.85.120
and 77.85.140, respectively, pursuant to 2000 c 107 § 135.

Sec. 45 RCW 79A.60.010 and 2000 c 11 s 92 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Boat wastes" includes, but is not limited to, sewage, garbage,
marine debris, plastics, contaminated bilge water, cleaning solvents,
paint scrapings, or discarded petroleum products associated with the
use of vessels.
(2) "Boater" means any person on a vessel on waters of the state of
Washington.
(3) "Carrying passengers for hire" means carrying passengers in a
vessel on waters of the state for valuable consideration, whether given
directly or indirectly or received by the owner, agent, operator, or
other person having an interest in the vessel. This shall not include
trips where expenses for food, transportation, or incidentals are
shared by participants on an even basis. Anyone receiving compensation
for skills or money for amortization of equipment and carrying
passengers shall be considered to be carrying passengers for hire on
waters of the state.
(4) "Commission" means the state parks and recreation commission.
(5) "Darkness" means that period between sunset and sunrise.
(6) "Environmentally sensitive area" means a restricted body of
water where discharge of untreated sewage from boats is especially
detrimental because of limited flushing, shallow water, commercial or
recreational shellfish, swimming areas, diversity of species, the
absence of other pollution sources, or other characteristics.
(7) "Guide" means any individual, including but not limited to
subcontractors and independent contractors, engaged for compensation or
other consideration by a whitewater river outfitter for the purpose of
operating vessels. A person licensed under RCW ((77.32.211 or
75.28.780)) 77.65.480 or 77.65.440 and acting as a fishing guide is not
considered a guide for the purposes of this chapter.
(8) "Marina" means a facility providing boat moorage space, fuel,
or commercial services. Commercial services include but are not
limited to overnight or live-aboard boating accommodations.
(9) "Motor driven boats and vessels" means all boats and vessels
which are self propelled.
(10) "Muffler" or "muffler system" means a sound suppression device
or system, including an underwater exhaust system, designed and
installed to abate the sound of exhaust gases emitted from an internal
combustion engine and that prevents excessive or unusual noise.
(11) "Operate" means to steer, direct, or otherwise have physical
control of a vessel that is underway.
(12) "Operator" means an individual who steers, directs, or
otherwise has physical control of a vessel that is underway or
exercises actual authority to control the person at the helm.
(13) "Observer" means the individual riding in a vessel who is
responsible for observing a water skier at all times.
(14) "Owner" means a person who has a lawful right to possession of
a vessel by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal
action whether or not the vessel is subject to a security interest.
(15) "Person" means any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, nonprofit corporation or organization,
limited liability company, firm, association, or other legal entity
located within or outside this state.
(16) "Personal flotation device" means a buoyancy device, life
preserver, buoyant vest, ring buoy, or buoy cushion that is designed to
float a person in the water and that is approved by the commission.
(17) "Personal watercraft" means a vessel of less than sixteen feet
that uses a motor powering a water jet pump, as its primary source of
motive power and that is designed to be operated by a person sitting,
standing, or kneeling on, or being towed behind the vessel, rather than
in the conventional manner of sitting or standing inside the vessel.
(18) "Polluted area" means a body of water used by boaters that is
contaminated by boat wastes at unacceptable levels, based on applicable
water quality and shellfish standards.
(19) "Public entities" means all elected or appointed bodies,
including tribal governments, responsible for collecting and spending
public funds.
(20) "Reckless" or "recklessly" means acting carelessly and
heedlessly in a willful and wanton disregard of the rights, safety, or
property of another.
(21) "Sewage pumpout or dump unit" means:
(a) A receiving chamber or tank designed to receive vessel sewage
from a "porta-potty" or a portable container; and
(b) A stationary or portable mechanical device on land, a dock,
pier, float, barge, vessel, or other location convenient to boaters,
designed to remove sewage waste from holding tanks on vessels.
(22) "Underway" means that a vessel is not at anchor, or made fast
to the shore, or aground.
(23) "Vessel" includes every description of watercraft on the
water, other than a seaplane, used or capable of being used as a means
of transportation on the water. However, it does not include inner
tubes, air mattresses, sailboards, and small rafts or flotation devices
or toys customarily used by swimmers.
(24) "Water skiing" means the physical act of being towed behind a
vessel on, but not limited to, any skis, aquaplane, kneeboard, tube, or
any other similar device.
(25) "Waters of the state" means any waters within the territorial
limits of Washington state.
(26) "Whitewater river outfitter" means any person who is
advertising to carry or carries passengers for hire on any whitewater
river of the state, but does not include any person whose only service
on a given trip is providing instruction in canoeing or kayaking
skills.
(27) "Whitewater rivers of the state" means those rivers and
streams, or parts thereof, within the boundaries of the state as listed
in RCW 79A.60.470 or as designated by the commission under RCW
79A.60.495.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 77.32.211 and 75.28.780 were recodified as RCW 77.65.480
and 77.65.440, respectively, pursuant to 2000 c 107 § 31.

Sec. 46 RCW 82.27.070 and 1999 c 126 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All taxes collected by the department of revenue under this chapter
shall be deposited in the state general fund except for the excise tax
on anadromous game fish, which shall be deposited in the wildlife fund,
and, during the period January 1, 2000, to December 31, 2005, twenty-five forty-sixths of the revenues derived from the excise tax on sea
urchins collected under RCW 82.27.020 shall be deposited into the sea
urchin dive fishery account created in RCW ((75.30.210)) 77.70.150, and
twenty-five forty-sixths of the revenues derived from the excise tax on
sea cucumbers collected under RCW 82.27.020 shall be deposited into the
sea cucumber dive fishery account created in RCW ((75.30.250))
77.70.190.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.30.210 and 75.30.250 were recodified as RCW 77.70.150
and 77.70.190, respectively, pursuant to 2000 c 107 § 132.

Sec. 47 RCW 89.08.470 and 1998 c 249 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 1996, the Washington conservation commission
shall develop, in consultation with other state agencies, tribes, and
local governments, a consolidated application process for permits for
a watershed restoration project developed by an agency or sponsored by
an agency on behalf of a volunteer organization. The consolidated
process shall include a single permit application form for use by all
responsible state and local agencies. The commission shall encourage
use of the consolidated permit application process by any federal
agency responsible for issuance of related permits. The permit
application forms to be consolidated shall include, at a minimum,
applications for: (a) Approvals related to water quality standards
under chapter 90.48 RCW; (b) hydraulic project approvals under chapter
((75.20)) 77.55 RCW; and (c) section 401 water quality certifications
under 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341 and chapter 90.48 RCW.
(2) If a watershed restoration project is also a fish habitat
enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW ((75.20.350(1)))
77.55.290(1), the project sponsor shall instead follow the permit
review and approval process established in RCW ((75.20.350)) 77.55.290
with regard to state and local government permitting requirements. The
sponsor shall so notify state and local permitting authorities.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 75.20 RCW was recodified as chapter 77.55 RCW by 2000
c 107.

RCW 75.20.350 was recodified as RCW 77.55.290 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 48 RCW 90.03.247 and 1996 c 186 s 523 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever an application for a permit to make beneficial use of
public waters is approved relating to a stream or other water body for
which minimum flows or levels have been adopted and are in effect at
the time of approval, the permit shall be conditioned to protect the
levels or flows. No agency may establish minimum flows and levels or
similar water flow or level restrictions for any stream or lake of the
state other than the department of ecology whose authority to establish
is exclusive, as provided in chapter 90.03 RCW and RCW 90.22.010 and
90.54.040. The provisions of other statutes, including but not limited
to RCW ((75.20.100)) 77.55.100 and chapter 43.21C RCW, may not be
interpreted in a manner that is inconsistent with this section. In
establishing such minimum flows, levels, or similar restrictions, the
department shall, during all stages of development by the department of
ecology of minimum flow proposals, consult with, and carefully consider
the recommendations of, the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the
department of agriculture, and representatives of the affected Indian
tribes. Nothing herein shall preclude the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of community, trade, and economic development,
or the department of agriculture from presenting its views on minimum
flow needs at any public hearing or to any person or agency, and the
department of fish and wildlife, the department of community, trade,
and economic development, and the department of agriculture are each
empowered to participate in proceedings of the federal energy
regulatory commission and other agencies to present its views on
minimum flow needs.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

RCW 75.20.100 was recodified as RCW 77.55.100 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

Sec. 49 RCW 90.58.147 and 1998 c 249 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public or private project that is designed to improve fish or
wildlife habitat or fish passage shall be exempt from the substantial
development permit requirements of this chapter when all of the
following apply:
(a) The project has been approved by the department of fish and
wildlife;
(b) The project has received hydraulic project approval by the
department of fish and wildlife pursuant to chapter ((75.20)) 77.55
RCW; and
(c) The local government has determined that the project is
substantially consistent with the local shoreline master program. The
local government shall make such determination in a timely manner and
provide it by letter to the project proponent.
(2) Fish habitat enhancement projects that conform to the
provisions of RCW ((75.20.350)) 77.55.290 are determined to be
consistent with local shoreline master programs.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

Chapter 75.20 RCW was recodified as chapter 77.55 RCW by 2000
c 107.

RCW 75.20.350 was recodified as RCW 77.55.290 pursuant to 2000
c 107 § 129.

--- END ---