BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 42.44.040 (Certificate of appointment)
and 1985 c 156 s 4 are each repealed.

EXPLANATORY NOTE

The language contained in RCW 42.44.040 was added verbatim to
RCW 42.44.030 by section 287, chapter 86, Laws of 2002.

--- END ---