BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.52.010 and 1985 c 467 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Economic development and in particular international trade,
tourism, and investment have become increasingly important to
Washington, affecting the state's employment, revenues, and general
economic well-being. Additionally, economic trends are rapidly
changing and the international marketplace has become increasingly
competitive as states and countries seek to improve and safeguard their
own economic well-being. The purpose of the legislative committee on
economic development and international trade is to provide responsive
and consistent involvement by the legislature in economic development
to maintain a healthy state economy and to provide employment
opportunities to Washington residents.
(2) There is created a legislative committee on economic
development and international trade which shall consist of six senators
and six representatives from the legislature and the lieutenant
governor who shall serve as chairperson. The senate members of the
committee shall be appointed by the president of the senate and the
house members of the committee shall be appointed by the speaker of the
house. Not more than three members from each house shall be from the
same political party. A list of appointees shall be submitted before
the close of each regular legislative session during an odd-numbered
year or any successive special session convened by the governor or the
legislature prior to the close of such regular session or successive
special session(s) for confirmation of senate members, by the senate,
and house members, by the house. Vacancies occurring shall be filled
by the appointing authority.

--- END ---