BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the national
significance of the bicentennial anniversary of the Lewis and Clark
expedition and the anticipated increase in tourism to sites along the
trail. The legislature is also aware that due to budget reductions the
state parks and recreation commission recently closed four facilities
located on the Lewis and Clark trail that were leased from the federal
government and operated by the Washington state parks and recreation
commission. The legislature encourages the state parks and recreation
commission to develop a corps of discovery pass to generate revenues to
be used to reopen, operate, and maintain Central Ferry, Chief Timothy,
Lyons Ferry, and Crow Butte state parks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission may develop a corps of discovery pass that is valid
in lieu of parking fees that are required at sites designated by the
commission along the Lewis and Clark trail. The commission may seek
private assistance with the marketing and merchandising of the corps of
discovery pass and may use any Lewis and Clark trail logos owned by the
state of Washington. All proceeds from the sale of the corps of
discovery pass must be deposited in the state parks renewal and
stewardship account and must be used for costs associated with
administering the pass and the operation and maintenance of state parks
along the Lewis and Clark trail.

--- END ---