BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a professionally managed and
regulated trapping program is not only vital to the health of
Washington's wildlife populations, but is also consistent with the
state's obligations to manage all natural resources in trust for the
common good of all citizens.
(2) The legislature further finds that it is in the interest of all
of the citizens of Washington to ensure that all trapping is done in
accordance with sound scientific wildlife management principles using
humane methods as set forth in this act. It is the legislature's
intent to reinstate a sound furbearer management program, administered
using sound science by the department of fish and wildlife, that
addresses mammal population dynamics and animal damage issues.
(3) The legislature further finds that humanely regulated trapping
practices contribute positively to the economic well-being of the state
of Washington, to public health and welfare by assisting to control the
spread of animal-borne disease, and to the protection of private and
public property from damage resulting from uncontrolled animal
populations.
(4) The legislature further finds that trapping can be a valuable
commercial activity, when consistent with a sound furbearer management
program, and benefit the economy of the state of Washington.
(5) The legislature recognizes that among the choices available for
the trapping of animals, some may cause pain and suffering in the
animals captured. The legislature further recognizes that some
trapping methods can capture animals that are not targeted, including
pets. It is the policy of the state of Washington to minimize the use
of indiscriminate or painful traps and to use all traps humanely. When
lethal trapping methods are used, such methods must be used in the most
humane way that accomplishes the goals of the wildlife management
program. All trappers in the state should use all practicable means
necessary to avoid the capture of a nontargeted animal.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.08.010 and 2002 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title or rules adopted under this title, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.
(2) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.
(3) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.
(4) "Person" means and includes an individual; a corporation; a
public or private entity or organization; a local, state, or federal
agency; all business organizations, including corporations and
partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals acting with a
common purpose whether acting in an individual, representative, or
official capacity.
(5) "Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed and
commissioned by the director, with authority to enforce this title and
rules adopted pursuant to this title, and other statutes as prescribed
by the legislature. Fish and wildlife officer includes a person
commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a wildlife agent or a fisheries
patrol officer.
(6) "Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned
officer of a municipal, county, state, or federal agency having as its
primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general, while the
officer is in the appropriate jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish
and wildlife officer" includes special agents of the national marine
fisheries service, state parks commissioned officers, United States
fish and wildlife special agents, department of natural resources
enforcement officers, and United States forest service officers, while
the agents and officers are within their respective jurisdictions.
(7) "To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure,
capture, or harass a wild animal or wild bird.
(8) "To trap" and its derivatives means a method of hunting using
devices to capture wild animals or wild birds.
(9) "To fish," "to harvest," and "to take," and their derivatives
means an effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch a fish or shellfish.
(10) "Open season" means those times, manners of taking, and places
or waters established by rule of the commission for the lawful hunting,
fishing, taking, or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish,
food fish, or shellfish that conform to the special restrictions or
physical descriptions established by rule of the commission or that
have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest, or
possess by rule of the commission. "Open season" includes the first
and last days of the established time.
(11) "Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and places
or waters other than those established by rule of the commission as an
open season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or
shellfish that do not conform to the special restrictions or physical
descriptions established by rule of the commission as an open season or
that have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest,
or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.
(12) "Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some or all
species of wild animals or wild birds is prohibited.
(13) "Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or
other body of water, where fishing or harvesting is prohibited.
(14) "Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild
animals and wild birds is prohibited.
(15) "Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game
birds, or game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by
a person, as specified by rule of the commission for a particular
period of time, or as to size, sex, or species.
(16) "Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but is not
limited to mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and
invertebrates. The term "wildlife" does not include feral domestic
mammals, old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order
Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish, and marine invertebrates classified
as food fish or shellfish by the director. The term "wildlife"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of wildlife
members.
(17) "Wild animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state and the species Rana
catesbeiana (bullfrog). The term "wild animal" does not include feral
domestic mammals or old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of
the order Rodentia.
(18) "Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state.
(19) "Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the
commission that shall not be hunted or fished.
(20) "Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the
commission as seriously threatened with extinction.
(21) "Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted
except as authorized by the commission.
(22) "Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall not be
trapped except as authorized by the commission.
(23) "Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except
as authorized by the commission.
(24) "Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted
throughout the year as authorized by the commission.
(25) "Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the animal
kingdom not native to Washington and designated as dangerous to the
environment or wildlife of the state.
(26) "Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held or raised
for commercial purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not
include publicly owned facilities.
(27) "Person of disability" means a permanently disabled person who
is not ambulatory without the assistance of a wheelchair, crutches, or
similar devices.
(28) "Fish" includes all species classified as game fish or food
fish by statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently
classified as food fish or game fish if such species exist in state
waters. The term "fish" includes all stages of development and the
bodily parts of fish species.
(29) "Raffle" means an activity in which tickets bearing an
individual number are sold for not more than twenty-five dollars each
and in which a permit or permits are awarded to hunt or for access to
hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the basis of a drawing from
the tickets by the person or persons conducting the raffle.
(30) "Youth" means a person fifteen years old for fishing and under
sixteen years old for hunting.
(31) "Senior" means a person seventy years old or older.
(32) "License year" means the period of time for which a
recreational license is valid. The license year begins April 1st, and
ends March 31st.
(33) "Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of river mouths.
(34) "Freshwater" means all waters not defined as saltwater
including, but not limited to, rivers upstream of the river mouth,
lakes, ponds, and reservoirs.
(35) "State waters" means all marine waters and fresh waters within
ordinary high water lines and within the territorial boundaries of the
state.
(36) "Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific Ocean
outside the territorial boundaries of the state, including the marine
waters of other states and countries.
(37) "Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those waters
of the Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state
boundary.
(38) "Resident" means a person who has maintained a permanent place
of abode within the state for at least ninety days immediately
preceding an application for a license, has established by formal
evidence an intent to continue residing within the state, and who is
not licensed to hunt or fish as a resident in another state.
(39) "Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the
qualifications of a resident.
(40) "Shellfish" means those species of marine and freshwater
invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not be taken
except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term "shellfish"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of shellfish
species.
(41) "Commercial" means related to or connected with buying,
selling, or bartering.
(42) "To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or preserving
fish, wildlife, or shellfish.
(43) "Personal use" means for the private use of the individual
taking the fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.
(44) "Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable
of being held in hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line
operated without rod or reel.
(45) "Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species
of fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical
area.
(46) "Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a license
limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.
(47) "Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are
dependent upon the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in
either an attached or free floating form, and includes but is not
limited to marine aquatic plants in the classes Chlorophyta,
Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.
(48) "Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or
engaging in sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or
deleterious exotic wildlife.
(49) "Invasive species" means a plant species or a nonnative animal
species that either:
(a) Causes or may cause displacement of, or otherwise threatens,
native species in their natural communities;
(b) Threatens or may threaten natural resources or their use in the
state;
(c) Causes or may cause economic damage to commercial or
recreational activities that are dependent upon state waters; or
(d) Threatens or harms human health.
(50) "Prohibited aquatic animal species" means an invasive species
of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a prohibited aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(51) "Regulated aquatic animal species" means a potentially
invasive species of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a
regulated aquatic animal species by the commission.
(52) "Unregulated aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has been classified as an unregulated aquatic animal
species by the commission.
(53) "Unlisted aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has not been classified as a prohibited aquatic animal
species, a regulated aquatic animal species, or an unregulated aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(54) "Aquatic plant species" means an emergent, submersed,
partially submersed, free-floating, or floating-leaving plant species
that grows in or near a body of water or wetland.
(55) "Prohibited body-gripping trap" means a steel trap that grips
an animal's body or body part with teeth or serrated edges.
(56) "Raw fur" means a pelt that has not been processed for
purposes of retail sale.
(57) "Animal problem" means any classified furbearing mammal or
unclassified mammal that threatens or damages timber, publicly owned or
private property, or that threatens or injures livestock, human health
or safety, or any other domestic animal or wildlife population.
(58) "Nuisance wildlife" means wildlife so designated by the
department by rule.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.194 and 2001 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
It is the duty of every trapper to ensure that all trapping is done
humanely. To ensure that this goal is met, all trappers must abide by
the following:
(1) It is unlawful to use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed
((leghold)) foothold trap, neck snare, foot snare, or other prohibited
body-gripping trap to capture any mammal for ((recreation or commerce
in fur)) a purpose other than to address an animal problem, for the
live capture of raptors for falconry, scientific research, or to manage
a bird problem as authorized by rule of the commission, for scientific
research, or for mammal population management.
(2) It is unlawful to knowingly buy, sell, barter, or otherwise
exchange, or offer to buy, sell, barter, or otherwise exchange the raw
fur of a mammal or a mammal that has been trapped in ((this state with
a steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap, whether or
not pursuant to permit.
(3) It is unlawful to use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed
leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap to capture any animal,
except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of a Conibear trap in
water, a padded leghold trap, or a nonstrangling type foot snare with
a special permit granted by [the] director under (a) through (d) of
this subsection. Issuance of the special permits shall be governed by
rules adopted by the department and in accordance with the requirements
of this section. Every person granted a special permit to use a trap
or device listed in this subsection shall check the trap or device at
least every twenty-four hours.
(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the director, in consultation
with the department of social and health services or the United States
department of health and human services from granting a permit to use
traps listed in this subsection for the purpose of protecting people
from threats to their health and safety.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to use traps listed in this subsection to a person who
applies for such a permit in writing, and who establishes that there
exists on a property an animal problem that has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by the use of nonlethal control tools, including but
not limited to guard animals, electric fencing, or box and cage traps,
or if such nonlethal means cannot be reasonably applied. Upon making
a finding in writing that the animal problem has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by nonlethal control tools or if the tools cannot be
reasonably applied, the director may authorize the use, setting,
placing, or maintenance of the traps for a period not to exceed thirty
days.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to department employees or agents to use traps listed in
this subsection where the use of the traps is the only practical means
of protecting threatened or endangered species as designated under RCW
77.08.010.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from issuing a
permit to use traps listed in this subsection, excluding Conibear
traps, for the conduct of legitimate wildlife research.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the United States fish and
wildlife service, its employees or agents, from using a trap listed in
subsection (4) of this section where the fish and wildlife service
determines, in consultation with the director, that the use of such
traps is necessary to protect species listed as threatened or
endangered under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
1531 et seq.))) violation of subsection (1) of this section. Nothing
in this section prohibits the donation of an animal carcass or pelt for
scientific research and public health training.
(3)(a) All trapping of wild animals may only be conducted by
trappers licensed by the department under RCW 77.65.450 for the
management of animal problems, for scientific research, or for mammal
population management and in accordance with the rules developed by the
commission as they relate to wildlife trapping. However, nothing in
this section prohibits the use of commonly used traps by property
owners or their agents to control nuisance wildlife including, but not
limited to, moles, mice, rats, mountain beavers, and gophers.
(b) Furbearing mammals may not be taken from the wild and held
alive for sale or personal use. All trapping must be conducted in
furtherance of a wildlife trapping program being implemented by the
department for an animal problem, for scientific research, or for
mammal population management.
(c) Wildlife trapped for a purpose other than to manage animal
problems, for scientific research, or mammal population management
must, if possible, be released unharmed immediately upon discovery.
The commission may adopt by rule or guideline procedures for the
handling of any animal that is unable to be released unharmed.
(d) Lawfully trapped wild animals, if not intended for release,
must be humanely dispatched, or if intended for release, must be either
immediately released or immediately taken to a rehabilitation center,
if necessary. The commission may adopt by rule or guideline procedures
for the humane dispatch of captured animals.
(4)(a) It is unlawful for a licensed trapper to fail to complete
and submit to the department a report of catch postmarked on or before
April 20th of each year. The report must be submitted to the
department regardless of trapping success, and indicate the number,
general location, and species of all animals captured, including those
animals captured that were not part of an animal problem or mammal
population control. Trappers who fail to submit an accurate report of
catch shall have their trapping privileges suspended for one year.
False reports are considered failure to report. It is the
responsibility of each licensed trapper to obtain and submit a report
of catch on forms provided by the department.
(b) The department shall maintain and analyze all catch reports
received pursuant to (a) of this subsection. Data collected on catch
reports must be presented to the appropriate legislative committees by
November 30th of each year.
(5) Employees or agents of the United States department of
agriculture wildlife services program and of the United States fish and
wildlife service, acting lawfully within the scope of their authority,
are not subject to the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall adopt appropriate rules regarding the types of
traps and bait for use in capturing wildlife to ensure the humane
treatment of captured animals. In adopting these rules, the commission
may take into consideration the effectiveness of various trap sizes,
approved best management practices, and the habitats in which the traps
may be used. These rules must address the time intervals during which
specific traps must be checked and animals removed. These rules may
not allow for the use of a prohibited body-gripping trap, as that term
is defined in RCW 77.08.010, or a neck or body snare attached to a
spring pole or any spring pole type device. The commission must also
adopt rules for the appropriate disposal of carcasses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall institute a furbearer management program that
addresses mammal population dynamics and problem animals, and shall
only issue trapping licenses and propose rules consistent with the
program.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.65.450 and 1991 sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state trapping license allows the holder to trap fur-bearing
animals throughout the state in accordance with the rules adopted by
the commission under section 4 of this act; however, a trapper may not
place traps on private property without permission of the owner,
lessee, or tenant where the land is improved and apparently used, or
where the land is fenced or enclosed in a manner designed to exclude
intruders or to indicate a property boundary line, or where notice is
given by posting in a conspicuous manner. A state trapping license is
void on April 1st following the date of issuance. The fee for this
license is thirty-six dollars for residents sixteen years of age or
older, fifteen dollars for residents under sixteen years of age, and
one hundred eighty dollars for nonresidents. The department may only
issue trapping licenses for the control of animal problems, as that
term is defined in RCW 77.08.010, for scientific research, and for
mammal population management. The live capture of raptors for
falconry, scientific research, or to manage a bird problem by use of a
foot snare or other body-gripping trap may also be authorized by rule
of the commission.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.65.460 and 1987 c 506 s 82 are each amended to read
as follows:
Persons purchasing a state trapping license for the first time
shall present certification of completion of a course of instruction in
safe, humane, and proper trapping techniques or pass an examination to
establish that the applicant has the requisite knowledge.
The director shall establish a program for training persons in
trapping techniques and responsibilities in urban, suburban, and rural
settings, including the use of trapping devices designed to painlessly
capture or instantly kill. The director shall cooperate with
((national and)) Washington state animal, humane, hunter education, and
trapping organizations in the development of a curriculum. Upon
successful completion of the course, trainees shall receive a trapper's
training certificate signed by an authorized instructor. This
certificate is evidence of compliance with this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.32.545 and 1998 c 190 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
A property owner, lessee, or tenant may remove a trap placed on the
owner's, lessee's, or tenant's posted or fenced property by a trapper.
A property owner, lessee, or tenant who discovers a trap placed on any
portion of his or her property that is not authorized by the owner,
lessee, or tenant, may report the finding to the department, including
whether a live animal is captured in the trap. The commission may
adopt by rule or guideline procedures for the handling of live animals
discovered in such traps.
Trappers shall attach to the chain of their traps or devices a
legible metal tag with either the department identification number of
the trapper or the name and address of the trapper in English letters
not less than one-eighth inch in height.
When a property owner, lessee, or tenant presents a trapper
identification number to the department for a trap found upon the
property of the owner, lessee, or tenant and requests identification of
the trapper, the department shall provide the requestor with the name
and address of the trapper. Prior to disclosure of the trapper's name
and address, the department shall obtain the name and address of the
requesting individual in writing and after disclosing the trapper's
name and address to the requesting individual, the requesting
individual's name and address shall be disclosed in writing to the
trapper whose name and address was disclosed.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.15.198 and 2001 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
Any person who violates RCW 77.15.194 or 77.15.196 is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor. In addition to appropriate criminal penalties, the
director shall revoke the trapping license of any person convicted of
a repeat violation of RCW 77.15.194 or 77.15.196. The director shall
not issue the violator a trapping license for a period of five years
following the revocation. ((Following a subsequent conviction for a
violation of RCW 77.15.194 or 77.15.196 by the same person, the
director shall not issue a trapping license to the person at any time))
A person may not be granted a new trapping license following a
revocation under this section unless that person completes the
education program outlined in RCW 77.65.460 not more than one year
before a new license is granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 77.15.192 (Definitions) and 2001 c 1 s
2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---