BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4456 and 2000 c 106 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of manufacturing
software or programming, as those terms are defined in this section.
(2) A person who partially or totally relocates a business from one
rural county to another rural county is eligible for any qualifying new
jobs created as a result of the relocation but is not eligible to
receive credit for the jobs moved from one county to the other.
(3)(a) To qualify for the credit, the qualifying activity of the
person must be conducted in a rural county and the qualified employment
position must be located in the rural county.
(b) If an activity is conducted both from a rural county and
outside of a rural county, the credit is available if at least ninety
percent of the qualifying activity is conducted within a rural county.
If the qualifying activity is a service taxable activity, the place
where the work is performed is the place at which the activity is
conducted.
(4)(a) The credit under this section shall equal one thousand
dollars for each qualified employment position created after July 1,
1999, in an eligible area. A credit is earned for the calendar year
the person is hired to fill the position. Additionally a credit is
earned for each year the position is maintained over the subsequent
consecutive years, up to four years. The county must meet the
definition of a rural county at the time the position is filled. If
the county does not have a rural county status the following year or
years, the position is still eligible for the remaining years if all
other conditions are met.
(b) Credit may not be taken for hiring of persons into positions
that exist before July 1, 1999. Credit is authorized for new employees
hired for new positions created on or after July 1, 1999. New
positions filled by existing employees are eligible for the credit
under this section only if the position vacated by the existing
employee is filled by a new hire. A business that is a sole
proprietorship without any employees is equivalent to one employee
position and this type of business is eligible to receive credit for
one position.
(c) If a position is filled before July 1st, this position is
eligible for the full yearly credit for that calendar year. If it is
filled after June 30th, this position is eligible for half of the
credit for that calendar year.
(d) A person that has engaged in qualifying activities in the rural
county before August 1, 1999, qualifies for the credit under this
section for positions created and filled after August 1, 1999.
(5) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. This information includes information relating to
description of qualifying activity conducted in the rural county and
outside the rural county by the person as well as detailed records on
positions and employees.
(6) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed shall be immediately due. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken,
and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.
(7) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. A person is not eligible to receive a
credit under this section if the person is receiving credit for the
same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW 82.04.44525 or is taking
the credit under RCW 82.04.4457. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(8) A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an
annual report to the department. The report shall be in a letter form
and shall include the following information: Number of positions for
which credit is being claimed, type of position for which credit is
being claimed, type of activity in which the person is engaged in the
county, how long the person has been located in the county, and
taxpayer name and registration number. The report must be filed by
January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed during the
previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in the loss of
eligibility under this section. However, the department, through its
research division, shall contact taxpayers who have not filed the
report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the taxpayer in
the filing of the report, so that the data and information necessary to
measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.
(9) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the successive credits are available to the successor for
remaining periods in the five years only if the eligibility conditions
of this section are met.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" under RCW
82.04.120. Manufacturing includes the activities of both manufacturers
and processors for hire.
(b) "Programming" means the activities that involve the creation or
modification of software, as that term is defined in this chapter, and
that are taxable as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) or as a retail
sale under RCW 82.04.050.
(c) "Qualifying activity" means manufacturing of software or
programming.
(d) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
position doing programming of software or manufacturing of software.
This excludes administrative, professional, service, executive, and
other similar positions. If an employee is either voluntarily or
involuntarily separated from employment, the employment position is
considered filled on a full-time basis if the employer is either
training or actively recruiting a replacement employee. Full-time
means a position for at least thirty-five hours a week.
(e) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of less
than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the
period July 1st to June 30th.
(f) "Software" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.215.
(11) No credit may be taken or accrued under this section on or
after January 1, ((2004)) 2008.
(12) This section expires ((December 31, 2003)) January 1, 2008.

--- END ---