BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.040 and 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
A member of the public shall not be required, as a condition to
attendance at a meeting of a governing body, to register his or her
name and other information, to complete a questionnaire, or otherwise
to fulfill any condition precedent to his or her attendance.
The governing body may require persons desiring to speak or present
written comments to identify themselves.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.30.060 and 1989 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No)) A governing body of a public agency ((shall)) may adopt
((any)) an ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation, order, or
directive((, except in)) only when the action is taken at a meeting:
(a)(i) Open to the public ((and then only at a meeting)), (ii) for
which the date ((of which is)) and location are fixed by law or rule,
(iii) for which the deadlines and procedure for posting the meeting
agenda are fixed by law or rule, and (iv) for which the time allotted
per agenda item is fixed by law or rule; or ((at a meeting of))
(b) For which notice has been given according to the provisions of
this chapter.
Any action taken at meetings failing to comply with the provisions
of this subsection shall be null and void.
(2) No governing body of a public agency at any meeting required to
be open to the public shall vote by secret ballot. Any vote taken in
violation of this subsection shall be null and void, and shall be
considered an "action" under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.30.070 and 1983 c 155 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governing body of a public agency shall provide the location of
and the time for holding regular meetings by ordinance, resolution,
bylaws, or by whatever other rule is required for the conduct of
business by that body. Unless otherwise provided for in the act under
which the public agency was formed, meetings of the governing body need
not be held within the boundaries of the territory over which the
public agency exercises jurisdiction. For meetings attended by one or
more governing bodies with authority over at least two mutually
exclusive jurisdictions, governing bodies must adopt guidelines for
setting the location of and time for holding such multijurisdictional
meetings by ordinance, resolution, bylaws, or whatever other rule is
required for the conduct of business by that body. Where two or more
governing bodies with different jurisdictions meet, their guidelines
must produce determinations of meeting time and location that do not
conflict. If at any time any regular meeting falls on a holiday, such
regular meeting shall be held on the next business day. If, by reason
of fire, flood, earthquake, or other emergency, there is a need for
expedited action by a governing body to meet the emergency, the
presiding officer of the governing body may provide for a meeting site
other than the regular meeting site and the notice and agenda
requirements of this chapter shall be suspended during such emergency.
It shall not be a violation of the requirements of this chapter for a
majority of the members of a governing body to travel together or
gather for purposes other than a regular meeting or a special meeting
as these terms are used in this chapter: PROVIDED, That they take no
action as defined in this chapter.

--- END ---