BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any tax increase imposed by the state requires voter approval
unless the tax increase is approved by a vote of at least two-thirds of
the members of each house.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "tax" includes, but is not
necessarily limited to, sales and use taxes, property taxes, business
and occupation taxes, excise taxes, fuel taxes, impact fees, license
fees, permit fees, and any monetary charge by government.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "tax" does not include:
(a) Higher education tuition; and
(b) Civil and criminal fines and other charges collected in cases
of restitution or violation of law or contract.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "tax increase" includes, but
is not necessarily limited to, a new tax, a monetary increase in an
existing tax, a tax rate increase, an expansion in the legal definition
of a tax base, and an extension of an expiring tax.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "state" includes, but is not
necessarily limited to, the state itself and all its departments and
agencies, any city, county, special district, and other political
subdivision or governmental instrumentality of or within the state.
(6) This section does not apply to any specific emergency measure
authorized by vote of two-thirds of the members of each house of the
legislature and expiring not later than twelve months from the
effective date of the emergency act.
(7) This section is intended to add to, and not replace, the
requirements for tax increases set forth in Initiative 601, the
Taxpayer Protection Act, RCW 43.135.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the policies and purposes of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, which
requires voter approval for any tax increase (S-0510/03), is validly
submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general
election held in November 2003. If the proposed amendment is not
approved and ratified, this act is null and void in its entirety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---