BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The outlook for the state's pension system
is dramatically affected by the performance of the state investment
board. The recent performance of all pension funds throughout the
country has resulted in a greater emphasis on investment expertise and
accountability for investment decisions.
The legislature has determined that particular roles and
responsibilities are appropriate for various members of the investment
board. In delineating these roles and responsibilities, a system of
accountability for performance is an essential element.
The legislature also finds that an examination of Washington
investment opportunities within the context of Washington's overall
investment strategy for diversification and maximizing returns is an
appropriate role of the state investment board and that additional
resources may be necessary to fully consider those investments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state investment board shall
maintain a portion of the board's investment portfolio in the
technology investment account, an account that shall be accounted for
separately and apart from other moneys invested by the board.
Investments from the account may be made in technology businesses.
These investments may be made directly by the board or through the
board's investment advisors, including venture capital firms. The
earnings on the technology investment account must be accounted for
separately from other investments made by the board.
(2) Investments under this section must be made in a manner
consistent with investment or management criteria established by the
board. In making investments of moneys in the technology investment
account, the primary investment objectives are to maximize return at a
prudent level of risk, as required by RCW 43.33A.110, and to maintain
a diversity of investment as required by RCW 43.33A.140. In choosing
among equal investment opportunities that satisfy these investment
objectives, the board shall give priority to those investments from the
account that help attract or assist technology businesses in the state,
including investments in technology businesses seeking to locate or
expand in this state.
(3) The state investment board shall hire or designate from its
current staff, at least one experienced full-time staff person to
research, investigate, and recommend to the state investment board, if
appropriate, and subject to the standards of investment and management
under RCW 43.33A.110 and this section, investment opportunities in
technology businesses that are located in, have a substantial
employment base in, make a significant economic contribution to, or are
seeking to locate or expand in, Washington state. The department of
community, trade, and economic development is responsible for actively
marketing the technology investment account to businesses seeking to
locate or expand in Washington and shall work in conjunction with
appropriate staff of the state investment board to coordinate
information on technology businesses interested in locating or
expanding in Washington.
(4) As used in this section "technology business" means a company
that has as its principal function the providing of services including
computer, information transfer, communication, distribution,
processing, administrative, laboratory, experimental, developmental,
technical, testing services, manufacture of goods or materials, the
processing of goods or materials by physical or chemical change,
computer-related activities, robotics, energy, biological or
pharmaceutical industrial activity, or technology-oriented or emerging
industrial activity.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.33A.020 and 2002 c 303 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created the state investment board to consist of
((fifteen)) members to be appointed as provided in this ((section))
chapter.
(((1) One member who is an active member of the public employees'
retirement system and has been an active member for at least five
years. This member shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate, from a list of nominations submitted by
organizations representing active members of the system. The initial
term of appointment shall be one year.
(2) One member who is an active member of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system and has been an active
member for at least five years. This member shall be appointed by the
governor, subject to confirmation by the senate, from a list of
nominations submitted by organizations representing active members of
the system. The initial term of appointment shall be two years.
(3) One member who is an active member of the teachers' retirement
system and has been an active member for at least five years. This
member shall be appointed by the superintendent of public instruction
subject to confirmation by the senate. The initial term of appointment
shall be three years.
(4) The state treasurer or the assistant state treasurer if
designated by the state treasurer.
(5) A member of the state house of representatives. This member
shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.
(6) A member of the state senate. This member shall be appointed
by the president of the senate.
(7) One member who is a retired member of a state retirement system
shall be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the
senate. The initial term of appointment shall be three years.
(8) The director of the department of labor and industries.
(9) The director of the department of retirement systems.
(10) One member who is an active member of the school employees'
retirement system and has at least five years of service credit. This
member shall be appointed by the superintendent of public instruction
subject to confirmation by the senate. The initial term of appointment
shall be three years.
(11) Five nonvoting members appointed by the state investment board
who are considered experienced and qualified in the field of
investments.
The legislative members shall serve terms of two years. The
initial legislative members appointed to the board shall be appointed
no sooner than January 10, 1983. The position of a legislative member
on the board shall become vacant at the end of that member's term on
the board or whenever the member ceases to be a member of the senate or
house of representatives from which the member was appointed.
After the initial term of appointment, all other members of the
state investment board, except ex officio members, shall serve terms of
three years and shall hold office until successors are appointed.
Members' terms, except for ex officio members, shall commence on
January 1 of the year in which the appointments are made.
Members may be reappointed for additional terms. Appointments for
vacancies shall be made for the unexpired terms in the same manner as
the original appointments. Any member may be removed from the board
for cause by the member's respective appointing authority.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 There is hereby created an audit and
accountability committee of the state investment board consisting of
not more than five voting members of the investment board. The audit
and accountability committee members are appointed by the state
investment board chairperson.
At least one member of the audit and accountability committee must
be a representative of one of the retirement system beneficiaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The state treasurer or a designee is a
member of the state investment board. In addition to serving as a
fiduciary trustee, the state treasurer serves as a member of the audit
and accountability committee. The state treasurer will use his or her
expertise in financial markets to assist the accountability review
process for the state investment board. The state treasurer will also
assist in identifying in-state investment opportunities that meet or
exceed out-of-state investment returns. The state treasurer will work
with the chair of the state investment board and investment board staff
to develop and implement an outreach program to Washington citizens.
The purpose of the outreach program is to increase awareness of the
performance of the pension fund and to encourage public review of the
investment portfolio performance in aggregate. The state treasurer
will report to the investment board at least twice a year the extent of
those outreach efforts and any significant concerns or issues raised by
the public regarding the state investment board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 One member of the state investment board is
an active member of the public employees' retirement system and has
been an active member for at least five years. This member is
appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate, from
a list of nominations submitted by organizations representing active
members of the system. In addition to serving as a fiduciary trustee,
this member will use his or her position as a representative of pension
fund beneficiaries to work with state investment board staff to
participate in an outreach program specific to the public employees'
retirement system beneficiaries. At a minimum, the outreach program
will include making available a written annual report to public
employees and an annual meeting for public employees detailing board
performance and investment objectives. The public employees' board
member will also assist in identifying issues relevant to public
employees' for which the state investment board is held accountable,
and will provide a quarterly report to the board on those issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 One member of the state investment board is
an active member of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system and has been an active member for at least five
years. This member is appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate, from a list of nominations submitted by
organizations representing active members of the system. In addition
to serving as a fiduciary trustee, this member will use his or her
position as a representative of pension fund beneficiaries to work with
state investment board staff to participate in an outreach program
specific to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system beneficiaries. At a minimum, the outreach program will include
making available a written annual report to law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' employees and an annual meeting for law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' employees detailing board performance and
investment objectives. The law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' board member will also assist in identifying issues relevant
to law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' for which the state
investment board is held accountable, and will provide a quarterly
report to the board on those issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 One member of the state investment board is
an active member of the teachers' retirement system and has been an
active member for at least five years. This member is appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction subject to confirmation by the
senate. In addition to serving as a fiduciary trustee, this member
will use his or her position as a representative of pension fund
beneficiaries to work with state investment board staff to participate
in an outreach program specific to the teachers' retirement system
beneficiaries. At a minimum, the outreach program will include making
available a written annual report to teachers' retirement system
employees and an annual meeting for teachers' retirement system
employees detailing board performance and investment objectives. The
teachers' board member will also assist in identifying issues relevant
to teachers for which the state investment board is held accountable,
and will provide a quarterly report to the board on those issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 One member of the state investment board is
an active member of the school employees' retirement system and has at
least five years of service credit. This member is appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction subject to confirmation by the
senate. In addition to serving as a fiduciary trustee, this member
will use his or her position as a representative of pension fund
beneficiaries to work with state investment board staff to participate
in an outreach program specific to the school employees' retirement
system beneficiaries. At a minimum, the outreach program will include
making available a written annual report to school employees and an
annual meeting for school employees detailing board performance and
investment objectives. The school employees' board member will also
assist in identifying issues relevant to school employees for which the
state investment board is held accountable, and will provide a
quarterly report to the board on those issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 One member of the state investment board is
a retired member of a state retirement system and is appointed by the
governor subject to confirmation by the senate. In addition to serving
as a fiduciary trustee, this member will use his or her position as a
representative of pension fund beneficiaries to work with state
investment board staff to participate in an outreach program specific
to retired beneficiaries. At a minimum, the outreach program will
include making available a written annual report to retirees and an
annual meeting for retirees detailing board performance and investment
objectives. The retirees' board member will also assist in identifying
issues relevant to retirees for which the state investment board is
held accountable, and will provide a quarterly report to the board on
those issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The director of labor and industries is a
member of the state investment board, representing an agency that is
responsible for administering programs supported by state investment
board earnings. In addition to serving as a fiduciary trustee, the
director of labor and industries will work with state investment board
staff to implement a process for reporting state investment board
earnings and investment objectives to those businesses in Washington
state that provide the funding for the programs administered by the
department of labor and industries that are supported by state
investment board earnings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The director of retirement systems is a
member of the state investment board, representing an agency that is
responsible for administering programs supported by state investment
board earnings. In addition to serving as a fiduciary trustee, the
director of retirement systems will implement a process of reporting
state investment board earnings to the constituents of retirement
systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The performance of the state investment
board has a profound effect on the state budget and the interests of
the people of the state. Accordingly, the governor or the governor's
designee is a member of the state investment board. In addition to
serving as a fiduciary trustee, the governor will work with the state
investment board staff to develop and implement an outreach program to
Washington citizens. The intent of the outreach program is to increase
awareness of the performance of the pension fund and to encourage
public review of the investment board's performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The performance of the state investment
board has a profound effect on the state budget and the interests of
the people of the state. Accordingly, one member of the state
investment board is a member of the state house of representatives.
This member is appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives. In addition to serving as a fiduciary trustee, this
member is responsible for reporting to the relevant committees in the
house of representatives on the status of the funds for which the state
investment board is responsible and accountable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The performance of the state investment
board has a profound effect on the state budget and the interests of
the people of the state. Accordingly, one member of the state
investment board is a member of the state senate. This member is
appointed by the president of the senate. In addition to serving as a
fiduciary trustee, this member is responsible for reporting to the
relevant committees in the senate on the status of the funds for which
the state investment board is responsible and accountable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The performance of the state investment
board has a profound effect on local government fiscal systems and the
interests of people in our communities. Accordingly, one member is
appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate, from
a list of nominations submitted by cities and counties participating in
pension systems supported by the state investment board. In addition
to serving as a fiduciary trustee, this member is responsible for
reporting to the appropriate local government entities on the status of
the funds for which the state investment board is responsible and
accountable. The local government designee will work with the state
investment board staff to develop and implement an outreach program to
Washington citizens. The intent of the outreach program is to increase
awareness of the performance of the pension fund and to encourage
public review of the investment board's performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Expertise in investment decisions is sought
by the inclusion of five nonvoting members appointed by the state
investment board after nomination by the audit and accountability
committee, who are considered experienced and qualified in the field of
investments. At least one of the nonvoting members must have
experience in investing in companies, funds, or other investments that
are located in, have a substantial employment base in, or make a
significant economic contribution to, Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) All members of the state investment
board, except nonvoting members, legislative members, and ex officio
members, serve terms of three years and hold office until successors
are appointed. Members' terms, except for nonvoting members, commence
on January 1st of the year in which the appointments are made.
(2) Members may be reappointed for additional terms. Appointments
for vacancies are made for the unexpired terms in the same manner as
the original appointments. Any voting member may be removed from the
state investment board for cause by the member's respective appointing
authority. The five nonvoting members serve for a term determined by
the audit and accountability committee, which may not exceed two years.
Nonvoting members may be removed from the board by the audit and
accountability committee at any time with or without cause.
(3) The legislative members serve terms of two years. The position
of a legislative member on the state investment board becomes vacant at
the end of that member's term on the state investment board or whenever
the member ceases to be a member of the senate or house of
representatives from which the member was appointed.

Sec. 19 RCW
43.33A.040 and 2002 c 303 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A quorum to conduct the business of the state investment board
consists of ((at least six)) a majority of the voting members serving
on the board. No action may be taken by the board without the
affirmative vote of ((six members)) a majority of the voting members
serving on the board.
(2) The state investment board shall meet at least quarterly at
such times as it may fix. The board shall elect a chairperson and vice
chairperson annually: PROVIDED, That the legislative members are not
eligible to serve as chairperson.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 2 and 4 through 18 of this act are
each added to chapter 43.33A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---