BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.52.450 and 1994 c 154 s 215 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a complaint alleges a violation of RCW 42.52.180 by a
legislator or statewide elected official other than the attorney
general, the attorney general shall, if requested by the appropriate
ethics board, conduct the investigation under RCW 42.52.420 and
recommend action ((to the appropriate ethics board)).
(2) If a complaint alleges a violation of RCW 42.52.180 by the
attorney general, the state auditor shall conduct the investigation
under RCW 42.52.420 and recommend action to the appropriate ethics
board.

--- END ---