BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.54.340 and 1999 c 381 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any commercial fertilizer distributed in this state shall have
placed on or affixed to the package a label setting forth in clearly
legible and conspicuous form the following information:
(a) The net weight;
(b) The product name, brand, and grade. The grade is not required
if no primary nutrients are claimed;
(c) The guaranteed analysis;
(d) The name and address of the registrant or licensee. The name
and address of the manufacturer, if different from the registrant or
licensee, may also be stated;
(e) Any information required under WAC 296-62-054;
(f) ((At a minimum, one of the following labeling statements:
(i) "Information received by the Washington State Department of
Agriculture regarding the components in this product is available on
the internet at http://www.wa.gov/agr/"; or
(ii) "Information regarding the contents and levels of metals in
this product is available on the internet at http://www.wa.gov/agr/";
or
(iii) "Information regarding the contents and levels of metals in
this product is available on the internet at http://www.regulatory-info-xx.com". Each registrant must substitute a unique alpha numeric
identifier for "xx". This statement may be used only if the registrant
establishes and maintains the internet site and the internet site meets
the following criteria:
(A) There is no advertising or company-specific information on the
site;
(B) There is a clearly visible, direct hyperlink to the
department's internet site specified in (f)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection (1); and
(C) Any other criteria adopted by the director by rule)) A
statement, established by rule, referring persons to the department's
Uniform Resource Locator (URL) internet address where data regarding
the metals content of the product is located; and
(g) Other information as required by the department by rule.
(2) If a commercial fertilizer is distributed in bulk, a written or
printed statement of the information required by subsection (1) of this
section shall accompany delivery and be supplied to the purchaser at
the time of delivery.
(3) Each delivery of a customer-formula fertilizer shall be subject
to containing those ingredients specified by the purchaser, which
ingredients shall be shown on the statement or invoice with the amount
contained therein, and a record of all invoices of customer-formula
grade mixes shall be kept by the registrant or licensee for a period of
twelve months and shall be available to the department upon request:
PROVIDED, That each such delivery shall be accompanied by either a
statement, invoice, a delivery slip, or a label if bagged, containing
the following information: The net weight; the brand; the guaranteed
analysis which may be stated to the nearest tenth of a percent or to
the next lower whole number; the name and address of the registrant or
licensee, or manufacturer, or both; and the name and address of the
purchaser.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act takes effect January
1, 2004.

--- END ---