BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.315 and 1994 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No city or town shall enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation
that fails to conform to the limited preemption entitled "Amateur Radio
Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952 (1985)" issued by the federal
communications commission. An ordinance or regulation adopted by a
city or town with respect to amateur radio antennas shall conform to
the limited federal preemption, that states local regulations that
involve placement, screening, or height of antennas based on health,
safety, or aesthetic considerations must be crafted to reasonably
accommodate amateur communications, and to represent the minimal
practicable regulation to accomplish the local authority's legitimate
purpose. However, no city or town shall restrict an amateur radio
antenna height to less than seventy feet unless the restriction is
necessary to achieve a clearly defined health, safety, or aesthetic
consideration, and the city or town finds that these considerations are
of greater benefit to its citizenry than the value the proposed antenna
would add to the ability of the amateur radio network to fulfill its
mission as part of the state and local emergency management
organizations, including the provision of back-up emergency
communications coverage without gaps for the entire state.

Sec. 2 RCW 35A.21.260 and 1994 c 50 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
No code city shall enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation that
fails to conform to the limited preemption entitled "Amateur Radio
Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952 (1985)" issued by the federal
communications commission. An ordinance or regulation adopted by a
code city with respect to amateur radio antennas shall conform to the
limited federal preemption, that states local regulations that involve
placement, screening, or height of antennas based on health, safety, or
aesthetic considerations must be crafted to reasonably accommodate
amateur communications, and to represent the minimal practicable
regulation to accomplish the local authority's legitimate purpose.
However, no code city shall restrict an amateur radio antenna height to
less than seventy feet unless the restriction is necessary to achieve
a clearly defined health, safety, or aesthetic consideration, and the
city or town finds that these considerations are of greater benefit to
its citizenry than the value the proposed antenna would add to the
ability of the amateur radio network to fulfill its mission as part of
the state and local emergency management organizations, including the
provision of back-up emergency communications coverage without gaps for
the entire state.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.32.600 and 1994 c 50 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
No county shall enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation that
fails to conform to the limited preemption entitled "Amateur Radio
Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952 (1985)" issued by the federal
communications commission. An ordinance or regulation adopted by a
county with respect to amateur radio antennas shall conform to the
limited federal preemption, that states local regulations that involve
placement, screening, or height of antennas based on health, safety, or
aesthetic considerations must be crafted to reasonably accommodate
amateur communications, and to represent the minimal practicable
regulation to accomplish the local authority's legitimate purpose.
However, no county shall restrict an amateur radio antenna height to
less than seventy feet unless the restriction is necessary to achieve
a clearly defined health, safety, or aesthetic consideration, and the
city or town finds that these considerations are of greater benefit to
its citizenry than the value the proposed antenna would add to the
ability of the amateur radio network to fulfill its mission as part of
the state and local emergency management organizations, including the
provision of back-up emergency communications coverage without gaps for
the entire state.

--- END ---