BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the department of
fish and wildlife is responsible for the proper management of the
state's diverse wildlife resources. Wildlife management often requires
the department of fish and wildlife to immobilize individual animals in
order for the animals to be moved, treated, examined, or for other
legitimate purposes. The legislature finds that it is often necessary
for the department to use certain controlled substances to accomplish
these purposes. Therefore, the legislature finds that the department
of fish and wildlife, in coordination with the board of pharmacy, must
be enabled to use approved controlled substances in order to accomplish
its legitimate wildlife management goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of fish and wildlife may apply to the department of
health for registration pursuant to the applicable provisions of this
chapter to purchase, possess, and administer controlled substances for
use in chemical capture programs. The department of fish and wildlife
must not permit a person to administer controlled substances unless the
person has demonstrated adequate knowledge of the potential hazards and
proper techniques to be used in administering controlled substances.
The department of health may issue a limited registration to carry
out the provisions of this section. The board may adopt rules to
ensure strict compliance with the provisions of this section. The
board, in consultation with the department of fish and wildlife, must
by rule add or remove additional controlled substances for use in
chemical capture programs. The board shall suspend or revoke
registration upon determination that the person administering
controlled substances has not demonstrated adequate knowledge as
required by this section. This authority is granted in addition to any
other power to suspend or revoke registration as provided by law.

--- END ---