BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that healthy wildlife
populations significantly contribute to the economic vitality of
Washington's rural areas through increased opportunities for watchable
wildlife and related tourism. Travel related to watchable wildlife is
one of the fastest growing segments of the travel industry. Much of
this travel occurs off-season, creating jobs and providing revenue to
local businesses and governments during otherwise slow periods. The
watchable wildlife industry is particularly important to Washington's
rural economies.
The legislature also finds that it is vital to support programs
that enhance watchable wildlife activities and tourism, while also
protecting the wildlife resources that attract the viewers. A revenue
source must be created and directed to the watchable wildlife programs
of the department of fish and wildlife to develop watchable wildlife
opportunities in cooperation with other local, state, and federal
agencies, and nongovernmental organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may sell watchable wildlife decals. Proceeds
from the sale of the decal must be deposited into the state wildlife
fund created in RCW 77.12.170 and must be dedicated to the support of
the department's watchable wildlife activities. The department may
also use proceeds from the sale of the decal for marketing the decal
and for marketing watchable wildlife activities in the state.
(2) The term "watchable wildlife activities" includes but is not
limited to: Initiating partnerships with communities to jointly
develop watchable wildlife projects, building infrastructure to serve
wildlife viewers, assisting and training communities in conducting
wildlife watching events, developing destination wildlife viewing
corridors and trails, tours, maps, brochures, and travel aides, and
offering grants to assist rural communities in identifying key wildlife
attractions and ways to protect and promote them.
(3) The commission must adopt by rule the cost of the watchable
wildlife decal. A person may, at their discretion, contribute more
than the cost as set by the commission by rule for the watchable
wildlife decal in order to support watchable wildlife activities. A
person who purchases a watchable wildlife decal must be issued one
vehicle use permit free of charge.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.12.170 and 2001 c 253 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
fund which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes;
(c) The sale of licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by
chapter 77.32 RCW and RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult
saltwater and all shellfish licenses, which shall be deposited into the
state general fund;
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle license plates as provided in
chapter 46.16 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320
((or 77.32.380));
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The sale of personal property seized by the department for
fish, shellfish, or wildlife violations; ((and))
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; and
(k) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under section 2 of this
act.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.32.380 and 2001 c 243 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Persons who enter upon or use clearly identified department
improved access facilities with a motor vehicle may be required to
display a current annual fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit on
the motor vehicle while within or while using an improved access
facility. An "improved access facility" is a clearly identified area
specifically created for motor vehicle parking, and includes any boat
launch or boat ramp associated with the parking area, but does not
include the department parking facilities at the Gorge Concert Center
near George, Washington. One vehicle use permit shall be issued at no
charge with an initial purchase of either an annual saltwater,
freshwater, combination, small game hunting, big game hunting, or
trapping license, or a watchable wildlife decal, issued by the
department. The annual fee for a fish and wildlife lands vehicle use
permit, if purchased separately, is ten dollars. A person to whom the
department has issued a vehicle use permit or who has purchased a
vehicle use permit separately may purchase additional vehicle use
permits from the department at a cost of five dollars per vehicle use
permit. Revenue derived from the sale of fish and wildlife lands
vehicle use permits shall be used solely for the stewardship and
maintenance of department improved access facilities.
Youth groups may use department improved access facilities without
possessing a vehicle use permit when accompanied by a vehicle use
permit holder.
((The department may accept contributions into the state wildlife
fund for the sound stewardship of fish and wildlife. Contributors
shall be known as "conservation patrons" and, for contributions of
twenty dollars or more, shall receive a fish and wildlife lands vehicle
use permit free of charge.))
(2) The vehicle use permit must be displayed from the interior of
the motor vehicle so that it is clearly visible from outside of the
motor vehicle before entering upon or using the motor vehicle on a
department improved access facility. The vehicle use permit can be
transferred between two vehicles and must contain space for the vehicle
license numbers of each vehicle.
(3) Failure to display the fish and wildlife lands vehicle use
permit if required by this section is an infraction under chapter 7.84
RCW, and department employees are authorized to issue a notice of
infraction to the registered owner of any motor vehicle entering upon
or using a department improved access facility without such a vehicle
use permit. The penalty for failure to clearly display the vehicle use
permit is sixty-six dollars. This penalty is reduced to thirty dollars
if the registered owner provides proof to the court that he or she
purchased a vehicle use permit within fifteen days after the issuance
of the notice of violation.

--- END ---