BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the appropriate
monitoring of level three sex offenders may increase public safety and
that global positioning system based electronic monitoring holds
promise as an adjunct to traditional methods of supervision in the
community. The legislature also finds, however, that information it
has been presented regarding the actual availability, reliability,
price, and effectiveness of electronic monitoring based on global
positioning system technology is conflicting and inconclusive. The
legislature notes that some vendors have proposed systems in which no
production models have yet been built or tested. Consequently, the
legislature intends that a pilot project be undertaken to assess the
viability of passive data logging global positioning system based
electronic monitoring.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs shall work with the department of corrections and the
department of social and health services to establish a pilot project
to test the availability, reliability, and effectiveness of an
electronic monitoring system based on passive data logging global
positioning system technology.
(2) The pilot project shall be of sufficient size to test the
reliability of the technology in a variety of geographical
circumstances including both urban and rural locations.
(3) The pilot project shall test the system using sex or kidnapping
offenders under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections and
persons civilly committed under chapter 71.09 RCW under a variety of
supervision circumstances. Offenders included in the pilot project
shall be offenders over whom the department of corrections has
authority to establish conditions of supervision or persons who have
been ordered to be electronically monitored by the court in a
proceeding under chapter 71.09 RCW and who have been classified as
level three offenders by the end of sentence review committee.
(4) The pilot project shall specifically examine the feasibility of
electronic monitoring for level three sex offenders or kidnapping
offenders who register as homeless or transient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and the governor on the results of the pilot project by
December 1, 2003.
(2) The report shall discuss:
(a) The availability of the technology, including a description of
the system used and a discussion of the various types of global
positioning system based monitoring available and appropriate for a sex
offender population;
(b) Any geographic limitations posed by the technology;
(c) The reliability, including the false alarm rate of the
technology;
(d) Any training requirements for department of corrections staff
or supervised persons;
(e) Any distinctions in effectiveness or feasibility for different
supervision populations; and
(f) Costs, including equipment costs, monitoring fees, and any
changes to department of corrections staffing levels.
(3) The association shall make a recommendation in the report about
the frequency and timing of monitoring reports.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A decision by the department of
corrections or the department of social and health services to include
or exclude a person from the pilot project does not provide a basis for
imposition of civil damages and a decision not to include a supervised
offender in the pilot project does not constitute negligent
supervision.
(2) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and
its employees working on this pilot project are immune from civil
liability for damages for any discretionary decisions made pursuant to
the pilot project, unless it is shown that the association or its
employee acted with gross negligence or in bad faith.

--- END ---