BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.430 and 1998 c 191 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Catch record cards necessary for proper management of the
state's food fish and game fish species and shellfish resources shall
be administered under rules adopted by the commission and issued at no
charge for the initial catch record card and ten dollars for each
subsequent catch record card. A duplicate catch record costs ten
dollars.
(2) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term
charter stamp licenses are not subject to the ten-dollar charge as
provided in this section. Charter boat or guide operators issuing
temporary short-term charter stamp licenses shall affix the stamp to
each catch record card issued before fishing commences. Catch record
cards issued with a temporary short-term charter stamp are valid for
two consecutive days.
(3) The department shall include provisions for recording marked
and unmarked salmon in catch record cards issued after March 31, 2004.
(4) The funds received from the sale of catch record cards must be
deposited into the wildlife fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.32.256 and 2002 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall by rule establish the conditions and fees for
issuance of duplicate licenses, rebates, permits, tags, and stamps
required by this chapter. The fee for duplicate licenses, rebates,
permits, tags, and stamps, except catch record cards, may not exceed
the actual cost to the department for issuing the duplicate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect April 1, 2004.

--- END ---