BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the best
interest of the people of the state of Washington to contain the
significantly increasing costs of malpractice insurance for licensed
health care professionals and institutions and to ensure the continued
availability and affordability of health care services in this state by
enacting further reforms to the health care tort liability system.
The legislature finds that, notwithstanding the tort reform
measures it has enacted in the past, the amounts being paid out in
judgments and settlements have continued to increase inordinately, and
that as a result there have been dramatic increases in the cost of
health care professional liability insurance coverage. The legislature
further finds that the upward pressures on already high malpractice
insurance premiums threaten the publics' health by discouraging
physicians and other health care professionals from initiating or
continuing their practice in this state.
The legislature further finds that the state of California, largely
as a result of its enactment of the "medical injury compensation reform
act" in 1975, has been able to successfully stabilize the health care
professional liability insurance market, maintain access to affordable
quality health care services, and avert the kind of crisis now facing
the residents of Washington.
The legislature finds that such reforms are rationally related to
the legitimate goals of reducing the costs associated with the health
care tort liability system while ensuring adequate and appropriate
compensation for persons injured as a result of health care, ensuring
the continued availability and affordability of health care services in
this state, preventing the curtailment of health care services in this
state, stabilizing insurance and health care costs, preventing stale
health care liability claims, and protecting and preserving the public
health, safety, and welfare as a whole.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.56.250 and 1986 c 305 s 301 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Economic damages" means objectively verifiable monetary
losses, including medical expenses, loss of earnings, burial costs,
loss of use of property, cost of replacement or repair, cost of
obtaining substitute domestic services, loss of employment, and loss of
business or employment opportunities.
(b) "Noneconomic damages" means subjective, nonmonetary losses,
including((,)) but not limited to pain, suffering, inconvenience,
mental anguish, disability or disfigurement incurred by the injured
party, loss of ability to enjoy life, emotional distress, loss of
society and companionship, loss of consortium, injury to reputation and
humiliation, ((and)) destruction of the parent-child relationship, and
other nonpecuniary damages of any type.
(c) "Bodily injury" means physical injury, sickness, or disease,
including death.
(d) "Average annual wage" means the average annual wage in the
state of Washington as determined under RCW 50.04.355.
(2) In no action seeking damages for personal injury or death may
a claimant recover a judgment for noneconomic damages exceeding an
amount determined by multiplying 0.43 by the average annual wage and by
the life expectancy of the person incurring noneconomic damages, as the
life expectancy is determined by the life expectancy tables adopted by
the insurance commissioner. For purposes of determining the maximum
amount allowable for noneconomic damages, a claimant's life expectancy
shall not be less than fifteen years. The limitation contained in this
subsection applies to all claims for noneconomic damages made by a
claimant who incurred bodily injury. Claims for loss of consortium,
loss of society and companionship, destruction of the parent-child
relationship, and all other derivative claims asserted by persons who
did not sustain bodily injury are to be included within the limitation
on claims for noneconomic damages arising from the same bodily injury.
(3) If a case is tried to a jury, the jury shall not be informed of
the limitation contained in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action or arbitration for damages for injury or death
occurring as a result of health care, or arranging for the provision of
health care, whether brought under chapter 7.70 RCW, or under RCW
4.20.010, 4.20.020, 4.20.046, 4.20.060, 4.24.010, or 48.43.545(1), or
any combination thereof, the total amount of noneconomic damages may
not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(2) The limitation on noneconomic damages contained in subsection
(1) of this section includes all noneconomic damages claimed by or on
behalf of the person whose injury or death occurred as a result of
health care or arranging for the provision of health care, as well as
all claims for loss of consortium, loss of society and companionship,
destruction of the parent-child relationship, and other derivative
claims asserted by or on behalf of others arising from the same injury
or death. If the jury's assessment of noneconomic damages exceeds the
limitation contained in subsection (1) of this section, nothing in RCW
4.44.450 precludes the court from entering a judgment that limits the
total amount of noneconomic damages to those limits provided in
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.70.070 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the
court shall, in any action under this chapter, determine the
reasonableness of each party's attorneys' fees. The court shall take
into consideration the following:
(((1))) (a) The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty
of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly;
(((2))) (b) The likelihood, if apparent to the client, that the
acceptance of the particular employment will preclude other employment
by the lawyer;
(((3))) (c) The fee customarily charged in the locality for similar
legal services;
(((4))) (d) The amount involved and the results obtained;
(((5))) (e) The time limitations imposed by the client or by the
circumstances;
(((6))) (f) The nature and length of the professional relationship
with the client;
(((7))) (g) The experience, reputation, and ability of the lawyer
or lawyers performing the services;
(((8))) (h) Whether the fee is fixed or contingent.
(2)(a) An attorney may not contract for or collect a contingency
fee for representing a person in connection with an action for damages
against a health care provider based upon professional negligence in
excess of the following limits:
(i) Forty percent of the first fifty thousand dollars recovered;
(ii) Thirty-three and one-third percent of the next fifty thousand
dollars recovered;
(iii) Twenty-five percent of the next five hundred thousand dollars
recovered;
(iv) Fifteen percent of any amount in which the recovery exceeds
six hundred thousand dollars.
(b) The limitations in this section apply regardless of whether the
recovery is by judgment, settlement, arbitration, mediation, or other
form of alternative dispute resolution.
(c) If periodic payments are awarded to the plaintiff, the court
shall place a total value on these payments and include this amount in
computing the total award from which attorneys' fees are calculated
under this subsection.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "recovered" means the net sum
recovered after deducting any disbursements or costs incurred in
connection with prosecution or settlement of the claim. Costs of
medical care incurred by the plaintiff and the attorneys' office
overhead costs or charges are not deductible disbursements or costs for
such purposes.
(3) This section applies to all agreements for attorneys' fees
entered into or modified after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 7.70.100 and 1993 c 492 s 419 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No action based upon a health care provider's professional
negligence may be commenced unless the defendant has been given at
least ninety days' notice of the intention to commence the action. If
the notice is served within ninety days of the expiration of the
applicable statute of limitations, the time for the commencement of the
action must be extended ninety days from the service of the notice.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are not
applicable with respect to any defendant whose name is unknown to the
plaintiff at the time of filing the complaint and who is identified
therein by a fictitious name.
(3) After the filing of the ninety-day presuit notice, and before
a superior court trial, all causes of action, whether based in tort,
contract, or otherwise, for damages arising from injury occurring as a
result of health care provided after July 1, 1993, shall be subject to
mandatory mediation prior to trial.
(((2))) (4) The supreme court shall by rule adopt procedures to
implement mandatory mediation of actions under this chapter. The rules
shall require mandatory mediation without exception and address, at a
minimum:
(a) Procedures for the appointment of, and qualifications of,
mediators. A mediator shall have experience or expertise related to
actions arising from injury occurring as a result of health care, and
be a member of the state bar association who has been admitted to the
bar for a minimum of five years or who is a retired judge. The parties
may stipulate to a nonlawyer mediator. The court may prescribe
additional qualifications of mediators;
(b) Appropriate limits on the amount or manner of compensation of
mediators;
(c) The number of days following the filing of a claim under this
chapter within which a mediator must be selected;
(d) The method by which a mediator is selected. The rule shall
provide for designation of a mediator by the superior court if the
parties are unable to agree upon a mediator;
(e) The number of days following the selection of a mediator within
which a mediation conference must be held;
(f) A means by which mediation of an action under this chapter may
be waived by a mediator who has determined that the claim is not
appropriate for mediation; and
(g) Any other matters deemed necessary by the court.
(((3))) (5) Mediators shall not impose discovery schedules upon the
parties.
(6) The supreme court shall by rule also adopt procedures for the
parties to certify to the court the manner of mediation used by the
parties to comply with this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 4.16.350 and 1998 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil action for damages for injury or death occurring as
a result of health care which is provided after June 25, 1976, against:
(((1))) (a) A person licensed by this state to provide health care
or related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's
assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive
care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his
estate or personal representative;
(((2))) (b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of
this
subsection (((1) of this section)), acting in the course and scope
of his or her employment, including, in the event such employee or
agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or
(((3))) (c) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in (a) of this
subsection (((1) of this section)), including, but not limited to, a
hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or
an officer, director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course
and scope of his or her employment, including, in the event such
officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or
personal representative;
based upon alleged professional negligence shall be commenced within
three years of the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition, or one year of the time the patient or his or her
representative or custodial parent or guardian discovered or reasonably
should have discovered that the injury or condition was caused by said
act or omission, whichever period ((expires later, except that in no
event shall an action be commenced more than eight years after said act
or omission: PROVIDED, That the time for commencement of an action is
tolled upon proof of fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence of
a foreign body not intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic purpose
or effect, until the date the patient or the patient's representative
has actual knowledge of the act of fraud or concealment, or of the
presence of the foreign body; the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date of the actual knowledge in
which to commence a civil action for damages.
For purposes of this section, notwithstanding RCW 4.16.190, the
knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed to a
person under the age of eighteen years, and such imputed knowledge
shall operate to bar the claim of such minor to the same extent that
the claim of an adult would be barred under this section. Any action
not commenced in accordance with this section shall be barred.
For purposes of this section, with respect to care provided after
June 25, 1976, and before August 1, 1986, the knowledge of a custodial
parent or guardian shall be imputed as of April 29, 1987, to persons
under the age of eighteen years)) occurs first.
(2) In no event may an action be commenced more than three years
after the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition except:
(a) Upon proof of fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence
of a foreign body not intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic
purpose or effect, in which case the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date the patient or the patient's
representative or custodial parent or guardian has actual knowledge of
the act of fraud or concealment or of the presence of the foreign body
in which to commence a civil action for damages.
(b) In the case of a minor, for any period during minority, but
only for such period during minority in which the minor's custodial
parent or guardian and the defendant or the defendant's insurer have
committed fraud or collusion in the failure to bring an action on
behalf of the minor.
(c) In the case of a minor under the full age of six years, in
which case the action on behalf of the minor must be commenced within
three years or prior to the minor's eighth birthday, whichever provides
a longer period.
(3) Any action not commenced in accordance with this section is
barred.
(4) For purposes of this section, the tolling provisions of RCW
4.16.190 do not apply.
(5) This section does not apply to a civil action based on
intentional conduct brought against those individuals or entities
specified in this section by a person for recovery of damages for
injury occurring as a result of childhood sexual abuse as defined in
RCW 4.16.340(5).

Sec. 7 RCW 7.70.080 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any party may present evidence to the trier of fact that the
((patient)) plaintiff has already been, or will be, compensated for the
injury complained of from ((any source except the assets of the
patient, his representative, or his immediate family, or insurance
purchased with such assets. In the event such evidence is admitted,
the plaintiff may present evidence of an obligation to repay such
compensation. Insurance bargained for or provided on behalf of an
employee shall be considered insurance purchased with the assets of the
employee)) a collateral source. In the event the evidence is admitted,
the other party may present evidence of any amount that was paid or
contributed to secure the right to any compensation. Compensation as
used in this section shall mean payment of money or other property to
or on behalf of the patient, rendering of services to the patient free
of charge to the patient, or indemnification of expenses incurred by or
on behalf of the patient. Notwithstanding this section, evidence of
compensation by a defendant health care provider may be offered only by
that provider.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by statute, there is no right of
subrogation or reimbursement from a plaintiff's tort recovery with
respect to compensation covered in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 7.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A contract for health care services that contains a provision
for arbitration of a dispute as to professional negligence of a health
care provider under chapter 7.70 RCW must have the provision as the
first article of the contract and must be expressed in the following
language:
"It is understood that any dispute as to medical malpractice that
is as to whether any medical services rendered under this contract were
unnecessary or unauthorized or were improperly, negligently, or
incompetently rendered, will be determined by submission to arbitration
as provided by Washington law, and not by a lawsuit or resort to court
process except as Washington law provides for judicial review of
arbitration proceedings. Both parties to this contract, by entering
into it, are giving up their constitutional right to have such a
dispute decided in a court of law before a jury, and instead are
accepting the use of arbitration."
(2) Immediately before the signature line provided for the
individual contracting for the medical services, there must appear the
following in at least ten-point bold red type:
"NOTICE: BY SIGNING THIS CONTRACT YOU ARE AGREEING TO HAVE ANY
ISSUE OF MEDICAL MALPRACTICE DECIDED BY NEUTRAL ARBITRATION AND YOU ARE
GIVING UP YOUR RIGHT TO A JURY OR COURT TRIAL. SEE ARTICLE ONE OF THIS
CONTRACT."
(3) Once signed, such a contract governs all subsequent open-book
account transactions for medical services for which the contract was
signed until or unless rescinded by written notice within thirty days
of signature. Written notice of such rescission may be given by a
guardian or other legal representative of the patient if the patient is
incapacitated or a minor.
(4) Where the contract is one for medical services to a minor, it
may not be disaffirmed if signed by the minor's parent or legal
guardian.
(5) Such a contract is not a contract of adhesion, nor
unconscionable, nor otherwise improper, where it complies with
subsections (1) through (3) of this section.
(6) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to any
health benefit plan contract offered by an organization regulated under
Title 48 RCW that has been negotiated to contain an arbitration
agreement with subscribers and enrollees under such a contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 7.70.100, 7.70.110, 7.70.120, and 7.70.130 do not apply if
there is a contract for binding arbitration under section 8 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Future damages" includes damages for future medical treatment,
care or custody, loss of future earnings, loss of bodily function, or
future pain and suffering of the judgment creditor.
(b) "Periodic payments" means the payment of money or delivery of
other property to the judgment creditor at regular intervals.
(2) In any action for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care, the court shall, at the request of either party, enter a
judgment ordering that money damages or its equivalent for future
damages of the judgment creditor be paid in whole or in part by
periodic payments rather than by a lump-sum payment if the award equals
or exceeds fifty thousand dollars in future damages. In entering a
judgment ordering the payment of future damages by periodic payments,
the court shall make a specific finding as to the dollar amount of
periodic payments which will compensate the judgment creditor for such
future damages. As a condition to authorizing periodic payments of
future damages, the court shall require the judgment debtor who is not
adequately insured to post security adequate to ensure full payment of
such damages awarded by the judgment. Upon termination of periodic
payments of future damages, the court shall order the return of this
security, or so much as remains, to the judgment debtor.
(3)(a) The judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments must specify the recipient or recipients of the
payments, the dollar amount of the payments, the interval between
payments, and the number of payments or the period of time over which
payments must be made. The payments are only subject to modification
in the event of the death of the judgment creditor.
(b) In the event that the court finds that the judgment debtor has
exhibited a continuing pattern of failing to make the payments, as
specified in (a) of this subsection, the court shall find the judgment
debtor in contempt of court and, in addition to the required periodic
payments, shall order the judgment debtor to pay the judgment creditor
all damages caused by the failure to make such periodic payments,
including court costs and attorneys' fees.
(4) However, money damages awarded for loss of future earnings may
not be reduced or payments terminated by reason of the death of the
judgment creditor, but must be paid to persons to whom the judgment
creditor owed a duty of support, as provided by law, immediately prior
to his or her death. In such cases the court that rendered the
original judgment, may, upon petition of any party in interest, modify
the judgment to award and apportion the unpaid future damages in
accordance with this subsection (4).
(5) Following the occurrence or expiration of all obligations
specified in the periodic payment judgment, any obligation of the
judgment debtor to make further payments ceases and any security given
under subsection (2) of this section reverts to the judgment debtor.
(6) For purposes of this section, the provisions of RCW 4.56.250 do
not apply.
(7) It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this section to
authorize, in actions for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care, the entry of judgments that provide for the payment of
future damages through periodic payments rather than lump-sum payments.
By authorizing periodic payment judgments, it is the further intent of
the legislature that the courts will utilize such judgments to provide
compensation sufficient to meet the needs of an injured plaintiff and
those persons who are dependent on the plaintiff for whatever period is
necessary while eliminating the potential windfall from a lump-sum
recovery that was intended to provide for the care of an injured
plaintiff over an extended period who then dies shortly after the
judgment is paid, leaving the balance of the judgment award to persons
and purposes for which it was not intended. It is also the intent of
the legislature that all elements of the periodic payment program be
specified with certainty in the judgment ordering such payments and
that the judgment not be subject to modification at some future time
that might alter the specifications of the original judgment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action under this chapter for personal injuries, wrongful
deaths, or damage to property, in which the harm is alleged to have
been caused by an act which violates the appropriate standard of care
to be exercised by an individual licensed, certified, or registered
pursuant to chapter 18.120 RCW, the person initiating the action shall
serve upon each defendant an affidavit within ninety days of service of
process initiating the action. The affidavit shall be executed by a
person whose license, certification, or registration is identical to
the defendant. If there is more than one defendant, there shall be an
affidavit for each defendant. Each affidavit shall contain a statement
that the affiant believes there is a reasonable probability that the
defendant's conduct does not meet the standard of care required to be
exercised by the defendant. The affiant shall have no financial
interest in the outcome of the trial and have at least five years of
professional experience in the same vocation as the defendant who is
the subject of the affidavit. The affidavit shall be filed within
sixty days of the defendant answering the initial complaint.
In the event a defendant refuses to provide information necessary
to allow the execution of an affidavit, the court may, upon motion of
the plaintiff, waive the requirement following a hearing on the motion.
No hearing on the motion shall be held in fewer than forty-five days
following the receipt by the defendant of the request to provide the
information.
The court may, upon motion by the defendant and a showing of good
cause, grant only one additional period of forty-five days, following
the motion to waive the requirement of an affidavit, for the defendant
to provide the information required under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In the event that the Washington state supreme court or other court
of competent jurisdiction rules or affirms that section 3 of this act
is unconstitutional, then the prescribed cap on noneconomic damages
takes effect upon the ratification of a state constitutional amendment
that empowers the legislature to place limits on the amount of
noneconomic damages recoverable in any or all civil causes of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Unless otherwise provided in this act, this
act applies to all causes of action filed on or after the effective
date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---