BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.091 and 2001 c 211 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No license under the provision of this chapter shall be
required from any utility or any person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity employed by a utility because of work in
connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines,
wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of a
utility and used for transmission or distribution of electricity from
the source of supply to the point of contact at the premises and/or
property to be supplied and service connections and meters and other
apparatus or appliances used in the measurement of the consumption of
electricity by the customer.
(2) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any utility because of work in connection with the
installation, repair, or maintenance of the following:
(a) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment used in the lighting of
streets, alleys, ways, or public areas or squares;
(b) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by a commercial,
industrial, or public institution customer that are an integral part of
a transmission or distribution system, either overhead or underground,
providing service to such customer and located outside the building or
structure: PROVIDED, That a utility does not initiate the sale of
services to perform such work;
(c) Lines and wires, together with ancillary apparatus, and
equipment, owned by a customer that is an independent power producer
who has entered into an agreement for the sale of electricity to a
utility and that are used in transmitting electricity from an
electrical generating unit located on premises used by such customer to
the point of interconnection with the utility's system.
(3) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
licensed under RCW 19.28.041 may enter into a contract with a utility
for the performance of work under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of the work of installing and repairing ignition or
lighting systems for motor vehicles.
(5) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or
maintenance of wires and equipment, and installations thereof, exempted
in RCW 19.28.010.
(6) The department may by rule exempt from licensing requirements
under this chapter work performed on premanufactured electric power
generation equipment assemblies and control gear involving the testing,
repair, modification, maintenance, or installation of components
internal to the power generation equipment, the control gear, or the
transfer switch.
(7) If a property is a building used as a residence and is for
rent or lease, and is subject to chapter 59.18 RCW, this subsection
establishes an exemption for work on, alterations to, or replacement of
parts of electrical installations as necessary for maintenance of the
existing electrical installations on that property, but does not exempt
new electrical installations or substantial alterations to existing
electrical installations on that property. As used in this subsection,
"new electrical installations or substantial alterations" does not
include the replacement of an existing garbage disposal, dishwasher, or
electric hot water heater with a similar appliance of thirty amps or
less, single phase, by a landlord or landlord's agent, or the employee
of the landlord or landlord's agent. For the purposes of this
subsection, "landlord's agent" includes property management companies.
Nothing in this subsection may be construed to eliminate the property
owner's exemption provided in RCW 19.28.261.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.28.261 and 2001 c 211 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to
require that a person obtain a license or a certified electrician in
order to do electrical work at his or her residence or farm or place of
business or on other property owned by him or her unless the electrical
work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale,
or lease. However, if the construction is of a new residential
building with up to four units intended for rent, sale, or lease, the
owner may receive an exemption from the requirement to obtain a license
or use a certified electrician if he or she provides a signed affidavit
to the department stating that he or she will be performing the work
and will occupy one of the units as his or her principal residence.
The owner shall apply to the department for this exemption and may only
receive an exemption once every twenty-four months. It is intended
that the owner receiving this exemption shall occupy the unit as his or
her principal residence for twenty-four months after completion of the
units. Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be intended to
derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any valid electrical
code enacted by a city or town pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3), except
that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to
demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other
license or pay any fee in order to engage in the electrical
construction trade. RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to
common carriers subject to Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor
to their officers and employees. Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through
19.28.271 shall be deemed to apply to the installation or maintenance
of telephone, telegraph, radio, or television wires and equipment; nor
to any electrical utility or its employees in the installation, repair,
and maintenance of electrical wiring, circuits, and equipment by or for
the utility, or comprising a part of its plants, lines or systems. The
licensing provisions of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply
to:
(1) Persons making electrical installations on their own property
or to regularly employed employees working on the premises of their
employer, unless the electrical work is on the construction of a new
building intended for rent, sale, or lease;
(2) Employees of an employer while the employer is performing
utility type work of the nature described in RCW 19.28.091 so long as
such employees have registered in the state of Washington with or
graduated from a state-approved outside lineman apprenticeship course
that is recognized by the department and that qualifies a person to
perform such work; ((or))
(3) Any work exempted under RCW 19.28.091(6); or
(4) If a property is a building used as a residence and is for
rent or lease, and is subject to chapter 59.18 RCW, this subsection
establishes an exemption for work on, alterations to, or replacement of
parts of electrical installations as necessary for maintenance of the
existing electrical installations on that property, but does not exempt
new electrical installations or substantial alterations to existing
electrical installations on that property. As used in this subsection,
"new electrical installations or substantial alterations" does not
include the replacement of an existing garbage disposal, dishwasher, or
electric hot water heater with a similar appliance of thirty amps or
less, single phase, by a landlord or landlord's agent, or the employee
of the landlord or landlord's agent. For the purposes of this
subsection, "landlord's agent" includes property management companies.
Nothing in this subsection may be construed to eliminate the property
owner's exemption provided in this section.
Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to
restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive assistance
from a friend, neighbor, relative or other person when none of the
individuals doing the electrical installation hold themselves out as
engaged in the trade or business of electrical installations. Nothing
precludes any person who is exempt from the licensing requirements of
this chapter under this section from obtaining a journeyman or
specialty certificate of competency if they otherwise meet the
requirements of this chapter.

--- END ---