BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that natural, commonly
occurring harmful algal blooms on the Washington coast cause the
temporary contamination of shellfish and require the temporary
cessation of recreational and commercial shellfishing activities. The
legislature further finds it is in the interest of state agencies,
coastal native tribes, marine resource-based businesses, and local
communities to develop and implement a monitoring program to predict
the occurrence of these harmful algal blooms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the fees authorized in this chapter, the department
shall include a surcharge to fund monitoring by the Olympic region
harmful algal bloom program of the Olympic natural resources center at
the University of Washington. A surcharge of one dollar applies to the
resident and nonresident shellfish and seaweed licenses as authorized
by RCW 77.32.520(2) (a) and (b). Amounts collected from this surcharge
shall be deposited in the general fund--local account managed by the
University of Washington.
The University of Washington shall transfer from the general
fund--local account to the general fund amounts collected from the
surcharge that exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The surcharge imposed in this act shall be
implemented in the department of fish and wildlife's license fee
structure for the license year beginning April 1, 2004.

--- END ---