BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.77.060 and 2000 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever a defendant has pleaded not guilty by reason of
insanity, or there is reason to doubt his or her competency, the court
on its own motion or on the motion of any party shall either appoint or
request the secretary to designate at least two qualified experts or
professional persons, one of whom shall be approved by the prosecuting
attorney, to examine and report upon the mental condition of the
defendant. The signed order of the court shall serve as authority for
the experts to be given access to all records held by any mental
health, medical, educational, or correctional facility that relate to
the present or past mental, emotional, or physical condition of the
defendant. At least one of the experts or professional persons
appointed shall be a developmental disabilities professional if the
court is advised by any party that the defendant may be developmentally
disabled. Upon agreement of the parties, the court may designate one
expert or professional person to conduct the examination and report on
the mental condition of the defendant. For purposes of the
examination, the court may order the defendant committed to a hospital
or other suitably secure public or private mental health facility for
a period of time necessary to complete the examination, but not to
exceed fifteen days from the time of admission to the facility. If the
defendant is being held in jail or other detention facility, upon
agreement of the parties, the court may direct that the examination be
conducted at the jail or other detention facility.
(b) When a defendant is ordered to be committed for inpatient
examination under this subsection (1), the court may delay granting
bail until the defendant has been evaluated for competency or sanity
and appears before the court. Following the evaluation, in determining
bail the court shall consider: (i) Recommendations of the expert or
professional persons regarding the defendant's competency, sanity, or
diminished capacity; (ii) whether the defendant has a recent history of
one or more violent acts; (iii) whether the defendant has previously
been acquitted by reason of insanity or found incompetent; (iv) whether
it is reasonably likely the defendant will fail to appear for a future
court hearing; and (v) whether the defendant is a threat to public
safety.
(2) The court may direct that a qualified expert or professional
person retained by or appointed for the defendant be permitted to
witness the examination authorized by subsection (1) of this section,
and that the defendant shall have access to all information obtained by
the court appointed experts or professional persons. The defendant's
expert or professional person shall have the right to file his or her
own report following the guidelines of subsection (3) of this section.
If the defendant is indigent, the court shall upon the request of the
defendant assist him or her in obtaining an expert or professional
person.
(3) The report of the examination shall include the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A diagnosis of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) If the defendant suffers from a mental disease or defect, or is
developmentally disabled, an opinion as to competency;
(d) If the defendant has indicated his or her intention to rely on
the defense of insanity pursuant to RCW 10.77.030, an opinion as to the
defendant's sanity at the time of the act;
(e) When directed by the court, an opinion as to the capacity of
the defendant to have a particular state of mind which is an element of
the offense charged;
(f) An opinion as to whether the defendant should be evaluated by
a county designated mental health professional under chapter 71.05 RCW,
and an opinion as to whether the defendant is a substantial danger to
other persons, or presents a substantial likelihood of committing
criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security, unless kept under
further control by the court or other persons or institutions.
(4) The secretary may execute such agreements as appropriate and
necessary to implement this section.

--- END ---