BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the policy of the state of Washington
that individuals voting absentee and mail ballots receive their ballots
in a timely and consistent manner before each election. Since many
voters in Washington state have come to rely upon absentee and mail
voting, mailing the ballots in a timely manner is critical in order to
maximize participation by every eligible voter.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.36.270 and 1987 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except where a recount or litigation under RCW 29.04.030 is
pending, the county auditor shall have sufficient absentee ballots
((ready to mail to)) available for absentee voters of that county at
least twenty days before any primary, general election, or special
election. The county auditor must mail absentee ballots to each voter
for whom the county auditor has received a request nineteen days before
the primary or election at least eighteen days before the primary or
election. For a request for an absentee ballot received after the
nineteenth day before the primary or election, the county auditor shall
make every effort to mail ballots within one business day, and shall
mail the ballots within two business days.
(2) The county auditor shall make every effort to mail ballots to
overseas and service voters earlier than eighteen days before a primary
or election.
(3) Each county auditor shall certify to the office of the
secretary of state the dates the ballots prescribed in subsection (1)
of this section were available and mailed. Copies of this
certification must be provided to the county canvassing board, the
press, jurisdictions with issues on the ballot in the election, and any
candidates.
(4) If absentee ballots will not be available or mailed as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, the county auditor shall
immediately certify to the office of the secretary of state when
absentee ballots will be available and mailed. Copies of this
certification must be provided to the county canvassing board, the
press, jurisdictions with issues on the ballot in the election, and any
candidates.
(5) If absentee ballots were not available or mailed as prescribed
in subsection (1) of this section, for a reason other than a recount or
litigation, the county auditor, in consultation with the certification
and training program of the office of the secretary of state, shall
submit a report to the office of the secretary of state outlining why
the deadline was missed and what corrective actions will be taken in
future elections to ensure that absentee ballots are available and
mailed as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(6) Failure to have absentee ballots available and mailed as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section does not by itself provide
a basis for an election contest or other legal challenge to the results
of a primary, general election, or special election.

Sec. 3 RCW 29.38.010 and 2001 c 241 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county auditor may designate any precinct having fewer than two
hundred active registered voters at the time of closing of voter
registration as provided in RCW 29.07.160 as a mail ballot precinct.
The county auditor shall notify each registered voter by mail that for
all future primaries and elections the voting in his or her precinct
will be by mail ballot only. In determining the number of registered
voters in a precinct for the purposes of this section, persons who are
ongoing absentee voters under RCW 29.36.240 shall not be counted.
Nothing in this section may be construed as altering the vote tallying
requirements of RCW 29.62.090.
((As soon as ballots are available, the county auditor shall mail
or deliver a ballot and an envelope, preaddressed to the issuing
officer, to each active registered voter.)) The auditor shall mail
each active voter a ballot at least eighteen days before a primary,
general election, or special election. The auditor shall send each
inactive voter either a ballot or an application to receive a ballot at
least eighteen days before a primary, general election, or special
election. The auditor shall determine which of the two is to be sent.
If the inactive voter returns a voted ballot, the ballot shall be
counted and the voter's status restored to active. If the inactive
voter completes and returns an application, a ballot shall be sent and
the voter's status restored to active. The requirements regarding
certification, reporting, and the mailing of overseas and military
ballots in RCW 29.36.270 apply to mail ballot precincts.
If the precinct exceeds two hundred registered voters, or the
auditor determines to return to a polling place election environment,
the auditor shall notify each registered voter, by mail, of this and
shall provide the address of the polling place to be used.

Sec. 4 RCW 29.38.020 and 2001 c 241 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
At any nonpartisan special election not being held in conjunction
with a state primary or general election, the county, city, town, or
district requesting the election pursuant to RCW 29.13.010 or 29.13.020
may also request that the special election be conducted by mail ballot.
The county auditor may honor the request or may determine that the
election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The decision of the
county auditor in this regard is final.
For all special elections not being held in conjunction with a
state primary or state general election where voting is conducted by
mail ballot, the county auditor shall, not less than ((twenty))
eighteen days before the date of such election, ((make available)) mail
to each registered voter a mail ballot. The auditor shall handle
inactive voters in the same manner as inactive voters in mail ballot
precincts. The requirements regarding certification, reporting, and
the mailing of overseas and military ballots in RCW 29.36.270 apply to
mail ballot elections.

--- END ---