BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.13.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 29 are each amended
to read as follows:
Nominating primaries for general elections to be held in November
((shall)) must be held at the regular polling places in each precinct
on the ((third)) second Tuesday of the preceding ((September or on the
seventh Tuesday immediately preceding such general election, whichever
occurs first)) June.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.13.010 and 1994 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All state, county, city, town, and district general elections
for the election of federal, state, legislative, judicial, county,
city, town, district, and precinct officers, and for the submission to
the voters of the state, county, city, town, or district of any measure
for their adoption and approval or rejection, shall be held on the
first Tuesday after the first Monday of November, in the year in which
they may be called. A statewide general election shall be held on the
first Tuesday after the first Monday of November of each year:
PROVIDED, That the statewide general election held in odd-numbered
years shall be limited to (a) city, town, and district general
elections as provided for in RCW 29.13.020, or as otherwise provided by
law; (b) the election of federal officers for the remainder of any
unexpired terms in the membership of either branch of the congress of
the United States; (c) the election of state and county officers for
the remainder of any unexpired terms of offices created by or whose
duties are described in Article II, section 15, Article III, sections
16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22, and 23, and Article IV, sections 3 and 5 of the
state Constitution and RCW 2.06.080; (d) the election of county
officers in any county governed by a charter containing provisions
calling for general county elections at this time; and (e) the approval
or rejection of state measures, including proposed constitutional
amendments, matters pertaining to any proposed constitutional
convention, initiative measures and referendum measures proposed by the
electorate, referendum bills, and any other matter provided by the
legislature for submission to the electorate.
(2) A county legislative authority may, if it deems an emergency to
exist, call a special county election by presenting a resolution to the
county auditor at least ((forty-five days prior to)) fifty-two days
before the proposed election date. Except as provided in subsection
(4) of this section, a special election called by the county
legislative authority shall be held on one of the following dates as
decided by such governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) ((The third Tuesday in May;
(e))) The day of the primary as specified by RCW 29.13.070;
(e) The first Tuesday after the second Wednesday in September; or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2) (a)
through (f) of this section, a special election to validate an excess
levy or bond issue may be called at any time to meet the needs
resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God. Such
county special election shall be noticed and conducted in the manner
provided by law.
(4) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, or April((, or May)) under
chapter 29.19 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called
by the county legislative authority under subsection (2) of this
section during the month of that primary is the date of the
presidential primary.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections except
for those elections held pursuant to a home-rule charter adopted under
Article XI, section 4 of the state Constitution. This section shall
not be construed as fixing the time for holding primary elections, or
elections for the recall of any elective public officer.

Sec. 3 RCW 29.13.020 and 2002 c 43 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All city, town, and district general elections shall be held
throughout the state of Washington on the first Tuesday following the
first Monday in November in the odd-numbered years.
This section shall not apply to:
(a) Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;
(b) Public utility districts, conservation districts, or district
elections at which the ownership of property within those districts is
a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections shall be held at the
times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable thereto;
(c) Consolidation proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.315 RCW
((28A.315.280)) and nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for
in chapter 28A.540 RCW.
(2) The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon
request in the form of a resolution of the governing body of a city,
town, or district, presented to the auditor at least ((forty-five days
prior to)) fifty-two days before the proposed election date, may, if
the county auditor deems an emergency to exist, call a special election
in such city, town, or district, and for the purpose of such special
election he or she may combine, unite, or divide precincts. Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, such a special election
shall be held on one of the following dates as decided by the governing
body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) ((The third Tuesday in May;
(e))) The day of the primary election as specified by RCW
29.13.070;
(e) The first Tuesday after the second Wednesday in September; or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, or April((, or May)) under
chapter 29.19 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called
under subsection (2) of this section during the month of that primary
is the date of the presidential primary.
(4) In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section,
a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be
called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood,
earthquake, or other act of God, except that no special election may be
held between the first day for candidates to file for public office and
the last day to certify the returns of the general election other than
as provided in subsection (2)(((e))) (d) and (f) of this section. Such
special election shall be conducted and notice thereof given in the
manner provided by law.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections.

Sec. 4 RCW 29.15.020 and 1990 c 59 s 81 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except where otherwise provided by this title, declarations of
candidacy for the following offices shall be filed during regular
business hours with the filing officer no earlier than ((the fourth
Monday in July)) sixty-four days before the date of the primary
established by RCW 29.13.070 and no later than the following Friday in
the year in which the office is scheduled to be voted upon:
(1) Offices that are scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or
both full terms and short terms at, or in conjunction with, a state
general election; and
(2) Offices where a vacancy, other than a short term, exists that
has not been filled by election and for which an election to fill the
vacancy is required in conjunction with the next state general
election.
This section supersedes all other statutes that provide for a
different filing period for these offices.

Sec. 5 RCW 29.15.040 and 1987 c 110 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any candidate may mail his or her declaration of candidacy for an
office to the filing officer. Such declarations of candidacy shall be
processed by the filing officer in the following manner:
(1) Any declaration received by the filing officer by mail before
the ((tenth)) fifteenth business day immediately preceding the first
day for candidates to file for office shall be returned to the
candidate submitting it, together with a notification that the
declaration of candidacy was received too early to be processed. The
candidate shall then be permitted to resubmit his or her declaration of
candidacy during the filing period.
(2) Any properly executed declaration of candidacy received by mail
on or after the tenth business day immediately preceding the first day
for candidates to file for office and before the close of business on
the last day of the filing period shall be included with filings made
in person during the filing period. In partisan and judicial elections
the filing officer shall determine by lot the order in which the names
of those candidates shall appear upon sample and absentee primary
ballots.
(3) Any declaration of candidacy received by the filing officer
after the close of business on the last day for candidates to file for
office shall be rejected and returned to the candidate attempting to
file it.

Sec. 6 RCW 29.15.050 and 1999 c 298 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
A filing fee of one dollar shall accompany each declaration of
candidacy for precinct committee officer; a filing fee of ten dollars
shall accompany the declaration of candidacy for any office with a
fixed annual salary of one thousand dollars or less; a filing fee equal
to one percent of the annual salary of the office at the time of
filing, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, shall accompany the
declaration of candidacy for any office with a fixed annual salary of
more than one thousand dollars per annum. No filing fee need accompany
a declaration of candidacy for any office for which compensation is on
a per diem or per meeting attended basis.
A candidate who lacks sufficient assets or income at the time of
filing to pay the filing fee required by this section shall submit with
his or her declaration of candidacy a nominating petition. The
petition shall contain not less than a number of signatures of
registered voters equal to the number of dollars of the filing fee.
The signatures shall be of voters registered to vote within the
jurisdiction of the office for which the candidate is filing.
When the candidacy is for:
(1) A legislative or judicial office that includes territory from
more than one county, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of state
for equal division between the treasuries of the counties comprising
the district.
(2) A city or town office, the fee shall be paid to the county
auditor who shall transmit it to the city or town clerk for deposit in
the city or town treasury.

Sec. 7 RCW 29.15.150 and 1973 c 4 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Whenever it shall be necessary to hold a special election in an
odd-numbered year to fill an unexpired term of any office which is
scheduled to be voted upon for a full term in an even-numbered year, no
((September)) primary election shall be held in the odd-numbered year
if, after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, either of
the following circumstances exist:
(1) No more than one candidate of each qualified political party
has filed a declaration of candidacy for the same partisan office to be
filled; or
(2) No more than two candidates have filed a declaration of
candidacy for a single nonpartisan office to be filled.
In either event, the officer with whom the declarations of
candidacy were filed shall immediately notify all candidates concerned
and the names of the candidates that would have been printed upon the
((September)) primary ballot, but for the provisions of this section,
shall be printed as nominees for the positions sought upon the November
general election ballot.

Sec. 8 RCW 29.15.170 and 2001 c 46 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Filings for a nonpartisan office shall be reopened for a period of
three normal business days, such three day period to be fixed by the
election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy are filed and
notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and television in the
county and by such other means as may now or hereafter be provided by
law whenever before the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to a primary:
(1) A void in candidacy occurs;
(2) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office leaving an unexpired
term to be filled by an election for which filings have not been held;
or
(3) A nominee for judge of the superior court entitled to a
certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41
of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified.
Candidacies validly filed within said three-day period shall appear
on the ballot as if made during the earlier filing period.

Sec. 9 RCW 29.15.180 and 2001 c 46 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Filings for a nonpartisan office (other than judge of the supreme
court or superintendent of public instruction) shall be reopened for a
period of three normal business days, such three day period to be fixed
by the election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy are
filed and notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and
television in the county and by such other means as may now or
hereafter be provided by law, when:
(1) A void in candidacy for such nonpartisan office occurs on or
after the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the
((sixth)) seventh Tuesday before an election; or
(2) A nominee for judge of the superior court eligible after a
contested primary for a certificate of election by Article 4, section
29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified
within the ten day period immediately following the last day allotted
for a candidate to withdraw; or
(3) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office on or after the
((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the ((sixth))
seventh Tuesday before an election leaving an unexpired term to be
filled by an election for which filings have not been held.
The candidate receiving a plurality of the votes cast for that
office in the general election shall be deemed elected.

Sec. 10 RCW 29.15.190 and 2002 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A scheduled election shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken
from the ballot, no purported write-in votes counted, and no candidate
certified as elected, when:
(1) In an election for judge of the supreme court or superintendent
of public instruction, a void in candidacy occurs on or after the
((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to a primary, public filings and the
primary being an indispensable phase of the election process for such
offices;
(2) Except as otherwise specified in RCW 29.15.180, ((as now or
hereafter amended,)) a nominee for judge of the superior court entitled
to a certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section 29,
Amendment 41 of the state Constitution dies or is disqualified on or
after the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to a primary;
(3) In other elections for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy
occurs or a vacancy occurs involving an unexpired term to be filled on
or after the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday prior to an election.

Sec. 11 RCW 29.15.230 and 2001 c 46 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Filings for a partisan elective office shall be opened for a period
of three normal business days whenever, on or after the first day of
the regular filing period and before the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday
prior to a primary, a vacancy occurs in that office, leaving an
unexpired term to be filled by an election for which filings have not
been held.
Any such special three-day filing period shall be fixed by the
election officer with whom declarations of candidacy for that office
are filed. The election officer shall give notice of the special
three-day filing period by notifying the press, radio, and television
in the county or counties involved, and by such other means as may be
required by law.
Candidacies validly filed within the special three-day filing
period shall appear on the primary ballot as if filed during the
regular filing period.

Sec. 12 RCW 29.19.030 and 1989 c 4 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The name of any candidate for a major political party nomination
for president of the United States shall be printed on the presidential
preference primary ballot of a major political party only:
(1) By direction of the secretary of state, who in the secretary's
sole discretion has determined that the candidate's candidacy is
generally advocated or is recognized in national news media; or
(2) If members of the political party of the candidate have
presented a petition for nomination of the candidate that has attached
to the petition a sheet or sheets containing the signatures of at least
one thousand registered voters who declare themselves in the petition
as being affiliated with the same political party as the presidential
candidate. The petition shall be filed with the secretary of state not
later than the ((thirty-ninth)) fifty-second day before the
presidential preference primary. The signature sheets shall also
contain the residence address and name or number of the precinct of
each registered voter whose signature appears thereon and shall be
certified in the manner prescribed in RCW 29.79.200 and 29.79.210.
The secretary of state shall place the name of the candidate on the
ballot unless the candidate, at least ((thirty-five)) forty-five days
before the presidential preference primary, executes and files with the
secretary of state an affidavit stating without qualification that he
or she is not now and will not become a candidate for the office of
president of the United States at the forthcoming presidential
election. The secretary of state shall certify the names of all
candidates who will appear on the presidential preference primary
ballot to the respective county auditors on or before the fourth
Tuesday in April of each presidential election year.

Sec. 13 RCW 29.24.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
((A "convention" for the purposes of this chapter, is an organized
assemblage of registered voters representing an independent candidate
or candidates or a new or minor political party, organization, or
principle.)) As used in this chapter, the term "election jurisdiction"
shall mean the state or any political subdivision or jurisdiction of
the state from which partisan officials are elected. This term shall
include county commissioner districts or council districts for members
of a county legislative authority, counties for county officials who
are nominated and elected on a county-wide basis, legislative districts
for members of the legislature, congressional districts for members of
congress, and the state for president and vice president, members of
the United States senate, and state officials who are elected on a
statewide basis.

Sec. 14 RCW 29.24.020 and 2001 c 30 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any nomination of a candidate for partisan public office by
other than a major political party may be made only((: (a) In a
convention held not)) by petition conducted no earlier than the ((last
Saturday in June)) first day of January and not later than the first
((Saturday in July or during any of the seven days immediately
preceding the first day for filing declarations of candidacy as fixed
in accordance with RCW 29.68.080; (b) as provided by RCW 29.62.180;))
day of April or (((c))) as otherwise provided in this section.
(2) Nominations of candidates for president and vice president of
the United States other than by a major political party may be made
((either at a convention)) by petition conducted under subsection (1)
of this section, ((or at a similar convention)) taking place not
earlier than the first ((Sunday in July)) day of January and not later
than ((seventy days before the general election. Conventions held
during this time period may not nominate candidates for any public
office other than president and vice president of the United States,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section)) the last day of
June.
(3) If a special filing period for a partisan office is opened
under RCW 29.15.230, candidates of minor political parties and
independent candidates may file for office during that special filing
period. The names of those candidates may not appear on the ballot
unless they are nominated by ((convention held)) petition no later than
five days after the close of the special filing period and a
certificate of nomination is filed with the filing officer ((no later
than three days after the convention)). The requirements of RCW
29.24.025 do not apply to such a ((convention)) petition nomination.
If primary ballots or a voters' pamphlet are ordered to be printed
before the deadline for submitting the certificate of nomination and
the certificate has not been filed, then the candidate's name will be
included but may not appear on the general election ballot unless the
certificate is timely filed and the candidate otherwise qualifies to
appear on that ballot.
(4) A minor political party may ((hold more than one convention but
in no case shall any such party)) not nominate more than one candidate
for any one partisan public office or position. ((For the purpose of
nominating candidates for the offices of president and vice president,
United States senator, or a statewide office, a minor party or
independent candidate holding multiple conventions may add together the
number of signatures of different individuals from each convention
obtained in support of the candidate or candidates in order to obtain
the number required by RCW 29.24.030. For all other offices for which
nominations are made, signatures of the requisite number of registered
voters must be obtained at a single convention.))

Sec. 15 RCW 29.24.025 and 1989 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each minor party or independent candidate must publish a notice in
a newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the party
or the candidate intends to ((hold a convention)) gather petitions.
The notice must appear at least ten days before the ((convention is to
be held, and shall state the date, time, and place of the convention))
first day petition signatures are gathered. Additionally, it shall
include the mailing address of the person or organization ((sponsoring
the convention)) gathering signatures.

Sec. 16 RCW 29.24.030 and 1989 c 215 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) To be valid, a convention must be attended by at least
twenty-five registered voters.
(2))) In order to nominate candidates for the offices of president
and vice president of the United States, United States senator, or any
statewide office, a nominating ((convention shall obtain and submit to
the filing officer)) petition must contain the signatures of at least
two hundred registered voters of the state of Washington. In order to
nominate candidates for any other office, a nominating ((convention
shall obtain and submit to the filing officer)) petition must contain
the signatures of twenty-five persons who are registered to vote in the
jurisdiction of the office for which the nominations are made.

Sec. 17 RCW 29.24.035 and 2001 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A nominating petition submitted under this chapter shall clearly
identify the name of the minor party or independent candidate
((convention)) as it appears on the certificate of nomination as
required by RCW 29.24.040(((3))). The petition shall also contain a
statement that the person signing the petition is a registered voter of
the state of Washington and shall have a space for the voter to sign
his or her name and to print his or her name and address. No person
may sign more than one nominating petition under this chapter for an
office for a primary or election.

Sec. 18 RCW 29.24.040 and 1989 c 215 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A certificate evidencing nominations ((made at a convention)) by
petition must:
(1) Be in writing;
(2) Contain the name of each person nominated, his residence, and
the office for which he is named, and if the nomination is for the
offices of president and vice president of the United States, a sworn
statement from both nominees giving their consent to the nomination;
(3) Identify the minor political party or the independent candidate
on whose behalf the ((convention was held)) petition was circulated;
(4) Be verified by the oath of the presiding officer and secretary;
(5) Be accompanied by a nominating petition or petitions bearing
the signatures and addresses of registered voters equal in number to
that required by RCW 29.24.030;
(6) Contain proof of publication of the notice ((of calling the
convention)) required in RCW 29.24.025; and
(7) Be submitted to the ((appropriate)) same filing officer with
whom a declaration of candidacy is filed as required by RCW 29.15.030
not later than ((one week following the adjournment of the convention
at which the nominations were made. If the nominations are made only
for offices whose jurisdiction is entirely within one county, the
certificate and nominating petitions must be filed with the county
auditor. If a minor party or independent candidate convention
nominates any candidates for offices whose jurisdiction encompasses
more than one county, all nominating petitions and the convention
certificates must be filed with the secretary of state)) five days
after the last day for the petition to be circulated under RCW
29.24.020.

Sec. 19 RCW 29.24.045 and 2001 c 30 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If two or more valid certificates of nomination are filed
purporting to nominate different candidates for the same position using
the same party name, the filing officer must give effect to both
certificates. If conflicting claims to the party name are not resolved
either by mutual agreement or by a judicial determination of the right
to the name, the candidates must be treated as independent candidates.
Disputes over the right to the name must not be permitted to delay the
printing of either ballots or a voters' pamphlet. Other candidates
nominated ((by)) under the same ((conventions)) certificate may
continue to use the partisan affiliation unless a court of competent
jurisdiction directs otherwise.
(2) A person affected may petition the superior court of the county
in which the filing officer is located for a judicial determination of
the right to the name of a minor political party, either before or
after documents are filed with the filing officer. The court shall
resolve the conflict between competing claims to the use of the same
party name according to the following principles: (a) The prior
established public use of the name during previous elections by a party
composed of or led by the same individuals or individuals in documented
succession; (b) prior established public use of the name earlier in the
same election cycle; (c) the nomination of a more complete slate of
candidates for a number of offices or in a number of different regions
of the state; (d) documented affiliation with a national or statewide
party organization with an established use of the name; (e) the first
date of filing of a certificate of nomination; and (f) such other
indicia of an established right to use of the name as the court may
deem relevant. If more than one filing officer is involved, and one of
them is the secretary of state, the petition must be filed in the
superior court for Thurston county. Upon resolving the conflict
between competing claims, the court may also address any ballot
designation for the candidate who does not prevail.

Sec. 20 RCW 29.24.055 and 1989 c 215 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
A minor political party or independent candidate ((convention
nominating candidates)) for the offices of president and vice president
of the United States shall, not later than ten days after the
((adjournment of the convention)) submission of the certificate of
nomination and petition, submit a list of presidential electors to the
office of the secretary of state. The list shall contain the names and
the mailing addresses of the persons selected and shall be verified by
the presiding officer ((of the convention)).

Sec. 21 RCW 29.24.070 and 1990 c 59 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not later than the Friday immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file, the secretary of state shall notify the county
auditors of the names and designations of all minor party and
independent candidates who have filed valid ((convention)) petition
certificates and nominating petitions with that office. Except for the
offices of president and vice president, persons nominated under this
chapter shall file declarations of candidacy as provided by RCW
29.15.010 and 29.15.030. The name of a minor party or independent
candidate nominated ((at a convention shall)) by petition may not be
printed upon the primary ballot unless ((he)) the candidate pays the
fee required by law to be paid by candidates for the same office to be
nominated at a primary.

Sec. 22 RCW 29.24.060 and 1989 c 215 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the receipt of the certificate of nomination, the officer with
whom it is filed shall check the certificate and canvass the signatures
on the accompanying nominating petitions to determine if the
requirements of RCW 29.24.030 have been met. Once the determination
has been made, the filing officer shall notify the presiding officer
((of the convention)) and any other persons requesting the
notification((,)) of his or her decision regarding the sufficiency of
the certificate or the nominating petitions. Any appeal regarding the
filing officer's determination must be filed with the superior court of
the county in which the certificate or petitions were filed not later
than five days from the date the determination is made, and shall be
heard and finally disposed of by the court within five days of the
filing. Nominating petitions shall not be available for public
inspection or copying.

Sec. 23 RCW 29.36.270 and 1987 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except where a recount or litigation under RCW 29.04.030 is
pending, the county auditor shall have sufficient absentee ballots
ready to mail to absentee voters of that county, other than overseas
voters or service voters, at least twenty days before any primary,
general election, or special election. At least thirty days before a
primary, general election, or special election, the county auditor
shall mail absentee ballots to all overseas and service voters who have
submitted valid requests for absentee ballots. A request for an
absentee ballot made by an overseas voter or service voter after that
day must be processed immediately.

Sec. 24 RCW 29.38.020 and 2001 c 241 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
At any nonpartisan special election not being held in conjunction
with a state primary or general election, the county, city, town, or
district requesting the election pursuant to RCW 29.13.010 or 29.13.020
may also request that the special election be conducted by mail ballot.
The county auditor may honor the request or may determine that the
election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The decision of the
county auditor in this regard is final.
((For all special elections not being held in conjunction with a
state primary or state general election where voting is conducted by
mail ballot, the county auditor shall, not less than twenty days before
the date of such election, make available to each registered voter a
mail ballot.)) The auditor shall handle inactive voters in the same
manner as inactive voters in mail ballot precincts.

Sec. 25 RCW 29.38.030 and 2001 c 241 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
((In an odd-numbered year,)) The county auditor may conduct a
primary or a special election held in conjunction with a primary by
mail ballot ((concurrently with the primary:
(1) For an office or ballot measure of a special purpose district
that is entirely within the county;
(2) For an office or ballot measure of a special purpose district
that lies in the county and one or more other counties if the auditor
first secures the concurrence of the county auditors of those other
counties to conduct the primary in this manner district-wide; and
(3) For a ballot measure or nonpartisan office of a county, city,
or town if the auditor first secures the concurrence of the legislative
authority of the county, city, or town involved)).
For a primary held in an odd-numbered year, the county auditor
shall notify ((an)) each election jurisdiction for which a primary is
to be held that the primary will be conducted by mail ballot. For a
primary held in an even-numbered year, the county auditor shall notify
the secretary of state that the primary will be conducted by mail
ballot. The county auditor shall include in the notice required by RCW
29.27.030 information pertaining to a primary conducted by mail ballot
according to this section.
((A primary in an odd-numbered year may not be conducted by mail
ballot in a precinct with two hundred or more active registered voters
if a partisan office or state office or state ballot measure is to be
voted upon at that primary in the precinct.))
To the extent they are not inconsistent with other provisions of
law, the laws governing the conduct of mail ballot special elections
apply to nonpartisan primaries conducted by mail ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 29.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Except where a recount or litigation under RCW 29.04.030 is
pending, the county auditor shall have sufficient mail ballots ready to
mail to voters of that county, other than overseas voters or service
voters, at least twenty days before a primary, general election, or
special election. At least thirty days before a primary, general
election, or special election, the county auditor shall mail ballots to
all overseas voters and service voters. A request for a ballot made by
an overseas voter or service voter after that day must be processed
immediately.

Sec. 27 RCW 29.62.020 and 1999 c 259 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At least every third day after a special election, primary, or
general election and before certification of the election results,
except Sundays and legal holidays, the county auditor shall convene the
county canvassing board or their designees to process absentee ballots
and canvass the votes cast at that special election, primary, or
general election, if the county auditor is in possession of more than
twenty-five ballots that have yet to be canvassed. The county auditor
may use his or her discretion in determining when to convene the
canvassing board or their designees during the final four days before
the certification of election results in order to protect the secrecy
of any ballot.
Each absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by
the county auditor two days or more before the convening of the
canvassing board or their designees and that either was received by the
county auditor before the closing of the polls on the day of the
special election, primary, or general election for which it was issued,
or that bears a date of mailing on or before the special election,
primary, or general election for which it was issued, must be processed
at that time. The tabulation of votes that results from that day's
canvass must be made available to the general public immediately upon
completion of the canvass.
(2) On the ((tenth)) fifteenth day after a special election ((or
a)), primary ((and on the fifteenth day after a)), or general election,
the canvassing board shall complete the canvass and certify the
results. Each absentee ballot that was returned before the closing of
the polls on the date of the primary or election for which it was
issued, and each absentee ballot with a date of mailing on or before
the date of the primary or election for which it was issued and
received on or before the date on which the primary or election is
certified, shall be included in the canvass report.
(3) At the request of any caucus of the state legislature, the
county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state
and legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house.

Sec. 28 RCW 42.12.040 and 2002 c 108 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a vacancy occurs in any partisan elective office in the
executive or legislative branches of state government or in any
partisan county elective office before the ((sixth)) seventh Tuesday
prior to the primary for the next general election following the
occurrence of the vacancy, a successor shall be elected to that office
at that general election. Except during the last year of the term of
office, if such a vacancy occurs on or after the ((sixth)) seventh
Tuesday prior to the primary for that general election, the election of
the successor shall occur at the next succeeding general election. The
elected successor shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired
term. This section shall not apply to any vacancy occurring in a
charter county which has charter provisions inconsistent with this
section.

Sec. 29 RCW 42.17.080 and 2002 c 75 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On the day the treasurer is designated, each candidate or
political committee shall file with the commission and the county
auditor or elections officer of the county in which the candidate
resides, or in the case of a political committee, the county in which
the treasurer resides, in addition to any statement of organization
required under RCW 42.17.040 or 42.17.050, a report of all
contributions received and expenditures made prior to that date, if
any.
(2) At the following intervals each treasurer shall file with the
commission and the county auditor or elections officer of the county in
which the candidate resides, or in the case of a political committee,
the county in which the committee maintains its office or headquarters,
and if there is no office or headquarters then in the county in which
the treasurer resides, a report containing the information required by
RCW 42.17.090:
(a) On the twenty-first day and the seventh day immediately
preceding the date on which the election is held; and
(b) On the tenth day of the first month after the election((:
PROVIDED, That this report shall not be required following a primary
election from:
(i) A candidate whose name will appear on the subsequent general
election ballot; or
(ii) Any continuing political committee)); and
(c) On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are
required to be filed under this section: PROVIDED, That such report
shall only be filed if the committee has received a contribution or
made an expenditure in the preceding calendar month and either the
total contributions received or total expenditures made since the last
such report exceed two hundred dollars.
When there is no outstanding debt or obligation, and the campaign
fund is closed, and the campaign is concluded in all respects, and in
the case of a political committee, the committee has ceased to function
and has dissolved, the treasurer shall file a final report. Upon
submitting a final report, the duties of the treasurer shall cease and
there shall be no obligation to make any further reports.
The report filed twenty-one days before the election shall report
all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of the
fifth business day before the date of the report. The report filed
seven days before the election shall report all contributions received
and expenditures made as of the end of the one business day before the
date of the report. Reports filed on the tenth day of the month shall
report all contributions received and expenditures made from the
closing date of the last report filed through the last day of the month
preceding the date of the current report.
(3) For the period beginning the first day of the fourth month
preceding the date on which the special ((or general)) election is
held, or for the period beginning the first day of the seventh month
before the date on which the general election is held, and ending on
the date of that special or general election, each Monday the treasurer
shall file with the commission and the appropriate county elections
officer a report of each bank deposit made during the previous seven
calendar days. The report shall contain the name of each person
contributing the funds so deposited and the amount contributed by each
person. However, contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in
the aggregate from any one person may be deposited without identifying
the contributor. A copy of the report shall be retained by the
treasurer for his or her records. In the event of deposits made by a
deputy treasurer, the copy shall be forwarded to the treasurer for his
or her records. Each report shall be certified as correct by the
treasurer or deputy treasurer making the deposit.
(4) If a city requires that candidates or committees for city
offices file reports with a city agency, the candidate or treasurer so
filing need not also file the report with the county auditor or
elections officer.
(5) The treasurer or candidate shall maintain books of account
accurately reflecting all contributions and expenditures on a current
basis within five business days of receipt or expenditure. During the
eight days immediately preceding the date of the election the books of
account shall be kept current within one business day. As specified in
the committee's statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17.040,
the books of account must be open for public inspection as follows:
(a) For at least two consecutive hours between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00
p.m. on the eighth day immediately before the election, except when it
is a legal holiday, in which case on the seventh day immediately before
the election, at the principal headquarters or, if there is no
headquarters, at the address of the treasurer or such other place as
may be authorized by the commission; and
(b) By appointment for inspections to be conducted at the
designated place for inspections between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. on any
other day from the seventh day through the day immediately before the
election, other than Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday. It is a
violation of this chapter for a candidate or political committee to
refuse to allow and keep an appointment for an inspection to be
conducted during these authorized times and days in the week prior to
the election. The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time
and day for such inspections that is within twenty-four hours of the
time and day that is requested for the inspection.
(6) The treasurer or candidate shall preserve books of account,
bills, receipts, and all other financial records of the campaign or
political committee for not less than five calendar years following the
year during which the transaction occurred.
(7) All reports filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this
section shall be certified as correct by the candidate and the
treasurer.
(8) Copies of all reports filed pursuant to this section shall be
readily available for public inspection for at least two consecutive
hours Monday through Friday, excluding legal holidays, between 8:00
a.m. and 8:00 p.m., as specified in the committee's statement of
organization filed pursuant to RCW 42.17.040, at the principal
headquarters or, if there is no headquarters, at the address of the
treasurer or such other place as may be authorized by the commission.
(9) After January 1, 2002, a report that is filed with the
commission electronically need not also be filed with the county
auditor or elections officer.
(10) The commission shall adopt administrative rules establishing
requirements for filer participation in any system designed and
implemented by the commission for the electronic filing of reports.

Sec. 30 RCW 42.17.710 and 1993 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing thirty days
past the date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on
the date a special legislative session convenes and continuing through
the date that session adjourns, no state official or a person employed
by or acting on behalf of a state official or state legislator may
solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate
or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt.
(2) However, state officials who have reported to the commission
under RCW 42.17.240 and will appear on the ballot for an office in the
current year and persons employed by or acting on behalf of those
officials may, after the final adjournment of the regular session,
solicit and accept contributions to the candidate's public office fund,
to the candidate or authorized committee, or to retire the candidate's
campaign debt.

Sec. 31 RCW 42.52.185 and 1997 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the twelve-month period beginning on December 1st of the
year before a general election for a state legislator's election to
office and continuing through November 30th immediately after the
general election, the legislator may not mail, either by regular mail
or electronic mail, to a constituent at public expense a letter,
newsletter, brochure, or other piece of literature, except as follows:
(a) The legislator may mail two mailings of newsletters to
constituents. All newsletters within each mailing of newsletters must
be identical as to their content but not as to the constituent name or
address. One such mailing may be mailed no later than thirty days
after the start of a regular legislative session, except that a
legislator appointed during a regular legislative session to fill a
vacant seat may have up to thirty days from the date of appointment to
send out the first mailing. The other mailing may be mailed no ((later
than sixty days after the end of a regular legislative session))
earlier than one day after the date of the primary established by RCW
29.13.070 and no later than fifteen days after the date of the primary.
(b) The legislator may mail an individual letter to (i) an
individual constituent who has contacted the legislator regarding the
subject matter of the letter during the legislator's current term of
office; (ii) an individual constituent who holds a governmental office
with jurisdiction over the subject matter of the letter; or (iii) an
individual constituent who has received an award or honor of
extraordinary distinction of a type that is sufficiently infrequent to
be noteworthy to a reasonable person, including, but not limited to:
(A) An international or national award such as the Nobel prize or the
Pulitzer prize; (B) a state award such as Washington scholar; (C) an
Eagle Scout award; and (D) a Medal of Honor.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, "legislator"
means a legislator who is a "candidate," as defined by RCW 42.17.020,
for any public office.
(3) A violation of this section constitutes use of the facilities
of a public office for the purpose of assisting a campaign under RCW
42.52.180.
(4) The house of representatives and senate shall specifically
limit expenditures per member for the total cost of mailings. Those
costs include, but are not limited to, production costs, printing
costs, and postage costs. The limits imposed under this subsection
apply only to the total expenditures on mailings per member and not to
any categorical cost within the total.
(5) For purposes of this section, persons residing outside the
legislative district represented by the legislator are not considered
to be constituents, but students, military personnel, or others
temporarily employed outside of the district who normally reside in the
district are considered to be constituents.

Sec. 32 RCW 27.12.355 and 1987 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a rural county library district,
island library district, or intercounty rural library district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the library
district that previously had been withdrawn from the library district
under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the board of trustees requesting the
withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the board, inclusion of
this area within the library district will result in a reduction of the
district's tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b)
adoption of a resolution by the city or town council approving the
withdrawal, if the area is located within the city or town, or adoption
of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the county
within which the area is located approving the withdrawal, if the area
is located outside of a city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective
at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year
in which the resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of establishing
boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be
established immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution.
The authority of an area to be withdrawn from a library district as
provided under this section is in addition, and not subject, to the
provisions of RCW 27.12.380.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a library district
shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of
paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the library district
existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a
library district under this section may be reannexed into the library
district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the board of trustees
proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the
city or town council approving the reannexation, if the area is located
within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county
legislative authority of the county within which the area is located
approving the reannexation, if the area is located outside of a city or
town. The reannexation shall be effective at the end of the day on the
thirty-first day of December in the year in which the adoption of the
second resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing boundaries
for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established
immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum
action on the proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the
area proposed to be reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is
filed with the city or town council, or county legislative authority,
within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the second resolution,
which petition has been signed by registered voters of the area
proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of the total
number of the registered voters residing in that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-two or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a
simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec. 33 RCW 27.12.370 and 1982 c 123 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county legislative authority or authorities shall by resolution
call a special election to be held in such city or town at the next
date provided in RCW 29.13.010 but not less than ((forty-five)) fifty-two days from the date of the declaration of such finding, and shall
cause notice of such election to be given as provided for in RCW
29.27.080.
The election on the annexation of the city or town into the library
district shall be conducted by the auditor of the county or counties in
which the city or town is located in accordance with the general
election laws of the state and the results thereof shall be canvassed
by the canvassing board of the county or counties. No person shall be
entitled to vote at such election unless he or she is registered to
vote in said city or town for at least thirty days preceding the date
of the election. The ballot proposition shall be in substantially the
following form:

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote
in favor thereof, the city or town shall thereupon be annexed and shall
be a part of such library district.

Sec. 34 RCW 35.06.070 and 1994 c 81 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A ballot proposition authorizing an advancement in classification
of a town to a second class city shall be submitted to the voters of
the town if either: (1) Petitions proposing the advancement are
submitted to the town clerk that have been signed by voters of the town
equal in number to at least ten percent of the voters of the town
voting at the last municipal general election; or (2) the town council
adopts a resolution proposing the advancement. The clerk shall
immediately forward the petitions to the county auditor who shall
review the signatures and certify the sufficiency of the petitions.
A ballot proposition authorizing an advancement shall be submitted
to the town voters at the next municipal general election occurring
((forty-five)) fifty-two or more days after the petitions are submitted
if the county auditor certifies the petitions as having sufficient
valid signatures. The town shall be advanced to a second class city if
the ballot proposition is approved by a simple majority vote, effective
when the corporation is actually reorganized and the new officers are
elected and qualified. The county auditor shall notify the secretary
of state if the advancement of a town to a second class city is
approved.

Sec. 35 RCW 35.13.1821 and 1998 c 286 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The annexation ordinance provided for in RCW 35.13.182 is subject
to referendum for forty-five days after its passage. Upon the filing
of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the legislative
body, signed by qualified electors in number equal to not less than ten
percent of the votes cast in the last general state election in the
area to be annexed, the question of annexation shall be submitted to
the voters of the area in a general election if one is to be held
within ninety days or at a special election called for that purpose not
less than ((forty-five)) fifty-two days nor more than ninety days after
the filing of the referendum petition. Notice of the election shall be
given as provided in RCW 35.13.080 and the election shall be conducted
as provided in the general election law. The annexation shall be
deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of the votes cast on
the proposition are in opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.

Sec. 36 RCW 35.61.360 and 1987 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a metropolitan park district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the
metropolitan park district that previously had been withdrawn from the
metropolitan park district under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the park district commissioners requesting
the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the commissioners,
inclusion of this area within the metropolitan park district will
result in a reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the
provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the
city or town council approving the withdrawal, if the area is located
within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county
legislative authority of the county within which the area is located
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a city or
town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on the
thirty-first day of December in the year in which the resolutions are
adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax
purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a metropolitan
park district shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for
the purpose of paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the
metropolitan park district existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a
metropolitan park district under this section may be reannexed into the
metropolitan park district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the
park district commissioners proposing the reannexation; and (b)
adoption of a resolution by the city or town council approving the
reannexation, if the area is located within the city or town, or
adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the
county within which the area is located approving the reannexation, if
the area is located outside of a city or town. The reannexation shall
be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December
in the year in which the adoption of the second resolution occurs, but
for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the
boundaries shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the
second resolution. Referendum action on the proposed reannexation may
be taken by the voters of the area proposed to be reannexed if a
petition calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town
council, or county legislative authority, within a thirty-day period
after the adoption of the second resolution, which petition has been
signed by registered voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal
in number to ten percent of the total number of the registered voters
residing in that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-two or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a
simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec. 37 RCW 35A.14.299 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.299 are each
amended to read as follows:
Such annexation ordinance as provided for in RCW 35A.14.297 shall
be subject to referendum for forty-five days after the passage thereof.
Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the
legislative body, signed by qualified electors in number equal to not
less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general state
election in the area to be annexed, the question of annexation shall be
submitted to the voters of such area in a general election if one is to
be held within ninety days or at a special election called for that
purpose not less than ((forty-five)) fifty-two days nor more than
ninety days after the filing of the referendum petition. Notice of
such election shall be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070 and the
election shall be conducted as provided in RCW ((35A.14.060))
35A.29.151. The annexation shall be deemed approved by the voters
unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in
opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the code city upon the date fixed in the ordinance of
annexation. From and after such date, if the ordinance so provided,
property in the annexed area shall be subject to the proposed zoning
regulation prepared and filed for such area as provided in RCW
35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340. If the ordinance so provided, all property
within the area annexed shall be assessed and taxed at the same rate
and on the same basis as the property of such annexing code city is
assessed and taxed to pay for any then outstanding indebtedness of such
city contracted prior to, or existing at, the date of annexation.

Sec. 38 RCW 36.93.030 and 1991 c 363 s 91 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) created and established in each county with
a population of two hundred ten thousand or more a board to be known
and designated as a "boundary review board(("))."
(2) A boundary review board may be created and established in any
other county in the following manner:
(a) The county legislative authority may, by majority vote, adopt
a resolution establishing a boundary review board; or
(b) A petition seeking establishment of a boundary review board
signed by qualified electors residing in the county equal in number to
at least five percent of the votes cast in the county at the last
county general election may be filed with the county auditor.
Upon the filing of such a petition, the county auditor shall
examine the same and certify to the sufficiency of the signatures
thereon. No person may withdraw his or her name from a petition after
it has been filed with the auditor. Within thirty days after the
filing of such petition, the county auditor shall transmit the same to
the county legislative authority, together with his or her certificate
of sufficiency.
After receipt of a valid petition for the establishment of a
boundary review board, the county legislative authority shall submit
the question of whether a boundary review board should be established
to the electorate at the next county primary or county general election
which occurs more than ((forty-five)) fifty-two days from the date of
receipt of the petition. Notice of the election shall be given as
provided in RCW 29.27.080 and shall include a clear statement of the
proposal to be submitted.
If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote
in favor of the establishment of the boundary review board, such board
shall thereupon be deemed established.

Sec. 39 RCW 52.02.080 and 1989 c 63 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The election on the formation of the district and to elect the
initial fire commissioners shall be conducted by the election officials
of the county or counties in which the proposed district is located in
accordance with the general election laws of the state. This election
shall be held at the next general election date, as specified under RCW
29.13.020, that occurs ((forty-five)) fifty-two or more days after the
date of the action by the boundary review board, or county legislative
authority or authorities, approving the proposal.

Sec. 40 RCW 52.04.056 and 1989 c 63 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a fire protection district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the fire
protection district that previously had been withdrawn from the fire
protection district under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the board of fire commissioners requesting
the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the board, inclusion
of this area within the fire protection district will result in a
reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW
84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or town council
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located within the city or
town, or adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority
or authorities of the county or counties within which the area is
located approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a
city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on
the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the resolutions
are adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property
tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.
The authority of an area to be withdrawn from a fire protection
district as provided under this section is in addition, and not
subject, to the provisions of RCW 52.04.101.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a fire protection
district shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the
purpose of paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the fire
protection district existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a fire
protection district under this section may be reannexed into the fire
protection district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the board of
fire commissioners proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a
resolution by the city or town council approving the reannexation, if
the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a
resolution by the county legislative authority or authorities of the
county or counties within which the area is located approving the
reannexation, if the area is located outside of a city or town. The
reannexation shall be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the adoption of the second
resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for
property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately
upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum action on the
proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the area proposed
to be reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is filed with
the city or town council, or county legislative authority or
authorities, within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the
second resolution, which petition has been signed by registered voters
of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of
the total number of the registered voters residing in that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-two or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a
simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec. 41 RCW 52.04.071 and 1984 c 230 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county legislative authority or authorities shall by resolution
call a special election to be held in the city or town and in the fire
protection district at the next date provided in RCW 29.13.010 but not
less than ((forty-five)) fifty-two days from the date of the
declaration of the finding, and shall cause notice of the election to
be given as provided for in RCW 29.27.080.
The election on the annexation of the city or town into the fire
protection district shall be conducted by the auditor of the county or
counties in which the city or town and the fire protection district are
located in accordance with the general election laws of the state. The
results thereof shall be canvassed by the canvassing board of the
county or counties. No person is entitled to vote at the election
unless he or she is a qualified elector in the city or town or unless
he or she is a qualified elector within the boundaries of the fire
protection district. The ballot proposition shall be in substantially
the following form:

"Shall the city or town of . . . . . . be annexed to and be a part
of . . . . . . fire protection district?

YES. . . . . . . . . .
NO . . . . . . . . . . "

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition in the city
or town and a majority of the persons voting on the proposition in the
fire protection district vote in favor thereof, the city or town shall
be annexed and shall be a part of the fire protection district.

Sec. 42 RCW 53.04.110 and 1998 c 240 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any port district now existing or which may hereafter be organized
under the laws of the state of Washington is hereby authorized to
change its corporate name under the following conditions and in the
following manner:
(1) On presentation, at least ((forty-five)) fifty-two days before
any general port election to be held in the port district, of a
petition to the commissioners of any port district now existing or
which may hereafter be established under the laws of the state of
Washington, signed by at least ten percent of the total number of
voters of the port district who voted at the last general port election
and asking that the corporate name of the port district be changed, it
shall be the duty of the commissioners to submit to the voters of the
port district the proposition as to whether the corporate name of the
port shall be changed. The proposition shall be submitted at the next
general port election.
(2) The petition shall contain the present corporate name of the
port district and the corporate name which is proposed to be given to
the port district.
(3) On submitting the proposition to the voters of the port
district it shall be the duty of the port commissioners to cause to be
printed on the official ballot used at the election the following
proposition:

(4) At the time when the returns of the general election shall be
canvassed by the commissioners of the port district, it shall be the
duty of the commissioners to canvass the vote upon the proposition so
submitted, recording in their record the result of the canvass.
(5) Should a majority of the registered voters of the port district
voting at the general port election vote in favor of the proposition it
shall be the duty of the port commissioners to certify the fact to the
auditor of the county in which the port district shall be situated and
to the secretary of state of the state of Washington, under the seal of
the port district. On and after the filing of the certificate with the
county auditor as aforesaid and with the secretary of state of the
state of Washington, the corporate name of the port district shall be
changed, and thenceforth the port district shall be known and
designated in accordance therewith.

Sec. 43 RCW 54.08.010 and 1985 c 469 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
At any general election held in an even-numbered year, the county
legislative authority of any county in this state may, or, on petition
of ten percent of the qualified electors of the county based on the
total vote cast in the last general county election held in an even-numbered year, shall, by resolution, submit to the voters of the county
the proposition of creating a public utility district which shall be
coextensive with the limits of the county as now or hereafter
established. A form of petition for the creation of a public utility
district shall be submitted to the county auditor within ten months
prior to the election at which the proposition is to be submitted to
the voters. Petitions shall be filed with the county auditor not less
than four months before the election and the county auditor shall
within thirty days examine the signatures thereof and certify to the
sufficiency or insufficiency thereof. If the petition be found to be
insufficient, it shall be returned to the persons filing the same, who
may amend or add names thereto for ten days, when the same shall be
returned to the county auditor, who shall have an additional fifteen
days to examine the same and attach his certificate thereto. No person
having signed the petition shall be allowed to withdraw his name
therefrom after the filing of the same with the county auditor:
PROVIDED, That each signature shall be dated and that no signature
dated prior to the date on which the form of petition was submitted to
the county auditor shall be valid. Whenever the petition shall be
certified to as sufficient, the county auditor shall forthwith transmit
the same, together with his certificate of sufficiency attached
thereto, to the county legislative authority which shall submit the
proposition to the voters of the county at the next general election in
an even-numbered year occurring ((forty-five)) fifty-two days after
submission of the proposition to the legislative authority. The notice
of the election shall state the boundaries of the proposed public
utility district and the object of such election, and shall in other
respects conform to the requirements of the general laws of the state
of Washington, governing the time and manner of holding elections. In
submitting the question to the voters for their approval or rejection,
the proposition shall be expressed on the ballot substantially in the
following terms:

Public Utility District No. . . . . . . . . . . . . YES □
Public Utility District No. . . . . . . . . . . . . NO □

Any petition for the formation of a public utility district may
describe a less area than the entire county in which the petition is
filed, the boundaries of which shall follow the then existing precinct
boundaries and not divide any voting precinct; and in the event that
such a petition is filed the county legislative authority shall fix a
date for a hearing on such petition, and shall publish the petition,
without the signatures thereto appended, for two weeks prior to the
date of the hearing, together with a notice stating the time of the
meeting when the petition will be heard. The publication, and all
other publications required by chapter 1, Laws of 1931, shall be in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the district is
situated. The hearing on the petition may be adjourned from time to
time, not exceeding four weeks in all. If upon the final hearing the
county legislative authority shall find that any lands have been
unjustly or improperly included within the proposed public utility
district and will not be benefited by inclusion therein, it shall
change and fix the boundary lines in such manner as it shall deem
reasonable and just and conducive to the public welfare and
convenience, and make and enter an order establishing and defining the
boundary lines of the proposed public utility district: PROVIDED, That
no lands shall be included within the boundaries so fixed lying outside
the boundaries described in the petition, except upon the written
request of the owners of those lands. Thereafter the same procedure
shall be followed as prescribed in this chapter for the formation of a
public utility district including an entire county, except that the
petition and election shall be confined solely to the lesser public
utility district.
No public utility district created after September 1, 1979, shall
include any other public utility district within its boundaries:
PROVIDED, That this paragraph shall not alter, amend, or modify
provisions of chapter 54.32 RCW.

Sec. 44 RCW 54.08.070 and 1979 ex.s. c 240 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any district which does not own or operate electric facilities for
the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power on March
25, 1969, or any district which hereafter does not construct or acquire
such electric facilities within ten years of its creation, shall not
construct or acquire any such electric facilities without the approval
of such proposal by the voters of such district: PROVIDED, That a
district shall have the power to construct or acquire electric
facilities within ten years following its creation by action of its
commission without voter approval of such action.
At any general election held in an even-numbered year, the proposal
to construct or acquire electric facilities may be submitted to the
voters of the district by resolution of the public utility district
commission or shall be submitted to the voters of the district by the
county legislative authority on petition of ten percent of the
qualified electors of such district, based on the total vote cast in
the last general county election held in an even-numbered year. A form
of petition for the construction or acquisition of electric facilities
by the public utility district shall be submitted to the county auditor
within ten months prior to the election at which such proposition is to
be submitted to the voters. Petitions shall be filed with the county
auditor not less than four months before such election and the county
auditor shall within thirty days examine the signatures thereof and
certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency thereof. If such petition
is found to be insufficient, it shall be returned to the persons filing
the same, who may amend and add names thereto for ten days, when the
same shall be returned to the county auditor, who shall have an
additional fifteen days to examine the same and attach his certificate
thereto. No person having signed such petition shall be allowed to
withdraw his name therefrom after the filing of the same with the
county auditor: PROVIDED, That each signature shall be dated and that
no signature dated prior to the date on which the form of petition was
submitted to the county auditor shall be valid. Whenever such petition
shall be certified to as sufficient, the county auditor shall forthwith
transmit the same, together with his certificate of sufficiency
attached thereto, to the county legislative authority which shall
submit such proposition to the voters of said district at the next
general election in an even-numbered year occurring ((forty-five))
fifty-two days after submission of the proposition to said legislative
authority. The notice of the election shall state the object of such
election, and shall in other respects conform to the requirements of
the general laws of Washington, governing the time and manner of
holding elections.
The proposal submitted to the voters for their approval or
rejection, shall be expressed on the ballot substantially in the
following terms:

Shall Public Utility District No. . . . . of . . . . . . County
construct or acquire electric facilities for the generation,
transmission or distribution of electric power?

Yes □ No □

Within ten days after such election, the election board of the
county shall canvass the returns, and if at such election a majority of
the voters voting on such proposition shall vote in favor of such
construction or acquisition of electric facilities, the district shall
be authorized to construct or acquire electric facilities.

Sec. 45 RCW 57.04.050 and 1999 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon entry of the findings of the final hearing on the petition if
one or more county legislative authorities find that the proposed
district will be conducive to the public health, welfare, and
convenience and will benefit the land therein, they shall present a
resolution to the county auditor calling for a special election to be
held at a date specified under RCW 29.13.020, that occurs ((forty-five)) fifty-two or more days after the resolution is presented, at
which a ballot proposition authorizing the district to be created shall
be submitted to voters for their approval or rejection. The
commissioners shall cause to be published a notice of the election for
four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the
proposed district, which notice shall state the hours during which the
polls will be open, the boundaries of the district as finally adopted
and the object of the election, and the notice shall also be posted ten
days in ten public places in the proposed district. The district shall
be created if the ballot proposition authorizing the district to be
created is approved by a majority of the voters voting on the
proposition.
A separate ballot proposition authorizing the district, if created,
to impose a single-year excess levy for the preliminary expenses of the
district shall be submitted to voters for their approval or rejection
at the same special election, if the petition to create the district
also proposed that a ballot proposition authorizing an excess levy be
submitted to voters for their approval or rejection. The excess levy
shall be proposed in the amount specified in the petition to create the
district, not to exceed one dollar and twenty-five cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, and may only be submitted to voters for
their approval or rejection if the special election is held in
February, March, April, or ((May)) September. The proposition to be
effective must be approved in the manner set forth in Article VII,
section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

Sec. 46 RCW 70.44.235 and 1987 c 138 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a public hospital district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the public
hospital district that previously had been withdrawn from the public
hospital district under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the hospital district commissioners
requesting the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the
commissioners, inclusion of this area within the public hospital
district will result in a reduction of the district's tax levy rate
under the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution
by the city or town council approving the withdrawal, if the area is
located within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the
county legislative authority of the county within which the area is
located approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a
city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on
the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the resolutions
are adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property
tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a public hospital
district shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the
purpose of paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the public
hospital district existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a public
hospital district under this section may be reannexed into the public
hospital district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the hospital
district commissioners proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of
a resolution by the city or town council approving the reannexation, if
the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a
resolution by the county legislative authority of the county within
which the area is located approving the reannexation, if the area is
located outside of a city or town. The reannexation shall be effective
at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year
in which the adoption of the second resolution occurs, but for purposes
of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries
shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the second
resolution. Referendum action on the proposed reannexation may be
taken by the voters of the area proposed to be reannexed if a petition
calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town council, or
county legislative authority, within a thirty-day period after the
adoption of the second resolution, which petition has been signed by
registered voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number
to ten percent of the total number of the registered voters residing in
that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty-two or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a
simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 RCW 29.01.160 (September primary) and 1965
c 9 s 29.01.160 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---