BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONSSubpart 1.1
Definitions
Sec. 101 RCW 29.01.005 and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.005 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
SCOPE OF DEFINITIONS. Words and phrases as defined in this
chapter, wherever used in Title 29 RCW, shall have the meaning as in
this chapter ascribed to them, unless where used the context thereof
shall clearly indicate to the contrary or unless otherwise defined in
the chapter of which they are a part.

Sec. 102 RCW 29.01.006 and 1994 c 57 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
BALLOT AND RELATED TERMS. As used in this title:
(1) "Ballot" means, as the context implies, either:
(a) The issues and offices to be voted upon in a jurisdiction or
portion of a jurisdiction at a particular primary, general election, or
special election;
(b) A facsimile of the contents of a particular ballot whether
printed on a paper ballot or ballot card or as part of a voting machine
or voting device;
(c) A physical or electronic record of the choices of an individual
voter in a particular primary, general election, or special election;
or
(d) The physical document on which the voter's choices are to be
recorded;
(2) "Paper ballot" means a piece of paper on which the ballot for
a particular election or primary has been printed, on which a voter may
record his or her choices for any candidate or for or against any
measure, and that is to be tabulated manually;
(3) "Ballot card" means any type of card or piece of paper of any
size on which a voter may record his or her choices for any candidate
and for or against any measure and that is to be tabulated on a vote
tallying system;
(4) "Sample ballot" means a printed facsimile of all the issues and
offices on the ballot in a jurisdiction and is intended to give voters
notice of the issues, offices, and candidates that are to be voted on
at a particular primary, general election, or special election;
(5) "((Special)) Provisional ballot" means a ballot issued to a
voter at the polling place on election day by the precinct election
board, for one of the following reasons:
(a) The voter's name does not appear in the poll book;
(b) There is an indication in the poll book that the voter has
requested an absentee ballot, but the voter wishes to vote at the
polling place;
(c) There is a question on the part of the voter concerning the
issues or candidates on which the voter is qualified to vote.

Sec. 103 RCW 29.01.008 and 1990 c 59 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
CANVASSING. "Canvassing" means the process of examining ballots or
groups of ballots, subtotals, and cumulative totals in order to
determine the official returns of ((and prepare the certification for))
a primary or general election and includes the tabulation of any votes
((for that primary or election)) that were not tabulated at the
precinct or in a counting center on the day of the primary or election.

Sec. 104 RCW 29.01.042 and 1999 c 158 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
COUNTING CENTER. "Counting center" means the facility or
facilities designated by the county auditor to count and canvass mail
ballots, absentee ballots, and polling place ballots that are
transferred to a central site to be counted, rather than being counted
by a poll-site ballot counting device, on the day of a primary or
election.

Sec. 105 RCW 29.01.043 and 1984 c 106 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNTY AUDITOR. "County auditor" ((includes)) means the county
auditor in a noncharter county or the officer, irrespective of title,
having the overall responsibility to maintain voter registration and to
conduct state and local elections in a charter county.

Sec. 106 RCW 29.01.045 and 1987 c 346 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
DATE OF MAILING. For registered voters voting by absentee or
((voting by)) mail ballot, "date of mailing" means the date of the
postal cancellation on the envelope in which the ballot is returned to
the election official by whom it was issued. For all ((other))
nonregistered absentee voters, "date of mailing" means the date stated
by the voter on the envelope in which the ballot is returned to the
election official by whom it was issued.

Sec. 107 RCW 29.01.047 and 1987 c 346 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DISABLED VOTER. "Disabled voter" means any registered voter who
qualifies for special parking privileges under RCW 46.16.381, or who is
defined as blind under RCW 74.18.020, or who qualifies to require
assistance with voting under RCW 29.51.200.

Sec. 108 RCW 29.01.050 and 1990 c 59 s 5 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ELECTION. "Election" when used alone means a general election
except where the context indicates that a special election is included.
"Election" when used without qualification does not include a primary.

Sec. 109 RCW 29.01.055 and 1986 c 167 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
ELECTION BOARD. "Election board" means a group of election
officers serving one precinct or ((groups)) a group of precincts in a
polling place.

Sec. 110 RCW 29.01.060 and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.060 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
ELECTION OFFICER. "Election officer" includes any officer who has
a duty to perform relating to elections under the provisions of any
statute, charter, or ordinance.

Sec. 111 RCW 29.01.065 and 1987 c 346 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ELECTOR. "Elector" means any person who possesses all of the
qualifications to vote under Article VI of the state Constitution.

Sec. 112 RCW 29.01.068 and 1990 c 59 s 77 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
FILING OFFICER. "Filing officer" means the county or state officer
with whom declarations of candidacy for an office are required to be
filed under this title.

Sec. 113 RCW 29.01.070 and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.070 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
GENERAL ELECTION. "General election" means an election required to
be held on a fixed date recurring at regular intervals.

Sec. 114 RCW 29.01.080 and 1992 c 7 s 31 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
INFAMOUS CRIME. An "infamous crime" is a crime punishable by death
in the state penitentiary or imprisonment in a state correctional
facility.

Sec. 115 RCW 29.01.090 and 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
MAJOR POLITICAL PARTY. "Major political party" means a political
party of which at least one nominee for president, vice president,
United States senator, or a statewide office received at least five
percent of the total vote cast at the last preceding state general
election in an even-numbered year((: PROVIDED, That any)). A
political party qualifying as a major political party under ((the
previous subsection (2) or subsection (3) of this section prior to its
1977 amendment shall)) this section retains such status until ((after
the next state general election following June 30, 1977)) the next
even-year election at which a candidate of that party does not achieve
at least five percent of the vote for one of the previously specified
offices. If none of these offices appear on the ballot in an even-year
general election, the major party retains its status as a major party
through that election.

Sec. 116 RCW 29.01.100 and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.100 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
MINOR POLITICAL PARTY. "Minor political party" means a political
organization other than a major political party.

Sec. 117 RCW 29.01.110 and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.110 are each amended
to read as follows:
MEASURES. "Measure" includes any proposition or question submitted
to the voters ((of any specific constituency)).

Sec. 118 RCW 29.01.113 and 1987 c 346 s 5 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
OUT-OF-STATE VOTER. "Out-of-state voter" means any elector of the
state of Washington outside the state but not outside the territorial
limits of the United States or the District of Columbia.

Sec. 119 RCW 29.01.117 and 1987 c 346 s 6 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
OVERSEAS VOTER. "Overseas voter" means any elector of the state of
Washington outside the territorial limits of the United States or the
District of Columbia.

Sec. 120 RCW 29.01.119 and 1999 c 158 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
POLL-SITE BALLOT COUNTING DEVICES. "Poll-site ballot counting
device" means a device programmed to accept voted ballots at a polling
place for the purpose of tallying and storing the ballots on election
day.

Sec. 121 RCW 29.01.120 and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.120 are each amended
to read as follows:
PRECINCT. "Precinct" means a geographical subdivision for voting
purposes ((within or without the limits of a city or town, whether))
that is established by ((a board of county commissioners, by a city
council, or by the board of supervisors of a township)) a county
legislative authority.

Sec. 122 RCW 29.01.130 and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.130 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
PRIMARY. "Primary" or "primary election" means a statutory
procedure for nominating candidates to public office at the polls.

Sec. 123 RCW 29.01.135 and 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 2 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
QUALIFIED. "Qualified" when pertaining to a winner of an election
means that for such election:
(1) The results have been certified;
(2) A certificate has been issued;
(3) Any required bond has been posted; and
(4) The winner has taken and subscribed an oath or affirmation in
compliance with the appropriate statute, or if none is specified, that
he or she will faithfully and impartially discharge the duties of the
office to the best of his or her ability. This oath or affirmation
shall be administered and certified by any officer or notary public
authorized to administer oaths, without charge therefor.

Sec. 124 RCW 29.01.136 and 2001 c 225 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RECOUNT. "Recount" means the process of retabulating ballots and
producing amended election returns based on that retabulation, even if
the vote totals have not changed.

Sec. 125 RCW 29.01.137 and 1987 c 346 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
REGISTERED VOTER. "Registered voter" means any elector who
((possesses all of the statutory qualifications to vote under chapters
29.07 and 29.10 RCW)) has completed the statutory registration
procedures established by this title. The terms "registered voter" and
"qualified elector" are synonymous.

Sec. 126 RCW 29.01.140 and 1971 ex.s. c 178 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
RESIDENCE. "Residence" for the purpose of registering and voting
means a person's permanent address where he or she physically resides
and maintains his or her abode((: PROVIDED, That)). However, no
person gains residence by reason of his or her presence or loses his or
her residence by reason of his or her absence:
(1) While employed in the civil or military service of the state or
of the United States;
(2) While engaged in the navigation of the waters of this state or
the United States or the high seas;
(3) While a student at any institution of learning;
(4) While confined in any public prison.
Absence from the state on business shall not affect the question of
residence of any person unless the right to vote has been claimed or
exercised elsewhere.

Sec. 127 RCW 29.01.155 and 1991 c 23 s 13 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
SERVICE VOTER. "Service voter" means any elector of the state of
Washington who is a member of the armed forces under 42 U.S.C. Sec.
1973 ff-6 while in active service, is a student or member of the
faculty at a United States military academy, is a member of the
merchant marine of the United States, is a program participant as
defined in RCW 40.24.020, or is a member of a religious group or
welfare agency officially attached to and serving with the armed forces
of the United States.

Sec. 128 RCW 29.01.160 and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.160 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
SEPTEMBER PRIMARY. "September primary" means the primary election
held in September to nominate candidates to be voted for at the ensuing
election.

Sec. 129 RCW 29.01.170 and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.170 are each amended
to read as follows:
SPECIAL ELECTION. "Special election" means any election that is
not a general election and may be held in conjunction with a general
election or primary.

Sec. 130 RCW 29.01.180 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
SHORT TERM. "Short term" means the brief period of time starting
upon the completion of the certification of election returns and ending
with the start of the full term ((on the second Tuesday of the next
January immediately following the election)) and is applicable only
when the office concerned is being held by an appointee to fill a
vacancy ((which)). The vacancy must have occurred after the last
election((,)) at which such office could have been voted upon for an
unexpired term((, prior to the election for such office for the
subsequent full term)). Short term elections are always held in
conjunction with elections for the full term for the office.

Sec. 131 RCW 29.01.200 and 1990 c 59 s 6 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
VOTING SYSTEM, DEVICE, TALLYING SYSTEM. (1) "Voting system" means
a voting device, vote tallying system, or combination of these together
with ballots and other supplies or equipment used to conduct a primary
or election or to canvass the votes cast in a primary or election;
(2) "Voting device" means a piece of equipment used for the purpose
of or to facilitate the marking of a ballot to be tabulated by a vote
tallying system or a piece of mechanical or electronic equipment used
to directly record votes and to accumulate results for a number of
issues or offices from a series of voters; and
(3) "Vote tallying system" means a piece of mechanical or
electronic equipment and associated data processing software used to
tabulate votes cast on ballot cards or otherwise recorded on a voting
device or to prepare that system to tabulate ballot cards or count
votes.

Subpart 1.2
General Provisions
Sec. 132 RCW 29.04.001 and 2001 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
STATE POLICY. It is the policy of the state of Washington to
encourage every eligible person to register to vote and to participate
fully in all elections, and to protect the integrity of the electoral
process by providing equal access to the process while guarding against
discrimination and fraud. The election registration laws and the
voting laws of the state of Washington((, and the requirements of
chapter 41, Laws of 2001,)) must be administered without discrimination
based upon race, creed, color, national origin, sex, or political
affiliation.

Sec. 133 RCW 29.04.010 and 1965 c 9 s 29.04.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
REGISTRATION REQUIRED FOR VOTING--EXCEPTION. Only a registered
voter shall be permitted to vote:
(1) At any election held for the purpose of electing persons to
public office;
(2) At any recall election of a public officer;
(3) At any election held for the submission of a measure to any
voting constituency;
(4) At any primary election.
((The provisions of)) This section ((shall)) does not apply to
((township)) elections where being registered to vote is not a
prerequisite to voting.

Sec. 134 RCW 29.04.020 and 1987 c 295 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNTY AUDITOR AS SUPERVISOR OF CERTAIN PRIMARIES AND ELECTIONS.
The county auditor of each county shall be ex officio the supervisor of
all primaries and elections, general or special, and it shall be the
county auditor's duty to provide places for holding such primaries and
elections; to appoint the precinct election officers((;)) and to
provide for their compensation; to provide ((ballot boxes and ballots
or voting machines, poll books, or precinct lists of registered voters,
and tally sheets, and deliver them)) the supplies and materials
necessary for the conduct of elections to the precinct election
officers ((at the polling places)); and to publish and post notices of
calling such primaries and elections in the manner provided by law((:
PROVIDED, That)). The notice of a general election held in an even-
numbered year ((shall)) must indicate that the office of precinct
committee officer will be on the ballot((; and to)). The auditor shall
also apportion to each city, town, or district, and to the state of
Washington in the odd-numbered year, its share of the expense of such
primaries and elections((: PROVIDED, That)). This section ((shall))
does not apply to general or special elections for any city, town, or
district ((which)) that is not subject to RCW 29.13.010 and 29.13.020,
but all such elections ((shall)) must be held and conducted at the
time, in the manner, and by the officials (with such notice,
requirements for filing for office, and certifications by local
officers) as provided and required by the laws governing such
elections.

Sec. 135 RCW 29.57.140 and 1999 c 298 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNTY AUDITOR--PUBLIC NOTICE OF AVAILABILITY OF SERVICES. The
county auditor shall provide public notice of the availability of
registration and voting aids, assistance to elderly and ((handicapped))
disabled persons, and procedures for voting by absentee ballot
calculated to reach elderly and ((handicapped)) disabled persons not
later than public notice of the closing of registration for a primary
or election.

Sec. 136 RCW 29.04.025 and 1983 c 294 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
HANDLING OF REPORTS FILED UNDER PUBLIC DISCLOSURE LAW. Each county
auditor or county elections official shall ensure that reports filed
pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW are arranged, handled, indexed, and
disclosed in a manner consistent with the rules of the public
disclosure commission adopted under RCW 42.17.375.

Sec. 137 RCW 29.04.070 and 1994 c 57 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
SECRETARY OF STATE AS CHIEF ELECTION OFFICER. The secretary of
state through the election division shall be the chief election officer
for all federal, state, county, city, town, and district elections
((and it shall be his or her duty to)) that are subject to this title.
The secretary of state shall keep records of ((such)) elections held
((in the state and to)) for which he or she is required by law to
canvass the results, make such records available to the public upon
request, and ((to)) coordinate those state election activities required
by federal law.

Sec. 138 RCW 29.04.060 and 1965 c 9 s 29.04.060 are each amended
to read as follows:
PUBLICATION OF ELECTION LAWS BY SECRETARY OF STATE. ((In every
year in which state and county officers are to be elected, the
secretary of state shall cause the election laws of the state then in
force to be published in pamphlet form and distributed through the
county auditors at least twenty days prior to the primary next
preceding the election in sufficient number to place a copy thereof in
the hands of all officers of elections.)) The secretary of state shall
ensure that each county auditor is provided with the most recent
version of the election laws of the state, as contained in this title.
Where amendments have been enacted after the last compilation of the
election laws, he or she shall ensure that each county auditor receives
a copy of those amendments before the next primary or election. The
county auditor shall ensure that any statutory information necessary
for the precinct election officers to perform their duties is supplied
to them in a timely manner.

Sec. 139 RCW 29.04.085 and 2001 c 41 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
INFORMATION IN FOREIGN LANGUAGES. In order to encourage the
broadest possible voting participation by all eligible citizens, the
secretary of state shall produce voter registration information in the
foreign languages required of state agencies. ((This information must
be available no later than January 1, 2002.))

Sec. 140 RCW 29.04.088 and 2001 c 41 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
VOTER GUIDE. The secretary of state shall cause to be produced a
"voter guide" detailing what constitutes voter fraud and discrimination
under state election laws. This voter guide must be provided to every
county election officer and auditor, and any other person upon
request((, no later than January 1, 2002)).

Sec. 141 RCW 29.04.091 and 2001 c 41 s 5 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
TOLL-FREE MEDIA AND WEB PAGE. The secretary of state shall provide
a toll-free media and web page designed to allow voter communication
with the office of the secretary of state.

Sec. 142 RCW 29.04.230 and 1991 c 186 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
ELECTRONIC FACSIMILE DOCUMENTS--ACCEPTANCE OF. The secretary of
state or a county auditor shall accept and file in his or her office
electronic facsimile transmissions of the following documents:
(1) Declarations ((and affidavits)) of candidacy;
(2) County canvass reports;
(3) ((Candidates')) Voters' pamphlet statements;
(4) Arguments for and against ballot measures that will appear in
a voters' pamphlet;
(5) Requests for recounts;
(6) Certification of candidates and measures by the secretary of
state;
(7) Direction by the secretary of state for the conduct of a
mandatory recount;
(8) Requests for absentee ballots;
(9) Any other election related document authorized by rule adopted
by the secretary of state under RCW 29.04.235.
The acceptance by the secretary of state or the county auditor is
conditional upon the document being filed in a timely manner, being
legible, and otherwise satisfying the requirements of state law or
rules with respect to form and content.
If the original copy of a document must be signed and a copy of the
document is filed by facsimile transmission under this section, the
original copy ((shall)) must be subsequently filed with the official
with whom the facsimile was filed. The original copy ((shall)) must be
filed by a deadline established by the secretary by rule. The
secretary may by rule require that the original of any document, a copy
of which is filed by facsimile transmission under this section, also be
filed by a deadline established by the secretary by rule.

Subpart 1.3
Times for Holding Elections
Sec. 143 RCW 29.13.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 29 are each amended
to read as follows:
PRIMARIES. Nominating primaries for general elections to be held
in November ((shall)) must be held ((at the regular polling places in
each precinct)) on the third Tuesday of the preceding September or on
the seventh Tuesday immediately preceding such general election,
whichever occurs first.

Sec. 144 RCW 29.13.010 and 1994 c 142 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
STATE AND LOCAL GENERAL ELECTIONS--STATEWIDE GENERAL ELECTION--EXCEPTIONS--SPECIAL COUNTY ELECTIONS. (1) All state, county, city,
town, and district general elections for the election of federal,
state, legislative, judicial, county, city, town, district, and
precinct officers, and for the submission to the voters of the state,
county, city, town, or district of any measure for their adoption and
approval or rejection, shall be held on the first Tuesday after the
first Monday of November, in the year in which they may be called. A
statewide general election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the
first Monday of November of each year((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
the statewide general election held in odd-numbered years shall be
limited to (a) city, town, and district general elections as provided
for in RCW 29.13.020, or as otherwise provided by law; (b) the election
of federal officers for the remainder of any unexpired terms in the
membership of either branch of the Congress of the United States; (c)
the election of state and county officers for the remainder of any
unexpired terms of offices created by or whose duties are described in
Article II, section 15, Article III, sections 16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22,
and 23, and Article IV, sections 3 and 5 of the state Constitution and
RCW 2.06.080; (d) the election of county officers in any county
governed by a charter containing provisions calling for general county
elections at this time; and (e) the approval or rejection of state
measures, including proposed constitutional amendments, matters
pertaining to any proposed constitutional convention, initiative
measures and referendum measures proposed by the electorate, referendum
bills, and any other matter provided by the legislature for submission
to the electorate.
(2) A county legislative authority may, if it deems an emergency to
exist, call a special county election by presenting a resolution to the
county auditor at least forty-five days prior to the proposed election
date. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a special
election called by the county legislative authority shall be held on
one of the following dates as decided by such governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary as specified by RCW 29.13.070; or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2)(a) through
(f) of this section, a special election to validate an excess levy or
bond issue may be called at any time to meet the needs resulting from
fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God. Such county special
election shall be noticed and conducted in the manner provided by law.
(4) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29.19 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called by the
county legislative authority under subsection (2) of this section
during the month of that primary is the date of the presidential
primary.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections except
for those elections held pursuant to a home-rule charter adopted under
Article XI, section 4 of the state Constitution. This section shall
not be construed as fixing the time for holding primary elections, or
elections for the recall of any elective public officer.

Sec. 145 RCW 29.13.020 and 2002 c 43 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
CITY, TOWN, AND DISTRICT GENERAL AND SPECIAL ELECTIONS--
EXCEPTIONS. (1) All city, town, and district general elections shall
be held throughout the state of Washington on the first Tuesday
following the first Monday in November in the odd-numbered years.
This section shall not apply to:
(a) Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;
(b) Public utility districts, conservation districts, or district
elections at which the ownership of property within those districts is
a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections shall be held at the
times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable thereto;
(c) Consolidation proposals as provided for in RCW ((28A.315.280))
28A.315.265 and nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for in
chapter 28A.540 RCW.
(2) The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon
request in the form of a resolution of the governing body of a city,
town, or district, presented to the auditor at least forty-five days
prior to the proposed election date, may, if the county auditor deems
an emergency to exist, call a special election in such city, town, or
district, and for the purpose of such special election he or she may
combine, unite, or divide precincts. Except as provided in subsection
(3) of this section, such a special election shall be held on one of
the following dates as decided by the governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary election as specified by RCW 29.13.070;
or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29.19 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called under
subsection (2) of this section during the month of that primary is the
date of the presidential primary.
(4) In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section,
a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be
called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood,
earthquake, or other act of God, except that no special election may be
held between the first day for candidates to file for public office and
the last day to certify the returns of the general election other than
as provided in subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section. Such special
election shall be conducted and notice thereof given in the manner
provided by law.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections.

Subpart 1.4
Election Costs
Sec. 146 RCW 29.13.045 and 1965 c 123 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
ELECTION COSTS BORNE BY CONSTITUENCIES. Every city, town, and
district ((shall be)) is liable for its proportionate share of the
costs when such elections are held in conjunction with other elections
held under RCW 29.13.010 and 29.13.020.
Whenever any city, town, or district ((shall)) holds any primary or
election, general or special, on an isolated date, all costs of such
elections ((shall)) must be borne by the city, town, or district
concerned.
The purpose of this section is to clearly establish that the county
is not responsible for any costs involved in the holding of any city,
town, or district election.
In recovering such election expenses, including a reasonable pro-ration of administrative costs, the county auditor shall certify the
cost to the county treasurer with a copy to the clerk or auditor of the
city, town, or district concerned. Upon receipt of such certification,
the county treasurer shall make the transfer from any available and
appropriate city, town, or district funds to the county current expense
fund or to the county election reserve fund if such a fund is
established. Each city, town, or district ((shall)) must be promptly
notified by the county treasurer whenever such transfer has been
completed((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However, in those districts
wherein a treasurer, other than the county treasurer, has been
appointed such transfer procedure ((shall)) does not apply, but the
district shall promptly issue its warrant for payment of election
costs.

Sec. 147 RCW 29.13.047 and 1985 c 45 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
STATE SHARE OF ELECTION COSTS. (1) Whenever state officers or
measures are voted upon at a state primary or general election held in
an odd-numbered year under RCW 29.13.010, the state of Washington shall
assume a prorated share of the costs of that state primary or general
election.
(2) Whenever a primary or vacancy election is held to fill a
vacancy in the position of United States senator or United States
representative under chapter 29.68 RCW, the state of Washington shall
assume a prorated share of the costs of that primary or vacancy
election.
(3) The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of these
expenses when prorating election costs under RCW 29.13.045 and shall
file such expense claims with the secretary of state.
(4) The secretary of state shall include in his or her biennial
budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this section.
Reimbursements for election costs shall be from appropriations
specifically provided by law for that purpose.

Sec. 148 RCW 29.13.048 and 1986 c 167 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
INTEREST ON REIMBURSEMENT OF COSTS. For any reimbursement of
election costs under RCW 29.13.047, the secretary of state shall pay
interest at an annual rate equal to two percentage points in excess of
the discount rate on ninety-day commercial paper in effect at the
federal reserve bank in San Francisco on the fifteenth day of the month
immediately preceding the payment for any period of time in excess of
thirty days after the receipt of a properly executed and documented
voucher for such expenses and the entry of an allotment from
specifically appropriated funds for this purpose ((under RCW
43.88.111)). The secretary of state shall promptly notify any county
that submits an incomplete or inaccurate voucher for reimbursement
under RCW 29.13.047.

Subpart 1.5
Administration of Elections
Sec. 149 RCW 29.60.010 and 1992 c 163 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
ELECTION ADMINISTRATION AND CERTIFICATION BOARD--GENERALLY. (1)
The Washington state election administration and certification board is
established and has the responsibilities and authorities prescribed by
this chapter. The board is composed of the following members:
(a) The secretary of state or the secretary's designee;
(b) The state director of elections or the director's designee;
(c) Four county auditors appointed by the Washington state
association of county auditors or their alternates who are county
auditors designated by the association to serve as such alternates,
each appointee and alternate to serve at the pleasure of the
association;
(d) One member from each of the two largest political party
caucuses of the house of representatives designated by and serving at
the pleasure of the legislative leader of the respective caucus;
(e) One member from each of the two largest political party
caucuses of the senate designated by and serving at the pleasure of the
legislative leader of the respective caucus; and
(f) One representative from each major political party, ((as
defined by RCW 29.01.090,)) designated by and serving at the pleasure
of the chair of the party's state central committee.
(2) The board shall elect a chair from among its number; however,
neither the secretary of state nor the state director of elections nor
their designees may serve as the chair of the board. A majority of the
members appointed to the board constitutes a quorum for conducting the
business of the board. Chapter 42.30 RCW, the Open Public Meetings
Act, and RCW 42.32.030 regarding minutes of meetings, apply to the
meetings of the board.
(3) Members of the board shall serve without compensation. The
secretary of state shall reimburse members of the board, other than
those who are members of the legislature, for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members of the board who
are members of the legislature shall be reimbursed as provided in
chapter 44.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 APPEALS. The board created in RCW
29.60.010 shall review appeals filed under RCW 29.60.050 or 29.60.070.
A decision of the board regarding the appeal must be supported by not
less than a majority of the members appointed to the board. A decision
of the board regarding an appeal filed under RCW 29.60.070 concerning
an election review conducted under that section is final. If a
decision of the board regarding an appeal filed under RCW 29.60.050
includes a recommendation that a certificate be issued, the secretary
of state, upon the recommendation of the board, shall issue the
certificate.

Sec. 151 RCW 29.60.030 and 2001 c 41 s 11 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DUTIES OF SECRETARY OF STATE. The secretary of state shall:
(1) Establish and operate, or provide by contract, training and
certification programs for state and county elections administration
officials and personnel, including training on the various types of
election law violations and discrimination, and training programs for
political party observers which conform to the rules for such programs
established under RCW 29.60.020;
(2) Administer tests for state and county officials and personnel
who have received such training and issue certificates to those who
have successfully completed the training and passed such tests;
(3) Maintain a record of those individuals who have received such
training and certificates; and
(4) Provide the staffing and support services required by the board
created under RCW 29.60.010.

Sec. 152 RCW 29.60.040 and 1992 c 163 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
TRAINING OF ELECTION ADMINISTRATORS. A person having
responsibility for the administration or conduct of elections, other
than precinct election officers, shall, within eighteen months of
undertaking those responsibilities ((or within eighteen months of July
1, 1993, whichever is later)), receive general training regarding the
conduct of elections and specific training regarding their
responsibilities and duties as prescribed by this title or by rules
adopted by the secretary of state under this title. Included among
those persons for whom such training is mandatory are the following:
(1) Secretary of state elections division personnel;
(2) County elections administrators under RCW 36.22.220;
(3) County canvassing board members;
(4) Persons officially designated by each major political party as
elections observers; and
(5) Any other person or group charged with election administration
responsibilities if the person or group is designated by rule adopted
by the secretary of state as requiring the training.
The secretary of state shall reimburse election observers in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for travel expenses
incurred to receive training required under subsection (4) of this
section.
Neither this section nor RCW 29.60.030 may be construed as
requiring an elected official to receive training or a certificate of
training as a condition for seeking or holding elective office or as a
condition for carrying out constitutional duties.

Sec. 153 RCW 29.60.050 and 1992 c 163 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
DENIAL OF CERTIFICATION--REVIEW AND APPEAL. (1) A decision of the
secretary of state to deny certification under RCW 29.60.030 ((shall))
must be entered in the manner specified for orders under the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Such a decision
((shall)) is not ((be)) effective for a period of twenty days following
the date of the decision, during which time the person denied
certification may file a petition with the secretary of state
requesting the secretary to reconsider the decision and to grant
certification. The petitioner shall include((,)) in the petition, an
explanation of the reasons why the initial decision is incorrect and
certification should be granted, and may include a request for a
hearing on the matter. The secretary of state shall reconsider the
matter if the petition is filed in a proper and timely manner. If a
hearing is requested, the secretary of state shall conduct the hearing
within sixty days after the date on which the petition is filed. The
secretary of state shall render a final decision on the matter within
ninety days after the date on which the petition is filed.
(2) Within twenty days after the date on which the secretary of
state makes a final decision denying a petition under this section, the
petitioner may appeal the denial to the board created in RCW 29.60.010.
In deciding appeals, the board shall restrict its review to the record
established when the matter was before the secretary of state. The
board shall affirm the decision if it finds that the record supports
the decision and that the decision is not inconsistent with other
decisions of the secretary of state in which the same standards were
applied and certification was granted. Similarly, the board shall
reverse the decision and recommend to the secretary of state that
certification be granted if the board finds that such support is
lacking or that such inconsistency exists.
(3) Judicial review of certification decisions ((shall)) will be as
prescribed under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, but ((shall be)) is
limited to the review of board decisions denying certification.

Sec. 154 RCW 29.60.060 and 1992 c 163 s 8 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ELECTION REVIEW SECTION. An election review section is established
in the elections division of the office of the secretary of state.
Permanent staff of the elections division, trained and certified as
required by RCW 29.60.040, shall perform the election review functions
prescribed by RCW 29.60.070. The staff may also be required to assist
in training, certification, and other duties as may be assigned by the
secretary of state to ensure the uniform and orderly conduct of
elections in this state.

Sec. 155 RCW 29.60.070 and 1997 c 284 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REVIEW OF COUNTY ELECTION PROCEDURES. (1)(a) The election review
staff of the office of the secretary of state shall conduct a review of
election-related policies, procedures, and practices in an affected
county or counties:
(i) If the unofficial returns of a primary or general election for
a position in the state legislature indicate that a mandatory recount
is likely for that position; or
(ii) If unofficial returns indicate a mandatory recount is likely
in a statewide election or an election for federal office.
Reviews conducted under (ii) of this subsection shall be performed
in as many selected counties as time and staffing permit. Reviews
conducted as a result of mandatory recounts shall be performed between
the time the unofficial returns are complete and the time the recount
is to take place, if possible.
(b) In addition to conducting reviews under (a) of this subsection,
the election review staff shall also conduct such a review in a county
periodically, in conjunction with a county primary or special or
general election, at the direction of the secretary of state or at the
request of the county auditor. If any resident of this state believes
that an aspect of a primary or election has been conducted
inappropriately in a county, the resident may file a complaint with the
secretary of state. The secretary shall consider such complaints in
scheduling periodic reviews under this section.
(c) Before an election review is conducted in a county, the
secretary of state shall provide the county auditor of the affected
county and the chair of the state central committee of each major
political party with notice that the review is to be conducted. When
a periodic review is to be conducted in a county at the direction of
the secretary of state under (b) of this subsection, the secretary
shall provide the affected county auditor not less than thirty days'
notice.
(2) Reviews shall be conducted in conformance with rules adopted
under RCW 29.60.020. In performing a review in a county under this
chapter, the election review staff shall evaluate the policies and
procedures established for conducting the primary or election in the
county and the practices of those conducting it. As part of the
review, the election review staff shall issue to the county auditor and
the members of the county canvassing board a report of its findings and
recommendations regarding such policies, procedures, and practices. A
review conducted under this chapter shall not include any evaluation,
finding, or recommendation regarding the validity of the outcome of a
primary or election or the validity of any canvass of returns nor does
the election review staff have any jurisdiction to make such an
evaluation, finding, or recommendation under this title.
(3) The county auditor of the county in which a review is conducted
under this section or a member of the canvassing board of the county
may appeal the findings or recommendations of the election review staff
regarding the review by filing an appeal with the board created under
RCW 29.60.010.

Sec. 156 RCW 29.60.080 and 1992 c 163 s 10 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
POWERS AND DUTIES OF COUNTY AUDITOR AND REVIEW STAFF. The county
auditor may designate any person who has been certified under this
chapter, other than the auditor, to participate in a review conducted
in the county under this chapter. Each county auditor and canvassing
board shall cooperate fully during an election review by making
available to the reviewing staff any material requested by the staff.
The reviewing staff shall have full access to ballot pages, absentee
voting materials, any other election material normally kept in a secure
environment after the election, and other requested material. If
ballots are reviewed by the staff, they shall be reviewed in the
presence of the canvassing board or its designees. Ballots shall not
leave the custody of the canvassing board. During the review and after
its completion, the review staff may make appropriate recommendations
to the county auditor or canvassing board, or both, to bring the county
into compliance with the training required under this chapter, and the
laws or rules of the state of Washington, to safeguard election
material or to preserve the integrity of the elections process.

Sec. 157 RCW 29.60.090 and 1992 c 163 s 11 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ELECTION ASSISTANCE AND CLEARINGHOUSE PROGRAM. The secretary of
state shall establish within the elections division an election
assistance and clearinghouse program, which shall provide regular
communication between the secretary of state, local election officials,
and major and minor political parties regarding newly enacted elections
legislation, relevant judicial decisions affecting the administration
of elections, and applicable attorney general opinions, and which shall
respond to inquiries from elections administrators, political parties,
and others regarding election information. This section does not
empower the secretary of state to offer legal advice or opinions, but
the secretary may discuss the construction or interpretation of
election law, case law, or legal opinions from the attorney general or
other competent legal authority.

Subpart 1.6
Construction
Sec. 158 RCW 29.98.010 and 1965 c 9 s 29.98.010 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
CONTINUATION OF EXISTING LAW. The provisions of this title insofar
as they are substantially the same as statutory provisions repealed by
this chapter, and relating to the same subject matter, shall be
construed as restatements and continuations, and not as new enactments.

Sec. 159 RCW 29.98.020 and 1965 c 9 s 29.98.020 are each amended
to read as follows:
CAPTIONS NOT PART OF LAW. ((Title headings,)) Chapter headings,
part, subpart, and section or subsection ((headings)) captions, as used
in this title do not constitute any part of the law.

Sec. 160 RCW 29.98.030 and 1965 c 9 s 29.98.030 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
INVALIDITY OF PART OF TITLE NOT TO AFFECT REMAINDER. If any
provision of this title, or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the title, or the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not
affected.

Subpart 1.7
Rule-making Authority
Sec. 161 RCW 29.04.080 and 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
RULES BY SECRETARY OF STATE. The secretary of state as chief
election officer shall make reasonable rules ((and regulations)) in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW not inconsistent with the
federal((,)) and state((, county, city, town, and district)) election
laws to effectuate any provision of this title and to facilitate the
execution of ((their)) its provisions in an orderly, timely, and
uniform manner ((and)) relating to any federal, state, county, city,
town, and district elections. To that end the secretary shall assist
local election officers by devising uniform forms and procedures. ((He
shall provide uniform regulations governing the maintenance of voter
registration records on electronic or automatic data processing systems
so that the records of counties using such systems shall be compatible.
He shall supervise the development and use of such systems to insure
that they conform to all the provisions of Title 29 RCW and the
regulations provided for in this section.))
In addition to the rule-making authority granted otherwise by this
section, the secretary of state shall make rules governing the
following provisions:
(1) The maintenance of voter registration records;
(2) The preparation, maintenance, distribution, review, and filing
of precinct maps;
(3) Standards for the design, layout, and production of ballots;
(4) The examination and testing of voting systems for
certification;
(5) The source and scope of independent evaluations of voting
systems that may be relied upon in certifying voting systems for use in
this state;
(6) Standards and procedures for the acceptance testing of voting
systems by counties;
(7) Standards and procedures for testing the programming of vote
tallying software for specific primaries and elections;
(8) Standards and procedures for the preparation and use of each
type of certified voting system including procedures for the operation
of counting centers where vote tallying systems are used;
(9) Standards and procedures to ensure the accurate tabulation and
canvassing of ballots;
(10) Consistency among the counties of the state in the preparation
of ballots, the operation of vote tallying systems, and the canvassing
of primaries and elections;
(11) Procedures to ensure the secrecy of a voter's ballot when a
small number of ballots are counted at the polls or at a counting
center;
(12) The use of substitute devices or means of voting when a voting
device at the polling place is found to be defective, the counting of
votes cast on the defective device, the counting of votes cast on the
substitute device, and the documentation that must be submitted to the
county auditor regarding such circumstances;
(13) Procedures for the transportation of sealed containers of
voted ballots or sealed voting devices;
(14) The acceptance and filing of documents via electronic
facsimile;
(15) Voter registration applications and records;
(16) The use of voter registration information in the conduct of
elections;
(17) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by driver licensing agents or the
department of licensing;
(18) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by agencies designated by the governor to
provide voter registration services;
(19) Procedures to receive and distribute voter registration
applications by mail;
(20) Procedures for a voter to change his or her voter registration
address within a county by telephone;
(21) Procedures for a voter to change the name under which he or
she is registered to vote;
(22) Procedures for canceling dual voter registration records and
for maintaining records of persons whose voter registrations have been
canceled;
(23) Procedures for the electronic transfer of voter registration
records between county auditors and the office of the secretary of
state;
(24) Procedures and forms for declarations of candidacy;
(25) Procedures and requirements for the acceptance and filing of
declarations of candidacy by electronic means;
(26) Procedures for the circumstance in which two or more
candidates have a name similar in sound or spelling so as to cause
confusion for the voter;
(27) Filing for office;
(28) The order of positions and offices on a ballot;
(29) Sample ballots;
(30) Independent evaluations of voting systems;
(31) The testing, approval, and certification of voting systems;
(32) The testing of vote tallying software programming;
(33) Standards and procedures to prevent fraud and to facilitate
the accurate processing and canvassing of absentee ballots and mail
ballots;
(34) Standards and procedures to guarantee the secrecy of absentee
ballots and mail ballots;
(35) Uniformity among the counties of the state in the conduct of
absentee voting and mail ballot elections;
(36) Standards and procedures to accommodate out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters;
(37) The tabulation of paper ballots before the close of the polls;
(38) The accessibility of polling places and registration
facilities that are accessible to elderly and disabled persons;
(39) The aggregation of precinct results if reporting the results
of a single precinct could jeopardize the secrecy of a person's ballot;
(40) Procedures for conducting a statutory recount;
(41) Procedures for filling vacancies in congressional offices if
the general statutory time requirements for availability of absentee
ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures cannot be
met;
(42) Procedures for the statistical sampling of signatures for
purposes of verifying and canvassing signatures on initiative,
referendum, and recall election petitions;
(43) Standards and deadlines for submitting material to the office
of the secretary of state for the voters' pamphlet;
(44) Deadlines for the filing of ballot titles for referendum bills
and constitutional amendments if none have been provided by the
legislature;
(45) Procedures for the publication of a state voters' pamphlet;
and
(46) Procedures for conducting special elections regarding nuclear
waste sites if the general statutory time requirements for availability
of absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures
cannot be met.

Sec. 162 RCW 29.19.070 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 20 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY RULES. The secretary of state as chief
election officer may make rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to
facilitate the operation, accomplishment, and purpose of ((this
chapter)) the presidential primary authorized in RCW 29.19.010 through
29.19.080 (as recodified by this act). The secretary of state shall
adopt rules consistent with this chapter to comply with national or
state political party rules.

Sec. 163 RCW 29.60.020 and 1992 c 163 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD. (1) The secretary of state and the
board created in RCW 29.60.010 shall jointly adopt rules, in the manner
specified for the adoption of rules under the Administrative Procedure
Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, governing:
(a) The training of persons officially designated by major
political parties as elections observers under this title, and the
training and certification of election administration officials and
personnel;
(b) The policies and procedures for conducting election reviews
under RCW 29.60.070; and
(c) The policies and standards to be used by the board in reviewing
and rendering decisions regarding appeals filed under RCW 29.60.070.
((The initial policies and standards adopted under (c) of this
subsection shall be adopted concurrently with adoption of the initial
policies and procedures adopted under (b) of this subsection.
(2) The board created in RCW 29.60.010 shall review appeals filed
under RCW 29.60.050 or 29.60.070. A decision of the board regarding
such an appeal shall be supported by not less than a majority of the
members appointed to the board. A decision of the board regarding an
appeal filed under RCW 29.60.070 concerning an election review
conducted under that section is final. If a decision of the board
regarding an appeal filed under RCW 29.60.050 includes a recommendation
that a certificate be issued, the certificate shall be issued by the
secretary of state as recommended by the board.
(3))) (2) The board created in RCW 29.60.010 may adopt rules
governing its procedures.

PART 2
VOTERS AND REGISTRATIONSubpart 2.1
Definitions
Sec. 201 RCW 29.07.005 and 1994 c 57 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEFINITION. As used in this chapter: "Information required for
voter registration" means the minimum information provided on a voter
registration application that is required by the county auditor in
order to place a voter registration applicant on the voter registration
rolls. This information includes the applicant's name, complete
residence address, date of birth, and a signature attesting to the
truth of the information provided on the application. All other
information supplied is ancillary and not to be used as grounds for not
registering an applicant to vote.

Sec. 202 RCW 29.04.095 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 111 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
DEFINITIONS. For purposes of ((RCW 29.04.100 through 29.04.120))
this chapter, the following words ((shall)) have the following
meanings:
(1) (("County auditor" means the county auditor in any noncharter
county and in a charter county that county official having the overall
responsibility to maintain voter registration information.
(2))) "Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture,
public or private corporation, association, state or local governmental
entity or agency however constituted, candidate, committee, political
committee, political party, executive committee thereof, or any other
organization or group of persons, however organized.
(((3))) (2) "Political purpose" means a purpose concerned with the
support of or opposition to any candidate for any partisan or
nonpartisan office or concerned with the support of or opposition to
any ballot proposition or issue; "political purpose" includes, but is
not limited to, such activities as the advertising for or against any
candidate or ballot measure or the solicitation of financial support.

Sec. 203 RCW 29.10.011 and 1994 c 57 s 33 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DEFINITIONS. The definitions set forth in this section apply
throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Verification notice" means a notice sent by the county auditor
to a voter registration applicant and is used to verify or collect
information about the applicant in order to complete the registration.
(2) "Acknowledgement notice" means a notice sent by nonforwardable
mail by the county auditor to a registered voter to acknowledge a voter
registration transaction, which can include initial registration,
transfer, or reactivation of an inactive registration. An
acknowledgement notice may be a voter registration card.
(3) "Confirmation notice" means a notice sent to a registered voter
by first class forwardable mail at the address indicated on the voter's
permanent registration record and to any other address at which the
county auditor could reasonably expect mail to be received by the voter
in order to confirm the voter's residence address. The confirmation
notice must be designed so that the voter may update his or her current
residence address.

Sec. 204 RCW 29.08.010 and 1994 c 57 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
DEFINITIONS. The definitions set forth in this section apply
throughout this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "By mail" means delivery of a completed original voter
registration application by mail or by personal delivery. ((The
secretary of state, in consultation with the county auditors, may adopt
rules to develop a process to receive and distribute these
applications.))
(2) For voter registration applicants, "date of mailing" means the
date of the postal cancellation on the voter registration application.
This date will also be used as the date of application for the purpose
of meeting the registration cutoff deadline. If the postal
cancellation date is illegible then the date of receipt by the
elections official is considered the date of application. If an
application is received by the elections official by the close of
business on the fifth day after the cutoff date for voter registration
and the postal cancellation date is illegible, the application will be
considered to have arrived by the cutoff date for voter registration.

Subpart 2.2
General Provisions
Sec. 205 RCW 29.07.010 and 1999 c 298 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNTY AUDITOR AS CHIEF REGISTRAR OF VOTERS, CUSTODIAN OF RECORDS--REGISTRATION ASSISTANTS. (1) In all counties, the county auditor shall
be the chief registrar of voters for every precinct within the county.
The auditor may appoint ((a registration assistant for each precinct or
group of precincts and shall appoint city or town clerks as))
registration assistants to assist in registering persons residing in
((cities, towns, and rural precincts within)) the county.
(((2) In addition, the auditor may appoint a registration assistant
for each common school. The auditor may appoint a registration
assistant for each fire station.
(3) A registration assistant must be a registered voter. Except
for city and town clerks,)) Each registration assistant holds office at
the pleasure of the county auditor and must be a registered voter.
(((4))) (2) The county auditor shall be the custodian of the
official registration records of ((that)) the county. The county
auditor shall ensure that mail-in voter registration application forms
are readily available to the public at locations to include but not
limited to the elections office, and all common schools, fire stations,
and public libraries.

Sec. 206 RCW 29.08.060 and 1994 c 57 s 32 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
AUDITOR'S PROCEDURE. (1) On receipt of an application for voter
registration under this chapter, the county auditor shall review the
application to determine whether the information supplied is complete.
An application that contains the applicant's name, complete valid
residence address, date of birth, and signature attesting to the truth
of the information provided on the application is complete. If it is
not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice of
the deficiency to the applicant. This verification notice shall
require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the
verification notice is not returned by the applicant or is returned as
undeliverable the auditor shall not place the name of the applicant on
the county voter list. If the applicant provides the required
information, the applicant shall be registered to vote as of the date
of mailing of the original voter registration application.
(2) If the information is complete, the applicant is considered to
be registered to vote as of the date of mailing. The auditor shall
record the appropriate precinct identification, taxing district
identification, and date of registration on the voter's record. Within
forty-five days after the receipt of an application but no later than
seven days before the next primary, special election, or general
election, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first class mail,
an acknowledgement notice identifying the registrant's precinct and
containing such other information as may be required by the secretary
of state. The postal service shall be instructed not to forward a
voter registration card to any other address and to return to the
auditor any card which is not deliverable. If the applicant has
indicated that he or she is registered to vote in another county in
Washington but has also provided an address within the auditor's county
that is for voter registration purposes, the auditor shall send, on
behalf of the registrant, a registration cancellation notice to the
auditor of that other county and the auditor receiving the notice shall
cancel the registrant's voter registration in that other county. If
the registrant has indicated on the form that he or she is registered
to vote within the county but has provided a new address within the
county that is for voter registration purposes, the auditor shall
transfer the voter's registration.
(3) If an acknowledgement notice card is properly mailed as
required by this section to the address listed by the voter as being
the voter's mailing address and the notice is subsequently returned to
the auditor by the postal service as being undeliverable to the voter
at that address, the auditor shall promptly send the voter a
confirmation notice. The auditor shall place the voter's registration
on inactive status pending a response from the voter to the
confirmation notice.

Sec. 207 RCW 29.07.110 and 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
TRANSMITTAL OF REGISTRATION FORMS. Every ((deputy registrar
located outside the county courthouse)) registration assistant shall
keep registration supplies at his or her usual place of residence or
usual place of business ((at reasonable hours and at the end of each
week mail to the county auditor the cards of those who have registered
during the week: PROVIDED, That with the written consent of the county
auditor a deputy registrar may designate some centrally located place
for registration in lieu of the usual place where registration supplies
are kept by giving notice thereof in such manner as he may deem
expedient stating therein the days and hours when the place will be
open for registration: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such consent of the
county auditor may include authorization for door-to-door registration
including registration from a portable office as in a trailer and the
person or persons so deputized may register all eligible electors
residing in any precinct within the county concerned)). A person or
organization collecting voter registration application forms must
transmit the forms to the secretary of state or a designee at least
once weekly.

Sec. 208 RCW 29.08.030 and 1993 c 434 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REGISTRATION BY MAIL. Any elector of this state may register to
vote by mail under this chapter.

Sec. 209 RCW 29.07.220 and 1993 c 408 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
COMPUTER FILE OF VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDS -- ESTABLISHMENT -- DUTIES
OF COUNTY AUDITOR. Each county auditor shall maintain a computer file
((on magnetic tape or disk, punched cards, or other form of data
storage)) containing the records of all registered voters within the
county. ((Where it is necessary or advisable,)) The auditor may
provide for the establishment and maintenance of such files by private
contract or through interlocal agreement as provided by chapter 39.34
RCW((, as it now exists or is hereafter amended)). The computer file
((shall)) must include, but not be limited to, each voter's last name,
first name, middle initial, date of birth, residence address, ((sex))
gender, date of registration, applicable taxing district and precinct
codes, and the last date on which the individual voted. The county
auditor shall subsequently record each consecutive date upon which the
individual has voted and retain at least the last five such consecutive
dates((: PROVIDED, That)). If the voter has not voted at least five
times since establishing his or her current registration record, only
the available dates ((shall)) will be included.

Sec. 210 RCW 29.10.081 and 1994 c 57 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNT OF REGISTERED VOTERS. (1) Except as otherwise specified by
this title, registered voters include those assigned to active and
inactive status by the county auditor.
(2) Election officials shall not include inactive voters in the
count of registered voters for the purpose of dividing precincts,
creating vote-by-mail precincts, determining voter turnout, or other
purposes in law for which the determining factor is the number of
registered voters. Election officials shall not include persons who
are ongoing absentee voters under RCW ((29.36.013)) 29.36.240 (as
recodified by this act) in determining the maximum permissible size of
vote-by-mail precincts or in determining the maximum permissible size
of precincts. Nothing in this subsection may be construed as altering
the vote tallying requirements of RCW 29.62.090.

Sec. 211 RCW 29.07.092 and 2001 c 41 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
NEW REGISTRATION OR TRANSFER -- ACKNOWLEDGMENT--CANCELLATION OF
PREVIOUS REGISTRATION. The county auditor shall acknowledge each new
voter registration or transfer by providing or sending the voter a card
identifying his or her current precinct and containing such other
information as may be prescribed by the secretary of state. When a
person who has previously registered to vote in a jurisdiction applies
for voter registration in a new jurisdiction, the person shall provide
on the registration form, all information needed to cancel any previous
registration. The county auditor shall forward any information
pertaining to the voter's prior voter registration to the county where
the voter was previously registered, so that registration may be
canceled. If the prior voter registration is in another state, the
notification must be made to the state elections office of that state.
A county auditor receiving official information that a voter has
registered to vote in another jurisdiction shall immediately cancel
that voter's registration.

Sec. 212 RCW 29.07.160 and 1993 c 383 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CLOSING REGISTRATION FILES -- NOTICE. The registration files of all
precincts shall be closed against original registration or transfers
for thirty days immediately preceding every primary, special election,
and general election to be held in such precincts.
The county auditor shall give notice of the closing of the precinct
files for original registration and transfer and notice of the special
registration and voting procedure provided by RCW 29.07.152 by one
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at
least five days before the closing of the precinct files.
No person may vote at any primary, special election, or general
election in a precinct polling place unless he or she has registered to
vote at least thirty days before that primary or election. If a
person, otherwise qualified to vote in the state, county, and precinct
in which he or she applies for registration, does not register at least
thirty days before any primary, special election, or general election,
he or she may register and vote by absentee ballot for that primary or
election under RCW 29.07.152.

Sec. 213 RCW 29.07.152 and 1993 c 383 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
LATE REGISTRATION -- SPECIAL PROCEDURE. This section establishes a
special procedure which an elector may use to register to vote during
the period beginning after the closing of registration for voting at
the polls under RCW 29.07.160 and ending on the fifteenth day before a
primary, special election, or general election. ((During this period,
the unregistered)) A qualified elector in the county may register to
vote in person in the office of the county auditor or at a voter
registration location specifically designated for this purpose by the
county auditor of the county in which the applicant resides, and apply
for an absentee ballot for that primary or election. The auditor or
((voter registrar)) registration assistant shall register that
individual in the manner provided in this chapter. The application for
an absentee ballot executed by the newly registered voter for the
primary or election that follows the execution of the registration
shall be promptly transmitted to the auditor with the completed voter
registration form.

Sec. 214 RCW 29.07.030 and 1965 c 9 s 29.07.030 are each amended
to read as follows:
EXPENSE OF REGISTRATION. The expense of registration in all rural
precincts ((shall)) must be paid by the county((;)). The expense of
registration in all precincts lying wholly within a city or town must
be paid by the city or town. ((In precincts lying partly within and
partly outside of a city or town, the expense of registration shall be
apportioned between the county and city or town according to the number
of voters registered in the precinct living within the city or town and
the number living outside of it.)) Registration expenses for this
section include both active and inactive voters.

Sec. 215 RCW 29.07.230 and 1980 c 32 s 6 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PAYMENT TO COUNTIES FOR MAINTENANCE OF VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDS
ON ELECTRONIC DATA PROCESSING SYSTEMS. To compensate counties with
fewer than ten thousand registered voters at the time of the most
recent state general election for unrecoverable costs incident to the
maintenance of voter registration records on electronic data processing
systems, the secretary of state shall, in June of each year, pay such
counties an amount equal to thirty cents for each registered voter in
the county at the time of the most recent state general election.

Subpart 2.3
Forms
Sec. 216 RCW 29.07.070 and 1994 c 57 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
VOTER QUALIFICATION INFORMATION -- VERIFICATION NOTICE. ((Except as
provided under RCW 29.07.260,)) An applicant for voter registration
shall complete an application providing the following information
concerning his or her qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) The address of the last former registration of the applicant as
a voter in the state;
(2) The applicant's full name;
(3) The applicant's date of birth;
(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;
(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the
same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;
(6) The sex of the applicant;
(7) A declaration that the applicant is a citizen of the United
States; ((and))
(8) The applicant's signature; and
(9) Any other information that the secretary of state determines is
necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent
duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state.
If the applicant fails to provide the information required for
voter registration, the auditor shall send the applicant a verification
notice. The auditor shall not register the applicant until the
required information is provided. If a verification notice is returned
as undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice within
forty-five days, the auditor shall not register the applicant to vote.
The following warning shall appear in a conspicuous place on the
voter registration form:

"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, or by
a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both imprisonment and fine."

Sec. 217 RCW 29.07.140 and 1994 c 57 s 18 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
APPLICATION FORM -- SINGLE COMPLETION -- FURNISHED BY SECRETARY OF
STATE. (1) The secretary of state shall specify by rule the format of
all voter registration applications. These applications shall be
compatible with existing voter registration records. An applicant for
voter registration shall be required to complete only one application
and to provide the required information other than his or her signature
no more than one time. These applications shall also contain
information for the voter to transfer his or her registration.
Any application format specified by the secretary for use in
registering to vote in state and local elections shall satisfy the
requirements of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31) for registering to vote in federal elections.
(2) The secretary of state shall adopt by rule a uniform data
format for transferring voter registration records on machine-readable
media.
(3) All registration applications required under RCW 29.07.070 and
29.07.260 shall be produced and furnished by the secretary of state to
the county auditors and the department of licensing.
(4) The secretary of state shall produce and distribute any
instructional material and other supplies needed to implement RCW
29.07.260 through 29.07.300 and 46.20.155.
(5) Any notice or statement that must be provided under the
National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31) to prospective
registrants concerning registering to vote in federal elections shall
also be provided to prospective registrants concerning registering to
vote under this title in state and local elections as well as federal
elections.

Sec. 218 RCW 29.07.080 and 1994 c 57 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
OATH OF APPLICANT. For all voter registrations ((executed under
RCW 29.07.070)), the registrant shall sign the following oath:

"I declare that the facts on this voter registration form are true.
I am a citizen of the United States, I am not presently denied my civil
rights as a result of being convicted of a felony, I will have lived in
Washington at this address for thirty days immediately before the next
election at which I vote, and I will be at least eighteen years old
when I vote."

Sec. 219 RCW 29.07.090 and 1994 c 57 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
SIGNATURE CARD. At the time of registering, a voter shall sign his
or her name upon a signature card to be transmitted to the secretary of
state. The voter shall also provide his or her first name followed by
the last name or names and the name of the county in which he or she is
registered. Once each week the county auditor shall transmit all such
cards to the secretary of state. The secretary of state may exempt a
county auditor who is providing electronic voter registration and
electronic voter signature information to the secretary of state from
the requirements of this section.

Sec. 220 RCW 29.08.080 and 2001 c 41 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
FORMS -- SUPPLIED WITHOUT COST--CITIZENSHIP. The secretary of state
shall furnish registration forms necessary to carry out the
registration of voters as provided by this chapter without cost to the
respective counties. All voter registration forms ((printed after
January 1, 2002,)) must include clear and conspicuous language,
designed to draw an applicant's attention, stating that the applicant
must be a United States citizen in order to register to vote.

Sec. 221 RCW 29.08.040 and 1993 c 434 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
FORMS. The county auditor shall distribute forms by which a person
may register to vote by mail and cancel any previous registration in
this state. The county auditor shall keep a supply of voter
registration forms in his or her office at all times for political
parties and others interested in assisting in voter registration, and
shall make every effort to make these forms generally available to the
public. The county auditor shall provide voter registration forms to
city and town clerks, state offices, schools, fire stations, and any
other locations considered appropriate by the auditor for extending
registration opportunities to all areas of the county. After the
initial distribution of voter registration forms to a given location,
a representative designated by the official in charge of that location
shall notify the county auditor of the need for additional voter
registration supplies.

Subpart 2.4
Motor Voter and Registration at State Agencies
Sec. 222 RCW 29.07.025 and 2002 c 185 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
VOTER REGISTRATION IN STATE OFFICES, COLLEGES. (1) The governor,
in consultation with the secretary of state, shall designate agencies
to provide voter registration services in compliance with federal
statutes.
(2) Each state agency designated ((under RCW 29.07.420)) shall
provide voter registration services for employees and the public within
each office of that agency.
(((2))) (3) The secretary of state shall design and provide a
standard notice informing the public of the availability of voter
registration, which notice shall be posted in each state agency where
such services are available.
(((3))) (4) The secretary of state shall design and provide
standard voter registration forms for use by these state agencies.
(((4))) (5) Each institution of higher education shall put in place
an active prompt on its course registration web site, or similar web
site that students actively and regularly use, that, if selected, will
link the student to the secretary of state's voter registration web
site. The prompt must ask the student if he or she wishes to register
to vote.

Sec. 223 RCW 29.07.430 and 1994 c 57 s 27 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REGISTRATION OR TRANSFER AT DESIGNATED AGENCIES -- FORM AND
APPLICATION. (1) A person may register to vote or transfer a voter
registration when he or she applies for service or assistance and with
each renewal, recertification, or change of address at agencies
designated under RCW 29.07.420.
(2) A prospective applicant shall initially be offered a form
adopted by the secretary of state that is designed to determine whether
the person wishes to register to vote. The form must comply with all
applicable state and federal statutes regarding content.
The form shall also contain a box that may be checked by the
applicant to indicate that he or she declines to register.
If the person indicates an interest in registering or has made no
indication as to a desire to register or not register to vote, the
person shall be given a mail-in voter registration application or a
prescribed agency application as provided by RCW 29.07.440.

Sec. 224 RCW 29.07.440 and 2001 c 41 s 7 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REGISTRATION AT DESIGNATED AGENCIES -- PROCEDURES. (1) The secretary
of state shall prescribe the method of voter registration for each
designated agency. The agency shall use either the state voter
registration by mail form with a separate declination form for the
applicant to indicate that he or she declines to register at this time,
or the agency may use a separate form approved for use by the secretary
of state.
(2) The person providing service at the agency shall offer voter
registration services to every client whenever he or she applies for
service or assistance and with each renewal, recertification, or change
of address. The person providing service shall give the applicant the
same level of assistance with the voter registration application as is
offered to fill out the agency's forms and documents, including
information about age and citizenship requirements for voter
registration.
(3) If an agency uses a computerized application process, it may,
in consultation with the secretary of state, develop methods to capture
simultaneously the information required for voter registration during
a person's computerized application process.
(4) Each designated agency shall provide for the voter registration
application forms to be collected from each agency office at least once
each week. The agency shall then forward the application forms to the
secretary of state each week. The secretary of state shall forward the
forms to the county in which the applicant has registered to vote no
later than ten days after the date on which the forms were received by
the secretary of state.

Sec. 225 RCW 29.07.260 and 2001 c 41 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
REGISTRATION WITH DRIVER'S LICENSE APPLICATION OR RENEWAL. (1) A
person may register to vote, transfer a voter registration, or change
his or her name for voter registration purposes when he or she applies
for or renews a driver's license or identification card under chapter
46.20 RCW.
(2) To register to vote, transfer his or her voter registration, or
change his or her name for voter registration purposes under this
section, the applicant shall provide the ((following:
(a) His or her full name;
(b) Whether the address in the driver's license file is the same as
his or her residence for voting purposes;
(c) The address of the residence for voting purposes if it is
different from the address in the driver's license file;
(d) His or her mailing address if it is not the same as the address
in (c) of this subsection;
(e) Additional information on the geographic location of that
voting residence if it is only identified by route or box;
(f) The last address at which he or she was registered to vote in
this state;
(g) A declaration that he or she is a citizen of the United States;
and
(h) Any other information, other than an applicant's social
security number, that the secretary of state determines is necessary to
establish the identity of the applicant and to prevent duplicate or
fraudulent voter registrations)) information required by RCW 29.07.070
(as recodified by this act).
(3) ((The following warning shall appear in a conspicuous place on
the voter registration form:

"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, or by
a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both imprisonment and fine."

(4) The applicant shall sign a portion of the form that can be used
as an initiative signature card for the verification of petition
signatures by the secretary of state and shall sign and attest to the
following oath:

"I declare that the facts on this voter registration form are true.
I am a citizen of the United States, I am not presently denied my civil
rights as a result of being convicted of a felony, I will have lived in
Washington at this address for thirty days before the next election at
which I vote, and I will be at least eighteen years old when I vote."

(5))) The driver licensing agent shall record that the applicant
has requested to register to vote or transfer a voter registration.

Sec. 226 RCW 29.07.270 and 1994 c 57 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
DUTIES OF SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING, COUNTY
AUDITORS -- ADDRESS CHANGES. (1) The secretary of state shall provide
for the voter registration forms submitted under RCW 29.07.260 to be
collected from each driver's licensing facility within five days of
their completion.
(2) The department of licensing shall produce and transmit to the
secretary of state a machine-readable file containing the following
information from the records of each individual who requested a voter
registration or transfer at a driver's license facility during each
period for which forms are transmitted under subsection (1) of this
section: The name, address, date of birth, ((and sex)) gender of the
applicant ((and)), the driver's license number, the date on which the
application for voter registration or transfer was submitted, and the
location of the office at which the application was submitted.
(3) ((The department of licensing shall provide information on all
persons changing their address on change of address forms submitted to
the department unless the voter has indicated that the address change
is not for voting purposes. This information will be transmitted to
the secretary of state each week in a machine-readable file containing
the following information on persons changing their address: The name,
address, date of birth, and sex of the applicant, the applicant's
driver's license number, the applicant's former address, the county
code for the applicant's former address, and the date that the request
for address change was received.
(4) The secretary of state shall forward this information to the
appropriate county each week. When the information indicates that the
voter has moved within the county, the county auditor shall use the
change of address information to transfer the voter's registration and
send the voter an acknowledgement notice of the transfer. If the
information indicates that the new address is outside the voter's
original county, the county auditor shall send the voter a registration
by mail form at the voter's new address and advise the voter of the
need to reregister in the new county. The auditor shall then place the
voter on inactive status)) The voter registration forms from the
driver's licensing facilities must be forwarded to the county in which
the applicant has registered to vote no later than ten days after the
date on which the forms were to be collected.
(4) For a voter registration application where the address for
voting purposes is different from the address in the machine-readable
file received from the department of licensing, the secretary of state
shall amend the record of that application in the machine-readable file
to reflect the county in which the applicant has registered to vote.
(5) The secretary of state shall sort the records in the machine-readable file according to the county in which the applicant registered
to vote and produce a file of voter registration transactions for each
county. The records of each county may be transmitted on or through
whatever medium the county auditor determines will best facilitate the
incorporation of these records into the existing voter registration
files of that county.
(6) The secretary of state shall produce a list of voter
registration transactions for each county and transmit a copy of this
list to that county with each file of voter registration transactions
no later than ten days after the date on which that information was to
be transmitted under subsection (1) of this section.
(7) If a registrant has indicated on the voter registration
application form that he or she is registered to vote in another county
in Washington but has also provided an address within the auditor's
county that is for voter registration purposes, the auditor shall send,
on behalf of the registrant, a registration cancellation notice to the
auditor of that other county and the auditor receiving the notice shall
cancel the registrant's voter registration in that other county. If
the registrant has indicated on the form that he or she is registered
to vote within the county but has provided a new address within the
county that is for voter registration purposes, the auditor shall
transfer the voter's registration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 ADDRESS CHANGES AT THE DEPARTMENT OF
LICENSING. (1) The department of licensing shall provide information
on all persons changing their address on change of address forms
submitted to the department unless the voter has indicated that the
address change is not for voting purposes. This information will be
transmitted to the secretary of state each week in a machine-readable
file containing the following information on persons changing their
address: The name, address, date of birth, gender of the applicant,
the applicant's driver's license number, the applicant's former
address, the county code for the applicant's former address, and the
date that the request for address change was received.
(2) The secretary of state shall forward this information to the
appropriate county each week. When the information indicates that the
voter has moved within the county, the county auditor shall use the
change of address information to transfer the voter's registration and
send the voter an acknowledgement notice of the transfer. If the
information indicates that the new address is outside the voter's
original county, the county auditor shall send the voter a registration
by mail form at the voter's new address and advise the voter of the
need to reregister in the new county. The auditor shall then place the
voter on inactive status.

Subpart 2.5
Transfers and Name Changes
Sec. 228 RCW 29.10.020 and 1994 c 57 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
ADDRESS CHANGE WITHIN COUNTY -- TRANSFER BY TELEPHONE. To maintain
a valid voter registration, a registered voter who changes his or her
residence from one address to another within the same county shall
transfer his or her registration to the new address in one of the
following ways: (1) Sending to the county auditor a signed request
stating the voter's present address and the address from which the
voter was last registered; (2) appearing in person before the auditor
and signing such a request; (3) transferring the registration in the
manner provided by RCW 29.10.170; or (4) telephoning the county auditor
to transfer the registration. The telephone call transferring a
registration by telephone must be received by the auditor before the
precinct registration files are closed to new registrations for the
next primary or special or general election in which the voter
participates.
((The secretary of state may adopt rules facilitating the transfer
of a registration by telephone authorized by this section.))

Sec. 229 RCW 29.10.040 and 1999 c 100 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
REREGISTRATION ON TRANSFER TO ANOTHER COUNTY. A registered voter
who changes his or her residence from one county to another county,
shall be required to register anew. The voter shall sign an
authorization to cancel his or her ((present)) current registration.
An authorization to cancel a voter's registration must be forwarded
promptly to the county auditor of the county in which the voter was
previously registered. The county auditor of the county where the
previous registration was made shall cancel the registration of the
voter if it appears that the signatures in the registration record and
on the cancellation authorization form were made by the same person.

Sec. 230 RCW 29.10.170 and 1991 c 81 s 28 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
TRANSFER ON ELECTION DAY. (1) A person who is registered to vote
in this state may transfer his or her voter registration on the day of
a special or general election or primary under the following
procedures:
(a) The voter may complete, at the polling place, a registration
transfer form designed by the secretary of state and supplied by the
county auditor; or
(b) The voter may write in his or her new residential address in
the precinct list of registered voters.
The county auditor shall determine which of these two procedures
are to be used in the county or may determine that both procedures are
to be available to voters for use in the county.
(2) A voter who transfers his or her registration in the manner
authorized by this section shall vote in the precinct in which he or
she was previously registered.
(3) The auditor shall, within ninety days, mail to each voter who
has transferred a registration under this section a notice of his or
her current precinct and polling place.

Sec. 231 RCW 29.10.051 and 1994 c 57 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
VOTER NAME CHANGE. To maintain a valid voter registration, a
person who changes his or her name shall notify the county auditor
regarding the name change in one of the following ways: (1) By sending
the auditor a notice clearly identifying the name under which he or she
is registered to vote, the voter's new name, and the voter's residence.
Such a notice must be signed by the voter using both this former name
and the voter's new name; (2) by appearing in person before the auditor
or a registration assistant and signing such a change-of-name notice;
(3) by signing such a change-of-name notice at the voter's precinct
polling place on the day of a primary or special or general election;
(4) by properly executing a name change on a mail-in registration
application or a prescribed state agency application.
A properly registered voter who files a change-of-name notice at
the voter's precinct polling place during a primary or election and who
desires to vote at that primary or election shall sign the poll book
using the voter's former and new names in the same manner as is
required for the change-of-name notice.
((The secretary of state may adopt rules facilitating the
implementation of this section.))

Subpart 2.6
Cancellations
Sec. 232 RCW 29.10.090 and 1999 c 100 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
CANCELLATION FOR DEATH. In addition to case-by-case maintenance
under RCW 29.10.071 and 29.10.075 and the general program of
maintenance of voter registration lists under RCW 29.10.180, deceased
voters will be canceled from voter registration lists as follows:
(1) Every month, the registrar of vital statistics of the state
shall prepare a separate list of persons who resided in each county,
for whom a death certificate was transmitted to the registrar and was
not included on a previous list, and shall supply the appropriate list
to each county auditor.
A county auditor shall compare this list with the registration
records and cancel the registrations of deceased voters within at least
forty-five days before the next primary or election held in the county
after the auditor receives the list.
(2) In addition, the county auditor may also use newspaper obituary
articles as a source of information in order to cancel a voter's
registration. The auditor must verify the identity of the voter by
matching the voter's date of birth or an address. The auditor shall
record the date and source of the obituary in the cancellation records.
(3) In addition, any registered voter may sign a statement, subject
to the penalties of perjury, to the effect that to his or her personal
knowledge or belief another registered voter is deceased. This
statement may be filed with the county auditor. Upon the receipt of
such signed statement, the county auditor shall cancel the registration
records concerned and so notify the secretary of state. ((Upon receipt
of such notice, the secretary of state shall in turn cancel his or her
copy of said registration record.
The secretary of state as chief elections officer shall cause such
form to be designed to carry out the provisions of this section. The
county auditors shall have such forms available for public use.
Further, each such public officer having jurisdiction of an election
shall make available a reasonable supply of such forms for the use of
the precinct election officers at each polling place on the day of an
election.))

Sec. 233 RCW 29.10.097 and 1994 c 57 s 42 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CANCELLATION FOR CONVICTION OF FELONY. Upon receiving official
notice of a person's conviction of a felony in either state or federal
court, if the convicted person is a registered voter in the county, the
county auditor shall cancel the defendant's voter registration.

Sec. 234 RCW 29.10.100 and 1999 c 298 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
WEEKLY REPORT OF CANCELLATIONS AND NAME CHANGES. Once each week
after the cancellation of the registration of any voter or the change
of name of a voter, each county auditor shall certify all cancellations
or name changes to the secretary of state. The certificate shall set
forth the name of each voter whose registration has been canceled or
whose name was changed, and the county, city or town, and precinct in
which the voter was registered. A county may be exempted from this
requirement by entering into an interlocal agreement with the secretary
of state.

Sec. 235 RCW 29.10.110 and 1991 c 81 s 26 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RECORD OF CANCELLATIONS. Every county auditor shall carefully
preserve in a separate file or list the registration records of persons
whose voter registrations have been canceled as authorized under this
title. The files or lists shall be kept in the manner prescribed by
rule by the secretary of state. Information from such canceled
registration records is available for public inspection and copying to
the same extent established by RCW 29.07.130 for other voter
registration information.
The county auditor may destroy the voter registration information
and records of any person whose voter registration has been canceled
for a period of two years or more.

Subpart 2.7
List Maintenance
Sec. 236 RCW 29.10.180 and 1999 c 100 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
GENERAL PROGRAM. In addition to the case-by-case maintenance
required under RCW 29.10.071 and 29.10.075 and the canceling of
registrations under RCW 29.10.090, the county auditor shall establish
a general program of voter registration list maintenance. This program
must be a thorough review that is applied uniformly throughout the
county and must be nondiscriminatory in its application. Any program
established must be completed at least once every two years and not
later than ninety days before the date of a primary or general election
for federal office. The county may fulfill its obligations under this
section in one of the following ways:
(1) The county auditor may enter into one or more contracts with
the United States postal service, or its licensee, which permit the
auditor to use postal service change-of-address information. If the
auditor receives change of address information from the United States
postal service that indicates that a voter has changed his or her
residence address within the county, the auditor shall transfer the
registration of that voter and send a confirmation notice informing the
voter of the transfer to the new address. If the auditor receives
postal change of address information indicating that the voter has
moved out of the county, the auditor shall send a confirmation notice
to the voter and advise the voter of the need to reregister in the new
county. The auditor shall place the voter's registration on inactive
status;
(2) A direct, nonforwardable, nonprofit or first-class mailing to
every registered voter within the county bearing the postal endorsement
"Return Service Requested." If address correction information for a
voter is received by the county auditor after this mailing, the auditor
shall place that voter on inactive status and shall send to the voter
a confirmation notice;
(3) Any other method approved by the secretary of state.

Sec. 237 RCW 29.10.185 and 2001 c 41 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
DUAL REGISTRATION OR VOTING DETECTION. In addition to the case-by-case cancellation procedure required in RCW 29.10.040, the county
auditor, in conjunction with the office of the secretary of state,
shall participate in an annual list maintenance program designed to
detect persons registered in more than one county or voting in more
than one county in an election. This program must be applied uniformly
throughout the county and must be nondiscriminatory in its application.
The program must be completed not later than thirty days before the
date of a primary or general election.
The office of the secretary of state shall cause to be created a
list of registered voters with the same date of birth and similar names
who appear on two or more county lists of registered voters. The
office of the secretary of state shall forward this list to each county
auditor so that they may properly cancel the previous registration of
voters who have subsequently registered in a different county. The
county auditor of the county where the previous registration was made
shall cancel the registration of the voter if it appears that the
signatures in the registration and the signature provided to the new
county on the voter's new registration were made by the same person.
((The office of the secretary of state shall adopt rules to facilitate
this process.))
If a voter is suspected of voting in two or more counties in an
election, the county auditors in each county shall cooperate without
delay to determine the voter's county of residence. The county auditor
of the county of residence of the voter suspected of voting in two or
more counties shall take action under RCW 29.85.245 without delay.

Sec. 238 RCW 29.10.015 and 1994 c 57 s 34 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
"ACTIVE," "INACTIVE" REGISTERED VOTERS. Registered voters are
divided into two categories, "active" and "inactive." All registered
voters are classified as active, unless assigned to inactive status by
the county auditor.

Sec. 239 RCW 29.10.071 and 1994 c 57 s 38 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ASSIGNMENT OF VOTER TO INACTIVE STATUS -- CONFIRMATION NOTICE. (1)
A county auditor shall assign a registered voter to inactive status and
shall send the voter a confirmation notice if any of the following
documents are returned by the postal service as undeliverable:
(a) An acknowledgement of registration;
(b) An acknowledgement of transfer to a new address;
(c) A vote-by-mail ballot, absentee ballot, or application for a
ballot;
(d) Notification to a voter after precinct reassignment;
(e) Notification to serve on jury duty; or
(f) Any other document other than a confirmation notice, required
by statute, to be mailed by the county auditor to the voter.
(2) A county auditor shall also assign a registered voter to
inactive status and shall send the voter a confirmation notice:
(a) Whenever change of address information received from the
department of licensing under RCW 29.07.270, or by any other agency
designated to provide voter registration services under RCW 29.07.420,
indicates that the voter has moved to an address outside the county; or
(b) If the auditor receives postal change of address information
under RCW 29.10.180, indicating that the voter has moved out of the
county.

Sec. 240 RCW 29.10.220 and 1994 c 57 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
VOTING BY INACTIVE OR CANCELED VOTERS. (1) A voter whose
registration has been made inactive under this chapter and who offers
to vote at an ensuing election before two federal elections have been
held ((shall)) must be allowed to vote a regular ballot and the voter's
registration restored to active status.
(2) A voter whose registration has been properly canceled under
this chapter shall vote a ((special)) provisional ballot. The voter
shall mark the ((special)) provisional ballot in secrecy, the ballot
((shall be)) placed in a security envelope, the security envelope
placed in a ((special)) provisional ballot envelope, and the reasons
for the use of the ((special)) provisional ballot noted.
(3) Upon receipt of such a voted ((special)) provisional ballot the
auditor shall investigate the circumstances surrounding the original
cancellation. If he or she determines that the cancellation was in
error, the voter's registration ((shall)) must be immediately
reinstated, and the voter's ((special)) provisional ballot ((shall))
must be counted. If the original cancellation was not in error, the
voter ((shall)) must be afforded the opportunity to reregister at his
or her correct address, and the voter's ((special)) provisional ballot
((shall)) must not be counted.

Sec. 241 RCW 29.10.075 and 1994 c 57 s 39 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RETURN OF INACTIVE VOTER TO ACTIVE STATUS -- CANCELLATION OF
REGISTRATION. The county auditor shall return an inactive voter to
active voter status if, during the period beginning on the date the
voter was assigned to inactive status and ending on the day of the
second general election for federal office that occurs after the date
that the voter was sent a confirmation notice, the voter: Notifies the
auditor of a change of address within the county; responds to a
confirmation notice with information that the voter continues to reside
at the registration address; votes or attempts to vote in a primary or
a special or general election and resides within the county; or signs
any petition authorized by statute for which the signatures are
required by law to be verified by the county auditor. If the inactive
voter fails to provide such a notice or take such an action within that
period, the auditor shall cancel the person's voter registration.

Sec. 242 RCW 29.10.200 and 1994 c 57 s 45 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CONFIRMATION NOTICES -- FORM, CONTENTS. Confirmation notices must be
on a form prescribed by, or approved by, the secretary of state and
must request that the voter confirm that he or she continues to reside
at the address of record and desires to continue to use that address
for voting purposes. The notice must inform the voter that if the
voter does not respond to the notice and does not vote in either of the
next two federal elections, his or her voter registration will be
canceled.

Sec. 243 RCW 29.10.210 and 1994 c 57 s 46 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CONFIRMATION NOTICE -- RESPONSE, AUDITOR'S ACTION. If the response
to the confirmation notice provides the county auditor with the
information indicating that the voter has moved within the county, the
auditor shall transfer the voter's registration. If the response
indicates that the voter has left the county, the auditor shall cancel
the voter's registration.

Sec. 244 RCW 29.10.230 and 1999 c 100 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
ELECTRONIC FILE FORMAT. The secretary of state shall create a
standard electronic file format (state transfer form) to be used for
the transfer of voter registration information between county auditors
and the office of the secretary of state. The format must be
prescribed by rule and contain at least the following information:
Voter name, address, date of birth, date of registration, mailing
address, legislative and congressional district, and digitized
signature image. Each county shall program its voter registration
system to convert this data from the county's storage format into the
state transfer format. ((Every county shall complete this work by
January 1, 2000. Each county may bill reasonable programming costs
incurred by it to the office of the secretary of state by June 1,
2000.))

Sec. 245 RCW 29.04.250 and 2002 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
VOTER REGISTRATION DATA BASE. (1) The office of the secretary of
state shall work in conjunction with the county auditors of the state
of Washington to initiate the creation of a statewide voter
registration data base. The secretary of state shall identify a group
of voter registration experts whose responsibility will be to work on
a design for the voter registration data base system. ((The secretary
of state shall report back the findings of this group to the
legislature no later than February 1, 2003.))
(2) Among the intended goals the voter registration data base must
be designed to accomplish at a minimum, are the following:
(a) Identify duplicate voter registrations;
(b) Identify suspected duplicate voters;
(c) Screen against the department of corrections data base to aid
in the cancellation of voter registration of felons;
(d) Provide up-to-date signatures of voters for the purposes of
initiative signature checking;
(e) Provide for a comparison between the voter registration data
base and the department of licensing change of address data base;
(f) Provide online access for county auditors with the goal of real
time duplicate checking and update capabilities, if sufficient funds
are available;
(g) Provide for the cancellation of voter registration for persons
who have moved to other states and surrendered their Washington state
drivers' licenses;
(h) Ensure that each county shall maintain legal control of the
registration records for that county.

Subpart 2.8
Public Access to Registration Records
Sec. 246 RCW 29.07.130 and 1994 c 57 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
REGISTRATION RECORDS -- ORIGINALS AND AUTOMATED FILES -- PUBLIC
ACCESS. (1) ((The cards required by RCW 29.07.090 shall be kept on
file in the office of the secretary of state in such manner as will be
most convenient for, and for the sole purpose of, checking initiative
and referendum petitions. The secretary may maintain an automated file
of voter registration information for any county or counties in lieu of
filing or maintaining these voter registration cards if the automated
file includes all of the information from the cards including, but not
limited to, a retrievable facsimile of the signature of each voter of
that county or counties. Such an automated file may be used only for
the purpose authorized for the use of the cards.
(2))) The county auditor shall have custody of the voter
registration records for each county. The original voter registration
form((, as established by RCW 29.07.070, shall)) must be filed
((alphabetically)) without regard to precinct and ((shall be)) is
considered confidential and unavailable for public inspection and
copying. An automated file of all registered voters ((shall)) must be
maintained pursuant to RCW 29.07.220. An auditor may maintain the
automated file in lieu of filing or maintaining the original voter
registration forms if the automated file includes all of the
information from the original voter registration forms including, but
not limited to, a retrievable facsimile of each voter's signature.
(((3))) (2) The following information contained in voter
registration records or files regarding a voter or a group of voters is
available for public inspection and copying: The voter's name, gender,
voting record, date of registration, and registration number. The
address and political jurisdiction of a registered voter ((or addresses
of a group of voters)) are available for public inspection and copying
except ((to the extent that the address of a particular voter is not so
available under RCW 42.17.310(1)(bb). The political jurisdictions
within which a voter or group of voters reside are also available for
public inspection and copying except that the political jurisdictions
within which a particular voter resides are not available for such
inspection and copying if the address of the voter is not so available
under RCW 42.17.310(1)(bb))) as provided by chapter 40.24 RCW. No
other information from voter registration records or files is available
for public inspection or copying.

Sec. 247 RCW 29.04.100 and 1994 c 57 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
REGISTRATION, VOTING RECORDS -- AS PUBLIC RECORDS -- INFORMATION
FURNISHED -- RESTRICTIONS, CONFIDENTIALITY. (1) In the case of voter
registration records received through the department of licensing, the
identity of the office at which any particular individual registered to
vote is not available for public inspection and shall not be disclosed
to the public. In the case of voter registration records received
through an agency designated under RCW 29.07.420, the identity of the
agency at which any particular individual registered to vote is not
available for public inspection and shall not be disclosed to the
public. Any record of a particular individual's choice not to register
to vote at an office of the department of licensing or a state agency
designated under RCW 29.07.420 is not available for public inspection
and any information regarding such a choice by a particular individual
shall not be disclosed to the public.
(2) All poll books or current lists of registered voters, except
original voter registration forms or their images, shall be public
records and be made available for inspection under such reasonable
rules and regulations as the county auditor may prescribe. The county
auditor shall promptly furnish current lists or mailing labels of
registered voters in his or her possession, at actual reproduction
cost, to any person requesting such information((: PROVIDED, That
such)). The lists and labels shall not be used for the purpose of
mailing or delivering any advertisement or offer for any property,
establishment, organization, product, or service or for the purpose of
mailing or delivering any solicitation for money, services, or anything
of value((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such)). However, the lists and
labels may be used for any political purpose.

Sec. 248 RCW 29.04.110 and 1994 c 57 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
REGISTRATION, VOTING -- FURNISHING DATA UPON REQUEST -- COST -- USE
RESTRICTED. Except original voter registration forms or their images,
a reproduction of any form of data storage, in the custody of the
county auditor, including poll books and precinct lists of registered
voters, magnetic tapes or discs, punched cards, and any other form of
storage of such books and lists, shall at the written request of any
person be furnished to him or her by the county auditor pursuant to
such reasonable rules and regulations as the county auditor may
prescribe, and at a cost equal to the county's actual cost in
reproducing such form of data storage. Any data contained in a form of
storage furnished under this section shall not be used for the purpose
of mailing or delivering any advertisement or offer for any property,
establishment, organization, product or service or for the purpose of
mailing or delivering any solicitation for money, services or anything
of value((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such)). However, the data may be
used for any political purpose. Whenever the county auditor furnishes
any form of data storage under this section, he or she shall also
furnish the person receiving the same with a copy of RCW 29.04.120.

Sec. 249 RCW 29.04.120 and 1999 c 298 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
VIOLATIONS OF RESTRICTED USE OF REGISTERED VOTER DATA -- PENALTIES--LIABILITIES. (1) Any person who uses registered voter data furnished
under RCW 29.04.100 or 29.04.110 for the purpose of mailing or
delivering any advertisement or offer for any property, establishment,
organization, product, or service or for the purpose of mailing or
delivering any solicitation for money, services, or anything of value
((shall be)) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in a
state correctional facility for a period of not more than five years or
a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars or both such fine and
imprisonment, and ((shall be)) is liable to each person provided such
advertisement or solicitation, without the person's consent, for the
nuisance value of such person having to dispose of it, which value is
herein established at five dollars for each item mailed or delivered to
the person's residence((: PROVIDED, That any)). However, a person who
mails or delivers any advertisement, offer, or solicitation for a
political purpose ((shall)) is not ((be)) liable under this
section((,)) unless the person is liable under subsection (2) of this
section. For purposes of this subsection, two or more attached papers
or sheets or two or more papers ((which)) that are enclosed in the same
envelope or container or are folded together ((shall be deemed to
constitute)) are one item. Merely having a mailbox or other receptacle
for mail on or near the person's residence ((shall)) is not ((be any))
an indication that ((such)) the person consented to receive the
advertisement or solicitation. A class action may be brought to
recover damages under this section, and the court may award a
reasonable attorney's fee to any party recovering damages under this
section.
(2) ((It shall be the responsibility of)) Each person furnished
data under RCW 29.04.100 or 29.04.110 ((to)) shall take reasonable
precautions designed to assure that the data is not used for the
purpose of mailing or delivering any advertisement or offer for any
property, establishment, organization, product, or service or for the
purpose of mailing or delivering any solicitation for money, services,
or anything of value((: PROVIDED, That such)). However, the data may
be used for any political purpose. Where failure to exercise due care
in carrying out this responsibility results in the data being used for
such purposes, then such person ((shall be)) is jointly and severally
liable for damages under ((the provisions of)) subsection (1) of this
section along with any other person liable under subsection (1) of this
section for the misuse of such data.

Sec. 250 RCW 29.04.150 and 1993 c 441 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
COMPUTER FILE OF REGISTERED VOTERS -- COUNTY RECORDS TO SECRETARY OF
STATE -- REIMBURSEMENT. (1) No later than June 15th or November 15th,
any political party organization or any other individual may request in
writing from the secretary of state to receive a copy of the subsequent
statewide computer file of registered voters compiled under subsection
(2) of this section. At the time it makes this request, the political
party or individual shall deposit sufficient funds with the secretary
of state to pay for the cost of assembling, compiling, and distributing
the computer file of registered voters and shall agree to the statutory
restrictions regarding the commercial use of this data.
(2) Not earlier than January 1st or July 1st subsequent to the
receipt of a request and deposit under subsection (1) of this section,
each county auditor shall provide to the secretary of state, or a data
processing agency designated by the secretary of state, a duplicate
computer tape or data file of the records of the registered voters in
that county, containing the information specified in RCW 29.07.220.
The secretary of state shall reimburse each county for the actual cost
of reproduction and mailing of the duplicate computer tape or data
file.

Sec. 251 RCW 29.04.160 and 1995 c 135 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
COMPUTER FILE -- DUPLICATE COPY -- RESTRICTIONS AND PENALTIES. As soon
as any or all of the voter registration data from the counties has been
received under RCW 29.04.150 and processed, the secretary of state
shall provide a duplicate copy of this data to the political party
organization or other individual making the request, at cost, shall
provide a duplicate copy of the master statewide computer tape or data
file of registered voters to the statute law committee without cost,
and shall provide a duplicate copy of the master statewide computer
tape or electronic data file of registered voters to the department of
information services for purposes of creating the jury source list
without cost. Restrictions as to the commercial use of the information
on the statewide computer tape or data file of registered voters, and
penalties for its misuse, shall be the same as provided in RCW
29.04.110 and 29.04.120 ((as now existing or hereafter amended)).

Sec. 252 RCW 29.04.240 and 1994 c 57 s 7 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RECORDS CONCERNING ACCURACY AND CURRENCY OF VOTERS LISTS. Each
county auditor shall maintain for at least two years and shall make
available for public inspection and copying all records concerning the
implementation of programs and activities conducted for the purpose of
insuring the accuracy and currency of official lists of eligible
voters. These records must include lists of the names and addresses of
all persons to whom notices are sent and information concerning whether
or not each person has responded to the notices. These records must
contain lists of all persons removed from the list of eligible voters
and the reasons why the voters were removed.

Subpart 2.9
Challenges
Sec. 253 RCW 29.10.125 and 2001 c 41 s 9 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CHALLENGE OF REGISTRATION -- INITIATION. Registration of a person as
a voter is presumptive evidence of his or her right to vote at any
primary or election, general or special. A person's right to vote may
be challenged at the polls only by a precinct judge or inspector. A
challenge may be made only upon the belief or knowledge of the
challenging officer that the voter is unqualified. The challenge must
be supported by evidence or testimony given to the county canvassing
board under RCW 29.10.127 and may not be based on unsupported
allegations or allegations by anonymous third parties. The identity of
the challenger, and any third person involved in the challenge, shall
be public record and shall be announced at the time the challenge is
made.
Challenges initiated by a registered voter must be filed not later
than the day before any primary or election, general or special, at the
office of the appropriate county auditor. A challenged voter may
properly transfer or reregister until three days before the primary or
election, general or special, by applying personally to the county
auditor. Challenges may also be initiated by the office of the county
prosecuting attorney and must be filed in the same manner as challenges
initiated by a registered voter.

Sec. 254 RCW 29.10.127 and 1987 c 288 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
CHALLENGE -- VOTING BY PERSON CHALLENGED -- BURDEN OF PROOF,
PROCEDURES. When the right of a person has been challenged under RCW
29.10.125 or 29.10.130(2), the challenged person shall be permitted to
vote a ballot which shall be placed in a sealed envelope separate from
other voted ballots. In precincts where voting machines are used, any
person whose right to vote is challenged under RCW 29.10.125 or
29.10.130(2) shall be furnished a paper ballot, which shall be placed
in a sealed envelope after being marked. Included with the challenged
ballot shall be (1) an affidavit filed under RCW 29.10.130 challenging
the person's right to vote or (2) an affidavit signed by the precinct
election officer and any third party involved in the officer's
challenge and stating the reasons the voter is being challenged. The
sealed ballots of challenged voters shall be transmitted at the close
of the election to the canvassing board or other authority charged by
law with canvassing the returns of the particular primary or election.
The county auditor shall notify the challenger and the challenged
voter, by certified mail, of the time and place at which the county
canvassing board will meet to rule on challenged ballots. If the
challenge is made by a precinct election officer under RCW 29.10.125,
the officer must appear in person before the board unless he or she has
received written authorization from the canvassing board to submit an
affidavit supporting the challenge. If the challenging officer has
based his or her challenge upon evidence provided by a third party,
that third party must appear with the challenging officer before the
canvassing board, unless he or she has received written authorization
from the canvassing board to submit an affidavit supporting the
challenge. If the challenge is filed under RCW 29.10.130, the
challenger must either appear in person before the board or submit an
affidavit supporting the challenge. The challenging party must prove
to the canvassing board by clear and convincing evidence that the
challenged voter's registration is improper. If the challenging party
fails to meet this burden, the challenged ballot shall be accepted as
valid and counted. The canvassing board shall give the challenged
voter the opportunity to present testimony, either in person or by
affidavit, and evidence to the canvassing board before making their
determination. All challenged ballots must be determined no later than
the time of canvassing for the particular primary or election. The
decision of the canvassing board or other authority charged by law with
canvassing the returns shall be final. Challenges of absentee ballots
shall be determined according to RCW ((29.36.100)) 29.36.350 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec. 255 RCW 29.10.130 and 1987 c 288 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CHALLENGE -- AFFIDAVIT -- ADMINISTRATION, NOTICE OF CHALLENGE. (1) Any
registered voter may request that the registration of another voter be
canceled if he or she believes that the voter does not meet the
requirements of Article VI, section 1 of the state Constitution or that
voter no longer maintains a legal voting residence at the address shown
on his or her registration record. The challenger shall file with the
county auditor a signed affidavit subject to the penalties of perjury,
to the effect that to his or her personal knowledge and belief another
registered voter does not actually reside at the address as given on
his or her registration record or is otherwise not a qualified voter
and that the voter in question is not protected by the provisions of
Article VI, section 4, of the Constitution of the state of Washington.
The person filing the challenge must furnish the address at which the
challenged voter actually resides.
(2) Any such challenge of a voter's registration and right to vote
made less than thirty days before a primary or election, special or
general, shall be administered under RCW 29.10.127. The county auditor
shall notify the challenged voter and the precinct election officers in
the voter's precinct that a challenge has been filed, provide the name
of the challenger, and instruct both the precinct election officers and
the voter that, in the event the challenged voter desires to vote at
the ensuing primary or election, a challenged ballot will be provided.
The voter shall also be informed that the status of his or her
registration and the disposition of any challenged ballot will be
determined by the county canvassing board in the manner provided by RCW
29.10.127. If the challenged voter does not vote at the ensuing
primary or election, the challenge shall be processed in the same
manner as challenges made more than thirty days prior to the primary or
election under RCW 29.10.140.

Sec. 256 RCW 29.10.140 and 1987 c 288 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CHALLENGE -- PROCEDURE BEFORE CANCELLATION. All challenges of voter
registration under RCW 29.10.130 made thirty days or more before a
primary or election, general or special, shall be delivered to the
appropriate county auditor who shall notify the challenged voter, by
certified mail, that his or her voter registration has been challenged.
The notification shall be mailed to the address at which the
challenged voter is registered, any address provided by the challenger
under RCW 29.10.130, and to any other address at which the individual
whose registration is being challenged is alleged to reside or at which
the county auditor would reasonably expect that individual to receive
notice of the challenge of his or her voter registration. Included in
the notification shall be a request that the challenged voter appear at
a hearing to be held within ten days of the mailing of the request, at
the place, day, and hour stated, in order to determine the validity of
his or her registration. The challenger shall be provided with a copy
of this notification and request. If either the challenger or the
challenged voter is unable to appear in person, he or she may file a
reply by means of an affidavit stating under oath the reasons he or she
believes the registration to be invalid or valid.
If both the challenger and the challenged voter file affidavits
instead of appearing in person, an evaluation of the affidavits by the
county auditor constitutes a hearing for the purposes of this section.
The county auditor shall hold a hearing at which time both parties
may present their facts and arguments. After reviewing the facts and
arguments, including any evidence submitted by either side, the county
auditor shall rule as to the validity or invalidity of the challenged
registration. His or her ruling is final subject only to a petition
for judicial review by the superior court under chapter 34.05 RCW. If
either party, or both parties, fail to appear at the meeting or fail to
file an affidavit, the county auditor shall determine the status of the
registration based on his or her evaluation of the available facts.

Sec. 257 RCW 29.10.150 and 1991 c 81 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
CHALLENGE OF REGISTRATION -- FORMS, AVAILABILITY. The secretary of
state as chief elections officer shall cause appropriate forms to be
designed to carry out the provisions of RCW 29.10.130 ((through
29.10.160)) and 29.10.140 (as recodified by this act). The county
auditors and ((registrars)) registration assistants shall have such
forms available. Further, a reasonable supply of such forms shall be
at each polling place on the day of a primary or election, general or
special.

PART 3
VOTING SYSTEMS
Sec. 301 RCW 29.33.020 and 1990 c 59 s 17 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
AUTHORITY FOR USE. At any primary or election in any county, votes
may be cast, registered, recorded, or counted by means of voting
systems that have been approved under RCW 29.33.041.

Sec. 302 RCW 29.33.041 and 1990 c 59 s 18 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
INSPECTION AND TEST BY SECRETARY OF STATE--REPORT. The secretary
of state shall inspect, evaluate, and publicly test all voting systems
or components of voting systems that are submitted for review under RCW
29.33.051. The secretary of state shall determine whether the voting
systems conform with all of the requirements of this title, the
applicable rules adopted in accordance with this title, and with
generally accepted safety requirements. The secretary of state shall
transmit a copy of the report of any examination under this section,
within thirty days after completing the examination, to the county
auditor of each county.

Sec. 303 RCW 29.33.051 and 1990 c 59 s 19 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
SUBMITTING SYSTEM OR COMPONENT FOR EXAMINATION. The manufacturer
or distributor of a voting system or component of a voting system may
submit that system or component to the secretary of state for
examination under RCW 29.33.041.

Sec. 304 RCW 29.33.061 and 1990 c 59 s 20 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
INDEPENDENT EVALUATION. (1) The secretary of state may rely on the
results of independent design, engineering, and performance evaluations
in the examination under RCW 29.33.041 if the source and scope of these
independent evaluations are specified by rule.
(2) The secretary of state may contract with experts in mechanical
or electrical engineering or data processing to assist in examining a
voting system or component. The manufacturer or distributor who has
submitted a voting system for testing under RCW 29.33.051 shall pay the
secretary of state a deposit to reimburse the cost of any contract for
consultation under this section and for any other unrecoverable costs
associated with the examination of a voting system or component by the
manufacturer or distributor who submitted the voting system or
component for examination.

Sec. 305 RCW 29.33.081 and 1990 c 59 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
APPROVAL REQUIRED--MODIFICATION. If voting systems or devices or
vote tallying systems are to be used for conducting a primary or
election, only those that have the approval of the secretary of state
or had been approved under this chapter or the former chapter 29.34 RCW
before March 22, 1982, may be used. Any modification, change, or
improvement to any voting system or component of a system that does not
impair its accuracy, efficiency, or capacity or extend its function,
may be made without reexamination or reapproval by the secretary of
state under RCW 29.33.041.

Sec. 306 RCW 29.33.130 and 1990 c 59 s 22 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RESPONSIBILITY FOR MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION. The county auditor
of a county in which voting systems are used is responsible for the
preparation, maintenance, and operation of those systems and may employ
and direct persons to perform some or all of these functions.

Sec. 307 RCW 29.33.145 and 1998 c 58 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ACCEPTANCE TEST. An agreement to purchase or lease a voting system
or a component of a voting system is subject to that system or
component passing an acceptance test sufficient to demonstrate that the
equipment is the same as that certified by the secretary of state and
that the equipment is operating correctly as delivered to the county.

Sec. 308 RCW 29.33.300 and 1990 c 59 s 26 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REQUIREMENTS OF VOTING DEVICES FOR APPROVAL. No voting device
shall be approved by the secretary of state unless it:
(1) Secures to the voter secrecy in the act of voting;
(2) Permits the voter to vote for any person for any office and
upon any measure that he or she has the right to vote for;
(3) Permits the voter to vote for all the candidates of one party
or in part for the candidates of one or more other parties;
(4) Correctly registers all votes cast for any and all persons and
for or against any and all measures;
(5) Provides that a vote for more than one candidate cannot be cast
by one single operation of the voting device or vote tally system
except when voting for president and vice president of the United
States; and
(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested, certified, and used in at least one other state or
election jurisdiction.

Sec. 309 RCW 29.33.310 and 1990 c 59 s 27 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
SINGLE DISTRICT AND PRECINCT ON VOTING DEVICES. The ballot on a
single voting device shall not contain the names of candidates for the
offices of United States representative, state senator, state
representative, county council, or county commissioner in more than one
district. In all general elections, primaries, and special elections,
in each polling place the voting devices containing ballots for
candidates from each congressional, legislative, or county council or
commissioner district shall be grouped together and physically
separated from those devices containing ballots for other districts.
Each voter shall be directed by the precinct election officers to the
correct group of voting devices.

Sec. 310 RCW 29.33.320 and 1990 c 59 s 28 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REQUIREMENTS OF VOTE TALLYING SYSTEMS FOR APPROVAL. The secretary
of state shall not approve a vote tallying system unless it:
(1) Correctly counts votes on ballots on which the proper number of
votes have been marked for any office or issue;
(2) Ignores votes marked for any office or issue where more than
the allowable number of votes have been marked, but correctly counts
the properly voted portions of the ballot;
(3) Accumulates a count of the specific number of ballots tallied
for each precinct, total votes by candidate for each office, and total
votes for and against each issue of the ballot in that precinct;
(4) Accommodates rotation of candidates' names on the ballot under
RCW 29.30.040;
(5) Produces precinct and cumulative totals in printed form; and
(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested, certified, and used in at least one other state or
election jurisdiction.

Sec. 311 RCW 29.33.330 and 1990 c 59 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
RECORD OF BALLOT FORMAT--DEVICES SEALED. In preparing a voting
device for a primary or election, a record shall be made of the ballot
format installed in each device and the precinct or portion of a
precinct for which that device has been prepared. Except where
provided by a rule adopted under RCW ((29.04.210)) 29.04.080 (as
recodified by this act), after being prepared for a primary or
election, each device shall be sealed with a uniquely numbered seal and
provided to the inspector of the appropriate polling place.

Sec. 312 RCW 29.33.340 and 1990 c 59 s 29 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ELECTION OFFICIALS--INSTRUCTION, COMPENSATION, REQUIREMENTS. (1)
Before each state primary or general election at which voting systems
are to be used, the county auditor shall instruct all precinct election
officers appointed under RCW 29.45.010, counting center personnel, and
political party observers designated under RCW 29.54.025 in the proper
conduct of their duties.
(2) The county auditor may waive instructional requirements for
precinct election officers, counting center personnel, and political
party observers who have previously received instruction and who have
served for a sufficient length of time to be fully qualified to perform
their duties. The county auditor shall keep a record of each person
who has received instruction and is qualified to serve at the
subsequent primary or election.
(3) As compensation for the time spent in receiving instruction,
each precinct election officer who qualifies and serves at the
subsequent primary or election shall receive an additional two hours
compensation, to be paid at the same time and in the same manner as
compensation is paid for services on the day of the primary or
election.
(4) Except for the appointment of a precinct election officer to
fill a vacancy under RCW 29.45.040, no inspector or judge may serve at
any primary or election at which voting systems are used unless he or
she has received the required instruction and is qualified to perform
his or her duties in connection with the voting devices. No person may
work in a counting center at a primary or election at which a vote
tallying system is used unless that person has received the required
instruction and is qualified to perform his or her duties in connection
with the handling and tallying of ballots for that primary or election.
No person may serve as a political party observer unless that person
has received the required instruction and is familiar with the
operation of the counting center and the vote tallying system and the
procedures to be employed to verify the accuracy of the programming for
that vote tallying system.

Sec. 313 RCW 29.33.350 and 1998 c 58 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
VOTE TALLYING SYSTEMS--PROGRAMMING TESTS. At least three days
before each state primary or general election, the office of the
secretary of state shall provide for the conduct of tests of the
programming for each vote tallying system to be used at that primary or
general election. The test must verify that the system will correctly
count the vote cast for all candidates and on all measures appearing on
the ballot at that primary or general election. ((The office of the
secretary of state shall adopt rules specifying the manner of
conducting these programming tests.)) The test shall verify the
capability of the vote tallying system to perform all of the functions
that can reasonably be expected to occur during conduct of that
particular primary or election. If any error is detected, the cause
shall be determined and corrected, and an errorless total shall be
produced before the primary or election.
Such tests shall be observed by at least one representative from
each major political party, if representatives have been appointed by
the respective major political parties and are present at the test, and
shall be open to candidates, the press, and the public. The county
auditor and any political party observers shall certify that the test
has been conducted in accordance with this section. Copies of this
certification shall be retained by the secretary of state and the
county auditor. All programming materials, test results, and test
ballots shall be securely sealed until the day of the primary or
general election.

Sec. 314 RCW 29.33.360 and 1998 c 58 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
OPERATING PROCEDURES. The secretary of state may publish
recommended procedures for the operation of the various vote tallying
systems that have been approved. These procedures allow the office of
the secretary of state to restrict or define the use of approved
systems in elections.

Sec. 315 RCW 29.04.200 and 1998 c 245 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
RECORDING REQUIREMENTS. (1) ((Beginning January 1, 1993,)) No
voting device or machine may be used in a county with a population of
seventy thousand or more to conduct a primary or general or special
election in this state unless it correctly records on a separate ballot
the votes cast by each elector for any person and for or against any
measure and such separate ballots are available for audit purposes
after such a primary or election.
(2) ((Beginning January 1, 1993,)) The secretary of state shall not
certify under this title any voting device or machine for use in
conducting a primary or general or special election in this state
unless the device or machine correctly records on a separate ballot the
votes cast by each elector for any person and for or against any
measure and such separate ballots are available for audit purposes
after such a primary or election.
(((3) Beginning January 1, 1993, a county with a population of less
than seventy thousand may use a voting machine or device for conducting
a primary or general or special election which does not record on a
separate ballot, available for audit purposes after the primary or
election, the votes cast by each elector for any person and for or
against any measure if:
(a) The device was certified under this title before January 1,
1993, for use in this state;
(b) The device otherwise satisfies the requirements of this title;
and
(c) Not more than twenty percent of the votes cast during any
primary or general or special election conducted after January 1, 1998,
in the county are cast using such a machine or device.
(4) The purpose of subsection (3) of this section is to permit less
populous counties to replace voting equipment in stages over several
years. These less populous counties are, nonetheless, encouraged to
secure as expeditiously as possible voting equipment which would
satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this section established
for more populous counties.))

PART 4
PRECINCT AND POLLING PLACE DETERMINATION AND ACCESSIBILITY
Sec. 401 RCW 29.57.010 and 1999 c 298 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
INTENT--DUTIES OF COUNTY AUDITORS. The intent of this chapter is
to require state and local election officials to designate and use
polling places in all elections and permanent registration locations
which are accessible to elderly and ((handicapped)) disabled persons.
County auditors shall:
(1) Make modifications such as installation of temporary ramps or
relocation of polling places within buildings, where appropriate;
(2) Designate new, accessible polling places to replace those that
are inaccessible; and
(3) Continue to use polling places and voter registration locations
which are accessible to elderly and ((handicapped)) disabled persons.

Sec. 402 RCW 29.57.090 and 1999 c 298 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
ALTERNATIVE POLLING PLACES OR PROCEDURES. The secretary of state
shall establish procedures to assure that, in any primary or election,
any ((handicapped)) disabled or elderly voter assigned to an
inaccessible polling place will, upon advance request of that voter,
either be permitted to vote at an alternative accessible polling place
not overly inconvenient to that voter or be provided with an
alternative means of casting a ballot on the day of the primary or
election. The county auditor shall make any accommodations in voting
procedures necessary to allow the use of alternative polling places by
elderly or ((handicapped)) disabled voters under this section.

Sec. 403 RCW 29.57.160 and 1999 c 298 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
COSTS FOR MODIFICATIONS--ALTERNATIVES--ELECTION COSTS. (1) County
auditors shall seek alternative polling places or other low-cost
alternatives including, but not limited to, procedural changes and
assistance from local disabled groups, service organizations, and other
private sources before incurring costs for modifications under this
chapter.
(2) The cost of those modifications to buildings or other
facilities, including signs designating ((handicapped)) disabled
accessible parking and entrances, that are necessary to permit the use
of those facilities for polling places under this chapter or any
procedures established under RCW 29.57.090 shall be treated as election
costs and prorated under RCW 29.13.045.

Sec. 404 RCW 29.04.040 and 1999 c 158 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
PRECINCTS--NUMBER OF VOTERS--DIVIDING, ALTERING, OR COMBINING--CREATING NEW PRECINCTS. (1) ((No paper ballot precinct may contain
more than three hundred active registered voters. The county
legislative authority may divide, alter, or combine precincts so that,
whenever practicable, over-populated precincts shall contain no more
than two hundred fifty active registered voters in anticipation of
future growth.
(2))) Precinct boundaries may be altered at any time as long as
sufficient time exists prior to a given election for the necessary
procedural steps to be honored. Except as permitted under subsection
(((5))) (4) of this section, no precinct boundaries may be changed
during the period starting on the thirtieth day prior to the first day
for candidates to file for the primary election and ending with the day
of the general election.
(((3))) (2) Precincts in which voting machines or electronic voting
devices are used may contain as many as nine hundred active registered
voters. The number of poll-site ballot counting devices at each
polling place is at the discretion of the auditor. The number of
devices must be adequate to meet the expected voter turnout.
(((4))) (3) On petition of twenty-five or more voters resident more
than ten miles from any polling site, the county legislative authority
shall establish a separate voting precinct therefor.
(((5))) (4) The county auditor shall temporarily adjust precinct
boundaries when a city or town annexes unincorporated territory to the
city or town, or whenever unincorporated territory is incorporated as
a city or town. The adjustment ((shall)) must be made as soon as
possible after the approval of the annexation or incorporation. The
temporary adjustment ((shall)) must be limited to the minimum changes
necessary to accommodate the addition of the territory to the city or
town, or to establish the eligible voters within the boundaries of the
new city or town, and ((shall)) remains in effect only until precinct
boundary modifications reflecting the annexation or incorporation are
adopted by the county legislative authority.
The county legislative authority may establish by ordinance a
limitation on the maximum number of active registered voters in each
precinct within its jurisdiction. The limitation may be different for
precincts based upon the method of voting used for such precincts and
the number may be less than the number established by law, but in no
case may the number exceed that authorized by law.
The county legislative authority of each county in the state
hereafter formed shall, at their first session, divide their respective
counties into election precincts ((with two hundred fifty active
registered voters or less)) and establish the boundaries of the
precincts. The county auditor shall thereupon designate the voting
place for each such precinct or whether the precinct is a vote by mail
precinct.
(((6))) (5) In determining the number of active registered voters
for the purposes of this section, persons who are ongoing absentee
voters under RCW ((29.36.013)) 29.36.240 (as recodified by this act)
shall not be counted. Nothing in this subsection may be construed as
altering the vote tallying requirements of RCW 29.62.090.

Sec. 405 RCW 29.04.050 and 1999 c 298 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
PRECINCTS--RESTRICTIONS ON PRECINCT BOUNDARIES--DESIGNATED BY
NUMBER. (1) Every voting precinct must be wholly within a single
congressional district, a single legislative district, ((and)) a single
district of a county legislative authority, and, if applicable, a
single city.
(2) Every voting precinct shall be composed, as nearly as
practicable, of contiguous and compact areas.
(3) Except as provided in this subsection, changes to the
boundaries of any precinct shall follow visible, physical features
delineated on the most current maps provided by the United States
census bureau. A change need not follow such visible, physical
features if (a) it is necessitated by an annexation or incorporation
and the proposed precinct boundary is identical to an exterior boundary
of the annexed or incorporated area which does not follow a visible,
physical feature; or (b) doing so would substantially impair election
administration in the involved area.
(4) After a change to precinct boundaries is adopted by the county
legislative authority, if the change does not follow visible physical
features, the county auditor shall send to the secretary of state ((a))
an electronic or paper copy of the ((legal)) description ((and)), a map
or maps of the changes, and((, if all or part of the changes do not
follow visible, physical features,)) a statement of the applicable
exception under subsection (3) of this section. For boundary changes
made pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section, the auditor shall
include a statement of the reasons why following visible, physical
features would have substantially impaired election administration.
(5) Every voting precinct within each county shall be designated by
number for the purpose of preparation of maps and the tabulation of
population for apportionment purposes. These precincts may be
identified with names or other numbers for other election purposes.
(6) After a change to precinct boundaries in a city or town, the
county auditor shall send one copy of the map or maps delineating the
new precinct boundaries within that city or town to the city or town
clerk.
(7) Precinct maps are public records and shall be available for
inspection by the public during normal office hours in the offices
where they are kept. Copies shall be made available to the public for
a fee necessary to cover the cost of reproduction.

Sec. 406 RCW 29.04.055 and 2001 c 241 s 22 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
COMBINING OR DIVIDING PRECINCTS, ELECTION BOARDS. At any special
election or primary, the county auditor may combine, unite, or divide
precincts and may combine or unite election boards for the purpose of
holding such election. At any general election, the county auditor may
combine or unite election boards for the purpose of holding such
election, but shall report all election returns by individual precinct.

Sec. 407 RCW 29.48.005 and 1965 c 9 s 29.48.005 are each amended
to read as follows:
POLLING PLACE--MAY BE LOCATED OUTSIDE PRECINCT. Polling places for
the various voting precincts may be located outside the boundaries of
the respective precincts, when the officers conducting the primary or
election shall deem it feasible((: PROVIDED, That)). However, such
polling places ((shall)) must be located within a reasonable distance
of their respective precincts. The purpose of this section is to
furnish adequate voting facilities at readily accessible and
identifiable locations, and nothing ((herein shall be construed as
affecting)) in this section affects the number, method of selection, or
duties of precinct election officers.

Sec. 408 RCW 29.48.007 and 1985 c 205 s 14 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
POLLING PLACE--USE OF COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY, OR SPECIAL DISTRICT
FACILITIES. The legislative authority of each county, municipality,
and special district shall, at the request of the county auditor, make
their facilities available for use as polling places for primaries,
special elections, and state general elections held within that county.
When, in the judgment of the county auditor, a facility of a county,
municipality, or special district would provide a location for a
polling place that would best satisfy the requirements of chapter 29.57
RCW, he or she shall notify the legislative authority of that county,
municipality, or district of the number of facilities needed for use as
polling places. Payment for polling places and any other conditions or
obligations regarding these polling places shall be provided for by
contract between the county auditor and the county, municipality, or
district.

Sec. 409 RCW 29.57.040 and 1979 ex.s. c 64 s 4 are each reenacted
to read as follows:
PUBLIC BUILDINGS USED AS POLLING PLACES--CONDITIONS. Each state
agency and entity of local government shall permit the use of any of
its buildings and the most suitable locations therein as polling places
when required by a county auditor to provide accessible places in each
precinct.

Sec. 410 RCW 29.57.070 and 1999 c 298 s 14 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
INACCESSIBLE POLLING PLACES--AUDITORS' LIST. No later than April
1st of each even-numbered year, each county auditor shall submit to the
secretary of state a list showing the number of polling places in the
county and specifying any that have been found inaccessible. The
auditor shall indicate the reasons for inaccessibility, and what
efforts have been made pursuant to this chapter to locate alternative
polling places or to make the existing facilities temporarily
accessible.
If a county auditor's list shows, for two consecutive reporting
periods, that no polling places have been found inaccessible, the
auditor need not submit further reports unless the secretary of state
specifically reinstates the requirement for that county. Notice of
reinstatement must be in writing and delivered at least sixty days
before the reporting date.

Sec. 411 RCW 29.57.100 and 1999 c 298 s 16 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
POLLING PLACES--ACCESSIBILITY REQUIRED, EXCEPTIONS. Each polling
place must be accessible unless:
(1) The county auditor has determined that it is inaccessible, that
no alternative accessible polling place is available, that no temporary
modification of that polling place or any alternative polling place is
possible, and that the county auditor has complied with the procedures
established under RCW 29.57.090; or
(2) The secretary of state determines that a state of emergency
exists that would otherwise interfere with the efficient administration
of the primary or election.

Sec. 412 RCW 29.57.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 64 s 5 are each reenacted
to read as follows:
REVIEW BY AND RECOMMENDATIONS OF DISABLED VOTERS. County auditors
shall, as feasible, solicit and use the assistance of disabled voters
in reviewing sites and recommending inexpensive remedies to improve
accessibility.

Sec. 413 RCW 29.57.150 and 1999 c 298 s 19 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
COUNTY AUDITORS--NOTICE OF ACCESSIBILITY. Each county auditor
shall include a notice of the accessibility of polling places in the
notice of election published under RCW 29.27.030 and 29.27.080.

PART 5
QUALIFICATIONS, TERMS, AND REQUIREMENTS FOR ELECTIVE OFFICESSubpart 5.1
General
Sec. 501 RCW 29.27.090 and 1965 c 9 s 29.27.090 are each amended
to read as follows:
PRESERVATION OF DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY. The secretary of
state((,)) and each county auditor ((of each county, and clerks of the
several municipal corporations)) shall preserve all ((certificates of
nomination)) declarations of candidacy filed in their respective
offices for six months. All ((certificates shall)) declarations of
candidacy must be open to public inspection ((under proper regulations
made by the officer with whom they are filed)).

Sec. 502 RCW 29.15.025 and 1999 c 298 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
QUALIFICATIONS FOR FILING, APPEARANCE ON BALLOT. (1) A person
filing a declaration ((and affidavit)) of candidacy for an office
shall, at the time of filing, be a registered voter and possess the
qualifications specified by law for persons who may be elected to the
office.
(2) Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a
temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or
freeholder, no person may file for more than one office.
(3) The name of a candidate for an office shall not appear on a
ballot for that office unless, except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and
3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration
((and affidavit)) of candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in
the geographic area represented by the office. For the purposes of
this section, each geographic area in which registered voters may cast
ballots for an office is represented by that office. If a person
elected to an office must be nominated from a district or similar
division of the geographic area represented by the office, the name of
a candidate for the office shall not appear on a primary ballot for
that office unless the candidate is, at the time the candidate's
declaration ((and affidavit)) of candidacy is filed, properly
registered to vote in that district or division. The officer with whom
declarations ((and affidavits)) of candidacy must be filed under this
title shall review each such declaration filed regarding compliance
with this subsection.
(((3))) (4) This section does not apply to the office of a member
of the United States Congress.

Sec. 503 RCW 29.13.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 14 are each amended
to read as follows:
LOCAL OFFICERS, BEGINNING OF TERMS--ORGANIZATION OF DISTRICT BOARDS
OF DIRECTORS. The term of every city, town, and district officer
elected to office on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in
November of the odd-numbered years ((shall)) begins in accordance with
RCW 29.04.170((: PROVIDED, That any)). However, a person elected to
less than a full term shall assume office as soon as the election
returns have been certified and he or she is qualified in accordance
with RCW 29.01.135.
Each board of directors of every district shall be organized at the
first meeting held after one or more newly elected directors take
office.

Sec. 504 RCW 29.04.170 and 1999 c 298 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
LOCAL ELECTED OFFICIALS, COMMENCEMENT OF TERM OF OFFICE--PURPOSE,
1979 EX.S. C 126. (1) The legislature finds that certain laws are in
conflict governing the ((election)) assumption of office of various
local officials. The purpose of ((chapter 126, Laws of 1979 ex.
sess.)) this section is to provide a common date for the assumption of
office for all the elected officials of counties, cities, towns, and
special purpose districts other than school districts where the
ownership of property is not a prerequisite of voting. A person
elected to the office of school director begins his or her term of
office at the first official meeting of the board of directors after
certification of the election results. It is also the purpose of
((chapter 126, Laws of 1979 ex. sess.)) this section to remove these
conflicts and delete old statutory language concerning such elections
which is no longer necessary.
(2) For elective offices of counties, cities, towns, and special
purpose districts other than school districts where the ownership of
property is not a prerequisite of voting, the term of incumbents
((shall)) ends and the term of successors ((shall)) begins after the
successor is elected and qualified, and the term ((shall)) commences
immediately after December 31st following the election, except as
follows:
(a) Where the term of office varies from this standard according to
statute; and
(b) If the election results have not been certified prior to
January 1st after the election, in which event the time of commencement
for the new term ((shall)) occurs when the successor becomes qualified
in accordance with RCW 29.01.135.
(3) For elective offices governed by this section, the oath of
office ((shall)) must be taken as the last step of qualification as
defined in RCW 29.01.135 but may be taken either:
(a) Up to ten days prior to the scheduled date of assuming office;
or
(b) At the last regular meeting of the governing body of the
applicable county, city, town, or special district held before the
winner is to assume office.

Subpart 5.2
Minor Party and Independent Candidate Nominating
Sec. 505 RCW 29.24.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
DEFINITIONS--"CONVENTION" AND "ELECTION JURISDICTION." A
"convention" for the purposes of this chapter, is an organized
assemblage of registered voters representing an independent candidate
or candidates or a new or minor political party, organization, or
principle. As used in this chapter, the term "election jurisdiction"
shall mean the state or any political subdivision or jurisdiction of
the state from which partisan officials are elected. This term shall
include county commissioner districts or council districts for members
of a county legislative authority, counties for county officials who
are nominated and elected on a county-wide basis, legislative districts
for members of the legislature, congressional districts for members of
Congress, and the state for president and vice president, members of
the United States senate, and state officials who are elected on a
statewide basis.

Sec. 506 RCW 29.24.020 and 2001 c 30 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
NOMINATION BY CONVENTION OR WRITE-IN--DATES--SPECIAL FILING
PERIOD. (1) Any nomination of a candidate for partisan public office
by other than a major political party may be made only: (a) In a
convention held not earlier than the last Saturday in June and not
later than the first Saturday in July or during any of the seven days
immediately preceding the first day for filing declarations of
candidacy as fixed in accordance with RCW 29.68.080; (b) as provided by
RCW 29.62.180; or (c) as otherwise provided in this section.
(2) Nominations of candidates for president and vice president of
the United States other than by a major political party may be made
either at a convention conducted under subsection (1) of this section,
or at a similar convention taking place not earlier than the first
Sunday in July and not later than seventy days before the general
election. Conventions held during this time period may not nominate
candidates for any public office other than president and vice
president of the United States, except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) If a special filing period for a partisan office is opened
under RCW 29.15.230, candidates of minor political parties and
independent candidates may file for office during that special filing
period. The names of those candidates may not appear on the ballot
unless they are nominated by convention held no later than five days
after the close of the special filing period and a certificate of
nomination is filed with the filing officer no later than three days
after the convention. The requirements of RCW 29.24.025 do not apply
to such a convention. If primary ballots or a voters' pamphlet are
ordered to be printed before the deadline for submitting the
certificate of nomination and the certificate has not been filed, then
the candidate's name will be included but may not appear on the general
election ballot unless the certificate is timely filed and the
candidate otherwise qualifies to appear on that ballot.
(4) A minor political party may hold more than one convention but
in no case shall any such party nominate more than one candidate for
any one partisan public office or position. For the purpose of
nominating candidates for the offices of president and vice president,
United States senator, or a statewide office, a minor party or
independent candidate holding multiple conventions may add together the
number of signatures of different individuals from each convention
obtained in support of the candidate or candidates in order to obtain
the number required by RCW 29.24.030. For all other offices for which
nominations are made, signatures of the requisite number of registered
voters must be obtained at a single convention.

Sec. 507 RCW 29.24.025 and 1989 c 215 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
NOTICE OF CONVENTION. Each minor party or independent candidate
must publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the
county in which the party or the candidate intends to hold a
convention. The notice must appear at least ten days before the
convention is to be held, and shall state the date, time, and place of
the convention. Additionally, it shall include the mailing address of
the person or organization sponsoring the convention.

Sec. 508 RCW 29.24.030 and 1989 c 215 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REQUIREMENTS FOR VALIDITY OF CONVENTION. (1) To be valid, a
convention must be attended by at least twenty-five registered voters.
(2) In order to nominate candidates for the offices of president
and vice president of the United States, United States senator, or any
statewide office, a nominating convention shall obtain and submit to
the filing officer the signatures of at least two hundred registered
voters of the state of Washington. In order to nominate candidates for
any other office, a nominating convention shall obtain and submit to
the filing officer the signatures of twenty-five persons who are
registered to vote in the jurisdiction of the office for which the
nominations are made.

Sec. 509 RCW 29.24.035 and 2001 c 64 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
NOMINATING PETITION--REQUIREMENTS. A nominating petition submitted
under this chapter shall clearly identify the name of the minor party
or independent candidate convention as it appears on the certificate of
nomination as required by RCW 29.24.040(3). The petition shall also
contain a statement that the person signing the petition is a
registered voter of the state of Washington and shall have a space for
the voter to sign his or her name and to print his or her name and
address. No person may sign more than one nominating petition under
this chapter for an office for a primary or election.

Sec. 510 RCW 29.24.040 and 1989 c 215 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
CERTIFICATE OF NOMINATION--REQUISITES. A certificate evidencing
nominations made at a convention must:
(1) Be in writing;
(2) Contain the name of each person nominated, his or her
residence, and the office for which he or she is named, and if the
nomination is for the offices of president and vice president of the
United States, a sworn statement from both nominees giving their
consent to the nomination;
(3) Identify the minor political party or the independent candidate
on whose behalf the convention was held;
(4) Be verified by the oath of the presiding officer and secretary;
(5) Be accompanied by a nominating petition or petitions bearing
the signatures and addresses of registered voters equal in number to
that required by RCW 29.24.030;
(6) Contain proof of publication of the notice of calling the
convention; and
(7) Be submitted to the appropriate filing officer not later than
one week following the adjournment of the convention at which the
nominations were made. If the nominations are made only for offices
whose jurisdiction is entirely within one county, the certificate and
nominating petitions must be filed with the county auditor. If a minor
party or independent candidate convention nominates any candidates for
offices whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one county, all
nominating petitions and the convention certificates must be filed with
the secretary of state.

Sec. 511 RCW 29.24.045 and 2001 c 30 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
MULTIPLE CERTIFICATES OF NOMINATION. (1) If two or more valid
certificates of nomination are filed purporting to nominate different
candidates for the same position using the same party name, the filing
officer must give effect to both certificates. If conflicting claims
to the party name are not resolved either by mutual agreement or by a
judicial determination of the right to the name, the candidates must be
treated as independent candidates. Disputes over the right to the name
must not be permitted to delay the printing of either ballots or a
voters' pamphlet. Other candidates nominated by the same conventions
may continue to use the partisan affiliation unless a court of
competent jurisdiction directs otherwise.
(2) A person affected may petition the superior court of the county
in which the filing officer is located for a judicial determination of
the right to the name of a minor political party, either before or
after documents are filed with the filing officer. The court shall
resolve the conflict between competing claims to the use of the same
party name according to the following principles: (a) The prior
established public use of the name during previous elections by a party
composed of or led by the same individuals or individuals in documented
succession; (b) prior established public use of the name earlier in the
same election cycle; (c) the nomination of a more complete slate of
candidates for a number of offices or in a number of different regions
of the state; (d) documented affiliation with a national or statewide
party organization with an established use of the name; (e) the first
date of filing of a certificate of nomination; and (f) such other
indicia of an established right to use of the name as the court may
deem relevant. If more than one filing officer is involved, and one of
them is the secretary of state, the petition must be filed in the
superior court for Thurston county. Upon resolving the conflict
between competing claims, the court may also address any ballot
designation for the candidate who does not prevail.

Sec. 512 RCW 29.24.055 and 1989 c 215 s 6 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS--SELECTION AT CONVENTION. A minor political
party or independent candidate convention nominating candidates for the
offices of president and vice president of the United States shall, not
later than ten days after the adjournment of the convention, submit a
list of presidential electors to the office of the secretary of state.
The list shall contain the names and the mailing addresses of the
persons selected and shall be verified by the presiding officer of the
convention.

Sec. 513 RCW 29.24.060 and 1989 c 215 s 7 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CERTIFICATE OF NOMINATION--CHECKING SIGNATURES--APPEAL OF
DETERMINATION. Upon the receipt of the certificate of nomination, the
officer with whom it is filed shall check the certificate and canvass
the signatures on the accompanying nominating petitions to determine if
the requirements of RCW 29.24.030 have been met. Once the
determination has been made, the filing officer shall notify the
presiding officer of the convention and any other persons requesting
the notification, of his or her decision regarding the sufficiency of
the certificate or the nominating petitions. Any appeal regarding the
filing officer's determination must be filed with the superior court of
the county in which the certificate or petitions were filed not later
than five days from the date the determination is made, and shall be
heard and finally disposed of by the court within five days of the
filing. Nominating petitions shall not be available for public
inspection or copying.

Sec. 514 RCW 29.24.070 and 1990 c 59 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
DECLARATIONS OF CANDIDACY REQUIRED, EXCEPTIONS--PAYMENT OF FEES.
Not later than the Friday immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file, the secretary of state shall notify the county
auditors of the names and designations of all minor party and
independent candidates who have filed valid convention certificates and
nominating petitions with that office. Except for the offices of
president and vice president, persons nominated under this chapter
shall file declarations of candidacy as provided by RCW 29.15.010 and
29.15.030. The name of a candidate nominated at a convention shall not
be printed upon the primary ballot unless he or she pays the fee
required by law to be paid by candidates for the same office to be
nominated at a primary.

PART 6
FILING FOR OFFICESubpart 6.1
General
Sec. 601 RCW 29.15.130 and 1990 c 59 s 79 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
POSITION NUMBERS DESIGNATED, WHEN -- EFFECT. Not less than thirty
days before the first day for filing declarations of candidacy under
RCW 29.15.020 for legislative, judicial, county, city, town, or
district office, where more than one position with the same name,
district number, or title will be voted upon at the succeeding
election, the filing officer shall designate the positions to be filled
by number.
The positions so designated shall be dealt with as separate offices
for all election purposes. With the exception of the office of justice
of the supreme court, the position numbers shall be assigned, whenever
possible, to reflect the position numbers that were used to designate
the same positions at the last full-term election for those offices.

Sec. 602 RCW 29.15.140 and 1990 c 59 s 92 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DESIGNATION OF SHORT TERMS, FULL TERMS, AND UNEXPIRED TERMS -- FILING
DECLARATIONS -- ELECTION TO BOTH SHORT AND FULL TERMS. If at the same
election there are short terms or full terms and unexpired terms of
office to be filled, the filing officer shall distinguish them and
designate the short term, the full term, and the unexpired term, as
such, or by use of the words "short term," "unexpired two year term,"
or "four year term," as the case may be.
In filing the declaration of candidacy in such cases the candidate
shall specify that the candidacy is for the short term, the full term,
or the unexpired term. When both a short term and a full term for the
same position are scheduled to be voted upon, or when a short term is
created after the close of the filing period, a single declaration of
candidacy accompanied by a single filing fee shall be construed as a
filing for both the short term and the full term and the name of such
candidate shall appear upon the ballot for the position sought with the
designation "short term and full term." The candidate elected to both
such terms shall be sworn into and assume office for the short term as
soon as the election returns have been certified and shall again be
sworn into office on the second Monday in January following the
election to assume office for the full term.

Sec. 603 RCW 29.15.010 and 2002 c 140 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY. A candidate who desires to have his or
her name printed on the ballot for election to an office other than
president of the United States, vice president of the United States, or
an office for which ownership of property is a prerequisite to voting
shall complete and file a declaration ((and affidavit)) of candidacy.
The secretary of state shall adopt, by rule, a declaration of candidacy
form for the office of precinct committee officer and a separate
standard form for candidates for all other offices filing under this
chapter. Included on the standard form shall be:
(1) A place for the candidate to declare that he or she is a
registered voter within the jurisdiction of the office for which he or
she is filing, and the address at which he or she is registered;
(2) A place for the candidate to indicate the position for which he
or she is filing;
(3) A place for the candidate to indicate a party designation, if
applicable;
(4) A place for the candidate to indicate the amount of the filing
fee accompanying the declaration of candidacy or for the candidate to
indicate that he or she is filing a nominating petition in lieu of the
filing fee under RCW 29.15.050;
(5) A place for the candidate to sign the declaration of candidacy,
stating that the information provided on the form is true and swearing
or affirming that he or she will support the Constitution and laws of
the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of
Washington.
In the case of a declaration of candidacy filed electronically,
submission of the form constitutes agreement that the information
provided with the filing is true, that he or she will support the
Constitutions and laws of the United States and the state of
Washington, and that he or she agrees to electronic payment of the
filing fee established in RCW 29.15.050.
The secretary of state may require any other information on the
form he or she deems appropriate to facilitate the filing process.

Sec. 604 RCW 29.15.044 and 2002 c 140 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ELECTRONIC FILING -- AUTHORIZED -- PERIOD. A candidate may file his or
her declaration of candidacy for an office by electronic means on a
system specifically designed and authorized by a filing officer to
accept filings.
(1) Filings that are received electronically must capture all
information specified in RCW 29.15.010 (1) through (4).
(2) Electronic filing may begin at 9:00 a.m. the fourth Monday in
July and continue through 4:00 p.m. the following Friday.
(3) In case of special filing periods established in this chapter,
electronic filings may be accepted beginning at 9:00 a.m. on the first
day of the special filing period through 4:00 p.m. the last day of the
special filing period.

Sec. 605 RCW 29.15.020 and 1990 c 59 s 81 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY -- CERTAIN OFFICES, WHEN FILED. Except
where otherwise provided by this title, declarations of candidacy for
the following offices shall be filed during regular business hours with
the filing officer no earlier than the fourth Monday in July and no
later than the following Friday in the year in which the office is
scheduled to be voted upon:
(1) Offices that are scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or
both full terms and short terms at, or in conjunction with, a state
general election; and
(2) Offices where a vacancy, other than a short term, exists that
has not been filled by election and for which an election to fill the
vacancy is required in conjunction with the next state general
election.
This section supersedes all other statutes that provide for a
different filing period for these offices.

Sec. 606 RCW 29.15.090 and 1990 c 59 s 83 are each amended to
read as follows:
CANDIDATES' NAMES -- NICKNAMES. When filing for office, a candidate
may indicate the manner in which he or she desires his or her name to
be printed on the ballot. For filing purposes, a candidate may use a
nickname by which he or she is commonly known as his or her first name,
but the last name shall be the name under which he or she is registered
to vote.
No candidate may:
(1) Use a nickname that denotes present or past occupation,
including military rank;
(2) Use a nickname that denotes the candidate's position on issues
or political affiliation;
(3) Use a nickname designed intentionally to mislead voters.
((The secretary of state shall adopt rules to resolve those
instances when candidates have filed for the same office whose last
names are so similar in sound or spelling as to be confusing to the
voter.))

Sec. 607 RCW 29.15.030 and 2002 c 140 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY -- WHERE FILED -- COPY TO PUBLIC DISCLOSURE
COMMISSION. Declarations of candidacy shall be filed with the
following filing officers:
(1) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for
statewide offices, United States senate, and United States house of
representatives;
(2) The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for the
state legislature, the court of appeals, and the superior court when
voters from a district comprising more than one county vote upon the
candidates;
(3) The county auditor for all other offices. For any nonpartisan
office, other than judicial offices and school director in joint
districts, where voters from a district comprising more than one county
vote upon the candidates, a declaration of candidacy shall be filed
with the county auditor of the county in which a majority of the
registered voters of the district reside. For school directors in
joint school districts, the declaration of candidacy shall be filed
with the county auditor of the county designated by the state board of
education as the county to which the joint school district is
considered as belonging under RCW 28A.323.040.
Each official with whom declarations of candidacy are filed under
this section, within one business day following the closing of the
applicable filing period, shall transmit to the public disclosure
commission the information required in RCW 29.15.010 (1) through (4)
for each declaration of candidacy filed in his or her office during
such filing period or a list containing the name of each candidate who
files such a declaration in his or her office during such filing period
together with a precise identification of the position sought by each
such candidate and the date on which each such declaration was filed.
Such official, within three days following his or her receipt of any
letter withdrawing a person's name as a candidate, shall also forward
a copy of such withdrawal letter to the public disclosure commission.

Sec. 608 RCW 29.15.040 and 1987 c 110 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DECLARATION -- FILING BY MAIL. Any candidate may mail his or her
declaration of candidacy for an office to the filing officer. Such
declarations of candidacy shall be processed by the filing officer in
the following manner:
(1) Any declaration received by the filing officer by mail before
the tenth business day immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file for office shall be returned to the candidate
submitting it, together with a notification that the declaration of
candidacy was received too early to be processed. The candidate shall
then be permitted to resubmit his or her declaration of candidacy
during the filing period.
(2) Any properly executed declaration of candidacy received by mail
on or after the tenth business day immediately preceding the first day
for candidates to file for office and before the close of business on
the last day of the filing period shall be included with filings made
in person during the filing period. In partisan and judicial elections
the filing officer shall determine by lot the order in which the names
of those candidates shall appear upon sample and absentee primary
ballots.
(3) Any declaration of candidacy received by the filing officer
after the close of business on the last day for candidates to file for
office shall be rejected and returned to the candidate attempting to
file it.

Sec. 609 RCW 29.15.050 and 1999 c 298 s 10 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DECLARATION -- FEES AND PETITIONS. A filing fee of one dollar shall
accompany each declaration of candidacy for precinct committee officer;
a filing fee of ten dollars shall accompany the declaration of
candidacy for any office with a fixed annual salary of one thousand
dollars or less; a filing fee equal to one percent of the annual salary
of the office at the time of filing shall accompany the declaration of
candidacy for any office with a fixed annual salary of more than one
thousand dollars per annum. No filing fee need accompany a declaration
of candidacy for any office for which compensation is on a per diem or
per meeting attended basis.
A candidate who lacks sufficient assets or income at the time of
filing to pay the filing fee required by this section shall submit with
his or her declaration of candidacy a nominating petition. The
petition shall contain not less than a number of signatures of
registered voters equal to the number of dollars of the filing fee.
The signatures shall be of voters registered to vote within the
jurisdiction of the office for which the candidate is filing.
When the candidacy is for:
(1) A legislative or judicial office that includes territory from
more than one county, the fee shall be paid to the secretary of state
for equal division between the treasuries of the counties comprising
the district.
(2) A city or town office, the fee shall be paid to the county
auditor who shall transmit it to the city or town clerk for deposit in
the city or town treasury.

Sec. 610 RCW 29.15.060 and 1984 c 142 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
NOMINATING PETITION -- CONTENTS. The nominating petition authorized
by RCW 29.15.050 shall be printed on sheets of uniform color and size,
shall contain no more than twenty numbered lines, and ((shall)) must be
in substantially the following form:

((WARNING

Any person who signs this petition with any other than his or
her true name, or who knowingly (1) signs more than one
petition for any single candidate, (2) signs the petition when
he or she is not a legal voter, or (3) makes any false
statement may be subject to fine, or imprisonment, or both.))
The warning prescribed by RCW 29.79.115; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision for which the nomination is
made) , hereby petition that the name of (candidate's name) be
printed on the official primary ballot for the office of (insert
name of office) .

((Signature Printed Name Residence
Address City County

1 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

2 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

3 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

etc.))

The petition must include a place for each individual to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

Sec. 611 RCW 29.15.070 and 1984 c 142 s 6 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PETITIONS -- REJECTION -- ACCEPTANCE, CANVASS OF SIGNATURES -- JUDICIAL
REVIEW. Nominating petitions may be rejected for the following
reasons:
(1) The petition is not in the proper form;
(2) The petition clearly bears insufficient signatures;
(3) The petition is not accompanied by a declaration of candidacy;
(4) The time within which the petition and the declaration of
candidacy could have been filed has expired.
If the petition is accepted, the officer with whom it is filed
shall canvass the signatures contained on it and shall reject the
signatures of those persons who are not registered voters and the
signatures of those persons who are not registered to vote within the
jurisdiction of the office for which the nominating petition is filed.
He or she shall additionally reject any signature that appears on the
nominating petitions of two or more candidates for the same office and
shall also reject, each time it appears, the name of any person who
signs the same petition more than once.
If the officer with whom the petition is filed refuses to accept
the petition or refuses to certify the petition as bearing sufficient
valid signatures, the person filing the petition may appeal that action
to the superior court. The application for judicial review shall take
precedence over other cases and matters and shall be speedily heard and
determined.

Sec. 612 RCW 29.15.125 and 1994 c 223 s 7 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
NOTICE OF DATE FOR WITHDRAWAL. Each person who files a declaration
of candidacy for an elected office of a city, town, or special district
shall be given written notice of the date by which a candidate may
withdraw his or her candidacy under RCW 29.15.120.

Sec. 613 RCW 29.15.120 and 1994 c 223 s 6 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
WITHDRAWAL OF CANDIDACY. A candidate may withdraw his or her
declaration of candidacy at any time before the close of business on
the Thursday following the last day for candidates to file under RCW
29.15.020 by filing, with the officer with whom the declaration of
candidacy was filed, a signed request that his or her name not be
printed on the ballot. There shall be no withdrawal period for
declarations of candidacy filed during special filing periods held
under this title. The filing officer may permit the withdrawal of a
filing for the office of precinct committee officer at the request of
the candidate at any time if no absentee ballots have been issued for
that office and the general election ballots for that precinct have not
been printed. The filing officer may permit the withdrawal of a filing
for any elected office of a city, town, or special district at the
request of the candidate at any time before a primary if the primary
ballots for that city, town, or special district have not been ordered.
No filing fee may be refunded to any candidate who withdraws under this
section. Notice of the deadline for withdrawal of candidacy and that
the filing fee is not refundable shall be given to each candidate at
the time he or she files.

Sec. 614 RCW 29.15.160 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 9 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
VOID IN CANDIDACY -- EXCEPTION. A void in candidacy for a
nonpartisan office occurs when an election for such office, except for
the short term, has been scheduled and no valid declaration of
candidacy has been filed for the position or all persons filing such
valid declarations of candidacy have died or been disqualified.

Sec. 615 RCW 29.15.210 and 1972 ex.s. c 61 s 5 are each reenacted
to read as follows:
NOTICE OF VOID IN CANDIDACY. The election officer with whom
declarations of candidacy are filed shall give notice of a void in
candidacy for a nonpartisan office, by notifying press, radio, and
television in the county and by such other means as may now or
hereafter be provided by law. The notice shall state the office, and
the time and place for filing declarations of candidacy.

Sec. 616 RCW 29.15.220 and 1972 ex.s. c 61 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
FILINGS TO FILL VOID IN CANDIDACY -- HOW MADE. Filings to fill a
void in candidacy for nonpartisan office ((shall)) must be made in the
same manner and with the same official as required during the regular
filing period for such office((: PROVIDED)), except that nominating
signature petitions ((which)) that may be required of candidates filing
for certain district offices during the normal filing period ((shall))
may not be required of candidates filing during the special three-day
filing period.

Sec. 617 RCW 29.15.170 and 2001 c 46 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REOPENING OF FILING -- OCCURRENCES BEFORE SIXTH TUESDAY BEFORE
PRIMARY. Filings for a nonpartisan office shall be reopened for a
period of three normal business days, such three day period to be fixed
by the election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy are
filed and notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and
television in the county and by such other means as may now or
hereafter be provided by law whenever before the sixth Tuesday prior to
a primary:
(1) A void in candidacy occurs;
(2) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office leaving an unexpired
term to be filled by an election for which filings have not been held;
or
(3) A nominee for judge of the superior court entitled to a
certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41
of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified.
Candidacies validly filed within said three-day period shall appear
on the ballot as if made during the earlier filing period.

Sec. 618 RCW 29.15.180 and 2001 c 46 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REOPENING OF FILING -- OCCURRENCES AFTER SIXTH TUESDAY BEFORE
PRIMARY. Filings for a nonpartisan office (other than judge of the
supreme court or superintendent of public instruction) shall be
reopened for a period of three normal business days, such three day
period to be fixed by the election officer with whom such declarations
of candidacy are filed and notice thereof given by notifying press,
radio, and television in the county and by such other means as may now
or hereafter be provided by law, when:
(1) A void in candidacy for such nonpartisan office occurs on or
after the sixth Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the sixth
Tuesday before an election; or
(2) A nominee for judge of the superior court eligible after a
contested primary for a certificate of election by Article 4, section
29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified
within the ten day period immediately following the last day allotted
for a candidate to withdraw; or
(3) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office on or after the
sixth Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the sixth Tuesday before
an election leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an election for
which filings have not been held.
The candidate receiving a plurality of the votes cast for that
office in the general election shall be deemed elected.

Sec. 619 RCW 29.15.190 and 2002 c 108 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
SCHEDULED ELECTION LAPSES, WHEN. A scheduled election shall be
lapsed, the office deemed stricken from the ballot, no purported write-in votes counted, and no candidate certified as elected, when:
(1) In an election for judge of the supreme court or superintendent
of public instruction, a void in candidacy occurs on or after the sixth
Tuesday prior to a primary, public filings and the primary being an
indispensable phase of the election process for such offices;
(2) Except as otherwise specified in RCW 29.15.180, ((as now or
hereafter amended,)) a nominee for judge of the superior court entitled
to a certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section 29,
Amendment 41 of the state Constitution dies or is disqualified on or
after the sixth Tuesday prior to a primary;
(3) In other elections for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy
occurs or a vacancy occurs involving an unexpired term to be filled on
or after the sixth Tuesday prior to an election.

Sec. 620 RCW 29.15.200 and 1994 c 223 s 8 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
LAPSE OF ELECTION WHEN NO FILING FOR SINGLE POSITIONS -- EFFECT. If
after both the normal filing period and special three day filing period
as provided by RCW 29.15.170 and 29.15.180 have passed, no candidate
has filed for any single city, town, or district position to be filled,
the election for such position shall be deemed lapsed, the office
deemed stricken from the ballot and no write-in votes counted. In such
instance, the incumbent occupying such position shall remain in office
and continue to serve until a successor is elected at the next election
when such positions are voted upon.

Sec. 621 RCW 29.15.230 and 2001 c 46 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
VACANCY IN PARTISAN ELECTIVE OFFICE -- SPECIAL FILING PERIOD.
Filings for a partisan elective office shall be opened for a period of
three normal business days whenever, on or after the first day of the
regular filing period and before the sixth Tuesday prior to a primary,
a vacancy occurs in that office, leaving an unexpired term to be filled
by an election for which filings have not been held.
Any such special three-day filing period shall be fixed by the
election officer with whom declarations of candidacy for that office
are filed. The election officer shall give notice of the special
three-day filing period by notifying the press, radio, and television
in the county or counties involved, and by such other means as may be
required by law.
Candidacies validly filed within the special three-day filing
period shall appear on the primary ballot as if filed during the
regular filing period.

Subpart 6.2
Write-in Candidates
Sec. 622 RCW 29.04.180 and 1999 c 157 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
WRITE-IN VOTING -- CANDIDATES, DECLARATION. Any person who desires
to be a write-in candidate and have such votes counted at a primary or
election may((, if the jurisdiction of the office sought is entirely
within one county,)) file a declaration of candidacy with the ((county
auditor)) officer designated in RCW 29.15.030 not later than the day
before the primary or election. ((If the jurisdiction of the office
sought encompasses more than one county the declaration of candidacy
shall be filed with the secretary of state not later than the day
before the primary or election.)) Declarations of candidacy for write-in candidates must be accompanied by a filing fee in the same manner as
required of other candidates filing for the office as provided in RCW
29.15.050.
Votes cast for write-in candidates who have filed such declarations
of candidacy and write-in votes for persons appointed by political
parties pursuant to RCW 29.18.160 need only specify the name of the
candidate in the appropriate location on the ballot in order to be
counted. Write-in votes cast for any other candidate, in order to be
counted, must designate the office sought and position number or
political party, if ((applicable)) the manner in which the write-in is
done does not make the office or position clear. In order for write-in
votes to be valid in jurisdictions employing optical-scan mark sense
ballot systems the voter must complete the proper mark next to the
write-in line for that office.
No person may file as a write-in candidate where:
(1) At a general election, the person attempting to file either
filed as a write-in candidate for the same office at the preceding
primary or the person's name appeared on the ballot for the same office
at the preceding primary;
(2) The person attempting to file as a write-in candidate has
already filed a valid write-in declaration for that primary or
election, unless one or the other of the two filings is for the office
of precinct committeeperson;
(3) The name of the person attempting to file already appears on
the ballot as a candidate for another office, unless one of the two
offices for which he or she is a candidate is precinct committeeperson.
The declaration of candidacy shall be similar to that required by
RCW 29.15.010. No write-in candidate filing under RCW 29.04.180 may be
included in any voter's pamphlet produced under chapter ((29.80)) 29.81
RCW (as recodified by this act) unless that candidate qualifies to have
his or her name printed on the general election ballot. The
legislative authority of any jurisdiction producing a local voter's
pamphlet under chapter 29.81A RCW may provide, by ordinance, for the
inclusion of write-in candidates in such pamphlets.

Sec. 623 RCW 29.04.190 and 1988 c 181 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
WRITE-IN CANDIDATES -- NOTICE TO AUDITORS, BALLOT COUNTERS. The
secretary of state shall notify each county auditor of any declarations
filed with the secretary under RCW 29.04.180 for offices appearing on
the ballot in that county. The county auditor shall ensure that those
persons charged with counting the ballots for a primary or election are
notified of all valid write-in candidates before the tabulation of
those ballots.

PART 7
VACANCIES
Sec. 701 RCW 29.18.150 and 1990 c 59 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
ON MAJOR PARTY TICKET CAUSED BY NO FILING--HOW
FILLED. ((Should)) If a place on the ticket of a major political party
((be)) is vacant because no person has filed for nomination as the
candidate of that major political party, after the last day allowed for
candidates to withdraw as provided by RCW 29.15.120, and if the vacancy
is for a state or county office to be voted on solely by the electors
of a single county, the county central committee of the major political
party may select and certify a candidate to fill the vacancy((;)). If
the vacancy is for any other office the state central committee of the
major political party may select and certify a candidate to fill the
vacancy((;)). The certificate must set forth the cause of the vacancy,
the name of the person nominated, the office for which ((he)) the
person is nominated, and other pertinent information required in an
ordinary certificate of nomination and be filed in the proper office no
later than the first Friday after the last day allowed for candidates
to withdraw, together with the candidate's fee applicable to that
office and a declaration of candidacy.

Sec. 702 RCW 29.18.160 and 2001 c 46 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
BY DEATH OR DISQUALIFICATION--HOW FILLED--CORRECTING BALLOTS--COUNTING VOTES ALREADY CAST. A vacancy caused by the death or
disqualification of any candidate or nominee of a major or minor
political party may be filled at any time up to and including the day
prior to the election for that position. For state partisan offices in
any political subdivision voted on solely by electors of a single
county, an individual shall be appointed to fill such vacancy by the
county central committee in the case of a major political party or by
the state central committee or comparable governing body in the case of
a minor political party. For other partisan offices, including federal
or statewide offices, an individual shall be appointed to fill such
vacancy by the state central committee or comparable governing body of
the appropriate political party.
((Should such)) If the vacancy occurs no later than the sixth
Tuesday prior to the state primary or general election concerned and
the ballots have been printed, it shall be mandatory that they be
corrected by the appropriate election officers. In making such
correction, it shall not be necessary to reprint complete ballots if
any other less expensive technique can be used and the resulting
correction is reasonably clear.
((Should such)) If the vacancy occurs after the sixth Tuesday prior
to ((said)) the state primary or general election and time does not
exist in which to correct ballots (including absentee ballots), either
in total or in part, then the votes cast or recorded for the person who
has died or become disqualified shall be counted for the person who has
been named to fill such vacancy.
When the secretary of state is the person with whom the appointment
by the major or minor political party is filed, ((he)) the secretary
shall, in certifying candidates or nominations to the various county
officers insert the name of the person appointed to fill a vacancy.
((In the event that)) If the secretary of state has already sent
forth ((his)) the certificate when the appointment to fill a vacancy is
filed ((with him)), ((he)) the secretary shall forthwith certify to the
county auditors of the proper counties the name and place of residence
of the person appointed to fill a vacancy, the office for which ((he))
the person is a candidate or nominee, the party ((he)) the person
represents, and all other pertinent facts pertaining to the vacancy.

Sec. 703 RCW 29.68.070 and 1985 c 45 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
UNITED STATES SENATE--TEMPORARY APPOINTMENT. When a vacancy occurs
in the representation of this state in the senate of the United States,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment to that office until
the people fill the vacancy by election as provided in this chapter.

Sec. 704 RCW 29.68.080 and 1990 c 59 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
CONGRESS--SPECIAL ELECTION. (1) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the
((office of)) United States house of representatives or the United
States ((senator)) senate from this state ((or any congressional
district of this state)), the governor shall order a special election
to fill the vacancy.
(2) Within ten days of such vacancy occurring, he or she shall
issue a writ of election fixing a date for the special vacancy election
not less than ninety days after the issuance of the writ, fixing a date
for the primary for nominating candidates for the special vacancy
election not less than thirty days before the day fixed for holding the
special vacancy election, fixing the dates for the special filing
period, and designating the term or part of the term for which the
vacancy exists. If the vacancy is in the office of United States
representative, the writ of election shall specify the congressional
district that is vacant.
(3) If the vacancy occurs less than six months before a state
general election and before the second Friday following the close of
the filing period for that general election, the special primary and
special vacancy elections shall be held in concert with the state
primary and state general election in that year.
(4) If the vacancy occurs on or after the first day for filing
under RCW 29.15.020 and on or before the second Friday following the
close of the filing period, a special filing period of three normal
business days shall be fixed by the governor and notice thereof given
to all media, including press, radio, and television within the area in
which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that, insofar as
possible, all interested persons will be aware of such filing period.
The last day of the filing period shall not be later than the third
Tuesday before the primary at which candidates are to be nominated.
The names of candidates who have filed valid declarations of candidacy
during this three-day period shall appear on the approaching primary
ballot.
(5) If the vacancy occurs later than the second Friday following
the close of the filing period, a special primary and special vacancy
election to fill the position shall be held after the next state
general election but, in any event, no later than the ninetieth day
following the November election.
(((6) As used in this chapter, "county" means, in the case of a
vacancy in the office of United States senator, any or all of the
counties in the state and, in the case of a vacancy in the office of
United States representative, only those counties wholly or partly
within the congressional district in which the vacancy has occurred.))

Sec. 705 RCW 29.68.100 and 1985 c 45 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
CONGRESS--NOTICES OF SPECIAL PRIMARY AND SPECIAL ELECTION. After
calling a special primary and special vacancy election to fill a
vacancy in the ((office of)) United States house of representatives or
the United States ((senator)) senate from this state, the governor
shall immediately notify the secretary of state who shall, in turn,
immediately notify the county auditor of each county wholly or partly
within which the vacancy exists.
Each county auditor shall publish notices of the special primary
and the special vacancy election at least once in any legal newspaper
published in the county, as provided by RCW 29.27.030 and 29.27.080
respectively.

Sec. 706 RCW 29.68.130 and 1985 c 45 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
CONGRESS--GENERAL, PRIMARY ELECTION LAWS TO APPLY--TIME DEADLINES,
MODIFICATIONS. The general election laws and laws relating to partisan
primaries shall apply to the special primaries and vacancy elections
provided for in RCW 29.68.080 through ((29.68.120)) 29.68.100 (as
recodified by this act) to the extent that they are not inconsistent
with the provisions of these sections. Statutory time deadlines
relating to availability of absentee ballots, certification,
canvassing, and related procedures that cannot be met in a timely
fashion may be modified for the purposes of a specific primary or
vacancy election under this chapter by the secretary of state through
emergency rules adopted under RCW 29.04.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 PRECINCT COMMITTEE OFFICER. If a vacancy
occurs in the office of precinct committee officer by reason of death,
resignation, or disqualification of the incumbent, or because of
failure to elect, the respective county chair of the county central
committee shall fill the vacancy by appointment. However, in a
legislative district having a majority of its precincts in a county
with a population of one million or more, the appointment may be made
only upon the recommendation of the legislative district chair. The
person so appointed must have the same qualifications as candidates
when filing for election to the office for that precinct. When a
vacancy in the office of precinct committee officer exists because of
failure to elect at a state general election, the vacancy may not be
filled until after the organization meeting of the county central
committee and the new county chair has been selected as provided by RCW
29.42.030.

PART 8
VOTERS' PAMPHLETSSubpart 8.1
State Voters' Pamphlet
Sec. 801 RCW 29.81.210 and 1999 c 260 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PRINTING AND DISTRIBUTION. The secretary of state shall, whenever
at least one statewide measure or office is scheduled to appear on the
general election ballot, print and distribute a voters' pamphlet.
The secretary of state shall distribute the voters' pamphlet to
each household in the state, to public libraries, and to any other
locations he or she deems appropriate. The secretary of state shall
also produce taped or Braille transcripts of the voters' pamphlet,
publicize their availability, and mail without charge a copy to any
person who requests one.
The secretary of state may make the material required to be
distributed by this chapter available to the public in electronic form.
The secretary of state may provide the material in electronic form to
computer bulletin boards, print and broadcast news media, community
computer networks, and similar services at the cost of reproduction or
transmission of the data.

Sec. 802 RCW 29.04.035 and 1984 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
PROHIBITION AGAINST CAMPAIGN MATERIALS DECEPTIVELY SIMILAR TO
VOTERS' PAMPHLET. No person or entity may publish or distribute any
campaign material that is deceptively similar in design or appearance
to a voters' pamphlet ((or candidates' pamphlet or combination thereof,
which pamphlet or combination)) that was published by the secretary of
state during the ten-year period ((prior to)) before the publication or
distribution of the campaign material by the person or entity. The
secretary of state shall take reasonable measures to prevent or to stop
violations of this section. Such measures may include, among others,
petitioning the superior court for a temporary restraining order or
other appropriate injunctive relief. In addition, the secretary may
request the superior court to impose a civil fine on a violator of this
section. The court is authorized to levy on and recover from each
violator a civil fine not to exceed the greater of: (1) Two dollars
for each copy of the deceptive material distributed, or (2) one
thousand dollars. In addition, the violator ((shall be)) is liable for
the state's legal expenses and other costs resulting from the
violation. Any funds recovered under this section ((shall)) must be
transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.

Sec. 803 RCW 29.81.220 and 1999 c 260 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CONTENTS. The voters' pamphlet must contain:
(1) Information about each ballot measure initiated by or referred
to the voters for their approval or rejection as required by RCW
29.81.250;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, advocating
the candidacies of nominees for the office of president and vice
president of the United States, United States senator, United States
representative, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state,
state treasurer, state auditor, attorney general, commissioner of
public lands, superintendent of public instruction, insurance
commissioner, state senator, state representative, justice of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the superior
court. Candidates may also submit a campaign mailing address and
telephone number and a photograph not more than five years old and of
a size and quality that the secretary of state determines to be
suitable for reproduction in the voters' pamphlet;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) In even-numbered years, a section explaining how voters may
participate in the election campaign process; the address and telephone
number of the public disclosure commission established under RCW
42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements that apply when
contributions are made to candidates and political committees;
(5) In even-numbered years the name, address, and telephone number
of each political party with nominees listed in the pamphlet, if filed
with the secretary of state by the state committee of a major political
party or the presiding officer of the convention of a minor political
party;
(6) In each odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected,
information explaining the precinct caucus and convention process used
by each major political party to elect delegates to its national
presidential candidate nominating convention. The pamphlet must also
provide a description of the statutory procedures by which minor
political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;
(7) In even-numbered years, a description of the office of precinct
committee officer and its duties;
(8) An application form for an absentee ballot;
(9) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language for proposed measures under RCW 29.81.260;
(10) Any additional information pertaining to elections as may be
required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is deemed
informative to the voters.

Sec. 804 RCW 29.81.230 and 1999 c 260 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
EXPLANATORY STATEMENTS. (1) Explanatory statements prepared by the
attorney general under RCW 29.81.250 (3) and (4) must be written in
clear and concise language, avoiding legal and technical terms when
possible, and filed with the secretary of state.
(2) When the explanatory statement for a measure initiated by
petition is filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state
shall immediately provide the text of the explanatory statement to the
person proposing the measure and any others who have made written
request for notification of the exact language of the explanatory
statement. When the explanatory statement for a measure referred to
the ballot by the legislature is filed with the secretary of state, the
secretary of state shall immediately provide the text of the
explanatory statement to the presiding officer of the senate and the
presiding officer of the house of representatives and any others who
have made written request for notification of the exact language of the
explanatory statement.
(3) A person dissatisfied with the explanatory statement may appeal
to the superior court of Thurston County within five days of the filing
date. A copy of the petition and a notice of the appeal must be served
on the secretary of state and the attorney general. The court shall
examine the measure, the explanatory statement, and objections, and may
hear arguments. The court shall render its decision and certify to and
file with the secretary of state an explanatory statement it determines
will meet the requirements of this chapter.
The decision of the superior court is final, and its explanatory
statement is the established explanatory statement. The appeal must be
heard without costs to either party.

Sec. 805 RCW 29.27.076 and 1967 c 96 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
NOTICE OF CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENTS AND STATE MEASURES -- EXPLANATORY
STATEMENT. The attorney general shall, by the first day of July
preceding each general election, prepare the explanatory statements
required in RCW 29.27.074. Such statements shall be prepared in clear
and concise language and shall avoid the use of legal and other
technical terms insofar as possible. Any person dissatisfied with the
explanatory statement so prepared may at any time within ten days from
the filing thereof in the office of the secretary of state appeal to
the superior court of Thurston county by petition setting forth the
proposed state measure, the explanatory statement prepared by the
attorney general, and his or her objection thereto and praying for the
amendment thereof. A copy of the petition and a notice of such appeal
shall be served on the secretary of state and the attorney general.
The court shall, upon filing of the petition, examine the proposed
state measure, the explanatory statement, and the objections thereto
and may hear argument thereon and shall, as soon as possible, render
its decision and certify to and file with the secretary of state such
explanatory statement as it determines will meet the requirement of RCW
29.27.072 through 29.27.076. The decision of the superior court shall
be final and its explanatory statement shall be the established
explanatory statement. Such appeal shall be heard without costs to
either party.

Sec. 806 RCW 29.81.240 and 1999 c 260 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ARGUMENTS. Committees shall write and submit arguments advocating
the approval or rejection of each statewide ballot issue and rebuttals
of those arguments. The secretary of state, the presiding officer of
the senate, and the presiding officer of the house of representatives
shall appoint the initial two members of each committee. In making
these committee appointments the secretary of state and presiding
officers of the senate and house of representatives shall consider
legislators, sponsors of initiatives and referendums, and other
interested groups known to advocate or oppose the ballot measure.
The initial two members may select up to four additional members,
and the committee shall elect a chairperson. The remaining committee
member or members may fill vacancies through appointment.
After the committee submits its initial argument statements to the
secretary of state, the secretary of state shall transmit the
statements to the opposite committee. The opposite committee may then
prepare rebuttal arguments. Rebuttals may not interject new points.
The voters' pamphlet may contain only argument statements prepared
according to this section. Arguments may contain graphs and charts
supported by factual statistical data and pictures or other
illustrations. Cartoons or caricatures are not permitted.

Sec. 807 RCW 29.81.250 and 2002 c 139 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
FORMAT, LAYOUT, CONTENTS. The secretary of state shall determine
the format and layout of the voters' pamphlet. The secretary of state
shall print the pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size, quality,
and weight of paper that in the judgment of the secretary of state best
serves the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of contents.
Federal and state offices must appear in the pamphlet in the same
sequence as they appear on the ballot. Measures and arguments must be
printed in the order specified by RCW 29.79.300.
The voters' pamphlet must provide the following information for
each statewide issue on the ballot:
(1) The legal identification of the measure by serial designation
or number;
(2) The official ballot title of the measure;
(3) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the law
as it presently exists;
(4) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the
effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;
(5) The fiscal impact statement prepared under RCW 29.79.075;
(6) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in
the senate and house of representatives, if the measure has been passed
by the legislature;
(7) An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure
together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;
(8) An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the measure
together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;
(9) Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed by the
names of the committee members who submitted them, and may be followed
by a telephone number that citizens may call to obtain information on
the ballot measure;
(10) The full text of each measure.

Sec. 808 RCW 29.81.260 and 1999 c 260 s 6 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
AMENDATORY STYLE. Statewide ballot measures that amend existing
law must be printed in the voters' pamphlet so that language proposed
for deletion is enclosed by double parentheses and has a line through
it. Proposed new language must be underlined. A statement explaining
the deletion and addition of language must appear as follows: "Any
language in double parentheses with a line through it is existing state
law and will be taken out of the law if this measure is approved by
voters. Any underlined language does not appear in current state law
but will be added to the law if this measure is approved by voters."

Sec. 809 RCW 29.81.280 and 1999 c 260 s 8 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ARGUMENTS--REJECTION, DISPUTE. (1) If in the opinion of the
secretary of state any argument or statement offered for inclusion in
the voters' pamphlet in support of or opposition to a measure or
candidate contains obscene matter or matter that is otherwise
prohibited by law from distribution through the mail, the secretary may
petition the superior court of Thurston County for a judicial
determination that the argument or statement may be rejected for
publication or edited to delete the matter. The court shall not enter
such an order unless it concludes that the matter is obscene or
otherwise prohibited for distribution through the mail.
(2)(a) A person who believes that he or she may be defamed by an
argument or statement offered for inclusion in the voters' pamphlet in
support of or opposition to a measure or candidate may petition the
superior court of Thurston County for a judicial determination that the
argument or statement may be rejected for publication or edited to
delete the defamatory statement.
(b) The court shall not enter such an order unless it concludes
that the statement is untrue and that the petitioner has a very
substantial likelihood of prevailing in a defamation action.
(c) An action under this subsection (2) must be filed and served no
later than the tenth day after the deadline for the submission of the
argument or statement to the secretary of state.
(d) If the secretary of state notifies a person named or identified
in an argument or statement of the contents of the argument or
statement within three days after the deadline for submission to the
secretary, then neither the state nor the secretary is liable for
damages resulting from publication of the argument or statement unless
the secretary publishes the argument or statement in violation of an
order entered under this section. Nothing in this section creates a
duty on the part of the secretary of state to identify, locate, or
notify the person.
(3) Parties to a dispute under this section may agree to resolve
the dispute by rephrasing the argument or statement, even if the
deadline for submission to the secretary has elapsed, unless the
secretary determines that the process of publication is too far
advanced to permit the change. The secretary shall promptly provide
any such revision to any committee entitled to submit a rebuttal
argument. If that committee has not yet submitted its rebuttal, its
deadline to submit a rebuttal is extended by five days. If it has
submitted a rebuttal, it may revise it to address the change within
five days of the filing of the revised argument with the secretary.
(4) In an action under this section the committee or candidate must
be named as a defendant, and may be served with process by certified
mail directed to the address contained in the secretary's records for
that party. The secretary of state shall be a nominal party to an
action brought under subsection (2) of this section, solely for the
purpose of determining the content of the voters' pamphlet. The
superior court shall give such an action priority on its calendar.

Sec. 810 RCW 29.81.290 and 1999 c 260 s 9 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ARGUMENTS--PUBLIC INSPECTION. (1) An argument or statement
submitted to the secretary of state for publication in the voters'
pamphlet is not available for public inspection or copying until:
(a) In the case of candidate statements, (i) all statements by all
candidates who have filed for a particular office have been received,
except those who informed the secretary that they will not submit
statements, or (ii) the deadline for submission of statements has
elapsed;
(b) In the case of arguments supporting or opposing a measure, (i)
the arguments on both sides have been received, unless a committee was
not appointed for one side, or (ii) the deadline for submission of
arguments has elapsed; and
(c) In the case of rebuttal arguments, (i) the rebuttals on both
sides have been received, unless a committee was not appointed for one
side, or (ii) the deadline for submission of arguments has elapsed.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the secretary from releasing
information under RCW 29.81.280(2)(d).

Sec. 811 RCW 29.81.300 and 1999 c 260 s 10 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PHOTOGRAPHS. All photographs of candidates submitted for
publication must conform to standards established by the secretary of
state by rule. No photograph may reveal clothing or insignia
suggesting the holding of a public office.

Sec. 812 RCW 29.81.310 and 1999 c 260 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
CANDIDATES' STATEMENTS--LENGTH. (1) The maximum number of words
for statements submitted by candidates is as follows: State
representative, one hundred words; state senator, judge of the superior
court, judge of the court of appeals, justice of the supreme court, and
all state offices voted upon throughout the state, except that of
governor, two hundred words; president and vice president, United
States senator, United States representative, and governor, three
hundred words.
(2) Arguments written by committees under RCW ((29.81.230))
29.81.240 (as recodified by this act) may not exceed two hundred fifty
words in length.
(3) Rebuttal arguments written by committees may not exceed
seventy-five words in length.
(4) The secretary of state shall allocate space in the pamphlet
based on the number of candidates or nominees for each office.

Subpart 8.2
Local Voters' Pamphlet
Sec. 813 RCW 29.81A.010 and 1984 c 106 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
AUTHORIZATION--CONTENTS--FORMAT. At least ninety days before any
primary or general election, or at least forty days before any special
election held under RCW 29.13.010 or 29.13.020, the legislative
authority of any county or first-class or code city may adopt an
ordinance authorizing the publication and distribution of a local
voters' pamphlet. The pamphlet shall provide information on all
measures within that jurisdiction and may, if specified in the
ordinance, include information on candidates within that jurisdiction.
If both a county and a first-class or code city within that county
authorize a local voters' pamphlet for the same election, the pamphlet
shall be produced jointly by the county and the first-class or code
city. If no agreement can be reached between the county and first-class or code city, the county and first-class or code city may each
produce a pamphlet. Any ordinance adopted authorizing a local voters'
pamphlet may be for a specific primary, special election, or general
election or for any future primaries or elections. The format of any
local voters' pamphlet shall, whenever applicable, comply with the
provisions of ((chapters 29.80 and)) chapter 29.81 RCW regarding the
publication of the state candidates' and voters' pamphlets.

Sec. 814 RCW 29.81A.020 and 1994 c 191 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
NOTICE OF PRODUCTION--LOCAL GOVERNMENTS' DECISION TO PARTICIPATE.
(1) Not later than ninety days before the publication and distribution
of a local voters' pamphlet by a county, the county auditor shall
notify each city, town, or special taxing district located wholly
within that county that a pamphlet will be produced.
(2) If a voters' pamphlet is published by the county for a primary
or general election, the pamphlet shall be published for the elective
offices and ballot measures of the county and for the elective offices
and ballot measures of each unit of local government located entirely
within the county which will appear on the ballot at that primary or
election. However, the offices and measures of a first class or code
city shall not be included in the pamphlet if the city publishes and
distributes its own voters' pamphlet for the primary or election for
its offices and measures. The offices and measures of any other town
or city are not required to appear in the county's pamphlet if the town
or city is obligated by ordinance or charter to publish and distribute
a voters' pamphlet for the primary or election for its offices and
measures and it does so.
If the required appearance in a county's voters' pamphlet of the
offices or measures of a unit of local government would create ((undo
[undue])) undue financial hardship for the unit of government, the
legislative authority of the unit may petition the legislative
authority of the county to waive this requirement. The legislative
authority of the county may provide such a waiver if it does so not
later than sixty days before the publication of the pamphlet and it
finds that the requirement would create such hardship.
(3) If a city, town, or district is located within more than one
county, the respective county auditors may enter into an interlocal
agreement to permit the distribution of each county's local voters'
pamphlet into those parts of the city, town, or district located
outside of that county.
(4) If a first-class or code city authorizes the production and
distribution of a local voters' pamphlet, the city clerk of that city
shall notify any special taxing district located wholly within that
city that a pamphlet will be produced. Notification shall be provided
in the manner required or provided for in subsection (1) of this
section.
(5) A unit of local government located within a county and the
county may enter into an interlocal agreement for the publication of a
voters' pamphlet for offices or measures not required by subsection (2)
of this section to appear in a county's pamphlet.

Sec. 815 RCW 29.81A.030 and 1984 c 106 s 5 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ADMINISTRATIVE RULES. The county auditor or, if applicable, the
city clerk of a first-class or code city shall, in consultation with
the participating jurisdictions, adopt and publish administrative rules
necessary to facilitate the provisions of any ordinance authorizing
production of a local voters' pamphlet. Any amendment to such a rule
shall also be adopted and published. Copies of the rules shall
identify the date they were adopted or last amended and shall be made
available to any person upon request. One copy of the rules adopted by
a county auditor and one copy of any amended rules shall be submitted
to the county legislative authority. One copy of the rules adopted by
a city clerk and one copy of any amended rules shall be submitted to
the city legislative authority. These rules shall include but not be
limited to the following:
(1) Deadlines for decisions by cities, towns, or special taxing
districts on being included in the pamphlet;
(2) Limits on the length and deadlines for submission of arguments
for and against each measure;
(3) The basis for rejection of any explanatory or candidates'
statement or argument deemed to be libelous or otherwise inappropriate.
Any statements by a candidate shall be limited to those about the
candidate himself or herself;
(4) Limits on the length and deadlines for submission of
candidates' statements;
(5) An appeal process in the case of the rejection of any statement
or argument.

Sec. 816 RCW 29.81A.040 and 1984 c 106 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
CONTENTS. The local voters' pamphlet shall include but not be
limited to the following:
(1) Appearing on the cover, the words "official local voters'
pamphlet," the name of the jurisdiction producing the pamphlet, ((the
jurisdictions that have measures or candidates in the pamphlet,)) and
the date of the election or primary;
(2) A list of jurisdictions that have measures or candidates in the
pamphlet;
(3) Information on how a person may register to vote and obtain an
absentee ballot;
(((3))) (4) The text of each measure accompanied by an explanatory
statement prepared by the prosecuting attorney for any county measure
or by the attorney for the jurisdiction submitting the measure if other
than a county measure. All explanatory statements for city, town, or
district measures not approved by the attorney for the jurisdiction
submitting the measure shall be reviewed and approved by the county
prosecuting attorney or city attorney, when applicable, before
inclusion in the pamphlet;
(((4))) (5) The arguments for and against each measure submitted by
committees selected pursuant to RCW 29.81A.080.

Sec. 817 RCW 29.81A.050 and 1984 c 106 s 7 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CANDIDATES, WHEN INCLUDED. If the legislative authority of a
county or first-class or code city provides for the inclusion of
candidates in the local voters' pamphlet, the pamphlet shall include
the statements from candidates and may also include those candidates'
photographs.

Sec. 818 RCW 29.81A.060 and 1984 c 106 s 8 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
MAILING. As soon as practicable before the primary, special
election, or general election, the county auditor, or if applicable,
the city clerk of a first-class or code city, as appropriate, shall
mail the local voters' pamphlet to every residence in each jurisdiction
that has included information in the pamphlet. The county auditor or
city clerk, as appropriate, may choose to mail the pamphlet to each
registered voter in each jurisdiction that has included information in
the pamphlet, if in his or her judgment, a more economical and
effective distribution of the pamphlet would result. If the county or
city chooses to mail the pamphlet to each residence, no notice of
election otherwise required by RCW 29.27.080 need be published.

Sec. 819 RCW 29.81A.070 and 1984 c 106 s 9 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
COST. The cost of a local voters' pamphlet shall be considered an
election cost to those local jurisdictions included in the pamphlet and
shall be prorated in the manner provided in RCW 29.13.045.

Sec. 820 RCW 29.81A.080 and 1994 c 191 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ARGUMENTS ADVOCATING APPROVAL AND DISAPPROVAL--PREPARATION BY
COMMITTEES. For each measure from a unit of local government that is
included in a local voters' pamphlet, the legislative authority of that
jurisdiction shall, not later than forty-five days before the
publication of the pamphlet, formally appoint a committee to prepare
arguments advocating voters' approval of the measure and shall formally
appoint a committee to prepare arguments advocating voters' rejection
of the measure. The authority shall appoint persons known to favor the
measure to serve on the committee advocating approval and shall,
whenever possible, appoint persons known to oppose the measure to serve
on the committee advocating rejection. Each committee shall have not
more than three members, however, a committee may seek the advice of
any person or persons. If the legislative authority of a unit of local
government fails to make such appointments by the prescribed deadline,
the county auditor shall whenever possible make the appointments.

PART 9
BALLOTS AND OTHER VOTING FORMS
Sec. 901 RCW 29.27.020 and 1990 c 59 s 8 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CERTIFYING PRIMARY CANDIDATES. On or before the day following the
last day for political parties to fill vacancies in the ticket as
provided by RCW 29.18.150, the secretary of state shall certify to each
county auditor a list of the candidates who have filed declarations of
candidacy in his or her office for the primary. For each office, the
certificate shall include the name of each candidate, his or her
address, and his or her party designation, if any.

Sec. 902 RCW 29.27.057 and 2000 c 197 s 7 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CONSTITUTIONAL MEASURES--BALLOT TITLE--FORMULATION, BALLOT DISPLAY,
CERTIFICATION. (1) When a proposed constitutional amendment is to be
submitted to the people of the state for statewide popular vote, the
ballot title consists of: (a) A statement of the subject of the
amendment; (b) a concise description of the amendment; and (c) a
question in the form prescribed in this section. The statement of the
subject of a constitutional amendment must be sufficiently broad to
reflect the nature of the amendment, sufficiently precise to give
notice of the amendment's subject matter, and not exceed ten words.
The concise description must contain no more than thirty words, give a
true and impartial description of the amendment's essential contents,
clearly identify the amendment to be voted on, and not, to the extent
reasonably possible, create prejudice either for or against the
amendment.
The ballot title for a proposed constitutional amendment must be
displayed on the ballot substantially as follows:

"The legislature has proposed a constitutional amendment on
(statement of subject). This amendment would (concise
description). Should this constitutional amendment be:

Approved . . . . . . . . . . . .

Rejected . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(2) When a proposed new constitution is submitted to the people of
the state by a constitutional convention for statewide popular vote,
the ballot title consists of: (a) A concise description of the new
constitution; and (b) a question in the form prescribed in this
section. The concise description must contain no more than thirty
words, give a true and impartial description of the new constitution's
essential contents, clearly identify the proposed constitution to be
voted on, and not, to the extent reasonably possible, create prejudice
either for or against the new constitution.
The ballot title for a proposed new constitution must be displayed
on the ballot substantially as follows:

"The constitutional convention approved a new proposed state
constitution that (concise description). Should this proposed
constitution be:

Approved . . . . . . . . . . . .

Rejected . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(3) The legislature may specify the statement of subject or concise
description, or both, in a constitutional amendment that it submits to
the people. If the legislature fails to specify the statement of
subject or concise description, or both, the attorney general shall
prepare the material that was not specified. The statement of subject
and concise description as so provided must be included as part of the
ballot title unless changed on appeal.
The attorney general shall specify the concise description for a
proposed new constitution that is submitted to the people by a
constitutional convention, and the concise description as so provided
must be included as part of the ballot title unless changed on appeal.
(4) The secretary of state shall certify to the county auditors the
ballot title for a proposed constitution, constitutional amendment, or
other statewide question at the same time and in the same manner as the
ballot titles to initiatives and referendums.

Sec. 903 RCW 29.27.061 and 2000 c 197 s 8 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CONSTITUTIONAL MEASURES -- BALLOT TITLE -- FILING. The ballot title
for a constitutional amendment or proposed constitution must be filed
with the secretary of state in the same manner as the ballot title and
summary for a state initiative or referendum are filed.

Sec. 904 RCW 29.27.065 and 2000 c 197 s 9 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CONSTITUTIONAL, STATEWIDE QUESTIONS -- NOTICE OF BALLOT TITLE AND
SUMMARY. Upon the filing of a ballot title under RCW 29.27.057 or
29.27.0653, the secretary of state shall provide notice of the exact
language of the ballot title and summary to the chief clerk of the
house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and the prime
sponsor of measure.

Sec. 905 RCW 29.27.0653 and 2000 c 197 s 10 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
STATEWIDE QUESTION -- BALLOT TITLE -- FORMULATION, BALLOT DISPLAY. (1)
If the legislature submits a question to the people for a statewide
popular vote that is not governed by RCW 29.79.035 or 29.27.057, the
ballot title on the question consists of: (a) A description of the
subject; and (b) a question in the form prescribed in this section.
The statement of the subject of the question must be sufficiently broad
to reflect the subject of the question, sufficiently precise to give
notice of the question's subject matter, and not exceed ten words. The
question must contain no more than thirty words.
The ballot title for such a question must be displayed on the
ballot substantially as follows:

"The following question concerning (description of subject) has
been submitted to the voters: (Question as submitted).

Yes . . . . . . . . . . . .

No . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(2) The legislature may specify the statement of subject for a
question and shall specify the question that it submits to the people.
If the legislature fails to specify the statement of subject, the
attorney general shall prepare the statement of subject. The statement
of subject and question as so provided must be included as part of the
ballot title unless changed on appeal.

Sec. 906 RCW 29.27.0655 and 2000 c 197 s 11 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CONSTITUTIONAL, STATEWIDE QUESTIONS -- BALLOT TITLE -- APPEAL. If any
persons are dissatisfied with the ballot title for a proposed
constitution, constitutional amendment, or question submitted under RCW
29.27.0653, they may at any time within ten days from the time of the
filing of the ballot title and summary, not including Saturdays,
Sundays, or legal holidays, appeal to the superior court of Thurston
county by petition setting forth the measure, the ballot title objected
to, their objections to it, and praying for amendment of the ballot
title. The time of the filing of the ballot title, as used in this
section for establishing the time for appeal, is the time the ballot
title is first filed with the secretary of state.
A copy of the petition on appeal together with a notice that an
appeal has been taken must be served upon the secretary of state, the
attorney general, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, and
the secretary of the senate. Upon the filing of the petition on
appeal, the court shall immediately, or at the time to which a hearing
may be adjourned by consent of the appellants, examine the proposed
measure, the ballot title filed, and the objections to it and may hear
arguments on it, and shall as soon as possible render its decision and
certify to and file with the secretary of state a ballot title that it
determines will meet the requirements of this chapter. The decision of
the superior court is final, and the ballot title so certified will be
the established ballot title. The appeal must be heard without cost to
either party.

Sec. 907 RCW 29.27.066 and 2000 c 197 s 12 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
LOCAL MEASURES--BALLOT TITLE -- FORMULATION -- ADVERTISING. (1) Except
as provided to the contrary in RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021, or 82.80.090,
the ballot title of any referendum filed on an enactment or portion of
an enactment of a local government and any other question submitted to
the voters of a local government consists of three elements: (a) An
identification of the enacting legislative body and a statement of the
subject matter; (b) a concise description of the measure; and (c) a
question. The ballot title must conform with the requirements and be
displayed substantially as provided under RCW 29.79.035, except that
the concise description must not exceed seventy-five words. If the
local governmental unit is a city or a town, the concise statement
shall be prepared by the city or town attorney. If the local
governmental unit is a county, the concise statement shall be prepared
by the prosecuting attorney of the county. If the unit is a unit of
local government other than a city, town, or county, the concise
statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting attorney of the county
within which the majority area of the unit is located.
(2) A referendum measure on the enactment of a unit of local
government shall be advertised in the manner provided for nominees for
elective office.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if another
provision of law specifies the ballot title for a specific type of
ballot question or proposition.

Sec. 908 RCW 29.27.0665 and 2000 c 197 s 13 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
LOCAL MEASURES -- BALLOT TITLE -- NOTICE. Upon the filing of a ballot
title of a question to be submitted to the people of a county or
municipality, the county auditor shall provide notice of the exact
language of the ballot title to the persons proposing the measure, the
county or municipality, and to any other person requesting a copy of
the ballot title.

Sec. 909 RCW 29.27.067 and 2000 c 197 s 14 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
LOCAL MEASURES -- BALLOT TITLE -- APPEAL. If any persons are
dissatisfied with the ballot title for a local ballot measure that was
formulated by the city attorney or prosecuting attorney preparing the
same, they may at any time within ten days from the time of the filing
of the ballot title, not including Saturdays, Sundays, and legal
holidays, appeal to the superior court of the county where the question
is to appear on the ballot, by petition setting forth the measure, the
ballot title objected to, their objections to it, and praying for
amendment of it. The time of the filing of the ballot title, as used
in this section in determining the time for appeal, is the time the
ballot title is first filed with the county auditor.
A copy of the petition on appeal together with a notice that an
appeal has been taken shall be served upon the county auditor and the
official preparing the ballot title. Upon the filing of the petition
on appeal, the court shall immediately, or at the time to which a
hearing may be adjourned by consent of the appellants, examine the
proposed measure, the ballot title filed, and the objections to it and
may hear arguments on it, and shall as soon as possible render its
decision and certify to and file with the county auditor a ballot title
that it determines will meet the requirements of this chapter. The
decision of the superior court is final, and the ballot title or
statement so certified will be the established ballot title. The
appeal must be heard without cost to either party.

Sec. 910 RCW 29.30.005 and 1990 c 59 s 93 are each amended to
read as follows:
NAMES ON PRIMARY BALLOT. Except for the candidates for the
positions of president and vice president or for a partisan or
nonpartisan office for which no primary is required, the names of all
candidates who ((have)), under this title, filed ((for nomination under
chapter 29.18 RCW and those)) a declaration of candidacy, were
certified as a candidate to fill a vacancy on a major party ticket, or
were nominated as an independent ((candidates and candidates of)) or
minor ((political parties who have been nominated under chapter 29.24
RCW shall)) party candidate will appear on the appropriate ballot at
the primary throughout the jurisdiction in which they are to be
nominated.

Sec. 911 RCW 29.30.010 and 1990 c 59 s 10 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
UNIFORMITY, ARRANGEMENT, CONTENTS REQUIRED. Every ballot for a
single combination of issues and offices shall be uniform within a
precinct and shall identify the type of primary or election, the
county, and the date of the primary or election, and the ballot or
voting device shall contain instructions on the proper method of
recording a vote, including write-in votes. Each position, together
with the names of the candidates for that office, shall be clearly
separated from other offices or positions in the same jurisdiction.
The offices in each jurisdiction shall be clearly separated from each
other. No paper ballot or ballot card may be marked in any way that
would permit the identification of the person who voted that ballot.

Sec. 912 RCW 29.30.020 and 2001 c 30 s 5 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ORDER OF OFFICES AND ISSUES -- PARTY INDICATION. (1) The positions
or offices on a primary ballot shall be arranged in substantially the
following order: United States senator; United States representative;
governor; lieutenant governor; secretary of state; state treasurer;
state auditor; attorney general; commissioner of public lands;
superintendent of public instruction; insurance commissioner; state
senator; state representative; county officers; justices of the supreme
court; judges of the court of appeals; judges of the superior court;
and judges of the district court. For all other jurisdictions on the
primary ballot, the offices in each jurisdiction shall be grouped
together and be in the order of the position numbers assigned to those
offices, if any.
(2) The order of the positions or offices on an election ballot
shall be substantially the same as on a primary ballot except that the
offices of president and vice president of the United States shall
precede all other offices on a presidential election ballot. State
ballot issues shall be placed before all offices on an election ballot.
The positions on a ballot to be assigned to ballot measures regarding
local units of government shall be established by the secretary of
state by rule.
(3) The political party or independent candidacy of each candidate
for partisan office shall be indicated next to the name of the
candidate on the primary and election ballot. A candidate shall file
a written notice with the filing officer within three business days
after the close of the filing period designating the political party to
be indicated next to the candidate's name on the ballot if either: (a)
The candidate has been nominated by two or more minor political parties
or independent conventions; or (b) the candidate has both filed a
declaration of candidacy declaring an affiliation with a major
political party and been nominated by a minor political party or
independent convention. If no written notice is filed the filing
officer shall give effect to the party designation shown upon the first
document filed. A candidate may be deemed nominated by a minor party
or independent convention only if all documentation required by chapter
29.24 RCW has been timely filed.

Sec. 913 RCW 29.30.025 and 1990 c 59 s 80 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ORDER OF CANDIDATES ON BALLOTS. After the close of business on the
last day for candidates to file for office, the filing officer shall,
from among those filings made in person and by mail, determine by lot
the order in which the names of those candidates will appear on all
sample and absentee ballots. In the case of candidates for city, town,
and district office, this procedure shall also determine the order for
candidate names on the official primary ballot used at the polling
place. The determination shall be done publicly and may be witnessed
by the media and by any candidate. If no primary is required for any
nonpartisan office under RCW 29.15.150 or 29.21.015, the names shall
appear on the general election ballot in the order determined by lot.

Sec. 914 RCW 29.30.040 and 1990 c 59 s 94 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PRIMARIES -- ROTATING NAMES OF CANDIDATES. At primaries, the names
of candidates for federal, state, and county partisan offices, for the
office of superintendent of public instruction, and for judicial
offices shall, for each office or position, be arranged initially in
the order determined under RCW 29.30.025. Additional sets of ballots
shall be prepared in which the positions of the names of all candidates
for each office or position shall be changed as many times as there are
candidates in the office or position in which there are the greatest
number of names. As nearly as possible an equal number of ballots
shall be prepared after each change. In making the changes of position
between each set of ballots, the candidates for each such office in the
first position under the office heading shall be moved to the last
position under that office heading, and each other name shall be moved
up to the position immediately above its previous position under that
office heading. The effect of this rotation of the order of the names
shall be that the name of each candidate for an office or position
shall appear first, second, and so forth for that office or position on
the ballots of a nearly equal number of registered voters in that
jurisdiction. In a precinct using voting devices, the names of the
candidates for each office shall appear in only one sequence in that
precinct. The names of candidates for city, town, and district office
on the ballot at the primary shall not be rotated.

Sec. 915 RCW 29.30.060 and 1991 c 363 s 33 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
SAMPLE BALLOTS. Except in each county with a population of one
million or more, on or before the fifteenth day before a primary or
election, the county auditor shall prepare a sample ballot which shall
be made readily available to members of the public. The secretary of
state shall adopt rules governing the preparation of sample ballots in
counties with a population of one million or more. The rules shall
permit, among other alternatives, the preparation of more than one
sample ballot by a county with a population of one million or more for
a primary or election, each of which lists a portion of the offices and
issues to be voted on in that county. The position of precinct
committee officer shall be shown on the sample ballot for the general
election, but the names of candidates for the individual positions need
not be shown.

Sec. 916 RCW 29.30.081 and 1990 c 59 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
ARRANGEMENT OF INSTRUCTIONS, MEASURES, OFFICES -- ORDER OF
CANDIDATES -- NUMBERING OF BALLOTS. (1) On the top of each ballot there
((shall)) will be printed instructions directing the voters how to mark
the ballot, including write-in votes. After the instructions and
before the offices ((shall be placed)), the questions of adopting
constitutional amendments or any other state measure authorized by law
to be submitted to the voters at that election will be placed.
(2) The candidate or candidates of the major political party
((which)) that received the highest number of votes from the electors
of this state for the office of president of the United States at the
last presidential election ((shall)) will appear first following the
appropriate office heading, the candidate or candidates of the other
major political parties ((shall)) will follow according to the votes
cast for their nominees for president at the last presidential
election, and independent candidates and the candidate or candidates of
all other parties ((shall)) will follow in the order of their
qualification with the secretary of state.
(3) The names of candidates for president and vice president for
each political party ((shall)) must be grouped together with a single
response position for a voter to indicate his or her choice.
(4) All paper ballots and ballot cards ((shall)) used at a polling
place must be sequentially numbered in such a way to permit removal of
such numbers without leaving any identifying marks on the ballot.

Sec. 917 RCW 29.30.085 and 1992 c 181 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
NONPARTISAN CANDIDATES QUALIFIED FOR GENERAL ELECTION. (1) Except
as provided in RCW 29.30.086 and in subsection (2) of this section, on
the ballot at the general election for a nonpartisan office for which
a primary was held, only the names of the candidate who received the
greatest number of votes and the candidate who received the next
greatest number of votes for that office shall appear under the title
of that office, and the names shall appear in that order. If a primary
was conducted, no candidate's name may be printed on the subsequent
general election ballot unless he or she receives at least one percent
of the total votes cast for that office at the preceding primary. On
the ballot at the general election for any other nonpartisan office for
which no primary was held, the names of the candidates shall be listed
in the order determined under RCW 29.30.025.
(2) On the ballot at the general election for the office of justice
of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the
superior court, or state superintendent of public instruction, if a
candidate in a contested primary receives a majority of all the votes
cast for that office or position, only the name of that candidate may
be printed under the title of the office for that position.

Sec. 918 RCW 29.30.086 and 1992 c 181 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DISQUALIFIED CANDIDATES IN NONPARTISAN ELECTIONS -- SPECIAL
PROCEDURES. This section applies if a candidate for an elective office
of a city, town, or special purpose district would, under this chapter,
otherwise qualify to have his or her name printed on the general
election ballot for the office, but the candidate has been declared to
be unqualified to hold the office by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(1) In a case in which a primary is conducted for the office:
(a) If ballots for the general election for the office have not
been ordered by the county auditor, the candidate who received the
third greatest number of votes for the office at the primary shall
qualify as a candidate for general election and that candidate's name
shall be printed on the ballot for the office in lieu of the name of
the disqualified candidate.
(b) If general election ballots for the office have been so
ordered, votes cast for the disqualified candidate at the general
election for the office shall not be counted for that office.
(2) In a case in which a primary is not conducted for the office:
(a) If ballots for the general election for the office have not
been ordered by the county auditor, the name of the disqualified
candidate shall not appear on the general election ballot for the
office.
(b) If general election ballots for the office have been so
ordered, votes cast for the disqualified candidate at the general
election for the office shall not be counted for that office.
(3) If the disqualified candidate is the only candidate to have
filed for the office during a regular or special filing period for the
office, a void in candidacy for the office exists.

Sec. 919 RCW 29.30.095 and 1990 c 59 s 96 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PARTISAN CANDIDATES QUALIFIED FOR GENERAL ELECTION. The name of a
candidate for a partisan office for which a primary was conducted shall
not be printed on the ballot for that office at the subsequent general
election unless the candidate receives a number of votes equal to at
least one percent of the total number cast for all candidates for that
position sought and a plurality of the votes cast for the candidates of
his or her party for that office at the preceding primary.

Sec. 920 RCW 29.30.101 and 1999 c 298 s 11 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
NAMES QUALIFIED TO APPEAR ON BALLOT. The names of the persons
certified as nominees by the secretary of state or the county
canvassing board shall be printed on the ballot at the ensuing
election.
No name of any candidate whose nomination at a primary is required
by law shall be placed upon the ballot at a general or special election
unless it appears upon the certificate of either (1) the secretary of
state, or (2) the county canvassing board, or (3) a minor party
convention or the state or county central committee of a major
political party to fill a vacancy on its ticket under RCW 29.18.160.
Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a temporary
elected position such as a charter review board member or freeholder,
a candidate's name shall not appear more than once upon a ballot for a
position regularly nominated or elected at the same election.

Sec. 921 RCW 29.30.111 and 1999 c 224 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PROPERTY TAX LEVIES -- BALLOT PROPOSITION FORM. (1) The ballot
proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose the regular
property tax levies authorized in RCW 36.69.145, 67.38.130, or
84.52.069 shall contain in substance the following:
"Shall the . . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose regular property tax levies of . . . . . . (insert
the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
for each of . . . . . . (insert the maximum number of years allowable)
consecutive years?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
Each voter shall indicate either "Yes" or "No" on his or her ballot
in accordance with the procedures established under this title.
(2) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
a permanent regular tax levy under RCW 84.52.069 shall contain the
following:
"Shall the . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose a PERMANENT regular property levy of . . . . .
(insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

Sec. 922 RCW 29.30.130 and 1990 c 59 s 16 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
EXPENSE OF PRINTING AND DISTRIBUTING BALLOT MATERIALS. The cost of
printing ballots, ballot cards, and instructions and the delivery of
this material to the precinct election officers shall be an election
cost that shall be borne as determined under RCW 29.13.045 and
29.13.047, as appropriate.

PART 10
ABSENTEE VOTING
Sec. 1001 RCW 29.36.210 and 2001 c 241 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
WHEN PERMITTED. Any registered voter of the state or any out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter may vote by absentee
ballot in any general election, special election, or primary in the
manner provided in this chapter. Out-of-state voters, overseas voters,
and service voters are authorized to cast the same ballots, including
those for special elections, as a registered voter of the state would
receive under this chapter.

Sec. 1002 RCW 29.36.220 and 2001 c 241 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
REQUEST FOR SINGLE ABSENTEE BALLOT. (1) Except as otherwise
provided by law, a registered voter or out-of-state voter, overseas
voter, or service voter desiring to cast an absentee ballot at a single
election or primary must request the absentee ballot from his or her
county auditor no earlier than ninety days nor later than the day
before the election or primary at which the person seeks to vote.
Except as otherwise provided by law, the request may be made orally in
person, by telephone, electronically, or in writing. An application or
request for an absentee ballot made under the authority of a federal
statute or regulation will be considered and given the same effect as
a request for an absentee ballot under this chapter.
(2) A voter requesting an absentee ballot for a primary may also
request an absentee ballot for the following general election. A
request by an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter for
an absentee ballot for a primary election will be considered as a
request for an absentee ballot for the following general election.
(3) In requesting an absentee ballot, the voter shall state the
address to which the absentee ballot should be sent. A request for an
absentee ballot from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service
voter must include the address of the last residence in the state of
Washington and either a written application or the oath on the return
envelope must include a declaration of the other qualifications of the
applicant as an elector of this state. A request for an absentee
ballot from any other voter must state the address at which that voter
is currently registered to vote in the state of Washington or the
county auditor shall verify that information from the voter
registration records of the county.
(4) A request for an absentee ballot from a registered voter who is
within this state must be made directly to the auditor of the county in
which the voter is registered. An absentee ballot request from a
registered voter who is temporarily outside this state or from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter may be made either to
the appropriate county auditor or to the secretary of state, who shall
promptly forward the request to the appropriate county auditor.
(5) No person, organization, or association may distribute absentee
ballot applications within this state that contain a return address
other than that of the appropriate county auditor.

Sec. 1003 RCW 29.36.230 and 2001 c 241 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REQUEST ON BEHALF OF FAMILY MEMBER. A member of a registered
voter's family may request an absentee ballot on behalf of and for use
by the voter. As a means of ensuring that a person who requests an
absentee ballot is requesting the ballot for only that person or a
member of the person's immediate family, an auditor may require a
person who requests an absentee ballot to identify the date of birth of
the voter for whom the ballot is requested and deny a request that is
not accompanied by this information.

Sec. 1004 RCW 29.36.240 and 2001 c 241 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ONGOING ABSENTEE STATUS -- REQUEST -- TERMINATION. Any registered
voter may apply, in writing, for status as an ongoing absentee voter.
Each qualified applicant shall automatically receive an absentee ballot
for each ensuing election or primary for which the voter is entitled to
vote and need not submit a separate request for each election. Ballots
received from ongoing absentee voters shall be validated, processed,
and tabulated in the same manner as other absentee ballots.
Status as an ongoing absentee voter shall be terminated upon any of
the following events:
(1) The written request of the voter;
(2) The death or disqualification of the voter;
(3) The cancellation of the voter's registration record;
(4) The return of an ongoing absentee ballot as undeliverable; or
(5) Upon placing a voter on inactive status under RCW 29.10.071.

Sec. 1005 RCW 29.36.250 and 2001 c 241 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
SPECIAL ABSENTEE BALLOTS. (1) As provided in this section, county
auditors shall provide special absentee ballots to be used for state
primary or state general elections. An auditor shall provide a special
absentee ballot only to a registered voter who completes an application
stating that she or he will be unable to vote and return a regular
absentee ballot by normal mail delivery within the period provided for
regular absentee ballots.
The application for a special absentee ballot may not be filed
earlier than ninety days before the applicable state primary or general
election. The special absentee ballot will list the offices and
measures, if known, scheduled to appear on the state primary or general
election ballot. The voter may use the special absentee ballot to
write in the name of any eligible candidate for each office and vote on
any measure.
(2) With any special absentee ballot issued under this section, the
county auditor shall include a listing of any candidates who have filed
before the time of the application for offices that will appear on the
ballot at that primary or election and a list of any issues that have
been referred to the ballot before the time of the application.
(3) Write-in votes on special absentee ballots must be counted in
the same manner provided by law for the counting of other write-in
votes. The county auditor shall process and canvass the special
absentee ballots provided under this section in the same manner as
other absentee ballots under ((chapters 29.36)) this chapter and
chapter 29.62 RCW (as recodified by this act).
(4) A voter who requests a special absentee ballot under this
section may also request an absentee ballot under RCW 29.36.220(4). If
the regular absentee ballot is properly voted and returned, the special
absentee ballot is void, and the county auditor shall reject it in
whole when special absentee ballots are canvassed.

Sec. 1006 RCW 29.36.260 and 2001 c 241 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
ISSUANCE OF BALLOT AND OTHER MATERIALS. (1) The county auditor
shall issue an absentee ballot for the primary or election for which it
was requested, or for the next occurring primary or election when
ongoing absentee status has been requested if the information contained
in a request for an absentee ballot or ongoing absentee status received
by the county auditor is complete and correct and the applicant is
qualified to vote under federal or state law. Otherwise, the county
auditor shall notify the applicant of the reason or reasons why the
request cannot be accepted. Whenever two or more candidates have filed
for the position of precinct committee officer for the same party in
the same precinct at a general election held in an even-numbered year,
the contest for that position must be presented to absentee voters from
that precinct by either including the contest on the regular absentee
ballot or a separate absentee ballot. The ballot must provide space
designated for writing in the name of additional candidates.
(2) A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot if the
ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by the voter. The
voter may obtain the ballot by telephone request, by mail,
electronically, or in person. The county auditor shall keep a record
of each replacement ballot provided under this subsection.
(3) A copy of the state voters' ((and candidates')) pamphlet must
be sent to registered voters temporarily outside the state, out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters along with the
absentee ballot if such a pamphlet has been prepared for the primary or
election and is available to the county auditor at the time of mailing.
The county auditor shall mail all absentee ballots and related material
to voters outside the territorial limits of the United States and the
District of Columbia under 39 U.S.C. 3406.

Sec. 1007 RCW 29.36.270 and 1987 c 54 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DATE BALLOTS READY. Except where a recount or litigation under RCW
29.04.030 is pending, the county auditor shall have sufficient absentee
ballots ready to mail to absentee voters of that county at least twenty
days before any primary, general election, or special election.

Sec. 1008 RCW 29.36.280 and 2001 c 241 s 7 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DELIVERY OF BALLOT, QUALIFICATIONS FOR. The delivery of an
absentee ballot for any primary or election shall be subject to the
following qualifications:
(1) Only the registered voter personally, or a member of the
registered voter's immediate family may pick up an absentee ballot for
the voter at the office of the issuing officer unless the voter is a
resident of a health care facility, as defined by RCW 70.37.020(3), on
election day and applies by messenger for an absentee ballot. In this
latter case, the messenger may pick up the voter's absentee ballot.
(2) Except as noted in subsection (1) of this section, the issuing
officer shall mail or deliver the absentee ballot directly to each
applicant.

Sec. 1009 RCW 29.36.290 and 2001 c 241 s 8 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ENVELOPES AND INSTRUCTIONS. The county auditor shall send each
absentee voter a ballot, a security envelope in which to seal the
ballot after voting, a larger envelope in which to return the security
envelope, and instructions on how to mark the ballot and how to return
it to the county auditor. The larger return envelope must contain a
declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her qualifications
and stating that he or she has not voted in any other jurisdiction at
this election, together with a summary of the penalties for any
violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The return
envelope must provide space for the voter to indicate the date on which
the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the oath. A summary of
the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter must be printed on
the return envelope immediately adjacent to the space for the voter's
signature. The signature of the voter on the return envelope must
affirm and attest to the statements regarding the qualifications of
that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters, the signed declaration on the
return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a voter registration for
the election or primary for which the ballot has been issued. The
voter must be instructed to either return the ballot to the county
auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first class postage,
if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate county auditor no
later than the day of the election or primary for which the ballot was
issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

Sec. 1010 RCW 29.36.300 and 2001 c 241 s 9 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
OBSERVERS. County auditors must request that observers be
appointed by the major political parties to be present during the
processing of absentee ballots. The absence of the observers will not
prevent the processing of absentee ballots if the county auditor has
requested their presence.

Sec. 1011 RCW 29.36.310 and 2001 c 241 s 10 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PROCESSING INCOMING BALLOTS. (1) The opening and subsequent
processing of return envelopes for any primary or election may begin on
or after the tenth day before the primary or election. The tabulation
of absentee ballots must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day
of the primary or election.
(2) After opening the return envelopes, the county canvassing board
shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until after 8:00 p.m.
of the day of the primary or election. Absentee ballots that are to be
tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system may be taken from the
inner envelopes and all the normal procedural steps may be performed to
prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the return envelope that contains the
security envelope and absentee ballot. They shall verify that the
voter's signature on the return envelope is the same as the signature
of that voter in the registration files of the county. For registered
voters casting absentee ballots, the date on the return envelope to
which the voter has attested determines the validity, as to the time of
voting for that absentee ballot if the postmark is missing or is
illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters, the date on the return envelope to which the voter has attested
determines the validity as to the time of voting for that absentee
ballot. For any absentee ballot, a variation between the signature of
the voter on the return envelope and the signature of that voter in the
registration files due to the substitution of initials or the use of
common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting
are clearly the same.

Sec. 1012 RCW 29.36.320 and 2001 c 241 s 11 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REPORT OF COUNT. The absentee ballots must be reported at a
minimum on a congressional and legislative district basis. Absentee
ballots may be counted by congressional or legislative district or by
individual precinct, except as required under RCW 29.62.090(2).
These returns must be added to the total of the votes cast at the
polling places.

Sec. 1013 RCW 29.36.340 and 1991 c 81 s 33 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RECORD OF REQUESTS -- PUBLIC ACCESS. Each county auditor shall
maintain in his or her office, open for public inspection, a record of
the requests he or she has received for absentee ballots under this
chapter.
The information from the requests shall be recorded and lists of
this information shall be available no later than twenty-four hours
after their receipt.
This information about absentee voters shall be available according
to the date of the requests and by legislative district. It shall
include the name of each applicant, the address and precinct in which
the voter maintains a voting residence, the date on which an absentee
ballot was issued to this voter, if applicable, the type of absentee
ballot, and the address to which the ballot was or is to be mailed, if
applicable.
The auditor shall make copies of these records available to the
public for the actual cost of production or copying.

Sec. 1014 RCW 29.36.350 and 2001 c 241 s 13 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CHALLENGES. The qualifications of any absentee voter may be
challenged at the time the signature on the return envelope is verified
and the ballot is processed by the canvassing board. The board has the
authority to determine the legality of any absentee ballot challenged
under this section. Challenged ballots must be handled in accordance
with chapter 29.10 RCW.

Sec. 1015 RCW 29.36.360 and 1993 c 417 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The secretary of state shall adopt rules to:
(1) Establish standards and procedures to prevent fraud and to
facilitate the accurate processing and canvassing of absentee ballots
and mail ballots;
(2) Establish standards and procedures to guarantee the secrecy of
absentee ballots and mail ballots;
(3) Provide uniformity among the counties of the state in the
conduct of absentee voting and mail ballot elections; and
(4) Facilitate the operation of the provisions of this chapter
regarding out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters.))
The secretary of state shall produce and furnish envelopes and
instructions for out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters to the county auditors.

PART 11
POLLING PLACE ELECTIONS AND POLL WORKERSSubpart 11.1
General Provisions
Sec. 1101 RCW 29.51.010 and 1990 c 59 s 39 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
INTERFERENCE WITH VOTER PROHIBITED. No person may interfere with
a voter in any way within the polling place. This does not prevent the
voter from receiving assistance in preparing his or her ballot as
provided in RCW 29.51.200.

Sec. 1102 RCW 29.51.125 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 83 are each
amended to read as follows:
DETERMINATION OF WHO HAS AND WHO HAS NOT VOTED. At any election,
general or special, or at any primary, any political party or committee
may designate a person other than a precinct election officer, for each
polling place to check a list of registered voters of the precinct to
determine who has and who has not voted((: PROVIDED, That such)). The
lists ((shall)) must be furnished by the party or committee concerned.

Sec. 1103 RCW 29.51.180 and 1990 c 59 s 47 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
TAKING PAPERS INTO VOTING BOOTH. Any voter may take into the
voting booth or voting device any printed or written material to assist
in casting his or her vote. The voter shall not use this material to
electioneer and shall remove the material when he or she leaves the
polls.

Sec. 1104 RCW 29.51.190 and 1990 c 59 s 48 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
OFFICIAL BALLOTS -- VOTE ONLY ONCE -- INCORRECTLY MARKED BALLOTS. No
ballots may be used in any polling place other than those prepared by
the county auditor. No voter is entitled to vote more than once at a
primary or a general or special election, except that if a voter
incorrectly marks a ballot, he or she may return it and be issued a new
ballot. The precinct election officers shall void the incorrectly
marked ballot and return it to the county auditor.

Sec. 1105 RCW 29.54.037 and 1999 c 158 s 10 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
BALLOT PICK UP, DELIVERY, AND TRANSPORTATION. (1) At the direction
of the county auditor, a team or teams composed of a representative of
at least two major political parties shall stop at designated polling
places and pick up the sealed containers of voted, untallied ballots
for delivery to the counting center. There may be more than one
delivery from each polling place. Two precinct election officials,
representing two major political parties, shall seal the voted ballots
in containers furnished by the county auditor and properly identified
with his or her address with uniquely prenumbered seals.
(2) At the counting center or the collection stations where the
sealed ballot containers are delivered by the designated
representatives of the major political parties, the county auditor or
a designated representative of the county auditor shall receive the
sealed ballot containers, record the time, date, precinct name or
number, and seal number of each ballot container.

Sec. 1106 RCW 29.48.010 and 1999 c 158 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
VOTING BOOTHS. The county auditor shall provide in each polling
place a sufficient number of voting booths or voting devices along with
any supplies necessary to enable the voter to mark or register his or
her choices on the ballot and within which the voters may cast their
votes in secrecy.

Sec. 1107 RCW 29.13.080 and 1973 c 78 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
OPENING AND CLOSING POLLS. At all primaries and elections, general
or special, in all counties the polls must be kept open from seven
o'clock a.m. to eight o'clock p.m. All qualified electors who are at
the polling place at eight o'clock p.m., shall be allowed to cast their
votes.

Sec. 1108 RCW 29.51.240 and 1990 c 59 s 50 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
POLLS OPEN CONTINUOUSLY -- ANNOUNCEMENT OF CLOSING. The polls for a
precinct shall remain open continuously until the time specified under
RCW 29.13.080. At that time, the precinct election officers shall
announce that the polls for that precinct are closed.

Sec. 1109 RCW 29.51.185 and 1987 c 346 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
DOUBLE VOTING PROHIBITED. A registered voter shall not be allowed
to vote in the precinct in which he or she is registered at any
election or primary for which that voter has cast an absentee ballot.
A registered voter who has requested an absentee ballot for a primary
or special or general election but chooses to vote at the voter's
precinct polling place in that primary or election shall cast a
provisional ballot ((in the manner prescribed by RCW 29.10.127 for
challenged ballots)). The canvassing board shall not count the ballot
if it finds that the voter has also voted by absentee ballot in that
primary or election.

Subpart 11.2
Procedures
Sec. 1110 RCW 29.48.030 and 1990 c 59 s 36 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DELIVERY OF SUPPLIES. No later than the day before a primary or
election, the county auditor shall provide to the inspector or one of
the judges of each precinct or to one of the inspectors of a polling
place where more than one precinct will be voting, all of the ballots,
precinct lists of registered voters, and other supplies necessary for
conducting the election or primary.

Sec. 1111 RCW 29.07.170 and 1994 c 57 s 19 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DELIVERY OF PRECINCT LISTS TO POLLS. Upon closing of the
registration files preceding an election, the county auditor shall
deliver the precinct lists of registered voters to the inspector or one
of the judges of each precinct or group of precincts located at the
polling place before the polls open.

Sec. 1112 RCW 29.48.035 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 82 are each
amended to read as follows:
ADDITIONAL SUPPLIES FOR PAPER BALLOTS. In precincts where votes
are cast on paper ballots, the following supplies, in addition to those
specified in RCW 29.48.030 ((as now or hereafter amended, shall)), must
be provided:
(1) Two tally books in which the names of the candidates ((shall))
will be listed in the order in which they appear on the sample ballots
and in each case have the proper party designation at the head thereof;
(2) Two certificates or two sample ballots prepared as blanks, for
recording of the unofficial results by the precinct election officers.

Sec. 1113 RCW 29.57.130 and 1999 c 298 s 17 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
VOTING AND REGISTRATION INSTRUCTIONS AND INFORMATION. (1) Each
county auditor shall provide voting and registration instructions,
printed in large type, to be conspicuously displayed at each polling
place and permanent registration facility.
(2) The county auditor shall make information available for deaf
persons throughout the state by telecommunications.

Sec. 1114 RCW 29.48.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 80 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
TIME FOR ARRIVAL OF OFFICERS. The precinct election officers for
each precinct shall meet at the designated polling place at the time
set by the county auditor.

Sec. 1115 RCW 29.48.070 and 1990 c 59 s 37 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
INSPECTION OF VOTING EQUIPMENT. Before opening the polls for a
precinct, the voting equipment shall be inspected to determine if it
has been properly prepared for voting. If the voting equipment is
capable of direct tabulation of each voter's choices, the precinct
election officers shall verify that no votes have been registered for
any issue or office to be voted on at that primary or election. Any
ballot box shall be carefully examined by the judges of election to
determine that it is empty. The ballot box shall then be sealed or
locked. The ballot box shall not be opened before the certification of
the primary or election except in the manner and for the purposes
provided under this title.

Sec. 1116 RCW 29.48.090 and 1965 c 9 s 29.48.090 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
DISPLAY OF FLAG. At all primaries and elections the flag of the
United States shall be conspicuously displayed in front of each polling
place.

Sec. 1117 RCW 29.48.100 and 1990 c 59 s 38 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ANNOUNCEMENT OPENING THE POLLS. The precinct election officers,
immediately before they start to issue ballots or permit a voter to
vote, shall announce at the place of voting that the polls for that
precinct are open.

Sec. 1118 RCW 29.51.150 and 1990 c 59 s 45 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
VOTING DEVICES -- PERIODIC EXAMINATION. The precinct election
officers shall periodically examine the voting devices to determine if
they have been tampered with.

Sec. 1119 RCW 29.51.050 and 1990 c 59 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
ISSUING BALLOT TO VOTER -- CHALLENGE. A voter desiring to vote shall
give his or her name to the precinct election officer who has the
precinct list of registered voters. This officer shall announce the
name to the precinct election officer who has the copy of the
inspector's poll book for that precinct. If the right of this voter to
participate in the primary or election is not challenged, the voter
((shall)) must be issued a ballot or permitted to enter a voting booth
or to operate a voting device. The number of the ballot or the voter
((shall)) must be recorded by the precinct election officers. If the
right of the voter to participate is challenged, RCW 29.10.125 and
29.10.127 apply to that voter.

Sec. 1120 RCW 29.51.060 and 1990 c 59 s 41 are each amended to
read as follows:
SIGNATURE REQUIRED TO VOTE -- PROCEDURE IF VOTER UNABLE TO SIGN
NAME. ((If any person appears)) Any person desiring to vote at any
primary or election ((as a registered voter in the jurisdiction where
the primary or election is being held, the precinct election officers
shall require the voter)) is required to sign his or her name ((and
current address subject to penalties of perjury in one of)) on the
appropriate precinct list((s)) of registered voters. If the ((person))
voter registered using a mark, or can no longer sign his or her name,
the election officers shall require the ((person offering to vote))
voter to be identified by another registered voter.
((As soon as it is determined that the person is qualified to vote,
one of)) The precinct election officers shall ((enter)) then record the
voter's name ((in a second poll book)).

Sec. 1121 RCW 29.51.100 and 1990 c 59 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
CASTING VOTE. On signing the precinct list of registered voters or
being issued a ballot, the voter shall, without leaving the polling
place, proceed to one of the voting booths or voting devices to cast
his or her vote. ((If the voter was issued a ballot)) When the voter
has finished, he or she shall either (1) remove the ((number)) numbered
stub from the ballot, place the ballot in the ballot box, and return
the number to the precinct election officers, or ((shall)) (2) deliver
((it)) the entire ballot to the precinct election officers, who shall
remove the ((number)) numbered stub from the ballot and place the
ballot in the ballot box.

Sec. 1122 RCW 29.51.070 and 1990 c 59 s 42 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RECORD OF PARTICIPATION. As each voter casts his or her vote, the
precinct election officers shall insert in the poll books or precinct
list of registered voters opposite that voter's name, a notation to
credit the voter with having participated in that primary or election.
The precinct election officers shall record the voter's name so that a
separate record is kept.

Sec. 1123 RCW 29.51.200 and 1981 c 34 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
DISABLED VOTERS. Voting shall be secret except to the extent
necessary to assist sensory or physically ((handicapped)) disabled
voters.
If any voter declares in the presence of the election officers that
because of sensory or physical ((handicap)) disability he or she is
unable to register or record his or her vote, he or she may designate
a person of his or her choice or two election officers from opposite
political parties to enter the voting machine booth with him or her and
record his or her vote as he or she directs.

Sec. 1124 RCW 29.54.018 and 1990 c 59 s 54 are each amended to
read as follows:
TABULATION OF PAPER BALLOTS BEFORE CLOSE OF POLLS. (1) Paper
ballots may be tabulated at the precinct polling place before the
closing of the polls ((under rules adopted by the secretary of state)).
The tabulation of ballots, paper or otherwise, shall be open to the
public, but no persons except those employed and authorized by the
county auditor may touch a ballot card or ballot container or operate
vote tallying equipment.
(2) The results of the tabulation of paper ballots at the polls
shall be delivered to the county auditor as soon as the tabulation is
complete.

Sec. 1125 RCW 29.51.250 and 1990 c 59 s 51 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
VOTERS IN POLLING PLACE AT CLOSING TIME. If at the time of closing
the polls, there are any voters in the polling place who have not
voted, they shall be allowed to vote after the polls have been closed.

Sec. 1126 RCW 29.54.010 and 1990 c 59 s 52 are each amended to
read as follows:
UNUSED BALLOTS. At each precinct immediately after the last
qualified voter has cast his or her vote, the precinct election
officers shall ((identify and seal)) render unusable and secure in a
container all unused ballots for that precinct and ((seal them in a
container to be returned)) return them to the county auditor.

Sec. 1127 RCW 29.54.015 and 1990 c 59 s 53 are each amended to
read as follows:
DUTIES OF ELECTION OFFICERS AFTER SECURING BALLOTS. Immediately
after the ((close of the polls and the completion of voting)) unused
ballots are secure, the precinct election officers shall count the
number of voted ballots and make a record of any discrepancy between
this number and the number of voters who signed the poll book for that
precinct or polling place, complete the certifications in the poll
book, prepare the ballots for transfer to the counting center if
necessary, and seal the voting devices.

Sec. 1128 RCW 29.07.180 and 1994 c 57 s 20 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RETURN OF PRECINCT LISTS AFTER ELECTION -- PUBLIC RECORDS. The
precinct list of registered voters for each precinct or group of
precincts delivered to the precinct election officers for use on the
day of an election held in that precinct shall be returned by them to
the county auditor upon the completion of the count of the votes cast
in the precinct at that election. While in possession of the county
auditor they shall be open to public inspection under such reasonable
rules and regulations as may be prescribed therefor.

Subpart 11.3
Poll-site Ballot Counting Devices
Sec. 1129 RCW 29.48.080 and 1999 c 158 s 6 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
INITIALIZATION. In precincts where poll-site ballot counting
devices are used the election officers, before initializing the device
for voting, shall proceed as follows:
(1) They shall see that the device is placed where it can be
conveniently attended by the election officers and conveniently
operated by the voters;
(2) They shall see whether the number or other designating mark on
the device's seal agrees with the control number provided by the
elections department. If they do not agree they shall at once notify
the elections department and delay initializing the device. The polls
may be opened pending reexamination of the device;
(3) If the numbers do agree, they shall proceed to initialize the
device and see whether the public counter registers "000." If the
counter is found to register a number other than "000," one of the
judges shall at once set the counter at "000" and confirm that the
ballot box is empty;
(4) Before processing any ballots through a poll-site ballot
counting device a zero report must be produced. The inspector and at
least one of the judges shall carefully verify that zero ballots have
been run through the poll-site ballot counting device and that all vote
totals for each office are zero. If the totals are not zero, the
inspector shall either reset the device to zero or contact the
elections department to reset the device and allow voting to continue
using the auxiliary or emergency device.

Sec. 1130 RCW 29.48.045 and 1999 c 158 s 5 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DELIVERY AND SEALING. Whenever poll-site ballot counting devices
are used, the devices may either be included with the supplies required
in RCW 29.48.030 or they may be delivered to the polling place
separately. All poll-site ballot counting devices must be sealed with
a unique numbered seal at the time of final preparation and logic and
accuracy testing. A log must be made of all seal numbers and device
numbers used.

Sec. 1131 RCW 29.54.093 and 1999 c 158 s 11 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
MEMORY PACKS. The programmed memory pack for each poll-site ballot
counting device must be sealed into the device during final preparation
and logic and accuracy testing. Except in the case of a device
breakdown, the memory pack must remain sealed in the device until after
the polls have closed and all reports and telephonic or electronic
transfer of results are completed. After all reporting is complete the
precinct election officers responsible for transferring the sealed
voted ballots under RCW 29.54.075 shall ensure that the memory pack is
returned to the elections department. If the entire poll-site ballot
counting device is returned, the memory pack must remain sealed in the
device. If the poll-site ballot counting device is to remain at the
polling place, the precinct election officer shall break the seal on
the device and remove the memory pack and seal and return it along with
the irregularly voted ballots and special ballots to the elections
department on election day.

Sec. 1132 RCW 29.51.115 and 1999 c 158 s 7 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
INCORRECTLY MARKED BALLOTS. Each poll-site ballot counting device
must be programmed to return all blank ballots and overvoted ballots to
the voter for private reexamination. The election officer shall take
whatever steps are necessary to ensure that the secrecy of the ballot
is maintained. The precinct election officer shall provide information
and instruction on how to properly mark the ballot. The voter may
remark the original ballot, may request a new ballot under RCW
29.51.190, or may choose to complete a special ballot envelope and
return the ballot as a special ballot.

Sec. 1133 RCW 29.51.155 and 1999 c 158 s 8 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
FAILURE OF DEVICE. If a poll-site ballot counting device fails to
operate at any time during polling hours, voting must continue, and the
ballots must be deposited for later tabulation in a secure ballot
compartment separate from the tabulated ballots.

Subpart 11.4
Poll Workers
Sec. 1134 RCW 29.45.010 and 1991 c 106 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
APPOINTMENT OF JUDGES AND INSPECTOR. (1) At least ten days prior
to any primary or election, general or special, the county auditor
shall appoint one inspector and two judges of election for each
precinct (or each combination of precincts temporarily consolidated as
a single precinct for that primary or election), other than those
precincts designated as vote-by-mail precincts pursuant to RCW
((29.36.120)) 29.38.010 (as recodified by this act). Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, the persons appointed shall
be among those whose names are contained on the lists furnished under
RCW 29.45.030 by the chairpersons of the county central committees of
the political parties entitled to representation thereon. Such
precinct election officers, whenever possible, should be residents of
the precinct in which they serve.
(2) The county auditor may delete from the lists of names submitted
to the auditor by the chairpersons of the county central committees
under RCW 29.45.030: (a) The names of those persons who indicate to
the auditor that they cannot or do not wish to serve as precinct
election officers for the primary or election or who otherwise cannot
so serve; and (b) the names of those persons who lack the ability to
conduct properly the duties of an inspector or judge of election after
training in that proper conduct has been made available to them by the
auditor. The lists which are submitted to the auditor in a timely
manner under RCW 29.45.030, less the deletions authorized by this
subsection, constitute the official nomination lists for inspectors and
judges of election.
(3) If the number of persons whose names are on the official
nomination list for a political party is not sufficient to satisfy the
requirements of subsection (4) of this section as it applies to that
political party or is otherwise insufficient to provide the number of
precinct election officials required from that political party, the
auditor shall notify the chair of the party's county central committee
regarding the deficiency. The chair may, within five business days of
being notified by the auditor, add to the party's nomination list the
names of additional persons belonging to that political party who are
qualified to serve on the election boards. To the extent that,
following this procedure, the number of persons whose names appear on
the official nomination lists of the political parties is insufficient
to provide the number of election inspectors and judges required for a
primary or election, the auditor may appoint a properly trained person
whose name does not appear on such a list as an inspector or judge of
election for a precinct.
(4) The county auditor shall designate the inspector and one judge
in each precinct from that political party which polled the highest
number of votes in the county for its candidate for president at the
last preceding presidential election and one judge from that political
party polling the next highest number of votes in the county for its
candidate for president at the same election. The provisions of this
subsection apply only if the number of names on the official nomination
list for inspectors and judges of election for a political party is
sufficient to satisfy the requirements imposed by this subsection.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 29.45.040 for the filling of
vacancies, this shall be the exclusive method for the appointment of
inspectors and judges to serve as precinct election officers at any
primary or election, general or special, and shall supersede the
provisions of any and all other statutes, whether general or special in
nature, having different requirements.

Sec. 1135 RCW 29.45.020 and 1965 ex.s. c 101 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
APPOINTMENT OF CLERKS -- PARTY REPRESENTATION -- HOUR TO REPORT. At
the same time the officer having jurisdiction of the election appoints
the inspector and two judges as provided in RCW 29.45.010, he or she
may appoint one or more persons to act as clerks if in his or her
judgment such additional persons are necessary, except that in
precincts in which voting machines are used, the judges of election
shall perform the duties required to be performed by clerks.
Each clerk appointed shall represent a major political party((:
PROVIDED, That)). The political party representation of a single set
of precinct election officers shall, whenever possible, be equal but,
in any event, no single political party shall be represented by more
than a majority of one at each polling place.
The election officer having jurisdiction of the election may
designate at what hour the clerks shall report for duty. The hour may
vary among the precincts according to the judgment of the appointing
officer.

Sec. 1136 RCW 29.45.030 and 1991 c 106 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
NOMINATION. The precinct committee officer of each major political
party shall certify to the officer's county chair a list of those
persons belonging to the officer's political party qualified to act
upon the election board in the officer's precinct.
By the first day of June each year, the chair of the county central
committee of each major political party shall certify to the officer
having jurisdiction of the election a list of those persons belonging
to the county chair's political party in each precinct who are
qualified to act on the election board therein.
The county chair shall compile this list from the names certified
by the various precinct committee officers unless no names or not
(([a])) a sufficient (([number of])) number of names have been
certified from a precinct, in which event the county chair may include
therein the names of qualified members of the county chair's party
selected by the county chair. The county chair shall also have the
authority to substitute names of persons recommended by the precinct
committee officers if in the judgment of the county chair such persons
are not qualified to serve as precinct election officers.

Sec. 1137 RCW 29.45.040 and 1965 c 9 s 29.45.040 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
VACANCIES -- HOW FILLED -- INSPECTOR'S AUTHORITY. If no election
officers have been appointed for a precinct, or if at the hour for
opening the polls none of those appointed is present at the polling
place therein, the voters present may appoint the election board for
that precinct. One of the judges may perform the duties of clerk of
election. The inspector shall have the power to fill any vacancy that
may occur in the board of judges, or by absence or refusal to serve of
either of the clerks after the polls shall have been opened.

Sec. 1138 RCW 29.45.050 and 1994 c 223 s 91 are each amended to
read as follows:
ONE SET OF PRECINCT ELECTION OFFICERS, EXCEPTIONS -- COUNTING BOARD--RECEIVING BOARD. There shall be but one set of election officers at
any one time in each precinct except as provided in this section.
In every precinct using paper ballots having two hundred or more
registered voters there shall be appointed, and in every precinct
having less than two hundred registered voters there may be appointed,
at a state primary or state general election, two or more sets of
precinct election officers as provided in RCW 29.04.020 and 29.45.010.
The officer in charge of the election may appoint one or more counting
boards at his or her discretion, when he or she decides that because of
a long or complicated ballot or because of the number of expected
voters, there is need of additional counting board or boards to improve
the speed and accuracy of the count.
In making such appointments, one or more sets of precinct election
officers shall be designated as the counting board or boards, the first
of which shall consist of an inspector, two judges, and a clerk and the
second set, if activated, shall consist of two judges and two clerks.
The duties of the counting board or boards shall be the count of
ballots cast and the return of the election records and supplies to the
officer having jurisdiction of the election.
One set of precinct election officers shall be designated as the
receiving board which shall have all other powers and duties imposed by
law for such elections. Nothing in this section prevents the county
auditor from appointing relief or replacement precinct election
officers at any time during election day. Relief or replacement
precinct election officers must be of the same political party as the
officer they are relieving or replacing.

Sec. 1139 RCW 29.45.060 and 1990 c 59 s 74 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DUTIES -- GENERALLY. The inspector and judges of election in each
precinct shall conduct the elections therein and receive, deposit, and
count the ballots cast thereat and make returns to the proper
canvassing board or officer except that when two or more sets of
precinct election officers are appointed as provided in RCW 29.45.050,
the ballots shall be counted by the counting board or boards as
provided in RCW 29.54.015, 29.54.018, and 29.85.225.

Sec. 1140 RCW 29.45.065 and 1973 c 102 s 5 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
APPLICATION TO OTHER PRIMARIES OR ELECTIONS. All of the provisions
of RCW 29.45.050 and 29.45.060 relating to counting boards may be
applied on an optional basis to any other primary or election, regular
or special, at the discretion of the officer in charge of the election.

Sec. 1141 RCW 29.45.070 and 1965 c 9 s 29.45.070 are each amended
to read as follows:
INSPECTOR AS CHAIR -- AUTHORITY. The inspector shall be ((chairman))
the chair of the board and after its organization ((shall have power
to)) administer all necessary oaths ((which)) that may be required in
the progress of the election.

Sec. 1142 RCW 29.45.080 and 1965 c 9 s 29.45.080 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
OATHS OF OFFICERS REQUIRED. The inspector, judges, and clerks of
election, before entering upon the duties of their offices, shall take
and subscribe the prescribed oath or affirmation which shall be
administered to them by any person authorized to administer oaths and
verified under the hand of the person by whom such oath or affirmation
is administered. If no such person is present, the inspector shall
administer the same to the judges and clerks, and one of the judges
shall administer the oath to the inspector.
The county auditor shall furnish two copies of the proper form of
oath to each precinct election officer, one copy thereof, after
execution, to be placed and transmitted with the election returns.

Sec. 1143 RCW 29.45.090 and 1965 c 9 s 29.45.090 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
OATH OF INSPECTORS, FORM. The following shall be the form of the
oath or affirmation to be taken by each inspector:
"I, A B, do swear (or affirm) that I will duly attend to the
ensuing election, during the continuance thereof, as an inspector, and
that I will not receive any ballot or vote from any person other than
such as I firmly believe to be entitled to vote at such election,
without requiring such evidence of the right to vote as is directed by
law; nor will I vexatiously delay the vote of, or refuse to receive, a
ballot from any person whom I believe to be entitled to vote; but that
I will in all things truly, impartially, and faithfully perform my duty
therein to the best of my judgment and abilities; and that I am not,
directly nor indirectly, interested in any bet or wager on the result
of this election."

Sec. 1144 RCW 29.45.100 and 1965 c 9 s 29.45.100 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
OATH OF JUDGES, FORM. The following shall be the oath or
affirmation of each judge:
"We, A B, do swear (or affirm) that we will as judges duly attend
the ensuing election, during the continuance thereof, and faithfully
assist the inspector in carrying on the same; that we will not give our
consent to the receipt of any vote or ballot from any person, other
than one whom we firmly believe to be entitled to vote at such
election; and that we will make a true and perfect return of the said
election and will in all things truly, impartially, and faithfully
perform our duty respecting the same to the best of our judgment and
abilities; and that we are not directly nor indirectly interested in
any bet or wager on the result of this election."

Sec. 1145 RCW 29.45.110 and 1965 c 9 s 29.45.110 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
OATH OF CLERKS, FORM. The following shall be the form of the oath
to be taken by the clerks:
"We, and each of us, A B, do swear (or affirm) that we will
impartially and truly write down the name of each elector who votes at
the ensuing election, and also the name of the county and precinct
wherein the elector resides; that we will carefully and truly write
down the number of votes given for each candidate at the election as
often as his name is read to us by the inspector and in all things
truly and faithfully perform our duty respecting the same to the best
of our judgment and abilities, and that we are not directly nor
indirectly interested in any bet or wager on the result of this
election."

Sec. 1146 RCW 29.45.120 and 1971 ex.s. c 124 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
COMPENSATION. The fees of officers of election shall be as
follows:
To the judges and clerks of an election not less than the minimum
hourly wage per hour as provided under RCW 49.46.020 ((as now or
hereafter amended)), the exact amount to be fixed by the respective
boards of county commissioners for each county. To inspectors, the
rate paid to judges and clerks plus an additional two hours'
compensation. The precinct election officer picking up the election
supplies and returning the election returns to the county auditor shall
be entitled to additional compensation, the exact amount to be
determined by the respective boards of county commissioners for each
county.

PART 12
VOTE BY MAIL BALLOTS
Sec. 1201 RCW 29.38.010 and 2001 c 241 s 15 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
MAIL BALLOT PRECINCTS. The county auditor may designate any
precinct having fewer than two hundred active registered voters at the
time of closing of voter registration as provided in RCW 29.07.160 as
a mail ballot precinct. The county auditor shall notify each
registered voter by mail that for all future primaries and elections
the voting in his or her precinct will be by mail ballot only. In
determining the number of registered voters in a precinct for the
purposes of this section, persons who are ongoing absentee voters under
RCW 29.36.240 shall not be counted. Nothing in this section may be
construed as altering the vote tallying requirements of RCW 29.62.090.
As soon as ballots are available, the county auditor shall mail or
deliver a ballot and an envelope, preaddressed to the issuing officer,
to each active registered voter. The auditor shall send each inactive
voter either a ballot or an application to receive a ballot. The
auditor shall determine which of the two is to be sent. If the
inactive voter returns a voted ballot, the ballot shall be counted and
the voter's status restored to active. If the inactive voter completes
and returns an application, a ballot shall be sent and the voter's
status restored to active.
If the precinct exceeds two hundred registered voters, or the
auditor determines to return to a polling place election environment,
the auditor shall notify each registered voter, by mail, of this and
shall provide the address of the polling place to be used.

Sec. 1202 RCW 29.38.020 and 2001 c 241 s 16 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
SPECIAL ELECTIONS. At any nonpartisan special election not being
held in conjunction with a state primary or general election, the
county, city, town, or district requesting the election pursuant to RCW
29.13.010 or 29.13.020 may also request that the special election be
conducted by mail ballot. The county auditor may honor the request or
may determine that the election is not to be conducted by mail ballot.
The decision of the county auditor in this regard is final.
For all special elections not being held in conjunction with a
state primary or state general election where voting is conducted by
mail ballot, the county auditor shall, not less than twenty days before
the date of such election, make available to each registered voter a
mail ballot. The auditor shall handle inactive voters in the same
manner as inactive voters in mail ballot precincts.

Sec. 1203 RCW 29.38.030 and 2001 c 241 s 17 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ODD-YEAR PRIMARIES. In an odd-numbered year, the county auditor
may conduct a primary or a special election by mail ballot concurrently
with the primary:
(1) For an office or ballot measure of a special purpose district
that is entirely within the county;
(2) For an office or ballot measure of a special purpose district
that lies in the county and one or more other counties if the auditor
first secures the concurrence of the county auditors of those other
counties to conduct the primary in this manner district-wide; and
(3) For a ballot measure or nonpartisan office of a county, city,
or town if the auditor first secures the concurrence of the legislative
authority of the county, city, or town involved.
The county auditor shall notify an election jurisdiction for which
a primary is to be held that the primary will be conducted by mail
ballot.
A primary in an odd-numbered year may not be conducted by mail
ballot in a precinct with two hundred or more active registered voters
if a partisan office or state office or state ballot measure is to be
voted upon at that primary in the precinct.
To the extent they are not inconsistent with other provisions of
law, the laws governing the conduct of mail ballot special elections
apply to nonpartisan primaries conducted by mail ballot.

Sec. 1204 RCW 29.38.040 and 2001 c 241 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
DEPOSITING BALLOTS -- REPLACEMENT BALLOTS. (1) If a county auditor
conducts an election by mail, the county auditor shall designate one or
more places for the deposit of ballots not returned by mail. The
places designated under this section shall be open on the date of the
election for a period of thirteen hours, beginning at 7:00 a.m. and
ending at 8:00 p.m.
(2) A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot as provided
in this subsection ((if the ballot is destroyed, damaged, lost, or not
received by the voter)). A voter may request a replacement mail ballot
in person, by mail, by telephone, or by other electronic transmission
for himself or herself and for any member of his or her immediate
family. The request must be received by the auditor before 8:00 p.m.
on election day. The county auditor shall keep a record of each
replacement ballot issued, including the date of the request.
Replacement mail ballots may be counted in the final tabulation of
ballots only if the original ballot is not received by the county
auditor and the replacement ballot meets all requirements for
tabulation necessary for the tabulation of regular mail ballots.

Sec. 1205 RCW 29.38.050 and 2001 c 241 s 19 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RETURN OF VOTED BALLOT. The voter shall return the ballot to the
county auditor in the return identification envelope. If mailed, a
ballot must be postmarked not later than the date of the primary or
election. Otherwise, the ballot must be deposited at the office of the
county auditor or the designated place of deposit not later than 8:00
p.m. on the date of the primary or election.

Sec. 1206 RCW 29.38.060 and 2001 c 241 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
BALLOT CONTENTS--COUNTING. All mail ballots authorized by RCW
29.38.010 or 29.38.020 or 29.38.030 must contain the same offices,
names of nominees or candidates, and propositions to be voted upon,
including precinct offices, as if the ballot had been voted in person
at the polling place. Except as otherwise provided by law, mail
ballots must be treated in the same manner as absentee ballots issued
at the request of the voter. If electronic vote tallying devices are
used, political party observers must be given the opportunity to be
present, and a test of the equipment must be performed as required by
RCW 29.33.350 before tabulating ballots. Political party observers may
select at random ballots to be counted manually as provided by RCW
29.54.025. ((Any violation of the secrecy of the count is subject to
the same penalties as provided for in RCW 29.85.225.))

PART 13
PRIMARIES AND ELECTIONSSubpart 13.1
General
Sec. 1301 RCW 29.15.150 and 1973 c 4 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ELECTIONS TO FILL UNEXPIRED TERM -- NO PRIMARY, WHEN. Whenever it
shall be necessary to hold a special election in an odd-numbered year
to fill an unexpired term of any office which is scheduled to be voted
upon for a full term in an even-numbered year, no September primary
election shall be held in the odd-numbered year if, after the last day
allowed for candidates to withdraw, either of the following
circumstances exist:
(1) No more than one candidate of each qualified political party
has filed a declaration of candidacy for the same partisan office to be
filled; or
(2) No more than two candidates have filed a declaration of
candidacy for a single nonpartisan office to be filled.
In either event, the officer with whom the declarations of
candidacy were filed shall immediately notify all candidates concerned
and the names of the candidates that would have been printed upon the
September primary ballot, but for the provisions of this section, shall
be printed as nominees for the positions sought upon the November
general election ballot.

Subpart 13.2
Partisan Primaries
Sec. 1302 RCW 29.18.010 and 1990 c 59 s 78 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
APPLICATION OF CHAPTER. Candidates for the following offices shall
be nominated at partisan primaries held pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter:
(1) Congressional offices;
(2) All state offices except (a) judicial offices and (b) the
office of superintendent of public instruction;
(3) All county offices except (a) judicial offices and (b) those
offices where a county home rule charter provides otherwise.

Sec. 1303 RCW 29.18.120 and 1990 c 59 s 87 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
GENERAL ELECTION LAWS GOVERN PRIMARIES. So far as applicable, the
provisions of this title relating to conducting general elections shall
govern the conduct of primaries.

Sec. 1304 RCW 29.18.200 and 1990 c 59 s 88 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
BLANKET PRIMARY AUTHORIZED. Except as provided otherwise in
chapter 29.19 RCW, all properly registered voters may vote for their
choice at any primary held under this title, for any candidate for each
office, regardless of political affiliation and without a declaration
of political faith or adherence on the part of the voter.

Subpart 13.3
Nonpartisan Primaries
Sec. 1305 RCW 29.21.010 and 1990 c 59 s 89 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
LOCAL PRIMARIES. All city and town primaries shall be nonpartisan.
Primaries for special purpose districts, except those districts that
require ownership of property within the district as a prerequisite to
voting, shall be nonpartisan. City, town, and district primaries shall
be held as provided in RCW 29.13.070.
The purpose of this section is to establish the holding of a
primary, subject to the exemptions in RCW 29.21.015, as a uniform
procedural requirement to the holding of city, town, and district
elections. These provisions supersede any and all other statutes,
whether general or special in nature, having different election
requirements.

Sec. 1306 RCW 29.21.015 and 1998 c 19 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
WHEN NO LOCAL PRIMARY PERMITTED -- PROCEDURE. (1) No primary may be
held for any single position in any city, town, district, or district
court, as required by RCW 29.21.010, if, after the last day allowed for
candidates to withdraw, there are no more than two candidates filed for
the position. The county auditor shall, as soon as possible, notify
all the candidates so affected that the office for which they filed
will not appear on the primary ballot.
(2) No primary may be held for the office of commissioner of a park
and recreation district or for the office of cemetery district
commissioner.
(3) Names of candidates for offices that do not appear on the
primary ballot shall be printed upon the general election ballot in the
manner specified by RCW 29.30.025.

Sec. 1307 RCW 29.21.070 and 1990 c 59 s 91 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
NONPARTISAN OFFICES SPECIFIED. The offices of superintendent of
public instruction, justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of
appeals, judge of the superior court, and judge of the district court
shall be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such.
All city, town, and special purpose district elective offices shall
be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and
elected as such.

Sec. 1308 RCW 29.21.410 and 1972 ex.s. c 61 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
SPECIAL ELECTION TO FILL UNEXPIRED TERM. Whenever it ((shall be))
is necessary to hold a special election to fill an unexpired term of an
elective office of any city, town, or district, ((such)) the special
election ((shall)) must be held in concert with the next general
election ((which)) that is to be held by the respective city, town, or
district concerned for the purpose of electing officers to full
terms((: PROVIDED, That)). This section ((shall)) does not apply to
any city of the first class whose charter provision relating to
elections to fill unexpired terms are inconsistent ((herewith)) with
this section.

Subpart 13.4
Notices and Certificates
Sec. 1309 RCW 29.27.030 and 1965 c 9 s 29.27.030 are each amended
to read as follows:
NOTICE OF PRIMARY. Not more than ten nor less than three days
((prior to)) before the primary ((election)) the county auditor shall
publish notice of such primary in one or more newspapers of general
circulation within the county. ((Said)) The notice ((shall)) must
contain the proper party designations, the names and addresses of all
persons who have filed a declaration of candidacy to be voted upon at
that primary ((election)), the hours during which the polls will be
open, and ((that the election will be held in the regular)) the polling
places ((in)) for each precinct, giving the address of each polling
place((: PROVIDED, That)). The names of all candidates for
nonpartisan offices ((shall)) must be published separately with
designation of the offices for which they are candidates but without
party designation. This ((shall be)) is the only notice required for
the holding of any primary ((election)).

Sec. 1310 RCW 29.27.050 and 1990 c 59 s 9 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CERTIFICATION OF NOMINEES. No later than the day following the
certification of the returns of any primary, the secretary of state
shall certify to the appropriate county auditors, the names of all
persons nominated for offices, the returns of which have been canvassed
by the secretary of state.

Sec. 1311 RCW 29.27.072 and 1997 c 405 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
NOTICE OF CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENTS AND STATE MEASURES --
METHOD. Subject to the availability of funds appropriated specifically
for that purpose, the secretary of state shall publish notice of the
proposed constitutional amendments and other state measures that are to
be submitted to the people at a state general election up to four times
during the four weeks immediately preceding that election in every
legal newspaper in the state. The secretary of state shall supplement
this publication with an equivalent amount of radio and television
advertisements.

Sec. 1312 RCW 29.27.074 and 1997 c 405 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
NOTICE OF CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENTS AND STATE MEASURES -- CONTENTS.
The newspaper and broadcast notice required by Article XXIII, section
1, of the state Constitution and RCW 29.27.072 may set forth all or
some of the following information:
(1) A legal identification of the state measure to be voted upon.
(2) The official ballot title of such state measure.
(3) A brief statement explaining the constitutional provision or
state law as it presently exists.
(4) A brief statement explaining the effect of the state measure
should it be approved.
(5) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in
both the state senate and house of representatives.
No individual candidate or incumbent public official may be
referred to or identified in these notices or advertisements.

Sec. 1313 RCW 29.27.080 and 1999 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
NOTICE OF ELECTION -- CERTIFICATION OF MEASURES. (((1))) Except as
provided in RCW 29.81A.060, notice for any state, county, district, or
municipal election, whether special or general, ((shall)) must be given
by at least one publication not more than ten nor less than three days
((prior to)) before the election by the county auditor or the officer
conducting the election as the case may be, in one or more newspapers
of general circulation within the county. ((Said)) The legal notice
((shall)) must contain the title of each office under the proper party
designation, the names and addresses of all officers who have been
nominated for an office to be voted upon at that election, together
with the ballot titles of all measures, the hours during which the
polls will be open, and ((that the election will be held in the
regular)) the polling places ((in)) for each precinct, giving the
address of each polling place((: PROVIDED, That)). The names of all
candidates for nonpartisan offices ((shall)) must be published
separately with designation of the offices for which they are
candidates but without party designation. This ((shall be)) is the
only notice required for a state, county, district, or municipal
general or special election and ((shall)) supersedes the provisions of
any and all other statutes, whether general or special in nature,
having different requirements for the giving of notice of any general
or special elections.
(((2) All school district elections held on February 5, 1980, at
which the number and proportion of persons required by law voted to
authorize bonds or tax levies, are hereby validated regardless of any
failure to publish notice of such election. No action challenging the
validity of any such election may be brought later than April 15, 1980,
or thirty days from June 12, 1980, whichever is later. Notice of
provisions of this subsection shall be published within five days after
February 28, 1980, in a newspaper of general circulation within each
county where a school district election was held on February 5, 1980,
and where notice of such election was not published as provided in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) All school district elections held on May 19, 1998, at which
the number and proportion of persons required by law voted to authorize
bonds or tax levies, are hereby validated regardless of any failure to
publish notice of such election. No action challenging the validity of
any such election may be brought later than thirty days after January
29, 1999. Notice of provisions of this subsection shall be published
within five days after January 29, 1999, in a newspaper of general
circulation within each county where a school district election was
held on May 19, 1998, and where notice of such election was not
published as provided in subsection (1) of this section.))

Sec. 1314 RCW 29.27.100 and 1965 c 9 s 29.27.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
CERTIFICATES OF ELECTION TO OFFICERS ELECTED IN SINGLE COUNTY OR
LESS. Immediately after the ascertainment of the result of an election
for an office to be filled by the voters of a single county, or of a
precinct, or of a constituency within a county for which ((he)) the
county auditor serves as supervisor of elections, the county auditor
shall notify the person elected, and ((upon his demand)) issue to
((him)) the person a certificate of ((his)) election.

Sec. 1315 RCW 29.27.110 and 1965 c 9 s 29.27.110 are each amended
to read as follows:
CERTIFICATES OF ELECTION TO OTHER OFFICERS. Except as provided in
the state Constitution, the governor shall issue certificates of
election to those elected as senator or representative in the Congress
of the United States and to state offices. The secretary of state
shall issue certificates of election to those elected to the office of
judge of the superior court in judicial districts comprising more than
one county and to those elected to either branch of the state
legislature in legislative districts comprising more than one county.

PART 14
SPECIAL CIRCUMSTANCES ELECTIONSSubpart 14.1
Presidential Primary
Sec. 1401 RCW 29.19.010 and 1989 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
INTENT. The people of the state of Washington declare that:
(1) The current presidential nominating caucus system in Washington
state is unnecessarily restrictive of voter participation in that it
discriminates against the elderly, the infirm, women, the
((handicapped)) disabled, evening workers, and others who are unable to
attend caucuses and therefore unable to fully participate in this most
important quadrennial event that occurs in our democratic system of
government.
(2) It is the intent of this chapter to make the presidential
selection process more open and representative of the will of the
people of our state.
(3) A presidential primary will afford the maximum opportunity for
voter access at regular polling places during the daytime and evening
hours convenient to the most people.
(4) This state's participation in the selection of presidential
candidates shall be in accordance with the will of the people as
expressed in a presidential preference primary.
(5) It is the intent of this chapter, to the maximum extent
practicable, to continue to reserve to the political parties the right
to conduct their delegate selection as prescribed by party rules
insofar as it reflects the will of the people as expressed in a
presidential primary election conducted every four years in the manner
described by this chapter.

Sec. 1402 RCW 29.19.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
DATE. (1) On the fourth Tuesday in May of each year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected, a
presidential primary shall be held at which voters may vote for the
nominee of a major political party for the office of president. The
secretary of state may propose an alternative date for the primary no
later than the first day of August of the year before the year in which
a president is to be nominated and elected.
(2) No later than the first day of September of the year before the
year in which a presidential nominee is selected, the state committee
of any major political party that will use the primary results for
candidates of that party may propose an alternative date for that
primary.
(3) If an alternative date is proposed under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section, a committee consisting of the chair and the vice-chair
of the state committee of each major political party, the secretary of
state, the majority leader and minority leader of the senate, and the
speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives shall
meet and, if affirmed by a two-thirds vote of the members of the
committee, the date of the primary shall be changed. The committee
shall meet and decide on the proposed alternate date not later than the
first day of October of the year before the year in which a
presidential nominee is selected. The secretary of state shall convene
and preside over the meeting of the committee. A committee member
other than a legislator may appoint, in writing, a designee to serve on
his or her behalf. A legislator who is a member of the committee may
appoint, in writing, another legislator to serve on his or her behalf.
(4) If an alternate date is approved under this section, the
secretary of state shall adopt rules under RCW 29.19.070 to adjust the
deadlines in RCW 29.19.030 and related provisions of this chapter to
correspond with the date that has been approved.

Sec. 1403 RCW 29.19.030 and 1989 c 4 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
BALLOT -- NAMES INCLUDED. The name of any candidate for a major
political party nomination for president of the United States shall be
printed on the presidential preference primary ballot of a major
political party only:
(1) By direction of the secretary of state, who in the secretary's
sole discretion has determined that the candidate's candidacy is
generally advocated or is recognized in national news media; or
(2) If members of the political party of the candidate have
presented a petition for nomination of the candidate that has attached
to the petition a sheet or sheets containing the signatures of at least
one thousand registered voters who declare themselves in the petition
as being affiliated with the same political party as the presidential
candidate. The petition shall be filed with the secretary of state not
later than the thirty-ninth day before the presidential preference
primary. The signature sheets shall also contain the residence address
and name or number of the precinct of each registered voter whose
signature appears thereon and shall be certified in the manner
prescribed in RCW 29.79.200 and 29.79.210.
The secretary of state shall place the name of the candidate on the
ballot unless the candidate, at least thirty-five days before the
presidential preference primary, executes and files with the secretary
of state an affidavit stating without qualification that he or she is
not now and will not become a candidate for the office of president of
the United States at the forthcoming presidential election. The
secretary of state shall certify the names of all candidates who will
appear on the presidential preference primary ballot to the respective
county auditors on or before the fourth Tuesday in April of each
presidential election year.

Sec. 1404 RCW 29.19.045 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 20 s 2 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
PROCEDURES -- BALLOT FORM AND ARRANGEMENT. (1) Except where
necessary to accommodate the national or state rules of a major
political party or where this chapter specifically provides otherwise,
the presidential primary must be conducted in substantially the same
manner as a state partisan primary under this title.
(2) Except as provided under this chapter or by rule of the
secretary of state adopted under RCW 29.19.070, the arrangement and
form of presidential primary ballots must be substantially as provided
for a partisan primary under this title. Whenever requested by a major
political party, a separate ballot containing only the candidates of
that party who have qualified under RCW 29.19.030 must be provided for
a voter who requests a ballot of that party. A primary ballot,
containing the names of all the candidates who have qualified for a
place on the ballot under RCW 29.19.030, must be provided for
nonaffiliated voters.
(3) The ballot must list alphabetically the names of all candidates
for the office of president. The ballot must indicate the political
party of each candidate adjacent to the name of that candidate. Each
ballot must include a blank space to allow the voter to write in the
name of any other candidate.
(4) A presidential primary ballot with votes for more than one
candidate is void, and notice to this effect, stated in clear, simple
language and printed in large type, must appear on the face of each
presidential primary ballot or on or about each voting device.

Sec. 1405 RCW 29.19.055 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 20 s 3 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
ALLOCATION OF DELEGATES -- PARTY DECLARATIONS. (1) A major political
party may, under national or state party rules, base the allocation of
delegates from this state to the national nominating convention of that
party in whole or in part on the participation in precinct caucuses and
conventions conducted under the rules of that party.
(2) If requested by a major political party, the secretary of state
shall adopt rules under RCW 29.19.070 to provide for any declaration
required by that party.
(3) Voters who subscribe to a specific political party declaration
under this section must be given ballots that are readily
distinguishable from those given to other voters. Votes cast by
persons making these declarations must be tabulated and reported
separately from other votes cast at the primary and may be used by a
major political party in its allocation of delegates under the rules of
that party.
(4) For a political party that requires a specific voter
declaration under this section, the secretary of state shall prescribe
rules for providing, to the state and county committees of that
political party, a copy of the declarations or a list of the voters who
participated in the presidential nominating process of that party.

Sec. 1406 RCW 29.19.080 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 20 s 5 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
COSTS. Subject to available funds specifically appropriated for
this purpose, whenever a presidential primary is held as provided by
this chapter, the state of Washington shall assume all costs of holding
the primary if it is held alone. If any other election or elections
are held at the same time, the state is liable only for a prorated
share of the costs. The county auditor shall determine the costs,
including the state's prorated share, if applicable, in the same manner
as provided under RCW 29.13.045 and shall file a certified claim with
the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall include in his or
her biennial budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this
section. Reimbursements for primary costs must be from appropriations
specifically provided by law for that purpose.

Subpart 14.2
Recall
Sec. 1407 RCW 29.82.010 and 1984 c 170 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
INITIATING PROCEEDINGS -- STATEMENT -- CONTENTS -- VERIFICATION--DEFINITIONS. Whenever any legal voter of the state or of any political
subdivision thereof, either individually or on behalf of an
organization, desires to demand the recall and discharge of any
elective public officer of the state or of such political subdivision,
as the case may be, under the provisions of sections 33 and 34 of
Article 1 of the Constitution, ((he or they)) the voter shall prepare
a typewritten charge, reciting that such officer, naming him or her and
giving the title of ((his)) the office, has committed an act or acts of
malfeasance, or an act or acts of misfeasance while in office, or has
violated ((his)) the oath of office, or has been guilty of any two or
more of the acts specified in the Constitution as grounds for recall.
The charge shall state the act or acts complained of in concise
language, give a detailed description including the approximate date,
location, and nature of each act complained of, be signed by the person
or persons making the charge, give their respective post office
addresses, and be verified under oath that ((he or they)) the person or
persons believe the charge or charges to be true and have knowledge of
the alleged facts upon which the stated grounds for recall are based.
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Misfeasance" or "malfeasance" in office means any wrongful
conduct that affects, interrupts, or interferes with the performance of
official duty;
(a) Additionally, "misfeasance" in office means the performance of
a duty in an improper manner; and
(b) Additionally, "malfeasance" in office means the commission of
an unlawful act;
(2) "Violation of the oath of office" means the ((wilful)) neglect
or knowing failure by an elective public officer to perform faithfully
a duty imposed by law.

Sec. 1408 RCW 29.82.015 and 1984 c 170 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PETITION -- WHERE FILED. Any person making a charge shall file it
with the elections officer whose duty it is to receive and file a
declaration of candidacy for the office concerning the incumbent of
which the recall is to be demanded. The officer with whom the charge
is filed shall promptly (1) serve a copy of the charge upon the officer
whose recall is demanded, and (2) certify and transmit the charge to
the preparer of the ballot synopsis provided in RCW 29.82.021. The
manner of service shall be the same as for the commencement of a civil
action in superior court.

Sec. 1409 RCW 29.82.021 and 1984 c 170 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
BALLOT SYNOPSIS. (1) Within fifteen days after receiving a charge,
the officer specified below shall formulate a ballot synopsis of the
charge of not more than two hundred words.
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, if the recall is
demanded of an elected public officer whose political jurisdiction
encompasses an area in more than one county, the attorney general shall
be the preparer, except if the recall is demanded of the attorney
general, the chief justice of the supreme court shall be the preparer.
(b) If the recall is demanded of an elected public officer whose
political jurisdiction lies wholly in one county, or if the recall is
demanded of an elected public officer of a district whose jurisdiction
encompasses more than one county but whose declaration of candidacy is
filed with a county auditor in one of the counties, the prosecuting
attorney of that county shall be the preparer, except that if the
prosecuting attorney is the officer whose recall is demanded, the
attorney general shall be the preparer.
(2) The synopsis shall set forth the name of the person charged,
the title of ((his)) the office, and a concise statement of the
elements of the charge. Upon completion of the ballot synopsis, the
preparer shall certify and transmit the exact language of the ballot
synopsis to the persons filing the charge and the officer subject to
recall. The preparer shall additionally certify and transmit the
charges and the ballot synopsis to the superior court of the county in
which the officer subject to recall resides and shall petition the
superior court to approve the synopsis and to determine the sufficiency
of the charges.

Sec. 1410 RCW 29.82.023 and 1984 c 170 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DETERMINATION BY SUPERIOR COURT -- CORRECTION OF BALLOT
SYNOPSIS. Within fifteen days after receiving the petition, the
superior court shall have conducted a hearing on and shall have
determined, without cost to any party, (1) whether or not the acts
stated in the charge satisfy the criteria for which a recall petition
may be filed, and (2) the adequacy of the ballot synopsis. The clerk
of the superior court shall notify the person subject to recall and the
person demanding recall of the hearing date. Both persons may appear
with counsel. The court may hear arguments as to the sufficiency of
the charges and the adequacy of the ballot synopsis. The court shall
not consider the truth of the charges, but only their sufficiency. An
appeal of a sufficiency decision shall be filed in the supreme court as
specified by RCW 29.82.160. The superior court shall correct any
ballot synopsis it deems inadequate. Any decision regarding the ballot
synopsis by the superior court is final. The court shall certify and
transmit the ballot synopsis to the officer subject to recall, the
person demanding the recall, and either the secretary of state or the
county auditor, as appropriate.

Sec. 1411 RCW 29.82.025 and 1984 c 170 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
FILING SIGNATURES -- TIME LIMITS. (1) The sponsors of a recall
demanded of any public officer shall stop circulation of and file all
petitions with the appropriate elections officer not less than six
months before the next general election in which the officer whose
recall is demanded is subject to reelection.
(2) The sponsors of a recall demanded of an officer elected to a
statewide position shall have a maximum of two hundred seventy days,
and the sponsors of a recall demanded of any other officer shall have
a maximum of one hundred eighty days, in which to obtain and file
supporting signatures after the issuance of a ballot synopsis by the
superior court. If the decision of the superior court regarding the
sufficiency of the charges is not appealed, the one hundred eighty or
two hundred seventy day period for the circulation of signatures begins
on the sixteenth day following the decision of the superior court. If
the decision of the superior court regarding the sufficiency of the
charges is appealed, the one hundred eighty or two hundred seventy day
period for the circulation of signatures begins on the day following
the issuance of the decision by the supreme court.

Sec. 1412 RCW 29.82.030 and 1984 c 170 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
PETITION -- FORM. Recall petitions ((shall)) must be printed on
single sheets of paper of good writing quality (including but not
limited to newsprint) not less than eleven inches in width and not less
than fourteen inches in length. No petition may be circulated or
signed prior to the first day of the one hundred eighty or two hundred
seventy day period established by RCW 29.82.025 for that recall
petition. ((Such)) The petitions ((shall)) must be substantially in
the following form:

((WARNING

Every person who signs this petition with any other than his true
name, or who knowingly (1) signs more than one of these petitions, (2)
signs this petition when he is not a legal voter, or (3) makes herein
any false statement, may be fined, or imprisoned, or both.)) The
warning prescribed by RCW 29.79.115; followed by:
Petition for the recall of (here insert the name of the office and
of the person whose recall is petitioned for) to the Honorable (here
insert the name and title of the officer with whom the charge is
filed).
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision in which the recall is to be
held), respectfully direct that a special election be called to
determine whether or not (here insert the name of the person charged
and the office which he or she holds) be recalled and discharged from
his or her office, for and on account of (his or her having committed
the act or acts of malfeasance or misfeasance while in office, or
having violated his or her oath of office, as the case may be), in the
following particulars: (here insert the synopsis of the charge); and
each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this
petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington in the precinct
and city (or town) and county written after my name, and my residence
address is correctly stated, and to my knowledge, have signed this
petition only once.

((Petitioner's
signature Print name
for positive
identification Residence address,
street and number,
if any City
or
Town

County

(Here follow 20 numbered lines divided into columns as below.)

1 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

2 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

3 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

etc.))

The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

Sec. 1413 RCW 29.82.040 and 1965 c 9 s 29.82.040 are each amended
to read as follows:
PETITION -- SIZE. Each recall petition at the time of circulating,
signing, and filing with the officer with whom it is to be filed,
((shall)) must consist of not more than five sheets with numbered lines
for not more than twenty signatures on each sheet, with the prescribed
warning, title, and form of petition on each sheet, and a full, true,
and correct copy of the original statement of the charges against the
officer referred to therein, printed on sheets of paper of like size
and quality as the petition, firmly fastened together.

Sec. 1414 RCW 29.82.060 and 1991 c 363 s 36 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
NUMBER OF SIGNATURES REQUIRED. When the person, committee, or
organization demanding the recall of a public officer has secured
sufficient signatures upon the recall petition the person, committee,
or organization may submit the same to the officer with whom the charge
was filed for filing in his or her office. The number of signatures
required shall be as follows:
(1) In the case of a state officer, an officer of a city of the
first class, a member of a school board in a city of the first class,
or a county officer of a county with a population of forty thousand or
more -- signatures of legal voters equal to twenty-five percent of the
total number of votes cast for all candidates for the office to which
the officer whose recall is demanded was elected at the preceding
election.
(2) In the case of an officer of any political subdivision, city,
town, township, precinct, or school district other than those mentioned
in subsection (1) of this section, and in the case of a state senator
or representative -- signatures of legal voters equal to thirty-five
percent of the total number of votes cast for all candidates for the
office to which the officer whose recall is demanded was elected at the
preceding election.

Sec. 1415 RCW 29.82.080 and 1965 c 9 s 29.82.080 are each amended
to read as follows:
CANVASSING PETITION FOR SUFFICIENCY OF SIGNATURES -- TIME OF --
NOTICE. Upon the filing of a recall petition ((in his office)), the
officer with whom the charge was filed shall stamp on each petition the
date of filing, and shall notify the persons filing them and the
officer whose recall is demanded of the date when the petitions will be
canvassed, which date ((shall)) must be not less than five or more than
ten days from the date of its filing.

Sec. 1416 RCW 29.82.090 and 1984 c 170 s 7 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
VERIFICATION AND CANVASS OF SIGNATURES -- PROCEDURE -- STATISTICAL
SAMPLING. (1) Upon the filing of a recall petition, the elections
officer shall proceed to verify and canvass the names of legal voters
on the petition.
(2) The verification and canvass of signatures on the petition may
be observed by persons representing the advocates and opponents of the
proposed recall so long as they make no record of the names, addresses,
or other information on the petitions or related records during the
verification process except upon the order of the superior court. The
elections officer may limit the number of observers to not fewer than
two on each side, if in his or her opinion a greater number would cause
undue delay or disruption of the verification process. Any such
limitation shall apply equally to both sides. If the elections officer
finds the same name signed to more than one petition, he or she shall
reject all but the first such valid signature.
(3) Where the recall of a statewide elected official is sought, the
secretary of state may use any statistical sampling techniques for
verification and canvassing which have been adopted by rule for
canvassing initiative petitions under RCW 29.79.200. No petition will
be rejected on the basis of any statistical method employed. No
petition will be accepted on the basis of any statistical method
employed if such method indicates that the petition contains less than
the number of signatures of legal voters required by Article I, section
33 (Amendment 8) of the state Constitution.

Sec. 1417 RCW 29.82.100 and 1984 c 170 s 8 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
FIXING DATE FOR RECALL ELECTION -- NOTICE. If, at the conclusion of
the verification and canvass, it is found that a petition for recall
bears the required number of signatures of certified legal voters, the
officer with whom the petition is filed shall promptly certify the
petitions as sufficient and fix a date for the special election to
determine whether or not the officer charged shall be recalled and
discharged from office. The special election shall be held not less
than forty-five nor more than sixty days from the certification and,
whenever possible, on one of the dates provided in RCW 29.13.020, but
no recall election may be held between the date of the primary and the
date of the general election in any calendar year. Notice shall be
given in the manner as required by law for special elections in the
state or in the political subdivision, as the case may be.

Sec. 1418 RCW 29.82.105 and 1984 c 170 s 9 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RESPONSE TO PETITION CHARGES. When a date for a special recall
election is set the certifying officer shall serve a notice of the date
of the election to the officer whose recall is demanded and the person
demanding recall. The manner of service shall be the same as for the
commencement of a civil action in superior court. After having been
served a notice of the date of the election and the ballot synopsis,
the officer whose recall is demanded may submit to the certifying
officer a response, not to exceed two hundred fifty words in length, to
the charge contained in the ballot synopsis. Such response shall be
submitted by the seventh consecutive day after service of the notice.
The certifying officer shall promptly send a copy of the response to
the person who filed the petition.

Sec. 1419 RCW 29.82.110 and 1965 c 9 s 29.82.110 are each amended
to read as follows:
DESTRUCTION OF INSUFFICIENT RECALL PETITION. If it is found that
the recall petition does not contain the requisite number of signatures
of certified legal voters, the officer shall so notify the persons
filing the petition, and at the expiration of thirty days from the
conclusion of the count ((he)) the officer shall destroy the petitions
unless prevented therefrom by the injunction or mandate of a court.

Sec. 1420 RCW 29.82.120 and 1965 c 9 s 29.82.120 are each amended
to read as follows:
FRAUDULENT NAMES -- RECORD OF. The officer making the canvass of a
recall petition shall keep a record of all names appearing ((thereon
which)) on it that are not certified to be legal voters of the state or
of the political subdivision, as the case may be, and of all names
appearing more than once ((thereon)), and ((he)) shall report the same
to the prosecuting attorneys of the respective counties where ((such))
the names appear to have been signed, to the end that prosecutions may
be had for ((such)) the violation of this chapter.

Sec. 1421 RCW 29.82.130 and 1990 c 59 s 71 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CONDUCT OF ELECTION -- CONTENTS OF BALLOT. The special election for
the recall of an officer shall be conducted in the same manner as a
special election for that jurisdiction. The county auditor shall
conduct the recall election. The ballots at any recall election shall
contain a full, true, and correct copy of the ballot synopsis of the
charge and the officer's response to the charge if one has been filed.

Sec. 1422 RCW 29.82.140 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 109 are each
amended to read as follows:
ASCERTAINING THE RESULT -- WHEN RECALL EFFECTIVE. The votes on a
recall election ((shall)) must be counted, canvassed, and the results
certified in the manner provided by law for counting, canvassing, and
certifying the results of an election for the office from which the
officer is being recalled((: PROVIDED, That)). However, if the
officer whose recall is demanded is the officer to whom, under the law,
returns of elections are made, ((such)) the returns ((shall)) must be
made to the officer with whom the charge is filed, and who called the
special election((; and)). In the case of an election for the recall
of a state officer, the county canvassing boards of the various
counties shall canvass and return the result of ((such)) the election
to the officer calling ((such)) the special election. If a majority of
all votes cast at the recall election is for the recall of the officer
charged, ((he shall)) the officer is thereupon ((be)) recalled and
discharged from ((his)) the office, and the office ((shall)) thereupon
((become and be)) is vacant.

Sec. 1423 RCW 29.82.160 and 1988 c 202 s 30 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS -- MANDAMUS -- APPELLATE REVIEW. The superior
court of the county in which the officer subject to recall resides has
original jurisdiction to compel the performance of any act required of
any public officer or to prevent the performance by any such officer of
any act in relation to the recall not in compliance with law.
The supreme court has like original jurisdiction in relation to
state officers and revisory jurisdiction over the decisions of the
superior courts. Any proceeding to compel or prevent the performance
of any such act shall be begun within ten days from the time the cause
of complaint arises, and shall be considered an emergency matter of
public concern and take precedence over other cases, and be speedily
heard and determined. Appellate review of a decision of any superior
court shall be begun and perfected within fifteen days after its
decision in a recall election case and shall be considered an emergency
matter of public concern by the supreme court, and heard and determined
within thirty days after the decision of the superior court.

Subpart 14.3
Presidential Electors
Sec. 1424 RCW 29.71.010 and 1965 c 9 s 29.71.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
DATE OF ELECTION -- NUMBER. On the Tuesday ((next)) after the first
Monday of November in the year in which a president of the United
States is to be elected, there shall be elected as many electors of
president and vice president of the United States as there are senators
and representatives in Congress allotted to this state.

Sec. 1425 RCW 29.71.020 and 1990 c 59 s 69 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
NOMINATION -- PLEDGE BY ELECTORS -- WHAT NAMES ON BALLOTS -- HOW
COUNTED. In the year in which a presidential election is held, each
major political party and each minor political party or independent
candidate convention held under chapter 29.24 RCW that nominates
candidates for president and vice president of the United States shall
nominate presidential electors for this state. The party or convention
shall file with the secretary of state a certificate signed by the
presiding officer of the convention at which the presidential electors
were chosen, listing the names and addresses of the presidential
electors. Each presidential elector shall execute and file with the
secretary of state a pledge that, as an elector, he or she will vote
for the candidates nominated by that party. The names of presidential
electors shall not appear on the ballots. The votes cast for
candidates for president and vice president of each political party
shall be counted for the candidates for presidential electors of that
political party.

Sec. 1426 RCW 29.71.030 and 1965 c 9 s 29.71.030 are each amended
to read as follows:
CANVASSING THE RETURNS. The votes for candidates for president and
vice president ((shall be given, received, returned and)) must be
canvassed ((as the same are given, returned, and canvassed for
candidates for congress)) under chapter 29.62 RCW (as recodified by
this act). The secretary of state shall prepare three lists of names
of electors elected and affix the seal of the state ((to the same.
Such lists shall)). The lists must be signed by the governor and
secretary of state and by the latter delivered to the college of
electors at the hour of their meeting.

Sec. 1427 RCW 29.71.040 and 1977 ex.s. c 238 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
MEETING -- TIME -- PROCEDURE -- VOTING FOR NOMINEE OF OTHER PARTY,
PENALTY. The electors of the president and vice president shall
convene at the seat of government on the day fixed by federal statute,
at the hour of twelve o'clock noon of that day. If there is any
vacancy in the office of an elector occasioned by death, refusal to
act, neglect to attend, or otherwise, the electors present shall
immediately proceed to fill it by ((viva voce)) voice vote, and
plurality of votes. When all of the electors have appeared and the
vacancies have been filled they shall constitute the college of
electors of the state of Washington, and shall proceed to perform the
duties required of them by the Constitution and laws of the United
States. Any elector who votes for a person or persons not nominated by
the party of which he or she is an elector ((shall be)) is subject to
a civil penalty of up to ((a fine of)) one thousand dollars.

Sec. 1428 RCW 29.71.050 and 1965 c 9 s 29.71.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
COMPENSATION. Every presidential elector who attends at the time
and place appointed, and gives his or her vote for president and vice
president, ((shall be)) is entitled to receive from this state, five
dollars for each day's attendance at the meeting of the college of
electors, and ten cents per mile for travel by the usually traveled
route in going to and returning from the place where the electors meet.

Sec. 1429 RCW 29.27.140 and 2001 c 30 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
SLATE OF PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS. In a year in which the president
and vice president of the United States are to be elected, the
secretary of state shall include in the certification prepared under
RCW 29.27.050 the names of all candidates for president and vice
president who, at least fifty days before the general election, have
certified a slate of electors to the secretary of state under RCW
29.71.020 and have been nominated either (1) by a major political
party, as certified by the appropriate authority under party rules, or
(2) by a minor party or as independent candidates under chapter 29.24
RCW. Major or minor political parties or independent presidential
candidates may substitute a different candidate for vice president for
the one whose name appears on the party's certification or nominating
petition at any time before forty-five days before the general
election, by certifying the change to the secretary of state.
Substitutions must not be permitted to delay the printing of either
ballots or a voters' pamphlet. Substitutions are valid only if
submitted under oath and signed by the same individual who originally
certified the nomination, or his or her documented successor, and only
if the substitute candidate consents in writing.

Subpart 14.4
Constitutional Amendment Conventions
Sec. 1430 RCW 29.74.010 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
GOVERNOR'S PROCLAMATION CALLING CONVENTION -- WHEN. Within thirty
days after the state is officially notified that the Congress of the
United States has submitted to the several states a proposed amendment
to the Constitution of the United States to be ratified or rejected by
a convention, the governor shall issue a proclamation fixing the time
and place for holding the convention and fixing the time for holding an
election to elect delegates to the convention.

Sec. 1431 RCW 29.74.020 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.020 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
GOVERNOR'S PROCLAMATION -- PUBLICATION. The proclamation shall be
published once each week for two successive weeks in one newspaper
published and of general circulation in each of the congressional
districts of the state. The first publication of the proclamation
shall be within thirty days of the receipt of official notice by the
state of the submission of the amendment.

Sec. 1432 RCW 29.74.030 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.030 are each amended
to read as follows:
ELECTION OF CONVENTION DELEGATES -- DATE FOR, HOW FIXED. The date
for holding the election of delegates ((shall)) must be not less than
one month nor more than six weeks ((prior to)) before the date of
holding the convention((: PROVIDED, That)). If a general ((state))
election is to be held not more than six months nor less than three
months from the date of official notice of submission to the state of
the proposed amendment, the governor must fix the date of the general
election as the date for the election of delegates to the convention.

Sec. 1433 RCW 29.74.040 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.040 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
TIME AND PLACE FOR HOLDING CONVENTION. The convention shall be
held not less than five nor more than eight months from the date of the
first publication of the proclamation provided for in RCW 29.74.020.
It shall be held in the chambers of the state house of representatives
unless the governor shall select some other place at the state capitol.

Sec. 1434 RCW 29.74.050 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.050 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
DELEGATES -- NUMBER AND QUALIFICATIONS. Each state representative
district shall be entitled to as many delegates in the convention as it
has members in the house of representatives of the state legislature.
No person shall be qualified to act as a delegate in said convention
who does not possess the qualifications required of representatives in
the state legislature from the same district.

Sec. 1435 RCW 29.74.060 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.060 are each amended
to read as follows:
DELEGATES--DECLARATIONS OF CANDIDACY. Anyone desiring to file as
a candidate for election as a delegate to ((said)) the convention
shall, not less than thirty nor more than sixty days ((prior to))
before the date fixed for holding the election, file ((his)) a
declaration of candidacy with the secretary of state. Filing ((shall))
must be made on a form to be prescribed by the secretary of state and
((shall)) include a sworn statement of the candidate ((that he is)) as
being either for or against((, as the case may be,)) the amendment
((which)) that will be submitted to a vote of the convention and that
((he)) the candidate will, if elected as a delegate, vote in accordance
with ((his)) the declaration. The form ((shall)) must be so worded
that the candidate must give a plain unequivocal statement of his or
her views as either for or against the proposal upon which he or she
will, if elected, be called upon to vote. No candidate ((shall)) may
in any such filing make any statement or declaration as to ((his))
party politics or political faith or beliefs. The fee for filing as a
candidate ((shall be)) is ten dollars and ((shall)) must be transmitted
to the secretary of state with the filing papers and be by the
secretary of state transmitted to the state treasurer for the use of
the general fund.

Sec. 1436 RCW 29.74.070 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.070 are each amended
to read as follows:
ELECTION OF CONVENTION DELEGATES--GENERAL PROCEDURE. The election
of delegates to ((such)) the convention ((shall)) must as far as
practicable, be ((called, held and conducted)) administered, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter ((provided)), in the same manner as
a general election under the election laws of this state.

Sec. 1437 RCW 29.74.080 and 1990 c 59 s 70 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ELECTION OF CONVENTION DELEGATES--BALLOTS. The issue shall be
identified as, "Delegates to a convention for ratification or rejection
of a proposed amendment to the United States Constitution, relating
. . . . . . . . . . . (stating briefly the substance of amendment
proposed for adoption or rejection)." The names of all candidates who
have filed in a district shall be printed on the ballots for that
district in two separate groups under the headings, "For the amendment"
and "Against the amendment." The names of the candidates in each group
shall be printed in alphabetical order.

Sec. 1438 RCW 29.74.100 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
ELECTION OF CONVENTION DELEGATES--ASCERTAINING ELECTION RESULT.
The election officials shall count and determine the number of votes
cast for each individual; and shall also count and determine the
aggregate number of votes cast for all candidates whose names appear
under each of the respective headings. Where more than the required
number have been voted for, the ballot ((shall)) must be rejected. The
figures determined by the various counts ((shall)) must be entered in
the poll books of the respective precincts. The vote ((shall)) must be
canvassed in each county by the county canvassing board, and
certificate of results ((shall)) must within ((twelve)) fifteen days
after the election be transmitted to the secretary of state. Upon
receiving ((such)) the certificate, the secretary of state ((shall have
power to)) may require returns or poll books from any county precinct
to be forwarded for ((his)) the secretary's examination.
Where a district embraces precincts of more than one county, the
secretary of state shall combine the votes from all the precincts
included in each district. The delegates elected in each district
((shall)) will be the number of candidates((,)) corresponding to the
number of state representatives from the district, who receive the
highest number of votes in the group (either "for" or "against")((,
which)) that received an aggregate number of votes for all candidates
in the group greater than the aggregate number of votes for all the
candidates in the other group((, and)). The secretary of state shall
issue certificates of election((,)) to the delegates so elected.

Sec. 1439 RCW 29.74.110 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.110 are each amended
to read as follows:
MEETING--ORGANIZATION. The convention shall meet at the time and
place fixed in the governor's proclamation. ((It shall be called to
order by)) The secretary of state shall call it to order, who shall
then call the roll of the delegates and preside over the convention
until its president is elected. The chief justice of the supreme court
shall administer the oath of office ((shall then be administered)) to
the delegates ((by the chief justice of the supreme court)). As far as
practicable, the convention shall proceed under the rules adopted by
the last preceding session of the state senate. The convention shall
elect a president and a secretary and shall thereafter and thereupon
proceed ((to)) with a publicly recorded voice vote ((viva voce)) upon
the proposition submitted by the Congress of the United States.

Sec. 1440 RCW 29.74.120 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.120 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
QUORUM--PROCEEDINGS--RECORD. Two-thirds of the elected members of
said convention shall constitute a quorum to do business, and a
majority of those elected shall be sufficient to adopt or reject any
proposition coming before the convention. If such majority votes in
favor of the ratification of the amendment submitted to the convention,
the said amendment shall be deemed ratified by the state of Washington;
and if a majority votes in favor of rejecting or not ratifying the
amendment, the same shall be deemed rejected by the state of
Washington.

Sec. 1441 RCW 29.74.130 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.130 are each amended
to read as follows:
CERTIFICATION AND TRANSMITTAL OF RESULT. The vote of each member
shall be recorded in the journal of the convention, which shall be
preserved by the secretary of state as a public document. The action
of the convention shall be enrolled, signed by its president and
secretary and filed with the secretary of state and it shall be the
duty of the secretary of state to properly certify the action of the
convention to the Congress of the United States as provided by general
law.

Sec. 1442 RCW 29.74.140 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.140 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
EXPENSES--HOW PAID--DELEGATES RECEIVE FILING FEE. The delegates
attending the convention shall be paid the amount of their filing fee,
upon vouchers approved by the president and secretary of the convention
and state warrants issued thereon and payable from the general fund of
the state treasury. The delegates shall receive no other compensation
or mileage. All other necessary expenses of the convention shall be
payable from the general fund of the state upon vouchers approved by
the president and secretary of the convention.

Sec. 1443 RCW 29.74.150 and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.150 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
FEDERAL STATUTES CONTROLLING. If a congressional measure, which
submits to the several states an amendment to the Constitution of the
United States for ratification or rejection, provides for or requires
a different method of calling and holding conventions to ratify or
reject said amendment, the requirements of said congressional measure
shall be followed so far as they conflict with the provisions of this
chapter.

PART 15
CANVASSING
Sec. 1501 RCW 29.13.040 and 1965 c 123 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS--CANVASS. All elections, whether special or
general, held under RCW 29.13.010 and 29.13.020 ((as now or hereafter
amended, shall)) must be conducted by the county auditor as ex officio
county supervisor of elections and, except as provided in RCW
29.62.100, the returns ((thereof shall be)) canvassed by the county
canvassing board.

Sec. 1502 RCW 29.62.180 and 1999 c 157 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
WRITE-IN VOTING--DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY--COUNTING OF VOTE. (1)
For any office at any election or primary, any voter may write in on
the ballot the name of any person for an office who has filed as a
write-in candidate for the office in the manner provided by RCW
29.04.180 and such vote shall be counted the same as if the name had
been printed on the ballot and marked by the voter. No write-in vote
made for any person who has not filed a declaration of candidacy
pursuant to RCW 29.04.180 is valid if that person filed for the same
office, either as a regular candidate or a write-in candidate, at the
preceding primary. Any abbreviation used to designate office,
position, or political party shall be accepted if the canvassing board
can determine, to their satisfaction, the voter's intent.
(2) The number of write-in votes cast for each office must be
recorded and reported with the canvass for the election.
(3) Write-in votes cast for an individual candidate for an office
need not be tallied if the total number of write-in votes cast for the
office is not greater than the number of votes cast for the candidate
apparently nominated or elected, and the write-in votes could not have
altered the outcome of the primary or election. In the case of write-in votes for statewide office or for any office whose jurisdiction
encompasses more than one county, write-in votes for an individual
candidate must be tallied whenever the county auditor is notified by
either the office of the secretary of state or another auditor in a
multicounty jurisdiction that it appears that the write-in votes could
alter the outcome of the primary or election.
(4) In the case of statewide offices or jurisdictions that
encompass more than one county, if the total number of write-in votes
cast for an office within a county is greater than the number of votes
cast for a candidate apparently nominated or elected in a primary or
election, the auditor shall tally all write-in votes for individual
candidates for that office and notify the office of the secretary of
state and the auditors of the other counties within the jurisdiction,
that the write-in votes for individual candidates should be tallied.

Sec. 1503 RCW 29.54.042 and 1990 c 59 s 58 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
TABULATION CONTINUOUS. Except as provided by rule under RCW
29.04.210, on the day of the primary or election, the tabulation of
ballots at the polling place or at the counting center shall proceed
without interruption or adjournment until all of the ballots cast at
the polls at that primary or election have been tabulated.

Sec. 1504 RCW 29.54.050 and 1999 c 158 s 13 and 1999 c 157 s 4
are each reenacted to read as follows:
REJECTION OF BALLOTS OR PARTS--WRITE-IN VOTES. A ballot is invalid
and no votes on that ballot may be counted if it is found folded
together with another ballot or it is marked so as to identify the
voter.
Those parts of a ballot are invalid and no votes may be counted for
those issues or offices where more votes are cast for the office or
issue than are permitted by law; write-in votes do not contain all of
the information required under RCW 29.62.180; or that issue or office
is not marked with sufficient definiteness to determine the voter's
choice or intention. No write-in vote may be rejected due to a
variation in the form of the name if the election board or the
canvassing board can determine the issue for or against which or the
person and the office for which the voter intended to vote.

Sec. 1505 RCW 29.54.060 and 1990 c 59 s 57 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
QUESTIONS ON LEGALITY OF BALLOT--PRESERVATION AND RETURN. Whenever
the precinct election officers or the counting center personnel have a
question about the validity of a ballot or the votes for an office or
issue that they are unable to resolve, they shall prepare and sign a
concise record of the facts in question or dispute. These ballots
shall be delivered to the canvassing board for processing. All ballots
shall be preserved in the same manner as valid ballots for that primary
or election.

Sec. 1506 RCW 29.54.097 and 1999 c 158 s 12 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
POLL-SITE BALLOT COUNTING DEVICES--RESULTS. After the close of the
polls, counties employing poll-site ballot counting devices may
telephonically or electronically transmit the accumulated tally for
each device to a central reporting location. Before making a
telephonic or electronic transmission the precinct election officer
must create a printed record of the results of the election for that
poll site. During the canvassing period the results transmitted
telephonically or electronically must be considered unofficial until a
complete reconciliation of the results has been performed. This
reconciliation may be accomplished by a direct loading of the results
from the memory pack into the central accumulator, or a comparison of
the report produced at the poll site on election night with the results
received by the central accumulating device.

Sec. 1507 RCW 29.54.105 and 1990 c 59 s 60 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RETURNS, PRECINCT AND CUMULATIVE--DELIVERY TO CANVASSING BOARD.
The county auditor shall produce cumulative and precinct returns for
each primary and election and deliver them to the canvassing board for
verification and certification. The precinct and cumulative returns of
any primary or election are public records under chapter 42.17 RCW.

Sec. 1508 RCW 29.54.121 and 1990 c 59 s 24 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
SEALING OF VOTING DEVICES--EXCEPTIONS. Except for reopening to
make a recanvass, the registering mechanism of each mechanical voting
device used in any primary or election shall remain sealed until ten
days after the completion of the canvass of that primary or election in
that county. Except where provided by a rule adopted under RCW
29.04.210, voting devices used in a primary or election shall remain
sealed until ten days after the completion of the canvass of that
primary or election in that county.

Sec. 1509 RCW 29.54.170 and 1990 c 59 s 61 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
VOTING SYSTEMS--MAINTENANCE OF DOCUMENTS. In counties using voting
systems, the county auditor shall maintain the following documents for
at least sixty days after the primary or election:
(1) Sample ballot formats together with a record of the format or
formats assigned to each precinct;
(2) All programming material related to the control of the vote
tallying system for that primary or election; and
(3) All test materials used to verify the accuracy of the
tabulating equipment as required by RCW 29.33.350.

Sec. 1510 RCW 29.51.175 and 1990 c 59 s 46 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
VOTES BY STICKERS, PRINTED LABELS, REJECTED. Votes cast by
stickers or printed labels are not valid for any purpose and shall be
rejected. Votes cast by sticker or label shall not affect the validity
of other offices or issues on the voter's ballot.

Sec. 1511 RCW 29.54.075 and 1999 c 158 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
BALLOT CONTAINERS, SEALING, OPENING. Immediately after their
tabulation, all ballots counted at a ballot counting center must be
sealed in containers that identify the primary or election and be
retained for at least sixty days or according to federal law, whichever
is longer. All ballots tallied by poll-site ballot counting devices
must be returned to the elections department in sealed ballot
containers on election day. Counties composed entirely of islands or
portions of counties composed of islands shall collect the ballots
within twenty-four hours of the close of the polls.
Ballots tabulated in poll-site ballot counting devices must be
sealed by two of the election precinct officers at the polling place,
and a log of the seal and the names of the people sealing the container
must be completed. One copy of this log must be retained by the
inspector, one copy must be placed in the ballot transfer case, and one
copy must be transported with the ballots to the elections department,
where the seal number must be verified by the county auditor or a
designated representative. Ballots may be transported by one election
employee if the container is sealed at the poll and then verified when
returned to the elections department. Auditors using poll-site ballot
counting devices may conduct early pickup of counted ballots on
election day.
In the presence of major party observers who are available, ballots
may be removed from the sealed containers at the elections department
and consolidated into one sealed container for storage purposes. The
containers may only be opened by the canvassing board as part of the
canvass, or to conduct recounts, or under RCW 29.54.025(3), or by order
of the superior court in a contest or election dispute. If the
canvassing board opens a ballot container, it shall make a full record
of the additional tabulation or examination made of the ballots. This
record ((shall)) must be added to any other record of the canvassing
process in that county.

Sec. 1512 RCW 29.54.085 and 1999 c 158 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNTING BALLOTS--OFFICIAL RETURNS. (1) The ballots picked up from
the precincts during the polling hours may be counted only at the
counting center before the polls have closed. Election returns from
the count of these ballots must be held in secrecy until the polls have
been closed ((as provided by RCW 29.54.018)).
(2) Upon breaking the seals and opening the ballot containers from
the precincts, all voted ballots ((shall)) must be manually inspected
for damage, write-in votes, and incorrect or incomplete marks. If it
is found that any ballot is damaged so that it cannot properly be
counted by the vote tallying system, a true duplicate copy ((shall))
must be made of the damaged ballot in the presence of witnesses and
substituted for the damaged ballot. All damaged ballots ((shall)) must
be kept by the county auditor until sixty days after the primary or
election or according to federal law, whichever is longer.
(3) The returns produced by the vote tallying system, to which have
been added the counts of questioned ballots, write-in votes, and
absentee votes, constitute the official returns of the primary or
election in that county.

Sec. 1513 RCW 29.27.120 and 1965 c 9 s 29.27.120 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
CERTIFICATE NOT WITHHELD FOR INFORMALITY IN RETURNS. No
certificate shall be withheld on account of any defect or informality
in the returns of any election, if it can with reasonable certainty be
ascertained from such return what office is intended, and who is
entitled to such certificate, nor shall any commission be withheld by
the governor on account of any defect or informality of any return made
to the office of the secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1514 COUNTY CANVASSING BOARD--MEMBERSHIP--AUTHORITY--DELEGATION OF AUTHORITY--RULE MAKING. (1) Members of the
county canvassing board are the county auditor, who is the chair, the
county prosecuting attorney, and the chair of the county legislative
body. If a member of the board is not available to carry out the
duties of the board, then the auditor may designate a deputy auditor,
the prosecutor may designate a deputy prosecuting attorney, and the
chair of the county legislative body may designate another member of
the county legislative body. Any such designation may be made on an
election-by-election basis or may be on a permanent basis until revoked
by the designating authority. Any such designation must be in writing,
and if for a specific election, must be filed with the county auditor
not later than the day before the first day duties are to be undertaken
by the canvassing board. If the designation is permanent until revoked
by the designating authority, then the designation must be on file in
the county auditor's office no later than the day before the first day
the designee is to undertake the duties of the canvassing board.
(2) The county canvassing board may adopt rules that delegate in
writing to the county auditor or the county auditor's staff the
performance of any task assigned by law to the canvassing board.
(3) The county canvassing board may not delegate the responsibility
of certifying the returns of a primary or election, of determining the
validity of challenged ballots, or of determining the validity of
provisional ballots referred to the board by the county auditor.
(4) The county canvassing board shall adopt administrative rules to
facilitate and govern the canvassing process in that jurisdiction.
(5) Meetings of the county canvassing board are public meetings
under chapter 42.30 RCW. All rules adopted by the county canvassing
board must be adopted in a public meeting under chapter 42.30 RCW, and
once adopted must be available to the public to review and copy under
chapter 42.17 RCW.

Sec. 1515 RCW 29.62.030 and 1995 c 139 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
PROCEDURE WHEN MEMBER A CANDIDATE. The members of the county
canvassing board may not include individuals who are candidates for an
office to be voted upon at the primary or election. If no individual
is available to serve on the canvassing board who is not a candidate at
the primary or election ((is one at which a member, or the officer
designating a member, of the canvassing board is a candidate for an
office,)) the individual who is a candidate must not make decisions
regarding the determination of a voter's intent with respect to a vote
cast for that specific office ((shall)); the decision must be made by
the other two members of the board ((not designated by that officer)).
If the two disagree, the vote ((shall)) must not be counted unless the
number of those votes could affect the result of the primary or
election, in which case the secretary of state or a designee shall make
the decision on those votes. This section does not restrict
participation in decisions as to the acceptance or rejection of entire
ballots, unless the office in question is the only one for which the
voter cast a vote.

Sec. 1516 RCW 29.62.020 and 1999 c 259 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNTY CANVASSING BOARD--PROCEDURE FOR ABSENTEE BALLOTS. (((1)))
At least every third day after a ((special election,)) primary((,)) or
((general)) election and before certification of the election results,
except Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, the county auditor, as
delegated by the county canvassing board, shall ((convene the county
canvassing board or their designees to)) process absentee ballots and
canvass the votes cast at that ((special election,)) primary((,)) or
((general)) election, if the county auditor is in possession of more
than twenty-five ballots that have yet to be canvassed. The county
auditor, as delegated by the county canvassing board, may use his or
her discretion in determining when to ((convene the canvassing board or
their designees)) process the remaining absentee ballots and canvass
the votes during the final four days before the certification of
election results in order to protect the secrecy of any ballot. In
counties where this process has not been delegated to the county
auditor, the county auditor shall convene the county canvassing board
to process absentee ballots and canvass the votes cast at the primary
or election as set forth in this section.
Each absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by
the county auditor two days or more before ((the convening of the
canvassing board or their designees and)) processing absentee ballots
and canvassing the votes as delegated by or processed by the county
canvassing board, that either was received by the county auditor before
the closing of the polls on the day of the ((special election,))
primary((,)) or ((general)) election for which it was issued, or that
bears a ((date of mailing)) postmark on or before the ((special
election,)) primary((,)) or ((general)) election for which it was
issued, must be processed at that time. The tabulation of votes that
results from that day's canvass must be made available to the general
public immediately upon completion of the canvass.
(((2) On the tenth day after a special election or a primary and on
the fifteenth day after a general election, the canvassing board shall
complete the canvass and certify the results. Each absentee ballot
that was returned before the closing of the polls on the date of the
primary or election for which it was issued, and each absentee ballot
with a date of mailing on or before the date of the primary or election
for which it was issued and received on or before the date on which the
primary or election is certified, shall be included in the canvass
report.
(3) At the request of any caucus of the state legislature, the
county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state
and legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house.))

Sec. 1517 RCW 29.54.025 and 1999 c 158 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNTING CENTER, DIRECTION AND OBSERVATION OF PROCEEDINGS--MANUAL
COUNT OF CERTAIN PRECINCTS. (1) The counting center in a county using
voting systems ((shall be)) is under the direction of the county
auditor and ((shall)) must be observed by one representative from each
major political party, if representatives have been appointed by the
respective major political parties and these representatives are
present while the counting center is operating. The proceedings
((shall)) must be open to the public, but no persons except those
employed and authorized by the county auditor may touch any ballot or
ballot container or operate a vote tallying system.
(2) In counties in which ballots are not counted at the polling
place, the official political party observers, upon mutual agreement,
may request that a precinct be selected at random on receipt of the
ballots from the polling place and that a manual count be made of the
number of ballots and of the votes cast on any office or issue. The
ballots for that precinct ((shall)) must then be counted by the vote
tallying system, and this result ((shall)) will be compared to the
results of the manual count. This may be done as many as three times
during the tabulation of ballots on the day of the primary or election.
(3) In counties using poll-site ballot counting devices, the
political party observers, upon mutual agreement, may choose as many as
three precincts and request that a manual count be made of the number
of ballots and the votes cast on any office or issue. The results of
this count will be compared to the count of the precinct made by the
poll-site ballot counting device. These selections must be made no
later than thirty minutes after the close of the polls. The manual
count must be completed within forty-eight hours after the close of the
polls. The process must take place at a location designated by the
county auditor for that purpose. The political party observers must
receive timely notice of the time and location, and have the right to
be present. However, the process must proceed as scheduled if the
observers are unable to attend.

Sec. 1518 RCW 29.36.330 and 2001 c 241 s 12 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
CREDIT FOR VOTING--RETENTION OF BALLOTS. Each registered voter
casting an absentee ballot will be credited with voting on his or her
voter registration record. Absentee ballots must be retained for the
same length of time and in the same manner as ballots cast at the
precinct polling places.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1519 CERTIFICATION OF ELECTION RESULTS--UNOFFICIAL RETURNS. (1) On the tenth day after a special election or
primary and on the fifteenth day after a general election, the county
canvassing board shall complete the canvass and certify the results.
Each absentee ballot that was returned before the closing of the polls
on the date of the primary or election for which it was issued, and
each absentee ballot with a postmark on or before the date of the
primary or election for which it was issued and received on or before
the date on which the primary or election is certified, must be
included in the canvass report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house or representatives.

Sec. 1520 RCW 29.62.040 and 1990 c 59 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNTY CANVASSING BOARD--CANVASSING PROCEDURE--PENALTY. Before
canvassing the returns of a primary or election, the ((chairman)) chair
of the county legislative authority or the chair's designee shall
administer an oath to the county auditor or the auditor's designee
attesting to the authenticity of the information presented to the
canvassing board. This oath must be signed by the county auditor or
designee and filed with the returns of the primary or election.
The county canvassing board shall proceed to verify the results
from the precincts and the absentee ballots. The board shall execute
a certificate of the results of the primary or election signed by all
members of the board or their designees. Failure to certify the
returns, if they can be ascertained with reasonable certainty, is a
((misdemeanor)) crime under RCW 29.85.170.

Sec. 1521 RCW 29.62.050 and 1990 c 59 s 64 are each amended to
read as follows:
RECANVASS--GENERALLY. Whenever the canvassing board finds that
there is an apparent discrepancy or an inconsistency in the returns of
a primary or election, the board may recanvass the ballots or voting
devices in any precincts of the county. The canvassing board shall
conduct any necessary recanvass activity on or before the last day to
certify the primary or election and correct any error and document the
correction of any error that it finds.

Sec. 1522 RCW 29.62.080 and 1965 c 9 s 29.62.080 are each amended
to read as follows:
TIE VOTES IN PRIMARY OR FINAL ELECTION. (1) If the requisite
number of any federal, state, county, city, or district offices have
not been nominated in a primary by reason of two or more persons having
an equal and requisite number of votes for being placed on the general
election ballot, the official empowered by state law to certify
candidates for the general election ballot shall give notice to the
several persons so having the equal and requisite number of votes to
attend at the appropriate office at the time designated by that
official, who shall then and there proceed publicly to decide by lot
which of those persons will be declared nominated and placed on the
general election ballot.
(2) If the requisite number of any federal, state, county, city,
district, or precinct officers ((shall not be)) have not been elected
by reason of two or more persons having an equal and highest number of
votes for one and the same office, the official empowered by state law
to issue the original certificate of election shall give notice to the
several persons so having the highest and equal number of votes to
attend at the appropriate office at the time to be appointed by
((said)) that official, who shall then and there proceed publicly to
decide by lot which of ((the)) those persons ((so having an equal
number of votes shall)) will be declared duly elected, and the ((said))
official shall make out and deliver to the person thus duly declared
elected a certificate of ((his)) election ((as hereinbefore provided)).

Sec. 1523 RCW 29.62.090 and 2001 c 225 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
ABSTRACT BY ELECTION OFFICER--TRANSMITTAL TO SECRETARY OF STATE.
(1) Immediately after the official results of a state primary or
general election in a county are ascertained, the county auditor or
other election officer shall make an abstract of the number of
registered voters in each precinct and of all the votes cast in the
county at such state primary or general election for and against state
measures and for each candidate for federal, state, and legislative
office or for any other office which the secretary of state is required
by law to canvass. The ((abstract must be entered on blanks furnished
by the secretary of state or on compatible computer printouts approved
by the secretary of state, and the)) cumulative report of the election
and a copy of the certificate of the election must be transmitted to
the secretary of state immediately, through electronic means and mailed
with the abstract of votes no later than the next business day
following the certification by the county canvassing board.
(2) After each general election, the county auditor or other
election officer shall provide to the secretary of state a report of
the number of absentee ballots cast in each precinct for and against
state measures and for each candidate for federal, state, and
legislative office or for any other office which the secretary of state
is required by law to canvass. The report may be included in the
abstract required by this section or may be transmitted to the
secretary of state separately, but in no event later than March 31st of
the year following the election. Absentee ballot results may be
incorporated into votes cast at the polls for each precinct or may be
reported separately on a precinct-by-precinct basis.
(3) If absentee ballot results are not incorporated into votes cast
at the polls, the county auditor or other election official may
aggregate results from more than one precinct if the auditor, pursuant
to rules adopted by the secretary of state, finds that reporting a
single precinct's absentee ballot results would jeopardize the secrecy
of a person's ballot. To the extent practicable, precincts for which
absentee results are aggregated must be contiguous.

Sec. 1524 RCW 29.62.100 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 97 are each
amended to read as follows:
SECRETARY OF STATE--PRIMARY RETURNS--STATE OFFICES, ETC. The
secretary of state shall, as soon as possible but in any event not
later than the third Tuesday following the primary, canvass and certify
the returns of all primary elections as to candidates for state
offices, United States senators and representatives in Congress, and
all other candidates whose district extends beyond the limits of a
single county.

Sec. 1525 RCW 29.62.120 and 1965 c 9 s 29.62.120 are each amended
to read as follows:
SECRETARY OF STATE TO CANVASS FINAL RETURNS--SCOPE. As soon as the
returns have been received from all the counties of the state, but not
later than the thirtieth day after the election, the secretary of state
shall make a canvass of such of the returns as are not required to be
canvassed by the legislature and make out a statement thereof, file it
in his or her office, and transmit a certified copy ((thereof)) to the
governor.

Sec. 1526 RCW 29.62.130 and 1965 c 9 s 29.62.130 are each amended
to read as follows:
CANVASS OF VOTE ON STATEWIDE MEASURES. The votes on proposed
amendments to the state Constitution, recommendations for the calling
of constitutional conventions and other questions submitted to the
people ((shall)) must be counted, canvassed, and returned by ((the
regular precinct election officers and by the county auditors and))
each county canvassing board((s)) in the manner provided by law for
counting, canvassing, and returning votes for candidates for state
offices. ((It shall be the duty of)) The secretary of state shall, in
the presence of the governor, within thirty days after ((any such)) the
election, ((to)) canvass the votes upon each question and certify to
the governor the result ((thereof, and)). The governor shall forthwith
issue ((his)) a proclamation giving the whole number of votes cast in
the state for and against such measure and declaring the result((:
PROVIDED, That)). If the vote cast upon an initiative or referendum
measure is equal to less than one-third of the total vote cast at the
election, the governor shall proclaim the measure to have failed ((for
that reason)).

PART 16
RECOUNTS
Sec. 1601 RCW 29.64.010 and 2001 c 225 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
APPLICATION FOR RECOUNT--REQUIREMENTS--APPLICATION OF CHAPTER. An
officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were cast in
a primary who was not declared nominated may file a written application
for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast at that
primary for all persons for whom votes were cast for nomination to that
office.
An officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were
cast at any election may file a written application for a recount of
the votes or a portion of the votes cast at that election for all
candidates for election to that office.
Any group of five or more registered voters may file a written
application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast
upon any question or issue. They shall designate one of the members of
the group as ((chairman)) chair and shall indicate the voting residence
of each member of the group.
An application for a recount of the votes cast for an office or on
a ballot measure must be filed with the officer with whom filings are
made for the jurisdiction.
An application for a recount must specify whether the recount will
be done manually or by the vote tally system. A recount done by the
vote tally system must use programming that recounts and reports only
the office or ballot measure in question. The county shall also
provide for a test of the logic and accuracy of that program.
An application for a recount ((shall)) must be filed within three
business days after the county canvassing board or secretary of state
has declared the official results of the primary or election for the
office or issue for which the recount is requested.
This chapter applies to the recounting of votes cast by paper
ballots and to the recounting of votes recorded on ballots counted by
a vote tally system.

Sec. 1602 RCW 29.64.015 and 2001 c 225 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
MANDATORY RECOUNT. (1) If the official canvass of all of the
returns for any office at any primary or election reveals that the
difference in the number of votes cast for a candidate apparently
nominated or elected to any office and the number of votes cast for the
closest apparently defeated opponent is less than two thousand votes
and also less than one-half of one percent of the total number of votes
cast for both candidates, the county canvassing board shall conduct a
recount of all votes cast on that position.
(a) Whenever such a difference occurs in the number of votes cast
for candidates for a position the declaration of candidacy for which
was filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall,
within three business days of the day that the returns of the primary
or election are first certified by the canvassing boards of those
counties, direct those boards to recount all votes cast on the
position.
(b) If the difference in the number of votes cast for the apparent
winner and the closest apparently defeated opponent is less than one
hundred fifty votes and also less than one-fourth of one percent of the
total number of votes cast for both candidates, the votes shall be
recounted manually or as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) A mandatory recount shall be conducted in the manner provided
by RCW 29.64.020, 29.64.030, and 29.64.040. No cost of a mandatory
recount may be charged to any candidate.
(3) The apparent winner and closest apparently defeated opponent
for an office for which a manual recount is required under subsection
(1)(b) of this section may select an alternative method of conducting
the recount. To select such an alternative, the two candidates shall
agree to the alternative in a signed, written statement filed with the
election official for the office. The recount shall be conducted using
the alternative method if: It is suited to the balloting system that
was used for casting the votes for the office; it involves the use of
a vote tallying system that is approved for use in this state by the
secretary of state; and the vote tallying system is readily available
in each county required to conduct the recount. If more than one
balloting system was used in casting votes for the office, an
alternative to a manual recount may be selected for each system.

Sec. 1603 RCW 29.64.020 and 2001 c 225 s 5 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DEPOSIT OF FEES--NOTICE--PUBLIC PROCEEDING. An application for a
recount shall state the office for which a recount is requested and
whether the request is for all or only a portion of the votes cast in
that jurisdiction of that office. The person filing an application for
a manual recount shall, at the same time, deposit with the county
canvassing board or secretary of state, in cash or by certified check,
a sum equal to twenty-five cents for each ballot cast in the
jurisdiction or portion of the jurisdiction for which the recount is
requested as security for the payment of any costs of conducting the
recount. If the application is for a machine recount, the deposit must
be equal to fifteen cents for each ballot. These charges shall be
determined by the county canvassing board or boards under RCW
29.64.060.
The county canvassing board shall determine a time and a place or
places at which the recount will be conducted. This time shall be less
than three business days after the day upon which: The application was
filed with the board; the request for a recount or directive ordering
a recount was received by the board from the secretary of state; or the
returns are certified which indicate that a recount is required under
RCW 29.64.015 for an issue or office voted upon only within the county.
Not less than two days before the date of the recount, the county
auditor shall mail a notice of the time and place of the recount to the
applicant or affected parties and, if the recount involves an office,
to any person for whom votes were cast for that office. The county
auditor shall also notify the affected parties by either telephone,
fax, e-mail, or other electronic means at the time of mailing. At
least three attempts must be made over a two-day period to notify the
affected parties or until the affected parties have received the
notification. Each attempt to notify affected parties must request a
return response indicating that the notice has been received. Each
person entitled to receive notice of the recount may attend, witness
the recount, and be accompanied by counsel.
Proceedings of the canvassing board are public under chapter 42.30
RCW. Subject to reasonable and equitable guidelines adopted by the
canvassing board, all interested persons may attend and witness a
recount.

Sec. 1604 RCW 29.64.030 and 2001 c 225 s 6 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
RECOUNTING THE VOTES--OBSERVERS--REQUEST TO STOP. (1) At the time
and place established for a recount, the canvassing board or its duly
authorized representatives, in the presence of all witnesses who may be
in attendance, shall open the sealed containers containing the ballots
to be recounted, and shall recount the votes for the offices or issues
for which the recount has been ordered. Ballots shall be handled only
by the members of the canvassing board or their duly authorized
representatives.
Witnesses shall be permitted to observe the ballots and the process
of tabulating the votes, but they shall not be permitted to handle the
ballots. The canvassing board shall not permit the tabulation of votes
for any nomination, election, or issue other than the ones for which a
recount was applied for or required.
(2) At any time before the ballots from all of the precincts listed
in the application for the recount have been recounted, the applicant
may file with the board a written request to stop the recount.
(3) The recount may be observed by persons representing the
candidates affected by the recount or the persons representing both
sides of an issue that is being recounted. The observers may not make
a record of the names, addresses, or other information on the ballots,
poll books, or applications for absentee ballots unless authorized by
the superior court. The secretary of state or county auditor may limit
the number of observers to not less than two on each side if, in his or
her opinion, a greater number would cause undue delay or disruption of
the recount process.

Sec. 1605 RCW 29.64.035 and 2001 c 225 s 7 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PARTIAL RECOUNT REQUIRING COMPLETE RECOUNT. When a partial recount
of votes cast for an office or issue changes the result of the
election, the canvassing board or the secretary of state, if the office
or issue is being recounted at his or her direction, shall order a
complete recount of all ballots cast for the office or issue for the
jurisdiction in question.
This recount will be conducted in a manner consistent with RCW
29.64.015.

Sec. 1606 RCW 29.64.040 and 2001 c 225 s 8 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
AMENDED ABSTRACTS. Upon completion of the canvass of a recount,
the canvassing board shall prepare and certify an amended abstract
showing the votes cast in each precinct for which the recount was
conducted. Copies of the amended abstracts must be transmitted to the
same officers who received the abstract on which the recount was based.
If the nomination, election, or issue for which the recount was
conducted was submitted only to the voters of a county, the canvassing
board shall file the amended abstract with the original results of that
election or primary.
If the nomination, election, or issue for which a recount was
conducted was submitted to the voters of more than one county, the
secretary of state shall canvass the amended abstracts and shall file
an amended abstract with the original results of that election. An
amended abstract certified under this section supersedes any prior
abstract of the results for the same offices or issues at the same
primary or election.

Sec. 1607 RCW 29.64.051 and 2001 c 225 s 9 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
LIMITATION ON RECOUNTS. After the original count, canvass, and
certification of results, the votes cast in any single precinct may not
be recounted and the results recertified more than twice.

Sec. 1608 RCW 29.64.060 and 2001 c 225 s 10 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
EXPENSES OF RECOUNT--CHARGES. The canvassing board shall determine
the expenses for conducting a recount of votes.
The cost of the recount shall be deducted from the amount deposited
by the applicant for the recount at the time of filing the request for
the recount, and the balance shall be returned to the applicant. If
the costs of the recount exceed the deposit, the applicant shall pay
the difference. No charges may be deducted by the canvassing board
from the deposit for a recount if the recount changes the result of the
nomination or election for which the recount was ordered.

Sec. 1609 RCW 29.64.080 and 2001 c 225 s 11 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
STATEWIDE MEASURES--MANDATORY RECOUNT--COST AT STATE EXPENSE. When
the official canvass of returns of any election reveals that the
difference in the number of votes cast for the approval of a statewide
measure and the number of votes cast for the rejection of such measure
is less than two thousand votes and also less than one-half of one
percent of the total number of votes cast on such measure, the
secretary of state shall direct that a recount of all votes cast on
such measure be made on such measure, in the manner provided by RCW
29.64.030 and 29.64.040, and the cost of such recount will be at state
expense.

Sec. 1610 RCW 29.64.090 and 1977 ex.s. c 144 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
STATEWIDE MEASURES--MANDATORY RECOUNT--FUNDS FOR ADDITIONAL
EXPENSES. Each county auditor shall file with the secretary of state
a statement listing only the additional expenses incurred whenever a
mandatory recount of the votes cast on a state measure is made as
provided in RCW 29.64.080. The secretary of state shall include in his
or her biennial budget request a provision for sufficient funds to
carry out the provisions of this section. Payments hereunder shall be
from appropriations specifically provided for such purpose by law.

PART 17
CONTESTING AN ELECTION
Sec. 1701 RCW 29.04.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 3 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
PREVENTION AND CORRECTION OF ELECTION FRAUDS AND ERRORS. Any
justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge
of the superior court in the proper county shall, by order, require any
person charged with error, wrongful act, or neglect to forthwith
correct the error, desist from the wrongful act, or perform the duty
and to do as the court orders or to show cause forthwith why the error
should not be corrected, the wrongful act desisted from, or the duty or
order not performed, whenever it is made to appear to such justice or
judge by affidavit of an elector that:
(1) An error or omission has occurred or is about to occur in
printing the name of any candidate on official ballots; or
(2) An error other than as provided in subsections (1) and (3) of
this section has been committed or is about to be committed in printing
the ballots; or
(3) The name of any person has been or is about to be wrongfully
placed upon the ballots; or
(4) A wrongful act other than as provided for in subsections (1)
and (3) of this section has been performed or is about to be performed
by any election officer; or
(5) Any neglect of duty on the part of an election officer other
than as provided for in subsections (1) and (3) of this section has
occurred or is about to occur; or
(6) An error or omission has occurred or is about to occur in the
issuance of a certificate of election.
An affidavit of an elector under subsections (1) and (3) above when
relating to a primary election must be filed with the appropriate court
no later than the second Friday following the closing of the filing
period for nominations for such office and shall be heard and finally
disposed of by the court not later than five days after the filing
thereof. An affidavit of an elector under subsections (1) and (3) of
this section when relating to a general election must be filed with the
appropriate court no later than three days following the official
certification of the primary election returns and shall be heard and
finally disposed of by the court not later than five days after the
filing thereof. An affidavit of an elector under subsection (6) of
this section shall be filed with the appropriate court no later than
ten days following the issuance of a certificate of election.

Sec. 1702 RCW 29.65.010 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 30 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
COMMENCEMENT BY REGISTERED VOTER--CAUSES FOR. Any registered voter
may contest the right of any person declared elected to an office to be
issued a certificate of election for any of the following causes:
(1) For misconduct on the part of any member of any precinct
election board involved therein;
(2) Because the person whose right is being contested was not at
the time ((he)) the person was declared elected eligible to that
office;
(3) Because the person whose right is being contested was previous
to the election convicted of a felony by a court of competent
jurisdiction, ((his)) the conviction not having been reversed nor
((his)) the person's civil rights restored after the conviction;
(4) Because the person whose right is being contested gave a bribe
or reward to a voter or to an inspector or judge of election for the
purpose of procuring ((his)) the election, or offered to do so;
(5) On account of illegal votes.
(a) Illegal votes include but are not limited to the following:
(i) More than one vote cast by a single voter;
(ii) A vote cast by a person disqualified under Article VI, section
3 of the state Constitution.
(b) Illegal votes do not include votes cast by improperly
registered voters who were not properly challenged ((pursuant to))
under RCW 29.10.125 and 29.10.127.
All election contests ((shall)) must proceed under RCW 29.04.030.

Sec. 1703 RCW 29.65.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 102 are each
amended to read as follows:
AFFIDAVIT OF ERROR OR OMISSION--TIME FOR FILING--CONTENTS--WITNESSES. An affidavit of an elector with respect to RCW 29.04.030(6)
must be filed with the appropriate court no later than ten days
following the issuance of a certificate of election and ((shall)) must
set forth specifically:
(1) The name of the contestant and that he or she is a registered
voter in the county, district or precinct, as the case may be, in which
the office is to be exercised;
(2) The name of the person whose right is being contested;
(3) The office;
(4) The particular causes of the contest.
No statement of contest ((shall)) may be dismissed for want of form
if the particular causes of contest are alleged with sufficient
certainty. The person charged with the error or omission ((shall))
must be given the opportunity to call any witness, including the
candidate to whom he or she has issued or intends to issue the
certificate of election.

Sec. 1704 RCW 29.65.040 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 103 are each
amended to read as follows:
HEARING DATE--ISSUANCE OF CITATION--SERVICE. Upon such affidavit
being filed, ((it shall be the duty of)) the clerk ((to)) shall inform
the judge of the appropriate court, who may give notice, and order a
session of the court to be held at the usual place of holding ((said))
the court, on some day to be named by ((him)) the judge, not less than
ten nor more than twenty days from the date of ((such)) the notice, to
hear and determine such contested election((: PROVIDED, That)). If no
session ((be)) is called for the purpose, ((such)) the contest
((shall)) must be determined at the first regular session of court
after ((such)) the statement is filed.
The clerk of the court shall also at the time issue a citation for
the person charged with the error or omission, to appear at the time
and place specified in the notice((, which)). The citation ((shall))
must be delivered to the sheriff and be served upon the party in
person; or if ((he)) the person cannot be found, by leaving a copy
thereof at the house where ((he)) the person last resided.

Sec. 1705 RCW 29.65.050 and 1965 c 9 s 29.65.050 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
WITNESSES TO ATTEND--HEARING OF CONTEST--JUDGMENT. The clerk shall
issue subpoenas for witnesses in such contested election at the request
of either party, which shall be served by the sheriff or constable, as
other subpoenas, and the superior court shall have full power to issue
attachments to compel the attendance of witnesses who shall have been
duly subpoenaed to attend if they fail to do so.
The court shall meet at the time and place designated to determine
such contested election by the rules of law and evidence governing the
determination of questions of law and fact, so far as the same may be
applicable, and may dismiss the proceedings if the statement of the
cause or causes of contest is insufficient, or for want of prosecution.
After hearing the proofs and allegations of the parties, the court
shall pronounce judgment in the premises, either confirming or
annulling and setting aside such election, according to the law and
right of the case.
If in any such case it shall appear that another person than the
one returned has the highest number of legal votes, said court shall
declare such person duly elected.

Sec. 1706 RCW 29.65.055 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 104 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
COSTS, HOW AWARDED. If the proceedings are dismissed for
insufficiency, want of prosecution, or the election is by the court
confirmed, judgment shall be rendered against the party contesting such
election for costs, in favor of the party charged with error or
omission.
If such election is annulled and set aside, judgment for costs
shall be rendered against the party charged with the error or omission
and in favor of the party alleging the same.

Sec. 1707 RCW 29.65.060 and 1965 c 9 s 29.65.060 are each amended
to read as follows:
MISCONDUCT OF BOARD--IRREGULARITY MUST BE MATERIAL TO RESULT. No
irregularity or improper conduct in the proceedings of any election
board or any member ((thereof shall)) of the board amounts to such
malconduct as to annul or set aside any election unless the
irregularity or improper conduct was such as to procure the person
whose right to the office may be contested, to be declared duly elected
although ((he)) the person did not receive the highest number of legal
votes.

Sec. 1708 RCW 29.65.070 and 1965 c 9 s 29.65.070 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
MISCONDUCT OF BOARD--NUMBER OF VOTES AFFECTED--ENOUGH TO CHANGE
RESULT. When any election for an office exercised in and for a county
is contested on account of any malconduct on the part of any election
board, or any member thereof, the election shall not be annulled and
set aside upon any proof thereof, unless the rejection of the vote of
such precinct or precincts will change the result as to such office in
the remaining vote of the county.

Sec. 1709 RCW 29.65.080 and 1965 c 9 s 29.65.080 are each amended
to read as follows:
ILLEGAL VOTES--ALLEGATION OF IN STATEMENT OF CONTEST. When the
reception of illegal votes is alleged as a cause of contest, it ((shall
be)) is sufficient to state generally that illegal votes were cast,
((which)) that, if given to the person whose election is contested in
the specified precinct or precincts, will, if taken from ((him)) that
person, reduce the number of ((his)) the person's legal votes below the
number of legal votes given to some other person for the same office.

Sec. 1710 RCW 29.65.090 and 1965 c 9 s 29.65.090 are each amended
to read as follows:
ILLEGAL VOTES--LIST REQUIRED FOR TESTIMONY. No testimony ((shall))
may be received as to any illegal votes unless the party contesting the
election delivers to the opposite party, at least three days before
trial, a written list of the number of illegal votes and by whom given,
((which he)) that the contesting party intends to prove ((on such)) at
the trial. No testimony ((shall)) may be received as to any illegal
votes, except as to such as are specified in the list.

Sec. 1711 RCW 29.65.100 and 1965 c 9 s 29.65.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
ILLEGAL VOTES--NUMBER OF VOTES AFFECTED--ENOUGH TO CHANGE RESULT.
No election ((shall)) may be set aside on account of illegal votes,
unless it appears that an amount of illegal votes has been given to the
person whose right is being contested, ((which)) that, if taken from
((him)) that person, would reduce the number of ((his)) the person's
legal votes below the number of votes given to some other person for
the same office, after deducting therefrom the illegal votes ((which))
that may be shown to have been given to ((such)) the other person.

Sec. 1712 RCW 29.65.120 and 1965 c 9 s 29.65.120 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
NULLIFICATION OF ELECTION CERTIFICATE--WHEN EFFECTIVE. If an
election is set aside by the judgment of the superior court and if no
appeal is taken therefrom within ten days, the certificate issued shall
be thereby rendered void.

PART 18
STATE INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1801 VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION. The
cards required by RCW 29.07.090 must be kept on file in the office of
the secretary of state in the manner that will be most convenient for,
and for the sole purpose of, checking initiative and referendum
petitions. The secretary may maintain an automated file of voter
registration information for any county or counties in lieu of filing
or maintaining these voter registration cards if the automated file
includes all of the information from the cards including, but not
limited to, a retrievable facsimile of the signature of each voter of
that county or counties. The automated file may be used only for the
purpose authorized for the use of the cards.

Sec. 1802 RCW 29.79.010 and 1982 c 116 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
FILING PROPOSED MEASURES WITH SECRETARY OF STATE. If any legal
voter of the state, either individually or on behalf of an
organization, desires to petition the legislature to enact a proposed
measure, or submit a proposed initiative measure to the people, or
order that a referendum of all or part of any act, bill, or law, passed
by the legislature be submitted to the people, he or she shall file
with the secretary of state a ((typewritten)) legible copy of the
measure proposed, or the act or part of such act on which a referendum
is desired, accompanied by an affidavit that the ((proposer)) sponsor
is a legal voter and a filing fee prescribed under RCW 43.07.120((, as
now or hereafter amended)).

Sec. 1803 RCW 29.79.015 and 1982 c 116 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
REVIEW OF INITIATIVE MEASURES BY CODE REVISER'S OFFICE--CERTIFICATE
OF REVIEW REQUIRED FOR ASSIGNMENT OF SERIAL NUMBER. Upon receipt of
((any petition proposing an initiative to the people or an initiative
to the legislature, and prior to)) a proposed initiative measure, and
before giving it a serial number ((thereto)), the secretary of state
shall submit a copy thereof to the office of the code reviser and give
notice to the ((petitioner)) sponsor of such transmittal. Upon receipt
of the measure, the assistant code reviser to whom it has been assigned
may confer with the ((petitioner)) sponsor and shall within seven
working days from its receipt ((thereof)), review the proposal ((for
matters of form and style, and such matters of substantive import as
may be agreeable to the petitioner, and shall)) and recommend to the
((petitioner)) sponsor such revision or alteration of the measure as
may be deemed necessary and appropriate. The recommendations of the
code reviser's office ((shall be)) are advisory only, and the
((petitioner)) sponsor may accept or reject them in whole or in part.
The code reviser shall issue a certificate of review certifying that he
or she has reviewed the measure ((for form and style)) and that ((the))
any recommendations ((thereon, if any,)) have been communicated to the
((petitioner, and such)) sponsor. The certificate ((shall issue)) must
be issued whether or not the ((petitioner)) sponsor accepts such
recommendations. Within fifteen working days after notification of
submittal of the ((petition)) proposed measure to the code reviser's
office, the ((petitioner)) sponsor, if he or she desires to proceed
with ((his)) sponsorship, shall file the measure together with the
certificate of review with the secretary of state for assignment of a
serial number, and the secretary of state shall ((thereupon)) then
submit to the code reviser's office a certified copy of the measure
filed. Upon ((submitting)) submission of the proposal to the secretary
of state for assignment of a serial number, the secretary of state
shall refuse to make such assignment unless the proposal is accompanied
by a certificate of review.

Sec. 1804 RCW 29.79.020 and 1987 c 161 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
TIME FOR FILING VARIOUS TYPES. Initiative measures proposed to be
submitted to the people must be filed with the secretary of state
within ten months prior to the election at which they are to be
submitted, and the signature petitions ((therefor)) must be filed with
the secretary of state not less than four months before the next
general statewide election.
Initiative measures proposed to be submitted to the legislature
must be filed with the secretary of state within ten months prior to
the next regular session of the legislature at which they are to be
submitted, and the signature petitions ((therefor)) must be filed with
the secretary of state not less than ten days before such regular
session of the legislature.
A referendum measure petition ordering that any act or part
((thereof)) of an act passed by the legislature be referred to the
people must be filed with the secretary of state within ninety days
after the final adjournment of the legislative session at which the act
was passed. It may be submitted at the next general statewide election
or at a special election ordered by the legislature.
A proposed initiative or referendum measure may be filed no earlier
than the opening of the secretary of state's office for business
pursuant to RCW 42.04.060 on the first day filings are permitted, and
any initiative or referendum petition must be filed not later than the
close of business on the last business day in the specified period for
submission of signatures. If a filing deadline falls on a Saturday,
the office of the secretary of state ((shall)) must be open ((on that
Saturday)) for the transaction of business under this section from 8:00
a.m. to 5:00 p.m. on that Saturday.

Sec. 1805 RCW 29.79.030 and 1982 c 116 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
NUMBERING--TRANSMITTAL TO ATTORNEY GENERAL. The secretary of state
shall give a serial number to each initiative, referendum bill, or
referendum measure, using a separate series for initiatives to the
legislature, initiatives to the people, referendum bills, and
referendum measures, and forthwith transmit one copy of the measure
proposed bearing its serial number to the attorney general. Thereafter
a measure shall be known and designated on all petitions, ballots, and
proceedings as "Initiative Measure No. . . . .," "Referendum Bill No.
. . . . .," or "Referendum Measure No. . . . .(("))."

Sec. 1806 RCW 29.79.035 and 2000 c 197 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
BALLOT TITLE--FORMULATION, BALLOT DISPLAY. (1) The ballot title
for an initiative to the people, an initiative to the legislature, a
referendum bill, or a referendum measure consists of: (a) A statement
of the subject of the measure; (b) a concise description of the
measure; and (c) a question in the form prescribed in this section for
the ballot measure in question. The statement of the subject of a
measure must be sufficiently broad to reflect the subject of the
measure, sufficiently precise to give notice of the measure's subject
matter, and not exceed ten words. The concise description must contain
no more than thirty words, be a true and impartial description of the
measure's essential contents, clearly identify the proposition to be
voted on, and not, to the extent reasonably possible, create prejudice
either for or against the measure.
(2) For an initiative to the people, or for an initiative to the
legislature for which the legislature has not proposed an alternative,
the ballot title must be displayed on the ballot substantially as
follows:

"Initiative Measure No. . . . concerns (statement of subject).
This measure would (concise description). Should this measure
be enacted into law?

Yes . . . . . . . . . . . .

No . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(3) For an initiative to the legislature for which the legislature
has proposed an alternative, the ballot title must be displayed on the
ballot substantially as follows:

"Initiative Measure Nos. . . . and . . .B concern (statement of
subject).

Initiative Measure No. . . . would (concise description).

As an alternative, the legislature has proposed Initiative
Measure No. . . .B, which would (concise description).

1. Should either of these measures be enacted into law?

Yes . . . . . . . . . . . .

No . . . . . . . . . . . .

2. Regardless of whether you voted yes or no above, if one of
these measures is enacted, which one should it be?

Measure No. . . . . . . . . . . . .

or

Measure No. . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(4) For a referendum bill submitted to the people by the
legislature, the ballot issue must be displayed on the ballot
substantially as follows:

"The legislature has passed . . . . Bill No. . . . concerning
(statement of subject). This bill would (concise description).
Should this bill be:

Approved . . . . . . . . . . . .

Rejected . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(5) For a referendum measure by state voters on a bill the
legislature has passed, the ballot issue must be displayed on the
ballot substantially as follows:

"The legislature passed . . . Bill No. . . . concerning
(statement of subject) and voters have filed a sufficient
referendum petition on this bill. This bill would (concise
description). Should this bill be:

Approved . . . . . . . . . . . .

Rejected . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(6) The legislature may specify the statement of subject or concise
description, or both, in a referendum bill that it refers to the
people. The legislature may specify the concise description for an
alternative it submits for an initiative to the legislature. If the
legislature fails to specify these matters, the attorney general shall
prepare the material that was not specified. The statement of subject
and concise description as so provided must be included as part of the
ballot title unless changed on appeal.
The attorney general shall specify the statement of subject and
concise description for an initiative to the people, an initiative to
the legislature, and a referendum measure. The statement of subject
and concise description as so provided must be included as part of the
ballot title unless changed on appeal.

Sec. 1807 RCW 29.79.040 and 2000 c 197 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
BALLOT TITLE AND SUMMARY--FORMULATION BY ATTORNEY GENERAL. Within
five days after the receipt of an initiative or referendum the attorney
general shall formulate the ballot title, or portion of the ballot
title that the legislature has not provided, required by RCW 29.79.035
and a summary of the measure, not to exceed seventy-five words, and
transmit the serial number for the measure, complete ballot title, and
summary to the secretary of state. Saturdays, Sundays, and legal
holidays are not counted in calculating the time limits in this
section.

Sec. 1808 RCW 29.79.050 and 2000 c 197 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
BALLOT TITLE AND SUMMARY--NOTICE. Upon the filing of the ballot
title and summary for a state initiative or referendum measure in the
office of secretary of state, the secretary of state shall notify by
telephone and by mail, and, if requested, by other electronic means,
the person proposing the measure, the prime sponsor of a referendum
bill or alternative to an initiative to the legislature, the chief
clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and
any other individuals who have made written request for such
notification of the exact language of the ballot title and summary.

Sec. 1809 RCW 29.79.060 and 2000 c 197 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
BALLOT TITLE AND SUMMARY--APPEAL TO SUPERIOR COURT. Any persons,
including the attorney general or either or both houses of the
legislature, dissatisfied with the ballot title or summary for a state
initiative or referendum may, within five days from the filing of the
ballot title in the office of the secretary of state appeal to the
superior court of Thurston county by petition setting forth the
measure, the ballot title or summary, and their objections to the
ballot title or summary and requesting amendment of the ballot title or
summary by the court. Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not
counted in calculating the time limits contained in this section.
A copy of the petition on appeal together with a notice that an
appeal has been taken shall be served upon the secretary of state, upon
the attorney general, and upon the person proposing the measure if the
appeal is initiated by someone other than that person. Upon the filing
of the petition on appeal or at the time to which the hearing may be
adjourned by consent of the appellant, the court shall accord first
priority to examining the proposed measure, the ballot title or
summary, and the objections to that ballot title or summary, may hear
arguments, and shall, within five days, render its decision and file
with the secretary of state a certified copy of such ballot title or
summary as it determines will meet the requirements of RCW 29.79.040.
The decision of the superior court shall be final. Such appeal shall
be heard without costs to either party.

Sec. 1810 RCW 29.79.070 and 2000 c 197 s 5 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
BALLOT TITLE AND SUMMARY--MAILED TO PROPONENTS AND OTHER PERSONS--APPEARANCE ON PETITIONS. When the ballot title and summary are finally
established, the secretary of state shall file the instrument
establishing it with the proposed measure and transmit a copy thereof
by mail to the person proposing the measure, the chief clerk of the
house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and to any other
individuals who have made written request for such notification.
Thereafter such ballot title shall be the title of the measure in all
petitions, ballots, and other proceedings in relation thereto. The
summary shall appear on all petitions directly following the ballot
title.

Sec. 1811 RCW 29.79.080 and 1982 c 116 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
PETITIONS--PAPER--SIZE--CONTENTS. The person proposing the measure
shall print blank petitions upon single sheets of paper of good writing
quality (including but not limited to newsprint) not less than eleven
inches in width and not less than fourteen inches in length. Each
petition at the time of circulating, signing, and filing with the
secretary of state ((shall)) must consist of not more than one sheet
with numbered lines for not more than twenty signatures, with the
prescribed warning and title, ((shall)) be in the form required by RCW
29.79.090, 29.79.100, or 29.79.110, ((as now or hereafter amended,))
and ((shall)) have a readable, full, true, and correct copy of the
proposed measure ((referred to therein)) printed on the reverse side of
the petition.

Sec. 1812 RCW 29.79.090 and 1982 c 116 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
PETITIONS TO LEGISLATURE--FORM. Petitions for proposing measures
for submission to the legislature at its next regular session((,
shall)) must be substantially in the following form:

((WARNING

Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or her
true name, knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, signs this
petition when he or she is not a legal voter, or makes any false
statement on this petition may be punished by fine or imprisonment or
both.)) The warning prescribed by RCW 29.79.115; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE LEGISLATURE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that this petition and the proposed
measure known as Initiative Measure No. . . . . and entitled (here set
forth the established ballot title of the measure), a full, true, and
correct copy of which is printed on the reverse side of this petition,
be transmitted to the legislature of the State of Washington at its
next ensuing regular session, and we respectfully petition the
legislature to enact said proposed measure into law; and each of us for
himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am
a legal voter of the State of Washington in the city (or town) and
county written after my name, my residence address is correctly stated,
and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.

((Petitioner's
signature Print name
for positive
identification Residence address,
street and number,
if any City
or
Town

County

(Here follow 20 numbered lines divided into columns as below.)

1 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

2 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

3 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

etc.))

The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

Sec. 1813 RCW 29.79.100 and 1982 c 116 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
PETITIONS TO PEOPLE--FORM. Petitions for proposing measures for
submission to the people for their approval or rejection at the next
ensuing general election((, shall)) must be substantially in the
following form:

((WARNING

Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or her
true name, knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, signs this
petition when he or she is not a legal voter, or makes any false
statement on this petition may be punished by fine or imprisonment or
both.)) The warning prescribed by RCW 29.79.115; followed by:

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR SUBMISSION TO THE PEOPLE

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully direct that the proposed measure known as
Initiative Measure No. . . . ., entitled (here insert the established
ballot title of the measure), a full, true and correct copy of which is
printed on the reverse side of this petition, be submitted to the legal
voters of the State of Washington for their approval or rejection at
the general election to be held on the . . . . . day of November,
((19. . .)) (year); and each of us for himself or herself says: I have
personally signed this petition; I am a legal voter of the State of
Washington, in the city (or town) and county written after my name, my
residence address is correctly stated, and I have knowingly signed this
petition only once.

((Petitioner's
signature Print name
for positive
identification Residence address,
street and number,
if any City
or
Town

County

(Here follow 20 numbered lines divided into columns as below.)

1 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

2 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

3 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

etc.))

The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

Sec. 1814 RCW 29.79.110 and 1993 c 256 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
REFERENDUM PETITIONS--FORM. Petitions ordering that acts or parts
of acts passed by the legislature be referred to the people at the next
ensuing general election, or special election ordered by the
legislature, ((shall)) must be substantially in the following form:

((WARNING

Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or her
true name, knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, signs this
petition when he or she is not a legal voter, or makes any false
statement on this petition may be punished by fine or imprisonment or
both.)) The warning prescribed by RCW 29.79.115; followed by:

PETITION FOR REFERENDUM

To the Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of
Washington, respectfully order and direct that Referendum Measure No.
. . . . ., filed to revoke a (or part or parts of a) bill that (concise
statement required by RCW ((29.79.055)) 29.27.066 (as recodified by
this act)) and that was passed by the . . . . . . legislature of the
State of Washington at the last regular (special) session of said
legislature, shall be referred to the people of the state for their
approval or rejection at the regular (special) election to be held on
the . . . . day of November, ((19. . .)) (year); and each of us for
himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am
a legal voter of the State of Washington, in the city (or town) and
county written after my name, my residence address is correctly stated,
and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.

((Petitioner's
signature Print name
for positive
identification Residence address,
street and number,
if any City
or
Town

County

(Here follow 20 numbered lines divided into columns as below.)

1 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

2 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

3 - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

etc.))

The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

Sec. 1815 RCW 29.79.115 and 1993 c 256 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
WARNING STATEMENT--FURTHER REQUIREMENTS. The word "warning" and
the following warning statement regarding signing petitions ((that))
must appear on petitions as prescribed by ((RCW 29.79.090, 29.79.100,
and 29.79.110 shall)) this title and must be printed on each petition
sheet such that they occupy not less than four square inches of the
front of the petition sheet.

WARNING

Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or her
true name, knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, signs this
petition when he or she is not a legal voter, or makes any false
statement on this petition may be punished by fine or imprisonment or
both.

Sec. 1816 RCW 29.79.120 and 1982 c 116 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
PETITIONS--SIGNATURES--NUMBER NECESSARY. When the person proposing
any initiative measure has ((secured upon such initiative petition a
number of)) obtained signatures of legal voters equal to or exceeding
eight percent of the votes cast for the office of governor at the last
regular gubernatorial election prior to the submission of the
signatures for verification, or when the person or organization
demanding any referendum of an act or part of an act of the legislature
((or any part thereof has secured upon any such referendum petition))
has obtained a number of signatures of legal voters equal to or
exceeding four percent of the votes cast for the office of governor at
the last regular gubernatorial election prior to the submission of the
signatures for verification, ((he or they may submit)) the petition
containing the signatures may be submitted to the secretary of state
for filing.

Sec. 1817 RCW 29.79.140 and 1965 c 9 s 29.79.140 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
PETITIONS--TIME FOR FILING. The time for submitting initiative or
referendum petitions to the secretary of state for filing is as
follows:
(1) A referendum petition ordering and directing that the whole or
some part or parts of an act passed by the legislature be referred to
the people for their approval or rejection at the next ensuing general
election or a special election ordered by the legislature, must be
submitted not more than ninety days after the final adjournment of the
session of the legislature which passed the act;
(2) An initiative petition proposing a measure to be submitted to
the people for their approval or rejection at the next ensuing general
election, must be submitted not less than four months before the date
of such election;
(3) An initiative petition proposing a measure to be submitted to
the legislature at its next ensuing regular session must be submitted
not less than ten days before the commencement of the session.

Sec. 1818 RCW 29.79.150 and 1982 c 116 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
PETITIONS--ACCEPTANCE OR REJECTION BY SECRETARY OF STATE. The
secretary of state may refuse to file any initiative or referendum
petition being submitted upon any of the following grounds:
(1) That the petition ((is not in the form)) does not contain the
information required by RCW 29.79.090, 29.79.100, or 29.79.110 ((as now
or hereafter amended)).
(2) That the petition clearly bears insufficient signatures.
(3) That the time within which the petition may be filed has
expired.
In case of such refusal, the secretary of state shall endorse on
the petition the word "submitted" and the date, and retain the petition
pending appeal.
If none of the grounds for refusal exists, the secretary of state
must accept and file the petition.

Sec. 1819 RCW 29.79.160 and 1965 c 9 s 29.79.160 are each amended
to read as follows:
PETITIONS--REVIEW OF REFUSAL TO ACCEPT AND FILE. If the secretary
of state refuses to file an initiative or referendum petition when
submitted ((to him)) for filing, the persons submitting it for filing
may, within ten days after ((his)) the refusal, apply to the superior
court of Thurston county for ((a citation)) an order requiring the
secretary of state to bring the petitions before the court, and for a
writ of mandate to compel ((him)) the secretary of state to file it.
The application ((shall)) takes precedence over other cases and matters
and ((shall)) must be speedily heard and determined.
If the court issues the citation, and determines that the petition
is legal in form and apparently contains the requisite number of
signatures and was submitted for filing within the time prescribed in
the Constitution, it shall issue its mandate requiring the secretary of
state to file it ((in his office)) as of the date of submission for
filing.
The decision of the superior court granting a writ of mandate
((shall be)) is final.

Sec. 1820 RCW 29.79.170 and 1988 c 202 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
PETITIONS--REVIEW--APPELLATE REVIEW OF SUPERIOR COURT'S REFUSAL TO
ISSUE MANDATE. The decision of the superior court refusing to grant a
writ of mandate((,)) may be reviewed by the supreme court within five
days after the decision of the superior court. The review ((shall))
must be considered an emergency matter of public concern, and ((shall))
be heard and determined with all convenient speed((, and)). If the
supreme court decides that the petitions are legal in form and
apparently contain the requisite number of signatures of legal voters,
and were filed within the time prescribed in the Constitution, it shall
issue its mandate directing the secretary of state to file the petition
((in his office)) as of the date of submission.

Sec. 1821 RCW 29.79.180 and 1965 c 9 s 29.79.180 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
PETITIONS--DESTRUCTION ON FINAL REFUSAL. If no appeal is taken
from the refusal of the secretary of state to file a petition within
the time prescribed, or if an appeal is taken and the secretary of
state is not required to file the petition by the mandate of either the
superior or the supreme court, the secretary of state shall destroy it.

Sec. 1822 RCW 29.79.190 and 1982 c 116 s 14 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PETITIONS--CONSOLIDATION INTO VOLUMES. If the secretary of state
accepts and files an initiative or referendum petition upon its being
submitted for filing or if he or she is required to file it by the
court, he or she shall, in the presence of the person submitting such
petition for filing if he or she desires to be present, arrange and
assemble the sheets containing the signatures into such volumes as will
be most convenient for verification and canvassing and shall
consecutively number the volumes and stamp the date of filing on each
volume.

Sec. 1823 RCW 29.79.200 and 1993 c 368 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PETITIONS--VERIFICATION AND CANVASS OF SIGNATURES, OBSERVERS--STATISTICAL SAMPLING--INITIATIVES TO LEGISLATURE, CERTIFICATION OF.
Upon the filing of an initiative or referendum petition, the secretary
of state shall proceed to verify and canvass the names of the legal
voters on the petition. The verification and canvass of signatures on
the petition may be observed by persons representing the advocates and
opponents of the proposed measure so long as they make no record of the
names, addresses, or other information on the petitions or related
records during the verification process except upon the order of the
superior court of Thurston county. The secretary of state may limit
the number of observers to not less than two on each side, if in his or
her opinion, a greater number would cause undue delay or disruption of
the verification process. Any such limitation shall apply equally to
both sides. The secretary of state may use any statistical sampling
techniques for this verification and canvass which have been adopted by
rule as provided by chapter 34.05 RCW. No petition will be rejected on
the basis of any statistical method employed, and no petition will be
accepted on the basis of any statistical method employed if such method
indicates that the petition contains fewer than the requisite number of
signatures of legal voters. If the secretary of state finds the same
name signed to more than one petition, he or she shall reject all but
the first such valid signature. For an initiative to the legislature,
the secretary of state shall transmit a certified copy of the proposed
measure to the legislature at the opening of its session and, as soon
as the signatures on the petition have been verified and canvassed, the
secretary of state shall send to the legislature a certificate of the
facts relating to the filing, verification, and canvass of the
petition.

Sec. 1824 RCW 29.79.210 and 1988 c 202 s 29 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PETITIONS--COUNT OF SIGNATURES--REVIEW. Any citizen dissatisfied
with the determination of the secretary of state that an initiative or
referendum petition contains or does not contain the requisite number
of signatures of legal voters may, within five days after such
determination, apply to the superior court of Thurston county for a
citation requiring the secretary of state to submit the petition to
said court for examination, and for a writ of mandate compelling the
certification of the measure and petition, or for an injunction to
prevent the certification thereof to the legislature, as the case may
be. Such application and all proceedings had thereunder shall take
precedence over other cases and shall be speedily heard and determined.
The decision of the superior court granting or refusing to grant
the writ of mandate or injunction may be reviewed by the supreme court
within five days after the decision of the superior court, and if the
supreme court decides that a writ of mandate or injunction, as the case
may be, should issue, it shall issue the writ directed to the secretary
of state; otherwise, it shall dismiss the proceedings. The clerk of
the supreme court shall forthwith notify the secretary of state of the
decision of the supreme court.

Sec. 1825 RCW 29.79.230 and 1965 c 9 s 29.79.230 are each amended
to read as follows:
INITIATIVES AND REFERENDUMS TO VOTERS--CERTIFICATES OF
SUFFICIENCY. If a referendum or initiative petition for submission of
a measure to the people is found sufficient, the secretary of state
shall at the time and in the manner that he or she certifies to the
county auditors of the various counties the names of candidates for
state and district officers certify to each county auditor the serial
numbers and ballot titles of the several initiative and referendum
measures to be voted upon at the next ensuing general election or
special election ordered by the legislature.

Sec. 1826 RCW 29.79.270 and 1965 c 9 s 29.79.270 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
REJECTED INITIATIVE TO LEGISLATURE TREATED AS REFERENDUM
BILL. Whenever any measure proposed by initiative petition for
submission to the legislature is rejected by the legislature or the
legislature takes no action thereon before the end of the regular
session at which it is submitted, the secretary of state shall certify
the serial number and ballot title thereof to the county auditors for
printing on the ballots at the next ensuing general election in like
manner as initiative measures for submission to the people are
certified.

Sec. 1827 RCW 29.79.280 and 1965 c 9 s 29.79.280 are each
reenacted to read as follows:
SUBSTITUTE FOR REJECTED INITIATIVE TREATED AS REFERENDUM BILL. If
the legislature, having rejected a measure submitted to it by
initiative petition, proposes a different measure dealing with the same
subject, the secretary of state shall give that measure the same number
as that borne by the initiative measure followed by the letter "B."
Such measure so designated as "Alternative Measure No. . . . . B,"
together with the ballot title thereof, when ascertained, shall be
certified by the secretary of state to the county auditors for printing
on the ballots for submission to the voters for their approval or
rejection in like manner as initiative measures for submission to the
people are certified.

Sec. 1828 RCW 29.79.290 and 2000 c 197 s 6 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
SUBSTITUTE FOR REJECTED INITIATIVE--CONCISE DESCRIPTION. For a
measure designated as "Alternative Measure No. . . . . B," the
secretary of state shall obtain from the measure adopting the
alternative, or otherwise the attorney general, a concise description
of the alternative measure that differs from the concise description of
the original initiative and indicates as clearly as possible the
essential differences between the two measures.

Sec. 1829 RCW 29.79.300 and 1965 c 9 s 29.79.300 are each amended
to read as follows:
PRINTING BALLOT TITLES ON BALLOTS--ORDER AND FORM. The county
auditor of each county shall ((cause to be printed)) print on the
official ballots for the election at which initiative and referendum
measures are to be submitted to the people for their approval or
rejection, the serial numbers and ballot titles((,)) certified by the
secretary of state. They ((shall)) must appear under separate headings
in the order of the serial numbers as follows:
(1) Measures proposed for submission to the people by initiative
petition ((shall)) will be under the heading, "Proposed by Initiative
Petition";
(2) Bills passed by the legislature and ordered referred to the
people by referendum petition ((shall)) will be under the heading,
"Passed by the Legislature and Ordered Referred by Petition";
(3) Bills passed and referred to the people by the legislature
((shall)) will be under the heading, "Proposed to the People by the
Legislature";
(4) Measures proposed to the legislature and rejected or not acted
upon ((shall)) will be under the heading, "Proposed to the Legislature
and Referred to the People";
(5) Measures proposed to the legislature and alternative measures
passed by the legislature in lieu thereof ((shall)) will be under the
heading, "Initiated by Petition and Alternative by Legislature."

PART 19
REDISTRICTING
Sec. 1901 RCW 29.70.100 and 1984 c 13 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
COUNTIES, MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS, AND SPECIAL PURPOSE DISTRICTS.
(1) It is the responsibility of each county, municipal corporation, and
special purpose district with a governing body comprised of internal
director, council, or commissioner districts not based on statutorily
required land ownership criteria to periodically redistrict its
governmental unit, based on population information from the most recent
federal decennial census.
(2) Within forty-five days after receipt of federal decennial
census information applicable to a specific local area, the commission
established in RCW 44.05.030 shall forward the census information to
each municipal corporation, county, and district charged with
redistricting under this section.
(3) No later than eight months after its receipt of federal
decennial census data, the governing body of the municipal corporation,
county, or district shall prepare a plan for redistricting its internal
or director districts.
(4) The plan shall be consistent with the following criteria:
(a) Each internal director, council, or commissioner district shall
be as nearly equal in population as possible to each and every other
such district comprising the municipal corporation, county, or special
purpose district.
(b) Each district shall be as compact as possible.
(c) Each district shall consist of geographically contiguous area.
(d) Population data may not be used for purposes of favoring or
disfavoring any racial group or political party.
(e) To the extent feasible and if not inconsistent with the basic
enabling legislation for the municipal corporation, county, or
district, the district boundaries shall coincide with existing
recognized natural boundaries and shall, to the extent possible,
preserve existing communities of related and mutual interest.
(5) During the adoption of its plan, the municipal corporation,
county, or district shall ensure that full and reasonable public notice
of its actions is provided. The municipal corporation, county, or
district shall hold at least one public hearing on the redistricting
plan at least one week before adoption of the plan.
(6)(a) Any registered voter residing in an area affected by the
redistricting plan may request review of the adopted local plan by the
superior court of the county in which he or she resides, within forty-five days of the plan's adoption. Any request for review must specify
the reason or reasons alleged why the local plan is not consistent with
the applicable redistricting criteria. The municipal corporation,
county, or district may be joined as respondent. The superior court
shall thereupon review the challenged plan for compliance with the
applicable redistricting criteria set out in subsection (4) of this
section.
(b) If the superior court finds the plan to be consistent with the
requirements of this section, the plan shall take effect immediately.
(c) If the superior court determines the plan does not meet the
requirements of this section, in whole or in part, it shall remand the
plan for further or corrective action within a specified and reasonable
time period.
(d) If the superior court finds that any request for review is
frivolous or has been filed solely for purposes of harassment or delay,
it may impose appropriate sanctions on the party requesting review,
including payment of attorneys' fees and costs to the respondent
municipal corporation, county, or district.

Sec. 1902 RCW 29.15.026 and 1991 c 178 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
INFORMATION ON GEOGRAPHICAL BOUNDARIES. (1) The legislative
authority of each county and each city, town, and special purpose
district which lies entirely within the county shall provide the county
auditor accurate information describing its geographical boundaries and
the boundaries of its director, council, or commissioner districts and
shall ensure that the information provided to the auditor is kept
current.
(2) A city, town, or special purpose district that lies in more
than one county shall provide the secretary of state accurate
information describing its geographical boundaries and the boundaries
of its director, council, or commissioner districts and shall ensure
that the information provided to the secretary is kept current. The
secretary of state shall promptly transmit to each county in which a
city, town, or special purpose district is located information
regarding the boundaries of that jurisdiction which is provided to the
secretary.

Sec. 1903 RCW 29.10.060 and 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 27 are each
amended to read as follows:
CHANGE OF PRECINCT BOUNDARIES--TRANSFER OF REGISTRATION. If the
boundaries of any city, township, or rural precinct are changed in the
manner provided by law, the county auditor shall transfer the
registration cards of every registered voter whose place of residence
is affected thereby to the files of the proper precinct, noting thereon
the name or number of the new precinct, or change the addresses, the
precinct names or numbers, and the special district designations for
those registered voters on the voter registration lists of the county.
It shall not be necessary for any registered voter whose residence has
been changed from one precinct to another, by a change of boundary, to
apply to the registration officer for a transfer of registration. The
county auditor shall mail to each registrant in the new precinct a
notice that his or her precinct has been changed from . . . . . . to
. . . . . ., and that thereafter ((he)) the registrant will be entitled
to vote in the new precinct, giving the name or number.

Sec. 1904 RCW 29.04.140 and 1989 c 278 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
MAPS AND CENSUS CORRESPONDENCE LISTS--APPORTIONMENT--DUTIES OF
SECRETARY OF STATE. (1) With regard to functions relating to census,
apportionment, and the establishment of legislative and congressional
districts, the secretary of state shall:
(a) ((Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW governing the
preparation, maintenance, distribution, review, and filing of precinct
maps under RCW 29.04.050;
(b))) Coordinate and monitor precinct mapping functions of the
county auditors and county engineers;
(((c))) (b) Maintain official state base maps and correspondence
lists and maintain an index of all such maps and lists;
(((d))) (c) Furnish to the United States bureau of the census as
needed for the decennial census of population, current, accurate, and
easily readable versions of maps of all counties, cities, towns, and
other areas of this state, which indicate current precinct boundaries
together with copies of the census correspondence lists.
(2) The secretary of state shall serve as the state liaison with
the United States bureau of census on matters relating to the
preparation of maps and the tabulation of population for apportionment
purposes.

PART 20
POLITICAL PARTIES
Sec. 2001 RCW 29.42.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
AUTHORITY--GENERALLY. (1) Each political party organization
((shall have the power to)) may:
(((1))) (a) Make its own rules and regulations;
(((2) Call conventions;
(3) Elect delegates to conventions, state and national;
(4) Fill vacancies on the ticket;
(5) Provide for the nomination of presidential electors;)) and
(((6))) (b) Perform all functions inherent in such an
organization((:)).
((PROVIDED, That)) (2) Only major political parties ((shall have
the power to)) may designate candidates to appear on the state primary
((election)) ballot as provided in RCW 29.18.150 ((as now or hereafter
amended)).

Sec. 2002 RCW 29.42.020 and 1987 c 295 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
STATE COMMITTEE. The state committee of each major political party
((shall)) consists of one committeeman and one committeewoman from each
county elected by the county central committee at its organization
meeting. It ((shall)) must have a chair and vice-chair ((who must be))
of opposite sexes. This committee shall meet during January of each
odd-numbered year for the purpose of organization at a time and place
designated by a ((sufficient notice to all the newly elected state
committeemen and committeewomen by the authorized officers of the
retiring committee. For the purpose of this section a)) notice mailed
at least one week ((prior to)) before the date of the meeting ((shall
constitute sufficient notice)) to all the newly elected state
committeemen and committeewomen by the authorized officers of the
retiring committee. At its organizational meeting it shall elect its
chair and vice-chair, and such officers as its bylaws may provide, and
adopt bylaws, rules, and regulations. It ((shall have power to)) may:
(1) Call conventions at such time and place and under such
circumstances and for such purposes as the call to convention ((shall))
designates. The manner, number, and procedure for selection of state
convention delegates ((shall be)) is subject to the committee's rules
and regulations duly adopted;
(2) Provide for the election of delegates to national conventions;
(3) Fill vacancies on the ticket for any federal or state office to
be voted on by the electors of more than one county;
(4) Provide for the nomination of presidential electors; and
(5) Perform all functions inherent in such an organization.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the committee
((shall not set rules which shall govern)) may not adopt rules
governing the conduct of the actual proceedings at a party state
convention.

Sec. 2003 RCW 29.42.030 and 1987 c 295 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
COUNTY CENTRAL COMMITTEE--ORGANIZATION MEETINGS. The county
central committee of each major political party ((shall)) consists of
the precinct committee officers of the party from the several voting
precincts of the county. Following each state general election held in
even-numbered years, this committee shall meet for the purpose of
organization at an easily accessible location within the county,
subsequent to the certification of precinct committee officers by the
county auditor and no later than the second Saturday of the following
January. The authorized officers of the retiring committee shall cause
notice of the time and place of ((such)) the meeting to be mailed to
each precinct committee officer at least seventy-two hours ((prior to))
before the date of the meeting.
At its organization meeting, the county central committee shall
elect a chair and vice-chair ((who must be)) of opposite sexes((; it
shall also elect a state committeeman and a state committeewoman)).

Sec. 2004 RCW 29.42.040 and 1990 c 59 s 104 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PRECINCT COMMITTEE OFFICER, ELIGIBILITY. Any member of a major
political party who is a registered voter in the precinct may upon
payment of a fee of one dollar file his or her declaration of candidacy
as prescribed under RCW 29.15.010 with the county auditor for the
office of precinct committee officer of his or her party in that
precinct. When elected the precinct committee officer shall serve so
long as the committee officer remains an eligible voter in that
precinct and until a successor has been elected at the next ensuing
state general election in the even-numbered year.

Sec. 2005 RCW 29.42.050 and 1991 c 363 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
PRECINCT COMMITTEE OFFICER--ELECTION--DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY,
FEE--TERM--VACANCY. The statutory requirements for filing as a
candidate at the primaries ((shall)) apply to candidates for precinct
committee officer, except that the filing period for this office alone
((shall be)) is extended to and includes the Friday immediately
following the last day for political parties to fill vacancies in the
ticket as provided by RCW 29.18.150((, and)). The office shall not be
voted upon at the primaries, but the names of all candidates must
appear under the proper party and office designations on the ballot for
the general ((November)) election for each even-numbered year, and the
one receiving the highest number of votes ((shall)) will be declared
elected((: PROVIDED, That)). However, to be declared elected, a
candidate must receive at least ten percent of the number of votes cast
for the candidate of the candidate's party receiving the greatest
number of votes in the precinct. ((Any person elected to the office of
precinct committee officer who has not filed a declaration of candidacy
shall pay the fee of one dollar to the county auditor for a certificate
of election.)) The term of office of precinct committee officer
((shall be for)) is two years, commencing upon completion of the
official canvass of votes by the county canvassing board of election
returns. ((Should any vacancy occur in this office by reason of death,
resignation, or disqualification of the incumbent, or because of
failure to elect, the respective county chair of the county central
committee shall be empowered to fill such vacancy by appointment:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in legislative districts having a majority of
its precincts in a county with a population of one million or more,
such appointment shall be made only upon the recommendation of the
legislative district chair: PROVIDED, That the person so appointed
shall have the same qualifications as candidates when filing for
election to such office for such precinct: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when
a vacancy in the office of precinct committee officer exists because of
failure to elect at a state general election, such vacancy shall not be
filled until after the organization meeting of the county central
committee and the new county chair selected as provided by RCW
29.42.030.))

Sec. 2006 RCW 29.42.070 and 1991 c 363 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT CHAIR--ELECTION--TERM--REMOVAL. Within forty-five days after the statewide general election in even-numbered years,
((or within thirty days following July 30, 1967, for the biennium
ending with the 1968 general elections,)) the county chair of each
major political party shall call separate meetings of all elected
precinct committee officers in each legislative district, a majority of
the precincts of which are within a county with a population of one
million or more for the purpose of electing a legislative district
chair in such district. The district chair shall hold office until the
next legislative district reorganizational meeting two years later, or
until a successor is elected.
The legislative district chair ((can only)) may be removed only by
the majority vote of the elected precinct committee officers in the
chair's district.

PART 21
CRIMES AND PENALTIESSubpart 21.1
General Provisions
Sec. 2101 RCW 29.85.245 and 2001 c 41 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
ACTION AGAINST VOTING, REGISTRATION IRREGULARITIES. (1) A county
auditor who suspects a person of fraudulent voter registration, vote
tampering, or irregularities in voting shall transmit his or her
suspicions and observations without delay to the canvassing board.
(2) The county auditor shall make a good faith effort to contact
the person in question without delay. If the county auditor is unable
to contact the person, or if, after contacting the person, the auditor
still suspects fraudulent voter registration, vote tampering, or
irregularities in voting, the auditor shall refer the issue to the
county prosecuting attorney to determine if further action is
warranted.
(3) When a complaint providing information concerning fraudulent
voter registration, vote tampering, or irregularities in voting ((are
[is])) is presented to the office of the prosecuting attorney, that
office shall file charges in all cases where warranted.

Sec. 2102 RCW 29.82.210 and 1965 c 9 s 29.82.210 are each amended
to read as follows:
VIOLATIONS BY OFFICERS. Every officer who willfully violates ((any
of the provisions of this chapter)) sections 1407 through 1423 of this
act, for the violation of which no penalty is ((herein)) prescribed in
this title or who willfully fails to comply with the provisions of this
chapter ((shall be)) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2103 RCW 29.38.070 and 2001 c 241 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
PENALTY. A person who willfully violates any provision of this
((chapter)) title regarding the conduct of mail ballot primaries or
elections is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2104 RCW 29.85.275 and 1991 c 81 s 19 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
POLITICAL ADVERTISING, REMOVING OR DEFACING. A person who removes
or defaces lawfully placed political advertising including yard signs
or billboards without authorization is guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable to the same extent as a misdemeanor that is punishable under
RCW 9A.20.021. The defacement or removal of each item constitutes a
separate violation.

Subpart 21.2
Registration
Sec. 2105 RCW 29.07.400 and 1994 c 57 s 24 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
OFFICIALS' VIOLATIONS. If any county auditor or registration
assistant:
(1) Willfully neglects or refuses to perform any duty required by
law in connection with the registration of voters; or
(2) Willfully neglects or refuses to perform such duty in the
manner required by voter registration law; or
(3) Enters or causes or permits to be entered on the voter
registration records the name of any person in any other manner or at
any other time than as prescribed by voter registration law or enters
or causes or permits to be entered on such records the name of any
person not entitled to be thereon; or
(4) Destroys, mutilates, conceals, changes, or alters any
registration record in connection therewith except as authorized by
voter registration law,
he or she is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable to the same
extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2106 RCW 29.07.405 and 2001 c 41 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DISENFRANCHISEMENT OR DISCRIMINATION--PENALTY. An election officer
or a person who intentionally disenfranchises an eligible citizen or
discriminates against a person eligible to vote by denying voter
registration is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2107 RCW 29.07.410 and 1994 c 57 s 25 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
VOTERS' AND OFFICIALS' VIOLATIONS. Any person who:
(1) Knowingly provides false information on an application for
voter registration under any provision of this title;
(2) Knowingly makes or attests to a false declaration as to his or
her qualifications as a voter;
(3) Knowingly causes or permits himself or herself to be registered
using the name of another person;
(4) Knowingly causes himself or herself to be registered under two
or more different names;
(5) Knowingly causes himself or herself to be registered in two or
more counties;
(6) Offers to pay another person to assist in registering voters,
where payment is based on a fixed amount of money per voter
registration;
(7) Accepts payment for assisting in registering voters, where
payment is based on a fixed amount of money per voter registration; or
(8) Knowingly causes any person to be registered or causes any
registration to be transferred or canceled except as authorized under
this title,
is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2108 RCW 29.85.249 and 2001 c 41 s 13 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
UNQUALIFIED REGISTRATION. A person who knows that he or she does
not possess the legal qualifications of a voter and who registers to
vote is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Subpart 21.3
Petitions and Signatures
Sec. 2109 RCW 29.79.480 and 1993 c 256 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
VIOLATIONS BY OFFICERS. Every officer who willfully violates any
of the provisions of ((this chapter or)) chapter 29A.--- (Part 18 of
this act) or 29.81 RCW, for the violation of which no penalty is herein
prescribed, or who willfully fails to comply with the provisions of
((this chapter or)) chapter 29A.--- (Part 18 of this act) or 29.81 RCW,
((shall be)) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable to the same
extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2110 RCW 29.82.220 and 1984 c 170 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
VIOLATIONS--CORRUPT PRACTICES. Every person is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor, who:
(1) For any consideration, compensation, gratuity, reward, or thing
of value or promise thereof, signs or declines to sign any recall
petition; or
(2) Advertises in any newspaper, magazine or other periodical
publication, or in any book, pamphlet, circular, or letter, or by means
of any sign, signboard, bill, poster, handbill, or card, or in any
manner whatsoever, that he or she will either for or without
compensation or consideration circulate, solicit, procure, or obtain
signatures upon, or influence or induce or attempt to influence or
induce persons to sign or not to sign any recall petition or vote for
or against any recall; or
(3) For pay or any consideration, compensation, gratuity, reward,
or thing of value or promise thereof, circulates, or solicits,
procures, or obtains or attempts to procure or obtain signatures upon
any recall petition; or
(4) Pays or offers or promises to pay, or gives or offers or
promises to give any consideration, compensation, gratuity, reward, or
thing of value to any person to induce him or her to sign or not to
sign, or to circulate or solicit, procure, or attempt to procure or
obtain signatures upon any recall petition, or to vote for or against
any recall; or
(5) By any other corrupt means or practice or by threats or
intimidation interferes with or attempts to interfere with the right of
any legal voter to sign or not to sign any recall petition or to vote
for or against any recall; or
(6) Receives, accepts, handles, distributes, pays out, or gives
away, directly or indirectly, any money, consideration, compensation,
gratuity, reward, or thing of value contributed by or received from any
person, firm, association, or corporation whose residence or principal
office is, or the majority of whose stockholders are nonresidents of
the state of Washington, for any service, work, or assistance of any
kind done or rendered for the purpose of aiding in procuring signatures
upon any recall petition or the adoption or rejection of any recall.

Sec. 2111 RCW 29.79.440 and 1993 c 256 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
VIOLATIONS BY SIGNERS. Every person who signs an initiative or
referendum petition with any other than his or her true name ((shall
be)) is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.
Every person who knowingly signs more than one petition for the same
initiative or referendum measure or who signs an initiative or
referendum petition knowing that he or she is not a legal voter or who
makes a false statement as to his or her residence on any initiative or
referendum petition, ((shall be)) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor
punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2112 RCW 29.82.170 and 1984 c 170 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
VIOLATIONS BY SIGNERS -- OFFICERS. Every person who signs a recall
petition with any other than his or her true name is guilty of a
felony. Every person who knowingly (1) signs more than one petition
for the same recall, (2) signs a recall petition when he or she is not
a legal voter, or (3) makes a false statement as to ((his)) residence
on any recall petition is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. Every
registration officer who makes any false report or certificate on any
recall petition is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2113 RCW 29.79.490 and 1993 c 256 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
VIOLATIONS--CORRUPT PRACTICES. Every person ((shall be)) is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor who:
(1) For any consideration or gratuity or promise thereof, signs or
declines to sign any initiative or referendum petition; or
(2) Provides or receives consideration for soliciting or procuring
signatures on an initiative or referendum petition if any part of the
consideration is based upon the number of signatures solicited or
procured, or offers to provide or agrees to receive such consideration
any of which is based on the number of signatures solicited or
procured; or
(3) Gives or offers any consideration or gratuity to any person to
induce him or her to sign or not to sign or to vote for or against any
initiative or referendum measure; or
(4) Interferes with or attempts to interfere with the right of any
voter to sign or not to sign an initiative or referendum petition or
with the right to vote for or against an initiative or referendum
measure by threats, intimidation, or any other corrupt means or
practice; or
(5) Receives, handles, distributes, pays out, or gives away,
directly or indirectly, money or any other thing of value contributed
by or received from any person, firm, association, or corporation whose
residence or principal office is, or the majority of whose members or
stockholders have their residence outside, the state of Washington, for
any service rendered for the purpose of aiding in procuring signatures
upon any initiative or referendum petition or for the purpose of aiding
in the adoption or rejection of any initiative or referendum measure((:
PROVIDED, That)). This subsection ((shall)) does not apply to or
prohibit any activity ((which)) that is properly reported in accordance
with the applicable provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW.
A gross misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the same
extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2114 RCW 29.15.080 and 1984 c 142 s 8 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PETITIONS -- PENALTIES FOR IMPROPERLY SIGNING. The following apply
to persons signing nominating petitions prescribed by RCW 29.15.060:
(1) A person who signs a petition with any other than his or her
name shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(2) A person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor if the person
knowingly: Signs more than one petition for any single candidacy of
any single candidate; signs the petition when he or she is not a legal
voter; or makes a false statement as to his or her residence.

Sec. 2115 RCW 29.15.110 and 1965 c 9 s 29.18.080 are each amended
to read as follows:
DUPLICATION OF NAMES -- CONSPIRACY -- CRIMINAL AND CIVIL LIABILITY.
Any person who with intent to mislead or confuse the electors conspires
with another person who has a surname similar to an incumbent seeking
reelection to the same office, or to an opponent for the same office
whose political reputation has been well established, by persuading
such other person to file for such office with no intention of being
elected, but to defeat the incumbent or the well known opponent,
((shall be)) is guilty of a felony. In addition ((thereto such person
or persons shall be)), all conspirators are subject to a suit for civil
damages, the amount of which ((shall)) may not exceed the salary
((which)) that the injured person would have received had he or she
been elected or reelected.

Sec. 2116 RCW 29.79.500 and 1993 c 256 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PAID PETITION SOLICITORS--FINDING. The legislature finds that
paying a worker, whose task it is to secure the signatures of voters on
initiative or referendum petitions, on the basis of the number of
signatures the worker secures on the petitions encourages the
introduction of fraud in the signature gathering process. Such a form
of payment may act as an incentive for the worker to encourage a person
to sign a petition which the person is not qualified to sign or to sign
a petition for a ballot measure even if the person has already signed
a petition for the measure. Such payments also threaten the integrity
of the initiative and referendum process by providing an incentive for
misrepresenting the nature or effect of a ballot measure in securing
petition signatures for the measure.

Subpart 21.4
Filing for Office, Declarations, and Nominations
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2117 FILING FOR OFFICE, DECLARATIONS, AND
NOMINATIONS. Every person who:
(1) Knowingly provides false information on his or her declaration
of candidacy or petition of nomination; or
(2) Conceals or fraudulently defaces or destroys a certificate that
has been filed with an elections officer under chapter 29.24 RCW or a
declaration of candidacy or petition of nomination that has been filed
with an elections officer, or any part of such a certificate,
declaration, or petition,
is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2118 RCW 29.15.100 and 1965 c 9 s 29.18.070 are each amended
to read as follows:
DUPLICATION OF, USE OF NONEXISTENT OR UNTRUE NAMES, AS FELONY. A
person is guilty of a felony who files a declaration of candidacy for
any public office of:
(1) A nonexistent or fictitious person; or
(2) The name of any person not his or her true name; or
(3) A name similar to that of an incumbent seeking reelection to
the same office with intent to confuse and mislead the electors by
taking advantage of the public reputation of the incumbent; or
(4) A surname similar to one who has already filed for the same
office, and whose political reputation is widely known, with intent to
confuse and mislead the electors by capitalizing on the public
reputation of the candidate who had previously filed.

Subpart 21.5
Ballots
Sec. 2119 RCW 29.85.040 and 1991 c 81 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
BALLOTS--UNLAWFUL APPROPRIATION, PRINTING, OR DISTRIBUTION. Any
person who is retained or employed by any officer authorized by the
laws of this state to procure the printing of any official ballot or
who is engaged in printing official ballots is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor if the person knowingly:
(1) Appropriates any official ballot to himself or herself; or
(2) Gives or delivers any official ballot to or permits any
official ballot to be taken by any person other than the officer
authorized by law to receive it; or
(3) Prints or causes to be printed any official ballot: (a) In any
other form than that prescribed by law or as directed by the officer
authorized to procure the printing thereof; or (b) with any other names
thereon or with the names spelled otherwise than as directed by such
officer, or the names or printing thereon arranged in any other way
than that authorized and directed by law.
A gross misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the same
extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2120 RCW 29.85.020 and 1991 c 81 s 2 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
UNAUTHORIZED EXAMINATION OF BALLOTS, ELECTION MATERIALS--REVEALING
INFORMATION. (1) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to examine, or
assist another to examine, any voter record, ballot, or any other state
or local government official election material if the person, without
lawful authority, conducts the examination:
(a) For the purpose of identifying the name of a voter and how the
voter voted; or
(b) For the purpose of determining how a voter, whose name is known
to the person, voted; or
(c) For the purpose of identifying the name of the voter who voted
in a manner known to the person.
(2) Any person who reveals to another information which the person
ascertained in violation of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor.
(3) A gross misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the
same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW
9A.20.021.

Subpart 21.6
Polling Place
Sec. 2121 RCW 29.51.020 and 1991 c 81 s 20 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
ACTS PROHIBITED IN VICINITY OF POLLING PLACE--PROHIBITED PRACTICES
AS TO BALLOTS. (1) On the day of any primary or general or special
election, no person may, within a polling place, or in any public area
within three hundred feet of any entrance to such polling place:
(a) Suggest or persuade or attempt to suggest or persuade any voter
to vote for or against any candidate or ballot measure;
(b) Circulate cards or handbills of any kind;
(c) Solicit signatures to any kind of petition; or
(d) Engage in any practice which interferes with the freedom of
voters to exercise their franchise or disrupts the administration of
the polling place.
(2) No person may obstruct the doors or entries to a building in
which a polling place is located or prevent free access to and from any
polling place. Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or municipal law
enforcement officer shall prevent such obstruction, and may arrest any
person creating such obstruction.
(3) No person may:
(a) Except as provided in RCW 29.54.037, remove any ballot from the
polling place before the closing of the polls; or
(b) Solicit any voter to show his or her ballot.
(4) No person other than an inspector or judge of election may
receive from any voter a voted ballot or deliver a blank ballot to such
elector.
(5) Any violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor,
punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021, and the person convicted may be ordered to pay the
costs of prosecution.

Sec. 2122 RCW 29.51.030 and 1965 c 9 s 29.51.030 are each amended
to read as follows:
ELECTIONEERING BY ELECTION OFFICERS. Any election officer who does
any electioneering on primary or election day, ((shall be)) is guilty
of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction ((shall)) must be fined in any
sum not exceeding one hundred dollars and pay the costs of prosecution.

Sec. 2123 RCW 29.51.221 and 1990 c 59 s 49 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REFUSING TO LEAVE VOTING BOOTH. Deliberately impeding other voters
from casting their votes by refusing to leave a voting booth or voting
device is a misdemeanor and is subject to the penalties provided in
chapter 9A.20 RCW. The precinct election officers may provide
assistance in the manner provided by RCW 29.51.200 to any voter who
requests it.

Sec. 2124 RCW 29.85.010 and 1991 c 81 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
BALLOTS--REMOVING FROM POLLING PLACE. Any person who, without
lawful authority, removes a ballot from a polling place is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor
that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2125 RCW 29.85.110 and 1991 c 81 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
TAMPERING WITH POLLING PLACE MATERIALS. Any person who willfully
defaces, removes, or destroys any of the supplies or materials
((which)) that the person knows are intended both for use in a polling
place and for enabling a voter to prepare his or her ballot is guilty
of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2126 RCW 29.85.260 and 1991 c 81 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
VOTING MACHINES, DEVICES--TAMPERING WITH--EXTRA KEYS. Any person
who tampers with or damages or attempts to damage any voting machine or
device to be used or being used in a primary or special or general
election, or who prevents or attempts to prevent the correct operation
of such machine or device, or any unauthorized person who makes or has
in his or her possession a key to a voting machine or device to be used
or being used in a primary or special or general election, ((shall be))
is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Subpart 21.7
Voting
Sec. 2127 RCW 29.85.051 and 1991 c 81 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DECEPTIVE, INCORRECT VOTE RECORDING. A person is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor who knowingly:
(1) Deceives any voter in recording his or her vote by providing
incorrect or misleading recording information or by providing faulty
election equipment or records; or
(2) Records the vote of any voter in a manner other than as
designated by the voter.
Such a gross misdemeanor is punishable to the same extent as a
gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2128 RCW 29.85.060 and 1991 c 81 s 5 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
HINDERING OR BRIBING VOTER. Any person who uses menace, force,
threat, or any unlawful means towards any voter to hinder or deter such
a voter from voting, or directly or indirectly offers any bribe,
reward, or any thing of value to a voter in exchange for the voter's
vote for or against any person or ballot measure, or authorizes any
person to do so, is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW
9A.20.021.

Sec. 2129 RCW 29.85.070 and 1991 c 81 s 6 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
INFLUENCING VOTER TO WITHHOLD VOTE. Any person who in any way,
directly or indirectly, by menace or unlawful means, attempts to
influence any person in refusing to give his or her vote in any primary
or special or general election is guilty of a gross misdemeanor
punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2130 RCW 29.85.090 and 1991 c 81 s 7 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
SOLICITATION OF BRIBE BY VOTER. Any person who solicits, requests,
or demands, directly or indirectly, any reward or thing of value or the
promise thereof in exchange for his or her vote or in exchange for the
vote of any other person for or against any candidate or for or against
any ballot measure to be voted upon at a primary or special or general
election is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable to the same extent
as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2131 RCW 29.85.210 and 1991 c 81 s 13 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REPEATERS. Any person who votes or attempts to vote more than once
at any primary or general or special election is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor, punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that
is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2132 RCW 29.85.220 and 1991 c 81 s 14 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
REPEATERS--UNQUALIFIED PERSONS--OFFICERS CONNIVING WITH. Any
precinct election officer who knowingly permits any voter to cast a
second vote at any primary or general or special election, or knowingly
permits any person not a qualified voter to vote at any primary or
general or special election, is guilty of a class C felony punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2133 RCW 29.85.240 and 1991 c 81 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
UNQUALIFIED PERSONS VOTING. Any person who knows that he or she
does not possess the legal qualifications of a voter and who votes at
any primary or special or general election authorized by law to be held
in this state for any office whatever ((shall be)) is guilty of a class
C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2134 RCW 29.51.230 and 1965 c 9 s 29.51.230 are each amended
to read as follows:
UNLAWFUL ACTS BY VOTERS. It ((shall be)) is unlawful for a voter
to:
(1) ((Show his ballot after it is marked to any person in such a
way as to reveal the contents thereof or the name of any candidate for
whom he has marked his vote;
(2))) Receive a ballot from any person other than the election
officer having charge of the ballots;
(((3))) (2) Vote or offer to vote any ballot except one ((that he
has)) received from the election officer having charge of the ballots;
(((4) Place any mark upon his ballot by which it may afterward be
identified as the one voted by him;
(5))) (3) Fail to return to the election officers any ballot ((he))
received from an election officer.
A violation of any provision of this section ((shall be)) is a
misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars,
plus costs of prosecution.

Sec. 2135 RCW 29.51.215 and 1981 c 34 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
DISABLED VOTERS. Any person violating any provision of RCW
29.51.200((, as now or hereafter amended, shall)) will be punished as
for a misdemeanor.

Sec. 2136 RCW 29.36.370 and 2001 c 241 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
ABSENTEE BALLOT PENALTY--GENERAL PENALTY. A person who willfully
violates any provision of ((this)) chapter 29A.-- RCW (Part 10 of this
act) regarding the assertion or declaration of qualifications to
receive or cast an absentee ballot or unlawfully casts a vote by
absentee ballot is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW
9A.20.021. Except as provided in this chapter ((29.85 RCW)), a person
who willfully violates any other provision of ((this)) chapter 29A.--RCW (Part 10 of this act) is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Subpart 21.8
Canvassing and Certifying
Sec. 2137 RCW 29.85.100 and 1991 c 81 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
CERTIFICATES OF NOMINATION AND ELECTION--DECLARATIONS OF
CANDIDACY--PETITIONS OF NOMINATION--FRAUDS AND FALSEHOODS. Every
person who:
(1) Knowingly and falsely issues a certificate of nomination or
election; or
(2) Knowingly provides false information on a certificate which
must be filed with an elections officer under chapter 29.24 RCW((; or
(3) Knowingly provides false information on his or her declaration
of candidacy or petition of nomination; or
(4) Conceals or fraudulently defaces or destroys a certificate
which has been filed with an elections officer under chapter 29.24 RCW
or a declaration of candidacy or petition of nomination which has been
filed with an elections officer, or any part of such a certificate,
declaration, or petition)),
is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 2138 RCW 29.85.170 and 1991 c 81 s 10 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
OFFICERS--VIOLATIONS GENERALLY. Every person charged with the
performance of any duty under the provisions of any law of this state
relating to elections, including primaries, or the provisions of any
charter or ordinance of any city or town of this state relating to
elections who willfully neglects or refuses to perform such duty, or
who, in the performance of such duty, or in his or her official
capacity, knowingly or fraudulently violates any of the provisions of
law relating to such duty, is guilty of a class C felony punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021 and shall forfeit his or her office.

Sec. 2139 RCW 29.85.225 and 1991 c 81 s 15 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
DIVULGING BALLOT COUNT. (1) In any location in which ballots are
counted, no person authorized by law to be present while votes are
being counted may divulge any results of the count of the ballots at
any time prior to the closing of the polls for that primary or special
or general election.
(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable
to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW
9A.20.021.

Sec. 2140 RCW 29.85.230 and 1991 c 81 s 16 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
It shall be a gross misdemeanor, punishable to the same extent as
a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021, for any
person to remove or deface the posted copy of the result of votes cast
at their precinct or to delay delivery of or change the copy of primary
or special or general election returns to be delivered to the proper
election officer.

PART 22
NUCLEAR WASTE SITE--ELECTION FOR DISAPPROVAL
Sec. 2201 RCW 29.91.010 and 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 3 are each reenacted
to read as follows:
FINDINGS. (1) The legislature and the people find that the federal
Nuclear Waste Policy Act provides that within sixty days of the
president's recommendation of a site for a high-level nuclear waste
repository, a state may disapprove the selection of such site in that
state.
(2) The legislature and the people desire, if the governor and
legislature do not issue a notice of disapproval within twenty-one days
of the president's recommendation, that the people of this state have
the opportunity to vote upon disapproval.

Sec. 2202 RCW 29.91.020 and 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
HIGH-LEVEL NUCLEAR WASTE REPOSITORY--SELECTION OF SITE IN STATE--
SPECIAL ELECTION FOR DISAPPROVAL. (1) Within seven days after any
recommendation by the president of the United States of a site in the
state of Washington to be a high-level nuclear waste repository under
42 U.S.C. Sec. 10136, the governor shall set the date for a special
statewide election to vote on disapproval of the selection of such
site. The special election shall be no more than fifty days after the
date of the recommendation of the president of the United States.
(2) If either the governor or the legislature submits a notice of
disapproval to the United States Congress within twenty-one days of the
date of the recommendation by the president of the United States, then
the governor is authorized to cancel the special election pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 2203 RCW 29.91.030 and 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 5 are each reenacted
to read as follows:
COSTS OF ELECTION. The state of Washington shall assume the costs
of any special election called under RCW 29.91.020 in the same manner
as provided in RCW 29.13.047 and 29.13.048.

Sec. 2204 RCW 29.91.040 and 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 6 are each reenacted
to read as follows:
SPECIAL ELECTION--NOTIFICATION OF AUDITORS--APPLICATION OF ELECTION
LAWS. The secretary of state shall promptly notify the county auditors
of the date of the special election and certify to them the text of the
ballot title for this special election. The general election laws
shall apply to the election required by RCW 29.91.020 to the extent
that they are not inconsistent with this chapter. Statutory deadlines
relating to certification, canvassing, and the voters' pamphlet may be
modified for the election held pursuant to RCW 29.91.020 by the
secretary of state through emergency rules adopted under RCW 29.04.080.

Sec. 2205 RCW 29.91.050 and 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 7 are each reenacted
to read as follows:
BALLOT TITLE. The ballot title for the special election called
under RCW 29.91.020 shall be "Shall the Governor be required to notify
Congress of Washington's disapproval of the President's recommendation
of [name of site] as a national high-level nuclear waste repository?"

Sec. 2206 RCW 29.91.060 and 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
EFFECT OF VOTE. If the governor or the legislature fails to
prepare and submit a notice of disapproval to the United States
Congress within fifty-five days of the president's recommendation and
a majority of the voters in the special election held pursuant to RCW
29.91.020 favored such notice of disapproval, then the vote of the
people shall be binding on the governor. The governor shall prepare
and submit the notice of disapproval to the United States Congress
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 10136.

PART 23
OTHER LAWS AFFECTED
Sec. 2301 RCW 29.13.023 and 1981 c 213 s 3 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
FIRST CLASS MAYOR-COUNCIL CITIES--TWELVE COUNCILMEMBERS. All
regular elections in first class cities having a mayor-council form of
government whose charters provide for twelve councilmembers elected for
a term of two years, two being elected from each of six wards, and for
the election of a mayor, treasurer, and comptroller for terms of two
years, shall be held biennially as provided in RCW 29.13.020. The term
of each councilmember, mayor, treasurer, and comptroller shall be four
years and until his or her successor is elected and qualified and
assumes office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170. The terms of the
councilmembers shall be so staggered that six councilmembers shall be
elected to office at each regular election.

Sec. 2302 RCW 29.13.024 and 1981 c 213 s 4 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
FIRST CLASS MAYOR-COUNCIL CITIES--SEVEN COUNCILMEMBERS. All
regular elections in first class cities having a mayor-council form of
government whose charters provide for seven councilmembers, one to be
elected from each of six wards and one at large, for a term of two
years, and for the election of a mayor, comptroller, treasurer and
attorney for two year terms, shall be held biennially as provided in
RCW 29.13.020. The terms of the six councilmembers to be elected by
wards shall be four years and until their successors are elected and
qualified and the term of the councilmember to be elected at large
shall be two years and until their successors are elected and
qualified. The terms of the councilmembers shall be so staggered that
three ward councilmembers and the councilmember at large shall be
elected at each regular election. The term of the mayor, attorney,
treasurer, and comptroller shall be four years and until their
successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance
with RCW 29.04.170.

Sec. 2303 RCW 43.07.310 and 1992 c 163 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
DIVISION OF ELECTIONS--DUTIES. The secretary of state, through the
division of elections, is responsible for the following duties, as
prescribed by Title 29 RCW:
(1) The filing, verification of signatures, and certification of
state initiative, referendum, and recall petitions;
(2) The production and distribution of a state voters' ((and
candidates')) pamphlet;
(3) The examination, testing, and certification of voting
equipment, voting devices, and vote-tallying systems;
(4) The administration, canvassing, and certification of the
presidential primary, state primaries, and state general elections;
(5) The administration of motor voter and other voter registration
and voter outreach programs;
(6) The training, testing, and certification of state and local
elections personnel as established in RCW 29.60.030;
(7) The training of state and local party observers required by RCW
29.60.040;
(8) The conduct of postelection reviews as established in RCW
29.60.070; and
(9) Other duties that may be prescribed by the legislature.

PART 24
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2401 RECODIFICATION. The following sections
are recodified in the order in which they appear in parts 1 through 22
of this act as new chapters and sections of a new elections title of
the Revised Code of Washington, to be designated as Title 29A RCW:
RCW 29.01.005, 29.01.006, 29.01.008, 29.01.042, 29.01.043,
29.01.045, 29.01.047, 29.01.050, 29.01.055, 29.01.060, 29.01.065,
29.01.068, 29.01.070, 29.01.080, 29.01.090, 29.01.100, 29.01.110,
29.01.113, 29.01.117, 29.01.119, 29.01.120, 29.01.130, 29.01.135,
29.01.136, 29.01.137, 29.01.140, 29.01.155, 29.01.160, 29.01.170,
29.01.180, 29.01.200, 29.04.001, 29.04.010, 29.04.020, 29.57.140,
29.04.025, 29.04.070, 29.04.060, 29.04.085, 29.04.088, 29.04.091,
29.04.230, 29.13.070, 29.13.010, 29.13.020, 29.13.045, 29.13.047,
29.13.048, 29.60.010, 29.60.030, 29.60.040, 29.60.050, 29.60.060,
29.60.070, 29.60.080, 29.60.090, 29.98.010, 29.98.020, 29.98.030,
29.04.080, 29.19.070, 29.60.020, 29.07.005, 29.04.095, 29.10.011,
29.08.010, 29.07.010, 29.08.060, 29.07.110, 29.08.030, 29.07.220,
29.10.081, 29.07.092, 29.07.160, 29.07.152, 29.07.030, 29.07.230,
29.07.070, 29.07.140, 29.07.080, 29.07.090, 29.08.080, 29.08.040,
29.07.025, 29.07.430, 29.07.440, 29.07.260, 29.07.270, 29.10.020,
29.10.040, 29.10.170, 29.10.051, 29.10.090, 29.10.097, 29.10.100,
29.10.110, 29.10.180, 29.10.185, 29.10.015, 29.10.071, 29.10.220,
29.10.075, 29.10.200, 29.10.210, 29.10.230, 29.04.250, 29.07.130,
29.04.100, 29.04.110, 29.04.120, 29.04.150, 29.04.160, 29.04.240,
29.10.125, 29.10.127, 29.10.130, 29.10.140, 29.10.150, 29.33.020,
29.33.041, 29.33.051, 29.33.061, 29.33.081, 29.33.130, 29.33.145,
29.33.300, 29.33.310, 29.33.320, 29.33.330, 29.33.340, 29.33.350,
29.33.360, 29.04.200, 29.57.010, 29.57.090, 29.57.160, 29.04.040,
29.04.050, 29.04.055, 29.48.005, 29.48.007, 29.57.040, 29.57.070,
29.57.100, 29.57.050, 29.57.150, 29.27.090, 29.15.025, 29.13.050,
29.04.170, 29.24.010, 29.24.020, 29.24.025, 29.24.030, 29.24.035,
29.24.040, 29.24.045, 29.24.055, 29.24.060, 29.24.070, 29.15.130,
29.15.140, 29.15.010, 29.15.044, 29.15.020, 29.15.090, 29.15.030,
29.15.040, 29.15.050, 29.15.060, 29.15.070, 29.15.125, 29.15.120,
29.15.160, 29.15.210, 29.15.220, 29.15.170, 29.15.180, 29.15.190,
29.15.200, 29.15.230, 29.04.180, 29.04.190, 29.18.150, 29.18.160,
29.68.070, 29.68.080, 29.68.100, 29.68.130, 29.81.210, 29.04.035,
29.81.220, 29.81.230, 29.27.076, 29.81.240, 29.81.250, 29.81.260,
29.81.280, 29.81.290, 29.81.300, 29.81.310, 29.81A.010, 29.81A.020,
29.81A.030, 29.81A.040, 29.81A.050, 29.81A.060, 29.81A.070, 29.81A.080,
29.27.020, 29.27.057, 29.27.061, 29.27.065, 29.27.0653, 29.27.0655,
29.27.066, 29.27.0665, 29.27.067, 29.30.005, 29.30.010, 29.30.020,
29.30.025, 29.30.040, 29.30.060, 29.30.081, 29.30.085, 29.30.086,
29.30.095, 29.30.101, 29.30.111, 29.30.130, 29.36.210, 29.36.220,
29.36.230, 29.36.240, 29.36.250, 29.36.260, 29.36.270, 29.36.280,
29.36.290, 29.36.300, 29.36.310, 29.36.320, 29.36.340, 29.36.350,
29.36.360, 29.51.010, 29.51.125, 29.51.180, 29.51.190, 29.54.037,
29.48.010, 29.13.080, 29.51.240, 29.51.185, 29.48.030, 29.07.170,
29.48.035, 29.57.130, 29.48.020, 29.48.070, 29.48.090, 29.48.100,
29.51.150, 29.51.050, 29.51.060, 29.51.100, 29.51.070, 29.51.200,
29.54.018, 29.51.250, 29.54.010, 29.54.015, 29.07.180, 29.48.080,
29.48.045, 29.54.093, 29.51.115, 29.51.155, 29.45.010, 29.45.020,
29.45.030, 29.45.040, 29.45.050, 29.45.060, 29.45.065, 29.45.070,
29.45.080, 29.45.090, 29.45.100, 29.45.110, 29.45.120, 29.38.010,
29.38.020, 29.38.030, 29.38.040, 29.38.050, 29.38.060, 29.15.150,
29.18.010, 29.18.120, 29.18.200, 29.21.010, 29.21.015, 29.21.070,
29.21.410, 29.27.030, 29.27.050, 29.27.072, 29.27.074, 29.27.080,
29.27.100, 29.27.110, 29.19.010, 29.19.020, 29.19.030, 29.19.045,
29.19.055, 29.19.080, 29.82.010, 29.82.015, 29.82.021, 29.82.023,
29.82.025, 29.82.030, 29.82.040, 29.82.060, 29.82.080, 29.82.090,
29.82.100, 29.82.105, 29.82.110, 29.82.120, 29.82.130, 29.82.140,
29.82.160, 29.71.010, 29.71.020, 29.71.030, 29.71.040, 29.71.050,
29.27.140, 29.74.010, 29.74.020, 29.74.030, 29.74.040, 29.74.050,
29.74.060, 29.74.070, 29.74.080, 29.74.100, 29.74.110, 29.74.120,
29.74.130, 29.74.140, 29.74.150, 29.13.040, 29.62.180, 29.54.042,
29.54.050, 29.54.060, 29.54.097, 29.54.105, 29.54.121, 29.54.170,
29.51.175, 29.54.075, 29.54.085, 29.27.120, 29.62.030, 29.62.020,
29.54.025, 29.36.330, 29.62.040, 29.62.050, 29.62.080, 29.62.090,
29.62.100, 29.62.120, 29.62.130, 29.64.010, 29.64.015, 29.64.020,
29.64.030, 29.64.035, 29.64.040, 29.64.051, 29.64.060, 29.64.080,
29.64.090, 29.04.030, 29.65.010, 29.65.020, 29.65.040, 29.65.050,
29.65.055, 29.65.060, 29.65.070, 29.65.080, 29.65.090, 29.65.100,
29.65.120, 29.79.010, 29.79.015, 29.79.020, 29.79.030, 29.79.035,
29.79.040, 29.79.050, 29.79.060, 29.79.070, 29.79.080, 29.79.090,
29.79.100, 29.79.110, 29.79.115, 29.79.120, 29.79.140, 29.79.150,
29.79.160, 29.79.170, 29.79.180, 29.79.190, 29.79.200, 29.79.210,
29.79.230, 29.79.270, 29.79.280, 29.79.290, 29.79.300, 29.70.100,
29.15.026, 29.10.060, 29.04.140, 29.42.010, 29.42.020, 29.42.030,
29.42.040, 29.42.050, 29.42.070, 29.85.245, 29.82.210, 29.38.070,
29.85.275, 29.07.400, 29.07.405, 29.07.410, 29.85.249, 29.79.480,
29.82.220, 29.79.440, 29.82.170, 29.79.490, 29.15.080, 29.15.110,
29.79.500, 29.15.100, 29.85.040, 29.85.020, 29.51.020, 29.51.030,
29.51.221, 29.85.010, 29.85.110, 29.85.260, 29.85.051, 29.85.060,
29.85.070, 29.85.090, 29.85.210, 29.85.220, 29.85.240, 29.51.230,
29.51.215, 29.36.370, 29.85.100, 29.85.170, 29.85.225, 29.85.230,
29.91.010, 29.91.020, 29.91.030, 29.91.040, 29.91.050, and 29.91.060.
The code reviser shall correct any cross-references to the
recodified sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2402 RCW 29.13.023 and 29.13.024 are each
recodified as sections in chapter 35.22 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2403 EXPIRATION. RCW 29.04.250 and 2002 c 21
s 2 and section 245 of this act expire January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2404 REPEALER. The following acts or parts of
acts are each repealed:
(1) RCW 9.81.100 (Public office -- Candidate must file affidavit) and
1951 c 254 s 16;
(2) RCW 29.01.010 (City clerk) and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.010;
(3) RCW 29.01.020 (City council) and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.020;
(4) RCW 29.01.030 (City precinct) and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.030;
(5) RCW 29.01.040 (Constituency) and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.040;
(6) RCW 29.01.087 (Local voters' pamphlet) and 1984 c 106 s 2;
(7) RCW 29.01.150 (Rural precinct) and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.150;
(8) RCW 29.04.210 (Ballots, voting systems -- Rules by secretary of
state) and 1990 c 59 s 7;
(9) RCW 29.04.235 (Electronic facsimile documents -- Rules) and 1991
c 186 s 2;
(10) RCW 29.07.100 (Registration assistance by city and town
clerks) and 1994 c 57 s 14, 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 13, & 1965 c 9 s
29.07.100;
(11) RCW 29.07.115 (Registration records -- Weekly transmittal) and
1994 c 57 s 15 & 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 23;
(12) RCW 29.07.120 (Registrar's cards -- Weekly transmittal--Exemption) and 1999 c 298 s 5, 1994 c 57 s 16, 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 16,
& 1965 c 9 s 29.07.120;
(13) RCW 29.07.240 (Computer file of voter registration records--Rules -- Assistance) and 1974 ex.s. c 127 s 14;
(14) RCW 29.07.280 (Forwarding of forms to voter's county) and 1990
c 143 s 3;
(15) RCW 29.07.290 (Records -- Correction, sorting, transmittal) and
1990 c 143 s 4;
(16) RCW 29.07.300 (Delivery of files to auditors -- Address changes)
and 1994 c 57 s 23 & 1990 c 143 s 5;
(17) RCW 29.07.310 (Driver licensing and voter registration -- Duties
of secretary of state) and 1990 c 143 s 10;
(18) RCW 29.07.320 (Driver licensing and voter registration--Funding) and 1990 c 143 s 11;
(19) RCW 29.07.420 (Designation of agencies providing registration
services) and 1994 c 57 s 26;
(20) RCW 29.07.450 (Duties of secretary of state) and 1994 c 57 s
29;
(21) RCW 29.08.020 (Duties of county auditor -- Application of
remainder of title) and 1993 c 434 s 2;
(22) RCW 29.08.050 (Declaration and warning) and 1994 c 57 s 31 &
1993 c 434 s 5;
(23) RCW 29.08.070 (Form -- Adoption, contents) and 1993 c 434 s 7;
(24) RCW 29.08.090 (Violations of chapter) and 1993 c 434 s 9;
(25) RCW 29.08.900 (Effective date -- 1993 c 434) and 1993 c 434 s
13;
(26) RCW 29.13.021 (First class commission cities with charters
providing triennial elections) and 1983 c 3 s 43, 1979 ex.s. c 126 s
10, & 1965 c 9 s 29.13.021;
(27) RCW 29.13.060 (Elections in certain first class school
districts) and 1996 c 202 s 1, 1991 c 363 s 32, 1990 c 33 s 563, & 1989
c 10 s 7;
(28) RCW 29.15.046 (Electronic filing -- Rules) and 2002 c 140 s 3;
(29) RCW 29.15.240 (Rejection of ineligible persons) and 1993 c 1
s 7;
(30) RCW 29.15.800 (Rules by secretary of state) and 1990 c 59 s
97;
(31) RCW 29.19.900 (Severability -- 1989 c 4) and 1989 c 4 s 12;
(32) RCW 29.36.900 (Captions not law--2001 c 241) and 2001 c 241 s
26;
(33) RCW 29.51.173 (Effect of term limitations on write-in voting)
and 1993 c 1 s 6;
(34) RCW 29.57.170 (Implementing rules) and 1985 c 205 s 13;
(35) RCW 29.62.010 (Rules for canvassing -- Statement of returns--Resolving ties) and 1990 c 59 s 62 & 1965 c 9 s 29.62.010;
(36) RCW 29.62.015 (County canvassing board -- Membership, delegation
of authority, public meetings) and 1995 c 139 s 1;
(37) RCW 29.64.070 (Rules) and 1991 c 81 s 38 & 1965 c 9 s
29.64.070;
(38) RCW 29.64.900 (Short title -- Construction) and 1965 c 9 s
29.64.900;
(39) RCW 29.68.015 (United States house of representatives -- Term
limits) and 1993 c 1 s 4;
(40) RCW 29.68.016 (United States senate -- Term limits) and 1993 c
1 s 5;
(41) RCW 29.68.120 (Vacancy in congress -- Canvass of primary and
special vacancy election -- Certification of nominees) and 1985 c 45 s 6,
1983 c 3 s 46, 1973 2nd ex.s. c 36 s 7, & 1965 c 9 s 29.68.120;
(42) RCW 29.74.090 (Election of convention delegates--Qualifications of voters) and 1965 c 9 s 29.74.090;
(43) RCW 29.79.250 (Referendum bills by legislature -- Serial
numbering) and 1965 c 9 s 29.79.250;
(44) RCW 29.81.270 (Deadlines) and 1999 c 260 s 7;
(45) RCW 29.81.320 (Procedural rules) and 1999 c 260 s 12;
(46) RCW 29.81A.900 (Effective date -- 1984 c 106) and 1984 c 106 s
14;
(47) RCW 29.81A.901 (Severability -- 1984 c 106) and 1984 c 106 s 13;
(48) RCW 29.91.900 (Transmission of copies of act -- 1986 ex.s. c 1)
and 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 10;
(49) RCW 29.91.901 (Referral to electorate -- Ballot title -- 1986
ex.s. c 1) and 1986 ex.s. c 1 s 11;
(50) RCW 29.98.050 (Emergency -- 1965 c 9) and 1965 c 9 s 29.98.050;
and
(51) RCW 43.01.015 (Governor, lieutenant governor--Terms limited)
and 1993 c 1 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2405 EFFECTIVE DATE. This act takes effect
July 1, 2004.

--- END ---