BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
Subpart 1
General Provisions
Sec. 1 RCW 29.85.170 and 1991 c 81 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
OFFICERS--VIOLATIONS GENERALLY. Except as otherwise provided by
law, every person charged with the performance of any duty under the
provisions of any law of this state relating to elections, including
primaries, or the provisions of any charter or ordinance of any county,
city, or town of this state relating to elections who ((willfully
neglects or refuses to perform such duty, or who, in the performance of
such duty, or in his or her official capacity,)) knowingly ((or
fraudulently)) violates any of the provisions of law relating to such
duty, is guilty of a class C felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021,
and shall forfeit his or her office.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.85.245 and 2001 c 41 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
ACTION AGAINST VOTING, REGISTRATION IRREGULARITIES. (1) A county
auditor who suspects a person of fraudulent voter registration, vote
tampering, or irregularities in voting shall transmit his or her
suspicions and observations without delay to the canvassing board.
(2) The county auditor shall make a good faith effort to contact
the person in question without delay. If the county auditor is unable
to contact the person, or if, after contacting the person, the auditor
still suspects fraudulent voter registration, vote tampering, or
irregularities in voting, the auditor shall refer the issue to the
county prosecuting attorney to determine if further action is
warranted.
(3) When a complaint providing information concerning fraudulent
voter registration, vote tampering, or irregularities in voting ((are
[is])) is presented to the office of the prosecuting attorney, that
office shall file charges in all cases where warranted.

Sec. 3 RCW 29.85.275 and 1991 c 81 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
POLITICAL ADVERTISING, REMOVING OR DEFACING. A person who removes
or defaces lawfully placed political advertising including yard signs
or billboards without authorization is guilty of a misdemeanor
((punishable to the same extent as a misdemeanor that is punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021)). The defacement or removal of each item
constitutes a separate violation.

Subpart 2
Voter Registration
Sec. 4 RCW 29.07.400 and 1994 c 57 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
OFFICIALS' VIOLATIONS. ((If any)) A county auditor or registration
assistant who:
(1) ((Willfully neglects or refuses to perform any duty required by
law in connection with the registration of voters)) Intentionally fails
to place a voter registration applicant on the voter registration rolls
when required by law; or
(2) ((Willfully neglects or refuses to perform such duty in the
manner required by voter registration law; or
(3) Enters or causes or permits to be entered on the voter
registration records the name of any person in any other manner or at
any other time than as prescribed by voter registration law or enters
or causes or permits to be entered on such records the name of any
person not entitled to be thereon; or
(4))) Places a voter registration applicant on the voter
registration rolls knowing that the rejection of the application for
registration is required by law; or
(3) Destroys, mutilates, conceals, changes, or alters any
registration record ((in connection therewith)) except as authorized by
voter registration law,
((he or she)) is guilty of a ((gross misdemeanor punishable to the same
extent as a gross misdemeanor that is)) class C felony, punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 5 RCW 29.07.410 and 1994 c 57 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
VOTER VIOLATIONS. Any person who:
(1) Knowingly provides false information on an application for
voter registration under any provision of this title;
(2) Knowingly makes or attests to a false declaration as to his or
her qualifications as a voter;
(3) Knowingly causes or permits himself or herself to be registered
using the name of another person;
(4) Knowingly causes himself or herself to be registered under two
or more different names;
(5) ((Knowingly causes himself or herself to be registered in two
or more counties)) Registers to vote without disclosing previous
registration information with the intent of causing himself or herself
to be registered more than once or in more than one location;
(6) Offers to pay another person to assist in registering voters,
where payment is based on a fixed amount of money per voter
registration;
(7) Accepts payment for assisting in registering voters, where
payment is based on a fixed amount of money per voter registration; or
(8) Knowingly causes any person to be registered or causes any
registration to be transferred or canceled except as authorized under
this title,
is guilty of a class C felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Subpart 3
Petitions and Signatures
Sec. 6 RCW 29.79.440 and 1993 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
VIOLATIONS BY SIGNERS. Every person who knowingly signs an
initiative ((or)), referendum, recall, or candidate petition with any
other than his or her true name ((shall be)) is guilty of a class C
felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021. Every person who knowingly
signs more than one petition for the same initiative ((or)), referendum
((measure)), recall, or candidate or who signs ((an initiative or
referendum)) any such petition knowing that he or she is not a legal
voter or who makes a false statement as to his or her residence on any
((initiative or referendum)) such petition, ((shall be)) is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor ((punishable to the same extent as a gross
misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021)).

Sec. 7 RCW 29.79.490 and 1993 c 256 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
CORRUPT PRACTICES. Every person ((shall be)) is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor who:
(1) For any consideration or gratuity or promise thereof, signs or
declines to sign any initiative ((or)), referendum, recall, or
candidate petition; or
(2) Provides or receives consideration for soliciting or procuring
signatures on an initiative ((or)), referendum, recall, or candidate
petition if any part of the consideration is based upon the number of
signatures solicited or procured, or offers to provide or agrees to
receive such consideration any of which is based on the number of
signatures solicited or procured; or
(3) Gives or offers any consideration or gratuity to any person to
induce him or her to sign or not to sign ((or to vote for or against
any initiative or referendum measure)) an initiative, referendum,
recall, or candidate petition; or
(4) Interferes with or attempts to interfere with the right of any
voter to sign or not to sign an initiative ((or)), referendum, recall,
or candidate petition ((or with the right to vote for or against an
initiative or referendum measure)) by threats, intimidation, or any
other corrupt means or practice((; or
(5) Receives, handles, distributes, pays out, or gives away,
directly or indirectly, money or any other thing of value contributed
by or received from any person, firm, association, or corporation whose
residence or principal office is, or the majority of whose members or
stockholders have their residence outside, the state of Washington, for
any service rendered for the purpose of aiding in procuring signatures
upon any initiative or referendum petition or for the purpose of aiding
in the adoption or rejection of any initiative or referendum measure:
PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to or prohibit any
activity which is properly reported in accordance with the applicable
provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW.
A gross misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the same
extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021)).

Sec. 8 RCW 29.79.500 and 1993 c 256 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
PAID PETITION SOLICITORS--FINDING. The legislature finds that
paying a worker, whose task it is to secure the signatures of voters on
initiative or referendum petitions, on the basis of the number of
signatures the worker secures on the petitions encourages the
introduction of fraud in the signature gathering process. Such a form
of payment may act as an incentive for the worker to encourage a person
to sign a petition which the person is not qualified to sign or to sign
a petition for a ballot measure even if the person has already signed
a petition for the measure. Such payments also threaten the integrity
of the initiative and referendum process by providing an incentive for
misrepresenting the nature or effect of a ballot measure in securing
petition signatures for the measure.

Subpart 4
Filing for Office, Declarations, and Nominations
NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 FALSE INFORMATION. Every person who:
(1) Knowingly provides false information on his or her declaration
of candidacy or petition of nomination;
(2) Files a declaration of candidacy or petition of nomination on
behalf of a fictitious person; or
(3) Conceals, defaces, or destroys a certificate that has been
filed with an elections officer under chapter 29.24 RCW or a
declaration of candidacy or petition of nomination that has been filed
with an elections officer, or any part of such a certificate,
declaration, or petition with the intent to mislead or provide false
information to others,
is guilty of a class C felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Subpart 5
Ballots
Sec. 10 RCW 29.85.040 and 1991 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
UNLAWFUL APPROPRIATION, PRINTING, OR DISTRIBUTION. Any person who
is retained or employed by any officer authorized by the laws of this
state to procure the printing of any official ballot or who is engaged
in printing official ballots is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the
person knowingly:
(1) Appropriates any official ballot to himself or herself; or
(2) Gives or delivers any official ballot to or permits any
official ballot to be taken by any person ((other than the)) knowing
that the person is not an officer authorized by law to receive it; or
(3) Prints or causes to be printed or otherwise prepared any
official ballot: (a) In ((any other form than that prescribed by law
or as directed by the officer authorized to procure the printing
thereof; or (b) with any other names thereon or with the names spelled
otherwise than as directed by such officer, or the names or printing
thereon arranged in any other way than that authorized and directed by
law)) which the name of a candidate, ballot title, or instruction to
voters is altered, omitted, supplemented, or otherwise differs from the
manner prescribed by law or as certified; (b) arranged differently than
the manner prescribed by law or as certified; or (c) otherwise altered
in form or substance from the manner prescribed by law or as certified.
((A gross misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the same
extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.))

Sec. 11 RCW 29.85.020 and 1991 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
UNAUTHORIZED EXAMINATIONS OF BALLOTS, ELECTION MATERIALS--REVEALING
INFORMATION. (1) It is a gross misdemeanor for a person to examine, or
assist another to examine, any voter record, ballot, or any other state
or local government official election material if the person, without
lawful authority, conducts the examination:
(a) ((For the purpose)) With the intent of identifying the name of
a voter and how the voter voted; or
(b) ((For the purpose)) With the intent of determining how a voter,
whose name is known to the person, voted; or
(c) ((For the purpose)) With the intent of identifying the name of
the voter who voted in a manner known to the person.
(2) Any person who knowingly reveals to another information
((which)) that the person ascertained in violation of subsection (1) of
this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(3) ((A gross misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the
same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW
9A.20.021.)) Consent by the voter for that person to see his or her
ballot or know his or her vote is a defense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 BALLOT INTERFERENCE. A person who receives
possession of a voted ballot with the intent to destroy or alter the
ballot, prevent its delivery to a proper election official, or deliver
it to a person other than a proper election official is guilty of a
class C felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Subpart 6
Crimes at the Polling Place
Sec. 13 RCW 29.51.020 and 1991 c 81 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
ACTS PROHIBITED IN VICINITY OF POLLING PLACE--PROHIBITED PRACTICES
AS TO BALLOTS. (1) On the day of any primary or general or special
election, ((no person may,)) a person who knowingly commits any of the
following acts within a polling place((,)) or in any public area within
three hundred feet of any entrance to such polling place is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor:
(a) Suggest or persuade ((or attempt to suggest or persuade)) any
voter to vote for or against any candidate or ballot measure, whether
verbally or through the use of printed material or other medium;
(b) ((Circulate cards or handbills of any kind;
(c))) Solicit signatures to any kind of petition; or
(((d))) (c) Engage in any practice ((which)) that interferes with
the freedom of voters to exercise their franchise or disrupts the
administration of the polling place.
(2) ((No)) A person ((may)) who knowingly obstructs the doors or
entries to a building in which a polling place is located or prevents
free access to and from any polling place is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor. ((Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or municipal law
enforcement officer shall prevent such obstruction, and may arrest any
person creating such obstruction.
(3) No person may:
(a) Except as provided in RCW 29.54.037, remove any ballot from the
polling place before the closing of the polls; or
(b) Solicit any voter to show his or her ballot.
(4) No person other than an inspector or judge of election may
receive from any voter a voted ballot or deliver a blank ballot to such
elector.
(5) Any violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor,
punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021, and the person convicted may be ordered to pay the
costs of prosecution.))

Sec. 14 RCW 29.51.221 and 1990 c 59 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
REFUSING TO LEAVE VOTING BOOTH. Deliberately impeding other voters
from casting their votes by refusing to leave a voting booth or voting
device is a misdemeanor ((and is subject to the penalties provided in
chapter 9A.20 RCW)). The precinct election officers may provide
assistance in the manner provided by RCW 29.51.200 to any voter who
requests it.

Sec. 15 RCW 29.85.110 and 1991 c 81 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
TAMPERING WITH POLLING PLACE MATERIALS. Any person who willfully
defaces, removes, or destroys any of the supplies or materials
((which)) that the person knows are intended both for use in a polling
place and for enabling a voter to prepare his or her ballot is guilty
of a class C felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 16 RCW 29.85.260 and 1991 c 81 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
VOTING MACHINES, DEVICES--TAMPERING WITH--EXTRA KEYS. Any person
who ((tampers with or)) damages or ((attempts to damage)) tampers or
interferes with any voting ((machine or device to be used or being used
in a primary or special or general election, or who prevents or
attempts to prevent the correct operation of such machine or device, or
any unauthorized person who makes or has in his or her possession a key
to a voting machine or device to be used or being used in a primary or
special or general election, shall be)) system, device, or tallying
system knowing that it is or will be used in a primary or special or
general election is guilty of a class C felony, punishable under RCW
9A.20.021.

Subpart 7
Voting
NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 PREVENTING VOTING. A person who knowingly
prevents another voter from casting a vote or casting a vote in the
manner desired by the voter, whether in the polling place or otherwise,
other than as provided in RCW 29.51.221, is guilty of a class C felony,
punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 18 RCW 29.85.060 and 1991 c 81 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
HINDERING OR BRIBING VOTER. Any person who ((uses menace, force,
threat, or any unlawful means towards any voter to hinder or deter such
a voter from voting, or)) directly or indirectly offers any bribe,
reward, or any thing of value to a voter in exchange for the voter's
vote for or against any person or ballot measure, or ((authorizes any
person to do so)) in exchange for the voter declining to vote, is
guilty of a class C felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 19 RCW 29.85.070 and 1991 c 81 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
INFLUENCING VOTER TO WITHHOLD VOTE. Any person who in any way,
directly or indirectly, ((by menace or unlawful means, attempts to
influence any person in refusing to give)) persuades or attempts to
persuade, other than by offer of a bribe, reward, or thing of value, a
voter against casting his or her vote in any primary or special or
general election is guilty of a gross misdemeanor ((punishable to the
same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW
9A.20.021)).

Sec. 20 RCW 29.85.090 and 1991 c 81 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
SOLICITATION OF BRIBE BY VOTER. Any person who solicits, requests,
or demands, directly or indirectly, any reward or thing of value or the
promise thereof in exchange for his or her vote or in exchange for the
vote of any other person for or against any candidate or for or against
any ballot measure to be voted upon at a primary or special or general
election is guilty of a gross misdemeanor ((punishable to the same
extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021)).

Sec. 21 RCW 29.85.210 and 1991 c 81 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
REPEATERS. Any person who knowingly votes or attempts to vote more
than once at any primary or general or special election is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor((, punishable to the same extent as a gross
misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021)).

Sec. 22 RCW 29.85.220 and 1991 c 81 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
REPEATERS--UNQUALIFIED PERSONS--OFFICERS CONNIVING WITH. Any
precinct election officer who knowingly permits any voter to cast a
second vote at any primary or general or special election, or knowingly
permits any person not a qualified voter to vote at any primary or
general or special election, is guilty of a class C felony, punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 23 RCW 29.85.240 and 1991 c 81 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
UNQUALIFIED PERSONS VOTING. Any person who knows that he or she
does not possess the legal qualifications of a voter and who votes at
any primary or special or general election authorized by law to be held
in this state for any office whatever ((shall be)) is guilty of a class
C felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 24 RCW 29.51.215 and 1981 c 34 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
DISABLED VOTERS. Any person violating any provision of RCW
29.51.200((, as now or hereafter amended, shall)) will be punished as
for a misdemeanor.

Sec. 25 RCW 29.36.370 and 2001 c 241 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
PROVIDING FALSE INFORMATION. A person who ((willfully violates any
provision of this chapter regarding the assertion or declaration of
qualifications to receive or cast an absentee ballot or unlawfully
casts a vote by absentee)) knowingly provides false information in
order to obtain or vote a ballot is guilty of a class C felony,
punishable under RCW 9A.20.021. ((Except as provided in chapter 29.85
RCW a person who willfully violates any other provision of this chapter
is guilty of a misdemeanor.))

Subpart 8
Canvassing and Certifying Primaries and Elections
Sec. 26 RCW 29.85.100 and 1991 c 81 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
CERTIFICATES OF NOMINATION AND ELECTION. Every person is guilty of
a class C felony, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021, who:
(1) Knowingly and falsely issues a certificate of nomination or
election; or
(2) Knowingly provides false information on a certificate ((which))
that must be filed with an elections officer under chapter 29.24 RCW((;
or
(3) Knowingly provides false information on his or her declaration
of candidacy or petition of nomination; or
(4) Conceals or fraudulently defaces or destroys a certificate
which has been filed with an elections officer under chapter 29.24 RCW
or a declaration of candidacy or petition of nomination which has been
filed with an elections officer, or any part of such a certificate,
declaration, or petition, is guilty of a class C felony punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021)).

Sec. 27 RCW 29.85.225 and 1991 c 81 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
DIVULGING BALLOT COUNT. (1) In any location in which ballots are
counted, no person authorized by law to be present while votes are
being counted may knowingly divulge any results of the count of the
ballots at any time prior to the closing of the polls for that primary
or special or general election.
(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor ((punishable
to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW
9A.20.021)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29.07.405 (Disenfranchisement or discrimination -- Penalty)
and 2001 c 41 s 2;
(2) RCW 29.15.080 (Petitions -- Penalties for improperly signing) and
1984 c 142 s 8;
(3) RCW 29.15.100 (Duplication of, use of nonexistent or untrue
names, as felony) and 1965 c 9 s 29.18.070;
(4) RCW 29.15.110 (Duplication of names -- Conspiracy -- Criminal and
civil liability) and 1965 c 9 s 29.18.080;
(5) RCW 29.38.070 (Penalty) and 2001 c 241 s 21;
(6) RCW 29.51.030 (Electioneering by election officers forbidden--Penalty) and 1965 c 9 s 29.51.030;
(7) RCW 29.51.230 (Unlawful acts by voters -- Penalty) and 1965 c 9
s 29.51.230;
(8) RCW 29.79.480 (Violations by officers) and 1993 c 256 s 3 &
1965 c 9 s 29.79.480;
(9) RCW 29.82.170 (Violations by signers -- Officers) and 1984 c 170
s 11 & 1965 c 9 s 29.82.170;
(10) RCW 29.82.210 (Violations by officers) and 1965 c 9 s
29.82.210;
(11) RCW 29.82.220 (Violations -- Corrupt practices) and 1984 c 170
s 12 & 1965 c 9 s 29.82.220;
(12) RCW 29.85.010 (Ballots -- Removing from polling place) and 1991
c 81 s 1 & 1965 c 9 s 29.85.010;
(13) RCW 29.85.051 (Deceptive, incorrect vote recording) and 1991
c 81 s 4;
(14) RCW 29.85.230 (Returns and posted copy of results -- Tampering
with) and 1991 c 81 s 16 & 1965 c 9 s 29.85.230; and
(15) RCW 29.85.249 (Unqualified registration) and 2001 c 41 s 13.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Subpart headings and section captions used
in this act are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 The following sections are codified or
recodified in the order in which they appear in this act as a new
chapter of Title 29 or 29A RCW, as appropriate: RCW 29.85.170,
29.85.245, 29.85.275, 29.07.400, 29.07.410, 29.79.440, 29.79.490,
29.79.500, section 9 of this act, RCW 29.85.040, 29.85.020, section 12
of this act, RCW 29.51.020, 29.51.221, 29.85.110, 29.85.260, section 17
of this act, RCW 29.85.060, 29.85.070, 29.85.090, 29.85.210, 29.85.220,
29.85.240, 29.51.215, 29.36.370, 29.85.100, and 29.85.225.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 If either Senate Bill No. 5221 (Z-0168/03)
or House Bill No. 1159 (Z-0368/03) becomes law, this act supersedes
sections 2101 through 2140 of either of those two bills, which sections
will become null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---