BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes housing
affordability has become a significant problem for a large portion of
society in many parts of the state in recent years. To address this
problem, there is a need to allocate funding from the surcharge of ten
dollars per instrument charged by the county auditor for each document
recorded as established under RCW 36.22.178, to provide low-income
persons with rent vouchers to pay for permanent multifamily and single-family, private, for-profit, market rate rental housing.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.22.178 and 2002 c 294 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (((2))) (4) of this section,
a surcharge of ten dollars per instrument shall be charged by the
county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to
any other charge authorized by law. The auditor may retain up to five
percent of these funds collected to administer the collection of these
funds. Of the remaining funds, forty percent of the revenue generated
through this surcharge will be transmitted monthly to the state
treasurer who will deposit the funds into the Washington housing trust
account. The office of community development of the department of
community, trade, and economic development will develop guidelines for
the use of these funds to support building operation and maintenance
costs of housing projects or units within housing projects that are
affordable to extremely low-income persons with incomes at or below
thirty percent of the area median income, and that require a supplement
to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses.
(2) Sixty percent of the revenue generated by this surcharge will
be retained by the county and be deposited into a fund that must be
used by the county and its cities and towns for housing projects or
units within housing projects that are affordable to very low-income
persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median
income. The portion of the surcharge retained by a county shall be
allocated to very low-income housing projects or units within such
housing projects in the county and the cities within a county according
to an interlocal agreement between the county and the cities within the
county, consistent with countywide and local housing needs and
policies. The funds generated with this surcharge shall not be used
for construction of new housing if at any time the vacancy rate for
available low-income housing within the county rises above ((ten))
seven percent. The vacancy rate for each county shall be developed
using the state low-income vacancy rate standard developed under
subsection (((3))) (5) of this section. Permissible uses of these
local funds are limited to:
(a) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to very
low-income persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area
median income;
(b) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects built with housing trust
funds, that are affordable to very low-income persons with incomes at
or below fifty percent of the area median income, and that require a
supplement to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses;
(c) Rental assistance vouchers for housing projects or units within
housing projects that are affordable to very low-income persons with
incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median income, to be
administered by a local public housing authority or other local
organization that has an existing rental assistance voucher program,
consistent with the United States department of housing and urban
development's section 8 rental assistance voucher program standards;
((and))
(d) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed overnight
youth shelters; and
(e) Rental assistance or vouchers for payment of first and last
month's rent and security and other deposits required by a landlord,
payable directly to the landlord by the agency administering the county
funds, for housing that is affordable to very low-income persons with
incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median income.
(((2))) (3) If a very low-income person uses rental assistance or
a voucher as described in subsection (2)(c) of this section, and
remains in the same rental unit for twelve consecutive months, the
landlord shall return the amount collected as security and other
deposits and last month's rent to the county fund. Upon the
termination of the tenant's tenancy, should the landlord need to
collect the security and other deposits, or the last month's rent, the
landlord may then collect that money, pursuant to chapter 59.18 RCW,
from the county fund holding the money.
(4) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.
(((3))) (5) The real estate research center at Washington State
University shall develop a vacancy rate standard for low-income housing
in the state as described in RCW 18.85.540(1)(i).

--- END ---