BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.58.030 and 2000 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the words and phrases defined in this
section shall have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Active ingredient" means any ingredient which will prevent,
destroy, repel, control, or mitigate pests, or which will act as a
plant regulator, defoliant, desiccant, or spray adjuvant.
(2) "Antidote" means the most practical immediate treatment in case
of poisoning and includes first aid treatment.
(3) "Arthropod" means any invertebrate animal that belongs to the
phylum arthropoda, which in addition to insects, includes allied
classes whose members are wingless and usually have more than six legs;
for example, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(4) "Complete wood destroying organism inspection" means inspection
for the purpose of determining evidence of infestation, damage, or
conducive conditions as part of the transfer, exchange, or refinancing
of any structure in Washington state. Complete wood destroying
organism inspections include any wood destroying organism inspection
that is conducted as the result of telephone solicitation by an
inspection, pest control, or other business, even if the inspection
would fall within the definition of a specific wood destroying organism
inspection.
(5) "Defoliant" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to cause the leaves or foliage to drop from a plant with or
without causing abscission.
(((5))) (6) "Department" means the Washington state department of
agriculture.
(((6))) (7) "Desiccant" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended to artificially accelerate the drying of plant
tissues.
(((7))) (8) "Device" means any instrument or contrivance intended
to trap, destroy, control, repel, or mitigate pests, or to destroy,
control, repel or mitigate fungi, nematodes, or such other pests, as
may be designated by the director, but not including equipment used for
the application of pesticides when sold separately from the pesticides.
(((8))) (9) "Director" means the director of the department or a
duly authorized representative.
(((9))) (10) "Distribute" means to offer for sale, hold for sale,
sell, barter, or supply pesticides in this state.
(((10))) (11) "EPA" means the United States environmental
protection agency.
(((11))) (12) "EPA restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide
with restricted uses as classified for restricted use by the
administrator, EPA.
(((12))) (13) "FIFRA" means the federal insecticide, fungicide, and
rodenticide act as amended (61 Stat. 163, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).
(((13))) (14) "Fungi" means all nonchlorophyll-bearing thallophytes
(all nonchlorophyll-bearing plants of a lower order than mosses and
liverworts); for example, rusts, smuts, mildews, molds, yeasts, and
bacteria, except those on or in living persons or other animals.
(((14))) (15) "Fungicide" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any fungi.
(((15))) (16) "Herbicide" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any weed.
(((16))) (17) "Inert ingredient" means an ingredient which is not
an active ingredient.
(((17))) (18) "Ingredient statement" means a statement of the name
and percentage of each active ingredient together with the total
percentage of the inert ingredients in the pesticide, and when the
pesticide contains arsenic in any form, the ingredient statement shall
also include percentages of total and water soluble arsenic, each
calculated as elemental arsenic. In the case of a spray adjuvant the
ingredient statement need contain only the names of the principal
functioning agents and the total percentage of the constituents
ineffective as spray adjuvants. If more than three functioning agents
are present, only the three principal ones need by named.
(((18))) (19) "Insect" means any of the numerous small invertebrate
animals whose bodies are more or less obviously segmented, and which
for the most part belong to the class insecta, comprising six-legged,
usually winged forms, for example, beetles, bugs, bees, flies, and to
other allied classes of arthropods whose members are wingless and
usually have more than six legs, for example, spiders, mites, ticks,
centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(((19))) (20) "Insecticide" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any insects
which may be present in any environment whatsoever.
(((20))) (21) "Inspection control number" means a number obtained
from the department that is recorded on wood destroying organism
inspection reports issued by a structural pest inspector in conjunction
with the transfer, exchange, or refinancing of any structure.
(((21))) (22) "Label" means the written, printed, or graphic matter
on, or attached to, the pesticide, device, or immediate container, and
the outside container or wrapper of the retail package.
(((22))) (23) "Labeling" means all labels and other written,
printed, or graphic matter:
(a) Upon the pesticide, device, or any of its containers or
wrappers;
(b) Accompanying the pesticide, or referring to it in any other
media used to disseminate information to the public; and
(c) To which reference is made on the label or in literature
accompanying or referring to the pesticide or device except when
accurate nonmisleading reference is made to current official
publications of the department, United States departments of
agriculture; interior; education; health and human services; state
agricultural colleges; and other similar federal or state institutions
or agencies authorized by law to conduct research in the field of
pesticides.
(((23))) (24) "Land" means all land and water areas, including
airspace and all plants, animals, structures, buildings, devices and
contrivances, appurtenant thereto or situated thereon, fixed or mobile,
including any used for transportation.
(((24))) (25) "Master license system" means the mechanism
established by chapter 19.02 RCW by which master licenses, endorsed for
individual state-issued licenses, are issued and renewed using a master
application and a master license expiration date common to each
renewable license endorsement.
(((25))) (26) "Nematocide" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate nematodes.
(((26))) (27) "Nematode" means any invertebrate animal of the
phylum nemathelminthes and class nematoda, that is, unsegmented round
worms with elongated, fusiform, or saclike bodies covered with cuticle,
and inhabiting soil, water, plants or plant parts, may also be called
nemas or eelworms.
(((27))) (28) "Person" means any individual, partnership,
association, corporation, or organized group of persons whether or not
incorporated.
(((28))) (29) "Pest" means, but is not limited to, any insect,
rodent, nematode, snail, slug, weed and any form of plant or animal
life or virus, except virus on or in a living person or other animal,
which is normally considered to be a pest or which the director may
declare to be a pest.
(((29))) (30) "Pest control consultant" means any individual who
((acts as a structural pest inspector, who)) sells or offers for sale
at other than a licensed pesticide dealer outlet or location where they
are employed, or who offers or supplies technical advice((,
supervision, or aid,)) or makes recommendations to the user of:
(a) Highly toxic pesticides, as determined under RCW 15.58.040;
(b) EPA restricted use pesticides or restricted use pesticides
which are restricted by rule to distribution by licensed pesticide
dealers only; or
(c) Any other pesticide except those pesticides which are labeled
and intended for home and garden use only.
(((30))) (31) "Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:
(a) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate any insect, rodent, snail, slug,
fungus, weed, and any other form of plant or animal life or virus,
except virus on or in a living person or other animal which is normally
considered to be a pest or which the director may declare to be a pest;
(b) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as
a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant; and
(c) Any spray adjuvant.
(((31))) (32) "Pesticide advisory board" means the pesticide
advisory board as provided for in the Washington pesticide application
act.
(((32))) (33) "Pesticide dealer" means any person who distributes
any of the following pesticides:
(a) Highly toxic pesticides, as determined under RCW 15.58.040;
(b) EPA restricted use pesticides or restricted use pesticides
which are restricted by rule to distribution by licensed pesticide
dealers only; or
(c) Any other pesticide except those pesticides which are labeled
and intended for home and garden use only.
(((33))) (34) "Pesticide dealer manager" means the owner or other
individual supervising pesticide distribution at one outlet holding a
pesticide dealer license.
(((34))) (35) "Plant regulator" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended through physiological action, to accelerate or
retard the rate of growth or maturation, or to otherwise alter the
behavior of ornamental or crop plants or their produce, but shall not
include substances insofar as they are intended to be used as plant
nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant inoculants, or
soil amendments.
(((35))) (36) "Registrant" means the person registering any
pesticide under the provisions of this chapter.
(((36))) (37) "Restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or
device which, when used as directed or in accordance with a widespread
and commonly recognized practice, the director determines, subsequent
to a hearing, requires additional restrictions for that use to prevent
unreasonable adverse effects on the environment including people,
lands, beneficial insects, animals, crops, and wildlife, other than
pests.
(((37))) (38) "Rodenticide" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate rodents, or
any other vertebrate animal which the director may declare by rule to
be a pest.
(((38))) (39) "Specific wood destroying organism inspection" means
an inspection of a structure for purposes of identifying or verifying
evidence of an infestation of wood destroying organisms prior to pest
management activities.
(40) "Spray adjuvant" means any wetting agent, spreading agent,
deposit builder, adhesive, emulsifying agent, deflocculating agent,
water modifier, or similar agent with or without toxic properties of
its own, intended to be used with any other pesticide as an aid to the
application or to the effect of the pesticide, and which is in a
package or container separate from that of the pesticide with which it
is to be used.
(((39))) (41) "Special local needs registration" means a
registration issued by the director pursuant to provisions of section
24(c) of FIFRA.
(((40))) (42) "Structural pest inspector" means any individual who
performs the service of ((inspecting a building for)) conducting a
complete wood destroying ((organisms, their damage, or conditions
conducive to their infestation)) organism inspection or a specific wood
destroying organism inspection.
(((41))) (43) "Unreasonable adverse effects on the environment"
means any unreasonable risk to people or the environment taking into
account the economic, social, and environmental costs and benefits of
the use of any pesticide, or as otherwise determined by the director.
(((42))) (44) "Weed" means any plant which grows where not wanted.
(((43))) (45) "Wood destroying organism" means insects or fungi
that consume, excavate, develop in, or otherwise modify the integrity
of wood or wood products. Wood destroying organism includes, but is
not limited to, carpenter ants, moisture ants, subterranean termites,
dampwood termites, beetles in the family Anobiidae, and wood decay
fungi (wood rot).
(46) "Wood destroying organism inspection report" means any written
document that reports or comments on the presence or absence of wood
destroying organisms, their damage, and/or conducive conditions leading
to the establishment of such organisms.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.58.040 and 2000 c 96 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of
this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. All the authority
and requirements provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW (Administrative
Procedure Act) and chapter 42.30 RCW shall apply to this chapter in the
adoption of rules including those requiring due notice and a hearing
for the adoption of permanent rules.
(2) The director is authorized to adopt appropriate rules for
carrying out the purpose and provisions of this chapter, including but
not limited to rules providing for:
(a) Declaring as a pest any form of plant or animal life or virus
which is injurious to plants, people, animals (domestic or otherwise),
land, articles, or substances;
(b) Determining that certain pesticides are highly toxic to people.
For the purpose of this chapter, highly toxic pesticide means any
pesticide that conforms to the criteria in 40 C.F.R. Sec. 156.10 for
toxicity category I due to oral inhalation or dermal toxicity. The
director shall publish a list of all pesticides, determined to be
highly toxic, by their common or generic name and their trade or brand
name if practical. Such list shall be kept current and shall, upon
request, be made available to any interested party;
(c) Determining standards for denaturing pesticides by color,
taste, odor, or form;
(d) The collection and examination of samples of pesticides or
devices;
(e) The safe handling, transportation, storage, display,
distribution, and disposal of pesticides and their containers;
(f) Restricting or prohibiting the use of certain types of
containers or packages for specific pesticides. These restrictions may
apply to type of construction, strength, and/or size to alleviate
danger of spillage, breakage, misuse, or any other hazard to the
public. The director shall be guided by federal regulations concerning
pesticide containers;
(g) Procedures in making of pesticide recommendations;
(h) Adopting a list of restricted use pesticides for the state or
for designated areas within the state if the director determines that
such pesticides may require rules restricting or prohibiting their
distribution or use. The director may include in the rule the time and
conditions of distribution or use of such restricted use pesticides and
may, if it is found necessary to carry out the purpose and provisions
of this chapter, require that any or all restricted use pesticides
shall be purchased, possessed, or used only under permit of the
director and under the director's direct supervision in certain areas
and/or under certain conditions or in certain quantities or
concentrations. The director may require all persons issued such
permits to maintain records as to the use of all the restricted use
pesticides;
(i) Label requirements of all pesticides required to be registered
under provisions of this chapter;
(j) Regulating the labeling of devices;
(k) The establishment of criteria governing the conduct of a
structural pest inspection; ((and))
(l) Declaring crops, when grown to produce seed specifically for
crop reproduction purposes, to be nonfood and/or nonfeed sites of
pesticide application. The director may include in the rule any
restrictions or conditions regarding: (i) The application of
pesticides to the designated crops; and (ii) the disposition of any
portion of the treated crop;
(m) Fixing and collecting examination fees; and
(n) Requiring individuals to earn recertification credits in the
classifications in which they are licensed.
(3) For the purpose of uniformity and to avoid confusion
endangering the public health and welfare the director may adopt rules
in conformity with the primary pesticide standards, particularly as to
labeling, established by the United States environmental protection
agency or any other federal agency.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.58.150 and 2000 c 96 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to distribute within the state or
deliver for transportation or transport in intrastate commerce or
between points within this state through any point outside this state
any of the following:
(a) Any pesticide which has not been registered pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter;
(b) Any pesticide if any of the claims made for it or any of the
directions for its use or other labeling differs from the
representations made in connection with its registration, or if the
composition of a pesticide differs from its composition as represented
in connection with its registration: PROVIDED, That at the discretion
of the director, a change in the labeling or formula of a pesticide may
be made within a registration period without requiring reregistration
of the product;
(c) Any pesticide unless it is in the registrant's or the
manufacturer's unbroken immediate container and there is affixed to
such container, and to the outside container or wrapper of the retail
package, if there is one through which the required information on the
immediate container cannot be clearly read, a label bearing the
information required in this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter;
(d) Any pesticide including arsenicals, fluorides, fluosilicates,
and/or any other white powdered pesticides unless they have been
distinctly denatured as to color, taste, odor, or form if so required
by rule;
(e) Any pesticide which is adulterated or misbranded, or any device
which is misbranded;
(f) Any pesticide in containers, violating rules adopted pursuant
to RCW 15.58.040(2)(f) or pesticides found in containers which are
unsafe due to damage.
(2) It shall be unlawful:
(a) To sell or deliver any pesticide to any person who is required
by law or rules promulgated under such law to be certified, licensed,
or have a permit to use or purchase the pesticide unless such person or
the person's agent, to whom sale or delivery is made, has a valid
certification, license, or permit to use or purchase the kind and
quantity of such pesticide sold or delivered: PROVIDED, That, subject
to conditions established by the director, such permit may be obtained
immediately prior to sale or delivery from any person designated by the
director;
(b) For any person to detach, alter, deface or destroy, wholly or
in part, any label or labeling provided for in this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter, or to add any substance to, or take any
substance from, a pesticide in a manner that may defeat the purpose of
this chapter or the rules adopted thereunder;
(c) For any person to use or cause to be used any pesticide
contrary to label directions or to regulations of the director if those
regulations differ from or further restrict the label directions:
PROVIDED, The compliance to the term "contrary to label directions" is
enforced by the director consistent with the intent of this chapter;
(d) For any person to use for his or her own advantage or to
reveal, other than to the director or proper officials or employees of
the state, or to the courts of the state in response to a subpoena, or
to physicians, or in emergencies to pharmacists and other qualified
persons for use in the preparation of antidotes, any information
relative to formulas of products acquired by authority of RCW
15.58.060;
(e) For any person to make false, misleading, or erroneous
statements or reports concerning any pest during or after a pest
inspection or to fail to comply with criteria established by rule for
structural pest inspections;
(f) For any person to make false, misleading, or erroneous
statements or reports in connection with any pesticide complaint or
investigation;
(g) For any person to act as, or advertise that ((the person is a
licensed)) they perform the services of, a structural pest inspector
without having a ((valid pest control consultant)) license ((in the
category of)) to act as a structural pest inspector;
(h) For a business to conduct one or more complete wood destroying
organism inspections without first having obtained a structural pest
inspection company license from the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.58.210 and 2000 c 96 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no
individual may perform services as a pest control consultant without
obtaining a license from the director. The license shall expire
annually on a date set by rule by the director. ((Except as provided
in subsection (3) of this section, no individual may act as a
structural pest inspector without first obtaining from the director a
pest control consultant license in the special category of structural
pest inspector.)) Application for a license shall be on a form
prescribed by the director and shall be accompanied by a fee of forty-five dollars.
(2) The following are exempt from the licensing requirements of
subsection (1) of this section when acting within the authorities of
their existing licenses issued under chapter 17.21 RCW: Licensed
commercial pesticide applicators and operators; licensed
private-commercial applicators; and licensed demonstration and research
applicators. The following are also exempt from the licensing
requirements of subsection (1) of this section: Employees of federal,
state, county, or municipal agencies when acting in their official
governmental capacities; and pesticide dealer managers and employees
working under the direct supervision of the pesticide dealer manager
and only at a licensed pesticide dealer's outlet.
(((3) The following are exempt from the structural pest inspector
licensing requirement: Individuals inspecting for damage caused by
wood destroying organisms if such inspections are solely for the
purpose of: (a) Repairing or making specific recommendations for the
repair of such damage, or (b) assessing a monetary value for the
structure inspected. Individuals performing wood destroying organism
inspections that incorporate but are not limited to the activities
described in (a) or (b) of this subsection are not exempt from the
structural pest inspector licensing requirement.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 15.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no
individual may perform services as a structural pest inspector or
advertise that they perform services of a structural pest inspector
without obtaining a structural pest inspector license from the
director. The license expires annually on a date set by rule by the
director. Application for a license must be on a form prescribed by
the director and must be accompanied by a fee of forty-five dollars.
(2) The following are exempt from the application fee requirement
of subsection (1) of this section when acting within the authorities of
their existing licenses issued under chapter 15.58 or 17.21 RCW:
Licensed pest control consultants; licensed commercial pesticide
applicators and operators; licensed private-commercial applicators; and
licensed demonstration and research applicators.
(3) The following are exempt from the structural pest inspector
licensing requirement: Individuals inspecting for damage caused by
wood destroying organisms if the inspections are solely for the purpose
of: (a) Repairing or making specific recommendations for the repair of
the damage, or (b) assessing a monetary value for the structure
inspected. Individuals performing wood destroying organism inspections
that incorporate but are not limited to the activities described in (a)
or (b) of this subsection are not exempt from the structural pest
inspector licensing requirement.
(4) Persons holding a valid license to act as a structural pest
inspector on the effective date of this section are exempt from this
requirement until expiration of that license.
(5) A structural pest inspector license is not valid for conducting
a complete wood destroying organism inspection unless the inspector
owns or is employed by a business with a structural pest inspection
company license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 15.58 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall require each applicant for a structural pest
inspector license to demonstrate to the director the applicant's
knowledge of applicable laws and regulations; structural pest
identification and damage; and conditions conducive to the development
of wood destroying organisms by satisfactorily passing a written
examination for the classifications for which the applicant has applied
prior to issuing the license.

Sec. 7 RCW 15.58.233 and 2000 c 96 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may renew any license issued under this chapter
subject to the recertification standards identified in subsection (2)
of this section or an examination requiring new knowledge that may be
required to ((apply pesticides)) perform in those areas licensed.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, all
individuals licensed under this chapter shall meet the recertification
standards identified in (a) or (b) of this subsection, every five
years, in order to qualify for continuing licensure.
(a) Individuals licensed under this chapter may qualify for
continued licensure through accumulation of recertification credits.
Individuals licensed under this chapter shall accumulate a minimum of
forty department-approved credits every five years with no more than
fifteen credits allowed per year.
(b) Individuals licensed under this chapter may qualify for
continued licensure through meeting the examination requirements
necessary to become licensed in those areas in which the licensee
operates.
(3) At the termination of a licensee's five-year recertification
period, the director may waive the recertification requirements if the
licensee can demonstrate that he or she is meeting comparable
recertification standards through another state or jurisdiction or
through a federal environmental protection agency-approved government
agency plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 15.58 RCW
to read as follows:
It is unlawful for any business to conduct complete wood destroying
organism inspections without having obtained a company license from the
director. Application for a structural pest inspection company license
must be on a form prescribed by the director. The application must
include the following information:
(1) The full name of the individual applying for such license;
(2) The full name of the company that employs structural pest
inspectors;
(3) The physical and mailing addresses of the company, and the
telephone and facsimile numbers, if available;
(4) A list of the names of the structural pest inspectors who are
employed by the company;
(5) The unique business identifier for the company; and
(6) Any other necessary information prescribed by the director.
Any changes to the information on the prescribed structural pest
inspection company license form shall be reported by the company to the
department within thirty days of the change.

Sec. 9 RCW 15.58.460 and 2000 c 96 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The director shall not issue a license to any person who
intends to act as a structural pest inspector until the person has
furnished evidence of financial responsibility.
(2) Evidence of financial responsibility shall consist of either a
surety bond or an errors and omissions insurance policy or
certification thereof, protecting persons who may suffer legal damages
as a result of actions by the structural pest inspector. The director
shall not accept a surety bond or insurance policy except from
authorized insurers in this state.
(3) Evidence of financial responsibility shall be supplied to the
department on a financial responsibility insurance certificate or
surety bond form.)) The director shall not issue a license to any
individual who intends to act as a structural pest inspector until
evidence of financial responsibility, required and described in
subsection (2) of this section, is furnished by the applicant or the
business employing the applicant. Licensed commercial applicators that
have met the requirements of RCW 17.21.160 and their licensed
commercial operator employees are exempt from this financial
responsibility requirement when performing specific wood destroying
organism inspections. Public employees licensed to perform structural
pest inspections are exempt from this licensing requirement when acting
within their official capacities.
(2) Evidence of financial responsibility, consisting of one of the
following, must be provided and maintained as a condition of licensure:
(a) An errors and omissions insurance policy, the amount and terms
of which are consistent with the requirements of RCW 15.58.465(1)(a);
(b) A surety bond, the amounts and terms of which are consistent
with the requirements of RCW 15.58.465(1)(b);
(c) A surety bond and an errors and omissions insurance policy, the
amount and terms of which are consistent with the requirements of RCW
15.58.465(1)(c);
(d) An assigned account, the amount and terms of which are
consistent with the requirements of RCW 15.58.465(1)(d);
(e) Any other type of evidence of financial responsibility
identified by the director by rule that provides coverage equivalent to
that provided by any of (a) through (d) of this subsection.
(3) Evidence of financial responsibility must be supplied to the
department on a financial responsibility insurance certificate, surety
bond form, assigned account form, or other form prescribed by the
director with regard to evidence provided under subsection (2)(e) of
this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 15.58.465 and 2000 c 96 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The following requirements apply to the amount of surety bond
or insurance required for structural pest inspectors.
(a) The amount of the surety bond or errors and omissions
insurance, as provided for in RCW 15.58.460, shall be not less than
twenty-five thousand dollars and fifty thousand dollars respectively.
The surety bond or insurance policy shall be maintained at not less
than the required sum at all times during the licensed period.
(b) The director shall be notified ten days before any reduction of
insurance coverage at the request of the applicant or cancellation of
the surety bond or insurance by the surety or insurer and by the
insured.
(c) The total and aggregate of the surety and insurer for all
claims is limited to the face of the surety bond or insurance policy.
The director may accept a surety bond or insurance policy in the proper
sum that has a deductible clause in an amount not exceeding five
thousand dollars for the total amount of surety bond or insurance
required by this section. If the applicant has not satisfied the
requirement of the deductible amount in any prior legal claim the
deductible clause shall not be accepted by the director unless the
applicant furnishes the director with a surety bond or insurance policy
which shall satisfy the amount of the deductible as to all claims that
may arise.
(2) Insurance policies must be written on an occurrence basis.
(3) Insurance policies shall have a minimum three-year occurrence
clause.)) The following requirements apply to the forms of evidence of
financial responsibility required under RCW 15.58.460.
(a) Errors and Omissions Insurance. The amount of the errors and
omissions insurance policy required by RCW 15.58.460(2)(a) shall not be
less than twenty-five thousand dollars. The insurance policy shall be
maintained at not less than the required sum at all times during the
licensed period. The insurance policy shall provide coverage for
errors and omissions in an inspection conducted during the term of the
policy. However, the policy may limit the insurer's liability on the
policy in effect at the time of the inspection to two years from the
date of the inspection.
(b) Surety Bond. The amount of the surety bond required by RCW
15.58.460(2)(b) shall not be less than twenty-five thousand dollars.
The surety bond shall be maintained at not less than the required sum
at all times during the licensed period. Any person having a claim
against the structural pest inspector for legal damages as a result of
the actions of the structural pest inspector may bring suit upon the
bond in the court of the county in which the inspection took place or
of the county in which jurisdiction of the structural pest inspector
may be had. The surety issuing the bond shall be named as a party to
any suit upon the bond. The suit upon the bond must be commenced
within two years of the date of the inspection.
(c) Surety Bond and Errors and Omissions Insurance. The amount of
the surety bond required by RCW 15.58.460(2)(c) shall not be less than
twelve thousand five hundred dollars. Except as to the amount of the
bond, the terms of the bond shall be identical to those set forth in
(b) of this subsection. The amount of the errors and omissions
insurance policy required by RCW 15.58.460(2)(c) shall not be less than
twenty-five thousand dollars. The insurance policy shall be maintained
at not less than the required sum at all times during the licensed
period. The insurance policy shall provide coverage for errors and
omissions in an inspection conducted during the term of the policy.
(d) Assigned Account. The amount of the assigned account required
by RCW 15.58.460(2)(d) shall not be less than twenty-five thousand
dollars. The assigned account shall be held by the department to
satisfy any execution on a judgment issued against the inspector for
legal damages resulting from errors and omissions in the conduct of an
inspection, according to the provisions of the assigned account
agreement. The department has no liability for payment in excess of
the amount of the assigned account.
(i) The assigned account agreement filed with the director as
evidence of financial responsibility shall be canceled at the
expiration of two years after the inspector's license has expired or
been revoked, or at the expiration of two years after the inspector has
furnished another form of evidence of financial responsibility required
by RCW 15.58.460, unless legal action has been instituted against the
inspector prior to the expiration of the two-year period and the
director has been provided written notice of the same by the claimant.
In such a case the director shall not cancel the assigned account
agreement until the director either receives a copy of the order
dismissing the action by registered or certified mail, or has received
a copy of the unsatisfied judgment and has complied with the
requirements of (d)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) Any person having an unsatisfied final judgment against the
inspector for legal damages awarded based on errors and omissions in
the conduct of an inspection may execute upon the funds in the assigned
account by serving a certified copy of the unsatisfied final judgment
by registered or certified mail upon the department within one year of
the date of entry of such judgment. Upon the receipt of service of
such certified copy the department shall direct the financial
institution to pay from the assigned account, through the registry of
the court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the
unsatisfied judgment. The priority of payment from the assigned
account shall be the order of receipt of the final judgment by the
department.
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section that limits the time
period in which a suit must be commenced on a surety bond or in which
a claim must be made on a policy effects the statute of limitations
applicable to any claim any person may have against the structural pest
inspector or company.
(3) The director may only accept a surety bond or insurance policy
as evidence of financial responsibility if the bond or policy is issued
by an insurer authorized to do business in this state. The director
shall be notified ten days before any reduction of insurance coverage
at the request of the applicant or cancellation of the surety bond or
insurance by the surety or insurer and by the insured.
(4) The total and aggregate of the surety and insurer for all
claims is limited to the face of the surety bond or insurance policy.
The director may accept a surety bond or insurance policy in the proper
sum that has a deductible clause in an amount not exceeding five
thousand dollars for the total amount of surety bond or insurance
required by this section. If the applicant has not satisfied the
requirement of the deductible amount in any prior legal claim the
deductible clause may not be accepted by the director unless the
applicant furnishes the director with a surety bond or insurance policy
which satisfies the amount of the deductible as to all claims that may
arise.

Sec. 11 RCW 15.58.470 and 2000 c 96 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever ((a structural pest inspector's surety bond or insurance
policy)) the form of evidence of financial responsibility for a
structural pest inspector license is reduced below the requirements of
RCW 15.58.465 or no longer applies to the structural pest inspector, or
whenever the ((person)) licensee or the business that employs the
licensee has failed to provide evidence of financial responsibility as
required by RCW 15.58.460 by the expiration date of ((the)) any
previous ((surety bond or insurance policy)) form of evidence of
financial responsibility, the director shall immediately suspend the
((person's)) structural pest inspector license until the ((person's
surety bond or insurance policy again meets the)) requirements of RCW
15.58.465 are met again.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---