BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.44.010 and 1999 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The words and phrases defined in this section shall have the
following meanings when used in this chapter unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise.
(1) "Authorized contractor" means a person who decontaminates,
demolishes, or disposes of contaminated property as required by this
chapter who is certified by the department as provided for in RCW
64.44.060.
(2) "Contaminated" or "contamination" means polluted by hazardous
chemicals so that the property is unfit for human habitation or use due
to immediate or long-term hazards. Property that at one time was
contaminated but has been satisfactorily decontaminated according to
procedures established by the state board of health is not
"contaminated."
(3) "Hazardous chemicals" means the following substances used in
the manufacture of illegal drugs: (a) Hazardous substances as defined
in RCW 70.105D.020, and (b) precursor substances as defined in RCW
69.43.010 which the state board of health, in consultation with the
state board of pharmacy, has determined present an immediate or long-term health hazard to humans.
(4) "Officer" means a local health officer authorized under
chapters 70.05, 70.08, and 70.46 RCW.
(5) "Property" means any property, site, structure, or part of a
structure which is involved in the unauthorized manufacture or storage
of hazardous chemicals. This includes but is not limited to single-family residences, units of multiplexes, condominiums, apartment
buildings, storage units, vessels, boats, motor vehicles including
recreational vehicles and motor homes, trailers, manufactured housing,
or any shop, booth, or garden.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.44.030 and 1999 c 292 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If after the inspection of the property, the local health
officer finds that it is contaminated, then the property shall be found
unfit for use. The local health officer shall cause to be served an
order prohibiting use either personally or by certified mail, with
return receipt requested, upon all occupants and persons having any
interest therein as shown upon the records of the auditor's office of
the county in which such property is located. The local health officer
shall also post the order prohibiting use in a conspicuous place on the
property. If the whereabouts of such persons is unknown and the same
cannot be ascertained by the local health officer in the exercise of
reasonable diligence, and the health officer makes an affidavit to that
effect, then the serving of the order upon such persons may be made
either by personal service or by mailing a copy of the order by
certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to each
person at the address appearing on the last equalized tax assessment
roll of the county where the property is located or at the address
known to the county assessor, and the order shall be posted
conspicuously at the residence. A copy of the order shall also be
mailed, addressed to each person or party having a recorded right,
title, estate, lien, or interest in the property. The order shall
contain a notice that a hearing before the local health board or
officer shall be held upon the request of a person required to be
notified of the order under this section. The request for a hearing
must be made within ten days of serving the order. The hearing shall
then be held within not less than twenty days nor more than thirty days
after the serving of the order. The officer shall prohibit use as long
as the property is found to be contaminated. ((A))
(2) If the property found by the local health official to be unfit
for use is:
(a) Real property, a copy of the order shall also be filed by the
local health official with the auditor of the county in which the
property is located, and such filing of the complaint or order shall
have the same force and effect as other lis pendens notices provided by
law;
(b) A vehicle that is titled under chapter 46.12 RCW, a copy of the
order shall be submitted by the local health official to the department
of licensing. The local health official shall identify the vehicle by
(i) year, make, and model; (ii) license plate number; and (iii) vehicle
identification number, if the information is discernable or known. A
report containing the information required by this section may be
submitted electronically in lieu of a copy of the order, if the
department has the capability to receive, verify the authenticity of,
and process the report in electronic form; or
(c) A mobile home or manufactured home as defined in RCW 46.04.302,
a copy of the order shall be submitted by the local health official to
the department of licensing.
(3) In any hearing concerning whether property is fit for use, the
property owner has the burden of showing that the property is
decontaminated or fit for use. The owner or any person having an
interest in the property may file an appeal on any order issued by the
local health board or officer within thirty days from the date of
service of the order with the appeals commission established pursuant
to RCW 35.80.030. All proceedings before the appeals commission,
including any subsequent appeals to superior court, shall be governed
by the procedures established in chapter 35.80 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.44.050 and 1999 c 292 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An owner of contaminated property who desires to have the
property decontaminated shall use the services of an authorized
contractor unless otherwise authorized by the local health officer.
The contractor shall prepare and submit a written work plan for
decontamination to the local health officer. The local health officer
may charge a reasonable fee for review of the work plan. If the work
plan is approved and the decontamination is completed and the property
is retested according to the plan and properly documented, then the
health officer shall allow reuse of the property((. A)), and shall
issue to the owner a release for reuse document, describing the
property being released and indicating the property has been
decontaminated in accordance with rules of the state department of
health. The local health official may charge a reasonable fee for
making certified copies of release for reuse documents.
(2) If a seller or lessor fails to disclose the fact that a
property was at one time found to be unfit for use under RCW 64.44.030,
the purchaser or lessee has the right of rescission and may recover
under chapter 19.86 RCW.
(3) The seller or lessor of any decontaminated property that is
real property, who received the release for reuse document from the
local health official, shall record the release for reuse document
((shall be recorded)) in the real property records ((indicating the
property has been decontaminated in accordance with rules of the state
department of health)) of the county in which the property is located.
(4) The seller or lessor of any decontaminated property that is not
real property, who received the release for reuse document from the
local health official, shall give a copy of the release for reuse
document to the purchaser or lessee of the property. If the
decontaminated property is a vehicle titled under chapter 46.12 RCW,
the seller or lessor may, upon payment of the fees required by the
department of licensing, file with the department a certified copy of
the release for reuse document but only if the seller or lessor also
applies at the same time for a new title as provided under section 4(2)
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a local health official notifies the department that the
official has found a vehicle titled under this chapter, or a mobile
home as defined in RCW 46.04.302, to be unfit for use under RCW
64.44.030, the department shall make a notation on the record, if one
exists, maintained by the department for that vehicle or mobile home.
The notation must indicate that the vehicle has been found to be unfit
for use due to chemical contamination. Except as provided under
subsection (2) of this section, the department shall not transfer the
certificate of ownership and shall not renew the certificate of
registration for any vehicle about which the department has received a
notice from a local health official under this section.
(2) The department shall issue to a registered owner, legal owner,
purchaser, or lessee a unique certificate of ownership and certificate
of license registration, as required by chapter 46.16 RCW when the
department receives (a) an application for a certificate of ownership;
(b) a certified copy of a release for reuse document, as provided under
RCW 64.44.050(3); and (c) the original certificate of ownership or an
affidavit of lost title from a registered owner, legal owner,
purchaser, or lessee. Each certificate of ownership associated with a
vehicle issued after receipt of a release for reuse document must
conspicuously display across its front the following words:
"Decontaminated/Reusable." Each certificate of registration associated
with the vehicle must include a notation to the same effect.
(3) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---