BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.500 and 2002 c 247 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may drive either a two-wheeled or a three-wheeled
motorcycle, or a motor-driven cycle unless such person has a valid
driver's license specially endorsed by the director to enable the
holder to drive such vehicles.
(2) However, a person sixteen years of age or older, holding a
valid driver's license of any class issued by the state of the person's
residence, may operate a moped without taking any special examination
for the operation of a moped.
(3) No driver's license is required for operation of an electric-
assisted bicycle if the operator is at least sixteen years of age.
Persons under sixteen years of age may not operate an electric-assisted
bicycle.
(4) No driver's license is required to operate an electric personal
assistive mobility device.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.505 and 2002 c 352 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person applying for a special endorsement of a driver's
license authorizing such person to drive a two or three-wheeled
motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle shall pay a fee of five dollars,
which is not refundable. In addition, the endorsement fee for the
initial motorcycle endorsement shall not exceed ten dollars, and the
subsequent renewal endorsement fee shall not exceed twenty-five
dollars, unless the endorsement is renewed or extended for a period
other than five years, in which case the subsequent renewal endorsement
fee shall not exceed five dollars for each year that the endorsement is
renewed or extended. The initial and renewal endorsement fees shall be
deposited in the motorcycle safety education account of the highway
safety fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.515 and 2002 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The motorcycle endorsement examination must emphasize maneuvers
necessary for on-street operation, including emergency braking and
turning as may be required to avoid an impending collision. The
examination for a two-wheeled motorcycle endorsement and the
examination for a three-wheeled motorcycle endorsement must be separate
and distinct examinations emphasizing the skills and maneuvers
necessary to operate each type of motorcycle. The department may waive
all or part of the examination for persons who satisfactorily complete
the voluntary motorcycle operator training and education program
authorized under RCW 46.20.520 or who satisfactorily complete a private
motorcycle skills education course that has been certified by the
department under RCW 46.81A.020.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.81A.010 and 1988 c 227 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Motorcycle skills education program" means a motorcycle rider
skills training program to be administered by the department.
(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(3) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(4) "Motorcycle" means a ((motorcycle licensed under chapter 46.16
RCW, and does not include motorized bicycles, mopeds, scooters, off-road motorcycles, motorized tricycles, side-car equipped motorcycles,
or four-wheel all-terrain vehicles)) motor vehicle designed to travel
on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, on which the
driver rides astride the motor unit or power train and is designed to
be steered with a handle bar, but excluding farm tractors, electric
personal assistive mobility devices, mopeds, motorized bicycles, and
off-road motorcycles.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.81A.020 and 2002 c 197 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall administer and enforce the law pertaining to
the motorcycle skills education program as set forth in this chapter.
(2) The director may adopt and enforce reasonable rules that are
consistent with this chapter.
(3) The director shall revise the Washington motorcycle safety
program to:
(a) Institute ((a)) separate novice and advanced motorcycle skills
education courses for both ((novice and advanced motorcycle riders))
two-wheeled and three-wheeled motorcycles that ((is)) are each a
minimum of eight hours and no more than sixteen hours at a cost of (i)
no more than fifty dollars for Washington state residents under the age
of eighteen, and (ii) no more than one hundred dollars for Washington
state residents who are eighteen years of age or older and military
personnel of any age stationed in Washington state;
(b) Encourage the use of loaned or used motorcycles for use in the
motorcycle skills education course if the instructor approves them;
(c) Require all instructors for two-wheeled motorcycles to conduct
at least three classes in a one-year period, and all instructors for
three-wheeled motorcycles to conduct at least one class in a one-year
period, to maintain their teaching eligibility;
(d) Encourage the use of radio or intercom equipped helmets when,
in the opinion of the instructor, radio or intercom equipped helmets
improve the quality of instruction.
(4) The department may enter into agreements to review and certify
that a private motorcycle skills education course meets educational
standards equivalent to those required of courses conducted under the
motorcycle skills education program. An agreement entered into under
this subsection must provide that the department may conduct periodic
audits to ensure that educational standards continue to meet those
required for courses conducted under the motorcycle skills education
program, and that the costs of the review, certification, and audit
process will be borne by the party seeking certification.
(5) The department shall obtain and compile information from
applicants for a motorcycle endorsement regarding whether they have
completed a state approved or certified motorcycle skills education
course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act shall be known as the Monty Lish
Memorial Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---