BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that financial fraud
and white collar crime are serious problems, with expensive
consequences for consumers, taxpayers, financial institutions, and
retailers. The ready availability of unsolicited checks sent by credit
card issuers to card holders presents an opportunity for theft,
criminal misuse, and identity theft, as well as a temptation to
consumers to overextend themselves. Pathological gamblers,
inexperienced consumers, and persons with compulsive spending problems
may be encouraged to make use of unsolicited checks, putting themselves
and their families at additional financial risk. Mail thieves are able
to make use of the checks. The legislature finds that, although the
checks may be useful for some consumers' occasional needs, the checks
would be more appropriate if they were issued only upon request of the
card holder. The legislature intends to reduce financial fraud and
inhibit consumer financial overextension by requiring credit card
issuers to provide credit-based checks only upon affirmative request of
the card holder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.200 RCW
to read as follows:
For credit card accounts held by legal residents of Washington
state, credit card issuers shall provide a clearly worded, large-print
notice of the following:
(1) Credit card-based checks are available only upon request and
authorization by the card holder; and
(2) The issuance of unsolicited credit card-based checks to legal
residents of Washington state is prohibited.
The legislature finds that the practices covered by this section
are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A second or
subsequent violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to
the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition
for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86
RCW.

--- END ---