BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
Any decision or action of the department of natural resources and
the board of natural resources concerning state trust lands are exempt
from all of the procedural requirements for the preparation of an
environmental impact statement or the making of a threshold
determination required by this chapter for class I, II, and III forest
practices as defined by rules adopted by the forest practices board
under RCW 76.09.050. Such forest practices include timber sales by the
department of natural resources and the board of natural resources.
State trust lands include federally granted trust lands, forest board
transfer lands, forest board purchase lands, and the community college
reserve trust lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.68 RCW
to read as follows:
State trust lands are subject to the provisions of section 1 of
this act.

--- END ---