BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.210.280 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 721 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Public school districts and private schools that offer classes
for any of grades kindergarten through twelve may provide for clean,
intermittent bladder catheterization of students, or assisted self-catheterization of students pursuant to RCW 18.79.290, if the
catheterization is provided for in substantial compliance with:
(a) Rules adopted by the state nursing care quality assurance
commission and the instructions of a registered nurse or advanced
registered nurse practitioner issued under such rules; and
(b) Written policies of the school district or private school which
shall be adopted in order to implement this section and shall be
developed in accordance with such requirements of chapters 41.56 and
41.59 RCW as may be applicable.
(2) School district employees, except those licensed under chapter
18.79 RCW, who have not agreed in writing to perform clean,
intermittent bladder catheterizations as a specific part of their job
description, may file a written letter of refusal to perform clean,
intermittent bladder catheterization of students. This written letter
of refusal may not serve as grounds for discharge, nonrenewal, or other
action adversely affecting the employee's contract status.
(3) This section does not require school districts to provide
intermittent bladder catheterization of students.

--- END ---