BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.660.040 and 2001 c 158 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Partnership grants funded under this chapter shall operate one to
three specific route programs. Successful completion of the program
shall make a candidate eligible for residency teacher certification.
For route one and two candidates, the mentor of the teacher candidate
at the school and the supervisor of the teacher candidate from the
higher education teacher preparation program must both agree that the
teacher candidate has successfully completed the program. For route
three candidates, the mentor of the teacher candidate shall make the
determination that the candidate has successfully completed the
program.
(1) Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate route one
programs shall enroll currently employed classified instructional
employees with transferable associate degrees seeking residency teacher
certification with endorsements in special education, bilingual
education, or English as a second language. For a maximum of two
years, a route one candidate shall retain his or her employee status
during the time the candidate is participating in the program. It is
anticipated that candidates enrolled in this route will complete both
their baccalaureate degree and requirements for residency certification
in two years or less, including a mentored internship to be completed
in the final year. In addition, partnership programs shall uphold
entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
three years of successful student interaction and leadership as a
classified instructional employee;
(b) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam, when
available; and
(c) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers.
(2) Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate route two
programs shall enroll currently employed classified staff with
baccalaureate degrees seeking residency teacher certification in
subject matter shortage areas and areas with shortages due to
geographic location. For a maximum of two years, a route one candidate
shall retain his or her employee status during the time the candidate
is participating in the program. Candidates enrolled in this route
must complete a mentored internship complemented by flexibly scheduled
training and coursework offered at a local site, such as a school or
educational service district, or online or via video-conference over
the K-20 network, in collaboration with the partnership program's
higher education partner. In addition, partnership grant programs
shall uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
three years of successful student interaction and leadership as
classified staff;
(b) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's college or university grade
point average may be considered as a selection factor;
(c) Successful completion of the content test, once the state
content test is available;
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam, when
available.
(3) Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate route three
programs shall enroll individuals with baccalaureate degrees, who are
not employed in the district at the time of application, or who hold
emergency substitute certificates. When selecting candidates for
certification through route three, districts shall give priority to
individuals who are seeking residency teacher certification in subject
matter shortage areas or shortages due to geographic locations. For
route three only, the districts may include additional candidates in
nonshortage subject areas if the candidates are seeking endorsements
with a secondary grade level designation as defined by rule by the
state board of education. The districts shall disclose to candidates
in nonshortage subject areas available information on the demand in
those subject areas. Cohorts of candidates for this route shall attend
an intensive summer teaching academy, followed by a full year employed
by a district in a mentored internship, followed, if necessary, by a
second summer teaching academy. In addition, partnership programs
shall uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) Five years' experience in the work force;
(b) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's grade point average may be
considered as a selection factor;
(c) Successful completion of the content test, once the state
content test is available;
(d) External validation of qualifications, including demonstrated
successful experience with students or children, such as ((references
[reference])) reference letters and letters of support from previous
employers;
(e) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(f) Successful passage of statewide basic skills exams, when
available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2005.

--- END ---