BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.440 and 1997 c 80 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 46.61.400(1), and except in those instances
where a lower maximum lawful speed is provided by this chapter or
otherwise, it shall be unlawful for the operator of any vehicle to
operate the same at a speed in excess of twenty miles per hour when
operating any vehicle upon a highway either inside or outside an
incorporated city or town when passing any ((marked)) school or
playground ((crosswalk when such marked crosswalk)) speed zone when the
beginning and end of the zone is fully posted with standard school
speed limit signs or standard playground speed limit signs. ((The
speed zone at the crosswalk shall)) A school or playground speed zone
extends three hundred feet in either direction from ((the)) a marked
school or playground crosswalk, or three hundred feet from the school
or playground property line, whichever is encountered first as traffic
approaches the school. When no marked crosswalk exists, a school or
playground speed zone extends three hundred feet from the school or
playground property line.
(2) A person found to have committed any infraction relating to
speed restrictions within a school or playground speed zone shall be
assessed a monetary penalty equal to twice the penalty assessed under
RCW 46.63.110. This penalty may not be waived, reduced, or suspended.
(3) The school zone safety account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Fifty percent of the moneys collected under
subsection (2) of this section shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only by the Washington
traffic safety commission solely to fund projects in local communities
to improve school zone safety, pupil transportation safety, and student
safety in school bus loading and unloading areas. Only the director of
the traffic safety commission or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures until July 1, 1999, after which date moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.

--- END ---