BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Where internet-access library terminals are available for public
use, libraries shall equip such terminals with filtering software that
blocks, to the extent technically possible, access to internet sites
that are both adult-oriented and sexually explicit. Members of the
public shall not have access to such material on public library
computers. Library staff shall not monitor the use of internet-access
terminals in any way other than as directed by library policy or state
law.

--- END ---