BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that sexually explicit
materials are harmful to the safety and well-being of children. Such
graphic materials contribute to increased sexual activity by children
along with higher rates of sexually transmitted diseases, illegitimate
pregnancies, and acts of sexual aggression by children against other
children. The legislature intends by this act to promote the safety
and well-being of children by limiting the ability of children to
access sexually explicit materials and to ensure the law reinforces and
supports the wishes of parents regarding their children's access to
such graphic materials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 As used in sections 1 through 6 of this act,
the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Harmful to minors" means any matter or live performance:
(a) That the average adult person, applying contemporary community
standards, would find, when considered as a whole, appeals to the
prurient interest of minors; and
(b) That explicitly depicts or describes, by prevailing standards
in the adult community with respect to what is suitable for minors,
patently offensive representations or descriptions of:
(i) Ultimate sexual acts, normal or perverted, actual or simulated;
or
(ii) Masturbation, fellatio, cunnilingus, bestiality, excretory
functions, lewd exhibition of the genitals or genital area, sexually
explicit conduct, sexual excitement, or sexually explicit nudity; or
(iii) Sexual acts that are violent or destructive, including but
not limited to human or animal mutilation, dismemberment, rape, or
torture; and
(c) That, when considered as a whole, and in the context in which
it is used, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific
value for minors.
(2) "Matter" means a motion picture film, a publication, a sexual
device, or any combination thereof.
(3) "Motion picture film" means any:
(a) Film or plate negative;
(b) Film or plate positive;
(c) Film designed to be projected on a screen for exhibition;
(d) Film, glass slides, or transparencies, either in negative or
positive form, designed for exhibition by projection on a screen;
(e) Videotape; or
(f) Any other medium used to electronically transmit or reproduce
images on a screen.
(4) "Publication" means any book, magazine, article, pamphlet,
writing, printing illustration, picture, sound recording, telephonic
communication, or coin-operated machine.
(5) "Live performance" means any play, show, skit, dance, or other
exhibition performed or presented to or before an audience of one or
more, in person or by electronic transmission, or by telephonic
communication, with or without consideration.
(6) "Knowledge" means knowledge as defined in RCW 9A.08.010(1)(b).
(7) "Knowledge of its character" means that the person has
knowledge that the matter or performance contains, depicts, or
describes activity or conduct that may be found to be patently
offensive under subsection (1)(b) of this section. Such knowledge may
be proved by direct or circumstantial evidence, or both.
(8) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.
(9) "Person" means any individual, partnership, firm, association,
corporation, or other legal entity.
(10) "Sexual device" means any artificial device primarily
designed, promoted, or marketed to physically stimulate or manipulate
the human genitals.
(11) "Sexual excitement" means the condition of human male or
female genitals when in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal; or
the depiction of covered male genitals in a discernibly turgid state.
(12) "Sexually explicit conduct" means physical contact with a
person's clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks, perineum,
or, if such person is a female, breast.
(13) "Sexually explicit nudity" means the showing of the human male
or female genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or perineum with less than a
full opaque covering; or the showing of the female breast with less
than a full opaque covering of any portion thereof below the top of the
nipple.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No person may with knowledge of its
character:
(1) Display matter that is harmful to minors in such a way that
minors, as part of the invited general public, will be exposed to view
the matter; however, a person is deemed not to have displayed matter
harmful to minors if:
(a) The matter is kept behind devices commonly known as blinder
racks so that the lower two-thirds of the matter is not exposed to
view; or
(b) In the case of an operator who transmits matter that is harmful
to minors via cable television transmissions, the operator first
notifies the subscriber of the availability of a device that allows a
subscriber to prohibit the viewing of a particular cable transmission;
or
(c) In the case of a person who provides a minor with access to a
computer containing matter that is harmful to minors stored locally, or
that can be connected to the internet, the computer is equipped with
specialized filtering software actively installed for the purpose of
protecting minors from accessing matter that is harmful to minors; or
(d) In the case of a person publishing a world wide web page
containing matter that is harmful to minors, the web page contains
codes or hidden comments that trigger the blocking mechanisms of any
browser-filtering software that is designed for the purpose of
protecting minors from accessing matter that is harmful to minors; or
(e) In the case of a person hosting or mirroring internet content
on servers located within the state of Washington, the person mandates
the inclusion in all web pages of codes or hidden comments that trigger
the blocking mechanisms of any browser-filtering software that is
designed for the purpose of protecting minors from accessing matter
that is harmful to minors; or
(f) In the case of a person providing electronic communications or
telecommunications access or connection to or from a facility, system,
or network, whether one-way or interactive, including transmission,
downloading, storage, navigational tools, and related capabilities that
are incidental to the provision of the electronic communications or
telecommunications access or connection, the person mandates the
inclusion in all web pages of codes or hidden comments that trigger the
blocking mechanisms of any browser-filtering software that is designed
for the purpose of protecting minors from accessing matter that is
harmful to minors;
(2) Sell, furnish, present, distribute, allow to view or hear, or
otherwise disseminate to a minor, with or without consideration, any
matter that is harmful to minors; or
(3) Present to a minor or participate in presenting to a minor,
with or without consideration, any live performance that is harmful to
minors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In any prosecution for violation of section
3 of this act, it is an affirmative defense that:
(1) The matter or performance involved was displayed or otherwise
disseminated to a minor by the minor's parent or legal guardian, for
bona fide purposes; or
(2) The matter or performance involved was displayed or otherwise
disseminated to a minor with the written permission of the minor's
parent or legal guardian, for bona fide purposes; or
(3) The person made a reasonable good faith attempt to ascertain
the true age of the minor by requiring production of a driver's
license, marriage license, birth certificate, or other governmental or
educational identification card or paper, or copy thereof if supplied
by mail or electronic facsimile when in-person production thereof is
impractical, and not relying solely on the oral allegations or apparent
age of the minor; or
(4) If engaged in the commercial distribution of material that is
harmful to minors by electronic or telephonic transmission, access by
persons under eighteen years of age is restricted by requiring use of
a verified credit card, debit account, adult access code, or adult
personal identification number before transmission of the material.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A person who is convicted of violating
section 3 of this act is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) Each day that a violation of section 3 of this act occurs or
continues is a separate offense and is punishable as a separate
violation.
(3) Every act, thing, or transaction prohibited by section 3 of
this act is a separate offense as to each item, issue, or title
involved and is punishable as such.
(4) For the purpose of this section, multiple copies of the same
identical title, monthly issue, volume, and number issue, or other such
identical material are a single offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The state of Washington fully occupies
and preempts within the boundaries of the state the entire field of
regulation and sanctions for displaying, selling, furnishing,
presenting, or otherwise distributing matter or performances that are
harmful to minors.
(2) Counties, cities, towns, or other municipalities may enact only
those laws and ordinances relating to matter and performances harmful
to minors that are consistent with this chapter.
(3) Local laws and ordinances that are inconsistent with, more
restrictive than, or exceed the requirements of this chapter may not be
enacted and are preempted and repealed, regardless of the nature of the
code, charter, or home rule status of such county, city, town, or
municipality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 9.68.015 (Obscene literature, shows, etc. -- Exemptions) and
1959 c 260 s 2;
(2) RCW 9.68.050 ("Erotic material" -- Definitions) and 1992 c 5 s 1
& 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 13;
(3) RCW 9.68.060 ("Erotic material" -- Determination by court--Labeling -- Penalties) and 1992 c 5 s 2 & 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 14;
(4) RCW 9.68.070 (Prosecution for violation of RCW 9.68.060--Defense) and 1992 c 5 s 4 & 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 15;
(5) RCW 9.68.080 (Unlawful acts) and 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 16;
(6) RCW 9.68.090 (Civil liability of wholesaler or wholesaler-distributor) and 1992 c 5 s 3 & 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 17;
(7) RCW 9.68.100 (Exceptions to RCW 9.68.050 through 9.68.120) and
1969 ex.s. c 256 s 18;
(8) RCW 9.68.110 (Motion picture operator or projectionist exempt,
when) and 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 19;
(9) RCW 9.68.120 (Provisions of RCW 9.68.050 through 9.68.120
exclusive) and 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 20;
(10) RCW 9.68.130 ("Sexually explicit material" -- Defined -- Unlawful
display) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 156 s 1;
(11) RCW 9.68A.140 (Definitions) and 1987 c 396 s 1;
(12) RCW 9.68A.150 (Allowing minor on premises of live erotic
performance) and 1987 c 396 s 2; and
(13) RCW 9.68A.160 (Penalty) and 1987 c 396 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 9.68 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---