BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.30 RCW
to read as follows:
If the legislative body of an unclassified city determines that it
would serve the best interests and general welfare of such
municipality, the body may by resolution adopt any powers granted to
cities classified under Title 35A RCW including, but not limited to,
the power to define the functions, powers, and duties of its officers
and employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a majority of the legislative body of an unclassified city
determines that it would serve the best interests and general welfare
of such municipality to change the election procedures of such city to
the procedures specified in this section, such legislative body may, by
resolution, declare its intention to adopt such procedures for the
city. Such resolution must be adopted at least one hundred eighty days
before the general municipal election at which the new election
procedures are implemented. Within ten days after the passage of the
resolution, the legislative body shall cause it to be published at
least once in a newspaper of general circulation within the city.
(2) All general municipal elections in an unclassified city
adopting a resolution under subsection (1) of this section shall be
held biennially in the odd-numbered years as provided in RCW 29.13.020
and shall be held in accordance with the general election laws of the
state.
The term of the treasurer shall not commence in the same biennium
in which the term of the mayor commences. Candidates for the city
council shall run for specific council positions. The staggering of
terms of city officers shall be established at the first election,
where the simple majority of the persons elected as councilmembers
receiving the greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to four-year
terms of office and the remainder of the persons elected as
councilmembers and the treasurer shall be elected to two-year terms of
office. Thereafter, all elected city officers shall be elected for
four-year terms and until their successors are elected and qualified
and assume office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170.

--- END ---