BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.80.040 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 56 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization shall create a
transportation policy board. Transportation policy boards shall
provide policy advice to the regional transportation planning
organization and shall allow representatives of major employers within
the region, the department of transportation, transit districts, port
districts, and member cities, towns, and counties within the region to
participate in policy making. Any members of the house of
representatives or the state senate whose districts are within the
boundaries of the regional transportation planning organization are
considered ex officio, nonvoting policy board members of the regional
transportation planning organization. This does not preclude
legislators from becoming full-time, voting board members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.80 RCW
to read as follows:
When voting on matters solely affecting Washington state, a
regional transportation planning organization must obtain a majority
vote of the Washington residents serving as members of the regional
transportation planning organization before a matter may be adopted.

--- END ---