BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.80.010 and 1998 c 176 s 86 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy,
by approval of its legislative body and a majority of the registered
voters of the county voting on the proposition at a general or special
election, additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide
motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
county. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are
exempt from the county fuel excise tax. An election held under this
section must be held not more than twelve months before the date on
which the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth the
proposition shall state the tax rate that is proposed. The county's
authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section includes
the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. The
additional excise taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights
of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed
tax shall not be levied less than one month from the date the election
results are certified by the county election officer. The commencement
date for the levy of any tax under this section shall be the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(((2) Every person subject to the tax shall pay, in addition to any
other taxes provided by law, an additional excise tax to the director
of licensing at the rate levied by a county exercising its authority
under this section.))
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county shall contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the levying
county and cities contained therein the proceeds of the additional
excise taxes collected under this section, after the deductions for
payments and expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and
(((2))) (b) and under the conditions and limitations provided in RCW
82.80.080.
(((4))) (8) The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied
under this section shall be used strictly for transportation purposes
in accordance with RCW 82.80.070.
(((5) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
county fuel taxes. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as
provided by contract, for administrative, collection, refund, and audit
expenses incurred. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the
custody of the state treasurer for monthly distribution under RCW
82.80.080.))
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are
levying the tax in section 2 of this act or if they are a member of a
regional transportation investment district levying the tax in section
3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) For purposes of dedication to a regional transportation
investment district plan under chapter 36.120 RCW, subject to the
conditions of this section, a county may levy additional excise taxes
equal to ten percent of the statewide motor vehicle fuel tax rate under
RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel as defined in RCW
82.36.010 and on each gallon of special fuel as defined in RCW
82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the county. The additional
excise tax is subject to the approval of the county's legislative body
and a majority of the registered voters of the county voting on the
proposition at a general or special election. An election held under
this section must be held not more than twelve months before the date
on which the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth
the
proposition must state that the revenues from the tax will be used
for a regional transportation investment district plan. The county's
authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section includes
the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. Vehicles
paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the
county fuel excise tax. The additional excise taxes are subject to the
same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to other motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36
and 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax may not be levied less than one month
from the date the election results are certified by the county election
officer. The commencement date for the levy of any tax under this
section will be the first day of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county shall contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the county
levying the tax as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
after the deductions for payments and expenditures as provided in RCW
46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a county in this
section, to be used as a part of a regional transportation investment
plan, must be used in accordance with chapter 36.120 RCW, but only for
those areas that are considered "highway purposes" as that term is
construed in Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are a
member of a regional transportation investment district that is levying
the tax in section 3 of this act or the county is levying the tax in
RCW 82.80.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030;
(c) "District" means a regional transportation investment district
under chapter 36.120 RCW.
(2) A regional transportation investment district under chapter
36.120 RCW, subject to the conditions of this section, may levy
additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide motor
vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
district. The additional excise tax is subject to the approval of a
majority of the voters within the district boundaries. Vehicles paying
an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the
district's fuel excise tax. The additional excise taxes are subject to
the same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to other motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36
and 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax may not be levied less than one month
from the date the election results are certified. The commencement
date for the levy of any tax under this section will be the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the
first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of the
district to a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the
fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a district shall contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the district
levying the tax as part of the regional transportation investment
district plan, after the deductions for payments and expenditures as
provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a district in
this section, to be used as a part of a regional transportation
investment district plan, must be used in accordance with chapter
36.120 RCW, but only for those areas that are considered "highway
purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the
state Constitution.
(9) A district may not levy the tax in this section if a member
county is levying the tax in RCW 82.80.010 or section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.120.050 and 2002 c 56 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may, as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
recommend the imposition of some or all of the following revenue
sources, which a regional transportation investment district may impose
upon approval of the voters as provided in this chapter:
(a) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of
up to 0.5 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event in the regional transportation
investment district;
(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
district. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined
under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;
(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060 and
chapter 81.104 RCW;
(e) A local option fuel tax under section 3 of this act;
(f) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030; and
(((f))) (g) Vehicle tolls on new or reconstructed facilities.
Unless otherwise specified by law, the department shall administer the
collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities, and the state
transportation commission, or its successor, shall be the tolling
authority.
(2) Taxes, fees, and tolls may not be imposed without an
affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of
the district voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW
36.120.070. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to
implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate
entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees
authorized in this section.
(3) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes,
at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not
intended to be altered by this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.36.440 and 1991 c 173 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise, privilege,
or occupational tax upon the business of manufacturing, selling, or
distributing motor vehicle fuel, and no city, town, county, township or
other subdivision or municipal corporation of the state shall levy or
collect any excise tax upon or measured by the sale, receipt,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, except as provided in
chapter 82.80 RCW ((82.80.010)) and RCW 82.47.020.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.38.280 and 1991 c 173 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise, privilege,
or occupational tax upon the business of manufacturing, selling, or
distributing special fuel, and no city, town, county, township or other
subdivision or municipal corporation of the state shall levy or collect
any excise tax upon or measured by the sale, receipt, distribution, or
use of special fuel, except as provided in chapter 82.80 RCW
((82.80.010)) and RCW 82.47.020.

--- END ---