BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
ALTERNATIVE DELIVERY PROCEDURES FOR CONSTRUCTION SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that there is a
pressing need for additional transportation projects to meet the
mobility needs of Washington's citizens. With major new investments
approved to meet these pressing needs, additional workforce assistance
is necessary to ensure and enhance project delivery timelines.
Recruiting and retaining a high quality workforce, and implementing new
and innovative procedures for delivering these transportation projects,
is required to accomplish them on a timely basis that best serves the
public. It is the intent of sections 103 and 104 of this act that no
state employees will lose their employment as a result of implementing
new and innovative project delivery procedures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 47.28
RCW to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout section 103 of
this act and RCW 41.06.380 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Construction services" means those services that aid in the
delivery of the highway construction program and include, but are not
limited to, real estate services and construction engineering services.
(2) "Construction engineering services" include, but are not
limited to, construction management, construction administration,
materials testing, materials documentation, contractor payments and
general administration, construction oversight, and inspection and
surveying.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 47.28
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall work with
representatives of transportation labor groups to develop a financial
incentive program to aid in retention and recruitment of employee
classifications where problems exist and program delivery is negatively
affected. The department's financial incentive program must be
reviewed and approved by the legislature before it can be implemented.
This program must support the goal of enhancing project delivery
timelines as outlined in section 101 of this act. Upon receiving
approval from the legislature, the department of personnel shall
implement, as required, specific aspects of the financial incentive
package, as developed by the department of transportation.
(2) Notwithstanding chapter 41.06 RCW, the department of
transportation may acquire services from qualified private firms in
order to deliver the transportation construction program to the public.
Services may be acquired solely for augmenting the department's
workforce capacity and only when the department's transportation
construction program cannot be delivered through its existing or
readily available workforce. The department of transportation shall
work with representatives of transportation labor groups to develop and
implement a program identifying those projects requiring contracted
services while establishing a program as defined in subsection (1) of
this section to provide the classified personnel necessary to deliver
future construction programs. The procedures for acquiring
construction engineering services from private firms may not be used to
displace existing state employees nor diminish the number of existing
classified positions in the present construction program. The
acquisition procedures must be in accordance with chapter 39.80 RCW.
(3) Starting in December 2004, and biennially thereafter, the
secretary shall report to the transportation committees of the
legislature on the use of construction engineering services from
private firms authorized under this section. The information provided
to the committees must include an assessment of the benefits and costs
associated with using construction engineering services, or other
services, from private firms, and a comparison of public versus private
sector costs. The secretary may act on these findings to ensure the
most cost-effective means of service delivery.

Sec. 104 RCW 41.06.380 and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit any
department, as defined in RCW 41.06.020, from purchasing services by
contract with individuals or business entities if such services were
regularly purchased by valid contract by such department prior to April
23, 1979: PROVIDED, That no such contract may be executed or renewed
if it would have the effect of terminating classified employees or
classified employee positions existing at the time of the execution or
renewal of the contract.
(2) Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits the department of
transportation from purchasing construction services or construction
engineering services, as those terms are defined in section 102 of this
act, by contract from qualified private businesses as specified in
section 103(2) of this act.

PART II
APPRENTICESHIP AND ADJUSTMENTS TO PREVAILING WAGE PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) The legislature finds that a skilled
technical workforce is necessary for maintaining, preserving, and
improving Washington's transportation system. The Blue Ribbon
Commission on Transportation found that state and local transportation
agencies are showing signs of a workforce that is insufficiently
skilled to operate the transportation system at its highest level.
Sections 201 through 206 of this act are intended to explore methods
for fostering a stronger industry in transportation planning and
engineering.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the state prevailing
wage process operate efficiently, that the process allow contractors
and workers to be paid promptly, and that new technologies and
innovative outreach methods be used to enhance wage surveys in order to
better reflect current wages in counties across the state.
(3) The legislature finds that in order to enhance the prevailing
wage process it is appropriate for all intent and affidavit fees paid
by contractors be dedicated to the sole purpose of administering the
state prevailing wage program.
(4) To accomplish the intent of this section and in order to
enhance the response of businesses and labor representatives to the
prevailing wage survey process, the department of labor and industries
shall undertake the following activities:
(a) Establish a goal of conducting surveys for each trade every
three years;
(b) Actively promote increased response rates from all survey
recipients in every county both urban and rural. The department shall
provide public education and technical assistance to businesses, labor
representatives, and public agencies in order to promote a better
understanding of prevailing wage laws and increased participation in
the prevailing wage survey process;
(c) Actively work with businesses, labor representatives, public
agencies, and others to ensure the integrity of information used in the
development of prevailing wage rates, and ensure uniform compliance
with requirements of sections 201 through 206 of this act;
(d) Maintain a timely processing of intents and affidavits, with a
target processing time no greater than seven working days from receipt
of completed forms;
(e) Develop and implement electronic processing of intents and
affidavits and promote the efficient and effective use of technology to
improve the services provided by the prevailing wage program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 49.04
RCW to read as follows:
The apprenticeship council shall work with the department of
transportation, local transportation jurisdictions, local and statewide
joint apprenticeships, other apprenticeship programs, representatives
of labor and business organizations with interest and expertise in the
transportation workforce, and representatives of the state's
universities and community and vocational colleges to establish
technical apprenticeship opportunities specific to the needs of
transportation. The council shall issue a report of findings and
recommendations to the transportation committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2003. The report must include, but not be limited to,
findings and recommendations regarding the establishment of
transportation technical training programs within the community and
vocational college system and in the state universities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 47.01
RCW to read as follows:
The department of transportation shall work with local
transportation jurisdictions and representatives of transportation
labor groups to establish a human resources skills bank of
transportation professionals. The skills bank must be designed to
allow all transportation authorities to draw from it when needed. The
department shall issue a report of findings and recommendations to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2003. The
report must include, but not be limited to, identification of any
statutory or administrative rule changes necessary to create the skills
bank and allow it to function in the manner described.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 A new section is added to chapter 47.06
RCW to read as follows:
The state interest component of the statewide multimodal
transportation plan must include a plan for enhancing the skills of the
existing technical transportation workforce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 The department of labor and industries, in
cooperation with the department of transportation, shall conduct an
assessment of the current practices, including survey techniques, used
in setting prevailing wages for those trades related to transportation
facilities and transportation project delivery. The assessment must
include an analysis of regional variations and stratified random
sampling survey methods. A final report must be submitted to the
governor and the transportation and labor committees of the senate and
house of representatives by July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to chapter 39.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In establishing the prevailing rate of wage under RCW
39.12.010, 39.12.015, and 39.12.020, all data collected by the
department may be used only in the county for which the work was
performed.
(2) This section applies only to prevailing wage surveys initiated
on or after August 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 The sum of one hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the public
works administration account to the department of labor and industries
for the biennium ending June 30, 2005, to carry out the purposes of
sections 201, 205, and 206 of this act.

PART III
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING AND EFFICIENCY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The legislature finds that roads, streets,
bridges, and highways in the state represent public assets worth over
one hundred billion dollars. These investments require regular
maintenance and preservation, or rehabilitation, to provide cost-effective transportation services. Many of these facilities are in
poor condition. Given the magnitude of public investment and the
importance of safe, reliable roadways to the motoring public, the
legislature intends to create stronger accountability to ensure that
cost-effective maintenance and preservation is provided for these
transportation facilities.

Sec. 302 RCW 35.84.060 and 1969 ex.s. c 281 s 26 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every municipal corporation which owns or operates an urban public
transportation system as defined in RCW 47.04.082 within its corporate
limits((,)) may acquire, construct, extend, own, or operate such urban
public transportation system to any point or points not to exceed
fifteen miles outside of its corporate limits: PROVIDED, That no
municipal corporation shall extend its urban public transportation
system beyond its corporate limits to operate in any territory already
served by a privately operated auto transportation company holding a
certificate of public convenience and necessity from the utilities and
transportation commission.
As a condition of receiving state funding, the municipal
corporation shall submit a maintenance management plan for
certification by the transportation commission or its successor entity.
The plan must inventory all transportation system assets within the
direction and control of the municipality, and provide a preservation
plan based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 36.56
RCW to read as follows:
As a condition of receiving state funding, a county that has
assumed the transportation functions of a metropolitan municipal
corporation shall submit a maintenance and preservation management plan
for certification by the transportation commission or its successor
entity. The plan must inventory all transportation system assets
within the direction and control of the county, and provide a
preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 36.57A
RCW to read as follows:
As a condition of receiving state funding, a public transportation
benefit area authority shall submit a maintenance and preservation
management plan for certification by the transportation commission or
its successor entity. The plan must inventory all transportation
system assets within the direction and control of the authority, and
provide a preservation plan based on lowest life cycle cost
methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to chapter 46.68
RCW to read as follows:
During the 2003-2005 biennium, cities and towns shall provide to
the transportation commission, or its successor entity, preservation
rating information on at least seventy percent of the total city and
town arterial network. Thereafter, the preservation rating information
requirement shall increase in five percent increments in subsequent
biennia. The rating system used by cities and towns must be based upon
the Washington state pavement rating method or an equivalent standard
approved by the transportation commission or its successor entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 A new section is added to chapter 81.112
RCW to read as follows:
As a condition of receiving state funding, a regional transit
authority shall submit a maintenance and preservation management plan
for certification by the transportation commission or its successor
entity. The plan must inventory all transportation system assets
within the direction and control of the transit authority, and provide
a plan for preservation of assets based on lowest life cycle cost
methodologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 A new section is added to chapter 36.78
RCW to read as follows:
The county road administration board, or its successor entity,
shall establish a standard of good practice for maintenance of
transportation system assets. This standard must be implemented by all
counties no later than December 31, 2007. The board shall develop a
model maintenance management system for use by counties. The board
shall develop rules to assist the counties in the implementation of
this system. Counties shall annually submit their maintenance plans to
the board. The board shall compile the county data regarding
maintenance management and annually submit it to the transportation
commission or its successor entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 Part headings used in this act are not
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---