BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recent studies
show a powerful relationship between postsecondary education and an
increase in lifetime earned income. Even two years of college can
equate to a quarter of a million dollar increase in lifetime income.
A bachelor's degree can boost annual income seventy-three percent,
compared to a high school degree. In addition, studies indicate that
for individuals attending college, there is a correlation with improved
health status, increased civic participation, improved savings rates,
less reliance on government assistance, and improved quality of life
for their children. Additionally, this correlates to increased tax
revenues and reduced crime rates for society. The legislature finds
that some welfare recipients could qualify for college admission and
benefit from completion of their higher education at a community,
trade, or technical college, or other institution of higher education.
The federal government has specifically encouraged creative
approaches to higher education for welfare recipients, and several
other states have enacted legislation to this end. Even in a
recession, there is a shortage of skilled workers. An estimated
thirty-three thousand six hundred ninety-three firms had difficulty
finding applicants with vocational certificates or degrees. Among
Washington employers looking to hire workers with postsecondary
vocational training, eighty-three percent reported difficulty finding
qualified applicants. The shortage of skilled workers negatively
impacts Washington's economy, lowering output and sales, and reducing
the quality of their products and services. The shortage of skilled
workers in high-demand fields is particularly acute and skill
requirements and workforce shortages are expected to continue to
increase. In 2001, Washington hospitals reported a shortage of two
thousand registered nurses, and fifty-five percent of emergency
departments turned away patients because they did not have enough
staff. In order to close the postsecondary skills gap, Washington will
need significantly more advanced workers in the coming months and
years. Therefore, enabling welfare clients to achieve their
educational goals will help solve this problem.
In 1999, the federal government adopted final regulations for
temporary assistance for needy families, allowing expanded use of block
grant and maintenance of effort funds. These funds can be used
creatively for a variety of special approaches, to help poor families
achieve true financial independence.
The legislature intends to provide access to postsecondary
education for qualified adult recipients of temporary assistance for
needy families, while maintaining the emphasis on employment that is
the hallmark of the WorkFirst program. The legislature intends to
provide temporary assistance for needy families grants, including
working connections child care and tuition assistance, to college-qualified individuals, with the goal of providing a means for highly
motivated welfare recipients to complete college, exit assistance, and
secure careers to benefit themselves, their families, and society.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2
through 9 and 11 of this act.
(1) "HELP program" means the higher education for lifelong progress
program.
(2) "Institution of higher education" means the state research
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
the community colleges, the technical colleges, and private career
schools, colleges, and universities.
(3) "State board" means the state board for community and technical
colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department shall establish the HELP
program. The goal of the program is to help college-qualified parents
who have dependent children, who are in need and are eligible for
temporary assistance for needy families, receive up to two years of
undergraduate education or training. To the extent that funds are
specifically appropriated for this purpose up to a maximum enrollment
of six hundred, the department shall provide parents accepted into or
enrolled at an institution of higher education in Washington state with
assistance that includes their temporary assistance for needy families
cash grants, as well as the other support services provided to
recipients of temporary assistance for needy families, including but
not limited to medical assistance, working connections child care, food
stamps, tuition assistance based upon actual tuition or public higher
education tuition rates, whichever is less, and other support services.
The department may facilitate access to Pell grants and state need
grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Families that qualify for temporary
assistance for needy families under this chapter may participate in the
HELP program as a countable work activity of the temporary assistance
for needy families program. Eligibility for assistance and the amount
of assistance shall be determined under criteria used in the temporary
assistance for needy families program. Because participation in the
HELP program satisfies the countable work activity requirement, the
department shall not impose an additional work requirement upon HELP
participants.
(2) To the extent that funds and participant slots are available,
enrollment in the program shall be granted by the department if the
applicant intends to pursue higher education in a program, including
the necessary prerequisites, that is likely to result in employment in
a field designated by the state board as high-wage/high-demand, as
posted on the state board's web site.
(3) The state board shall develop a list of programs designated as
high-wage/high-demand for each region of the state that takes into
account regional variations in the local labor market and shall post
the lists on its web site. The state board shall review and update
these lists annually.
(4) Students receiving assistance under this section shall meet the
following requirements:
(a) They must be accepted into a postsecondary program;
(b) They must be enrolled full time, with the expectation that they
make satisfactory progress toward a degree, certificate, or license in
a high-wage/high-demand field as defined by lists prepared by the state
board. Satisfactory progress may be defined by the standards of the
institution of higher education where the student is enrolled; and
(c) They must meet the requirements for the state need grant under
RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.820.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department shall recommend that
applicants obtain career planning and counseling services from their
educational institutions to assist them in choosing an educational plan
that is likely to lead to self-sufficiency, and shall provide to
students who have begun an educational program assistance to overcome
barriers to completing the program and becoming employed. The
department may work with other state, local, and private entities to
provide the planning and counseling services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall inform all persons
applying for or participating in the temporary assistance for needy
families program of the option to apply for the HELP program and the
criteria for acceptance. Recipients of temporary assistance for needy
families who have already partially completed their postsecondary
education are encouraged to apply and shall be given priority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 To the extent permitted by federal law,
assistance received under sections 2 through 9 of this act must be
disregarded as income and excluded as a resource or asset to the same
extent as assistance under the temporary assistance for needy families
program under this chapter, for the purposes of any state, federal,
tribal, or municipal assistance program. Assistance received under
sections 2 through 9 of this act must be treated in the same manner as
assistance received under the temporary assistance for needy families
program under this chapter for all tax purposes. The department shall
implement the program so participants qualify for food stamps until
completion of their degree or certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department shall contract with the
Washington state institute for public policy for the performance of an
outcome study of HELP program participants. The study shall, at a
minimum:
(a) Track degree or certificate completion by participants;
(b) Report on wage progression of participants;
(c) Report on the program's dropout rate, including temporary
assistance for needy families' recidivism;
(d) Quantify the projected increase in lifetime earnings of program
graduates; and
(e) Report on self-identified enhancers and barriers to success in
postsecondary education experience by the study population.
(2) The results of the outcome study shall be reported annually, no
later than January 15th, beginning in 2005, to the governor and to the
appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Participation in the HELP program shall be
incorporated in the recipient's individual personal responsibility
plan, in a manner that clearly indicates that satisfactory progress in
college is the recipient's temporary assistance for needy families work
activity and responsibility.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.08A.250 and 2000 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
chapter, "work activity" means:
(1) Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;
(2) Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector,
including employment through the state or federal work-study program
for a period not to exceed twenty-four months;
(3) Work experience, including:
(a) An internship or practicum, that is paid or unpaid and is
required to complete a course of vocational training or to obtain a
license or certificate in a high demand field, as determined by the
((employment security department)) state board for community and
technical colleges. No internship or practicum shall exceed twelve
months; or
(b) Work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted
housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;
(4) On-the-job training;
(5) Job search and job readiness assistance;
(6) Community service programs;
(7) Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months
with respect to any individual;
(8) Job skills training directly related to employment;
(9) Education directly related to employment, in the case of a
recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a GED;
(10) Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of
study leading to a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not
completed secondary school or received such a certificate;
(11) The provision of child care services to an individual who is
participating in a community service program;
(12) Internships, that shall be paid or unpaid work experience
performed by an intern in a business, industry, or government or
nongovernmental agency setting;
(13) Practicums, which include any educational program in which a
student is working under the close supervision of a professional in an
agency, clinic, or other professional practice setting for purposes of
advancing their skills and knowledge; ((and))
(14) Services required by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and
74.08A.010(3) to become employable; and
(15) Participation in the higher education for lifelong progress
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The department and the state board shall
adopt rules to implement sections 2 through 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 2 through 9 and 11 of this act are
each added to chapter 74.08A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---