BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.22.060 and 1998 c 245 s 172 are each amended to
read as follows:
((By December 31, 1993, the department of ecology shall, in
cooperation with the Indian tribes, and the department of fish and
wildlife, establish a statewide list of priorities for evaluation of
instream flows. In establishing these priorities, the department shall
consider the achievement of wild salmonid production as its primary
goal.)) (1) The purpose of this section is to specify the priorities to
be used in establishing instream flows under RCW 90.22.010 and
90.54.020. Instream flows shall be established in rule for all
mainstem rivers and primary tributaries of the state by the year 2010.
The department of ecology, in close cooperation with the department of
fish and wildlife, must pursue achievement of this goal as a matter of
high priority. In developing and implementing the work plan required
under subsection (2) of this section, priority shall be given to
establishing instream flow rules in:
(a) Water resource inventory areas numbers 1, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 12,
17, 18, 32, 35, 37, 38, 39, 45, 48, and 49 as those areas are
established in chapter 173-500 WAC as it exists on the effective date
of this section; and
(b) Water resource inventory areas that are conducting planning
under chapter 90.82 RCW as of the effective date of this section.
(2) By December 2003, the department, in consultation with the
department of fish and wildlife and with affected tribal governments,
planning units under chapter 90.82 RCW, and local governments, shall
publish a work plan that identifies where and when instream flows will
be developed and adopted by rule in order to achieve the goals in this
section. The work plan must also define tributary areas where flows
should be addressed and provide a schedule for prioritizing,
recommending, and setting flows in these areas, as appropriate. This
work plan must be updated annually. By December 31st of each odd-numbered year, the department shall prepare a report on progress in
implementing the work plan for the previous biennium.
The department, in consultation with the department of fish and
wildlife and with affected tribal governments, planning units under
chapter 90.82 RCW, and local governments, shall develop and publish
strategies for achieving flows that satisfy the flow requirements of
the instream flow rules including, but not limited to, an
identification of priorities for the use of state resources to achieve
the flows. The strategies shall identify means of measuring whether
progress toward achieving instream flow requirements and overcoming
other limiting factors identified for streams is being made, and the
actions that will be taken if such progress is not being made for a
stream. For a water resource inventory area in which watershed
planning is conducted under chapter 90.82 RCW and for which the
planning unit has elected to recommend instream flows, the strategies
shall be those contained in the plan developed under chapter 90.82 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.22.010 and 1997 c 32 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ecology ((may)) shall establish ((minimum))
instream water flows or levels for the state's major rivers, streams,
lakes, or other public waters ((for the purposes of protecting fish,
game, birds or other wildlife resources, or recreational or aesthetic
values of said public waters whenever it appears to be in the public
interest to establish the same. In addition, the department of ecology
shall, when requested by the department of fish and wildlife to protect
fish, game or other wildlife resources under the jurisdiction of the
requesting state agency, or if the department of ecology finds it
necessary to preserve water quality, establish such minimum flows or
levels as are required to protect the resource or preserve the water
quality described in the request or determination. Any request
submitted by the department of fish and wildlife shall include a
statement setting forth the need for establishing a minimum flow or
level. When the department acts to preserve water quality, it shall
include a similar statement with the proposed rule filed with the code
reviser. This section shall not apply to waters artificially stored in
reservoirs, provided that in the granting of storage permits by the
department of ecology in the future, full recognition shall be given to
downstream minimum flows, if any there may be, which have theretofore
been established hereunder)) consistent with the standards and
procedures of this section and RCW 90.54.020.
(2) Instream flows shall be established to protect the full range
of applicable instream interests and values, including fish and
wildlife habitat, water quality, navigation, and scenic, aesthetic, and
environmental quality values. In establishing instream flows, the
department shall seek to fulfill instream interests and values based
upon both state and federal laws and federal treaties. Instream flows
should be established with the objective of being achievable a majority
of the time, recognizing seasonal variation, when based upon
hydrological records of natural flow conditions. On streams or stream
reaches where fish populations are the predominant consideration,
instream flows shall be established sufficient to support the
biological needs of fish at all life stages with the objective of
achieving sustainable and harvestable levels of fish.
(3) A higher instream flow may be established where recommended by
an approved watershed plan under chapter 90.82 RCW or other similar
comprehensive planning process. In considering whether to adopt or
recommend a higher instream flow, the department and watershed planning
units shall be guided by the allocation policies declared in RCW
90.54.020, including application of the maximum net benefits standard
to alternative uses of water for instream and offstream purposes.
(4) Where consistent with the requirements of subsection (2) of
this section and RCW 90.54.020, instream flow rules must incorporate an
instream flow component established by:
(a) The conditions for a license issued by the federal energy
regulatory commission after May 1994, for a hydroelectric power
generating facility, where the department of ecology with the agreement
of the department of fish and wildlife has approved or otherwise
formally acknowledged the instream flow component on behalf of the
state;
(b) The conditions established under a habitat conservation plan
approved under the federal endangered species act, where the department
of ecology with the agreement of the department of fish and wildlife
has approved or otherwise formally acknowledged the instream flow
component on behalf of the state; and
(c) The federal Yakima river basin water enhancement project
pursuant to Public Law 103-434.
(5) In establishing instream flows, the department shall use the
best available scientific information. When adequate information is
not available for a lake, stream, or stream reach and may not be
obtainable in a timely manner, an instream flow shall be established
that places the least risk upon jeopardizing the protection of instream
values, with the objective of reviewing and potentially revising the
level when adequate information becomes available. In developing and
selecting methodologies for use in establishing flows or levels for the
recovery of fish populations, and in developing criteria to select
methods to apply in each situation, the department shall consult with
the department of fish and wildlife, Indian tribes, and the science
panel created under RCW 77.85.040, and shall consult periodically with
them in updating methodologies. The department may select from among
several acceptable methodologies for a specific stream or lake, based
upon considerations such as fish species of principal concern,
available funding and staffing, the depletion of stream flows, and the
safety of personnel conducting the evaluation.
(6) The department shall apply a scientific-based adaptive
management process following the adoption of instream flow rules. This
shall include periodic review of hydrological, biological, and other
information regarding the level of protection of instream resources and
values, regular monitoring, and assessment consistent with the rule
implementation plan required under section 4 of this act, a scientific
and peer review process, and revision of adopted rules based upon new
information and analysis when appropriate to better achieve the level
of protection required by this section and RCW 90.54.020.
(7) In establishing instream flows, the department shall accord
substantial weight to the recommendations of a planning unit making a
timely recommendation for that lake, stream, stream reach, or other
public body of water as part of an approved watershed plan under
chapter 90.82 RCW. Where fish populations are a principal instream
value in establishing the instream flow, the department shall accord
substantial weight to the recommendations of the department of fish and
wildlife and Indian tribes with a treaty-based fishery right in the
water body, and shall provide a written explanation of any departure
from such recommendations.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.54.020 and 1997 c 442 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
Utilization and management of the waters of the state shall be
guided by the following general declaration of fundamentals:
(1) Uses of water for domestic, stock watering, industrial,
commercial, agricultural, irrigation, hydroelectric power production,
mining, fish and wildlife maintenance and enhancement, recreational,
and thermal power production purposes, and preservation of
environmental and aesthetic values, and all other uses compatible with
the enjoyment of the public waters of the state, are declared to be
beneficial.
(2) Allocation of waters among potential uses and users shall be
based generally on the securing of the maximum net benefits for the
people of the state. Maximum net benefits shall constitute total
benefits less costs including opportunities lost.
(3) The quality of the natural environment shall be protected and,
where possible, enhanced as follows:
(a) ((Perennial rivers and streams of the state shall be retained
with base flows necessary to provide for preservation of wildlife,
fish, scenic, aesthetic and other environmental values, and
navigational values)) Flows in the state's perennial rivers and streams
shall be managed to protect the full range of applicable instream
interests and values, including fish and wildlife habitat, water
quality, navigation, and scenic, aesthetic, and environmental quality
values. Regulatory instream flows shall be established pursuant to RCW
90.22.010. Lakes and ponds shall be retained substantially in their
natural condition. Withdrawals of water or the establishment of
regulatory instream flows which would conflict ((therewith)) with the
level of protection required by this subsection shall be authorized
only in those situations where ((it is clear that overriding
considerations of the public interest will be served)):
(i) It is necessary to meet emergency public health or safety
needs; or
(ii) It is necessary to meet emergency economic needs that are
regionwide, where full mitigation is provided for lowering flows or
levels critical for the survival of critical or depressed fish
populations; and
(iii) The authorized uses or exceptions to established regulatory
flows are of limited duration.
(b) Waters of the state shall be of high quality. Regardless of
the quality of the waters of the state, all wastes and other materials
and substances proposed for entry into said waters shall be provided
with all known, available, and reasonable methods of treatment prior to
entry. Notwithstanding that standards of quality established for the
waters of the state would not be violated, wastes and other materials
and substances shall not be allowed to enter such waters which will
reduce the existing quality thereof, except in those situations where
it is clear that overriding considerations of the public interest will
be served. Technology-based effluent limitations or standards for
discharges for municipal water treatment plants located on the
Chehalis, Columbia, Cowlitz, Lewis, or Skagit river shall be adjusted
to reflect credit for substances removed from the plant intake water
if:
(i) The municipality demonstrates that the intake water is drawn
from the same body of water into which the discharge is made; and
(ii) The municipality demonstrates that no violation of receiving
water quality standards or appreciable environmental degradation will
result.
(4) The development of multipurpose water storage facilities shall
be a high priority for programs of water allocation, planning,
management, and efficiency. The department, other state agencies,
local governments, and planning units formed under section 107 or 108
((of this act)), chapter 442, Laws of 1997 shall evaluate the potential
for the development of new storage projects and the benefits and
effects of storage in reducing damage to stream banks and property,
increasing the use of land, providing water for municipal, industrial,
agricultural, power generation, and other beneficial uses, and
improving stream flow regimes for fisheries and other instream uses.
(5) Adequate and safe supplies of water shall be preserved and
protected in potable condition to satisfy human domestic needs.
(6) Multiple-purpose impoundment structures are to be preferred
over single-purpose structures. Due regard shall be given to means and
methods for protection of fishery resources in the planning for and
construction of water impoundment structures and other artificial
obstructions.
(7) Federal, state, and local governments, individuals,
corporations, groups and other entities shall be encouraged to carry
out practices of conservation as they relate to the use of the waters
of the state. In addition to traditional development approaches,
improved water use efficiency and conservation shall be emphasized in
the management of the state's water resources and in some cases will be
a potential new source of water with which to meet future needs
throughout the state.
(8) Development of water supply systems, whether publicly or
privately owned, which provide water to the public generally in
regional areas within the state shall be encouraged. Development of
water supply systems for multiple domestic use which will not serve the
public generally shall be discouraged where water supplies are
available from water systems serving the public.
(9) Full recognition shall be given in the administration of water
allocation and use programs to the natural interrelationships of
surface and ground waters.
(10) Expressions of the public interest will be sought at all
stages of water planning and allocation discussions.
(11) Water management programs, including but not limited to, water
quality, flood control, drainage, erosion control and storm runoff are
deemed to be in the public interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.22 RCW
to read as follows:
Within one year of adopting an instream flow or level rule, the
department of ecology shall adopt an implementation plan describing
actions needed to protect flows or levels subject to the rule. The
plan provisions shall include but are not limited to:
(1) Needed flow gauges or other measuring methods on key stream
reaches;
(2) Roles and responsibilities of the department and the department
of fish and wildlife in protecting the flows or restoring flows;
(3) Enforcement of the flows against unauthorized withdrawals; and
(4) Performance measures and assessment of the level of protection
of instream resources and values, to assist with the periodic review
required by RCW 90.22.010.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.03.345 and 1979 ex.s. c 216 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The establishment of reservations of water for agriculture,
hydroelectric energy, municipal, industrial, and other beneficial uses
under RCW 90.54.050(1) or ((minimum)) instream flows or levels under
RCW 90.22.010 or 90.54.040 shall constitute appropriations within the
meaning of this chapter with priority dates as of the ((effective dates
of their establishment)) date of filing of notice of rule making under
RCW 34.05.320. Whenever an application for a permit to make beneficial
use of public waters embodied in a reservation, established after
September 1, 1979, is filed with the department of ecology after the
effective date of such reservation, the priority date for a permit
issued pursuant to an approval by the department of ecology of the
application shall be the effective date of the reservation.
(2) No later than October 1, 2003, the department shall adopt a
protocol applicable to the processing of applications for new water
withdrawals and applications for changes or transfers, for the
consideration of the impact of the proposed change or transfers upon
the flows subject to the instream flows during the period between the
establishment of a priority date as determined under RCW 90.82.080(2)
and the adoption of a final instream flow rule.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.55.050 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the policy of this state that a flow of water sufficient to
support game fish and food fish populations be maintained at all times
in the streams of this state.
The director of ecology shall promptly give the director notice of
each filing application for a permit to divert or store water and of
each application for a change or transfer of a water right. The
director has thirty days after receiving the notice to state his or her
objections to the application and of any proposed conditions on
approval of the application for the protection of flows sufficient to
support fish populations. The permit shall not be issued until the
thirty-day period has elapsed. The directors of ecology and fish and
wildlife shall jointly develop an interagency agreement providing
procedures for consultation on filings regarding water bodies that
provide habitat for critical or depressed fish stocks, including
provisions allowing predecisional review and comment by the director of
the department of fish and wildlife upon the department of ecology's
proposed decisions on applications that may adversely affect water
bodies whose flows or levels are a limiting factor in the recovery of
fish species listed or proposed for listing under the federal
endangered species act or determined by the department of fish and
wildlife to be depressed or critical.
The director of ecology may refuse to issue a permit if, in the
opinion of the director, issuing the permit might result in lowering
the flow of water in a stream below the flow ((necessary to
adequately)) sufficient to support food fish and game fish populations
in the stream.
The provisions of this section shall in no way affect existing
water rights.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.03.290 and 2001 c 239 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When an application complying with the provisions of this
chapter and with the rules of the department has been filed, the same
shall be placed on record with the department, and it shall be its duty
to investigate the application, and determine what water, if any, is
available for appropriation, and find and determine to what beneficial
use or uses it can be applied. If it is proposed to appropriate water
for irrigation purposes, the department shall investigate, determine
and find what lands are capable of irrigation by means of water found
available for appropriation. If it is proposed to appropriate water
for the purpose of power development, the department shall investigate,
determine and find whether the proposed development is likely to prove
detrimental to the public interest, having in mind the highest feasible
use of the waters belonging to the public.
(2)(a) If the application does not contain, and the applicant does
not promptly furnish sufficient information on which to base such
findings, the department may issue a preliminary permit, for a period
of not to exceed three years, requiring the applicant to make such
surveys, investigations, studies, and progress reports, as in the
opinion of the department may be necessary. If the applicant fails to
comply with the conditions of the preliminary permit, it and the
application or applications on which it is based shall be automatically
canceled and the applicant so notified. If the holder of a preliminary
permit shall, before its expiration, file with the department a
verified report of expenditures made and work done under the
preliminary permit, which, in the opinion of the department,
establishes the good faith, intent, and ability of the applicant to
carry on the proposed development, the preliminary permit may, with the
approval of the governor, be extended, but not to exceed a maximum
period of five years from the date of the issuance of the preliminary
permit.
(b) For any application for which a preliminary permit was issued
and for which the availability of water was directly affected by a
moratorium on further diversions from the Columbia river during the
years from 1990 to 1998, the preliminary permit is extended through
June 30, 2002. If such an application and preliminary permit were
canceled during the moratorium, the application and preliminary permit
shall be reinstated until June 30, 2002, if the application and permit:
(i) Are for providing regional water supplies in more than one urban
growth area designated under chapter 36.70A RCW and in one or more
areas near such urban growth areas, or the application and permit are
modified for providing such supplies, and (ii) provide or are modified
to provide such regional supplies through the use of existing intake or
diversion structures. The authority to modify such a canceled
application and permit to accomplish the objectives of (b)(i) and (ii)
of this subsection is hereby granted.
(3) The department shall make and file as part of the record in the
matter, written findings of fact concerning all things investigated,
and if it shall find that there is water available for appropriation
for a beneficial use, and the appropriation thereof as proposed in the
application will not impair existing rights or be detrimental to the
public welfare, it shall issue a permit stating the amount of water to
which the applicant shall be entitled and the beneficial use or uses to
which it may be applied: PROVIDED, That where the water applied for is
to be used for irrigation purposes, it shall become appurtenant only to
such land as may be reclaimed thereby to the full extent of the soil
for agricultural purposes. But where:
(a) There is no unappropriated water in the proposed source of
supply((,)); or ((where))
(b) The water source is a stream or lake for which the best
available measuring records or other information indicates that during
a majority of the time on a seasonal basis over the previous ten years
the stream flows or lake levels have been lower than established
instream flows or a flow or level adopted for purposes of review of the
application in the absence of an established instream flow rule; or
(c) The proposed use conflicts with existing rights((,)); or
(d) The proposed use threatens to prove detrimental to the public
interest, having due regard to the highest feasible development of the
use of the waters belonging to the public, it shall be duty of the
department to reject such application and to refuse to issue the permit
asked for.
(4) If the permit is refused because of conflict with existing
rights and such applicant shall acquire same by purchase or
condemnation under RCW 90.03.040, the department may thereupon grant
such permit. Any application may be approved for a less amount of
water than that applied for, if there exists substantial reason
therefor, and in any event shall not be approved for more water than
can be applied to beneficial use for the purposes named in the
application. In determining whether or not a permit shall issue upon
any application, it shall be the duty of the department to investigate
all facts relevant and material to the application. After the
department approves said application in whole or in part and before any
permit shall be issued thereon to the applicant, such applicant shall
pay the fee provided in RCW 90.03.470: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the
event a permit is issued by the department upon any application, it
shall be its duty to notify the director of fish and wildlife of such
issuance.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.54.050 and 1997 c 439 s 2 and 1997 c 32 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In conjunction with the programs provided for in RCW
90.54.040(1), whenever it appears necessary to the director in carrying
out the policy of this chapter, the department may by rule adopted
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW((:
(1))) reserve and set aside waters for beneficial utilization in
the future((, and)).
(2) When sufficient information and data are lacking to allow for
the making of sound decisions, the department may withdraw various
waters of the state from additional appropriations until such data and
information are available. Before proposing the adoption of rules to
withdraw waters of the state from additional appropriation under this
subsection, the department shall consult with the standing committees
of the house of representatives and the senate having jurisdiction over
water resource management issues.
(3) Whenever the department determines based upon measuring records
or other information that flows or levels have been lower than
established instream flows or levels adopted under chapter 90.22 RCW a
majority of the time on a seasonal basis over the previous ten years,
or that authorizing additional appropriations may adversely affect
achieving such flows or levels, the department shall adopt a rule
withdrawing the water body from additional appropriation. Such a rule
shall remain in effect until repealed by the department based upon a
determination that flow protection measures, reduced withdrawals, or
other actions indicate that additional appropriations may be authorized
without adversely affecting established instream flows or levels.
(4) Prior to the adoption of a rule under this section, the
department shall conduct a public hearing in each county in which
waters relating to the rule are located. The public hearing shall be
preceded by a notice placed in a newspaper of general circulation
published within each of said counties. Rules adopted hereunder shall
be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of RCW
34.05.240.

--- END ---