BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that athletic
courts, community centers, schools, and parks are important activity
centers to Washington's youth. These activity centers provide
opportunities for youth in Washington to grow academically as well as
athletically. It further recognizes the need for preserving basketball
courts in our parks, schools, and community centers. To aid
communities in maintaining and creating valuable youth programs
designed to promote fitness and education for Washington youth, a
"Sonics and Storm T.E.A.M. Foundation" license plate is established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Sonics and Storm T.E.A.M Foundation license plates" means license
plates that display a symbol of the sponsor of the Sonics and Storm
T.E.A.M. Foundation, a charitable organization that aids communities in
promoting fitness and educational opportunities for youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
In cooperation with the Washington state patrol and the department,
the sponsor of the Sonics and Storm T.E.A.M. Foundation license plates
shall create and design, and the department shall issue, a special
license plate that may be used in lieu of regular or personalized
license plates for motor vehicles required to display two motor vehicle
license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW,
upon terms and conditions established by the department. The special
license plates will commemorate the Sonics and Storm T.E.A.M.
Foundation and their goal to enrich communities by supporting
educational and athletic opportunities for Washington's youth.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed
thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to
become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no
more than forty dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees
required to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have
been requested. All such additional special license plate fees
collected by the department shall be deposited in the state treasury
and credited to the motor vehicle fund.
(2) ((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder
of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(((4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(((5))) (4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(((6) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
Sonics and Storm T.E.A.M. Foundation license plate shall pay an initial
fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit
the proceeds to the Sonics and Storm T.E.A.M. Foundation license plate
account established under section 6 of this act.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a Sonics and
Storm T.E.A.M. Foundation license plate shall, upon application, pay a
fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to
exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit
the funds to the Sonics and Storm T.E.A.M. Foundation license plate
account established under section 6 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates under section 3 of this act or RCW 46.16.301 as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, sells,
trades, or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the vehicle
upon which the special license plate or plates have been displayed, he
or she shall immediately report the transfer of such plate or plates to
an acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such plates pursuant to
departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such plates to the
department immediately if such surrender is required by departmental
rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or plates to
another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars shall be
charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such transfer fees
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to surrender the
plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Sonics and Storm T.E.A.M. Foundation license plate account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts, except
as provided in RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7), from the Sonics and Storm
T.E.A.M. Foundation license plates must be deposited into the account.
Only the director of the department or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.
(2) Funds in the account must be disbursed subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The director of the department or the director's designee may
disburse the funds solely for the purpose of contracting with a
qualified nonprofit organization to provide programs dedicated to: (i)
Improving local youth athletic opportunities, especially those focused
on the sport of basketball; and (ii) preserving valuable community
basketball courts in community centers, schools, and parks.
(b) For purposes of this section, a "qualified nonprofit
organization" means a not-for-profit corporation incorporated and
operating exclusively in Washington that has received a determination
of tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the Federal Internal
Revenue Code. The organization must have been established for the
express purpose of providing athletic opportunities to youth and
preserving valuable community basketball courts in schools, parks, and
community centers.
(c) Disbursements must be made quarterly beginning with the quarter
following such time as the department has recovered its development
costs.
(d) Beginning January 31, 2005, the designated nonprofit
organization shall prepare and submit to the department an annual
independent audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report
detailing the nonprofit organization's expenditure of the funds from
the account created in subsection (1) of this section.
(e) Disbursement of these funds from the account to the nonprofit
organization is contingent upon the organization meeting all reporting
and review requirements as specified under (d) of this subsection.
(f) No portion of any funds disbursed under this section may be
used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence: (A) The passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by a county,
city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington,
or by the Congress; or (B) the adoption or rejection of any rule,
standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

--- END ---