BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.320 and 1995 c 403 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At least twenty days before the rule-making hearing at which
the agency receives public comment regarding adoption of a rule, the
agency shall cause notice of the hearing to be published in the state
register. The publication constitutes the proposal of a rule. The
notice shall include all of the following:
(a) A title, a description of the rule's purpose, and any other
information which may be of assistance in identifying the rule or its
purpose;
(b) Citations of the statutory authority for adopting the rule and
the specific statute the rule is intended to implement;
(c) A summary of the rule and a statement of the reasons supporting
the proposed action;
(d) The agency personnel, with their office location and telephone
number, who are responsible for the drafting, implementation, and
enforcement of the rule;
(e) The name of the person or organization, whether private,
public, or governmental, proposing the rule;
(f) Agency comments or recommendations, if any, regarding statutory
language, implementation, enforcement, and fiscal matters pertaining to
the rule;
(g) Whether the rule is necessary as the result of federal law or
federal or state court action, and if so, a copy of such law or court
decision shall be attached to the purpose statement;
(h) When, where, and how persons may present their views on the
proposed rule;
(i) The date on which the agency intends to adopt the rule;
(j) A short explanation of the rule, its purpose, and anticipated
effects, including in the case of a proposal that would modify existing
rules, a short description of the changes the proposal would make;
(k) A copy of the small business economic impact statement prepared
under chapter 19.85 RCW, or an explanation for why the agency did not
prepare the statement; ((and))
(l) A statement indicating whether RCW 34.05.328 applies to the
rule adoption; and
(m) If RCW 34.05.328 does apply, a statement indicating that a copy
of the preliminary cost-benefit analysis described in RCW
34.05.328(1)(c) is available.
(2) Upon filing notice of the proposed rule with the code reviser,
the adopting agency shall have copies of the notice on file and
available for public inspection and shall forward three copies of the
notice to the rules review committee.
(3) No later than three days after its publication in the state
register, the agency shall cause a copy of the notice of proposed rule
adoption to be mailed to each person, city, and county that has made a
request to the agency for a mailed copy of such notices. An agency may
charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting party mailed
copies of these notices.
(4) In addition to the notice required by subsections (1) and (2)
of this section, an institution of higher education shall cause the
notice to be published in the campus or standard newspaper of the
institution at least seven days before the rule-making hearing.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.328 and 1997 c 430 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall:
(a) Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific
objectives of the statute that the rule implements;
(b) Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and
analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not
adopting the rule;
(c) Provide notification in the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320 that a preliminary cost-benefit analysis is
available. The preliminary cost-benefit analysis must fulfill the
requirements of the cost-benefit analysis under (d) of this subsection.
If the agency files a supplemental notice under RCW 34.05.340, the
supplemental notice shall include notification that a revised
preliminary cost-benefit analysis is available. A final cost-benefit
analysis shall be available when the rule is adopted under RCW
34.05.360;
(d) Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater
than its probable costs, taking into account both the qualitative and
quantitative benefits and costs and the specific directives of the
statute being implemented;
(((d))) (e) Determine, after considering alternative versions of
the rule and the analysis required under (b) ((and)), (c), and (d) of
this subsection, that the rule being adopted is the least burdensome
alternative for those required to comply with it that will achieve the
general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this
subsection;
(((e))) (f) Determine that the rule does not require those to whom
it applies to take an action that violates requirements of another
federal or state law;
(((f))) (g) Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent
performance requirements on private entities than on public entities
unless required to do so by federal or state law;
(((g))) (h) Determine if the rule differs from any federal
regulation or statute applicable to the same activity or subject matter
and, if so, determine that the difference is justified by the
following:
(i) A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ
from federal standards; or
(ii) Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of
this subsection; and
(((h))) (i) Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable,
with other federal, state, and local laws applicable to the same
activity or subject matter.
(2) In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b)
through (((g))) (h) of this section, the agency shall place in the
rule-making file documentation of sufficient quantity and quality so as
to persuade a reasonable person that the determinations are justified.
(3) Before adopting rules described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall place in the rule-making file a rule
implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting order. The
plan shall describe how the agency intends to:
(a) Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the
resources the agency intends to use;
(b) Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;
(c) Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and
(d) Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was
adopted, including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of
interim milestones to assess progress and the use of objectively
measurable outcomes.
(4) After adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section regulating the same activity or subject matter as another
provision of federal or state law, an agency shall do all of the
following:
(a) Provide to the business assistance center a list citing by
reference the other federal and state laws that regulate the same
activity or subject matter;
(b) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the
other federal and state entities regulating the same activity or
subject matter by making every effort to do one or more of the
following:
(i) Deferring to the other entity;
(ii) Designating a lead agency; or
(iii) Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying
how the agency and entities will coordinate implementation and
enforcement.
If the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (4)(b), the
agency shall report to the legislature pursuant to (c) of this
subsection;
(c) Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:
(i) The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or
state laws, any differences from federal law, and any known overlap,
duplication, or conflict with local laws; and
(ii) Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary
to eliminate or mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap,
duplication, or difference.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section
applies to:
(i) Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology,
labor and industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and
natural resources, the employment security department, the forest
practices board, the office of the insurance commissioner, and to the
legislative rules of the department of fish and wildlife implementing
chapter ((75.20)) 77.55 RCW; and
(ii) Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made
applicable to the rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule
by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee
within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(i) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(ii) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(iii) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(iv) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(v) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(vi) Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards; or
(vii) Rules of the department of social and health services
relating only to client medical or financial eligibility and rules
concerning liability for care of dependents.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals
(A) any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency
hearings; (B) any filing or related process requirement for making
application to an agency for a license or permit; or (C) any policy
statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations of an
agency.
(ii) An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does
not subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the
agency's interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.
(iii) A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a
procedural or interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions
of law pursuant to delegated legislative authority, the violation of
which subjects a violator of such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B)
establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard for the
issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit; or (C)
adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or
regulatory program.
(d) In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an
agency shall state whether this section applies to the proposed rule
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or if the agency will apply this
section voluntarily.
(6) By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered
year thereafter, the office of financial management, after consulting
with state agencies, counties, and cities, and business, labor, and
environmental organizations, shall report to the governor and the
legislature regarding the effects of this section on the regulatory
system in this state. The report shall document:
(a) The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the
extent possible, how compliance with this section affected the
substance of the rule, if any, that the agency ultimately adopted;
(b) The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this
section;
(c) Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of
any agency to comply with this section, the costs to the state of such
action, and the result;
(d) The extent to which this section has adversely affected the
capacity of agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;
(e) The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability
of state rules to those regulated; and
(f) Any other information considered by the office of financial
management to be useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.13.060 and 2000 c 134 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Governmental agencies, including law enforcement agencies,
prosecuting agencies, and the executive branch, whether state, local,
or federal shall have access to information or records deemed private
and confidential under this chapter if the information or records are
needed by the agency for official purposes and:
(a) The agency submits an application in writing to the employment
security department for the records or information containing a
statement of the official purposes for which the information or records
are needed and specific identification of the records or information
sought from the department; and
(b) The director, commissioner, chief executive, or other official
of the agency has verified the need for the specific information in
writing either on the application or on a separate document; and
(c) The agency requesting access has served a copy of the
application for records or information on the individual or employing
unit whose records or information are sought and has provided the
department with proof of service. Service shall be made in a manner
which conforms to the civil rules for superior court. The requesting
agency shall include with the copy of the application a statement to
the effect that the individual or employing unit may contact the public
records officer of the employment security department to state any
objections to the release of the records or information. The
employment security department shall not act upon the application of
the requesting agency until at least five days after service on the
concerned individual or employing unit. The employment security
department shall consider any objections raised by the concerned
individual or employing unit in deciding whether the requesting agency
needs the information or records for official purposes.
(2) The requirements of subsections (1) and (9) of this section
shall not apply to the state legislative branch. The state legislature
shall have access to information or records deemed private and
confidential under this chapter, if the legislature or a legislative
committee finds that the information or records are necessary and for
official purposes. If the employment security department does not make
information or records available as provided in this subsection, the
legislature may exercise its authority granted by chapter 44.16 RCW.
(3) In cases of emergency the governmental agency requesting access
shall not be required to formally comply with the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section at the time of the request if the
procedures required by subsection (1) of this section are complied with
by the requesting agency following the receipt of any records or
information deemed private and confidential under this chapter. An
emergency is defined as a situation in which irreparable harm or damage
could occur if records or information are not released immediately.
(4) The requirements of subsection (1)(c) of this section shall not
apply to governmental agencies where the procedures would frustrate the
investigation of possible violations of criminal laws or to the release
of employing unit names, addresses, number of employees, and aggregate
employer wage data for the purpose of state governmental agencies
preparing small business economic impact statements under chapter 19.85
RCW or preparing cost-benefit analyses under RCW 34.05.328(1) (c) and
(d). Information provided by the department and held to be private and
confidential under state or federal laws must not be misused or
released to unauthorized parties. A person who misuses such
information or releases such information to unauthorized parties is
subject to the sanctions in RCW 50.13.080.
(5) Governmental agencies shall have access to certain records or
information, limited to such items as names, addresses, social security
numbers, and general information about benefit entitlement or employer
information possessed by the department, for comparison purposes with
records or information possessed by the requesting agency to detect
improper or fraudulent claims, or to determine potential tax liability
or employer compliance with registration and licensing requirements.
In those cases the governmental agency shall not be required to comply
with subsection (1)(c) of this section, but the requirements of the
remainder of subsection (1) of this section must be satisfied.
(6) Governmental agencies may have access to certain records and
information, limited to employer information possessed by the
department for purposes authorized in chapter 50.38 RCW. Access to
these records and information is limited to only those individuals
conducting authorized statistical analysis, research, and evaluation
studies. Only in cases consistent with the purposes of chapter 50.38
RCW are government agencies not required to comply with subsection
(1)(c) of this section, but the requirements of the remainder of
subsection (1) of this section must be satisfied. Information provided
by the department and held to be private and confidential under state
or federal laws shall not be misused or released to unauthorized
parties subject to the sanctions in RCW 50.13.080.
(7) Disclosure to governmental agencies of information or records
obtained by the employment security department from the federal
government shall be governed by any applicable federal law or any
agreement between the federal government and the employment security
department where so required by federal law. When federal law does not
apply to the records or information state law shall control.
(8) The department may provide information for purposes of
statistical analysis and evaluation of the WorkFirst program or any
successor state welfare program to the department of social and health
services, the office of financial management, and other governmental
entities with oversight or evaluation responsibilities for the program
in accordance with RCW 43.20A.080. The confidential information
provided by the department shall remain the property of the department
and may be used by the authorized requesting agencies only for
statistical analysis, research, and evaluation purposes as provided in
RCW 74.08A.410 and 74.08A.420. The department of social and health
services, the office of financial management, or other governmental
entities with oversight or evaluation responsibilities for the program
are not required to comply with subsection (1)(c) of this section, but
the requirements of the remainder of subsection (1) of this section and
applicable federal laws and regulations must be satisfied. The
confidential information used for evaluation and analysis of welfare
reform supplied to the authorized requesting entities with regard to
the WorkFirst program or any successor state welfare program are exempt
from public inspection and copying under RCW 42.17.310.
(9) The disclosure of any records or information by a governmental
agency which has obtained the records or information under this section
is prohibited unless the disclosure is directly connected to the
official purpose for which the records or information were obtained.
(10) In conducting periodic salary or fringe benefit studies
pursuant to law, the department of personnel shall have access to
records of the employment security department as may be required for
such studies. For such purposes, the requirements of subsection (1)(c)
of this section need not apply.
(11)(a) To promote the reemployment of job seekers, the
commissioner may enter into data-sharing contracts with partners of the
one-stop career development system. The contracts shall provide for
the transfer of data only to the extent that the transfer is necessary
for the efficient provisions of work force programs, including but not
limited to public labor exchange, unemployment insurance, worker
training and retraining, vocational rehabilitation, vocational
education, adult education, transition from public assistance, and
support services. The transfer of information under contracts with
one-stop partners is exempt from subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(b) An individual who applies for services from the department and
whose information will be shared under (a) of this subsection (11) must
be notified that his or her private and confidential information in the
department's records will be shared among the one-stop partners to
facilitate the delivery of one-stop services to the individual. The
notice must advise the individual that he or she may request that
private and confidential information not be shared among the one-stop
partners and the department must honor the request. In addition, the
notice must:
(i) Advise the individual that if he or she requests that private
and confidential information not be shared among one-stop partners, the
request will in no way affect eligibility for services;
(ii) Describe the nature of the information to be shared, the
general use of the information by one-stop partner representatives, and
among whom the information will be shared;
(iii) Inform the individual that shared information will be used
only for the purpose of delivering one-stop services and that further
disclosure of the information is prohibited under contract and is not
subject to disclosure under RCW 42.17.310; and
(iv) Be provided in English and an alternative language selected by
the one-stop center or job service center as appropriate for the
community where the center is located.
If the notice is provided in-person, the individual who does not
want private and confidential information shared among the one-stop
partners must immediately advise the one-stop partner representative of
that decision. The notice must be provided to an individual who
applies for services telephonically, electronically, or by mail, in a
suitable format and within a reasonable time after applying for
services, which shall be no later than ten working days from the
department's receipt of the application for services. A one-stop
representative must be available to answer specific questions regarding
the nature, extent, and purpose for which the information may be
shared.
(12) To facilitate improved operation and evaluation of state
programs, the commissioner may enter into data-sharing contracts with
other state agencies only to the extent that such transfer is necessary
for the efficient operation or evaluation of outcomes for those
programs. The transfer of information by contract under this
subsection is exempt from subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(13) The misuse or unauthorized release of records or information
by any person or organization to which access is permitted by this
chapter subjects the person or organization to a civil penalty of five
thousand dollars and other applicable sanctions under state and federal
law. Suit to enforce this section shall be brought by the attorney
general and the amount of any penalties collected shall be paid into
the
employment security department administrative contingency fund.
The attorney general may recover reasonable attorneys' fees for any
action brought to enforce this section.

--- END ---