BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.360 and 1988 c 288 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
The order of adoption by which each rule is adopted by an agency
shall contain all of the following:
(1) If the head of the agency is appointed by the governor, then
the signature of the governor is required for significant legislative
rules;
(2) The date the agency adopted the rule;
(((2))) (3) A concise statement of the purpose of the rule;
(((3))) (4) A reference to all rules repealed, amended, or
suspended by the rule;
(((4))) (5) A reference to the specific statutory or other
authority authorizing adoption of the rule;
(((5))) (6) Any findings required by any provision of law as a
precondition to adoption or effectiveness of the rule; and
(((6))) (7) The effective date of the rule if other than that
specified in RCW 34.05.380(2).

--- END ---