BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.50.090 and 1998 c 190 s 82 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall not authorize commercial bottom trawling for
food fish and shellfish in ((all areas of Hood Canal south of a line
projected from Tala Point to Foulweather Bluff and in Puget Sound south
of a line projected from Foulweather Bluff to Double Bluff and
including)) all marine waters east of ((Whidbey Island and Camano
Island)) a line projected from the east point of Ediz Hook north to the
international boundary line.

--- END ---