BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The future of Washington forests review
commission is established. The purpose of the commission is to review
broadly the economic, demographic, land use development, environmental,
natural and climatic, and other trends that will influence the
geographic extent and environmental and economic productivity of
Washington's forests over the next fifty years. The commission will
review these trends within the context of the public's present and
future expectations regarding the values it seeks from Washington's
forests. Based upon this review, the commission will make
recommendations to the governor and to the legislature for policy and
budgetary allocations to further achievement of these changing public
expectations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The future of Washington forests review
commission is composed of the following members and members invited to
participate on the commission:
(a) The governor or the governor's designee;
(b) The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's
designee;
(c) Two members of the senate appointed by the senate president,
one from each major caucus in the senate;
(d) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, one from each major caucus in
the house of representatives;
(e) The presidents, or the presidents' designees, of the University
of Washington and Washington State University;
(f) Members representing the following interests, appointed by the
governor after consulting with the commissioner of public lands and
with the majority and minority leaders in the senate and house of
representatives:
(i) A representative of industrial forest landowners;
(ii) A representative of nonindustrial forest landowners;
(iii) A representative of businesses engaged in forest products
processing and distribution;
(iv) A representative of general purpose local government;
(v) A representative of organizations engaged in forest
conservation and preservation;
(vi) A representative of the United States forest service must be
invited to participate on the commission;
(vii) A representative of tribal governments must be invited to
participate on the commission.
(2) The governor shall convene the commission at an organizational
meeting no later than October 15, 2003. At such meeting, the
commission shall select a chairperson to preside over commission
meetings and a vice-chairperson to preside in the chairperson's
absence.
(3) Staff to the commission must be provided by the department of
natural resources. The chair of the commission may also request
assistance on any topic or element of the commission's review from the
college of forest resources of the University of Washington. The
commission must be administratively located within the department of
natural resources. State agencies shall provide the commission with
information and assistance as may be requested by the commission.
(4) Members of the commission, other than legislative members, must
be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Legislative members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW
44.04.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The future of Washington forests review
commission may form a technical advisory committee to assist the
commission in the preparation of technical papers on the social,
economic, environmental, demographic, land use development, natural and
climatic, and other trends that will affect the state's forests over
the next fifty years. The technical committee may also assist the
commission in analyzing the economic, environmental, and other values
provided by the state's forests and the expectations of the public
regarding the values to be provided by forests over the next fifty
years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The future of Washington forests review
commission shall review and summarize the potential roles of forests
and their contributions to Washington state over the next fifty years.
The commission shall examine the current condition and roles of forests
and their contributions to the state's character, quality of life, and
economic vitality. Specifically, the commission shall study issues,
policies, and trends that may influence or involve forest health, risks
of wildland fire and potential damages or benefits, fish and wildlife
habitat conditions, activities undertaken on federally controlled land,
forestry-related tax revenue, state land trust revenue, jobs, and the
public's desires for forests. The commission shall also examine
current and expected innovation in forest products, habitat
restoration, postwildfire rehabilitation, and other innovations that
may change the expectations for forests in Washington and how they are
managed.
(2) In conducting its review, the commission shall provide for
extensive public participation and involvement. The commission shall
attempt to schedule its meetings in locations throughout the state
and make its meetings convenient for the public to attend.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The future of Washington forests review
commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the
governor and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives on or before June 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The future of Washington forests review
commission and its powers and duties terminate June 30, 2005.

--- END ---