BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.56 RCW
to read as follows:
A component city, as defined in RCW 35.58.020, with a population
greater than four hundred thousand persons that is within the
boundaries of a county that has assumed public transportation functions
of a metropolitan municipal corporation may, by ordinance or resolution
of the city legislative body, provide an additional public
transportation function as provided in chapter 35.95 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.58.260 and 1965 c 7 s 35.58.260 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to
perform the metropolitan transportation function, it shall, upon the
effective date of the assumption of such power, have and exercise all
rights with respect to the construction, acquisition, maintenance,
operation, extension, alteration, repair, control and management of
passenger transportation which any component city shall have been
previously empowered to exercise and such powers shall not thereafter
be exercised by such component cities without the consent of the
metropolitan municipal corporation: PROVIDED, That any city owning and
operating a public transportation system on such effective date may
continue to operate such system within such city until such system
shall have been acquired by the metropolitan municipal corporation and
a metropolitan municipal corporation may not acquire such system
without the consent of the city council of such city.
(2) This section does not apply to component cities that have
adopted an ordinance or resolution to establish a public transportation
system under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.045 and 2001 c 89 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any city pursuant to RCW 35.92.060, of
any county which has created an unincorporated transportation benefit
area pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110, of any public
transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW 36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090,
of any county transportation authority established pursuant to chapter
36.57 RCW, and of any metropolitan municipal corporation within a
county with a population of one million or more pursuant to chapter
35.58 RCW, may, by resolution or ordinance for the sole purpose of
providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of
public transportation systems or public transportation limited to
persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and in
lieu of the excise taxes authorized by RCW 35.95.040, submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters or include such authorization in
a proposition to perform the function of public transportation or
public transportation limited to persons with special needs under RCW
36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and if approved by a majority of persons
voting thereon, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
the terms of this chapter: PROVIDED, That no such legislative body
shall impose such a sales and use tax without submitting such an
authorizing proposition to the voters and obtaining the approval of a
majority of persons voting thereon: PROVIDED FURTHER, That where such
a proposition is submitted by a county on behalf of an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, it shall be voted upon by the voters
residing within the boundaries of such unincorporated transportation
benefit area and, if approved, the sales and use tax shall be imposed
only within such area. Notwithstanding any provisions of this section
to the contrary, any county in which a county public transportation
plan has been adopted pursuant to RCW 36.57.070 and the voters of such
county have authorized the imposition of a sales and use tax pursuant
to the provisions of section 10, chapter 167, Laws of 1974 ex. sess.,
prior to July 1, 1975, shall be authorized to fix and impose a sales
and use tax as provided in this section at not to exceed the rate so
authorized without additional approval of the voters of such county as
otherwise required by this section.
The tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in addition to
the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within such city,
public transportation benefit area, county, or metropolitan municipal
corporation as the case may be. The rate of such tax shall be one-tenth, two-tenths, three-tenths, four-tenths, five-tenths, six-tenths,
seven-tenths, eight-tenths, or nine-tenths of one percent of the
selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used
(in the case of a use tax). The rate of such tax shall not exceed the
rate authorized by the voters unless such increase shall be similarly
approved.
(2)(a) In the event a metropolitan municipal corporation shall
impose a sales and use tax pursuant to this chapter, no city, with the
exception of a city that provides an additional public transportation
function under section 1 of this act, county which has created an
unincorporated transportation benefit area, public transportation
benefit area authority, or county transportation authority wholly
within such metropolitan municipal corporation shall be empowered to
levy and/or collect taxes pursuant to RCW 35.58.273, 35.95.040, and/or
82.14.045, but nothing herein shall prevent such city or county from
imposing sales and use taxes pursuant to any other authorization.
(b) In the event a county transportation authority shall impose a
sales and use tax pursuant to this section, no city, county which has
created an unincorporated transportation benefit area, public
transportation benefit area, or metropolitan municipal corporation,
located within the territory of the authority, shall be empowered to
levy or collect taxes pursuant to RCW 35.58.273, 35.95.040, or
82.14.045.
(c) In the event a public transportation benefit area shall impose
a sales and use tax pursuant to this section, no city, county which has
created an unincorporated transportation benefit area, or metropolitan
municipal corporation, located wholly or partly within the territory of
the public transportation benefit area, shall be empowered to levy or
collect taxes pursuant to RCW 35.58.273, 35.95.040, or 82.14.045.
(3) Any local sales and use tax revenue collected pursuant to this
section by any city or by any county for transportation purposes
pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110 shall not be counted as locally
generated tax revenues for the purposes of apportionment and
distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW, of the
proceeds of the motor vehicle excise tax authorized pursuant to RCW
35.58.273, except that the local sales and use tax revenue collected
under this section by a city with a population greater than sixty
thousand that as of January 1, 1998, owns and operates a municipal
public transportation system shall be counted as locally generated tax
revenues for the purposes of apportionment and distribution, in the
manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW, of the proceeds of the motor
vehicle excise tax authorized under RCW 35.58.273 as follows:
(a) For fiscal year 2000, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 25 percent
of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273;
(b) For fiscal year 2001, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 50 percent
of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273;
(c) For fiscal year 2002, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 75 percent
of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273; and
(d) For fiscal year 2003 and thereafter, revenues collected under
this section shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up
to 100 percent of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273.

--- END ---