BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.035 and 1991 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The chief of the Washington state patrol is directed to provide
security and protection for the governor, the governor's family, and
the lieutenant governor, and transportation for the lieutenant
governor's spouse when conducting official state business in
conjunction with the lieutenant governor, to the extent and in the
manner the governor and the chief of the Washington state patrol deem
adequate and appropriate.
In the same manner the chief of the Washington state patrol is
directed to provide security and protection for the governor-elect from
the time of the November election.

--- END ---