BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.60.070 and 2000 c 107 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may not authorize a person to take geoduck clams
for commercial purposes outside the harvest area designated in a
current department of natural resources geoduck harvesting agreement
issued under RCW 79.96.080. The director may not authorize commercial
harvest of geoduck clams from bottoms that are shallower than eighteen
feet below mean lower low water (0.0. ft.)((, or that lie in an area
bounded by the line of ordinary high tide (mean high tide) and a line
two hundred yards seaward from and parallel to the line of ordinary
high tide)). This section does not apply to the harvest of private
sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020.
(2) Commercial geoduck harvesting shall be done with a hand-held,
manually operated water jet or suction device guided and controlled
from under water by a diver. Periodically, the director shall
determine the effect of each type or unit of gear upon the geoduck
population or the substrate they inhabit. The director may require
modification of the gear or stop its use if it is being operated in a
wasteful or destructive manner or if its operation may cause permanent
damage to the bottom or adjacent shellfish populations.

--- END ---