BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.29A RCW
to read as follows:
Each electric utility that has more than ten thousand retail
electric customers must provide its retail electric customers with an
annual notice, in easily understandable language, concerning the
percentage of the customer's bill that is directly attributable to the
costs for fish protection. The utility may estimate the costs
attributable to fish protection.
Each electric utility that has ten thousand retail electric
customers or fewer is encouraged to provide its retail electric
customers with an annual notice, in easily understandable language,
concerning the percentage of the customer's bill that is directly
attributable to the costs for fish protection. The utility may
estimate the costs attributable to fish protection.
Notice under this section may be provided in customers' billing
statements or through the utility's annual report required under this
chapter.

--- END ---