BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Because of the possibility of a disaster
of unprecedented size and destruction, including acts of domestic
terrorism and civil unrest, that requires law enforcement response for
the protection of persons or property and preservation of the peace,
the need exists to ensure that the state is adequately prepared to
respond to such an incident. There is a need to (a) establish a
mechanism and a procedure to provide for reimbursement to law
enforcement agencies that respond to help others in time of need, and
to host law enforcement agencies that experience expenses beyond the
resources of the agencies; and (b) generally to protect the public
safety, peace, health, lives, and property of the people of Washington.
(2) It is hereby declared necessary to:
(a) Provide the policy and organizational structure for large-scale
mobilization of law enforcement resources in the state, using the
incident command system, through creation of the Washington state law
enforcement mobilization plan;
(b) Confer upon the chief of the Washington state patrol the powers
provided in this chapter;
(c) Provide a means for reimbursement to law enforcement
jurisdictions that incur expenses when mobilized by the chief under the
Washington state law enforcement mobilization plan; and
(d) Provide for reimbursement of the host law enforcement agency
when it has:
(i) Exhausted all of its resources; and
(ii) Invoked its local mutual aid network and exhausted those
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Agency" means any general purpose law enforcement agency as
defined in RCW 10.93.020.
(2) "Board" means the state law enforcement mobilization policy
board.
(3) "Chief" means the chief of the Washington state patrol.
(4) "Chief law enforcement officer" means the chief of police or
sheriff responsible for law enforcement services in the jurisdiction in
which the emergency is occurring.
(5) "General authority Washington peace officer" means a general
authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020.
(6) "Host agency" means the law enforcement agency that requests
statewide mobilization under sections 2 through 7 of this act.
(7) "Mobilization" means a redistribution of regional and statewide
law enforcement resources in response to an emergency or disaster
situation.
(8) "Mutual aid" means emergency interagency assistance provided
without compensation pursuant to an agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW.
(9) "Resource coordination" means the effort to locate and arrange
for the delivery of resources needed by chief law enforcement officers.
(10) "State law enforcement resource coordinator" means a
designated individual or agency selected by the chief to perform the
responsibilities of that position.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The state law enforcement mobilization
policy board shall be established by the chief and shall have
representatives from each of the regions established in section 6 of
this act. In carrying out its duty, the board shall consult with and
solicit recommendations from representatives of the state and local law
enforcement and emergency management organizations, and regional law
enforcement mobilization committees.
(2) The board shall establish and make recommendations to the chief
on the refinement and maintenance of the Washington state law
enforcement mobilization plan, including the procedures to be used
during an emergency or disaster response requiring coordination of
local, regional, and state law enforcement resources.
(3) The chief shall review the Washington state law enforcement
mobilization plan, as submitted by the board, recommend changes as
necessary, and may approve the plan. The plan shall be consistent with
the Washington state comprehensive emergency management plan. The
chief may recommend the plan for inclusion within the state
comprehensive emergency management plan established under chapter 38.52
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Local law enforcement may request
mobilization only in response to an emergency or disaster exceeding the
capabilities of available local resources and those available through
existing mutual aid agreements. Upon finding that the local
jurisdiction has exhausted all available resources, it is the
responsibility of the chief to determine whether mobilization is the
appropriate response to the emergency or disaster and, if so, to
mobilize jurisdictions under the Washington state law enforcement
mobilization plan.
(2) Upon mobilization, the chief shall appoint a state law
enforcement resource coordinator, and an alternate, who shall serve
jointly with the chief law enforcement officer from the host agency to
command the mobilization effort consistent with incident command system
procedures.
(3) Upon mobilization, all law enforcement resources including
those of the host agency and those that responded earlier under an
existing mutual aid or other agreement shall be mobilized.
Mobilization may include the redistribution of regional or statewide
law enforcement resources to either direct emergency incident
assignments or to assignments in communities where law enforcement
resources are needed.
(4) For the duration of the mobilization:
(a) Host agency resources shall become state law enforcement
mobilization resources, under the command of the state law enforcement
resource coordinator and the chief law enforcement officer from the
host agency, consistent with the state law enforcement mobilization
plan and incident command system procedures; and
(b) All law enforcement authorities providing resources in response
to a mobilization declaration shall be eligible for expense
reimbursement as provided by this chapter.
(5) The chief, in consultation with the regional law enforcement
resource coordinator, shall determine when mobilization is no longer
required and shall then declare the end to the mobilization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The state law enforcement resource
coordinator, or alternate, shall serve in that capacity for the
duration of the mobilization.
(2) The duties of the coordinator are to:
(a) Coordinate the mobilization of law enforcement and other
support resources within a region;
(b) Be primarily responsible for the coordination of resources in
conjunction with the regional law enforcement mobilization committees,
in the case of incidents involving more than one region or when
resources from more than one region must be mobilized; and
(c) Advise and consult with the chief regarding what resources are
required in response to the emergency or disaster and in regard to when
the mobilization should end.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Regions within the state are initially
established as follows and may be adjusted as necessary by the state
law enforcement policy board, but should remain consistent with the
Washington state fire defense regions:
(a) Central region - Grays Harbor, Thurston, Pacific, and Lewis
counties;
(b) Lower Columbia region - Kittitas, Yakima, and Klickitat
counties;
(c) Mid-Columbia region - Chelan, Douglas, and Grant counties;
(d) Northeast region - Okanogan, Ferry, Stevens, Pend Oreille,
Spokane, Adams, and Lincoln counties;
(e) Northwest region - Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, San Juan, and
Island counties;
(f) Olympic region - Clallam and Jefferson counties;
(g) South Puget Sound region - Kitsap, Mason, King, and Pierce
counties;
(h) Southeast region - Benton, Franklin, Walla Walla, Columbia,
Whitman, Garfield, and Asotin counties;
(i) Southwest region - Wahkiakum, Cowlitz, Clark, and Skamania
counties.
(2) Within each of the regions there is created a regional law
enforcement mobilization committee. The committees shall consist of
the sheriff of each county in the region, the district commander of the
Washington state patrol from the region, a number of police chiefs
within the region equivalent to the number of counties within the
region plus one, and the director of the counties' emergency management
office. The police chief members of each regional committee must
include the chiefs of police of each city of ninety-five thousand or
more population, and the number of members of the committee shall be
increased if necessary to accommodate such chiefs. Members of each
regional mobilization committee shall select a chair, who shall have
authority to implement the regional plan, and a secretary as officers.
Members serving on the regional mobilization committees shall not be
eligible for reimbursement for meeting-related expenses from the state.
(3) The regional mobilization committees shall work with the
relevant local government entities to facilitate development of
intergovernmental agreements if any such agreements are required to
implement a regional law enforcement mobilization plan.
(4) Regional mobilization committees shall develop regional law
enforcement mobilization plans that include provisions for organized
law enforcement agencies to respond across municipal, county, or
regional boundaries. Each regional mobilization plan shall be
consistent with the incident command system, the Washington state law
enforcement mobilization plan, and regional response plans adopted
prior to the effective date of this act.
(5) Each regional plan, adopted under subsection (4) of this
section shall be approved by the state law enforcement mobilization
policy board before implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The state patrol in consultation with the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and the office of
financial management shall develop procedures to facilitate
reimbursement to jurisdictions from funds appropriated specifically for
this purpose when jurisdictions are mobilized under the Washington
state law enforcement mobilization plan.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or interpreted to limit
the eligibility of any nonhost law enforcement authority for
reimbursement of expenses incurred in providing law enforcement
resources for mobilization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 36.28A RCW.

--- END ---