BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that good
language skills are essential for productive adults and that public
schools in the state of Washington provide trained speech pathologists
to assist children who lack adequate verbal communication skills to
compete successfully in the challenges of securing an education. It
recognizes that the task of teaching students to speak well is a
formidable one and sees shrinking public funding as an obstacle in
providing sufficient professional staff to realize that goal. It
further recognizes that professionally trained and nationally certified
speech pathologists are provided at no cost by nonprofit charitable
organizations to preschool and school-age children. To aid the public
schools in teaching essential speech skills, a "Help Kids Speak"
license plate is established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Help Kids Speak license plates" means license plates that display
a symbol of a nonprofit, charitable organization that provides no-fee
nationally certified speech pathologists to teach children to speak.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
In cooperation with the Washington state patrol and the department
of licensing, the sponsors of the "Help Kids Speak" program shall
create and design, and the department shall issue, a special license
plate displaying a symbol of a nonprofit charitable organization and
the words "Help Kids Speak" that may be used in lieu of regular or
personalized license plates for motor vehicles required to display two
motor vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under
chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the
department. The special plates will commemorate the "Help Kids Speak"
organization.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed
thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to
become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no
more than forty dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees
required to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have
been requested. All such additional special license plate fees
collected by the department shall be deposited in the state treasury
and credited to the motor vehicle fund.
(2) ((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder
of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(((4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(((5))) (4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(((6) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
"Help Kids Speak" license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
proceeds to the "Help Kids Speak" license plate account established
under section 5 of this act.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a "Help Kids
Speak" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the "Help Kids Speak" license plate account established under
section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The "Help Kids Speak" program is created. The purpose of the
program is to provide grants to nonprofit, charitable organizations,
incorporated under the laws of the state of Washington that do not
discriminate in any way, and that provide nationally certified speech
pathologists on a no-fee basis to children, regardless of their
economic status, whether enrolled in a public, private, or home school,
of preschool or school age, and who have displayed a lack of verbal
communication skills; including in the grant application a finding that
there is, on staff of the nonprofit, charitable organization,
nationally certified speech pathologists trained in the techniques of
teaching children essential communication skills. The superintendent
of public instruction shall administer the grant program.
(2) The "Help Kids Speak" license plate account is established in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts, except as provided
in RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7), from "Help Kids Speak" license plates
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only to fund the grant program under subsection (1) of this
section. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, and no appropriation is required for expenditures.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates under section 3 of this act or RCW 46.16.301 as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, sells,
trades, or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the vehicle
upon which the special license plate or plates have been displayed, he
or she shall immediately report the transfer of such plate or plates to
an acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such plates pursuant to
departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such plates to the
department immediately if such surrender is required by departmental
rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or plates to
another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars shall be
charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such transfer fees
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to surrender the
plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

--- END ---