BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.010 and 2002 c 292 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In all competitive examinations, unless otherwise provided in this
section, to determine the qualifications of applicants for public
offices, positions or employment, the state, and all of its political
subdivisions and all municipal corporations, shall give a scoring
criteria status to all veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.007, by adding
to the passing mark, grade or rating only, based upon a possible rating
of one hundred points as perfect a percentage in accordance with the
following:
(1) Ten percent to a veteran who served during a period of war or
in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 and does not receive
military retirement. The percentage shall be added to the passing
mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's
first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in promotional
examinations;
(2) Five percent to a veteran who did not serve during a period of
war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 or is receiving
military retirement. The percentage shall be added to the passing
mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's
first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in promotional
examinations;
(3) Five percent to a veteran who was called to active military
service for one or more years from employment with the state or any of
its political subdivisions or municipal corporations. The percentage
shall be added to the first promotional examination only;
(4) All veterans' scoring criteria ((specified in subsections (1),
(2), and (3) of this section must)) may be claimed ((within fifteen
years of the date of)) upon release from active military service.
((This period may be extended for valid and extenuating reasons to
include but not be limited to:
(a) Documented medical reasons beyond control of the veteran;
(b) United States department of veterans' affairs documented
disabled veteran; or
(c) Any veteran who has his or her employment terminated through no
fault or action of his or her own and whose livelihood is adversely
affected may seek scoring criteria employment consideration under this
section.))

--- END ---