BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 40.14.030 and 1957 c 246 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All public records, not required in the current operation of
the office where they are made or kept, and all records of every
agency, commission, committee, or any other activity of state
government which may be abolished or discontinued, shall be transferred
to the state archives so that the valuable historical records of the
state may be centralized, made more widely available, and insured
permanent preservation: PROVIDED, That this section shall have no
application to public records approved for destruction under the
subsequent provisions of this chapter.
When so transferred, copies of the public records concerned shall
be made and certified by the archivist, which certification shall have
the same force and effect as though made by the officer originally in
charge of them. Fees may be charged to cover the cost of reproduction.
In turning over the archives of his office, the officer in charge
thereof, or his successor, thereby loses none of his rights of access
to them, without charge, whenever necessary.
(2) Records that are confidential, privileged, or exempt from
public disclosure under state or federal law while in the possession of
the originating agency, commission, board, committee, or other entity
of state or local government retain their confidential, privileged, or
exempt status after transfer to the state archives unless the
archivist, with the concurrence of the originating jurisdiction,
determines that the records must be made accessible to the public
according to proper and reasonable rules adopted by the secretary of
state, in which case the records may be open to inspection and
available for copying after the expiration of seventy-five years from
creation of the record. If the originating jurisdiction is no longer
in existence, the archivist shall make the determination of
availability according to those rules. If, while in the possession of
the originating agency, commission, board, committee, or other entity,
a record is determined to be confidential, privileged, or exempt from
public disclosure under state or federal law for a period of less than
seventy-five years, then the record must be made accessible to the
public upon the expiration of the shorter period of time.

--- END ---