BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.66.060 and 1979 c 111 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission may, at any time, by its order duly entered after
((a hearing had upon)) notice to the holder of any certificate issued
under this chapter, and an opportunity ((to such holder to be heard))
for a hearing, at which it is proven that the holder has willfully
violated or refused to observe any of the commission's proper orders,
rules, or regulations, suspend, revoke, alter, or amend any certificate
issued under the provisions of this chapter, but the holder of the
certificate shall have all the rights of rehearing, review, and appeal
as to the order of the commission as is provided for in RCW 81.68.070.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.68.030 and 1989 c 163 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission is vested with power and authority, and it is its
duty to supervise and regulate every auto transportation company in
this state as provided in this section. Under this authority, it shall
for each auto transportation company:
(1) Fix, alter, and amend just, fair, reasonable, and sufficient
rates, fares, charges, classifications, rules, and regulations;
(2) Regulate the accounts, service, and safety of operations;
(3) Require the filing of annual and other reports and of other
data;
(4) Supervise and regulate the companies in all other matters
affecting the relationship between such companies and the traveling and
shipping public;
(5) By general order or otherwise, prescribe rules and regulations
in conformity with this chapter, applicable to any and all such
companies, and within such limits make orders.
The commission may, at any time, by its order duly entered after
((a hearing had upon)) notice to the holder of any certificate under
this chapter, and an opportunity ((to the holder to be heard)) for a
hearing, at which it shall be proven that the holder willfully violates
or refuses to observe any of the commission's proper orders, rules, or
regulations, suspend, revoke, alter, or amend any certificate issued
under the provisions of this chapter, but the holder of the certificate
has all the rights of rehearing, review, and appeal as to the order of
the commission as is provided for in RCW 81.68.070.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.68.040 and 1961 c 14 s 81.68.040 are each amended
to read as follows:
No auto transportation company shall operate for the transportation
of persons, and baggage, mail and express on the vehicles of auto
transportation companies carrying passengers, for compensation between
fixed termini or over a regular route in this state, without first
having obtained from the commission under the provisions of this
chapter a certificate declaring that public convenience and necessity
require such operation; but a certificate shall be granted when it
appears to the satisfaction of the commission that such person, firm or
corporation was actually operating in good faith, over the route for
which such certificate shall be sought on January 15, 1921. Any right,
privilege, certificate held, owned or obtained by an auto
transportation company may be sold, assigned, leased, transferred or
inherited as other property, only upon authorization by the commission.
The commission shall have power, after notice and an opportunity for a
hearing, when the applicant requests a certificate to operate in a
territory already served by a certificate holder under this chapter,
only when the existing auto transportation company or companies serving
such territory will not provide the same to the satisfaction of the
commission, or when the existing auto transportation company does not
object, and in all other cases with or without hearing, to issue said
certificate as prayed for; or for good cause shown to refuse to issue
same, or to issue it for the partial exercise only of said privilege
sought, and may attach to the exercise of the rights granted by said
certificate to such terms and conditions as, in its judgment, the
public convenience and necessity may require.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 81.68.045 is recodified as a section in
chapter 81.70 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 81.77.030 and 1989 c 431 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall supervise and regulate every solid waste
collection company in this state,
(1) By fixing and altering its rates, charges, classifications,
rules and regulations;
(2) By regulating the accounts, service, and safety of operations;
(3) By requiring the filing of annual and other reports and data;
(4) By supervising and regulating such persons or companies in all
other matters affecting the relationship between them and the public
which they serve;
(5) By requiring compliance with local solid waste management plans
and related implementation ordinances;
(6) By requiring certificate holders under chapter 81.77 RCW to use
rate structures and billing systems consistent with the solid waste
management priorities set forth under RCW 70.95.010 and the minimum
levels of solid waste collection and recycling services pursuant to
local comprehensive solid waste management plans. The commission may
order consolidated billing and provide for reasonable and necessary
expenses to be paid to the administering company if more than one
certificate is granted in an area.
The commission, on complaint made on its own motion or by an
aggrieved party, at any time, after ((the holding of a hearing of
which)) providing the holder of any certificate ((has had)) with notice
and an opportunity ((to be heard, and)) for a hearing at which it shall
be proven that the holder has willfully violated or refused to observe
any of the commission's orders, rules, or regulations, or has failed to
operate as a solid waste collection company for a period of at least
one year preceding the filing of the complaint, may suspend, revoke,
alter, or amend any certificate issued under the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 81.77.040 and 1989 c 431 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
No solid waste collection company shall hereafter operate for the
hauling of solid waste for compensation without first having obtained
from the commission a certificate declaring that public convenience and
necessity require such operation. A condition of operating a solid
waste company in the unincorporated areas of a county shall be
complying with the solid waste management plan prepared under chapter
70.95 RCW applicable in the company's franchise area.
Issuance of the certificate of necessity shall be determined upon,
but not limited to, the following factors: The present service and the
cost thereof for the contemplated area to be served; an estimate of the
cost of the facilities to be utilized in the plant for solid waste
collection and disposal, sworn to before a notary public; a statement
of the assets on hand of the person, firm, association or corporation
which will be expended on the purported plant for solid waste
collection and disposal, sworn to before a notary public; a statement
of prior experience, if any, in such field by the petitioner, sworn to
before a notary public; and sentiment in the community contemplated to
be served as to the necessity for such a service.
((Except as provided in RCW 81.77.150,)) When an applicant requests
a certificate to operate in a territory already served by a certificate
holder under this chapter, the commission may, after notice and an
opportunity for a hearing, issue the certificate only if the existing
solid waste collection company or companies serving the territory will
not provide service to the satisfaction of the commission or if the
existing solid waste collection company does not object.
In all other cases, the commission may, with or without hearing,
issue certificates, or for good cause shown refuse to issue them, or
issue them for the partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and
may attach to the exercise of the rights granted such terms and
conditions as, in its judgment, the public convenience and necessity
may require.
Any right, privilege, certificate held, owned, or obtained by a
solid waste collection company may be sold, assigned, leased,
transferred, or inherited as other property, but only upon
authorization by the commission.
Any solid waste collection company which upon July 1, 1961 is
operating under authority of a common carrier or contract carrier
permit issued under the provisions of chapter 81.80 RCW shall be
granted a certificate of necessity without hearing upon compliance with
the provisions of this chapter. Such solid waste collection company
which has paid the plate fee and gross weight fees required by chapter
81.80 RCW for the year 1961 shall not be required to pay additional
like fees under the provisions of this chapter for the remainder of
such year.
For purposes of issuing certificates under this chapter, the
commission may adopt categories of solid wastes as follows: Garbage,
refuse, recyclable materials, and demolition debris. A certificate may
be issued for one or more categories of solid waste. Certificates
issued on or before July 23, 1989, shall not be expanded or restricted
by operation of this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 81.84.020 and 1993 c 427 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of an application the commission shall give
reasonable notice to the department, affected cities and counties, and
any common carrier which might be adversely affected, of the time and
place for hearing on such application. The commission shall have power
after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, to issue the certificate
as prayed for, or to refuse to issue it, or to issue it for the partial
exercise only of the privilege sought, and may attach to the exercise
of the rights granted by said certificate such terms and conditions as
in its judgment the public convenience and necessity may require; but
the commission shall not have power to grant a certificate to operate
between districts and/or into any territory prohibited by RCW 47.60.120
or already served by an existing certificate holder, unless such
existing certificate holder has failed or refused to furnish reasonable
and adequate service ((or)), has failed to provide the service
described in its certificate or tariffs after the time period allowed
to initiate service has elapsed, or has not objected to the issuance of
the certificate as prayed for: PROVIDED, A certificate shall be
granted when it shall appear to the satisfaction of the commission that
the commercial ferry was actually operating in good faith over the
route for which such certificate shall be sought, on January 15, 1927:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That in case two or more commercial ferries shall
upon said date have been operating vessels upon the same route, or
between the same districts the commission shall determine after public
hearing whether one or more certificates shall issue, and in
determining to whom a certificate or certificates shall be issued, the
commission shall consider all material facts and circumstances
including the prior operation, schedules, and services rendered by
either of the ferries, and in case more than one certificate shall
issue, the commission shall fix and determine the schedules and
services of the ferries to which the certificates are issued to the end
that duplication of service be eliminated and public convenience be
furthered.
(2) Before issuing a certificate, the commission shall determine
that the applicant has the financial resources to operate the proposed
service for at least twelve months, based upon the submission by the
applicant of a pro forma financial statement of operations. Issuance
of a certificate shall be determined upon, but not limited to, the
following factors: Ridership and revenue forecasts; the cost of
service for the proposed operation; an estimate of the cost of the
assets to be used in providing the service; a statement of the total
assets on hand of the applicant that will be expended on the proposed
operation; and a statement of prior experience, if any, in such field
by the applicant. The documentation required of the applicant under
this section shall comply with the provisions of RCW 9A.72.085.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to an application
for a certificate that is pending as of July 25, 1993.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 81.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission may, with or without a hearing, issue temporary
certificates to engage in the business of operating an auto
transportation company, but only after it finds that the issuance of
the temporary certificate is consistent with the public interest. The
temporary certificate may be issued for a period up to one hundred
eighty days. The commission may prescribe rules and impose terms and
conditions as in its judgment are reasonable and necessary in carrying
out this chapter. The commission may by rule, prescribe a fee for an
application for the temporary certificate. The commission shall not
issue a temporary certificate to operate in a territory: (1) For which
a certificate has been issued, unless the existing certificate holder,
upon twenty days' notice, does not object to the issuance of the
certificate or is not providing service; or (2) for which an
application is pending unless the filing for a temporary certificate is
made by the applicant or the applicant does not object to the issuance
of the certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---