BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that
this act clarify certain authorities of employees of the Washington
utilities and transportation commission. The legislature finds that
this act is necessary to ensure the continuance of existing safety
inspection programs. Further, this act does not create a new program
or authorize new authority, and will not result in the expansion of the
existing program.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.44.065 and 1961 c 14 s 81.44.065 are each amended
to read as follows:
The utilities and transportation commission shall exercise all
powers and duties in relation to the inspection of tracks, bridges,
structures, equipment, apparatus, and appliances of railroads with
respect to the safety of employees and the public and the
administration and enforcement of all laws providing for the protection
of the public and employees of railroads ((which prior to)) that before
April 1, 1955, were vested in and required to be performed by the
director of labor and industries.
A commission employee certified by the federal railroad
administration to perform hazardous materials inspections may enter the
property of any business that receives, ships, or offers for shipment
hazardous materials by rail, or that manufactures, marks, maintains,
reconditions, repairs, or tests containers that are represented,
marked, certified, or sold for use in the transportation of hazardous
materials by rail. Entry shall be at a reasonable time and in a
reasonable manner. The purpose of such entry is limited to performing
inspections, investigations, or surveillance of facilities, equipment,
records, and operations relating to the packaging, loading, or
transportation of hazardous materials by rail, pursuant only to the
state participation program outlined in 49 C.F.R. Part 212. The term
"business" is all inclusive and is not limited to common carriers or
public service companies.

--- END ---