BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.06C.010 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the public health and safety of its
citizens, the natural resources, and the environment are vital
interests of the state that need to be protected and preserved. The
legislature further finds that the safety of the traveling public and
the state's economic well-being are vital interests that depend upon
the development of cost-effective and efficient transportation systems
planned, designed, constructed, and maintained through expedited permit
decision-making processes.
It is the intent of the legislature to achieve transportation
permit reform that expedites the delivery of ((statewide significant))
transportation projects through a streamlined approach to environmental
permit decision making. To optimize the limited resources available
for transportation system improvements and environmental protection,
state regulatory and natural resource agencies, public and private
sector interests, Indian tribes, local and regional governments,
applicable federal agencies, and the department of transportation must
work cooperatively to establish common goals, minimize project delays,
develop consistency in the application of environmental standards,
maximize environmental benefits through coordinated investment
strategies, and eliminate duplicative processes through assigned
responsibilities of selected permit drafting and compliance activities
between state and federal agencies.
Therefore, the transportation permit efficiency and accountability
committee is created. The committee shall integrate current
environmental standards, but may not create new environmental
standards. The committee shall conduct three environmental permit
streamlining pilot projects and create a process to develop general
permits. Additionally, the committee shall seek federal delegation to
the state where appropriate to streamline transportation projects.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.06C.040 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 2 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The committee and its authorized technical subcommittees
shall develop a one-stop permit decision-making process that uses
interdisciplinary review of transportation projects of statewide
significance to streamline and expedite permit decision making. The
committee shall collaborate with appropriate agencies and parties to
identify existing environmental standards, to assess the application of
those standards, and develop an integrated permitting process based
upon environmental standards and best management practices, which may
use prescriptive or performance standards, for transportation projects
of statewide significance that can be applied with certainty,
consistency, and assurance of swift permit action, while taking into
account the varying environmental conditions throughout the state.
(b) By June 30, 2003, the committee shall develop a detailed work
plan of one-stop permitting activities for review by the legislature.
The work plan must include both a schedule to use the one-stop permit
process on all funded transportation projects of statewide significance
and any additional resources needed to ensure that this occurs. This
work plan must include a process that enables the department to propose
permit terms and conditions for permitting agency review and approval.
(c) The committee shall provide a status report to the legislature
by December 31, 2003, and shall also identify barriers and
opportunities to achieve a concurrent public review process, concurrent
public hearings, and a unified appeals process for one-stop permitting.
(2) The committee shall give notice to the legislative authority of
each affected county and city of the projects that are designated as
transportation projects of statewide significance.
(3) The committee shall create a technical subcommittee with
representation at a minimum from the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of ecology, and the department of transportation.
(a) Within six months from the first meeting of the committee, the
subcommittee shall create a process to develop a programmatic approach
for transportation projects. The committee shall review the
department's construction project list to determine which projects or
activities may be included in the programmatic approach and develop
agreements ((to cover)) with a goal of covering seventy percent of
those projects or activities with programmatic agreements. At a
minimum, this process must require that decisions on minor variations
to the requirements of a programmatic approach must be provided by the
permit decision-making agencies within twenty-one days of submittal.
(b) By June 30, 2003, the committee shall prioritize programmatic
agreement opportunities identified in (a) of this subsection, develop
a detailed work plan to achieve the goals set forth, and submit the
report and plan to the legislature. The work plan must be reviewed and
updated on a quarterly basis and submitted to the legislature twice
yearly. This work plan must include the following elements:
(i) A schedule of activities and resources needed to achieve
completion of the nine highest priority multiagency programmatic
agreements by June 30, 2004;
(ii) A prioritized list of the remaining departmental activities
eligible for programmatic, multiagency consideration by September 30,
2003;
(iii) A schedule of activities and resources to achieve completion
of the prioritized list of programmatic agreements by December 31,
2005.
(c) The committee shall work with local governments to identify
opportunities to integrate local government requirements in the
agreements or permits identified in (b) of this subsection.
(d) The technical subcommittee's recommendations must be approved
by a majority of the voting members of the committee.
(4) The committee shall explore the development of a consolidated
local permit process.
(5) The committee shall conduct one or more pilot projects to
implement the collaborative review process set forth in RCW 36.70A.430
to review and coordinate state and local permits for a transportation
project funded in the transportation budget and that crosses more than
one city or county boundary.
(6) The committee shall appoint a task force of representatives
from cities and counties, the department of transportation, and other
agencies as appropriate to identify one or more city or county permits
for activities for which uniform standards can be developed for
application by local governments. It is the goal of the task force to
develop uniform standards and best practices for these identified
permits that may be used by local governments in issuing their permits.
The task force shall identify strategies for local governments to adapt
these standards and best practices to local conditions. The committee
shall encourage local governments to use these standards and best
practices in local ordinances. The task force shall submit a progress
report to the committee and the legislature by December 31, 2003, and
shall conclude its work and report its final recommendations for review
to the committee and the legislature no later than December 31, 2004.
(7) The committee shall develop and prioritize a list of permit
streamlining opportunities, specifically identifying substantive and
procedural duplications and recommendations for resolving those
duplications. The committee shall evaluate current laws and
regulations and develop recommendations on ways to minimize the lapsing
of permits. The committee shall evaluate flexible approaches that
maximize transportation and environmental interests and make
recommendations regarding where those approaches should be implemented.
((The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the
legislature by January 15, 2002.
(6))) (8) The committee shall undertake the following activities to
develop a watershed approach to environmental mitigation:
(a) Develop methodologies for analyzing environmental impacts and
applying compensatory mitigation consistent with a watershed-based
approach before final design, including least cost methodology and low-impact development methodology;
(b) Assess models to collate and access watershed data to support
early agency involvement in transportation planning and reviews under
the national Environmental Policy Act and the State Environmental
Policy Act; ((and))
(c) Use existing best available information from watershed planning
efforts, lead entities, regional fisheries enhancement groups, and
other recognized entities as deemed appropriate by the committee, to
determine potential mitigation requirements for projects within a
watershed. Priority consideration should be given to the use of the
state's alternative mitigation policy guidance to best link
transportation mitigation needs with local watershed and lead entity
project lists; and
(d) By June 30, 2003, develop a detailed work plan that covers
watershed-based mitigation activities. This work plan must be
submitted to the legislature and include the following elements:
(i) A schedule of activities and resources needed to complete a
watershed-based mitigation policy by December 31, 2003, that covers
elements of permitting deemed appropriate by the committee;
(ii) A schedule of activities and resources needed to develop
watershed-based mitigation decision-making tools by June 30, 2004;
(iii) A schedule of activities and resources needed to complete a
test of technical and policy methods of watershed-based mitigation
decision making by December 31, 2004, for a funded project in an
urbanized area of the state; and
(iv) A schedule to integrate watershed-based mitigation policies,
technical tools, and procedures for projects by June 30, 2005.
(((7))) (9)(a) The committee shall seek federal delegation to the
state where appropriate to streamline permit processes for
transportation projects of statewide significance including:
Delegation of section 404 permit authority under the Clean Water Act;
nonfederal lead agency status under the federal Endangered Species Act;
section 106 cultural resource designation under the National Historic
Preservation Act; and other appropriate authority that when delegated
should result in permit streamlining.
(((8))) (b) The department, the department of ecology, and the
department of fish and wildlife shall jointly review relevant federal,
state, and local environmental laws, regulations, policies, guidance,
studies, and streamlining initiatives, and shall report to the
committee and the legislature by September 30, 2003, on those instances
where such might allow for delegation to the department or some other
duly recognized entity as appropriate. The report must include
recommendations on:
(i) How to delegate consistent with federal permit streamlining
efforts contained in new federal transportation authorizations and
under Presidential Executive Order number 13274, Environmental
Stewardship and Transportation Infrastructure Project Reviews,
September 18, 2002;
(ii) How to maximize possible use of programmatic approaches to
simplify issuance of federally required permits and project approvals;
(iii) The scope, roles, and responsibilities associated with any
such delegation, especially as relates to regulatory standard setting,
permitting, and oversight; and
(iv) A work plan and schedule of activities and resources needed to
implement the recommendations of the department, the department of
ecology, and the department of fish and wildlife on this matter.
The committee shall take action on the report, and shall report to
the legislature by December 31, 2003, and every six months thereafter
on the status of such delegation efforts.
(10) The committee shall develop a dispute resolution process to
resolve conflicts in interpretation of environmental standards and best
management practices, mitigation requirements, permit requirements,
assigned responsibilities, and other related issues by September 1,
2001. The dispute resolution process may not abrogate or supplant any
appeal right of any party under existing statutes. The dispute
resolution process must be designed to include federal agencies if they
choose to participate.
(((9))) (11) The committee shall develop preliminary models and
strategies for agencies to test how best to maximize the environmental
investment of transportation funds on a watershed basis. After
agencies test the models and strategies developed by the committee, the
committee shall evaluate the models and strategies and make
recommendations to the legislature.
(((10))) (12) The committee shall develop a consistent methodology
for the timely and predictable submittal and evaluation of completed
plans and specifications detailing project elements that impact
environmental resources as well as proposed mitigation measures during
the preliminary specifications and engineering phase of project
development and submit information on the consistent methodology to the
legislature.
(((11))) (13) The committee shall provide a summary report to the
legislature on ((September 15, 2001)) December 31, 2003, and every six
months thereafter that details the committee's status and performance
and its progress in implementing its master work plan.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.06C.901 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 2 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
This act expires March 31, ((2003)) 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---