BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Burdensome, duplicative, and conflicting rules and regulatory
programs are significantly hampering economic growth and prosperity for
the citizens of Washington state.
(2) Multiple layers of redundant federal, state, and local
environmental laws and regulations unnecessarily impede economic
development and job creation while undermining Washington state's
competitiveness in the national and global economy.
(3) The hydraulic project approval program was established prior to
the enactment of the federal endangered species act, the state
environmental policy act, shorelines management act, water pollution
control act, water resources act, and the growth management act.
(4) The provisions of the hydraulic project approval program are
now redundant or conflict with protective provisions adopted under
section 4(d) of the federal endangered species act by the national
marine fisheries service and the United States fish and wildlife
service.
(5) The provisions of the hydraulic project approval program are
also redundant or conflict with storm water and beneficial use
provisions adopted under the state water pollution control act and the
water resources act.
(6) The provisions of the hydraulic project approval program are
also redundant or conflict with provisions for protection of aquatic
resources in the shorelines management act and rules proposed for
adoption by the state department of ecology to implement the act.
(7) The provisions of the hydraulic project approval program are
also redundant or conflict with provisions of the state growth
management act requiring protection of critical areas.
(8) The unfair implementation of the hydraulic project approval
program by department of ecology's field staff, particularly in the
Skagit watershed, is placing an undue burden on the ability of the
agricultural community to farm in an economically viable manner.
(9) The hydraulic project approval program can therefore be
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of fish and wildlife shall
make all data collected through the salmon and steelhead habitat
inventory and assessment project, salmon and steelhead stock assessment
program, or other data sources established by the department related to
aquatic species readily available to federal, state, and local
agencies, volunteer groups, citizens, and other interested parties.
The data may be used for permitting decisions by regulatory agencies,
determining appropriate on-site and off-site wetlands mitigation,
watershed-based mitigation as developed by the transportation permit
efficiency and accountability committee, maximizing environmental
investments on a watershed basis, identifying habitat enhancement and
restoration opportunities for aquatic species, and other appropriate
uses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW
34.05.020, all rules made by the Washington state fish and wildlife
commission relating to the hydraulic project approval program shall be
repealed, without further action by the commission by July 1, 2003.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.09.350 and 1997 c 290 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes the importance of providing the greatest
diversity of habitats, particularly riparian, wetland, and old growth
habitats, and of assuring the greatest diversity of species within
those habitats for the survival and reproduction of enough individuals
to maintain the native wildlife of Washington forest lands. The
legislature also recognizes the importance of long-term habitat
productivity for natural and wild fish, for the protection of hatchery
water supplies, and for the protection of water quality and quantity to
meet the needs of people, fish, and wildlife. The legislature
recognizes the importance of maintaining and enhancing fish and
wildlife habitats capable of sustaining the commercial and
noncommercial uses of fish and wildlife. The legislature further
recognizes the importance of the continued growth and development of
the state's forest products industry which has a vital stake in the
long-term productivity of both the public and private forest land base.
The development of a landscape planning system would help achieve
these goals. Landowners and resource managers should be provided
incentives to voluntarily develop long-term multispecies landscape
management plans that will provide protection to public resources.
Because landscape planning represents a departure from the use of
standard baseline rules and may result in unintended consequences to
both the affected habitats and to a landowner's economic interests, the
legislature desires to establish up to seven experimental pilot
programs to gain experience with landscape planning that may prove
useful in fashioning legislation of a more general application.
(1) Until December 31, 2000, the department in cooperation with the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when
relating to water quality protection, is granted authority to select
not more than seven pilot projects for the purpose of developing
individual landowner multispecies landscape management plans.
(a) Pilot project participants must be selected by the department
in cooperation with the department of fish and wildlife, and the
department of ecology when relating to water quality protection, no
later than October 1, 1997.
(b) The number and the location of the pilot projects are to be
determined by the department in cooperation with the department of fish
and wildlife, and the department of ecology when relating to water
quality protection, and should be selected on the basis of risk to the
habitat and species, variety and importance of species and habitats in
the planning area, geographic distribution, surrounding ownership,
other ongoing landscape and watershed planning activities in the area,
potential benefits to water quantity and quality, financial and
staffing capabilities of participants, and other factors that will
contribute to the creation of landowner multispecies landscape planning
efforts.
(c) Each pilot project shall have a landscape management plan with
the following elements:
(i) An identification of public resources selected for coverage
under the plan and measurable objectives for the protection of the
selected public resources;
(ii) A termination date of not later than 2050;
(iii) A general description of the planning area including its
geographic location, physical and biological features, habitats, and
species known to be present;
(iv) An identification of the existing forest practices rules that
will not apply during the term of the plan;
(v) Proposed habitat management strategies or prescriptions;
(vi) A projection of the habitat conditions likely to result from
the implementation of the specified management strategies or
prescriptions;
(vii) An assessment of habitat requirements and the current habitat
conditions of representative species included in the plan;
(viii) An assessment of potential or likely impacts to
representative species resulting from the prescribed forest practices;
(ix) A description of the anticipated benefits to those species or
other species as a result of plan implementation;
(x) A monitoring plan;
(xi) Reporting requirements including a schedule for review of the
plan's performance in meeting its objectives;
(xii) Conditions under which a plan may be modified, including a
procedure for adaptive management;
(xiii) Conditions under which a plan may be terminated;
(xiv) A procedure for adaptive management that evaluates the
effectiveness of the plan to meet its measurable public resources
objectives, reflects changes in the best available science, and
provides changes to its habitat management strategies, prescriptions,
and hydraulic project standards to the extent agreed to in the plan and
in a timely manner and schedule;
(xv) A description of how the plan relates to publicly available
plans of adjacent federal, state, tribal, and private timberland
owners; and
(xvi) A statement of whether the landowner intends to apply for
approval of the plan under applicable federal law.
(2) Until December 31, 2000, the department, in agreement with the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when the
landowner elects to cover water quality in the plan, shall approve a
landscape management plan and enter into a binding implementation
agreement with the landowner when such departments find, based upon the
best scientific data available, that:
(a) The plan contains all of the elements required under this
section including measurable public resource objectives;
(b) The plan is expected to be effective in meeting those
objectives;
(c) The landowner has sufficient financial resources to implement
the management strategies or prescriptions to be implemented by the
landowner under the plan;
(d) The plan will:
(i) Provide better protection than current state law for the public
resources selected for coverage under the plan considered in the
aggregate; and
(ii) Compared to conditions that could result from compliance with
current state law:
(A) Not result in poorer habitat conditions over the life of the
plan for any species selected for coverage that is listed as threatened
or endangered under federal or state law, or that has been identified
as a candidate for such listing, at the time the plan is approved; and
(B) Measurably improve habitat conditions for species selected for
special consideration under the plan;
(e) The plan shall include watershed analysis or provide for a
level of protection that meets or exceeds the protection that would be
provided by watershed analysis, if the landowner selects fish or water
quality as a public resource to be covered under the plan. Any
alternative process to watershed analysis would be subject to timely
peer review;
(f) The planning process provides for a public participation
process during the development of the plan, which shall be developed by
the department in cooperation with the landowner.
The management plans must be submitted to the department and the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when the
landowner elects to cover water quality in the plan, no later than
March 1, 2000. The department shall provide an opportunity for public
comment on the proposed plan. The comment period shall not be less
than forty-five days. The department shall approve or reject plans
within one hundred twenty days of submittal by the landowner of a final
plan. The decision by the department, in agreement with the department
of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology when the landowner
has elected to cover water quality in the plan, to approve or
disapprove the management plan is subject to the environmental review
process of chapter 43.21C RCW, provided that any public comment period
provided for under chapter 43.21C RCW shall run concurrently with the
public comment period provided in this subsection (2).
(3) After a landscape management plan is adopted((:
(a))), forest practices consistent with the plan need not comply
with:
(((i))) (a) The specific forest practices rules identified in the
plan; and
(((ii))) (b) Any forest practice rules and policies adopted after
the approval of the plan to the extent that the rules:
(((A))) (i) Have been adopted primarily for the protection of a
public resource selected for coverage under the plan; or
(((B))) (ii) Provide for procedural or administrative obligations
inconsistent with or in addition to those provided for in the plan with
respect to those public resources((; and
(b) If the landowner has selected fish as one of the public
resources to be covered under the plan, the plan shall serve as the
hydraulic project approval for the life of the plan, in compliance with
RCW 75.20.100)).
(4) The department is authorized to issue a single landscape level
permit valid for the life of the plan to a landowner who has an
approved landscape management plan and who has requested a landscape
permit from the department. Landowners receiving a landscape level
permit shall meet annually with the department and the department of
fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology where water quality
has been selected as a public resource to be covered under the plan, to
review the specific forest practices activities planned for the next
twelve months and to determine whether such activities are in
compliance with the plan. The departments will consult with the
affected Indian tribes and other interested parties who have expressed
an interest in connection with the review. The landowner is to provide
ten calendar days' notice to the department prior to the commencement
of any forest practices authorized under a landscape level permit. The
landscape level permit will not impose additional conditions relating
to the public resources selected for coverage under the plan beyond
those agreed to in the plan. For the purposes of chapter 43.21C RCW,
forest practices conducted in compliance with an approved plan are
deemed not to have the potential for a substantial impact on the
environment as to any public resource selected for coverage under the
plan.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in a plan, the agreement
implementing the landscape management plan is an agreement that runs
with the property covered by the approved landscape management plan and
the department shall record notice of the plan in the real property
records of the counties in which the affected properties are located.
Prior to its termination, no plan shall permit forest land covered by
its terms to be withdrawn from such coverage, whether by sale,
exchange, or other means, nor to be converted to nonforestry uses
except to the extent that such withdrawal or conversion would not
measurably impair the achievement of the plan's stated public resource
objectives. If a participant transfers all or part of its interest in
the property, the terms of the plan still apply to the new landowner
for the plan's stated duration unless the plan is terminated under its
terms or unless the plan specifies the conditions under which the terms
of the plan do not apply to the new landowner.
(6) The departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife, and
ecology shall seek to develop memorandums of agreements with federal
agencies and affected Indian tribes relating to tribal issues in the
landscape management plans. The departments shall solicit input from
affected Indian tribes in connection with the selection, review, and
approval of any landscape management plan. If any recommendation is
received from an affected Indian tribe and is not adopted by the
departments, the departments shall provide a written explanation of
their reasons for not adopting the recommendation.
(7) The department is directed to report to the forest practices
board annually through the year 2000, but no later than December 31st
of each year, on the status of each pilot project. The department is
directed to provide to the forest practices board, no later than
December 31, 2000, an evaluation of the pilot projects including a
determination if a permanent landscape planning process should be
established along with a discussion of what legislative and rule
modifications are necessary.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.55.080 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 74 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Before a person commences construction on a dam or other
((hydraulic project)) obstruction across or in a stream for which the
director determines that a fishway is impractical, the person shall at
the option of the director:
(((1))) (a) Convey to the state a fish cultural facility on a site
satisfactory to the director and constructed according to plans and
specifications approved by the director, and enter into an agreement
with the director secured by sufficient bond, to furnish water and
electricity, without expense, and funds necessary to operate and
maintain the facilities; or
(((2))) (b) Enter into an agreement with the director secured by
sufficient bond to make payments to the state as the director
determines are necessary to expand, maintain, and operate additional
facilities at existing hatcheries within a reasonable distance of the
dam or other ((hydraulic work)) obstruction across or in a stream to
compensate for the damages caused by the dam or other hydraulic work.
(((3))) (2) A decision of the director under this section is
subject to review in the superior court of the state for Thurston
county. ((Each day that a person carries on construction work or
operates a dam or hydraulic project without complying with this section
is a separate offense.))

Sec. 6 RCW 77.55.130 and 2000 c 107 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department and the department of ecology will work
cooperatively with the United States army corps of engineers to develop
a memorandum of agreement outlining dike vegetation management
guidelines so that dike owners are eligible for coverage under P.L.
84-99((, and state requirements established pursuant to RCW 77.55.100
and 77.55.110 are met)).

Sec. 7 RCW 77.55.160 and 1998 c 190 s 89 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for the north fork of the Lewis river and the White
Salmon river, all streams and rivers tributary to the Columbia river
downstream from McNary dam are established as an anadromous fish
sanctuary. This sanctuary is created to preserve and develop the food
fish and game fish resources in these streams and rivers and to protect
them against undue industrial encroachment.
(2) Within the sanctuary area:
(a) ((The department shall not issue hydraulic project approval
to)) No public or private entity may construct a dam greater than
twenty-five feet high within the migration range of anadromous fish as
determined by the department.
(b) A person shall not divert water from rivers and streams in
quantities that will reduce the respective stream flow below the annual
average low flow, based upon data published in United States geological
survey reports.
(3) The commission may acquire and abate a dam or other
obstruction, or acquire any water right vested on a sanctuary stream or
river, which is in conflict with the provisions of subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) Subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply to the
sediment retention structure to be built on the North Fork Toutle river
by the United States army corps of engineers.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.55.270 and 1997 c 415 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Small scale prospecting and mining shall not require written
approval under this chapter if the prospecting is conducted in
accordance with provisions established by the department.
(2))) By December 31, 1998, the department shall adopt rules
applicable to small scale prospecting and mining activities subject to
this section. The department shall develop the rules in cooperation
with the recreational mining community and other interested parties.
(((3))) (2) Within two months of adoption of the rules, the
department shall distribute an updated gold and fish pamphlet that
describes methods of mineral prospecting that are consistent with the
department's rule. The pamphlet shall be written to clearly indicate
the prospecting methods that require written approval under this
chapter and the prospecting methods that require compliance with the
pamphlet. ((To the extent possible, the department shall use the
provisions of the gold and fish pamphlet to minimize the number of
specific provisions of a written approval issued under this chapter.
(4))) (3) For the purposes of this chapter, "small scale
prospecting and mining" means only the use of the following methods:
Pans, nonmotorized sluice boxes, concentrators, and minirocker boxes
for the discovery and recovery of minerals.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.55.290 and 2001 c 253 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((In order to receive the permit review and approval process
created in this section, a fish habitat enhancement project must meet
the criteria under (a) and (b) of this subsection:))
(a) A fish habitat enhancement project must be a project to
accomplish one or more of the following tasks:
(i) Elimination of human-made fish passage barriers, including
culvert repair and replacement;
(ii) Restoration of an eroded or unstable stream bank employing the
principle of bioengineering, including limited use of rock as a
stabilization only at the toe of the bank, and with primary emphasis on
using native vegetation to control the erosive forces of flowing water;
or
(iii) Placement of woody debris or other instream structures that
benefit naturally reproducing fish stocks.
((The department shall develop size or scale threshold tests to
determine if projects accomplishing any of these tasks should be
evaluated under the process created in this section or under other
project review and approval processes. A project proposal shall not be
reviewed under the process created in this section if the department
determines that the scale of the project raises concerns regarding
public health and safety; and))
(b) A fish habitat enhancement project must be approved in one of
the following ways:
(i) ((By the department pursuant to chapter 77.95 or 77.100 RCW;
(ii))) By the sponsor of a watershed restoration plan as provided
in chapter 89.08 RCW;
(((iii))) (ii) By the department as a department-sponsored fish
habitat enhancement or restoration project;
(((iv) Through the review and approval process for the jobs for the
environment program;
(v))) (iii) Through the review and approval process for
conservation district-sponsored projects, where the project complies
with design standards established by the conservation commission
through interagency agreement with the United States fish and wildlife
service and the natural resource conservation service;
(((vi))) (iv) Through a formal grant program established by the
legislature or the department for fish habitat enhancement or
restoration; and
(((vii))) (v) Through other formal review and approval processes
established by the legislature or the federal government.
(2) Fish habitat enhancement projects meeting the criteria of
subsection (1)(a) of this section are expected to result in beneficial
impacts to the environment. Decisions pertaining to fish habitat
enhancement projects meeting the criteria of subsection (1)(a) of this
section and being reviewed and approved according to the provisions of
subsection (1)(b) of this section are not subject to the requirements
of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).
(3) ((Hydraulic project approval is required for projects that meet
the criteria of subsection (1) of this section and are being reviewed
and approved under this section. An applicant shall use a joint
aquatic resource permit application form developed by the department of
ecology permit assistance center to apply for approval under this
chapter. On the same day, the applicant shall provide copies of the
completed application form to the department and to each appropriate
local government. Local governments shall accept the application as
notice of the proposed project. The department shall provide a
fifteen-day comment period during which it will receive comments
regarding environmental impacts. In no more than forty-five days, the
department shall either issue hydraulic project approval, with or
without conditions, deny approval, or make a determination that the
review and approval process created by this section is not appropriate
for the proposed project. The department shall base this determination
on identification during the comment period of adverse impacts that
cannot be mitigated by hydraulic project approval. If the department
determines that the review and approval process created by this section
is not appropriate for the proposed project, the department shall
notify the applicant and the appropriate local governments of its
determination. The applicant may reapply for approval of the project
under other review and approval processes.
Any person aggrieved by the approval, denial, conditioning, or
modification of hydraulic project approval under this section may
formally appeal the decision to the hydraulic appeals board pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter.
(4))) No local government may require permits or charge fees for
fish habitat enhancement projects that meet the criteria of subsection
(1)(b) of this section and that are reviewed and approved according to
the provisions of this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.55.300 and 2000 c 107 s 229 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning in January 1998, the department of fish and wildlife
and the department of natural resources shall implement a habitat
incentives program based on the recommendations of federally recognized
Indian tribes, landowners, the regional fisheries enhancement groups,
the timber, fish, and wildlife cooperators, and other interested
parties. The program shall allow a private landowner to enter into an
agreement with the departments to enhance habitat on the landowner's
property for food fish, game fish, or other wildlife species. In
exchange, the landowner shall receive state regulatory certainty with
regard to future applications for ((hydraulic project approval or)) a
forest practices permit on the property covered by the agreement. The
overall goal of the program is to provide a mechanism that facilitates
habitat development on private property while avoiding an adverse state
regulatory impact to the landowner at some future date. A single
agreement between the departments and a landowner may encompass up to
one thousand acres. A landowner may enter into multiple agreements
with the departments, provided that the total acreage covered by such
agreements with a single landowner does not exceed ten thousand acres.
The departments are not obligated to enter into an agreement unless the
departments find that the agreement is in the best interest of
protecting fish or wildlife species or their habitat.
(2) A habitat incentives agreement shall be in writing and shall
contain at least the following: A description of the property covered
by the agreement, an expiration date, a description of the condition of
the property prior to the implementation of the agreement, and other
information needed by the landowner and the departments for future
reference and decisions.
(3) ((As part of the agreement, the department of fish and wildlife
may stipulate the factors that will be considered when the department
evaluates a landowner's application for hydraulic project approval
under RCW 77.55.100 or 77.55.110 on property covered by the agreement.
The department's identification of these evaluation factors shall be in
concurrence with the department of natural resources and affected
federally recognized Indian tribes. In general, future decisions
related to the issuance, conditioning, or denial of hydraulic project
approval shall be based on the conditions present on the landowner's
property at the time of the agreement, unless all parties agree
otherwise.
(4))) As part of the agreement, the department of natural resources
may stipulate the factors that will be considered when the department
evaluates a landowner's application for a forest practices permit under
chapter 76.09 RCW on property covered by the agreement. The
department's identification of these evaluation factors shall be in
concurrence with the department of fish and wildlife and affected
federally recognized Indian tribes. In general, future decisions
related to the issuance, conditioning, or denial of forest practices
permits shall be based on the conditions present on the landowner's
property at the time of the agreement, unless all parties agree
otherwise.
(((5))) (4) The agreement is binding on and may be used by only the
landowner who entered into the agreement with the department. The
agreement shall not be appurtenant with the land. However, if a new
landowner chooses to maintain the habitat enhancement efforts on the
property, the new landowner and the departments may jointly choose to
retain the agreement on the property.
(((6))) (5) If the departments receive multiple requests for
agreements with private landowners under the habitat incentives
program, the departments shall prioritize these requests and shall
enter into as many agreements as possible within available budgetary
resources.

Sec. 11 RCW 89.08.470 and 1998 c 249 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 1996, the Washington conservation commission
shall develop, in consultation with other state agencies, tribes, and
local governments, a consolidated application process for permits for
a watershed restoration project developed by an agency or sponsored by
an agency on behalf of a volunteer organization. The consolidated
process shall include a single permit application form for use by all
responsible state and local agencies. The commission shall encourage
use of the consolidated permit application process by any federal
agency responsible for issuance of related permits. The permit
application forms to be consolidated shall include, at a minimum,
applications for: (a) Approvals related to water quality standards
under chapter 90.48 RCW; and (b) ((hydraulic project approvals under
chapter 75.20 RCW; and (c))) section 401 water quality certifications
under 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341 and chapter 90.48 RCW.
(2) If a watershed restoration project is also a fish habitat
enhancement project that meets the criteria of RCW ((75.20.350(1)))
77.55.290(1), the project sponsor shall instead follow the permit
review and approval process established in RCW ((75.20.350)) 77.55.290
with regard to state and local government permitting requirements. The
sponsor shall so notify state and local permitting authorities.

Sec. 12 RCW 90.58.147 and 1998 c 249 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public or private project that is designed to improve fish or
wildlife habitat or fish passage shall be exempt from the substantial
development permit requirements of this chapter when all of the
following apply:
(a) The project has been approved by the department of fish and
wildlife; and
(b) ((The project has received hydraulic project approval by the
department of fish and wildlife pursuant to chapter 75.20 RCW; and
(c))) The local government has determined that the project is
substantially consistent with the local shoreline master program. The
local government shall make such determination in a timely manner and
provide it by letter to the project proponent.
(2) Fish habitat enhancement projects that conform to the
provisions of RCW ((75.20.350)) 77.55.290 are determined to be
consistent with local shoreline master programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 77.15.300 (Unlawful hydraulic project activities -- Penalty)
and 2000 c 107 s 239 & 1998 c 190 s 52;
(2) RCW 77.55.020 (Environmental excellence program agreements--Effect on chapter) and 1997 c 381 s 25;
(3) RCW 77.55.030 (Hazardous substance remedial actions -- Procedural
requirements not applicable) and 1994 c 257 s 18;
(4) RCW 77.55.090 (Mitigation plan review) and 2000 c 107 s 15 &
1997 c 424 s 6;
(5) RCW 77.55.100 (Hydraulic projects or other work -- Plans and
specifications -- Permits -- Approval -- Emergencies) and 2002 c 368 s 2,
2000 c 107 s 16, & 1998 c 190 s 87;
(6) RCW 77.55.110 (Hydraulic projects for irrigation, stock
watering, or streambank stabilization -- Plans and specifications--Approval -- Emergencies) and 2002 c 368 s 3, 1998 c 190 s 88, 1993 sp.s.
c 2 s 32, 1991 c 322 s 31, 1988 c 272 s 2, 1988 c 36 s 34, & 1986 c 173
s 2;
(7) RCW 77.55.120 (Placement of woody debris as condition of
permit) and 2000 c 107 s 17, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 33, & 1991 c 322 s 18;
(8) RCW 77.55.140 (Hydraulic projects -- Civil penalty) and 2000 c
107 s 19, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 35, 1988 c 36 s 35, & 1986 c 173 s 6;
(9) RCW 77.55.150 (Hydraulic projects for removal or control of
spartina, purple loosestrife, and aquatic noxious weeds -- Approval may
not be required -- Rules -- Definitions) and 1995 c 255 s 4;
(10) RCW 77.55.170 (Hydraulic appeals board -- Members--Jurisdiction -- Procedures) and 2000 c 107 s 20, 1996 c 276 s 2, 1993
sp.s. c 2 s 37, 1989 c 175 s 160, 1988 c 272 s 3, 1988 c 36 s 37, &
1986 c 173 s 4;
(11) RCW 77.55.180 (Hydraulic appeals board -- Procedures) and 1995
c 382 s 7, 1989 c 175 s 161, & 1986 c 173 s 5;
(12) RCW 77.55.190 (Processing of permits or authorizations for
emergency water withdrawal and facilities to be expedited) and 1989 c
171 s 8 & 1987 c 343 s 6;
(13) RCW 77.55.200 (Marine beach front protective bulkheads or
rockwalls) and 1991 c 279 s 1;
(14) RCW 77.55.210 (Watershed restoration projects -- Hydraulic
project approval -- Permit processing) and 1995 c 378 s 14;
(15) RCW 77.55.220 (Definitions -- Hydraulic project approval--Regular maintenance -- Notice required) and 2002 c 368 s 7 & 1996 c 192
s 2;
(16) RCW 77.55.230 (Hydraulic projects -- Off-site mitigation) and
1996 c 276 s 1;
(17) RCW 77.55.250 (Wetlands filled under RCW 75.20.300 -- Mitigation
not required) and 2000 c 107 s 21 & 1995 c 328 s 1;
(18) RCW 77.55.260 (Sediment dredging or capping actions -- Dredging
of existing channels and berthing areas -- Mitigation not required) and
1997 c 424 s 5;
(19) RCW 77.55.280 (Hydraulic project approval -- Habitat incentives
agreement) and 2001 c 253 s 54 & 1997 c 425 s 4;
(20) RCW 77.55.330 (Derelict fishing gear -- Removal) and 2002 c 20
s 4;
(21) RCW 77.55.340 (Hydraulic project approvals -- Storm water
discharges) and 2002 c 368 s 4;
(22) RCW 77.55.350 (Hydraulic project approvals -- Reasonable
conditions) and 2002 c 368 s 5; and
(23) RCW 77.55.360 (Certain secure community transition facilities
not subject to this chapter) and 2002 c 68 s 14.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---