BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.48.390 and 1999 c 325 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A governing unit may require that each person who is booked at a
city, county, or regional jail pay a fee ((of ten dollars)) based on
and not to exceed the jail's actual booking costs to the sheriff's
department of the county or police chief of the city in which the jail
is located. The fee is payable immediately from any money then
possessed by the person being booked, or any money deposited with the
sheriff's department or city jail administration on the person's
behalf. If the person has no funds at the time of booking or during
the period of incarceration, the sheriff or police chief may notify the
court in the county or city where the charges related to the booking
are pending, and may request the assessment of the fee. Unless the
person is held on other criminal matters, if the person is not charged,
is acquitted, or if all charges are dismissed, the sheriff or police
chief shall return the fee to the person at the last known address
listed in the booking records.

--- END ---