BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.36.250 and 1987 c 330 s 747 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the department or its delegate determines at any time for any
part of the public highway system that the unsafe conditions of the
roadway require particular tires, tire chains, or traction equipment in
addition to or beyond the ordinary pneumatic rubber tires, the
department may establish the following recommendations or requirements
with respect to the use of such equipment for all persons using such
public highway:
(((1) Dangerous road conditions, chains or other approved traction
devices recommended.
(2) Dangerous road conditions, chains or other approved traction
devices required.
(3) Dangerous road conditions, chains required.))
(1) Traction advisory - oversize vehicles prohibited.
(2) Traction advisory - oversize vehicles prohibited. Vehicles
over 10,000 GVW - chains required.
(3) Traction advisory - oversize vehicles prohibited. All vehicles
- chains required, except all wheel drive.
Any equipment that may be required by this section shall be
approved by the state patrol as authorized under RCW 46.37.420.
The department shall place and maintain signs and other traffic
control devices on the public highways that indicate the tire, tire
chain, or traction equipment recommendation or requirement determined
under this section. Such signs or traffic control devices shall in no
event prohibit the use of studded tires from November 1st to April 1st,
but when the department determines that chains are required and that no
other traction equipment will suffice, the requirement is applicable to
all types of tires including studded tires. The ((signs or traffic
control devices)) Washington state patrol or the department may specify
different recommendations or requirements for four wheel drive vehicles
in gear.
Failure to obey a requirement indicated ((by a sign or other
traffic control device placed or maintained)) under this section is a
((misdemeanor)) traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW subject to
a penalty of five hundred dollars including all statutory assessments.

--- END ---