BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, through a network of water masters
appointed under this chapter, stream patrollers appointed under chapter
90.08 RCW, and other assigned compliance staff, achieve compliance with
the water laws and rules of the state of Washington in the following
sequence:
(a) The department shall prepare and distribute technical and
educational information to assist water users in complying with the
requirements of their water rights and applicable water laws;
(b) When the department determines that a violation has occurred or
is about to occur, it shall first attempt to achieve voluntary
compliance by informing and educating the responsible person or persons
regarding the law, the reason that the action or incipient action is
not allowed under the law, and the potential penalties and sanctions
that may be brought if compliance is not achieved. As part of this
first response, the department shall offer technical information and
assistance to the person in identifying alternative means to accomplish
the person's purposes within the framework of the law; and
(c) If education and technical assistance do not achieve
compliance, the department shall issue a notice of violation, a formal
administrative order under RCW 43.27A.190, or assess penalties under
RCW 90.03.600, unless the noncompliance is corrected expeditiously or
the department determines no impairment or harm.
(2) This section is not intended to prevent the department from
taking immediate action to cause a violation to be ceased immediately
if in the opinion of the department the nature of the violation is
causing or is likely to cause immediate harm to other water rights or
to public resources.
(3) The department shall to the extent practicable station its
compliance personnel within the watershed communities they serve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.27A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of this section is to set forth the powers of the
department to regulate the withdrawal or diversion of public waters and
water or water rights related thereto including regulation based on
dates of priority or other pertinent factors. Regulatory actions taken
under this section shall be based on examination and determination by
the department or the court, as applicable, of the various water rights
involved according to the department's records and other records and
pertinent facts. The powers set forth in this section may be exercised
whether or not a general adjudication relating to the water rights
involved has been conducted.
(2) In a regulatory situation (a) where a water right or all water
rights proposed for regulation by the department, as well as any right
or rights of a senior priority that the proposed regulation is designed
to protect, is or are embodied in a certificate or certificates issued
under RCW 90.03.240, 90.03.330, 90.38.040, 90.42.040, or 90.44.060 or
a permit or permits issued pursuant to RCW 90.03.290 or 90.44.060; or
(b) where a flow or level has been established by rule pursuant to
chapter 90.22 or 90.54 RCW; or (c) where a provisional flow or level
has been adopted pursuant to RCW 43.21B.300; or (d) where it appears to
the department that public waters are being withdrawn without any right
or other appropriate authority whatsoever, the department in its
discretion is authorized to regulate the right or rights under either
RCW 43.27A.190 or subsection (3) of this section.
(3) In a regulatory situation where one or more of the water rights
proposed for regulation by the department, as well as any right or
rights of a senior priority that the proposed regulation is designed to
protect, is not or are not embodied in a permit or certificate as
described in subsection (2) of this section, the department, as its
sole and exclusive power to regulate, may bring an appropriate action
at law or in equity, including seeking injunctive relief, as it may
deem necessary. Where actions are brought in a state court, the
actions shall be initiated in the superior court of the county where
the point or points of diversion of the water right or rights proposed
for regulation are located. If the points of diversion are located in
more than one county, the department may bring the action in a county
where a point of diversion is located.
(4) This section does not authorize the department to accomplish a
general adjudication of water rights proceeding or the substantial
equivalent of a general adjudication of water rights. The exclusive
procedure for accomplishing a general adjudication of water rights is
under RCW 90.03.110 through 90.03.245 or 90.44.220.
(5) This section does not amend, revise, or repeal RCW 90.14.130 or
90.14.200.
(6) This section does not in any way modify regulatory powers
previously placed with the department except as provided in subsections
(2) and (3) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.03.600 and 1995 c 403 s 635 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080 and
43.05.150, the power is granted to the department ((of ecology)) to
levy civil penalties ((of up to)) from one hundred to one thousand
dollars per day for violation of any of the provisions of this chapter
and chapters 43.83B, 90.22, ((and)) 90.44, 90.54, and 90.66 RCW, and
rules, permits, ((and similar documents)) certificates, and regulatory
orders of the department ((of ecology)) adopted or issued pursuant to
such chapters. Each and every violation is a separate and distinct
offense. Every act of commission or omission that results in, aids, or
abets in the violation is considered a violation under this section and
subject to the penalty as provided for in this section.
(2) A minor violation is a violation that does not seriously
threaten public health, safety, or the environment and is subject to a
penalty of no more than one hundred dollars. Minor violations include
paperwork violations such as failure to provide metering records or
other required water use records upon request.
(3) The procedures of RCW 90.48.144 shall be applicable to all
phases of the levying of a penalty as well as review and appeal of the
same.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.21B.300 and 2001 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330 shall be imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified
mail with return receipt requested or by personal service, to the
person incurring the penalty from the department or the local air
authority, describing the violation with reasonable particularity.
Within fifteen days after the notice is received, the person incurring
the penalty may apply in writing to the department or the authority for
the remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the
application, the department or authority may remit or mitigate the
penalty upon whatever terms the department or the authority in its
discretion deems proper. The department or the authority may ascertain
the facts regarding all such applications in such reasonable manner and
under such rules as it may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the
penalty only upon a demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such
as the presence of information or factors not considered in setting the
original penalty.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the
appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or
authority thirty days after receipt by the person penalized of the
notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after receipt of the notice
of disposition of the application for relief from penalty.
(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:
(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;
(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition on
application for relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or
(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the
hearings board if the penalty is appealed.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney
general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior
court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in
which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and
rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.
(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed
pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation
account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), RCW 70.94.431, the
disposition of which shall be governed by that provision, RCW
70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and
elimination account, created by RCW 70.105.180, ((and)) RCW 90.56.330,
which shall be credited to the coastal protection fund created by RCW
90.48.390, and RCW 90.03.600, which shall be credited to the stream
flow restoration account created by section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
The stream flow restoration account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from penalties under RCW 43.21B.300 and
90.03.600 must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the department to purchase or lease water
rights for placement in the trust water rights program created in this
chapter and chapter 90.38 RCW. Moneys in the stream flow restoration
account may be spent only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may establish and maintain a stream keeper volunteer
program. Stream keeper volunteers shall be appointed by the director
to assist with administration of the water code and be assigned to any
water resource in the state, including but not limited to designated
water master districts. Where watershed management plans are being
developed or implemented under chapter 90.82 RCW, the director shall
consult with the planning unit or plan implementing entity before
making an appointment of a stream keeper volunteer for the geographic
area to be covered by the watershed management plan. The duties of
stream keeper volunteers are limited to providing information and
assistance regarding water use, facilitating cooperative arrangements
among water right holders during periods of shortage, and other
nonregulatory duties as determined by the department. The department
may consult with the Washington State University cooperative extension
service and other suitable entities regarding recruitment of stream
keeper volunteers, as well as enter into agreements for education and
training of volunteers.

--- END ---