BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
A right to the instream beneficial use of water may be held by any
person or by a unit of state or local government.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.14.140 and 2001 c 240 s 1, 2001 c 237 s 27, and
2001 c 69 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180,
"sufficient cause" shall be defined as the nonuse of all or a portion
of the water by the owner of a water right for a period of five or more
consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a result of:
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes
under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150; ((or))
(h) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW; or
(i) If such right is authorized for any instream beneficial use of
water.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

--- END ---