BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The state's independent science panel made several
recommendations for improving the state's programs for monitoring
salmonid recovery in a December 2000 report to the governor and the
legislature;
(b) Acting upon this report and other recommendations, the 2001
legislature created the monitoring oversight committee to develop
recommendations for a comprehensive statewide strategy for monitoring
watershed health, with a focus upon salmon recovery;
(c) The 2001 legislation also directed the monitoring oversight
committee to prepare an action plan to achieve implementation of a
comprehensive strategy by 2007;
(d) The monitoring oversight committee has carried out this work
and delivered its report to the 2003 legislature, entitled The
Washington Comprehensive Monitoring Strategy and Action Plan for
Watershed Health and Salmon Recovery;
(e) The monitoring oversight committee surveyed current state
agency salmon recovery monitoring and watershed health-related
monitoring expenditures and found that millions of dollars are expended
on a biennial basis;
(f) The state's current budget crisis will severely constrain the
ability to make substantial progress in implementing some elements of
the action plan to achieve a comprehensive statewide salmon recovery
and monitoring strategy, but that many elements of the action plan may
be implemented by changing priorities in some existing monitoring
expenditures in order to better achieve the greatest benefits for
programs and activities for protecting and restoring watershed health
and fish recovery, combined with allocating new resources to the key
elements of the action plan; and
(g) There is a need to implement the work of the monitoring
oversight committee and to assign responsibility for overall
coordination in implementation of the action plan.
(2) Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to adopt the
monitoring strategy and action plan referenced in subsection (1)(d) of
this section and to charge the salmon recovery funding board with the
ongoing responsibility to implement the strategy and action plan in
cooperation with state agencies with monitoring responsibilities.
However, it is not the intent of the legislature to in any way hinder
fishery and hatchery monitoring activities specifically related to
comanagement responsibilities conducted by the department of fish and
wildlife.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The salmon recovery funding board shall provide coordination
among and oversight of state agencies in the implementation of the
comprehensive statewide watershed health monitoring strategy and action
plan developed under the authority of chapter 298, Laws of 2001. The
salmon recovery funding board may periodically revise the strategy and
action plan to reflect changes in funding availability, monitoring
activities by state or nonstate agencies or entities, and other
considerations relevant to achieving a comprehensive strategy. In
implementing as well as revising the plan, the board shall periodically
consult broadly with federal, state, regional, and local salmon
recovery and watershed health monitoring agencies and entities.
(2) To assist the salmon recovery funding board in carrying out its
duties under this section, the board shall establish a monitoring
policy implementation committee.
(a) The monitoring policy implementation committee consists of
eleven members, including one representative from each of the five
state agencies represented on the salmon recovery funding board and
five citizens at large appointed by the board. In addition, the salmon
recovery funding board shall appoint the chair of the committee.
(b) The monitoring policy implementation committee shall provide
the board with recommendations on:
(i) Continuing policy and technical issues related to salmon
recovery and watershed health monitoring;
(ii) Completion of missing elements of the monitoring strategy and
action plan;
(iii) Salmon recovery and watershed health monitoring data and
information management;
(iv) Coordination of agency monitoring work plans and budget
requests;
(v) Actions to consolidate, simplify, and make more efficient state
salmon recovery monitoring and watershed health monitoring;
(vi) Coordination of local and regional monitoring efforts with
statewide efforts;
(vii) Synthesized statewide reporting of salmon recovery monitoring
and watershed health monitoring;
(viii) Allocation of funds made available to the salmon recovery
funding board for salmon recovery monitoring and watershed health
monitoring activities; and
(ix) Funds that could be appropriated to the salmon recovery
funding board for allocation for salmon recovery monitoring and
watershed health monitoring activities.
(3) The salmon recovery funding board shall allocate funds
appropriated by the legislature to the board for grants or other
distribution to state agencies or other entities for the purposes of
salmon recovery and watershed health monitoring activities. In making
such allocations, the board shall be generally guided by the action
plan in The Washington Comprehensive Monitoring Strategy and Action
Plan for Watershed Health and Salmon Recovery.
(4) In addition to funding decisions regarding funds appropriated
to the board, the board may make recommendations to state agencies for
carrying out monitoring activities consistent with the strategy and
action plan. Where the state agency declines to implement the
recommendation wholly or substantially, the director of the agency
shall explain such refusal in writing, including an identification of
the funding, legal, or other constraints upon the agency to fully
implement the recommendation.
(5) At the end of each even-numbered year, the salmon recovery
funding board shall report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives on its activities
under this section and the progress of state agencies and other
entities in implementing the monitoring strategy and action plan.

--- END ---