BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that our current
election-financing system:
(1) Gives incumbents an unhealthy advantage over challengers;
(2) Hinders communication to voters by many qualified candidates;
(3) Undermines public confidence in the integrity of public
officials;
(4) Drives up the cost of running for state office, discouraging
otherwise qualified candidates who lack personal wealth or access to
special interest funding; and
(5) Requires that elected officials spend too much of their time
raising funds rather than representing the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This chapter, to be known as the Washington
clean elections act, establishes an alternative campaign financing
option available to candidates running for state senator and state
representative. The alternative campaign financing program is funded
entirely through voluntary donations made by individuals. The
commission shall administer this chapter and the Washington clean
elections account. Participating candidates must also comply with all
other applicable election and campaign laws and regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Account" means the Washington clean elections account
established under section 6 of this act.
(2) "Commission" means the public disclosure commission.
(3) "General election period" means the period beginning upon
certification of the primary results and ending on the day of the
general election.
(4) "General election spending limit" means the amount of
distributions made to the candidate from the account during the general
election period.
(5) "Nonparticipating candidate" means a candidate who does not
become certified as a participating candidate under this chapter.
(6) "Participating candidate" means a candidate for state senator
or state representative who becomes certified as a participating
candidate under this chapter.
(7) "Primary election period" means the period from June 15th to
the date of the primary election during an election year.
(8) "Primary election spending limit" means the amount of
distributions made to the candidate from the account during the primary
election period.
(9) "Qualifying contribution" means a contribution that is:
(a) Made during the qualifying period by an elector who at the time
of the contribution is registered in the electoral district of the
office the candidate is seeking and who has not given another
qualifying contribution to that candidate during the election cycle;
(b) Made by a person who is not given anything of value in exchange
for the qualifying contribution;
(c) In the sum of twenty-five dollars, exactly;
(d) If made by check or money order, made payable to the
candidate's campaign committee or, if in cash, deposited in the
candidate's campaign account; and
(e) Reported to the commission in compliance with section 4 of this
act.
(10) "Qualifying period" means the period beginning April 1st and
ending May 31st of an election year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A candidate who wishes to be certified
as a participating candidate shall submit to the commission by May 31st
of the election year:
(a) An application that identifies the candidate, the office that
the candidate plans to seek, and the candidate's political party, if
any;
(b) A report that provides the name and other information required
by the commission of at least two hundred persons who have made
qualifying contributions pursuant to this chapter on behalf of the
candidate and an amount equal to the qualifying contributions collected
by the candidate to be deposited in the account; and
(c) A statement signed by the candidate under oath, certifying
that:
(i) The candidate has complied with the restrictions of this
chapter during the election cycle to date;
(ii) The candidate agrees to comply with the requirements of this
chapter during the remainder of the election cycle and will not accept
private campaign contributions other than qualifying contributions as
provided in this chapter; and
(iii) The candidate agrees that all money received from the account
will be used exclusively for financing his or her primary or general
election campaign.
(2) The commission shall, within two weeks of receipt of the
application, certify the candidate as a participating candidate or
notify the candidate that his or her application has been denied
including the reason for denial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Participating candidates may not:
(1) Accept any campaign contributions other than qualifying
contributions as specified in this chapter;
(2) Make campaign expenditures from the candidate's personal funds;
(3) Make campaign expenditures in the primary election period in
excess of the primary election spending limit; or
(4) Make campaign expenditures in the general election period in
excess of the general election spending limit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The Washington clean elections account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
voluntary contributions from sources listed in subsection (2) of this
section must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for distributions under section 7 of this act.
Only the commission or the commission's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(2) Voluntary contributions to the account may be made in the
following manner and must be deposited in the account:
(a) Qualifying contributions collected by candidates and submitted
to the commission under section 4 of this act;
(b) Contributions made to the account or the commission for the
account;
(c) Contributions made through a voluntary check off on driver's
license application and renewal forms;
(d) Contributions made through a voluntary check off on vehicle
registration and renewal forms;
(e) Contributions made through a voluntary check off on state
college and university registration forms;
(f) Contributions made through a voluntary check off on department
of fish and wildlife license and renewal forms;
(g) Contributions made through a voluntary check off on department
of natural resources license and renewal forms;
(h) Contributions made through a voluntary check off on
professional license and renewal forms; and
(i) Transfer of surplus funds under RCW 42.17.095.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) By January 1st of each election year,
the commission shall publish an estimate of revenue in the account
available for distribution to participating candidates during the
upcoming elections.
(2) The commission may use up to ten percent of the amount in the
account for reasonable and necessary expenses of administration and
enforcement. Any portion of the ten percent not used for this purpose
must remain in the account.
(3) The commission may use up to ten percent of the amount in the
account for reasonable and necessary expenses associated with voter
education. Any portion of the ten percent not used for this purpose
must remain in the account.
(4) The account, after administrative and educational expenses are
deducted, shall be divided into two equal sections, with one-half going
toward primary election distribution and one-half going toward general
election distribution.
(a) The primary election distribution shall be distributed as
follows:
(i) The primary election distribution shall be divided by the
number of participating candidates to determine the pro rata share of
each candidate.
(ii) On June 15th, the commission shall pay from the primary
election distribution to the campaign account of each participating
candidate one-half of that candidate's pro rata share of the primary
election distribution.
(iii) At the middle of the primary election period and no later
than August 1st, the commission shall pay from the primary election
distribution to each participating candidate the remainder of his or
her pro rata share of the primary election account.
(b) The general election distribution shall be distributed as
follows:
(i) The general election distribution shall be divided by the
number of participating candidates who have been certified as winners
in the primary election and are not unopposed in the general election
to determine the pro rata share of each candidate.
(ii) No later than three business days after the primary results
have been certified by the appropriate government agency, the
commission shall distribute one-half of each eligible participating
candidate's pro rata share to the candidate.
(iii) At the middle of the general election period and no more than
thirty days before the date of the general election, the commission
shall distribute the remainder of each eligible participating
candidate's pro rata share to the candidate.
(c) Within thirty days of the end of the appropriate election
period, participating candidates shall return to the commission any
primary election distribution that has not been expended at the end of
the primary election period, and any general election distribution that
has not been expended at the end of the general election period.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.17.095 and 1995 c 397 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
The surplus funds of a candidate, or of a political committee
supporting or opposing a candidate, may only be disposed of in any one
or more of the following ways:
(1) Return the surplus to a contributor in an amount not to exceed
that contributor's original contribution;
(2) Transfer the surplus to the candidate's personal account as
reimbursement for lost earnings incurred as a result of that
candidate's election campaign. Such lost earnings shall be verifiable
as unpaid salary or, when the candidate is not salaried, as an amount
not to exceed income received by the candidate for services rendered
during an appropriate, corresponding time period. All lost earnings
incurred shall be documented and a record thereof shall be maintained
by the candidate or the candidate's political committee. The committee
shall include a copy of such record when its expenditure for such
reimbursement is reported pursuant to RCW 42.17.090;
(3) Transfer the surplus without limit to a political party or to
a caucus political committee;
(4) Donate the surplus to a charitable organization registered in
accordance with chapter 19.09 RCW;
(5) Transmit the surplus to the state treasurer for deposit in the
general fund; ((or))
(6) Hold the surplus in the campaign depository or depositories
designated in accordance with RCW 42.17.050 for possible use in a
future election campaign for the same office last sought by the
candidate and report any such disposition in accordance with RCW
42.17.090: PROVIDED, That if the candidate subsequently announces or
publicly files for office, information as appropriate is reported to
the commission in accordance with RCW 42.17.040 through 42.17.090. If
a subsequent office is not sought the surplus held shall be disposed of
in accordance with the requirements of this section((.));
(7) Hold the surplus campaign funds in a separate account for
nonreimbursed public office-related expenses or as provided in this
section, and report any such disposition in accordance with RCW
42.17.090. The separate account required under this subsection shall
not be used for deposits of campaign funds that are not surplus((.));
(8) No candidate or authorized committee may transfer funds to any
other candidate or other political committee;
(9) Transfer the surplus to the Washington clean elections account.
The disposal of surplus funds under this section shall not be
considered a contribution for purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The commission shall adopt rules as
necessary to implement this chapter and monitor activities under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 7 and 9 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 42 RCW.

--- END ---