BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Frequent users of the state's ferry system often purchase
frequent user coupons. Currently, coupon books have an expiration date
of ninety days after the date of purchase;
(2) Ferry fares have been raised considerably over the last year;
and
(3) Citizens who cannot use all of their frequent user coupons lose
significant money each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Frequent user coupons for the Washington state ferry system are
valid for one year from the date of purchase, after which time the
tickets will not be accepted for passage. Unused coupons are eligible
for refund up to one year from the date of purchase.

--- END ---