BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.79.080 and 1982 c 116 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The person proposing the measure shall print blank petitions upon
single sheets of paper of good writing quality (including but not
limited to newsprint) not less than eleven inches in width and not less
than fourteen inches in length. Each petition at the time of
circulating, signing, and filing with the secretary of state shall
consist of not more than one sheet with numbered lines for not more
than twenty signatures, with the prescribed warning and title, shall be
in the form required by RCW 29.79.090, 29.79.100, or 29.79.110, ((as
now or hereafter amended,)) and shall have a full, true, and correct
copy of the proposed measure referred to therein printed on the reverse
side of the petition.
Each petition shall have a line for the signature gatherer to sign
and date the petition.

--- END ---