BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that substantial
pavement damage is caused by studded tire use. Therefore, to offset
pavement maintenance and preservation costs, a surcharge is established
to recognize and to recover the cost of studded tire damage to the
roadways.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.4216 and 1999 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2001, a person may not sell a studded tire or
sell a stud for installation in a tire unless the stud qualifies as a
lightweight stud under RCW 46.04.272.
(2)(a) Beginning July 1, 2003, a fee of fifteen dollars per tire is
levied on the sale of each studded tire and lightweight studded tire,
regardless of the wholesale or retail value of the studded tire.
(b) The buyer of the tire shall pay the fee to the seller, and each
seller shall collect from the buyer the full amount of the fee. The
seller shall send the amount of fees collected from the buyer by the
seller to the department of revenue, acting in a custodial capacity,
for deposit in the motor vehicle fund.
(c) RCW 82.32.045 applies to the fees imposed by this section. The
tax due dates, reporting periods, and return requirements applicable to
chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally to the fees imposed by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---