BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.57A.100 and 1977 ex.s. c 44 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Except in accordance with an agreement made as provided in this
section or in accordance with the provisions of RCW 36.57A.090(3) as
now or hereafter amended, upon the effective date on which the public
transportation benefit area commences to perform the public
transportation service, no)) A person or private corporation ((shall))
may operate a local public passenger transportation service within
((the)) a public transportation benefit area ((with the exception of
taxis, buses owned or operated by a school district or private school,
and buses owned or operated by any corporation or organization solely
for the purposes of the corporation or organization and for the use of
which no fee or fare is charged.
An agreement may be entered into between the public transportation
benefit area authority and any person or corporation legally operating
a local public passenger transportation service wholly within or partly
within and partly without the public transportation benefit area and on
said effective date under which such person or corporation may continue
to operate such service or any part thereof for such time and upon such
terms and conditions as provided in such agreement. Such agreement
shall provide for a periodic review of the terms and conditions
contained therein. Where any such local public passenger
transportation service will be required to cease to operate within the
public transportation benefit area, the public transportation benefit
area authority may agree with the owner of such service to purchase the
assets used in providing such service, or if no agreement can be
reached, the public transportation benefit area authority shall condemn
such assets in the manner and by the same procedure as is or may be
provided by law for the condemnation of other properties for cities of
the first class, except insofar as such laws may be inconsistent with
the provisions of this chapter)).
Wherever a privately owned public carrier operates wholly or partly
within a public transportation benefit area, the Washington utilities
and transportation commission shall continue to exercise jurisdiction
over such operation as provided by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.60.120 and 1993 c 427 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the department acquires or constructs, maintains, and
operates any ((ferry crossings upon or)) toll bridges over Puget Sound
or any of its tributary or connecting waters, there shall not be
constructed, operated, or maintained any other ((ferry crossing upon
or)) bridge over any such waters within ten miles of any such crossing
or bridge operated or maintained by the department excepting such
bridges ((or ferry crossings)) in existence, and being operated and
maintained under a lawfully issued franchise at the time of the
((location of the ferry crossing or)) construction of the toll bridge
by the department.
(2) The ten-mile distance in subsection (1) of this section means
ten statute miles measured by airline distance. ((The ten-mile
restriction shall be applied by comparing the two end points (termini)
of a state ferry crossing to those of a private ferry crossing.))
(3) ((The Washington utilities and transportation commission may,
upon written petition of a commercial ferry operator certificated or
applying for certification under chapter 81.84 RCW, and upon notice and
hearing, grant a waiver from the ten-mile restriction. The waiver must
not be detrimental to the public interest. In making a decision to
waive the ten-mile restriction, the commission shall consider, but is
not limited to, the impact of the waiver on transportation congestion
mitigation, air quality improvement, and the overall impact on the
Washington state ferry system. The commission shall act upon a request
for a waiver within ninety days after the conclusion of the hearing.
A waiver is effective for a period of five years from the date of
issuance. At the end of five years the waiver becomes permanent unless
appealed within thirty days by the commission on its own motion, the
department, or an interested party.
(4))) The department shall not maintain and operate any ((ferry
crossing or)) toll bridge over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or
connecting waters that would infringe upon any franchise lawfully
issued by the state and in existence and being exercised at the time of
the ((location of the ferry crossing or)) construction of the toll
bridge by the department, without first acquiring the rights granted to
such franchise holder under the franchise.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.84.020 and 1993 c 427 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of an application the commission shall give
reasonable notice to the department, affected cities and counties, and
any common carrier which might be adversely affected, of the time and
place for hearing on such application. The commission shall have power
after hearing, to issue the certificate as prayed for, or to refuse to
issue it, or to issue it for the partial exercise only of the privilege
sought, and may attach to the exercise of the rights granted by said
certificate such terms and conditions as in its judgment the public
convenience and necessity may require; but the commission shall not
have power to grant a certificate to operate between districts and/or
into any territory ((prohibited by RCW 47.60.120 or)) already served by
an existing certificate holder, unless such existing certificate holder
has failed or refused to furnish reasonable and adequate service or has
failed to provide the service described in its certificate or tariffs
after the time period allowed to initiate service has elapsed:
PROVIDED, A certificate shall be granted when it shall appear to the
satisfaction of the commission that the commercial ferry was actually
operating in good faith over the route for which such certificate shall
be sought, on January 15, 1927: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That in case two or
more commercial ferries shall upon said date have been operating
vessels upon the same route, or between the same districts the
commission shall determine after public hearing whether one or more
certificates shall issue, and in determining to whom a certificate or
certificates shall be issued, the commission shall consider all
material facts and circumstances including the prior operation,
schedules, and services rendered by either of the ferries, and in case
more than one certificate shall issue, the commission shall fix and
determine the schedules and services of the ferries to which the
certificates are issued to the end that duplication of service be
eliminated and public convenience be furthered.
(2) Before issuing a certificate, the commission shall determine
that the applicant has the financial resources to operate the proposed
service for at least twelve months, based upon the submission by the
applicant of a pro forma financial statement of operations. Issuance
of a certificate shall be determined upon, but not limited to, the
following factors: Ridership and revenue forecasts; the cost of
service for the proposed operation; an estimate of the cost of the
assets to be used in providing the service; a statement of the total
assets on hand of the applicant that will be expended on the proposed
operation; and a statement of prior experience, if any, in such field
by the applicant. The documentation required of the applicant under
this section shall comply with the provisions of RCW 9A.72.085.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to an application
for a certificate that is pending as of July 25, 1993.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.64.090 and 1983 c 15 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
If any party assumes the operation and maintenance of any ferry or
ferry system by rent, lease, or charter from the department of
transportation, such party shall not assume ((and)) nor be bound by
((all the provisions herein and any)) this chapter. An agreement or
contract for such operation of any ferry or ferry system entered into
by the department ((shall)) may provide that the wages to be paid,
hours of employment, working conditions, and seniority rights of
employees will ((be established by the marine employees' commission in
accordance with the terms and provisions of)) differ from agreements or
contracts covered by this chapter ((and it shall further provide that
all labor disputes shall be adjudicated in accordance with chapter
47.64 RCW)).

--- END ---