BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
global markets to our state and national economy. As a leader among
states in international commerce, Washington houses many multinational
corporations. Competition among states for foreign businesses and
personnel is fierce and it is necessary to Washington's future economic
viability to eliminate a significant regulatory barrier to efficient
personnel exchange, resulting in a more attractive business climate in
Washington. The legislature recognizes that over twenty other states
have entered into informal reciprocal agreements with other nations to
waive driver's license testing requirements in order to ease the
transition of personnel to and from those states. By removing an
unnecessary barrier to efficient personnel mobility it is the intent of
the legislature to strengthen and diversify Washington's economy.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.120 and 2002 c 352 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant for a new or renewed driver's license must
successfully pass a driver licensing examination to qualify for a
driver's license. The department shall give examinations at places and
times reasonably available to the people of this state.
(1) Waiver. The department may waive:
(a) All or any part of the examination of any person applying for
the renewal of a driver's license unless the department determines that
the applicant is not qualified to hold a driver's license under this
title; or
(b) The actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motor
vehicle if the applicant:
(i) Surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's
previous home state; and
(ii) Is otherwise qualified to be licensed; or
(c) All or any part of the examination of a person, age eighteen
years or older, applying for a Washington driver's license who provides
for verification a valid driver's license issued by a nation with which
the department has an informal agreement authorized under section 3 of
this act.
(2) Fee. Each applicant for a new license must pay an examination
fee of ten dollars.
(a) The examination fee is in addition to the fee charged for
issuance of the license.
(b) "New license" means a license issued to a driver:
(i) Who has not been previously licensed in this state; or
(ii) Whose last previous Washington license has been expired for
more than five years.
(3) A person whose license expired or will expire on or after
January 1, 1998, while he or she was or is living outside the state
may:
(a) Apply to the department to extend the validity of his or her
license for no more than twelve months. If the person establishes to
the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to
Washington before the date his or her license expires, the department
shall extend the person's license. The department may grant
consecutive extensions, but in no event may the cumulative total of
extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted under this
section does not change the expiration date of the license for purposes
of RCW 46.20.181. The department shall charge a fee of five dollars
for each license extension;
(b) Apply to the department to renew his or her license by mail.
If the person establishes to the department's satisfaction that he or
she is unable to return to Washington within twelve months of the date
that his or her license expires, the department shall renew the
person's license by mail. If a person qualifies for a mail-in renewal
he or she is not required to pass an examination nor provide an updated
photograph. He or she must, however, pay the fee required by RCW
46.20.181 plus an additional five-dollar mail-in renewal fee. A
license renewed by mail that does not include a photograph of the
licensee must be labeled "not valid for identification purposes."
(4) If a person's driver's license is extended or renewed under
subsection (3) of this section while he or she is outside the state, he
or she must submit to the examination required under this section
within sixty days of returning to this state. The department will not
assess a penalty or examination fee for the examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into an informal agreement with one or
more other nations to waive the requirement for licensed drivers, age
eighteen years or older, from that nation to take all or any part of
the driver's license examination.
(2) The department may only enter into an agreement with a nation
if:
(a) The nation has procedures in place to verify the validity of
drivers' licenses issued by that nation; and
(b) The nation has agreed to waive all or any part of the driver's
license examination and education requirements for Washington licensed
drivers applying for a driver's license in that nation.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.181 and 1999 c 308 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, every
driver's license expires on the fifth anniversary of the licensee's
birthdate following the issuance of the license.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a person
may renew his or her license on or before the expiration date by
submitting an application as prescribed by the department and paying a
fee of twenty-five dollars. This fee includes the fee for the required
photograph.
(3) A person renewing his or her driver's license more than sixty
days after the license has expired shall pay a penalty fee of ten
dollars in addition to the renewal fee, unless his or her license
expired when:
(a) The person was outside the state and he or she renews the
license within sixty days after returning to this state; or
(b) The person was incapacitated and he or she renews the license
within sixty days after the termination of the incapacity.
(4) During the period from July 1, 2000, to July 1, 2006, the
department may issue or renew a driver's license for a period other
than five years, or may extend by mail a license that has already been
issued, in order to evenly distribute, as nearly as possible, the
yearly renewal rate of licensed drivers. The fee for a driver's
license issued or renewed for a period other than five years, or that
has been extended by mail, is five dollars for each year that the
license is issued, renewed, or extended. The department may adopt any
rules as are necessary to carry out this subsection.
(5) A driver's license issued under a waiver as provided in RCW
46.20.120(1)(c) may not be renewed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may make rules to carry out the purposes of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect May 1, 2005.

--- END ---