BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that chapter 4, Laws
of 1999 sp. sess. strongly encouraged the forest practices board to
adopt administrative rules that were substantially similar to the
recommendations presented to the legislature in the form of the forests
and fish report. In the time since the enactment of chapter 4, Laws of
1999 sp. sess., it has become clear that both the planning aspect and
the implementation aspect of the road maintenance and abandonment plan
requirement may cause an unforeseen and unintended disproportionate
financial hardship on small forest landowners.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.020 and 2002 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For purposes of this chapter:)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to
test the results of actions taken so that the management and related
policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.
(2) "Appeals board" means the forest practices appeals board
created by RCW 76.09.210.
(3) "Aquatic resources" includes water quality, salmon, other
species of the vertebrate classes Cephalaspidomorphi and Osteichthyes
identified in the forests and fish report, the Columbia torrent
salamander (Rhyacotriton kezeri), the Cascade torrent salamander
(Rhyacotriton cascadae), the Olympic torrent salamander (Rhyacotriton
olympian), the Dunn's salamander (Plethodon dunni), the Van Dyke's
salamander (Plethodon vandyke), the tailed frog (Ascaphus truei), and
their respective habitats.
(4) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(5) "Contiguous" means land adjoining or touching by common corner
or otherwise. Land having common ownership divided by a road or other
right of way shall be considered contiguous.
(6) "Conversion to a use other than commercial timber operation"
means a bona fide conversion to an active use which is incompatible
with timber growing and as may be defined by forest practices rules.
(7) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(8) "Forest land" means all land which is capable of supporting a
merchantable stand of timber and is not being actively used for a use
which is incompatible with timber growing. Forest land does not
include agricultural land that is or was enrolled in the conservation
reserve enhancement program by contract if such agricultural land was
historically used for agricultural purposes and the landowner intends
to continue to use the land for agricultural purposes in the future.
(9) "Forest landowner" means any person in actual control of forest
land, whether such control is based either on legal or equitable title,
or on any other interest entitling the holder to sell or otherwise
dispose of any or all of the timber on such land in any manner((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, any lessee or other person in possession of
forest land without legal or equitable title to such land shall be
excluded from the definition of "forest landowner" unless such lessee
or other person has the right to sell or otherwise dispose of any or
all of the timber located on such forest land.
(10) "Forest practice" means any activity conducted on or directly
pertaining to forest land and relating to growing, harvesting, or
processing timber, including but not limited to:
(a) Road and trail construction;
(b) Harvesting, final and intermediate;
(c) Precommercial thinning;
(d) Reforestation;
(e) Fertilization;
(f) Prevention and suppression of diseases and insects;
(g) Salvage of trees; and
(h) Brush control.
"Forest practice" shall not include preparatory work such as tree
marking, surveying and road flagging, and removal or harvesting of
incidental vegetation from forest lands such as berries, ferns,
greenery, mistletoe, herbs, mushrooms, and other products which cannot
normally be expected to result in damage to forest soils, timber, or
public resources.
(11) "Forest practices rules" means any rules adopted pursuant to
RCW 76.09.040.
(12) "Forest trees" does not include hardwood trees cultivated by
agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years if
the trees were planted on land that was not in forest use immediately
before the trees were planted and before the land was prepared for
planting the trees. "Forest trees" includes Christmas trees, but does
not include Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural
methods, as that term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(13) "Forests and fish report" means the forests and fish report to
the board dated April 29, 1999.
(14) "Application" means the application required pursuant to RCW
76.09.050.
(15) "Operator" means any person engaging in forest practices
except an employee with wages as his or her sole compensation.
(16) "Person" means any individual, partnership, private, public,
or municipal corporation, county, the department or other state or
local governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever
nature.
(17) "Public resources" means water, fish and wildlife, and in
addition shall mean capital improvements of the state or its political
subdivisions.
(18) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, of a commercial
species, including Christmas trees. However, "timber" does not include
Christmas trees that are cultivated by agricultural methods, as that
term is defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(19) "Timber owner" means any person having all or any part of the
legal interest in timber. Where such timber is subject to a contract
of sale, "timber owner" shall mean the contract purchaser.
(20) "Board" means the forest practices board created in RCW
76.09.030.
(21) "Unconfined avulsing channel migration zone" means the area
within which the active channel of an unconfined avulsing stream is
prone to move and where the movement would result in a potential near-term loss of riparian forest adjacent to the stream. Sizeable islands
with productive timber may exist within the zone.
(22) "Unconfined avulsing stream" means generally fifth order or
larger waters that experience abrupt shifts in channel location,
creating a complex flood plain characterized by extensive gravel bars,
disturbance species of vegetation of variable age, numerous side
channels, wall-based channels, oxbow lakes, and wetland complexes.
Many of these streams have dikes and levees that may temporarily or
permanently restrict channel movement.
(23) "Grazing lands" means land that is primarily used for animal
foraging on naturally occurring or planted vegetation, but does not
include land that is used by free-ranging livestock.

--- END ---