BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A program to contract for undergraduate and graduate placements
in high-demand fields and programs is created. For purposes of this
program, high-demand fields and programs are programs where enrollment
access is limited and fields where employers are experiencing
difficulty finding enough qualified graduates to fill job openings.
The higher education coordinating board shall administer the program,
subject to appropriation.
(2) Washington public community and technical colleges, public
baccalaureate institutions, and private nonprofit colleges and
universities are eligible to apply for high demand enrollment funds.
The board may accept applications for an enrollment contract from an
in-state or border-state, private nonprofit institution but only where
such entities have agreed to partner with one or more public,
Washington state colleges or universities to deliver the educational
program in high demand. The board may also accept applications for an
enrollment contract from a public institution or a private nonprofit
institution located in a county participating in the border county
higher education opportunity project under RCW 28B.80.806, but only
where such entities have agreed to partner with an institution of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 to deliver the
educational program in high demand. In all cases, an institution of
higher education must be the fiscal agent, grant-recipient-of-record,
and an active partner in the instruction of participating Washington
students.
(3) To review and select among competing proposals for these new
enrollments, the board shall establish an advisory committee consisting
of representatives of the board, the office of financial management,
out-of-state higher education institutions or associations, industry
and labor associations, and economic development and labor market
analysts. The advisory committee shall consult with the board to
develop the request for proposals, including criteria for awarding
grants, and shall recommend projects for funding by the board. The
advisory committee and board shall consider the present and near-term
outlook for in-state employment of graduating students for whom it will
contract to expand access opportunities. In reviewing proposals from
applicants, the board and its advisory committee shall consider
proposals that (a) create opportunities for underrepresented students
in the field of study, (b) respond to unique regional economic
opportunities and promote economic growth in depressed regions of the
state, (c) address health and education professional shortages, (d)
spread the benefit of the state's high-technology economy
geographically, (e) provide employment in a business or economic sector
with significant growth potential supported by data, or (f) include an
articulation agreement to ease the transfer of applicable, lower
division credit earned by participating Washington students. Priority
shall be given to proposals that foster collaboration across
educational sectors.
(4) Participating institutions shall cooperate with the board to
collect the data necessary to report to the governor and the
legislature on the impact of the program in this section, particularly
the degree of improved access to high-demand fields and programs for
students and successful job placements for graduates. The board shall
profile enrollment contracts let to date and review impacts as part of
the reports. Reports shall be made by December 1st of even-numbered
years to the fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature
and to the office of financial management.

--- END ---