BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that not all
mineral resources of long-term commercial significance can be used as
construction aggregates and not all regions of the state have
sufficient supplies of construction aggregates. As a result, projects
may not be completed timely, economically, and with the quality of
aggregates necessary for long-term durability.
(2)(a) A committee is created to study the state's need for
aggregate as recognized under subsection (1) of this section. The
committee is comprised of the following:
(i) The state geologist, representing the department of natural
resources, who shall serve as chair;
(ii) A representative of the association of general contractors;
(iii) A representative of the governor;
(iv) A representative of the Washington chapter of the American
public works association;
(v) An operating engineer representing the building and trades
council; and
(vi) A representative of the aggregate and concrete association.
(b) The committee shall:
(i) Determine whether the goals and requirements under chapter
36.70A RCW are being met with regard to the identification,
designation, and supply of aggregate necessary to meet the twenty-year
comprehensive plans and whether sufficient quality and quantity of
aggregate is available to meet the transportation elements of the
department of transportation, county, city, or municipal projects, and
private projects;
(ii) Determine whether environmental review procedures allow the
efficient processing of permit applications without reducing
environmental protection and without undermining the expectation that
a successful project will receive a permit in a timely manner;
(iii) Ensure the state has competitive and efficient industries by
evaluating and identifying areas of redundant, duplicative, and costly
regulations and suggesting remedies to eliminate those inefficient
impediments;
(iv) Consider how the aggregate and affiliated industries should be
regulated; and
(v) No later than December 15, 2003, prepare and submit to the
legislature its findings and any legislation necessary.
(3) The department of transportation and the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall provide technical and
staff support from existing staff.

--- END ---