BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.090 and 1993 c 256 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each report required under RCW 42.17.080 (1) and (2) shall
disclose the following:
(a) The funds on hand at the beginning of the period;
(b) The name and address of each person who has made one or more
contributions during the period, together with the money value and date
of such contributions and the aggregate value of all contributions
received from each such person during the campaign or in the case of a
continuing political committee, the current calendar year: PROVIDED,
That pledges in the aggregate of less than one hundred dollars from any
one person need not be reported: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the income
which results from a fund-raising activity conducted in accordance with
RCW 42.17.067 may be reported as one lump sum, with the exception of
that portion of such income which was received from persons whose names
and addresses are required to be included in the report required by RCW
42.17.067: PROVIDED FURTHER, That contributions of no more than
twenty-five dollars in the aggregate from any one person during the
election campaign may be reported as one lump sum so long as the
campaign treasurer maintains a separate and private list of the name,
address, and amount of each such contributor: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the money value of contributions of postage shall be the face value of
such postage;
(c) Each loan, promissory note, or security instrument to be used
by or for the benefit of the candidate or political committee made by
any person, together with the names and addresses of the lender and
each person liable directly, indirectly or contingently and the date
and amount of each such loan, promissory note, or security instrument;
(d) All other contributions not otherwise listed or exempted;
(e) The name and address of each candidate or political committee
to which any transfer of funds was made, together with the amounts and
dates of such transfers;
(f) The name and address of each person to whom an expenditure was
made in the aggregate amount of more than fifty dollars during the
period covered by this report, and the amount, date, and purpose of
each such expenditure. A candidate for state executive or state
legislative office or the political committee of such a candidate shall
report this information for an expenditure under one of the following
categories, whichever is appropriate: (i) Expenditures for the
election of the candidate; (ii) expenditures for nonreimbursed public
office-related expenses; (iii) expenditures required to be reported
under (e) of this subsection; or (iv) expenditures of surplus funds and
other expenditures. The report of such a candidate or committee shall
contain a separate total of expenditures for each category and a total
sum of all expenditures. Other candidates and political committees
need not report information regarding expenditures under the categories
listed in (i) through (iv) of this subsection or under similar such
categories unless required to do so by the commission by rule. The
report of such an other candidate or committee shall also contain the
total sum of all expenditures;
(g) The name and address of each person to whom any expenditure was
made directly or indirectly to compensate the person for soliciting or
procuring signatures on an initiative or referendum petition, the
amount of such compensation to each such person, and the total of the
expenditures made for this purpose. Such expenditures shall be
reported under this subsection (1)(g) whether the expenditures are or
are not also required to be reported under (f) of this subsection;
(h) The name and address of any person and the amount owed for any
debt, obligation, note, unpaid loan, or other liability in the amount
of more than two hundred fifty dollars or in the amount of more than
fifty dollars that has been outstanding for over thirty days;
(i) The surplus or deficit of contributions over expenditures;
(j) The disposition made in accordance with RCW 42.17.095 of any
surplus funds; and
(k) Such other information as shall be required by the commission
by rule in conformance with the policies and purposes of this
chapter((; and
(l) Funds received from a political committee not otherwise
required to report under this chapter (a "nonreporting committee").
Such funds shall be forfeited to the state of Washington unless the
nonreporting committee has filed or within ten days following such
receipt files with the commission a statement disclosing: (i) Its name
and address; (ii) the purposes of the nonreporting committee; (iii) the
names, addresses, and titles of its officers or if it has no officers,
the names, addresses, and titles of its responsible leaders; (iv) the
name, office sought, and party affiliation of each candidate in the
state of Washington whom the nonreporting committee is supporting, and,
if such committee is supporting the entire ticket of any party, the
name of the party; (v) the ballot proposition supported or opposed in
the state of Washington, if any, and whether such committee is in favor
of or opposed to such proposition; (vi) the name and address of each
person residing in the state of Washington or corporation which has a
place of business in the state of Washington who has made one or more
contributions in the aggregate of more than twenty-five dollars to the
nonreporting committee during the current calendar year, together with
the money value and date of such contributions; (vii) the name and
address of each person in the state of Washington to whom an
expenditure was made by the nonreporting committee on behalf of a
candidate or political committee in the aggregate amount of more than
fifty dollars, the amount, date, and purpose of such expenditure, and
the total sum of such expenditures; (viii) such other information as
the commission may prescribe by rule, in keeping with the policies and
purposes of this chapter. A nonreporting committee incurring an
obligation to file additional reports in a calendar year may satisfy
the obligation by filing with the commission a letter providing
updating or amending information)).
(2) The treasurer and the candidate shall certify the correctness
of each report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An out-of-state political committee organized for the purpose
of supporting or opposing candidates or ballot propositions in another
state that is not otherwise required to report under RCW 42.17.040
through 42.17.090 shall report as required in this section when it
makes an expenditure supporting or opposing a Washington state
candidate or political committee. The committee shall file with the
commission a statement disclosing:
(a) Its name and address;
(b) The purposes of the out-of-state committee;
(c) The names, addresses, and titles of its officers or, if it has
no officers, the names, addresses, and the titles of its responsible
leaders;
(d) The name, office sought, and party affiliation of each
candidate in the state of Washington whom the out-of-state committee is
supporting or opposing and, if such committee is supporting or opposing
the entire ticket of any party, the name of the party;
(e) The ballot proposition supported or opposed in the state of
Washington, if any, and whether such committee is in favor of or
opposed to such proposition;
(f) The name and address of each person residing in the state of
Washington or corporation which has a place of business in the state of
Washington who has made one or more contributions in the aggregate of
more than twenty-five dollars to the out-of-state committee during the
current calendar year, together with the money value and date of such
contributions;
(g) The name and address of each person in the state of Washington
to whom an expenditure was made by the out-of-state committee with
respect to a candidate or political committee in the aggregate amount
of more than fifty dollars, the amount, date, and purpose of such
expenditure, and the total sum of such expenditures; and
(h) Such other information as the commission may prescribe by rule
in keeping with the policies and purposes of this chapter.
(2) Each statement shall be filed no later than the twentieth day
of the month following any month in which a contribution or other
expenditure reportable under subsection (1) of this section is made.
An out-of-state committee incurring an obligation to file additional
statements in a calendar year may satisfy the obligation by timely
filing reports that supplement previously filed information.
(3) A political committee required to file campaign reports with
the federal election commission or its successor is exempt from
reporting under this section.

--- END ---