BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
a local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall issue its notice
of final decision on a project permit application within one hundred
twenty days after the local government notifies the applicant that the
application is complete, as provided in RCW 36.70B.070. In determining
the number of days that have elapsed after the local government has
notified the applicant that the application is complete, the following
periods are excluded:
(a) Any period during which the applicant has been requested by the
local government to correct plans, perform required studies, or provide
additional required information. The period must be calculated from
the date the local government notifies the applicant of the need for
additional information until the earlier of the date the local
government determines whether the additional information satisfies the
request for information or fourteen days after the date the information
has been provided to the local government. If the local government
determines that the information submitted by the applicant is
insufficient, it shall notify the applicant of the deficiencies and the
procedures apply as if a new request for studies had been made. In no
event may the total time period allowed for additional information
extend for more than sixty days from the date of original notification
to the applicant by the local government requiring additional
information, unless otherwise agreed in writing by the applicant and
the local government;
(b) Any period during which an environmental impact statement is
being prepared following a determination of significance under chapter
43.21C RCW, if the local government by ordinance or resolution has
established time periods for completion of environmental impact
statements, or if the local government and the applicant in writing
agree to a time period for completion of an environmental impact
statement;
(c) Any period for administrative appeals of project permits, if an
open record appeal hearing or a closed record appeal, or both, are
allowed. The local government by ordinance or resolution shall
establish a time period to consider and decide such appeals. The time
period may not exceed: (i) Ninety days for an open record appeal
hearing; and (ii) sixty days for a closed record appeal. All parties
to an appeal may agree to extend these time periods; and
(d) Any extension of time mutually agreed upon by the applicant and
the local government.
(2) The time limits established by subsection (1) of this section
do not apply if a project permit application:
(a) Requires an amendment to the comprehensive plan or a
development regulation;
(b) Requires approval of a new fully contained community as
provided in RCW 36.70A.350, a master planned resort as provided in RCW
36.70A.360, or the siting of an essential public facility as provided
in RCW 36.70A.200; or
(c) Is substantially revised by the applicant, in which case the
time period must start from the date at which the revised project
application is determined to be complete under RCW 36.70B.070.
(3) If the local government is unable to issue its final decision
within the time limits provided for in this section, the project permit
application must be deemed approved. If no notice of final decision is
issued to the applicant by the local government under RCW 36.70B.130,
then the written determination of complete application under RCW
36.70B.070 is conclusive evidence of project approval as of the date
when the project is deemed approved.
(4) This section applies to project permit applications filed on or
after January 1, 2004.
(5) An advisory group must be established by the legislature to
review the procedures in this chapter and to make recommendations to
the legislature concerning modifications to those procedures. The
advisory group consists of: Two members of the senate representing the
two major political parties, appointed by the president of the senate;
two members of the house of representatives representing the two major
political parties, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, and eight members, appointed jointly by the president
of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives
reflecting the interests of business, agriculture, labor, the
environment, property owners, neighborhood groups, cities, counties,
and federally recognized Indian tribes. Members must have substantial
experience in matters relating to land use and environmental planning
and regulation, and have the ability to work toward cooperative
solutions among diverse interests. Staff for the advisory group must
be provided by state agencies and the legislature, as may be required.

--- END ---