BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.280 and 1996 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A growth management hearings board shall hear and determine
only those petitions alleging either:
(a) That a state agency, county, or city planning under this
chapter is not in compliance with the procedural requirements of this
chapter as they relate to the adoption of comprehensive plans and
development regulations, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the
adoption of shoreline master programs or amendments thereto, or chapter
43.21C RCW as it relates to the adoption of plans, development
regulations, or amendments((, adopted)) under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW; or
(b) That the twenty-year growth management planning population
projections adopted by the office of financial management pursuant to
RCW 43.62.035 should be adjusted.
(2) A petition may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a county or
city that plans under this chapter; (b) a person who has participated
orally or in writing before the county or city regarding the matter on
which a review is being requested; (c) a person who is certified by the
governor within sixty days of filing the request with the board; or (d)
a person qualified pursuant to RCW 34.05.530.
(3) For purposes of this section "person" means any individual,
partnership, corporation, association, state agency, governmental
subdivision or unit thereof, or public or private organization or
entity of any character.
(4) When considering a possible adjustment to a growth management
planning population projection prepared by the office of financial
management, a board shall consider the implications of any such
adjustment to the population forecast for the entire state.
The rationale for any adjustment that is adopted by a board must be
documented and filed with the office of financial management within ten
working days after adoption.
If adjusted by a board, a county growth management planning
population projection shall only be used for the planning purposes set
forth in this chapter and shall be known as a "board adjusted
population projection". None of these changes shall affect the
official state and county population forecasts prepared by the office
of financial management, which shall continue to be used for state
budget and planning purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997 c 429 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All requests for review to a growth management hearings board
shall be initiated by filing a petition that includes a detailed
statement of issues presented for resolution by the board. The board
shall render written decisions articulating the basis for its holdings.
The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not presented to
the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any prehearing
order.
(2) All petitions relating to whether ((or not an adopted)) the
adoption of a comprehensive plan, development regulation, or permanent
amendment thereto, is in compliance with the goals and requirements of
this chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within sixty
days after publication by the legislative bodies of the county or city.
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the date of
publication for a city shall be the date the city publishes the
ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is required to be
published.
(b) Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that
it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto.
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this
section the date of publication for a county shall be the date the
county publishes the notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto.
(c) For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly
after approval or disapproval of a local government's shoreline master
program or amendment thereto by the department of ecology as provided
in RCW 90.58.090, the local government shall publish a notice that the
shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved by the department of ecology. For purposes of this
section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a
shoreline master program is the date the local government publishes
notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been
approved or disapproved by the department of ecology.
(3) Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds
that the person filing the petition lacks standing, or the parties have
filed an agreement to have the case heard in superior court as provided
in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall, within ten days of receipt of the
petition, set a time for hearing the matter.
(4) The board shall base its decision on the record developed by
the city, county, or the state and supplemented with additional
evidence if the board determines that such additional evidence would be
necessary or of substantial assistance to the board in reaching its
decision.
(5) The board, shall consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions
involving the review of the same comprehensive plan adoption or the
same development regulation or regulations adoption.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.302 and 1997 c 429 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A board may determine that part or all of a comprehensive plan
or development regulations are invalid if the board:
(a) Makes a finding of noncompliance and issues an order of remand
under RCW 36.70A.300;
(b) Includes in the final order a determination, supported by
findings of fact and conclusions of law, that the ((continued validity
of part or parts of the plan or regulation would substantially
interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of)) adoption of the plan
or regulation was not in compliance with this chapter; and
(c) Specifies in the final order the particular ((part or parts of
the plan or regulation)) adoption actions that are determined to be
invalid, and the reasons for their invalidity.
(2) A determination of invalidity is prospective in effect and does
not extinguish rights that vested under state or local law before
receipt of the board's order by the city or county. The determination
of invalidity does not apply to a completed development permit
application for a project that vested under state or local law before
receipt of the board's order by the county or city or to related
construction permits for that project.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section and (b) of this subsection, a development permit application
not vested under state or local law before receipt of the board's order
by the county or city vests to the local ordinance or resolution that
is determined by the board not to substantially interfere with the
fulfillment of the goals of this chapter.
(b) Even though the application is not vested under state or local
law before receipt by the county or city of the board's order, a
determination of invalidity does not apply to a development permit
application for:
(i) A permit for construction by any owner, lessee, or contract
purchaser of a single-family residence for his or her own use or for
the use of his or her family on a lot existing before receipt by the
county or city of the board's order, except as otherwise specifically
provided in the board's order to protect the public health and safety;
(ii) A building permit and related construction permits for
remodeling, tenant improvements, or expansion of an existing structure
on a lot existing before receipt of the board's order by the county or
city; and
(iii) A boundary line adjustment or a division of land that does
not increase the number of buildable lots existing before receipt of
the board's order by the county or city.
(4) If the ordinance that adopts a plan or development regulation
under this chapter includes a savings clause intended to revive prior
policies or regulations in the event the new plan or regulations are
determined to be invalid, the board shall determine under subsection
(1) of this section whether the prior policies or regulations are valid
during the period of remand.
(5) A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity may
adopt interim controls and other measures to be in effect until it
adopts a comprehensive plan and development regulations that ((comply))
are adopted in compliance with the requirements of this chapter. A
development permit application may vest under an interim control or
measure ((upon determination by the board that the interim controls and
other measures do not substantially interfere with the fulfillment of
the goals of this chapter)).
(6) A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity may
file a motion requesting that the board clarify, modify, or rescind the
order. The board shall expeditiously schedule a hearing on the motion.
At the hearing on the motion, the parties may present information to
the board to clarify the ((part or parts of the)) comprehensive plan or
development regulations adoption actions to which the final order
applies. The board shall issue any supplemental order based on the
information provided at the hearing not later than thirty days after
the date of the hearing.
(7)(((a))) If a determination of invalidity has been made and the
county or city has enacted an ordinance or resolution ((amending))
adopting the invalidated ((part or parts of the)) plan or regulation or
establishing interim controls on development affected by the order of
invalidity, after a compliance hearing, the board shall modify or
rescind the determination of invalidity if it determines under the
standard in subsection (1) of this section that the plan ((or)),
regulation, ((as amended or made subject to such)) or interim
controls((, will no longer substantially interfere with the fulfillment
of the goals of)) adoption complies with the requirements of this
chapter.
(((b) If the board determines that part or parts of the plan or
regulation are no longer invalid as provided in this subsection, but
does not find that the plan or regulation is in compliance with all of
the requirements of this chapter, the board, in its order, may require
periodic reports to the board on the progress the jurisdiction is
making towards compliance.))

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.320 and 1997 c 429 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section,
comprehensive plans and development regulations, and amendments
thereto, adopted under this chapter are presumed valid upon adoption.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section,
the burden is on the petitioner to demonstrate that any action taken by
a state agency, county, or city under this chapter is not in compliance
with the requirements of this chapter.
(3) In any petition under this chapter, the board, after full
consideration of the petition, shall determine whether there is
compliance with the requirements of this chapter. In making its
determination, the board shall consider the criteria adopted by the
department under RCW 36.70A.190(4). The board shall find compliance
unless it determines that the action by the state agency, county, or
city is clearly erroneous in view of the entire record before the board
and in light of the goals and requirements of this chapter.
(4) A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity made
under RCW 36.70A.300 or 36.70A.302 has the burden of demonstrating that
the ordinance or resolution it has enacted in response to the
determination of invalidity ((will no longer substantially interfere
with the fulfillment of the goals of)) was adopted in compliance with
this chapter under the standard in RCW 36.70A.302(1).
(5) The shoreline element of a comprehensive plan and the
applicable development regulations adopted by a county or city shall
take effect as provided in chapter 90.58 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.58.190 and 1995 c 347 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The appeal of the department's decision to adopt a master
program or amendment pursuant to RCW 90.58.070(2) or 90.58.090(4) is
governed by RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(2)(((a) The department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a
proposed master program or amendment adopted by a local government
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the growth
management hearings board with jurisdiction over the local government.
The appeal shall be initiated by filing a petition as provided in RCW
36.70A.250 through 36.70A.320.
(b) If the appeal to the growth management hearings board concerns
shorelines, the growth management hearings board shall review the
proposed master program or amendment for compliance with the
requirements of this chapter and chapter 36.70A RCW, the policy of RCW
90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, and chapter 43.21C RCW as it
relates to the adoption of master programs and amendments under chapter
90.58 RCW.
(c) If the appeal to the growth management hearings board concerns
a shoreline of statewide significance, the board shall uphold the
decision by the department unless the board, by clear and convincing
evidence, determines that the decision of the department is
inconsistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable
guidelines.
(d) The appellant has the burden of proof in all appeals to the
growth management hearings board under this subsection.
(e) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of a growth management
hearings board under this subsection may appeal the decision to
superior court as provided in RCW 36.70A.300.
(3)))(a) The department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a
proposed master program or master program amendment by a local
government ((not planning under RCW 36.70A.040)) shall be appealed to
the shorelines hearings board by filing a petition within thirty days
of the date of the department's written notice to the local government
of the department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a proposed
master program or master program amendment as provided in RCW
90.58.090(2).
(b) In an appeal relating to shorelines, the shorelines hearings
board shall review the proposed master program or master program
amendment and, after full consideration of the presentations of the
local government and the department, shall determine the validity of
the local government's master program or amendment in light of the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines.
(c) In an appeal relating to shorelines of statewide significance,
the shorelines hearings board shall uphold the decision by the
department unless the board determines, by clear and convincing
evidence that the decision of the department is inconsistent with the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines.
(d) Review by the shorelines hearings board shall be considered an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative
Procedure Act. The aggrieved local government shall have the burden of
proof in all such reviews.
(e) Whenever possible, the review by the shorelines hearings board
shall be heard within the county where the land subject to the proposed
master program or master program amendment is primarily located. The
department and any local government aggrieved by a final decision of
the hearings board may appeal the decision to superior court as
provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(((4))) (3) A master program amendment shall become effective after
the approval of the department or after the decision of the shorelines
hearings board to uphold the master program or master program
amendment, provided that the board may remand the master program or
master program adjustment to the local government or the department for
modification prior to the final adoption of the master program or
master program amendment.

--- END ---