BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.260 and 1994 c 249 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each growth management hearings board shall consist of three
members qualified by experience or training in matters pertaining to
land use planning and residing within the jurisdictional boundaries of
the applicable board. At least one member of each board must be
admitted to practice law in this state and at least one member must
have been a city or county elected official. Each board shall be
appointed by the governor and ((not)) shall be confirmed by the senate.
No more than two members at the time of appointment or during their
term shall be members of the same political party. No more than two
members at the time of appointment or during their term shall reside in
the same county.
(2) Each member of a board shall be appointed for a term of six
years. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the governor and
confirmation by the senate for the unexpired portion of the term in
which the vacancy occurs. The terms of the first three members of a
board shall be staggered so that one member is appointed to serve until
July 1, 1994, one member until July 1, 1996, and one member until July
1, 1998.

--- END ---