BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At the time of filing an application for a title insurance
agent license, or any renewal or reinstatement of a title insurance
agent license, the applicant shall provide satisfactory evidence to the
commissioner of having obtained the following as evidence of financial
responsibility:
(a) A fidelity bond providing coverage in the aggregate amount of
two hundred thousand dollars, or the minimum required under RCW
18.44.201, whichever is greater, with a deductible no greater than ten
thousand dollars covering the applicant and each corporate officer,
partner, escrow officer, and employee of the applicant conducting the
business of an escrow agent as defined in RCW 18.44.011 and exempt from
licensing under RCW 18.44.021(6); and
(b) A surety bond in the amount of ten thousand dollars, or the
minimum required under RCW 18.44.201, whichever is greater, executed by
the applicant as obligor and by a surety company authorized to do a
surety business in this state as surety, unless the fidelity bond
obtained by the licensee to satisfy the requirement in (a) of this
subsection does not have a deductible. The bond shall run to the state
of Washington as obligee, and shall run to the benefit of the state and
any person or persons who suffer loss by reason of the applicant's or
its employee's violation of this chapter. The bond shall be
conditioned that the obligor as licensee will faithfully conform to and
abide by this chapter and all rules adopted under this chapter, and
shall reimburse all persons who suffer loss by reason of a violation of
this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. The bond shall be
continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving
written notice to the commissioner of its intent to cancel the bond.
The cancellation shall be effective thirty days after the notice is
received by the commissioner. Whether or not the bond is renewed,
continued, reinstated, reissued, or otherwise extended, replaced, or
modified, including increases or decreases in the penal sum, it shall
be considered one continuous obligation, and the surety upon the bond
shall not be liable in an aggregate amount exceeding the penal sum set
forth on the face of the bond. In no event shall the penal sum, or any
portion thereof, at two or more points in time be added together in
determining the surety's liability. The bond is not liable for any
penalties imposed on the licensee, including but not limited to, any
increased damages or attorneys' fees, or both, awarded under RCW
19.86.090.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a "fidelity bond" means a
primary commercial blanket bond or its equivalent satisfactory to the
commissioner and written by an insurer authorized to transact this line
of business in the state of Washington. The bond shall provide
fidelity coverage for any fraudulent or dishonest acts committed by any
one or more of the employees, officers, or owners as defined in the
bond, acting alone or in collusion with others. The bond shall be for
the sole benefit of the title insurance agent and under no
circumstances whatsoever shall the bonding company be liable under the
bond to any other party. The bond shall name the title insurance agent
as obligee and shall protect the obligee against the loss of money or
other real or personal property belonging to the obligee, or in which
the obligee has a pecuniary interest, or for which the obligee is
legally liable or held by the obligee in any capacity, whether the
obligee is legally liable therefor or not. The bond may be canceled by
the insurer upon delivery of thirty days' written notice to the
commissioner and to the title insurance agent.
(3) The fidelity bond and the surety bond shall be kept in full
force and effect as a condition precedent to the title insurance
agent's authority to transact business in this state, and the title
insurance agent shall supply the commissioner with satisfactory
evidence thereof upon request.

--- END ---