BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Public confidence in government is essential and programs to
continuously improve quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of public
functions must be enhanced in order to restore public trust;
(2) Washington state government and other entities that receive tax
dollars must transform the way it operates and delivers services in
order to respond to severe, ongoing budget shortfalls and declining
revenues, and ensure citizens receive value for their tax dollars;
(3) A strong, objective, and independent board is necessary to help
develop, oversee, and monitor accountability systems for all government
to ensure that public entities accomplish intended goals and outcomes,
and that management systems, customer satisfaction, and efficiency are
world class in performance; and
(4) Fair, independent, professional performance audits of
government systems by the state auditor are essential to improving the
efficiency and effectiveness of government entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
The citizen accountability and progress board is created to guide
and assist agencies in developing data-driven, valid, and reliable
performance standards, measures, outcomes, and goals, designed to
manage the money agencies spend, the services they provide, the
employees and processes they control, and the businesses, people, and
resources they regulate. The board shall seek, review, and recommend
best practices for all agencies.
(1) The board shall consist of nine members appointed by the
governor. Individuals appointed to the board shall be from a diverse
range of backgrounds and be able to demonstrate knowledge and expertise
in performance management, quality management, strategic planning, or
closely related fields. The board shall elect a chair and a vice-chair. The governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the
house of representatives, the chief justice of the Washington supreme
court, and the state auditor, or their designees, shall serve as ex
officio nonvoting members of the board.
(2) Appointed members shall serve for terms of four years, with the
terms expiring on June 30th on the fourth year of the term. However,
in the case of the initial members, four members shall serve four-year
terms, three members shall serve three-year terms, and two members
shall serve two-year terms, with each of the terms expiring on June
30th of the applicable year. Appointees may be reappointed to serve
more than one term.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development,
office of community development, shall provide clerical, technical, and
management personnel to the board to serve as the board's staff. Staff
from the office of financial management and the state auditor's office
shall assist the board as needed.
(4) The board shall meet together as a board as the board
determines necessary at times and places specified by the call of the
chair or a majority of the members of the board.
(5) The members of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The board may adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
The citizen accountability and progress board shall:
(1) Review the various government performance measurement, audit,
and accountability systems currently in place and develop
recommendations to integrate into one performance measurement system
for all governments by December 15, 2004, and continually review and
provide recommendations for improvement every two years;
(2) Establish a program and strategic plan for the conduct of a
phased-in independent performance audit and yearly performance scoring
of state agencies and other government entities and their programs and
functions. As part of this program, the board shall:
(a) Consult with and seek input from elected officials and
professionals with a background in performance management. Performance
audit criteria shall be distributed before an audit and scoring. The
board shall consider already developed best practices and audit
criteria used by government or nongovernment organizations;
(b) Submit the results and advise the governor and the legislature
on the conduct of the performance audit and scoring program by December
15th of each year; and
(c) Contract or partner with public or private entities that have
expertise in the conduct of public sector reviews to perform the audits
and performance scoring of all government agencies. Initial areas to
be audited and scored shall be quality management, productivity and
fiscal efficiency, program effectiveness, contract management and
oversite, internal audit, internal and external customer satisfaction,
and statutory and regulatory compliance;
(3) Assist in the development of criteria for performance audits
conducted by the state auditor and advise in the implementation plan
for performance audits for all state agencies. As part of this effort:
(a) Submit the results of the state auditor's performance audit and
performance scoring to the governor and the legislature by December
15th of each year; and
(b) Release the state auditor's audit results and performance
scoring to the public and provide public recognition for outstanding
effort;
(4) Identify and evaluate best practices, audit findings, and
performance scoring in order to identify opportunities to develop
government partnerships and eliminate program duplications and
redundancies resulting in increased quality, effectiveness, and
efficiency of state agencies; and
(5) Collect, disseminate, and share appropriate best practices with
all state agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply to sections 2 through 4 of
this act, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Performance audit" means an objective systematic assessment,
survey, or directed self-assessment of state agencies, programs,
functions, or activities to provide for public accountability. Initial
performance audits and performance scoring shall include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Quality and process management practices;
(b) Independent and internal audit functions;
(c) Internal and external customer satisfaction;
(d) Program effectiveness;
(e) Fiscal productivity and efficiency;
(f) Regulatory and procedural compliance; and
(g) Any other areas as appropriate.
(2) "State agency" means elective officers and offices, and every
other office, officer, department, board, council, committee,
commission, or authority of the state government now existing or
hereafter created, and their vendors or subcontractors, supported,
wholly or in part, by appropriations from the state treasury or funds
under its control, or by the levy, assessment, collection, or receipt
of fines, penalties, fees, licenses, sales of commodities, service
charges, rentals, grants-in-aid, or other income provided by law, and
all state educational, penal, reformatory, charitable, eleemosynary, or
other institutions, supported, wholly or in part, by appropriations
from the state treasury or funds under its control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state auditor, with advice from the citizen accountability
and progress board, shall develop and implement a plan for conducting
recurring performance audits of government systems and operations.
(2) With advice from the board, the state auditor shall develop an
implementation plan for a phased-in audit schedule for auditing all
state government agencies and local governments and schools. All
audits shall be designed to be completed within a six-month period.
(3) The state auditor shall assist the board in the collection,
dissemination, tracking, and sharing of appropriate best practices with
all state agencies, schools, and local governments.
(4) The state auditor shall submit a report of findings for the
performance audits to the board December 1st of each year.
(5) The state auditor may conduct performance audits.
(6) The definitions in section 4 of this act apply to this section.

--- END ---