BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each state agency shall, within available funds, develop and
implement a quality management program to improve the quality,
efficiency, and effectiveness of the public services it provides
through business process redesign, employee involvement, and other
quality management techniques. Each agency shall ensure that front
line agency employees are engaged in the program and shall provide
employees with the training necessary for successful implementation of
efforts toward quality improvement.
(2) Each agency shall, within available funds, ensure that its
quality management program:
(a) Identifies immediate-term and near-term opportunities to
improve services and reduce costs;
(b) Identifies goals and uses strategic business planning and
performance measures to establish priorities and measure progress
toward meeting them. Each state agency shall develop performance
measures to assess customer satisfaction, agency progress toward
accomplishing outcomes specified in the agency budget under RCW
43.88.090, and the impact of initiatives instituted under the quality
management program as a whole;
(c) Reports the results of its quality management program on a
regular basis. Each agency shall ensure that its report specifies
improved outcomes for public service and efficiency. Any agency in its
report may describe methods of measuring customer and stakeholder
satisfaction, of engaging agency employees in the program, and of
assessing the extent to which business practices have been changed to
improve quality, efficiency, and effectiveness;
(d) Evaluates the results of its quality, service, and management
improvement programs and assesses program effects upon leadership,
information and analysis, strategic planning, human resource
development and management, process improvement, business results, and
customer focus and satisfaction; and
(e) Develops a plan for quality improvement, documenting efforts
made up to the date of the report and addressing all matters enumerated
in this subsection.
(3) State agencies whose chief executives are appointed by the
governor shall report program results to the governor on a regular
basis. State agencies whose chief executives are elected officials
other than the governor shall report program results to the elected
official on a regular basis.
(4) Each state agency shall integrate efforts made under this
section with quality management programs undertaken under executive
order or other authority. The office of insurance commissioner, the
department of natural resources, and four-year institutions of higher
education shall develop and implement a complete quality management
program by June 30, 2006. All other state agencies shall develop and
implement a complete quality management program by June 30, 2004.
(5) Starting in 2008 and at least once every three years
thereafter, the office of insurance commissioner, the department of
natural resources, and four-year institutions of higher education, or
their subdivisions, or both, shall apply for the Washington state
quality award, the Malcolm Baldrige National Quality Award, or an
equivalent outside quality assessment, for potential recognition.
Starting in 2005 and at least once every three years thereafter, all
other state agencies or their subdivisions, or both, shall apply for
the Washington state quality award, the Malcolm Baldrige National
Quality Award, or an equivalent outside quality assessment, for
potential recognition. Every subdivision of a state agency with three
thousand or more full-time equivalent employees must complete an
application in each three-year period.
(6) For purposes of this section, "state agency" means those state
agencies within the executive branch of government including
institutions of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The senate and the house of representatives shall each develop and
implement quality improvement programs as described under section 1 of
this act by June 30, 2005, and shall report the results of these
efforts to the leadership of each major political party caucus within
its respective house.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 2.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The supreme court is encouraged to develop and implement quality
improvement programs, as described under section 1 of this act, for the
judicial branch of government, by June 30, 2005, and shall report the
results of these efforts to the chief justice. The programs may be
implemented directly by the supreme court or may be delegated to the
administrator for the courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Local governments are encouraged to develop and implement
quality management programs as described in section 1 of this act.
(2) For purposes of this section, "local government" includes every
county, city, town, special district, municipal corporation, and quasi-municipal corporation in the state.

--- END ---