BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS. The legislature makes the
following findings:
(1) Despite numerous efforts to improve health care in the state,
the crisis continues to worsen;
(2) While this crisis is caused, to a great degree, by rising costs
associated with changing demographics and the increasing availability
of costly drugs and treatments, it is equally due to the lack of
effective public policy governing the purpose of a health care system,
its governance and financing, and related individual and/or
organizational responsibilities;
(3) Employer-based coverage has been on the decline for some time
because the cost of providing adequate worker coverage can
significantly affect the viability of a business, while minimal
employer contributions can place an undue burden upon the worker; and
(4) While consumer choice is important, the growing demand on
existing resources requires that funding be focused on services
identified to improve health status in the most economical manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 INTENT. The legislature intends that health
care improvement efforts include the following principles:
(1) Residents are fundamentally responsible for their health to the
extent it depends on the choices they make about the way they live;
(2) To support its residents in improving their health, Washington
state must establish a system that maintains and improves, where
possible and necessary, the health status of residents in a clinically
efficacious and cost-effective manner;
(3) While effective rules are necessary, they should be limited to
protecting the safety of consumers, ensuring necessary disclosure and
privacy of health information, providing fairness, ensuring adequate
and timely payment to providers, hospital, and other vendors, and
collecting necessary data to support patient care and affect necessary
public policy;
(4) It should not be the expectation of Washington's health care
system to maximize a resident's functioning or personal happiness, or
provide medical treatment when nonmedical approaches are readily
available. Thus, the system should be designed to minimize enrollee
encounters, if possible;
(5) An effective health care system is necessary for successful
economic, educational, and community infrastructures;
(6) Each resident should have access to a minimal set of health
services necessary to maintain his or her health status at an
acceptable level;
(7) Residents should have a choice of types of providers and
treatments, but such services should be limited to the provider's
practice scope and treatment that have been deemed clinically
efficacious through standard scientific methods and cost-effective; and
(8) The funding and maintenance of an effective health care system
is the joint responsibility of consumers, providers, health-related
manufacturers, employers, and governments. These responsibilities
should be clearly delineated and readily met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
BENEFIT DESIGN. (1) The schedule of basic health care services
designed by the administrator pursuant to RCW 70.47.060 shall include
the following:
(a) To the extent data is available, benefits designed using
evidence-based methods with explicit health outcomes;
(b) Catastrophic coverage, including inpatient and specialty care,
pharmaceuticals, durable medical equipment, and therapies upon the
satisfaction of a three thousand dollar deductible per person, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per family. Catastrophic coverage shall
be provided without copays or coinsurance, except for pharmaceuticals
and durable medical equipment, which may be subject to copays and/or
coinsurance;
(c) Primary care, as defined by the health care authority, with a
copayment of no more than fifteen dollars and/or coinsurance of no more
than twenty percent; and
(d) Preventive services, with no additional enrollee costs, based
on care developed by the state board of health in consideration of
nationally recognized standards.
(2) The benefits included shall be reasonably expected to drive
average total coverage costs in the basic health plan of no more than
one hundred fifty dollars per enrollee per month.
(3) Working with appropriate local organizations, the health care
authority may develop alternative plans that, although meeting the
requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, are otherwise
designed to address the specific population, health care system, or
other unique circumstances presented by the local areas for which they
are developed. The administrator may accept payment from an enrollee's
employer in lieu of all or any portion of the state subsidy for an
enrollee in an alternative plan. The unused state funds shall be used
to subsidize additional enrollees in the local area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
By January 1, 2005, a carrier offering any individual health
benefit plan shall offer to all individuals a health benefit plan
providing benefits identical to those included in the basic health plan
under chapter 70.47 RCW. Such a plan is not required to include any
benefits other than those in the basic health plan and is to be known
as the Washington standard plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 STUDIES. The governor, in consultation with
the legislature, shall determine methods, means, and schedules for the
following studies:
(1) Methods of streamlining purchaser, carrier, and provider health
care operations in areas of credentialing of providers, billings and
claims, patient information, and enrollee access to health prevention
information;
(2) Review of existing mandated benefits to determine degrees of
clinical efficacy and cost-effectiveness;
(3) Review of all insurance and provider licensure regulations for
the purpose of eliminating those that are unnecessary;
(4) Analysis of consolidating and reorganizing existing state
health agencies to increase efficiency;
(5) Develop methods to modify payment and other compliance
requirements to ensure an adequate percentage of provider's time for
patient care;
(6) Review of methods to recruit and retain necessary providers in
underserved areas;
(7) Review of current federal and state-funded benefit programs to
ensure that benefits are based on evidence of improving health status;
and
(8) Review of methods to maximize the availability of federal funds
to expand low-income access.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
QUALITY ASSURANCE. The administrator, in consultation with a
committee of agency medical directors, shall:
(1) Develop and implement a process to assure that any decision
regarding the health care services and products for which the state
pays is evidence-based, reflecting the conscientious, explicit, and
judicious use of current best evidence with regard to patient care; and
(2) Establish a scientifically based health care electronic
communication program to educate consumers on improving their health
status without medical intervention and to assist them in making
appropriate choices when medical treatment is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.47 RCW
to read as follows:
MANDATED BENEFIT MORATORIUM. After the effective date of this act,
the authorization of mandated benefits is prohibited pending the
completion of the related study required in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington health care recovery act.

--- END ---