BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) It is essential for the health and safety of the young people
of Washington state that they receive medically and factually accurate
and objective information about sexuality, pregnancy, and sexually
transmitted diseases;
(2) Effective sexuality education programs discussing condoms and
contraception help delay the onset of sexual activity, reduce the
frequency of sex, and reduce the number of sexual partners; and
(3) Medically accurate information in sex education classes has
contributed to a recent decline in Washington state's teen pregnancy
rate and can reduce human suffering and health care costs by minimizing
sexually transmitted diseases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "medically accurate" means verified or
supported by research conducted in compliance with scientific methods
and published in peer-review journals, where appropriate, and
recognized as accurate and objective by professional organizations and
agencies with expertise in the relevant field, including the American
college of obstetricians and gynecologists, the department of health,
or the centers for disease control and prevention.
(2) All sexuality education courses paid for in whole or in part
with public funds for use in public schools or elsewhere shall provide
medically accurate information.
(3) In addition to medically accurate information, sex educators
shall present information that abstinence from sexual intercourse is
the most effective means to prevent unwanted teenage pregnancy,
sexually transmitted diseases, and acquired immune deficiency syndrome
(AIDS) when transmitted sexually. Sex educators shall provide students
with statistics based on the latest medical information that cite
failure and success rates of condoms and other contraceptives in
preventing pregnancy, AIDS, and other sexually transmitted diseases.
(4) All material and instruction in classes that teach sex
education and discuss sexual intercourse shall be age appropriate.

--- END ---