BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Any manufacturer or importer licensed by
the United States secretary of the treasury that ships or transports a
pistol or rifle to be sold, rented, or transferred in the state shall
include in the box with the firearm in a separate sealed container:
(a) A projectile discharged from that firearm;
(b) A spent cartridge casing of the projectile discharged from that
firearm; and
(c) Additional information that identifies the specific firearm and
cartridge as required by chief of the Washington state patrol.
(2) Upon receipt of a pistol or rifle from the manufacturer or
importer, the dealer shall confirm to the Washington state patrol that
the manufacturer or importer complied with subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Upon the sale or transfer of the pistol or rifle, the dealer
shall forward the sealed container to the Washington state patrol crime
information center. The crime information center shall enter the
ballistics image and other required information in a ballistics imaging
data base.
(4) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall adopt rules to
carry out the provisions of this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "ballistics image" means the
unique characteristics that each firearm imprints on projectiles and
spent cartridge casings.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.500 and 1998 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is established the Washington state crime information center
to be located in the records division of the Washington state patrol
and to function under the direction of the chief of the Washington
state patrol. The center shall serve to coordinate crime information,
by means of data processing, for all law enforcement agencies in the
state. It shall make such use of the facilities of the law enforcement
teletype system as is practical. It shall provide access to the
national crime information center, to motor vehicle and driver license
information, to the sex offender central registry, to the ballistics
imaging data base, and to such other public records as may be accessed
by data processing and which are pertinent to law enforcement.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.43.510 and 1998 c 67 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As soon as is practical and feasible there shall be established, by
means of data processing, files listing stolen and wanted vehicles,
outstanding warrants, identifying children whose parents, custodians,
or legal guardians have reported as having run away from home or the
custodial residence, identifiable stolen property, files maintaining
the central registry of sex offenders required to register under
chapter 9A.44 RCW, files maintaining the ballistics imaging data base,
and such other files as may be of general assistance to law enforcement
agencies.

--- END ---