BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are areas
of the state that still have very high levels of unemployment. The
legislature also finds that additional incentives are needed to promote
economic stimulation and new employment opportunities in these
distressed areas, and that these incentives are essential to increase
economic growth in these areas. The legislature intends to accomplish
this by providing tax incentives for call centers, toll services, or
network telephone services located in distressed areas of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment used by a person who operates a call center
located in an eligible area, or to sale of or charges made for labor
and service rendered in respect to installing the machinery and
equipment. The exemption for labor and services provided by this
subsection does not apply to sale of or charges made for labor and
services for repairing, replacing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
machinery and equipment. The purchaser must provide the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate as part
of its permanent records for a period of at least five years.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sale of or
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to constructing
or improving buildings used as a call center located in an eligible
area, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of such building during the course of
constructing or improving the buildings. The purchaser must provide
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the
certificate as part of its permanent records for a period of at least
five years.
(3) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of or
charges to a person who operates a call center for rental of tangible
personal property along with an operator if such activity is used in
constructing or improving a building used as a call center located in
an eligible area or in regards to eligible machinery and equipment.
The purchaser must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in
a form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain
a copy of the certificate as part of its permanent records for a period
of at least five years.
(4) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sale of toll
services, as defined in RCW 82.08.0289, to a person who operates a call
center located in an eligible area. This exemption applies to the
calendar year in which a call center's operations commence and the
immediately subsequent three calendar years. This exemption does not
apply to any other network telephone services of the call center. The
purchaser must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a
form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain
a copy of the certificate as part of its permanent records for a period
of at least five years.
(5)(a) To qualify for the exemptions provided in this section, a
call center must employ twenty-five or more employees who provide
customer service and support by responding to inbound telephone calls
and electronic contacts, using computer-automated equipment, an
electronic medium, or the telephone, within one year of commencing call
center operations. Office support, management, and other employees who
do not primarily perform customer service and support are not included
in determining if the operation meets the threshold for the number of
employees. In addition, if, at any time after the threshold is
satisfied, employment at the call center falls below the twenty-five or
more employees, the exemptions under this section are not available on
or after that date, until such time as employment levels meet the
threshold.
(b) If a person discontinues the operation of a call center located
in an eligible area, the amount of taxes for which the exemption has
been claimed for the current calendar year and the preceding three
calendar years is immediately due. The department shall assess
interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for which the person is not
eligible. The interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be assessed
retroactively to the date the tax exemption was taken, and shall accrue
until the taxes for which the exemption has been taken are repaid.
(6) A person taking the exemptions under this section must apply to
the department for a call center exemption certificate. The
application must be in a form and manner as prescribed by the
department. The department shall rule on the application within sixty
days of receipt. The department shall issue an exemption certificate
to those persons that qualify as a call center located in an eligible
area. The exemption certificate is valid for a one-year period. Call
centers taking the exemptions provided by this section must reapply
each year to maintain eligibility.
(7) A person who takes an exemption under this section shall make
an annual report to the department. The report must be filed by
January 30th following any year in which an exemption under this
section was taken. The report shall be in letter form and shall
include the following information: Taxpayer name and registration
number, confirmation that the person is operating a call center,
location of the call center, how long the call center has been in that
location, the amount of each exemption taken under this section, and
the average number of employees providing customer service and support.
Failure to file a report will not result in the loss of eligibility
under this section. However, the department shall contact the
taxpayers who have not filed the report and obtain the data from the
taxpayer or assist the taxpayer in the filing of the report, so that
the data and information necessary to measure the program's
effectiveness is collected.
(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Buildings" means those structures used in a call center
located in an eligible area. If a building is used partly for a call
center located in an eligible area and partly for other purposes, the
applicable tax exemption shall be determined by apportioning the costs
of the construction. Such apportionment shall be based on square
footage and determined according to the ratio of the square footage of
that portion of the building or buildings used as a call center bears
to the square footage of the total building. The term "buildings" also
includes utility systems for heating, ventilation, air conditioning,
plumbing, electrical, or similar systems used in the call center
operation.
(b) "Call center located in an eligible area" means a business
operation:
(i) Employing twenty-five or more employees who provide customer
service and support by responding to inbound telephone calls and
electronic contacts, using computer-automated equipment, an electronic
medium, or the telephone; and
(ii) Commencing the operation of a call center, after July 1, 2004,
in one of the following eligible areas:
(A) A community empowerment zone, as defined in chapter 43.31C RCW;
(B) A county with fewer than one hundred persons per square mile,
as determined annually by the office of financial management and
published by the department, effective for the period July 1st through
June 30th; or
(C) A county smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles, as
determined annually by the office of financial management and published
by the department, effective for the period July 1st through June 30th.
(c) "Call center located in an eligible area" does not include:
(i) A call center that relocates any portion of a call center from
within the state to an eligible area under this section;
(ii) A business operation engaged in the activity of telemarketing
or the solicitation of sales; or
(iii) A business that merely incorporates, reincorporates, merges,
or otherwise changes or reforms its identity in an attempt to qualify
as a call center located in an eligible area.
(d)(i) "Machinery and equipment" means commercial fixtures and
devices, such as electronic communications equipment, communications
systems infrastructure components, computer software, computer
hardware, office furniture, and any other fixture and device necessary
for the communications operations of a call center located in an
eligible area. "Machinery and equipment" includes tangible personal
property that becomes an ingredient or component of the fixture or
device.
(ii) "Machinery and equipment" does not include:
(A) Hand-powered tools, such as hammer and wrenches;
(B) Property with a useful life of less than one year; or
(C) Repair and replacement parts for otherwise eligible machinery
and equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use by a
person who operates a call center located in an eligible area of:
(a) Machinery and equipment used in a call center located in an
eligible area;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing the
machinery and equipment in a call center located in an eligible area;
and
(c) Tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of buildings used in a call center located in an eligible
area.
(2) "Building," "call center located in an eligible area," and
"machinery and equipment" have the same meanings given in section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The office of financial management shall
develop a report on the prevalence by which the state of Washington,
from fiscal year 2001 through fiscal year 2004, contracted with
out-of-state employers, other business entities, or other state
governments for the provision of goods or services in this state or to
the residents of this state. The report shall include an accounting of
the total amount of funds expended and the number of contracts
executed between state agencies and businesses where the services or
goods contracted for were performed or provided by employees or
contractors working outside of the state of Washington. In addition,
for each contract, the report shall include a description of the
services performed, the agency participating in the contract, the funds
expended for each contract, the location where the services were
performed, an analysis of whether adequate services were available
within the state of Washington to provide the same or similar goods or
services, and the degree to which utilization of services within the
state would have affected the cost of the contract. The office of
financial management shall submit its report to the senate committee on
commerce and trade and the house committee on commerce and labor by
July 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---