BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.380 and 1993 c 182 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes the increase in water-oriented
recreation by users of human and wind-powered, beachable vessels such
as kayaks, canoes, or day sailors on Washington's waters. These
recreationists frequently require overnight camping facilities along
the shores of public or private beaches. The legislature now creates
a water trail recreation program, to be administered by the Washington
state parks and recreation commission. The legislature recognizes that
the effort to develop water trail sites is a continuing need and that
the commission provides beneficial expertise and consultation to water
trail user groups, agencies, and private landowners for the existing
Cascadia marine trail and Willapa Bay water trail.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.385 and 1993 c 182 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to its other powers, duties, and functions, the
commission may:
(1) Plan, construct, and maintain suitable facilities for water
trail activities on lands administered or acquired by the commission or
as authorized on lands administered by tribes or other public agencies
or private landowners by agreement.
(2) ((Provide and issue, upon payment of the proper fee, with the
assistance of those authorized agents as may be necessary for the
convenience of the public, water trail permits to utilize designated
water trail facilities. The commission may, after consultation with
the water trail advisory committee, adopt rules authorizing reciprocity
of water trail permits provided by another state or Canadian province,
but only to the extent that a similar exemption or provision for water
trail permits is issued by that state or province.
(3))) Compile, publish, distribute, and charge a fee for maps or
other forms of public information indicating areas and facilities
suitable for water trail activities.
(((4))) (3) Contract with a public agency, private entity, or
person for the actual conduct of these duties.
(((5))) (4) Work with individuals or organizations who wish to
volunteer their time to support the water trail recreation program.
(5) Provide expertise and consultation to individuals, agencies,
and organizations in the continued development of water trail sites in
this state.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.410 and 1993 c 182 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission may((, after consultation with the water trail
advisory committee,)) adopt rules to administer the water trail program
and facilities on areas owned or administered by the commission. Where
water trail facilities administered by other public or private entities
are incorporated into the water trail system, the rules adopted by
those entities shall prevail. The commission is not responsible or
liable for enforcement of these alternative rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any unspent balance of funds in the water
trail program account created in RCW 79A.05.405 as of June 30, 2003,
must be transferred to the state parks renewal and stewardship account
created in RCW 79A.05.215. All receipts from sales of materials under
RCW 79A.05.385 and all monetary civil penalties collected under RCW
79A.05.415 must be deposited in the state parks renewal and stewardship
account. Any gifts, grants, donations, or moneys from any source
received by the commission for the water trail program must also be
deposited in the state parks renewal and stewardship account. Funds
transferred or deposited into the state parks renewal and stewardship
account under this section must be used solely for water trail program
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 79A.05.400 (Water trail recreation program -- Permits) and
1993 c 182 s 5;
(2) RCW 79A.05.405 (Water trail recreation program--Account
created) and 2000 c 11 s 40 & 1993 c 182 s 6; and
(3) RCW 79A.05.420 (Water trail advisory committee) and 2000 c 11
s 41, 1994 c 264 s 21, & 1993 c 182 s 9.

--- END ---