BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that an
active, informed electorate provides a strong foundation for a
democratic republic and, as such, efforts to fully inform voters are
critical to sustain our democratic form of government. The initiative
and referendum process, a constitutional embodiment of an active
electorate, is cherished by Washington's independent-minded citizens.
Recent election history demonstrates the willingness of the public to
exercise their constitutional right to legislate by ballot measure.
The legislature finds that as the state officer with the responsibility
of certifying measures to the ballot, the secretary of state should
provide a formal opportunity for the general public to hear information
about the impact of a ballot measure in a public setting with an
opportunity for both proponents and opponents of a measure to present
their arguments. The legislature intends for the secretary to be a
facilitator in this process and as such should maintain a neutral or
nonbiased course of action throughout the public hearing process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW
to read as follows:
DEFINITIONS. (1) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all
local agencies.
(a) "State agency" includes every state office as defined in RCW
42.17.020 and department as specified in RCW 43.17.010.
(b) "Local agency" includes every county, city, town, or special
purpose district.
(2) "Ballot measure" means a measure as defined by RCW 29.01.110.
(3) "Impact statement" or "statement" means the document issued by
an agency that complies with the requirements of section 4 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.07.030 and 1982 c 35 s 186 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall:
(1) Keep a register of and attest the official acts of the
governor;
(2) Affix the state seal, with his attestation, to commissions,
pardons, and other public instruments to which the signature of the
governor is required, and also attestations and authentications of
certificates and other documents properly issued by the secretary;
(3) Record all articles of incorporation, deeds, or other papers
filed in the secretary of state's office;
(4) Receive and file all the official bonds of officers required to
be filed with the secretary of state;
(5) Take and file in the secretary of state's office receipts for
all books distributed by him;
(6) Hold public hearings on ballot measures certified to the
general election ballot;
(7) Certify to the legislature the election returns for all
officers required by the Constitution to be so certified, and certify
to the governor the names of all other persons who have received at any
election the highest number of votes for any office the incumbent of
which is to be commissioned by the governor;
(((7))) (8) Furnish, on demand, to any person paying the fees
therefor, a certified copy of all or any part of any law, record, or
other instrument filed, deposited, or recorded in the secretary of
state's office;
(((8))) (9) Present to the speaker of the house of representatives,
at the beginning of each regular session of the legislature during an
odd-numbered year, a full account of all purchases made and expenses
incurred by the secretary of state on account of the state;
(((9))) (10) File in his office an impression of each and every
seal in use by any state officer;
(([(10)])) (11) Keep a record of all fees charged or received by
the secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW
to read as follows:
IMPACT STATEMENTS. (1) The director or secretary of an agency may
issue an impact statement providing an analysis of the effect of a
ballot measure on the agency's ability to perform its constitutional or
statutory responsibilities.
(2) State and local officials, with the assistance of the employees
of the official's office or agency, and under the supervision of the
official, may use public facilities to prepare an impact statement on
a ballot measure that foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within
their constitutional or statutory responsibilities.
(3) The statement may provide a description of the agency's
methodology used in determining the impact of the ballot measure.
(4) The impact statement is considered to be issued when it is
filed electronically with the secretary of state after certification of
the ballot measure to the ballot and not later than forty-five days
before the general election.
(5) If issued, the statement must include an attestation that the
impact statement results from deliberative intra-agency processes and
constitutes the agency's final statement on the ballot measure.
(6) The statement may be withdrawn at any time, but may not be
altered once issued.
(7) The issuing agency shall retain an official paper copy of the
statement for purposes of archival record and dissemination, upon
request, to any member of the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW
to read as follows:
HEARINGS. (1) After the secretary of state certifies a ballot
measure as qualified for the general election ballot, the secretary of
state, or the secretary's designee, shall hold a public hearing on the
measure in each congressional district in the state. When two or more
congressional districts are in a compact geographical area, the
secretary of state may hold one hearing to serve these multiple
congressional districts. The secretary or a designee shall preside
over the hearings. The secretary may combine two or more ballot
measures in a single hearing.
(2) The secretary of state shall give thirty days' notice of the
hearings to all state agencies, county legislative authorities, and
persons designated in subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(3) The public hearings must include opportunity for the following
persons, or their designees, to present arguments for and against each
ballot measure, including an impact statement, if issued:
(a) Members of the committees appointed under RCW 29.81.240 to
prepare statements for the voters' pamphlet;
(b) State and local agency officials who determine that the measure
affects their constitutional or statutory responsibilities or have
issued an impact statement;
(c) Registered voters in the congressional district.
(4) The hearings must be held between September 1st and October
15th, and the secretary of state shall give notice of them by notifying
press, radio, and television in the congressional districts, and by
other means such as the secretary of state's web site. The secretary
may publish information in the state voters' pamphlet regarding the
availability of unedited audio or audio/video from the hearings.
(5) Other than the official voters' pamphlet, a public official may
not send, by mail or other form of communication, any unsolicited
information on the ballot measure. The secretary shall not distribute
any printed information presented by participants under this section,
but may supply on-line access to an unedited audio or audio/video file
of any hearing by means of the office's web site. Public officials
attending the hearings are entitled to travel expenses as otherwise
provided by law.
(6) When possible, hearings should be limited to four hours,
subject to being reconvened by the secretary or a designee at a later
date.
(7) Nothing in this section diminishes a citizen's constitutional
rights nor may any part of this section or the hearings authorized in
it invalidate an initiative measure.
(8) The secretary may adopt rules in accordance with this section
to ensure that the public hearings are carried out in an organized,
objective manner.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.17.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 265 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
No elective official nor any employee of his office nor any person
appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may use or
authorize the use of any of the facilities of a public office or
agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign
for election of any person to any office or for the promotion of or
opposition to any ballot proposition. Facilities of public office or
agency include, but are not limited to, use of stationery, postage,
machines, and equipment, use of employees of the office or agency
during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the
office or agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the office
or agency: PROVIDED, That the foregoing provisions of this section
shall not apply to the following activities:
(1) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition so long as (a) any required notice of
the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition,
and (b) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(2) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry;
(3) Activities ((which)) that are part of the normal and regular
conduct of the office or agency;
(4) Activities in compliance with sections 4 and 5 of this act of
an elected official or an employee of the official's office or a person
appointed to or employed by a public office or agency.

Sec. 7 RCW 42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use
of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for the
promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing
acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or
influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation
of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited
to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state
employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by
the agency.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition as long as (i) required notice of the
meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition, and
(ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this subsection,
it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to
respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make
incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an
actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards
shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;
(c) Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency; ((and))
(d) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide elected
officials and legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of
permissible communications, including written and verbal communications
initiated by them of their views on ballot propositions that
foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their constitutional
or statutory responsibilities; and
(e) Activities in compliance with sections 4 and 5 of this act of
an elected official or an employee of the official's office or a person
appointed to or employed by a public office or agency.
(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to
the exclusion of RCW 42.17.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Captions used in this act are not part of
the law.

--- END ---