BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All executive agencies shall allow employees to take paid
leave, not to exceed five days in a two-year period, as needed to
participate in life-giving procedures. Such leave shall not be charged
against sick leave or annual leave, and use of leave without pay is not
required.
(2) Agencies may take into account program implementation and
staffing replacement requirements in the scheduling of such leave time.
Employees may be required to provide reasonable advance notice of a
desire to take paid leave time.
(3) When planning for and granting paid leave, agencies shall take
into account provisions of collective bargaining agreements that cover
leave usage. Any additional leave time needed for life-giving
procedures shall be subject to each agency's leave policies and
collective bargaining agreements.
(4) Employees must provide written proof from an accredited medical
institution, physician, or other medical professional that the employee
participated in a life-giving procedure.
(5) This section does not create any entitlement or other right
that may be converted to cash, other compensation, or any other
benefit. It is intended only to encourage altruistic life-giving
procedures, and to allow paid leave to participate in such procedures.
(6) Agencies may continue or implement any informal, flextime, ad
hoc, or other leave.
(7) For purposes of this section, "life-giving procedure" means a
medically supervised procedure involving the testing, sampling, or
donation of organs, tissues, and other human body components for the
purposes of donation, without compensation, to a person or organization
for medically necessary treatments. "Life-giving procedure" does not
include the donation of blood or plasma.

--- END ---