BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Concerns have been raised that the state
hospitals and other facilities that draw users from across the state
present local government, including local law enforcement, with a
burden of unreimbursed costs as a result of their presence in the
jurisdiction. It has been proposed that the state pay for the ongoing
costs to the local government.
The legislature finds that no review has been done that addresses
both positive and negative fiscal impacts of state facilities on local
governments in this state, nor has this state reviewed the practices of
other states with regard to reimbursement of local government for
statewide facilities. The legislature further finds that it would be
inappropriate to address this matter in a piecemeal manner.
The legislature intends to review the economic impacts of state
facilities on local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall review the issue of the economic impacts of state
facilities on local government. The committee, in its review, shall
consider, but not be limited to, the following factors: Evaluation of
economic benefits of state facilities on local economies and
governments; evaluation of economic costs of state facilities on local
economies and governments; comparison of costs and benefits from these
facilities on local economies and governments; and evaluation of a
method to measure such costs and benefits on an ongoing basis. The
committee should consider such impacts from state hospitals, state
correctional facilities, and state juvenile correctional institutions
on local governments and economies. In carrying out this review, the
committee may consider developing a sample of both facilities and local
communities in assessing these impacts, but should be attentive to
regional differences within the state. As part of its review, the
committee may also assess comparable information from other states
regarding the allocation of excess costs between state and local
governments for the extraordinary impacts of state facilities. The
committee shall provide a final report on this review by December 1,
2004, to the appropriate legislative committees.

--- END ---