BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.29.050 and 1997 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person licensed as a dental hygienist in this state may remove
deposits and stains from the surfaces of the teeth, may apply topical
preventive or prophylactic agents, may polish and smooth restorations,
may perform root planing and soft-tissue curettage, and may perform
other dental operations and services delegated to them by a licensed
dentist: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That licensed dental hygienists shall in no
event perform the following dental operations or services:
(1) Any surgical removal of tissue of the oral cavity;
(2) Any prescription of drugs or medications requiring the written
order or prescription of a licensed dentist or physician. However, a
hygienist may place antimicrobials pursuant to the order of a licensed
dentist and under the dentist's required supervision;
(3) Any diagnosis for treatment or treatment planning; or
(4) The taking of any impression of the teeth or jaw, or the
relationships of the teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating any
intra-oral restoration, appliance, or prosthesis.
Such licensed dental hygienists may perform dental operations and
services only under the supervision of a licensed dentist, and under
such supervision may be employed by hospitals, boards of education of
public or private schools, county boards, boards of health, or public
or charitable institutions, or in dental offices.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.41.010 and 2000 c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a legend drug
whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the
practitioner.
(2) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a legend drug, whether
or not there is an agency relationship.
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a legend drug and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the
proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(5) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(6) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a legend drug.
(7) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(8) "Drug" means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States
pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States,
or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in man or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food, minerals or vitamins) intended to
affect the structure or any function of the body of man or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article
specified in clause (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. It does not
include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.
(9) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means
the communication of prescription information by computer, or the
transmission of an exact visual image of a prescription by facsimile,
or other electronic means for original prescription information or
prescription refill information for a legend drug between an authorized
practitioner and a pharmacy or the transfer of prescription information
for a legend drug from one pharmacy to another pharmacy.
(10) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by state law
or regulation of the state board of pharmacy to be dispensed on
prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.
(11) "Legible prescription" means a prescription or medication
order issued by a practitioner that is capable of being read and
understood by the pharmacist filling the prescription or the nurse or
other practitioner implementing the medication order.
(12) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by a
nonpractitioner to an individual residing in a community-based setting
specified in RCW 69.41.085 to facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or controlled substance. It includes
reminding or coaching the individual, handing the medication container
to the individual, opening the individual's medication container, using
an enabler, or placing the medication in the individual's hand, and
such other means of medication assistance as defined by rule adopted by
the department. The nonpractitioner may help in the preparation of
legend drugs or controlled substances for self-administration where a
practitioner has determined, in consultation with the individual or the
individual's representative, that such medication assistance is
necessary and appropriate. Medication assistance shall not include
assistance with intravenous medications or injectable medications.
(13) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership or association, or any other legal entity.
(14) "Practitioner" means:
(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician
or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a
dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed
practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, an optometrist under chapter
18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010,
an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW, a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW, a naturopath licensed
under chapter 18.36A RCW, ((or)) a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW,
or, when acting under the requisite supervision of a dentist licensed
under chapter 18.32 RCW, a dental hygienist licensed under chapter
18.29 RCW;
(b) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed,
registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct
research with respect to, or to administer a legend drug in the course
of professional practice or research in this state; and
(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in any
state, or province of Canada, which shares a common border with the
state of Washington.
(15) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

--- END ---