BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature would like to recognize
military veterans who have served their country and risked their own
lives to defend both the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that
define and distinguish our nation. It is the intent of the legislature
to honor veterans who have served their country honorably in times of
both war and peace, particularly those veterans who participated in the
World War II D day invasion of Normandy, for the public service they
have provided to their country.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Military veterans license plates" means license plates that
display a symbol honoring military veterans of the United States of
America.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"D day survivor license plates" means license plates that display
a symbol honoring United States of America servicemen who survived the
World War II D day invasion of Normandy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In cooperation with the Washington state patrol and the
department of licensing, the department of veterans affairs shall
create and design, and the department of licensing shall issue, a
special military veterans license plate displaying a symbol
representing military veterans. The special military veterans license
plate may be used in lieu of regular or personalized license plates for
motor vehicles required to display two motor vehicle license plates,
excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and
conditions established by the department of licensing.
(2) The special military veterans license plate may be purchased
only by:
(a) Veterans who served on active duty for at least one hundred
eighty days and were discharged under honorable conditions; and
(b) Military personnel who have honorably served their country for
at least one hundred eighty days while on active duty.
(3) Veterans or active duty military personnel requesting a
military veterans license plate must:
(a) Pay the appropriate fee prescribed in RCW 46.16.313; and
(b) Show proof of eligibility through:
(i) Providing a DD-214 or discharge papers if a veteran;
(ii) Providing a copy of orders if an individual serving on
military active duty; or
(iii) Attesting in a notarized affidavit of their eligibility as
required under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
In cooperation with the Washington state patrol and the department
of licensing, the department of veterans affairs shall create and
design, and the department of licensing shall issue, a special D day
survivor license plate displaying a symbol representing those
servicemen who participated in the World War II D day invasion of
Normandy. The D day survivor license plate may be used in lieu of
regular or personalized license plates for motor vehicles required to
display two motor vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered
under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the
department of licensing.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In any case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any
vehicle, the right to the certificates properly transferable therewith,
except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, and to the vehicle license plates
passes to the purchaser or transferee. It is unlawful for the holder
of such certificates, except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle
license plates to fail, neglect, or refuse to endorse the certificates
and deliver the vehicle license plates to the purchaser or transferee.
If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed by the state or any
county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision
entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the vehicle is
licensed with personalized plates, amateur radio operator plates, Medal
of Honor plates, disabled person plates, disabled veteran plates,
prisoner of war plates, military veterans plates, D day survivor
plates, or other special license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301 as
it existed before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997,
the vehicle license plates therefor shall be retained and may be
displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the vehicle so sold
or transferred.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.16.305 and 1997 c 291 s 6 and 1997 c 241 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The department shall continue to issue the categories of special
plates issued by the department under the sections repealed under
section 12 (1) through (7), chapter 250, Laws of 1990. Special license
plates issued under those repealed sections before January 1, 1991, are
valid to the extent and under the conditions provided in those repealed
sections. The following conditions, limitations, or requirements apply
to certain special license plates issued after January 1, 1991:
(1) A horseless carriage plate and a plate or plates issued for
collectors' vehicles more than thirty years old, upon payment of the
initial fees required by law and the additional special license plate
fee established by the department, are valid for the life of the
vehicle for which application is approved by the department. When a
single plate is issued, it shall be displayed on the rear of the
vehicle.
(2) The department may issue special license plates denoting
amateur radio operator status only to persons having a valid official
radio operator license issued by the federal communications commission.
(3) The department shall issue one set of special license plates to
each resident of this state who has been awarded the Congressional
Medal of Honor for use on a passenger vehicle registered to that
person. The department shall issue the plate without the payment of
licensing fees and motor vehicle excise tax.
(4) The department may issue for use on only one motor vehicle
owned by the qualified applicant special license plates denoting that
the recipient of the plate is a survivor of the attack on Pearl Harbor
on December 7, 1941, to persons meeting all of the following criteria:
(a) Is a resident of this state;
(b) Was a member of the United States Armed Forces on December 7,
1941;
(c) Was on station on December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55
a.m. to 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or
offshore at a distance not to exceed three miles;
(d) Received an honorable discharge from the United States Armed
Forces; and
(e) Is certified by a Washington state chapter of the Pearl Harbor
survivors association as satisfying the qualifications in (c) of this
subsection.
The department may issue such plates to the surviving spouse of any
deceased Pearl Harbor survivor who met the requirements of this
subsection. If the surviving spouse remarries, he or she shall return
the special plates to the department within fifteen days and apply for
regular plates. The surviving spouse must be a resident of this state.
The department shall issue these plates upon payment by the
applicant of all other license fees, but the department may not set or
charge an additional fee for these special license plates.
(5)(a) The department may issue for use on only one motor vehicle
owned by the qualified applicant special license plates denoting that
the recipient of the plate is a survivor of the World War II D day
invasion of Normandy, to persons meeting all of the following criteria:
(i) Is a resident of this state;
(ii) Served on active duty in the United States military service in
the Normandy campaign; and
(iii) Is honorably separated or discharged from military service or
is currently in active service in an honorable status.
(b) Veterans or active duty military personnel requesting a D day
survivor license plate must show proof of eligibility by:
(i) Providing a DD-214 or certification of discharge papers;
(ii) Providing a copy of orders, or any other official
documentation awarding a campaign ribbon or award from the Normandy
campaign; or
(iii) Attesting in a notarized affidavit of their eligibility as
required under this section.
(c) The department shall issue the D day survivor license plate
without the payment of licensing fees.
(6) The department shall replace, free of charge, special license
plates issued under subsections (3) ((and)), (4), and (5) of this
section if they are lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed. Such
plates shall remain with the persons upon transfer or other disposition
of the vehicle for which they were initially issued, and may be used on
another vehicle registered to the recipient in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 46.16.316(1).

Sec. 8 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee of no more than forty
dollars for each type of special license plates issued under RCW
46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by section
5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration
of this program. ((Until December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed
thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to
become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no
more than forty dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees
required to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have
been requested. All such additional special license plate fees
collected by the department shall be deposited in the state treasury
and credited to the motor vehicle fund.
(2) ((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder
of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(((4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(((5))) (4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(((6) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
military veterans license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
proceeds to the military veterans license plate account established
under section 9 of this act.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a military
veterans license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the military veterans license plate account established under
section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The military veterans license plate account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts, except as provided in
RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7), from military veterans license plates must
be deposited into the account. The director of the department of
veterans affairs may authorize expenditures from the account. The
funds in the account are to be used solely for the support and benefit
of veterans.

--- END ---