BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that municipal
water suppliers need greater certainty for their municipal water rights
in order to effectively meet their obligations under approved water
system plans, growth management plans, and other land use plans. The
legislature further finds that greater flexibility is needed in the
exercise of municipal water supplier's water rights to effectively
implement watershed, basin, and regional water management plans
developed under chapter 90.82 RCW and under other authorities.
(2) It is the legislature's intent to provide additional certainty
for municipal water rights, in conjunction with establishing clear
requirements for the efficient use of the state's water resources.
(3) Further, it is the legislature's intent that municipal water
suppliers with water rights, the sources of which are located within
watershed planning areas, be allowed under certain conditions to:
(a) Change or transfer unperfected amounts of water under such
rights;
(b) Develop new rights or change or transfer existing rights that
would impact stream flows if appropriate mitigation is provided; and
(c) Enter into contracts with the department of ecology to assist
in implementing the objectives of watershed plans, basin plans, or
regional water management plans.
(4) In providing certainty and flexibility for municipal water
rights, the legislature further intends that:
(a) Water resources be managed to ensure the safe supply of water
for drinking and sanitation needs for all citizens of the state;
(b) Valid rights to the use of water, both for instream and out-of-stream purposes be protected;
(c) Water resources be managed to ensure preservation of
environmental values, including instream resources;
(d) Water supplies be managed to meet planned growth, and growth
must be planned to responsibly address water supplies;
(e) Water resources be managed to ensure both efficient use of
water and efficient use of financial resources to secure affordable
supplies; and
(f) Water resource management decisions be made within a broad
context of local community and state interests.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.015 and 1987 c 109 s 65 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology((;)).
(2) "Director" means the director of ecology((; and)).
(3) "Municipal water supplier" means:
(a) A city or town;
(b) A county appointed as the receiver of a failing water system
under RCW 43.70.195, approved as a satellite management agency under
RCW 70.116.134, or that delivers water resulting from the reclamation
and reuse of water under chapter 90.46 RCW; or
(c) A purveyor, as defined in RCW 70.119A.020, that:
(i) Is approved by the department of health to serve either
existing service connections, or additional service connections, or
both;
(ii) Is serving water to supply customers and users to the extent
allowed under an applicable land use plan;
(iii) Is in compliance with water system planning requirements
established under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW; and
(iv) Provides water to one or more public water systems that
regularly serves fifteen or more residential connections, or twenty-five or more residents for one hundred eighty days or more per year.
(4) "Municipal water supply purposes" means any beneficial use for
which water is provided by a municipal water supplier, and any water
rights held by cities, towns, or counties for use in their own
operations. Beneficial uses of water under a municipal supply purpose
right may include water diverted or withdrawn for:
(a) Uses that are designed to benefit fish and wildlife, water
quality, or other instream resources or related habitat values; or
(b) Uses that are called for by an approved watershed plan adopted
under chapter 90.82 RCW or similar plan adopted under RCW 90.54.040(1),
a habitat conservation plan prepared in response to an endangered
species listing, or a comprehensive irrigation district management
plan.
(5) "Person" means any firm, association, water users' association,
corporation, irrigation district, or municipal corporation, as well as
an individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Only a municipal water supplier may hold a surface or ground
water right for municipal water supply purposes. For irrigation
districts that provide public water supplies under approval of the
department of health, only those rights or portions thereof that are
used for public water supply are water rights for municipal water
supply purposes.
(2) If a municipal water supplier acquires an existing surface or
ground water right that is a municipal water supply purpose right, the
right will remain as a municipal supply purpose right. If a municipal
water supplier acquires an existing surface or ground water right that
is not a municipal supply purpose right, the right may be changed to
municipal water supply purposes upon the approval of the department in
accordance with the water right change provisions of this chapter and
the amendment provisions of chapter 90.44 RCW.
(3) When requested by a municipal water supplier or when processing
a change or amendment to the right, the department shall amend the
water right documents and related records to ensure that municipal
supply purpose rights are correctly identified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.14 RCW
to read as follows:
When a municipal water supplier acquires an existing water right
that is not a municipal water supply purpose right, that right is not
subject to relinquishment for nonuse occurring during the time that the
acquirer diligently seeks the department's approval to change the right
to municipal water supply purposes. Once a change to municipal water
supply purposes is approved by the department, the right is thereafter
subject to the exception from relinquishment in RCW 90.14.140(2)(d).

Sec. 5 RCW 90.14.031 and 1969 ex.s. c 284 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
((Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context,
the following words and phrases as used in RCW 90.14.031 through
90.14.121 shall have the following meanings:))
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Municipal water supplier" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 90.03.015.
(b) "Municipal water supply purpose" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 90.03.015.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout RCW
90.14.031 through 90.14.121 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Person" shall mean an individual, partnership, association,
public or private corporation, city or other municipality, county, or
a state agency, and the United States of America when claiming water
rights established under the laws of the state of Washington.
(((2))) (b) "Beneficial use" shall include, but not be limited to,
use for domestic water, irrigation, fish, shellfish, game and other
aquatic life, municipal, recreation, industrial water, generation of
electric power, and navigation.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.03.330 and 1987 c 109 s 89 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon a showing satisfactory to the department that any
appropriation has been perfected in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter, it shall be the duty of the department to issue to the
applicant a certificate stating such facts in a form to be prescribed
by ((him)) the director, and such certificate shall thereupon be
recorded with the department. Any original water right certificate
issued, as provided by this chapter, shall be recorded with the
department and thereafter, at the expense of the party receiving the
same, be transmitted by the department ((transmitted)) to the county
auditor of the county or counties where the distributing system or any
part thereof is located, and be recorded in the office of such county
auditor, and thereafter be transmitted to the owner thereof.
(2) A water right certificate for an inchoate water right, or for
any portion of a water right that was or is inchoate, acquired by, held
by, or issued to a municipal water supplier for municipal water supply
purposes is considered a water right in good standing to the extent the
water:
(a)(i) Has been applied to beneficial use; or (ii) is needed to
meet reasonably anticipated future needs, for a period not to exceed
fifty years from the effective date of this section, as demonstrated
pursuant to the rules adopted under section 11(7) of this act; and
(b) The holder of the certificate is in compliance with all
requirements of the water system plan or coordinated water system plan
governing the municipal water supplier, including but not limited to
the conservation element of the municipal water supplier's approved
water system plan, as amended from time to time. If the certificate
holder is not in compliance with the requirements of the water system
plan or coordinated water system plan, the holder is prohibited from
further expansion of water use under an inchoate right until the holder
returns to compliance.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a certificate for an inchoate
water right is a water right certificate or a portion thereof that
authorizes the use of water that has not been perfected through the
actual beneficial use of water. By order of the department, a water
right certificate held by a municipal water supplier for municipal
water supply purposes under this subsection may be subject to
requirements for metering, monitoring, and reporting water use, and for
the installation of fish protection devices, as the department may deem
appropriate.
(4) Except as set forth in RCW 90.03.240, the department may not
rescind, reissue, or supersede any water right certificate held by a
municipal water supplier for municipal water supply purposes that
documents a water right in good standing under the requirements in
subsection (2) of this section, unless the water right holder requests
the issuance of new water right documents that reflect the status of
the water right perfected through beneficial use and the inchoate right
remaining in good standing, or the department authorizes a change,
transfer, or amendment of the water right under RCW 90.03.380 or
90.44.100. Nothing in this section prohibits the department from
correcting ministerial errors in a water right certificate.
(5) Any superseding water right certificate issued by the
department under this section retains the original priority date for
the water right and is not subject to an instream flow rule that has a
junior priority date. When implementing the requirement to not impair
existing water rights during a change, transfer, or amendment of a
water right certificate under RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100, the
department may condition the exercise of the water right, with the
consent of the certificate holder, in order to avoid impairment of an
instream flow right and to authorize the requested change, transfer, or
amendment.
(6) After the effective date of this section, the department shall
issue a new certificate under subsection (1) of this section only for
the perfected portion of a water right as demonstrated through actual
beneficial use of water.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.03.260 and 1987 c 109 s 84 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each application for permit to appropriate water shall set
forth the name and post office address of the applicant, the source of
water supply, the nature and amount of the proposed use, the time
during which water will be required each year, the location and
description of the proposed ditch, canal, or other work, the time
within which the completion of the construction and the time for the
complete application of the water to the proposed use.
(2) If for agricultural purposes, ((it)) the application shall give
the legal subdivision of the land and the acreage to be irrigated, as
near as may be, and the amount of water expressed in acre feet to be
supplied per season. If for power purposes, it shall give the nature
of the works by means of which the power is to be developed, the head
and amount of water to be utilized, and the uses to which the power is
to be applied.
(3) If for construction of a reservoir, ((it)) the application
shall give the height of the dam, the capacity of the reservoir, and
the uses to be made of the impounded waters.
(4) If for community or multiple domestic water supply, the
application shall give the projected number of service connections
sought to be served. However, for a municipal water supplier that has
an approved water system plan under chapter 43.20 RCW including a water
system plan that is part of a coordinated water system plan approved
under chapter 70.116 RCW that specifies a maximum number of service
connections, the service connection figure in the application or any
subsequent water right document is not an attribute limiting exercise
of the water right.
(5) If for municipal water supply, ((it)) the application shall
give the present population to be served, and, as near as may be
estimated, the future requirement of the municipality. However, for a
municipal water supplier that has an approved water system plan under
chapter 43.20 RCW including a water system plan that is part of a
coordinated water system plan approved under chapter 70.116 RCW that
specifies a maximum population, the population figures in the
application or any subsequent water right document are not an attribute
limiting exercise of the water right.
(6) If for mining purposes, ((it)) the application shall give the
nature of the mines to be served and the method of supplying and
utilizing the water; also their location by legal subdivisions.
(7) All applications shall be accompanied by such maps and
drawings, in duplicate, and such other data, as may be required by the
department, and such accompanying data shall be considered as a part of
the application.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.03.386 and 1991 c 350 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within service areas established pursuant to chapter((s)) 43.20
((and)) or 70.116 RCW, the department of ecology and the department of
health shall coordinate approval procedures to ensure compliance and
consistency with the approved water system plan.
(2) For a municipal water supplier that has an approved water
system plan under chapter 43.20 RCW including a water system plan that
is part of a coordinated water system plan approved under chapter
70.116 RCW that specifies a maximum number of service connections to be
served under the approved water system plan, the maximum number of
service connections or maximum population to be served specified on a
water right application, permit, or certificate are not an attribute
limiting exercise of the water right.
(3) For the purposes of subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
the appropriate authority for service area approvals is the department
of health. Where the department of health has approved a coordinated
water system plan under RCW 70.116.060(2), the appropriate authority
may also be the local legislative authority.
(4) The effect of the department of health's approval of a water
system plan or water system plan amendment that describes a municipal
water supplier's service area under chapter 43.20 RCW, or the local
legislative authority's approval of service area boundaries in
accordance with procedures adopted pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW, is
that the place of use of a surface water right or ground water right
used by the municipal water supplier is equivalent to, and coexistent
with, the approved service area provided that no impairment is found
under the procedures in subsection (5) of this section.
(5) If a municipal water supplier wants the place of use of a water
right in its possession to be equivalent to and coexistent with their
approved service area, the water right holder shall, within thirty days
after submitting the request for service area approval to the
appropriate authority as described in subsection (3) of this section,
notify the department and publish notice as prescribed in the case of
an original water right application in RCW 90.03.280.
(a) The notice must state that any person who believes that a water
right will be impaired as a result of the application of this section
must submit a written claim of impairment to the department within
thirty days of the last date of publication.
(b) If no impairment claims are submitted within the specified time
period, the service area approval by the appropriate authority as
described in subsection (3) of this section has the effect of
confirming that the place of use of the water right used to supply
water to the service area is equivalent to and coexistent with the
approved service area.
(c) If one or more impairment claim is submitted within the
specified time period, the department shall proceed to make a
determination regarding the impairment claim or claims within sixty
days of receipt of the claim or claims. The department shall issue its
determination in writing, stating either that it finds that there will
be impairment (a "finding of impairment") or that it finds there will
not be impairment (a "finding of no impairment"). The department of
ecology's written determination may be appealed to the pollution
control hearings board as provided in chapter 43.21B RCW.
(d) Final resolution of an impairment claim occurs at the
expiration of the appeal period following a final determination by the
department, the pollution control hearings board, and any reviewing
court. If the appropriate authority as described in subsection (3) of
this section approves the service area for which an impairment claim
has been filed but has not yet been finally resolved or for which final
resolution is a finding of impairment, approval has no effect on
whether the place of use is equivalent to and coexistent with the
approved service area. Upon final resolution of an impairment claim
that results in a finding of no impairment, the place of use of the
water right is equivalent to and coexistent with the service area
approved by the appropriate authority as described in subsection (3) of
this section.
(e) An impairment claim based on alleged impairment to either an
instream flow established by rule or a water right held by the state in
trust for instream flow purposes may only be asserted by the department
or the department of fish and wildlife.
(6) A municipal water supplier shall implement cost-effective water
conservation in accordance with its approved water system plan and
shall make full utilization of the conserved water before utilizing any
inchoate portion of water right certificates it may hold. When
establishing or extending a surface or ground water right construction
schedule under RCW 90.03.320, the department shall take into
consideration the public water system's use of conserved water.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The effect of a department approval of a water system plan or water
system plan amendment under this chapter is that the place of use of a
surface water right or ground water right used by the municipal water
supplier is equivalent to, and coexistent with, the service area
described in the system's water system plan provided that no impairment
is found under the procedures in RCW 90.03.386(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 70.116
RCW to read as follows:
The effect of approval by the local legislative authority of a
service area change for a public water system subject to a coordinated
water system plan approved under this chapter is that the place of use
of a surface water right or ground water right used by the municipal
water supplier is equivalent to, and coexistent with, the service area
described in the system's water system plan provided that no impairment
is found under the procedures in RCW 90.03.386(5).

Sec. 11 RCW 43.20.250 and 2002 c 161 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, for any
new or revised water system plan submitted for review under this
chapter, the department shall review and either approve, conditionally
approve, reject, or request amendments within ninety days of the
receipt of the submission of the plan. The department may extend this
ninety-day time limitation for new submittals by up to an additional
ninety days if insufficient time exists to adequately review the
general comprehensive plan. For rejections of plans or extensions of
the timeline, the department shall provide in writing, to the person or
entity submitting the plan, the reason for such action. In addition,
the person or entity submitting the plan and the department may
mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines contained in this
section.
(2) The time limitations set forth in subsection (1) of this
section do not apply to any new or revised water system plan that is
subject to the requirements of RCW 90.03.386(3) if a claim of
impairment is filed with the department of ecology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall:
(1) Develop water use efficiency requirements designed to ensure
efficient use of water while maintaining system financial viability and
improve affordability of supplies. Water use efficiency requirements
must include conservation planning requirements, water loss standards,
and procedures by which public water systems establish and adopt water
conservation objectives.
(2) Establish an advisory committee to assist the department in
developing rules for water use efficiency. The advisory committee must
include representatives from public water system customers,
environmental interest groups, business interests groups, a
representative cross section of public water systems required to
prepare water conservation programs as part of their water system
plans, tribal governments, the department of ecology, and any other
members determined necessary by the department.
(3) Provide technical assistance upon request to public water
systems and local governments regarding water conservation, including,
but not limited to, development of best management practices for water
conservation programs, conservation landscape ordinances, conservation
rate structures for public water systems, and general public education
programs on water conservation.
(4) Develop requirements for the conservation element of water
system plans, developed under chapter 43.20 RCW or required as part of
a coordinated water system plan under chapter 70.116 RCW. Conservation
planning requirements must be varied based upon the size of the public
water system and must include, but not be limited to, provisions that
require the purveyor to:
(a) Adopt conservation objectives in accordance with provisions of
subsection (6) of this section;
(b) Implement all measures determined by the public water system to
be cost-effective and necessary to achieve the system's water
conservation objectives. Provisions must allow utilities to select the
best methods for achieving their conservation objectives. Public water
systems are required to implement all conservation measures that
provide water from conservation at or below the cost of development of
new supplies;
(c) Evaluate the use of rate structures to encourage conservation;
(d) Evaluate systems' water loss and include a detailed plan for
achieving water loss standards developed under subsection (5) of this
section;
(e) Provide water consumption and source production data sufficient
to evaluate system conservation performance. Reporting periods and
reporting requirements may vary based on the system size. Reporting
must include reporting to the department and to the public; and
(f) Include water demand forecasts developed in accordance with
requirements established by the department.
(5) Develop standards for water loss from public water systems.
The standards for public water systems must consider system size and
water system loss trends.
(6) Establish procedures to be used by public water systems to
establish and adopt water conservation objectives. Procedures must
include, but not be limited to, provisions for:
(a) Public notification and conduct of public meetings by the
public water system prior to establishing conservation objectives;
(b) Establishing a range of reasonably achievable reductions in
consumption per equivalent residential unit, or other measurable
criteria, over time; and
(c) Establishing and revising conservation objectives.
Consideration must be given to historic conservation performance and
conservation investment, customer base demographics, regional climate
variations, instream flow conditions, system financial viability, and
affordability of water rates.
(7) Develop water demand forecast methodology sufficient to meet
the purposes of subsection (4) of this section and to be used in
determining reasonably anticipated future needs for the purposes of RCW
90.03.330(2).
(8) Establish provisions for either withholding approval of system
expansion, or withholding state funding, or both, in cases where water
systems fail to comply with the provisions of this section.
(9) Adopt rules necessary to implement the provision of this
section by December 31, 2005.

Sec. 13 RCW 90.48.495 and 1989 c 348 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of ecology shall require sewer plans to include a
discussion of water conservation measures considered or underway that
would reduce flows to the sewerage system and an analysis of their
anticipated impact on public sewer service and treatment capacity. The
plans must consider the feasibility of providing assistance to
implement water conservation measures as an alternative to constructing
new or expanded treatment capacity.

Sec. 14 RCW 90.48.112 and 1997 c 444 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The evaluation of any plans submitted under RCW 90.48.110 must
include consideration of opportunities for the use of reclaimed water
as defined in RCW 90.46.010. Wastewater plans submitted under RCW
90.48.110 must include a statement describing how applicable
reclamation and reuse elements will be coordinated as required under
RCW 90.46.120(2).

Sec. 15 RCW 90.46.120 and 1997 c 444 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of a wastewater treatment facility that is reclaiming
water with a permit issued under this chapter has the exclusive right
to any reclaimed water generated by the wastewater treatment facility.
Use and distribution of the reclaimed water by the owner of the
wastewater treatment facility is exempt from the permit requirements of
RCW 90.03.250 and 90.44.060. Revenues derived from the reclaimed water
facility shall be used only to offset the cost of operation of the
wastewater utility fund or other applicable source of system-wide
funding.
(2) If the proposed use or uses of reclaimed water are intended to
augment or replace potable water supplies or create the potential for
the development of additional potable water supplies, such use or uses
shall be considered in the development of the regional water supply
plan or plans addressing potable water supply service by multiple water
purveyors. The owner of a wastewater treatment facility that proposes
to reclaim water shall be included as a participant in the development
of such regional water supply plan or plans.
(3) Consistent with guidelines to be developed by the department of
health, water system plans and coordinated water systems plans
developed under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW must be developed and
coordinated to ensure that opportunities for reclaimed water are
evaluated and that proposals for construction in public rights of way
delineated within the plan consider infrastructure needed to distribute
the reclaimed water. The requirements of this subsection (3) do not
apply to water system plans developed under chapter 43.20 RCW for
utilities serving less than one thousand service connections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The right to use water under an unperfected municipal,
community domestic, or multiple domestic water right or a portion
thereof held by a municipal water supplier may be changed or
transferred, in the same manner as is provided in RCW 90.03.380, if the
change or transfer:
(a) Is subject to stream flow protection or restoration
requirements related to implementing a watershed plan approved under
chapter 90.82 RCW or RCW 90.54.040(1), based on the proportionate share
of the water user's effects on environmental resources, including
instream flows;
(b) Is subject to stream flow protection or restoration
requirements contained in an approved habitat conservation plan,
federal energy regulatory commission hydropower license, or
comprehensive irrigation district management plan;
(c) Is subject to a water management environmental contract
established under section 20 or 21 of this act; or
(d) Is needed to resolve or alleviate a public health or safety
emergency caused by a failing public water supply system currently
providing potable water to existing users.
(2) To qualify for a change or transfer of right under the
provisions of subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, the public
water system operated by the applicant municipal water supplier must be
certified by the state department of health to be in compliance with
water conservation standards specified by the department of health as
those standards may be amended in the future.
(3) To qualify for a change or transfer of right under the
provisions of subsection (1)(d) of this section, an application for
change or transfer of the unperfected water right must be filed
specifically to correct the actual or anticipated cause or causes of
the public water system failure. Inadequate water rights for a public
water system to serve existing hook-ups or to accommodate future
population growth or other future uses do not constitute a public
health or safety emergency. To be considered a failing public water
system, the department of health, in consultation with the department
and the local health authority, must make a determination that the
system meets one or more of the following conditions:
(a) A public water system has failed, or is in danger of failing
within two years, to meet state board of health standards for the
delivery of potable water to existing users in adequate quantity or
quality to meet basic human drinking, cooking, and sanitation needs;
(b) The current water source has failed or will fail so that the
public water system is or will become incapable of exercising its
existing water rights to meet existing needs for drinking, cooking, and
sanitation purposes after all reasonable conservation efforts have been
implemented; or
(c) A change in source is required to meet drinking water quality
standards and avoid unreasonable treatment costs, or the state
department of health determines that the existing source of supply is
unacceptable for human use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of use of an unperfected water right for municipal,
community domestic, or multiple domestic use, or a portion thereof,
held by a municipal water supplier may be changed or transferred in the
same manner as is provided in RCW 90.44.100, if the change or transfer:
(a) Is subject to stream flow protection or restoration
requirements related to implementing a watershed plan approved under
chapter 90.82 RCW or RCW 90.54.040(1), based on the proportionate share
of the water user's effects on environmental resources, including
instream flows;
(b) Is subject to stream flow protection or restoration
requirements contained in an approved habitat conservation plan,
federal energy regulatory commission hydropower license, or
comprehensive irrigation district management plan;
(c) Is subject to a water management environmental contract
established under section 20 or 21 of this act; or
(d) Is needed to resolve or alleviate a public health or safety
emergency caused by a failing public water supply system currently
providing potable water to existing users.
(2) To qualify for a change or transfer of right under the
provisions of subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, the public
water system operated by the applicant municipal water supplier must be
certified by the state department of health to be in compliance with
water conservation standards specified by the department of health as
those standards may be amended in the future.
(3) To qualify for a change or transfer of right under the
provisions of subsection (1)(d) of this section, an application for
change or transfer of the unperfected water right must be filed
specifically to correct the actual or anticipated cause or causes of
the public water system failure. Inadequate water rights for a public
water system to serve existing hook-ups or to accommodate future
population growth or other future uses do not constitute a public
health or safety emergency. To be considered a failing public water
system, the department of health, in consultation with the department
and the local health authority, must make a determination that the
system meets one or more of the following conditions:
(a) A public water system has failed, or is in danger of failing
within two years, to meet state board of health standards for the
delivery of potable water to existing users in adequate quantity or
quality to meet basic human drinking, cooking, and sanitation needs;
(b) The current water source has failed or will fail so that the
public water system is or will become incapable of exercising its
existing water rights to meet existing needs for drinking, cooking, and
sanitation purposes after all reasonable conservation efforts have been
implemented; or
(c) A change in source is required to meet drinking water quality
standards and avoid unreasonable treatment costs, or the state
department of health determines that the existing source of supply is
unacceptable for human use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may, with the concurrence of the department of
fish and wildlife, approve various forms of mitigation to offset a
measurable or calculated reduction in stream flow during critical flow
periods that would result from approval of an application for a water
right for municipal water supply purposes or an application for change
or transfer of a water right for municipal water supply purposes under
the following conditions:
(a)(i) The mitigation must be requested by the applicant municipal
water supplier; and (ii) a watershed plan adopted under chapter 90.82
RCW or RCW 90.54.040(1) must be in effect for the proposed or existing
water source related to the water right, and the requested mitigation
must be consistent with the plan; or
(b) The applicant must be subject to a water management
environmental contract established under section 20 or 21 of this act.
(2) The applicant must demonstrate that effective measures can be
adopted to avoid or mitigate the stream flow reduction, utilizing
generally accepted scientific standards to determine as nearly as
possible the actual amount of stream flow reduction.
(3) Mitigation measures prescribed by the department must be
directly proportional to the impact caused by the permitted use of
water or change. Elements of mitigation prescribed by the department
may include but are not limited to replacement of the consumed water
and other actions to preserve or maintain instream values, including
nonwater measures and measures at a location other than the stream
reach where the effects would occur, and may include any combination of
the following in addition to any other measures deemed effective by the
department:
(a) Stream flow augmentation to replace measured or calculated loss
of water as a result of a new surface or ground water permit. The
water must be returned to the water body at a time and at a point that
will have the required mitigating effect on stream flows;
(b) Stream or watershed restoration, installation of vegetation or
runoff controls, preservation or restoration of wetlands, ground water
recharge as preservation or restoration, replacement of a water source
that has a direct hydraulic connection with a surface water body with
an alternative source that has a lesser or delayed effect upon the
impacted water body, or any other mitigation measures or combination of
measures agreed upon by the department and the applicant for a water
right; or
(c) Use of reclaimed water as a replacement for water authorized
for use under an existing right or permit withdrawing water from the
same water body.
(4) Mitigation measures undertaken pursuant to issuing a water
right or a water right change must include:
(a) Provisions for assurance that mitigation measures will be
maintained and effective for the duration of the water right; and
(b) Enforcement measures through application of financial penalty,
injunction, or other remedy provided by law.
(5) Mitigation measures are subject to evaluation regarding their
effectiveness on a periodic basis and should be modified as necessary
by joint agreement between the department and the water right holder to
maintain the prescribed standard of performance.
(6) Mitigation measures approved under this section must not impair
existing water rights.
(7) Any mitigation prescribed by the department must be set forth
in the department's report of examination for the new or changed water
right. The mitigation requirements are subject to appeal to the
pollution control hearings board under chapter 43.21B RCW, as part of
an appeal of the report of examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of section 18 of this act apply to issuance of
ground water rights or approval of amendments when the right or
amendment would result in a measurable or calculated reduction in the
flow of a stream during a critical flow period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into water management environmental
contracts with one or more municipal water suppliers in a watershed to
meet environmental objectives established in a water resource
management program adopted under RCW 90.54.040(1) or under chapter
90.82 RCW. The term of the contracts may not exceed ten years, but the
contracts may be renewed or amended upon agreement of the parties.
(2) Water management environmental contracts must be consistent
with:
(a) Growth management plans developed under chapter 36.70A RCW
where these plans are adopted and in effect;
(b) Water supply plans approved under chapter 43.20 RCW;
(c) Coordinated water supply plans approved under chapter 70.116
RCW;
(d) Watershed plans adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW or RCW
90.54.040(1); and
(e) Water use efficiency and conservation requirements and
standards established by the state department of health or such
requirements and standards as are provided in an adopted watershed
plan, whichever are the more stringent.
(3) A water management environmental contract must:
(a) Require the public water system operated by the participating
municipal water supplier to meet the environmental obligations under
the watershed plan, based on the proportionate share of the public
water system's effect on environmental resources;
(b) Establish performance measures and timelines for measures to be
completed;
(c) Provide for monitoring of stream flows and metering of water
use as needed to ensure that the terms of the contract are met; and
(d) Require annual reports from the water users regarding contract
performance.
(4) As needed to implement contract activities, the department may
provide or receive funding, or both, under its existing authorities.
(5) The department shall provide opportunity for public review of
a proposed contract before it is executed. The department shall make
proposed and executed contracts and annual reports available on the
department's internet web site.
(6) The department must consult with affected local governments and
the state departments of health and fish and wildlife prior to
executing a contract.
(7) Prior to contract execution, the department must conduct a
government-to-government consultation with affected tribal governments.
The municipal water suppliers operating the public water systems that
are proposing to enter the contracts must be invited to participate in
the consultations. During these consultations, the department and the
municipal water suppliers shall explore the potential interest of the
tribal governments or governments in participating in the contract.
(8) Any person aggrieved by the department's failure to satisfy the
requirements in subsection (3) of this section as embodied in the
department's decision to enter a contract under this section may,
within thirty days of the execution of such a contract, appeal the
department's decision to the pollution control hearings board under
chapter 43.21B RCW.
(9) Any projects implemented by a municipal water system under the
terms of a contract reached under this section may be continued and
maintained by the municipal water system after the contract expires or
is terminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 90.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The departments of ecology and fish and wildlife shall solicit
a minimum of two areas engaged in watershed planning under this chapter
or basin or multiple watershed planning under RCW 90.54.040(1) to
voluntarily pilot the water management environmental contract
provisions provided in section 20 of this act prior to completion of a
watershed plan. At least one pilot area must be selected from east of
the Cascade mountains and at least one pilot area must be selected from
west of the Cascade mountains. The pilot areas selected should be
planning areas that are relatively advanced in the development and
adoption of a plan. This subsection is not intended to limit the
number of areas or entities eligible to participate in the pilot water
management environmental contracts.
(2) Any physical water management projects implemented under this
section must first be approved by the watershed planning unit
established under this chapter, using the provisions of RCW
90.82.130(1)(a); or by the departments of ecology and fish and wildlife
in the case of an areas planning under RCW 90.54.040(1).
(3) Before December 31, 2003, and December 31, 2004, the department
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature the
results of the implementation pilots provided for in subsection (1) of
this section. Based on the experience of the pilot areas, the
department shall offer any suggested changes in law that would improve,
facilitate, and maximize the implementation of watershed plans adopted
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 90.82 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may not enter into new water management
environmental contracts under section 20 or 21 of this act after July
1, 2008. This section does not apply to the renewal of contracts in
effect prior to that date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall give priority to processing new water right
applications under RCW 90.03.290, reservoir permits under RCW
90.03.370, and applications for changes and transfers under RCW
90.03.380 through 90.03.397, whenever necessary to provide for timely
and effective implementation of a watershed plan adopted under chapter
90.82 RCW or RCW 90.54.040(1) or a water management environmental
contract authorized under section 20 or 21 of this act. This section
applies only to the sequence of application processing and does not
affect the relative priority date of any resulting water rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall give priority to processing new water right
applications under RCW 90.44.050, and applications for changes and
transfers under RCW 90.44.100 and 90.44.105, whenever necessary to
provide for timely and effective implementation of a watershed plan
adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW or RCW 90.54.040(1) or a water
management environmental contract authorized under section 20 or 21 of
this act. This section applies only to the sequence of application
processing and does not affect the relative priority date of any
resulting water rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---