BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the trust water
rights program is an important tool in meeting the state's current and
future needs for water, both instream and out-of-stream. However, the
legislature finds that the existing procedures for establishing trust
water rights are unnecessarily complex, and are difficult to explain
and administer. Further, the legislature finds that groups currently
developing local watershed plans and regional water management programs
are seeking an effective means to facilitate multiple, voluntary
transfers of existing water rights to address presently unmet needs and
future needs.
It is the intent of this act to enhance the effectiveness of the
trust water rights program by improving existing incentives, removing
disincentives, clarifying and consolidating procedures for establishing
trust water rights, and authorizing the creation of water banks.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.42.005 and 1991 c 347 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to recognize and
preserve water rights in accordance with RCW 90.03.010.
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) The state of Washington is faced with a shortage of water with
which to meet existing and future needs, particularly during the summer
and fall months and in dry years when the demand is greatest;
(b) Consistent with RCW 90.54.180, conservation and water use
efficiency programs, including storage, should be the preferred methods
of addressing water uses because they can relieve current critical
water situations, provide for presently unmet needs, and assist in
meeting future water needs. Presently unmet needs or current needs
includes the water required to increase the frequency of occurrence of
base or minimum flow levels in streams of the state, the water
necessary to satisfy existing water rights, or the water necessary to
provide full supplies to existing water systems with current supply
deficiencies; ((and))
(c) The interests of the state will be served by developing
programs and regional water resource plans, in cooperation with local
governments, federally recognized tribal governments, appropriate
federal agencies, private citizens, and the various water users and
water interests in the state, that increase the overall ability to
manage the state's waters in order to resolve conflicts and to better
satisfy both present and future needs for water, both instream and
out-of-stream;
(d) A state trust water rights program is an effective means to
facilitate the voluntary transfer of water and water rights,
established through conservation, purchase, lease, or donation, to
secure and preserve water rights and provide water for presently unmet
needs and emerging needs;
(e) The interests of the state will be served by developing water
banking programs within the trust water rights program to administer
trust water rights in a watershed or region. Water banking is an
important tool for implementing watershed plans under chapter 90.82 RCW
because it will allow the efficient management of multiple trust water
rights and will facilitate three-party transfers of water rights needed
to meet the instream and out-of-stream needs of the watershed or
region. Water banks can: Make water available at another time or
location, which otherwise might not be possible, and thereby assist in
minimizing the consequences of drought; help improve stream flows and
preserve instream values; hold and provide water mitigation where
needed for future water development projects; and facilitate the
reallocation of water from one beneficial use to another; and
(f) The trust water rights program, including the potential for a
water bank, improves the ability of the state to work with the United
States and the various water users in the ongoing program to satisfy
both existing rights and other presently unmet as well as future needs
of the Yakima basin, through improvements to the existing federal water
project in the Yakima river basin, authorized under P.L. 96-162.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.42.020 and 1991 c 347 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Net water savings" means the amount of water that is
determined to be conserved and usable within or from a specified
((stream reach or reaches)) surface or ground water body for other
purposes without impairment ((or detriment)) to water rights existing
at the time that a water conservation project is ((undertaken, reducing
the ability to deliver water, or reducing the supply of water that
otherwise would have been available to other existing water uses))
funded.
(3) "Trust water right" means any water right acquired by the state
under this chapter for management in the state's trust water rights
program.
(((4) "Pilot planning areas" means the geographic areas designated
under RCW 90.54.045(2).
(5) "Water conservation project" means any project or program that
achieves physical or operational improvements that provide for
increased water use efficiency in existing systems of diversion,
conveyance, application, or use of water under water rights existing on
July 28, 1991.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All trust water established by the state must be placed in the
state trust water rights program to be held in trust by the department.
Trust water rights established by the state must be held or authorized
for use by the department for any beneficial use as described in RCW
90.54.020(1), and may be established for the protection of water rights
secured for mitigation purposes and for preservation of water rights
for future needs.
(2) Trust water rights may only be established from existing water
rights, including rights to divert or withdraw water under existing
certificates, claims, and permits, and rights to storage and use of
stored water from existing reservoir and secondary use rights.
(3) Trust water rights must be administered by the department or by
a water bank established under section 9 of this act. Each trust water
right must be administered in strict accordance with the terms under
which the trust water right was established, including any agreement
between the parties executed at the time the trust water right was
established, or as subsequently modified by mutual agreement of the
parties.
(4) Trust water rights retain the priority date of the right from
which they were established.
(5) To the extent practicable and subject to legislative
appropriation, trust water rights established in a watershed with an
approved watershed plan developed under chapter 90.82 RCW must be used
in a manner consistent with that plan.
(6) The department may make arrangements, including entering into
contracts with other persons or entities as appropriate, to ensure that
trust water rights established in accordance with this chapter can be
exercised to the fullest possible extent consistent with applicable
state laws.
(7) The department shall cooperate fully with the United States in
the implementation of this chapter. Trust water rights may be
established through expenditure of funds provided by the United States
and must be treated in the same manner as trust water rights
established as a result of the expenditure of state funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state may establish a trust water right from all or a
portion of an existing surface or ground water right through purchase,
lease, donation to the state, funding of a conservation project, or
other appropriate means other than by condemnation.
(a) A trust water right may be established on a temporary or
permanent basis.
(b) Water rights may be established for the trust water rights
program only to the extent the water right has been perfected through
actual beneficial use.
(c) Once established by the state, these rights are trust water
rights.
(d) The department shall develop a form for use in the
establishment of trust water rights to gather information pertaining to
the water right including, but not limited to, the existing purpose,
place of use, and point of diversion or withdrawal of the right, extent
of water use under the right, and the use or uses proposed for the
right as a trust water right.
(e) The provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100 do not apply to
trust water rights established under this chapter.
(f) Acceptance of an existing right as a trust water right under
this chapter does not provide independent evidence of the validity or
quantity of a right.
(2) If the holder of a right to water from a body of water chooses
to donate all or a portion of the person's water right to the trust
water program to assist in providing instream flows on a temporary or
permanent basis, the department shall accept the donation on such terms
as the person may prescribe as long as the donation satisfies the
applicable requirements of this chapter, and the terms prescribed are
relevant and material to protecting any interest in the water right
retained by the donor. Once accepted, these rights are trust water
rights within the conditions prescribed by the donor.
(3) When the department has determined that it will establish a
trust water right, the department shall provide notice and opportunity
for comment on the proposed provisions of the trust water right.
(a) The department shall publish notice thereof in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county or counties in which the right is
diverted or withdrawn and exercised, and in other newspapers as the
department may decide, once a week for two consecutive weeks. The
notice must describe the trust water right and provide a time period
for written comments, including any protest of the trust water right
provisions.
(b) Any person, party, or entity who submits to the department a
written comment must receive a copy of the department's final decision
regarding establishment of the trust water right.
(c) At the same time as the newspaper notice, the department shall
also send a notice containing pertinent information to all appropriate
state agencies, potentially affected local governments, federally
recognized tribal governments, and other interested parties. The
department shall also provide a copy of the department's final decision
to these parties.
(d) The notice provisions of this section do not apply in the case
of trust water rights established during a formally declared drought.
(4)(a) The quantity of water to be transferred to the trust water
rights program must be determined through the application of water
system engineering or other appropriate, quantitative methods, and may
not exceed:
(i) The extent to which the water right has been perfected through
actual beneficial use; and
(ii) The extent to which water use under the original right is
reduced or foregone, resulting in a net benefit to the water body as a
result of establishing the trust water right.
(b) A reduction in water use may result from one or more of the
following:
(i) Reduced diversion or withdrawal of water under the original
right as a result of a water conservation project;
(ii) A reduction in the number of acres irrigated under the right,
or a long-term change in the type of crop grown that will require less
water;
(iii) A reduction in the period of use of the right, on a seasonal
basis, during periods of low stream flows, or according to conditions
prescribed for the trust water right;
(iv) The elimination of water use under the original right;
(v) A downstream change in point of diversion of a water right that
results in increased flows in the reach of the stream affected by the
change;
(vi) The temporary or permanent use of a different source of supply
to meet all or a portion of the water needs under the original right;
or
(vii) Other appropriate changes in activities under the original
right, as agreed to between the water right holder and the department.
(c) Where the state establishes a trust water right from a portion
of an existing water right, the state must quantify only the portion of
the right to be placed in the trust water rights program. The
reduction in water use and related activities under the remaining
portion of the right must be reflected in the superseding document
issued to the water right holder by the state, and the superseding
document issued by the state must be conditioned to ensure that the
reduced water use is achieved.
(d) Where the department provides funding for a water conservation
project as a means of establishing a trust water right, the recipient
of funds conveys to the state that portion of the water right or claim
constituting all or a portion of the net water savings resulting from
the project for deposit in the trust water rights program. Before the
expenditure of state funds for a water conservation project, the state
and the water right holder must agree on the procedures for determining
net water savings to be placed into trust as a result of a conservation
project.
(5) After notice and consideration of comments received, the
department shall issue a final decision regarding the establishment of
a trust water right.
(a) The department shall provide copies of its final decision to
the affected parties and to those parties identified in subsection
(3)(b) and (c) of this section. The department's final decision on
establishment of a trust water right is appealable to the pollution
control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230 or other applicable law.
(b) A trust water right is established upon issuance of the
document described in subsection (6) of this section.
(6) The department shall issue a water right certificate,
certificate of change, or other appropriate legal document in the name
of the state of Washington for all trust water rights established by
the state.
(a) The document must be issued upon the final decision of the
department to establish a trust water right, after an appeal period has
lapsed without appeal.
(b) The document must indicate the quantity of the trust water
right, the location within the water body or portions thereof where the
trust water right will be exercised, the use or uses to which the trust
water right may be applied, the duration of the trust water right if
applicable, and other terms as specified for the trust water right.
The documentation must also include all applicable information
contained in the form prescribed by the department in subsection (1)(d)
of this section.
(c) Where only a portion of an existing right is established as a
trust water right, the department shall issue a superseding certificate
or other appropriate legal document to the original water right holder.
The superseding document must indicate the quantity of water remaining
with the original right holder.
(d) For temporary trust water rights, the department may issue a
certificate of change or other appropriate legal document to reflect
the terms of the trust water right.
(e) When the department establishes a trust water right from a
water right claim filed under chapter 90.14 RCW, the department shall
issue a certificate of change or other appropriate legal document to
reflect the terms of the trust water right.
(7) A trust water right retains the same priority as the water
right from which it originated. In the case of partial transfers into
trust, the portion of the right in trust is deemed to be junior in
priority to the portion of the right not in trust unless otherwise
specified in the terms of the trust water right.
(8) Exercise of trust water rights may not impair existing rights.
If, during the exercise of the right, it becomes apparent that exercise
of the right is impairing existing rights, the department must cease or
modify its exercise of the right to eliminate the impairment. Any
water right holder may file an impairment claim with the department if
the water right holder claims that the exercise of a trust water right
has impaired his or her right. The department shall review the
impairment claim, and will provide a written decision to the party that
filed the impairment claim. Where the department determines to modify
its exercise of a trust water right under this section, it shall
provide notice to the parties identified in subsection (5) of this
section. Any final decision by the department upon an impairment claim
is appealable to the pollution control hearings board under RCW
43.21B.230 or other applicable law.
(9) For a water right established by the trust water rights program
on a temporary basis, the full quantity of water diverted or withdrawn
to exercise the right before the trust water right was established must
be placed in the trust water rights program and reverts to the person
or entity from whom it was obtained upon the expiration of the trust
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding other requirements of this chapter, an unperfected
water right in good standing or portion thereof may become established
as a trust water right. During the period of time that the right is in
the trust water rights program, the priority date of the unperfected
trust water right is the date of establishment of the trust water
right, and is senior in priority only to water rights established after
that time. An unperfected water right established as a temporary trust
water right reverts to the original owner as an unperfected right, with
the priority date of the original right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
No state funds may be expended to establish trust water rights by
the state under this chapter unless specifically appropriated for this
purpose by the legislature. Prior to expending state or federal funds
for a trust water right, the department shall exercise appropriate due
diligence, as practiced by other water right purchasers, to ensure the
validity of the water right or portion thereof for which the funds will
be expended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
A water right conveyed to the trust water right program as a
donation that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream
purposes must be managed by the department for public purposes to
ensure that it qualifies as a donation that is deductible for federal
income taxation purposes for the person or entity conveying the water
right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Under the trust water right program, the department may
establish water banks to administer trust water rights.
(a) The department shall create water banks by rules adopted under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b) A water bank may be created to administer rights in one or more
watersheds or for one water body.
(c) The department shall identify the trust water rights to be
administered by a water bank. A water bank may be created to
administer water rights for either a specified geographic area, or for
select types of trust water rights, or both, as specified in the rules
creating the water bank.
(d) A water bank may be created either within or outside the
department. A water bank created outside the department must be
constituted as a public entity or a private-public partnership.
(2) The department is authorized to enter into agreements with
neighboring states to establish a joint water bank for a watershed or
water body shared between states. Such a joint water bank must operate
subject to the applicable legal requirements of each state.
(3) Water banks may be created for one or more of the following
purposes:
(a) To solicit water rights for the trust water rights program;
(b) To hold trust water rights for mitigation of future activities;
(c) To accept and manage funds to be used to establish trust water
rights;
(d) To purchase or lease water rights to be held in trust by the
department and to be administered by the water bank;
(e) To create a system of credits to track deposits of water rights
to, and withdrawals from, the bank;
(f) To assign water rights or credits to third parties authorizing
the beneficial use of water from the trust program, in a manner
consistent with the terms of a trust water right; and
(g) To develop a schedule of the amount of net water saved as a
result of water conservation projects carried out in a watershed,
developed annually to reflect the predicted hydrologic and water supply
conditions, as well as anticipated water demands, for the upcoming
irrigation season, to serve as the basis for the distribution and
management of trust water rights each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall conduct pilot rule making under RCW
34.05.313 to evaluate the effectiveness of different types of water
banks.
(2) In selecting areas for the pilot rule making, the department
shall consider the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that water banking could provide a temporary or
permanent water supply to address drought or future water supply
demands;
(b) The existence of plans, programs, or technical resources within
the water resource inventory area to assist with implementation and
review of the pilot rule making;
(c) Whether the area is located in one of the sixteen salmon
critical basins identified in the state salmon recovery strategy; and
(d) The degree of local watershed or regional group support.
(3) The department's pilot rules may include, but need not be
limited to, the following provisions:
(a) Procedures for establishing and quantifying consumptive and
nonconsumptive trust credits;
(b) Procedures for ensuring that assignments of trust water rights
or credits comply with the impairment provisions of this chapter;
(c) Geographical constraints on assignment of trust water rights or
credits by basin, subbasin, or water source; and
(d) Procedures for appeals of assignment of trust water rights or
credits.
(4) Within one year of adopting a pilot rule under this section,
the department shall request review and comments from tribal and local
governments, federal agencies, watershed groups, regional entities,
conservation groups, developers, agricultural organizations, and
others, on the pilot rule. The department shall summarize the comments
received on the rule and prepare a report, including any
recommendations, to the appropriate committees of the legislature for
their consideration during the subsequent legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
The water right relinquishment provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.230 do not apply to trust water rights held or exercised by the
department under this chapter as of the date the trust water right is
established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter authorizes the impairment of, or operates
to impair, any existing water rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When water is proposed to be provided to the department as a
trust water right by an irrigation district, evidence of the district's
authority to represent the water right holders must be submitted to,
and for the satisfaction of, the department.
(2) The department may not establish a trust water right from an
individual's water right under this chapter that is appurtenant to land
lying within an irrigation district without the approval of the board
of directors of the irrigation district.

Sec. 14 RCW 90.03.380 and 2001 c 237 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows,
averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point
of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any
person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as
provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such transfer or
such change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights,
the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate
granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be
made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued
to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner
and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or
permit to divert water.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) The requirements of this section ((shall)) do not apply to
trust water rights ((acquired by the state through the funding of water
conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through
90.42.070)) established under chapter 90.42 RCW.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

Sec. 15 RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c 316 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
ground water right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
ground waters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public ground water as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public ground water as the original
well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5) The requirements of this section do not apply to trust water
rights established under chapter 90.42 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 90.38.005 (Findings -- Purpose) and 1989 c 429 s 1;
(2) RCW 90.38.010 (Definitions) and 1989 c 429 s 2;
(3) RCW 90.38.020 (Acquisition or donation of trust water rights)
and 2002 c 329 s 7, 2001 c 237 s 28, & 1989 c 429 s 3;
(4) RCW 90.38.030 (Water conservation projects -- Contracts for
financial assistance) and 1989 c 429 s 4;
(5) RCW 90.38.040 (Trust water rights program) and 2001 c 237 s 29,
1994 c 264 s 90, & 1989 c 429 s 5;
(6) RCW 90.38.050 (Rules) and 1989 c 429 s 6;
(7) RCW 90.38.900 (Existing policies not replaced) and 1989 c 429
s 7;
(8) RCW 90.38.901 (Transfer of rights between irrigation districts
not intended) and 1989 c 429 s 8;
(9) RCW 90.38.902 (Existing rights not impaired) and 1989 c 429 s
9;
(10) RCW 90.42.010 (Findings -- Intent) and 1998 c 245 s 173;
(11) RCW 90.42.030 (Contracts to finance water conservation
projects -- Public benefits -- Trust water rights) and 1993 c 98 s 2 & 1991
c 347 s 7;
(12) RCW 90.42.040 (Trust water rights program -- Water right
certificate -- Notice of creation or modification) and 2002 c 329 s 8,
2001 c 237 s 30, 1993 c 98 s 3, & 1991 c 347 s 8;
(13) RCW 90.42.050 (Guidelines governing trust water rights--Submission of guidelines to joint select committee) and 1991 c 347 s 9;
(14) RCW 90.42.070 (Involuntary impairment of existing water rights
not authorized) and 1991 c 347 s 11; and
(15) RCW 90.42.080 (Trust water rights -- Acquisition, donation,
exercise, and transfer -- Appropriation required for expenditure of
funds) and 2002 c 329 s 9, 2001 c 237 s 31, 1993 c 98 s 4, & 1991 c 347
s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---