BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c 316 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
ground water right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
ground waters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, an
amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well or wells at
a location outside of the location of the original well or wells or to
change the manner or place of use of the water shall be issued only
after publication of notice of the application and findings as
prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall ((tap the same body of
public ground water)) be located within the same water resource
inventory area, as defined in chapter 173-500 WAC, or an adjoining
water resource inventory area as the original well or wells; (b) where
a replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well
or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not ((enlarge the right))
increase the annual or instantaneous quantity conveyed by the original
permit or certificate; and (d) other existing rights shall not be
impaired. The department may specify an approved manner of
construction and shall require a showing of compliance with the terms
of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of an
original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public ground water as the original
well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not ((enlarge the
right)) increase the annual or instantaneous quantity conveyed by the
original water use permit or certificate; (d) the construction and use
of the well shall not interfere with or impair water rights with an
earlier date of priority than the water right or rights for the
original well or wells; (e) the replacement or additional well shall be
located no closer than the original well to a well it might interfere
with; (f) the department may specify an approved manner of construction
of the well; and (g) the department shall require a showing of
compliance with the conditions of this subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the larger of: (a) The area described as the point of
withdrawal in the original public notice published for the application
for the water right for the well; or (b) the area up to one-quarter
mile radius from the current well or wells.
(5)(a) A water right holder may construct a replacement or new
additional well or wells at a location outside the location of the
original well or wells but not more than two miles from the current
well or wells without obtaining approval from the department under the
following conditions:
(i) That, at least sixty days before starting construction of the
well or wells, the water right holder provides written notice to the
department of the intention to construct the replacement or additional
well or wells and publishes a legal notice prescribed by the department
describing the location of the proposed well or wells, the amounts of
water to be withdrawn, and other details deemed necessary by the
department. The notice must state that a person wishing to assert a
claim of impairment of another water right may do so by filing the
claim with the department and the deadline for doing so. The notice
must be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper
of general circulation in the area in which the well or wells would be
located;
(ii) That, within thirty days of the last date of publication of
the legal notice, no claims of impairment are filed with the department
relating to the proposed replacement or additional well or wells; and
(iii) That the conditions of subsection (3)(a) through (g) of this
section are met.
(b) If any claims of impairment are filed with the department, the
department shall make a determination regarding the impairment claim or
claims and shall issue its determination in writing, stating either
that it finds that there will be impairment (a "finding of impairment")
or that it finds there will not be impairment (a "finding of no
impairment"). The department's written determination may be appealed
to the pollution control hearings board as provided in chapter 43.21B
RCW.
(c) Where an impairment claim has been filed, a replacement well
may only be constructed under this subsection (5) after a final
resolution of the impairment claim results in a finding of no
impairment. Final resolution of an impairment claim occurs at the
expiration of the appeal period following a final determination by the
department, the pollution control hearings board, and any reviewing
court.

--- END ---