BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.64.020 and 1989 c 367 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall consist of eleven members. One member shall
be a judge selected by and from the court of appeals judges; one member
shall be a judge selected by and from the superior court judges; one
member shall be ((a)) an elected judge selected by and from the
((district)) limited jurisdiction court judges; two members shall be
selected by the state bar association and be admitted to the practice
of law in this state; and six members shall be nonlawyers appointed by
the governor. The term of each member of the commission shall be four
years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2004, if
the proposed amendment to Article IV, section 31 of the state
Constitution (House Joint Resolution No. . . ., changing the membership
of the commission on judicial conduct) is validly submitted to and is
approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

--- END ---