BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.06B.015 and 1999 c 385 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to increase efficiency, to reduce waste and duplication,
to enable people to access social and health services, to provide a
basic level of mobility, and to extend and improve transportation
services to people with special transportation needs, the state shall
implement, to the extent that funds are appropriated, the Program for
Agency Coordinated Transportation. The program will improve
transportation efficiency and effectiveness to maximize the use of
community resources so that more people can be served within available
funding levels. If funds are available to the Program for Agency
Coordinated Transportation, an advisory group may be created to expend
the funds to facilitate the coordination of special needs
transportation. The state should seek funds from local and federal
sources for support of the program.
The Program for Agency Coordinated Transportation will facilitate
a statewide approach to coordination and will support the development
of community-based coordinated transportation systems that exhibit the
following characteristics:
(1) Organizations serving persons with special transportation needs
share responsibility for ensuring that customers can access services.
(2) There is a single entry process for customers to use to have
trips arranged and scheduled, so the customer does not have to contact
different locations based on which sponsoring agency or program is
paying for the trip.
(3) A process is in place so that when decisions are made by
service organizations on facility siting or program policy
implementation, the costs of client transportation and the potential
effects on the client transportation costs of other agencies or
programs are considered. Affected agencies are given an opportunity to
influence the decision if the potential impact is negative.
(4) Open local market mechanisms give all providers who meet
minimum standards an opportunity to participate in the program, and, in
addition, allow for cost comparisons so that purchasers can select the
least expensive trip most appropriate to the customer's needs.
(5) There is flexibility in using the available vehicles in a
community so that the ability to transport people is not restricted by
categorical claims to vehicles.
(6) There is maximum sharing of operating facilities and
administrative services, to avoid duplication of costly program
elements.
(7) Trip sponsors and service providers have agreed on a process
for allocating costs and billing when they share use of vehicles.
(8) Minimum standards exist for at least safety, driver training,
maintenance, vehicles, and technology to eliminate barriers that may
prevent sponsors from using each other's vehicles or serving each
other's clients.
(9) The system is user friendly. The fact that the system is
supported by a multitude of programs and agencies with different
eligibility, contracting, service delivery, payment, and funding
structures does not negatively affect the customer's ability to access
service.
(10) Support is provided for research, technology improvements, and
sharing of best practices from other communities, so that the system
can be continually improved.
(11) There are performance goals and an evaluation process that
leads to continuous system improvement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 47.06B.020 (Agency council on coordinated transportation--Creation, membership, staff) and 1998 c 173 s 2;
(2) RCW 47.06B.030 (Council -- Duties) and 1999 c 385 s 5, 1999 c 372
s 13, & 1998 c 173 s 3;
(3) RCW 47.06B.040 (Local planning forums) and 1999 c 385 s 6; and
(4) RCW 47.06B.900 (Council--Termination) and 1999 c 385 s 7 & 1998
c 173 s 6.

--- END ---