BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2003-05 BIENNIUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The transportation budget of the state
is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final
judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June
30, 2005.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2004" or "FY 2004" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2004.
(b) "Fiscal year 2005" or "FY 2005" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2005.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context
clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations.
(3) Reappropriations are limited to the unexpended balances
remaining on June 30, 2003, from the 2001-03 biennial appropriations,
or for the amount indicated on the appropriate capital project list
dated March 31, 2003, for each project.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES--OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Grade Crossing Protective Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $412,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $822,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section
is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is provided
solely for costs associated with the motor fuel quality program.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES--CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION -- CAPITAL PROJECTS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The motor vehicle account -- state
appropriation is a one-time reappropriation and is provided solely for
the Beacon Rock state park entrance road project. Any of the
appropriations not expended by June 30, 2005, shall revert to the motor
vehicle account -- state.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY
COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,649,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,744,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,059,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,452,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE LOCAL BOARDS COORDINATED PROGRAM
Rural Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $769,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,939,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,615,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,624,000
County Arterial Preservation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $719,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,666,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The executive director of the local boards
coordinated program is encouraged to contract with the Washington state
department of transportation, highways and local programs division, for
maintenance administrative review and endangered species act training
services. Contract costs shall be paid only from expenditure savings
realized from efficiencies produced by the combining of the staff for
the transportation improvement board and the county road administration
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION
COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,374,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) No funding is provided for the staffing, administration and
operations of the house of representatives transportation committee.
Existing staff of the transportation committee shall be transferred to
the house of representatives in the office of program research. All
tangible and intangible property that has been acquired by, or
allocated for use by the house of representatives transportation
committee and its staff, including but not limited to office space and
equipment, information systems technology, and employer-related assets,
rights, privileges, and liabilities shall be transferred to the house
of representatives. Any property acquired by, or allocated for use by
the senate transportation committee and its staff shall be transferred
to the senate.
(2) $1,600,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation in
this section is provided solely for the joint legislative audit and
review committee to conduct, or manage contracts for, full performance
audits of transportation agencies and departments under Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5748. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5748 is not
enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse. Within this amount, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a targeted performance audit of the Washington
state patrol. For this performance audit, the joint legislative audit
and review committee shall put its highest priority on the following
topics: (a) An assessment of the types and categories of services,
including a contrast of public highway policing and general policing
services provided by the patrol, and the organizational structures used
to deliver these services; (b) an evaluation of the patrol's fiscal
policies and procedures, including a differentiation between
transportation and general fund expenditures; and (c) an evaluation of
the linkages among expenditures, organizational structures, service
delivery, accountability, and outcomes. The joint legislative audit
and review committee shall provide a progress report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 31, 2003, and a final report,
including findings and recommendations, by September 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $807,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Sufficient funds are provided to implement
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5987.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD
OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,527,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,167,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $177,869,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in authorized off-duty
uniformed employment are authorized to use state patrol vehicles for
the purposes of that authorized employment, subject to guidelines
adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington
state patrol shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the
prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject
to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.
The patrol shall report to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees by December 31, 2004, on the use of agency
vehicles by officers engaging in off-duty employment. The report shall
include an analysis that compares cost reimbursement and cost-impacts,
including increased vehicle mileage, maintenance costs, and indirect
impacts, associated with the private use of patrol vehicles.
(2) $1,700,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation in this section is provided solely for the addition of
thirteen troopers to those permanently assigned to vessel and terminal
security. The Washington state patrol shall continue to provide the
enhanced services levels established after September 11, 2001. Vessel
and terminal security troopers shall board vessels at random, and
conduct commercial vehicle inspections and explosive detection dog
handler patrols.
(3) In addition to the user fees, the patrol shall transfer into
the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account created
under section 1501 of this act, no more than the amount of appropriated
state patrol highway account and general fund funding necessary to
cover the costs for the patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol
highway account and general fund--state funds shall be transferred
proportionately in accordance with a cost allocation that
differentiates between highway traffic enforcement services and general
policing purposes.
(4) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31 of
each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- SUPPORT
SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,799,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,089,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,895,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation in this section is provided solely for the purchase of
923 mobile radios. Before June 30, 2005, the patrol shall install in
all of its highway law enforcement and pursuit vehicles the mobile
radios funded in this subsection.
(2) Under the direction of the legislative auditor, the patrol
shall update the pursuit vehicle life-cycle cost model developed in the
1998 Washington state patrol performance audit (JLARC Report 99-4).
The patrol shall utilize the updated model as a basis for determining
maintenance and other cost impacts resulting from the increase to
pursuit vehicle mileage above 110 thousand miles in the 2003-05
biennium. The patrol shall submit a report, that includes identified
cost impacts, to the transportation committees of the senate and house
of representatives by December 31, 2003.
(3) The Washington state patrol shall assign two detectives to
address incidents of identity fraud and identity theft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,718,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,858,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,001,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $12,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for two temporary collision processing FTEs to
eliminate the backlog of collision reports. The department shall
report, informally, to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees quarterly, beginning October 1, 2003, on the
progress made in eliminating the backlog.
(2) $10,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5435 or Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1592.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,394,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,039,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $773,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,511,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $8,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for two temporary collision processing FTEs to
eliminate the backlog of collision reports. The department shall
report, informally, to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees quarterly, beginning October 1, 2003, on the
progress made in eliminating the backlog.
(2) $7,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5435 or Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1592.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE
SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $585,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,225,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,121,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $568,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,506,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,065,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $144,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5435 or Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1592.
(2) If Senate Bill No. 6063 is not enacted by June 30, 2003,
$1,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation shall
lapse.
(3) $90,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1036.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER
SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,576,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,487,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,267,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $178,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is provided solely for two temporary collision
processing FTEs to eliminate the backlog of collision reports. The
department shall report, informally, to the house of representatives
and senate transportation committees quarterly, beginning October 1,
2003, on the progress made in eliminating the backlog.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,661,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,163,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,508,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,695,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $715,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to retain an external consultant to provide an
assessment of the department's review of current major information
technology systems and planning for system and application
modernization. The legislative transportation committee shall approve
the statement of work before the consultant is hired. The consultant
shall also work with the department to prepare an application
modernization strategy and preliminary project plan.
The department and the consultant shall work with the office of
financial management and the department of information services to
ensure that (a) the department's current and future system development
is consistent with the overall direction of other key state systems;
and (b) when possible, common statewide information systems are used or
developed to encourage coordination and integration of information used
by the department and other state agencies and to avoid duplication.
The department shall provide a report on its proposed application
modernization plan to the transportation committees of the legislature
by June 30, 2004.
(2)(a) $2,150,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $2,150,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of a new revenue collection system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card), at the Washington state ferries. By December 1st of each
year, an annual update must be provided to the legislative
transportation committee concerning the status of implementing and
completing this project.
(b) $400,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the smart card
program. $200,000 of this amount must be held in allotment reserve
until a smart card report is delivered to the legislative
transportation committee indicating that an agreement on which
technology will be used throughout the state of Washington for the
smart card program has been reached among smart card participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,048,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,107,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and Education
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $282,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,039,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,381,000 of the aeronautics account--state appropriation is provided solely for additional preservation
grants to airports. $122,000 of the aircraft search and rescue safety
and education account--state appropriation is provided for additional
search and rescue and safety and education activities. If Senate Bill
No. 6056 is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,010,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,410,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $14,310,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the staffing, activities, and overhead of the
department's environmental affairs office. This funding is provided in
lieu of funding provided in section 304 of this act.
(2) $3,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the staffing and activities of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee.
(3) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely for the
purposes of providing contract services to the association of
Washington cities and Washington state association of counties to
implement section 2(3)(c), (5), and (6), chapter 8 (ESB 5279), Laws of
2003 for activities of the transportation permit efficiency and
accountability committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,011,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $283,350,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,253,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $289,029,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account--private/local
appropriation.
(4) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
allow for a continuation of the level of service targets included in
the 2001-03 biennium. In delivering the program, the department should
concentrate on the following areas:
(a) Meeting or exceeding the target for structural bridge repair on
a statewide basis;
(b) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level;
(c) Reducing the number of activities delivered in the "d" level of
service by increasing the resources directed to those activities on a
statewide and region basis; and
(d) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,696,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,821,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $7,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation may be expended for the incident response program. The
department and the Washington state patrol shall continue to consult
and coordinate with private sector partners, such as towing companies,
media, auto, insurance and trucking associations, and the legislative
transportation committees to ensure that limited state resources are
used most effectively. No funds shall be used to purchase tow trucks.
(2) $8,227,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give
priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or
provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost
enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis.
(3) At a frequency determined by the department, the interstate-5
variable message signs shall display a message advising slower traffic
to keep right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,852,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $636,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,554,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $627,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5248. If Senate Bill No. 5248 is not enacted by June 30,
2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The agency
may transfer between programs funds provided in this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,504,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,814,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,021,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,339,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a study of regional congestion relief solutions for
Puget Sound, Spokane, and Vancouver. The study must include proposals
to alleviate congestion consistent with population and land use
expectations under the growth management act.
(2) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for additional assistance to support regional
transportation planning organizations and long-range transportation
planning efforts.
(3) $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the costs of the regional transportation investment
district (RTID) election and department of transportation project
oversight. These funds are provided as a loan to the RTID and shall be
repaid to the state motor vehicle account within one year following the
certification of the election results.
(4) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department to support the
processing and analysis of the backlog of city and county collision
reports.
(5) The department shall contribute to the report required in
section 207(1) of this act in the form of an analysis of the cost
impacts incurred by the department as the result of the policy
implemented in section 207(1) of this act. The analysis shall contrast
overtime costs charged by the patrol prior to July 1, 2003, with
contract costs for similar services after July 1, 2003.
(6) $60,000 of the distribution under RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) is provided solely to the department for the Washington
strategic freight transportation analysis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,082,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(1) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT DIVISION OF RISK
MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . $989,000
(2) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF
THE STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . $823,000
(3) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,850,000
(4) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,252,000
(5) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND
ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,799,000
(6) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL
PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,846,000
(7) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $523,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,548,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,277,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for nonprofit
providers of transportation for persons with special transportation
needs. $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for transit
agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs.
Moneys shall be to provide additional service only and may not be used
to supplant current funding. Grants shall only be used by nonprofit
providers and transit agencies for capital purposes and the operating
costs directly associated with those capital purposes. Grants for
nonprofit providers shall be based on need, including the availability
of other providers of service in the area, efforts to coordinate trips
among providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness of trips
provided. Grants for transit agencies shall be prorated based on the
amount expended for demand response service and route deviated service
in calendar year 2001 as reported in the "Summary of Public
Transportation - 2001" published by the department of transportation.
No transit agency may receive more than thirty percent of these
distributions. The amount over thirty percent will be prorated to the
remaining transit agencies based on the above demand response service
and route deviated service expenditures. The department of
transportation shall notify the state treasurer of the amounts to be
distributed.
(2) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to implement section 9 of
House Bill No. 2228. In administering grants, the department shall
give priority to programs providing the greatest reduction in trips and
commute miles and to the level of contribution of the public agency,
nonprofit organization, developer, and property manager to achieving
those reductions. The department shall act to insure, to the extent
possible, that grants are distributed equitably among each eligible
type of recipient.
(3) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2001 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served by transit agencies through a competitive grant
process.
(4) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for public
transit agencies. The grant program will cover capital costs only; no
operating costs are eligible for funding under this grant program.
Only grants that add vanpools are eligible, no supplanting of transit
funds currently funding vanpools is allowed. Additional criteria for
selecting grants will include leveraging funds other than state funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,521,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of
$34,038,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2003-2005 biennium. If
the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted amount, the excess
amount may not be expended. If the actual cost exceeds this amount,
the department shall request a supplemental appropriation.
(2) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2003-2005 biennium may not exceed $203,583,000 plus a dollar
amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management, that is
equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general government
employees in excess of $495.30 a month annualized per eligible marine
employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees for
fiscal year 2004 and $567.67 a month annualized per eligible marine
employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees for
fiscal year 2005, a dollar amount as prescribed by the office of
financial management for costs associated with pension amortization
charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial
management for salary increases during the 2003-2005 biennium. For the
purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's policies,
regulations, and procedures named under objects of expenditure "A" and
"B" (7.2.6.2).
The prescribed salary increase or decrease dollar amount that shall
be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used
to increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 2003, and
thereafter, as established in the 2003-2005 general fund operating
budget.
(3) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(4) When augmenting the existing ferry fleet, the department of
transportation ferry capital program shall explore cost-effective
options to include the leasing of ferries from private-sector
organizations.
(5) The Washington state ferries shall work with the department of
general administration, office of state procurement to improve the
existing fuel procurement process and solicit, identify, and evaluate,
purchasing alternatives to reduce the overall cost of fuel and mitigate
the impact of market fluctuations and pressure on both short- and long-term fuel costs. Consideration shall include, but not be limited to,
long-term fuel contracts, partnering with other public entities, and
possibilities for fuel storage in evaluating strategies and options.
The department shall report back to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2003, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for managing fuel purchases and costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,075,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $30,831,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service.
(2) No Amtrak Cascade runs may be eliminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,480,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,569,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,049,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $75,000 of the total appropriation is provided in
accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) to fund the state's
share of the 2004 Washington marine cargo forecast study. Public port
districts, acting through their association, must provide funding to
cover the remaining cost of the forecast.
(2) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) solely to
fund a study of the threats posed by flooding to the state and other
infrastructure near the Interstate 5 crossing of the Skagit River.
This funding is contingent on the receipt of federal matching funds.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,775,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $626,000 of the state patrol highway
account appropriation is provided solely for the patrol's share of the
Shelton area water and sewer regional plan. However, this amount is
contingent on general fund--state funding of the Washington corrections
center's portion of the Shelton area water and sewer regional plan. If
general fund--state funding is not provided, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE LOCAL BOARDS COORDINATED PROGRAM
Rural Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,660,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,237,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,451,000
County Arterial Preservation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,747,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,457,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $362,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW 47.56.724(4).
(2) The transportation improvement account--state appropriation
includes $23,955,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.26.500. The transportation improvement board may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the agency in lieu of bond
proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,933,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $14,933,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement the activities and
projects included in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project List -Current Law Facilities Projects report as transmitted to LEAP on April
7, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $332,049,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $649,506,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,001,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,247,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,279,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $613,300,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $561,411,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--
Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,622,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,246,415,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $411,113,000 is
provided solely for program I to implement the activities and projects
included in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project List - Current Law
Highway Projects report transmitted to LEAP on April 7, 2003.
(2) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $656,439,000 is
provided for program P to implement the activities and projects
included in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project List - Current Law
Highway Projects report transmitted to LEAP on April 7, 2003.
(3) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
Highway Projects report transmitted to LEAP on April 7, 2003.
(a)(i) The legislature intends that this appropriation completes
the project-level environmental impact statement to a record of
decision for the corridor between Spokane Street and the Battery Street
Tunnel. The environmental impact statement is to include alternatives
that maintain or expand auto and truck carrying capacity in the project
corridor. Alternatives that do not meet or increase existing capacity
will not be eligible for future project funding from the state.
Alternatives that reduce traffic capacity must examine alternative
improvements to provide increased north-south capacity, including I-5
and I-405. The environmental impact statement is to include an
alternative for rebuilding and/or retrofitting the existing Alaskan Way
Viaduct. The legislative transportation committee shall be consulted
and shall approve the preferred alternative for this project prior to
any additional funding being expended on this project.
(ii) The legislature intends this appropriation to allow for the
purchase of property adjacent to the existing Alaskan Way Viaduct.
This property will be used in the interim as a remote ferry holding
area, and later for construction staging of the viaduct project.
(b)(i) The legislature intends that this appropriation completes
the project-level environmental impact statement to a record of
decision for the corridor between Seattle and Redmond. The
environmental impact statement is to include an analysis of an eight-lane alternative. The legislative transportation committee shall be
consulted and shall approve the preferred alternative for this project
prior to future project expenditures.
(ii) The legislature intends that this appropriation complete one
hundred percent of the design of the Floating Bridge, Approach
Structures, and Portage Bay, and fifteen percent of the design of
landslide improvements and early right-of-way acquisition.
(4) The entire Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account appropriation is
provided solely for the projects and activities as indicated in the
Senate 2003 Transportation Project List - Current Law Tacoma Narrows
Bridge report transmitted to LEAP on April 7, 2003.
(5)(a) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for a study to provide the legislature with
information regarding the feasibility of pursuing a Washington commerce
corridor. The department shall retain outside experts to conduct the
study. The study must include the following conditions:
(i) The Washington commerce corridor must be a north-south corridor
starting in the vicinity of Lewis county and extending northerly to the
vicinity of the Canadian border. The corridor must be situated east of
state route number 405 and west of the Cascades. The corridor may
include any of the following features:
(A) Ability to carry long-haul freight;
(B) Ability to provide for passenger auto travel;
(C) Freight rail;
(D) Passenger rail;
(E) Public utilities; and
(F) Other ancillary facilities as may be desired to maximize use of
the corridor;
(ii) The Washington commerce corridor must be developed, financed,
designed, constructed, and operated by private sector consortiums; and
(iii) The Washington commerce corridor must be subject to a joint
permitting process involving federal, state, and local agencies with
jurisdiction.
(b) The legislative transportation committee shall form a working
group to work with the department and the outside consultant on the
study.
(6) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $342,956,000 is
provided solely for the projects expected to be completed before June
30, 2005, as indicated in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project List -Current Law Highway Projects report transmitted to LEAP on April 7,
2003.
(7) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $203,404,000 is
provided for the projects expected to be completed before June 30,
2007, as indicated in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project List -Current Law Highway Projects report transmitted to LEAP on April 7,
2003.
(8) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $408,230,000 is
provided for the projects expected to be completed after June 30, 2007,
as indicated in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project List - Current
Law Highway Projects report transmitted to LEAP on April 7, 2003.
(9) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $80,897,000 is
provided for the direct project support and other administration as
indicated in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project List - Current Law
Highway Projects report transmitted to LEAP on April 7, 2003.
(10) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $34,602,000 is
provided for the emerging needs, projects without construction, and
future unidentified needs as indicated in the Senate 2003
Transportation Project List - Current Law Highway Projects report
transmitted to LEAP on April 7, 2003.
(11) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$155,700,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(12) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$2,850,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW
47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes.
(13) The transportation account (nickel account) appropriation
includes $280,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Senate Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(14) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes $567,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state
appropriation includes $46,300,000 in unexpended proceeds from the
January 2003 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project.
(15) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
$44,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.812. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available in the special category C account in lieu of
bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(16) The department of transportation is authorized to maximize the
use of federal and state funds to implement the provisions of this
section.
(17) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to program I or P to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission. The
department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2004.
(18) Amounts appropriated in this section include the
reappropriations for the cost underruns indicated by the department on
March 1, 2003. Should the actual underruns on June 30, 2003, be
higher, the department shall request additional appropriation authority
in the 2004 legislative session. Should the actual underruns on June
30, 2003, be lower, the appropriations in this section shall be lowered
by the difference between the amounts indicated on March 1, 2003, and
the actual amounts on June 30, 2003.
(19) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(20) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $124,000 is
provided for increased project costs due to the enactment of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5457.
(21) If federal earmarks are received by the department, the
funding must not be used to expand the scope of any project.
(22) The department of transportation may not operate any existing
high-occupancy vehicle lanes and may not open or operate any new high-occupancy vehicle lane projects in counties with a population of
300,000 or more that border the state of Oregon unless: (a) Vehicle
spaces at park and ride lots within the county are three times the
capacity in existence on the effective date of this act; (b) the
Interstate 5 bridge over the Columbia River is retrofitted to include
four southbound general purpose lanes; and (c) the department of
transportation determines that high-occupancy vehicle lanes will
improve travel time by at least eight minutes over the length of the
high-occupancy vehicle lanes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,688,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,510,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,198,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The motor vehicle account--state
appropriation includes $11,688,000 for state matching funds for
federally selected competitive grant or congressional earmark projects
other than the commercial vehicle information system and network.
These moneys shall be placed into reserve status until such time as
federal funds are secured that require a state match.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,066,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,400,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,522,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,988,000

The appropriations in this section are provided for improving the
Washington state ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal
construction and improvements. The appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) $129,066,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--state appropriation and $34,400,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--federal appropriation are provided solely for
capital projects as listed in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project
List - Current Law Ferries Capital as transmitted to the LEAP on April
7, 2003.
(2) $17,522,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel
account)--state appropriation is provided solely for capital projects
as listed in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
Ferries Capital as transmitted to the LEAP on April 7, 2003.
(3) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes $45,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major
and minor improvements, and long lead time materials acquisition for
the Washington state ferries. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the motor vehicle
account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,530,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,499,000
Washington Fruit Express Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,299,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,530,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation, $9,499,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal appropriation, $500,000 of the Washington fruit express
account--state appropriation, and $770,000 of the essential rail
assistance account--state appropriation are provided solely for capital
projects as listed in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project List -Current Law Rail Capital as transmitted to the LEAP on April 7, 2003.
(2) $30,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for capital projects as listed in the
Senate 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law Rail Capital as
transmitted to the LEAP on April 7, 2003.
(3) If federal block grant funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the legislative
transportation committee prior to spending the funds on additional
projects.
(4) If the department issues a call for projects, applications must
be received by the department by November 1, 2003, and November 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,425,000
Multimodal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,726,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,960,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Senate 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
Local Projects report transmitted to LEAP on April 7, 2003.
(2) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be
transferred from programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department may not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission. The
department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2004.
(3) $7,576,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to fund the first
phase of a multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to
dredge the Columbia River. The department shall not expend the
appropriation in this section unless agreement on ocean disposal sites
has been reached that protects the state's commercial crab fishery.
The amount provided in this subsection shall lapse unless the state of
Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the
project.
(4) $1,156,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
reappropriated and provided solely for additional small city pavement
preservation program grants, to be administered by the department's
highways and local programs division. The department shall review all
projects receiving grant awards under this program at least
semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory
progress. Any project that has been awarded small city pavement
preservation program grant funds, but does not report activity on the
project within one year of grant award, should be reviewed by the
department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The
department must promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. The
department shall expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified
projects when funds become available either because grant awards have
been rescinded for lack of sufficient project activity or because
completed projects returned excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(5) $4,010,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
reappropriated and provided solely for additional traffic and
pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The highways and local
programs division within the department of transportation shall
administer this program. The department shall review all projects
receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to
determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any
project that has been awarded traffic and pedestrian safety improvement
grant funds, but does not report activity on the project within one
year of grant award should be reviewed by the department to determine
whether the grant should be terminated. The department must promptly
close out grants when projects have been completed, and identify where
unused grant funds remain because actual project costs were lower than
estimated in the grant award. The department shall expeditiously
extend new grant awards to qualified projects when funds become
available either because grant awards have been rescinded for lack of
sufficient project activity or because completed projects returned
excess grant funds upon project closeout.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $258,971,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,340,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,721,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,876,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $331,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,293,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$567,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound capital construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$45,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and
terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead-time
materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to
cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,359,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For license permit and fee distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,652,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
(1) State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . $465,152,000
(3) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the motor
vehicle account -- state . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

The state treasurer shall perform the transfers from the state
patrol highway account and the highway safety account to the motor
vehicle account on a quarterly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Fund -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,757,000
(2) RV Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,954,000
(3) Motor Vehicle Fund--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,287,000
(4) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section up to the level provided, on an
as-needed basis.
(b) The department of transportation shall transfer funds in
subsection (4) of this section up to the amount identified, provided
that a minimum balance of $5,000,000 is retained in the Puget Sound
ferry operations account.
(c) The amount identified in subsection (4) of this section may not
include any revenues collected as passenger fares.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--TRANSFERS
State Patrol Highway Account: For transfer to the
department of retirement systems expense account:
For the administrative expenses of the judicial
retirement system . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,304

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS AND EMPLOYEE HEALTH BENEFITS
Pilotage Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Aeronautics Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,044,000
State Patrol Highway Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Patrol Highway Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Rural Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $634,000
Highway Safety Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,770,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,556,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
County Arterial Preservation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Department of Licensing Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,106,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS.
In addition to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenue for
distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system, and bond retirement and interest
including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers,
interest on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness,
there is also appropriated such further amounts as may be required or
available for these purposes under any statutory formula or under any
proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 The department of transportation is
authorized to undertake federal advance construction projects under the
provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to maintain progress in
meeting approved highway construction and preservation objectives. The
legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be required to
temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the
highway construction and preservation programs for federal advance
construction projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

2001-03 BIENNIUMTRANSPORTATION AGENCIES
Sec. 1201 2002 c 359 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,596,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:
(1) $2,823,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided for the operation of the house of representatives
transportation committee.
(2) To the extent possible, this appropriation shall utilize funds
allocated under RCW 46.68.110(2).
(3) To the extent possible, this appropriation shall utilize funds
allocated under RCW 46.68.120(3).
(4) The house of representatives transportation committee shall
conduct a study of the use of motorized scooters. The study shall, at
a minimum, identify and analyze the safety issues associated with use
of motorized scooters, including use by children, commuters, and the
disabled. House of representatives transportation committee cochairs
shall each appoint one member from their respective caucus to serve as
cochair of the study group. The chair of the senate transportation
committee may also appoint two members from the senate transportation
committee, one from each caucus, to participate in the study. The
study shall be staffed by house of representatives transportation
committee staff. The study group shall report back to the house of
representatives transportation committee by January 1, 2002.
(((4))) (5) The house of representatives transportation committee
shall conduct a study of the effect of the weight of fire-fighting
apparatus on state roadways. The study shall determine, at a minimum,
the various types of fire-fighting apparatus currently in use on state
roadways; the size, weight and load effect of fire-fighting apparatus
that are currently in use or that potentially could be in use on the
state roadways, as well as on state bridges; and the effect on public
safety. The study may examine state and federal laws that affect fire-fighting apparatuses. House of representatives transportation
committee cochairs shall each appoint one member from their respective
caucus to serve as cochair of the study group. The study shall be
staffed by house of representatives transportation committee staff.
The study group will report back to the house of representatives
transportation committee by January 1, 2002.
(((5))) (6) The legislative transportation committee shall conduct
a feasibility study of potential for economic partnerships between the
Washington state ferries and local government entities, including but
not limited to port districts. The study is intended to improve ferry
terminals. The study shall, at a minimum, identify the market,
physical, and economic factors that should be examined in determining
whether an economic or commercial development partnership project on or
around Washington state ferry terminals is likely to produce revenue
for the partners. The study shall apply those factors to an analysis
of each terminal used by Washington state ferries and recommend whether
further exploration of state and local partnerships would be of
potential economic benefit to the partners. The entity selected to
perform the study through the request for proposals process will report
back to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1,
2001.
(((6))) (7) The legislative transportation committee, in
cooperation with an areawide transportation system or systems, shall
undertake an evaluation of providing locally sponsored transit services
in a local community supplemental to those services provided by an
areawide system. The evaluation shall address:
(a) The costs and benefits of providing such services;
(b) The impact of such service on ridership on the areawide system
and on any regional systems;
(c) Funding options for supplemental services; and
(d) Institutional arrangements affecting the institution of
supplemental services.
The committee shall work with the department of transportation,
areawide transit providers, community officials, private businesses,
labor organizations, and others as appropriate in conducting the
evaluation, and in developing a pilot project if feasible. The
committee shall also conduct a study of local transit systems with the
purpose of making recommendations to make local transit services more
seamless and efficient. The committee shall provide an interim
progress report to the legislature by January 2002. The committee
shall report its findings to the legislature not later than December 1,
2002.
(((7))) (8) The legislative transportation committee shall
undertake an evaluation of the statutory exemptions for transportation
taxes, including but not limited to motor vehicle fuel taxes. The
committee shall report its findings to the legislature by December 1,
2003.
(((8))) (9) The legislative transportation committee will convene
a working group to review the costs, processes, and other
considerations relating to special vehicle license plates. The working
group will also review special license plate tabs and emblems. The
committee will report its findings to the legislature by December 1,
2002.
(((9))) (10) The legislative transportation committee shall form a
working group to evaluate the feasibility of developing an alternative
corridor to Interstate 5 and Interstate 405 to expedite the movement of
commerce between the Canadian border, the central Puget Sound region,
the south Puget Sound region, and more southerly areas. The corridor
would run from approximately the Canadian border in the north to
approximately Lewis county in the south. This alternative corridor
analysis shall address truck, rail, pipeline, and other utility needs
for the corridor, to determine the feasibility of financing and
constructing such a corridor, taking into consideration: (a)
Anticipated present and future freight demand as well as freight
traffic relief for existing state highway and rail routes; (b) the
potential for carrying general purpose traffic to provide relief for
other state highway routes; (c) a cost-benefit analysis detailing
various funding possibilities, including federal funds and the use of
charges and tolls to fund construction and operation of the corridor as
a utility corridor and a toll facility; (d) an analysis detailing
possible right of way locations, including but not limited to property
donations, trades, or credits between or among the public and private
sector; and (e) possible private sector, local, or other partnerships
that may be used to fund the project. The working group shall report
its findings to the full committee by December 15, 2002.

Sec. 1202 2002 c 359 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($164,147,000))
$163,915,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,278,000))
$7,544,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($169,000))
$282,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($171,594,000))
$171,741,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities of the field operations bureau:
(1) As a result of the elimination of the vehicle inspection number
(VIN) program, no permanent Washington state patrol employee shall be
displaced from employment without the opportunity to fill a vacant
patrol position for which he or she has a preference and meets the
minimum qualifications. For the purpose of the VIN program
elimination, the guidelines under chapter 356-26 WAC (Registers-Certifications) shall be suspended for those employees holding the
classification of VIN 1 or 2.
(2) To the extent possible, the agency shall transfer displaced VIN
personnel into the 20 newly created school bus inspection and motor
carrier safety assistance program positions. The agency shall fill
existing vacant positions within the commercial vehicle division with
displaced VIN personnel. The agency shall report by December 31, 2001,
to the senate and house of representatives transportation committees on
efforts to relocate displaced VIN personnel.

Sec. 1203 2002 c 359 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,247,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,736,000))
$71,731,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $735,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,718,000))
$77,713,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities of the support services bureau:
(1) $67,000 of the state patrol highway account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the patrol to work jointly with
the department of transportation, the military department, and the
department of natural resources, in coordination with the state
interoperability executive committee, on the development and
implementation of a secure geographical information system database to
illustrate locations and specifications of statewide radio and
microwave towers
(2) $5,247,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation and $2,299,000 of the state patrol highway account -- state
appropriation is a one time funding of general fund activities. The
general fund will resume funding these activities beginning in the
2003-05 biennium.
(3) The Washington state patrol shall review the policy of allowing
commissioned uniformed officers to use personally assigned vehicles for
commuting purposes. This provision applies to every Washington state
patrol officer except the chief and any officer that requires use of a
vehicle for work performed throughout the day. The agency shall submit
to the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by
December 1, 2002, a list of officers that use vehicles for commuting
purposes and any revisions to the vehicle use policy resulting from the
review required under this subsection.

Sec. 1204 2002 c 359 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,724,000))
$7,763,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,400,000))
$4,415,000
Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $173,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,524,000))
$12,578,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities referenced:
(1) $6,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $14,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$3,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $26,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$1,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $2,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$4,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $11,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6461 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6461 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1205 2002 c 359 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- INFORMATION SYSTEMS
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,735,000))
$5,763,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,695,000))
$3,707,000
Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($213,000))
$214,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,723,000))
$9,764,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of licensing shall report to the legislative
transportation committees on the progress of the expanded internet
service no later than December 15, 2002.
(2) $4,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $4,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$2,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $19,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$1,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $1,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$3,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $8,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6461 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6461 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1206 2002 c 359 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $578,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,191,000))
$58,479,000
Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,240,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,035,000))
$63,323,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities referenced:
(1) $82,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $376,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $77,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) The department shall work cooperatively with the national guard
to develop and make available a national guard sticker which may be
affixed to a license plate. The stickers shall be available upon
application. The department shall charge a fee for the stickers
sufficient to defray the costs of production.
(5) The department shall work cooperatively with the Washington
state council of fire fighters to develop and make available a fire
fighter sticker which may be affixed to a license plate. The stickers
shall be available upon application to members of the international
association of fire fighters. The department shall charge a fee for
the stickers sufficient to defray the costs of production.
(6) $22,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1207 2002 c 359 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,573,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,175,000))
$82,667,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($788,000))
$824,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,536,000))
$86,064,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of licensing shall prepare a capital project
plan adopting a process for using certificates of participation to
purchase licensing services offices if the combined principle and
interest payments are the same or less than existing or future leases
on comparable facilities.
(2) $21,000 of the highway safety fund -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $36,000 of the highway safety fund -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $162,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6461 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6461 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $56,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 1208 2002 c 359 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,349,000))
$4,967,000
Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,509,000))
$5,127,000

Sec. 1209 2002 c 359 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U
Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(1) FOR PAYMENT OF WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES TORT LIABILITY AND
SETTLEMENTS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,626,000
(((1))) (2) FOR PAYMENT OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
OFFICE OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000
(((2))) (3) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,000
(((3))) (4) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,047,000
(((4))) (5) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,237,000
(((5))) (6) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND
ADMINISTRATION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,755,000
Motor Vehicle Fund -- Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,204,000

The office of risk management shall evaluate the risk pool premium
assessments to ensure that proper tracking, measuring, and reporting
methods have been utilized to ensure funding equity has been
maintained. "Funding equity" includes but is not limited to
demonstrating that premiums assessed to the department of
transportation will, over time, not exceed claims paid in order to
ensure that premiums paid by the department of transportation are not
unconstitutionally expended for nonhighway purposes. The office of
risk management shall make a full report of its findings to the
legislature no later than January 15, 2002.

(6) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000
(7) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL
PROJECTS SURCHARGE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,547,000
(8) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $457,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,829,000))
$48,455,000

Sec. 1210 2002 c 359 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($311,312,000))
$313,250,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:
(1) The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of
(($35,159,000)) $35,797,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2001-2003
biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted
amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the actual cost
exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental
appropriation.
(2) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2001-2003 biennium may not exceed $207,065,000 plus a dollar
amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management, that is
equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general government
employees in excess of $432.82 a month annualized per eligible marine
employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees for the
respective fiscal year, a dollar amount as prescribed by the office of
financial management for costs associated with pension amortization
charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial
management for salary increases during the 2001-2003 biennium. For the
purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's policies,
regulations, and procedures named under objects of expenditure "A" and
"B" (7.2.6.2).
The prescribed salary and insurance benefit increase or decrease
dollar amount that shall be allocated from the governor's compensation
appropriations is in addition to the appropriation contained in this
section and may be used to increase or decrease compensation costs,
effective July 1, 2001, and thereafter, as established in the 2001-2003
general fund operating budget.
(3) The department shall issue a request for information from
entities interested in purchasing advertising on board Washington state
ferry vessels. The department shall evaluate the proposals and report
back to the legislature's transportation committees in January 2002
regarding the potential for revenue from different types of
advertising.
(4) The department may enter into contracts with private vendors to
sell ferry tickets and medium at locations other than Washington state
ferry terminals or facilities.
(a) The department may enter into the contracts only (i) with
private vendors that are already established businesses offering goods
for sale to the general public; and (ii) if it determines that the
vendor's established location has the potential to serve a significant
percentage of the customers using a particular ferry route.
(b) The department may adopt necessary rules and procedures to
allow the use of credit and debit cards to purchase ferry tickets or
medium from a private vendor who has contracted with the department to
sell ferry tickets or medium. The department may establish a
convenience fee to be paid by all persons purchasing ferry tickets and
medium at locations other than Washington state ferry terminals or
facilities. The convenience fee must be sufficient to offset the
charges imposed on the department by the credit and debit card
companies. In no event may the use of credit or debit cards authorized
by this section create a loss of revenue to the state. The use of a
personal credit card does not rely upon the credit of the state as
prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution.
(5) The legislature recognizes the value of a regional fare
collection system to promote intermodal travel throughout Washington
state ferries' Puget Sound service area and therefore encourages the
department to resume participation in the regional fare coordination
project (smart card). The department shall develop a request for
funding of the on-going operating costs associated with the regional
fare coordination project and shall present this request to the 2003
legislature. The request for funding shall be sufficient to support a
system that prevents the disclosure of personally identifying
information of persons who use a smart card to facilitate payment of
ferry fares. The requested system may facilitate the disclosure of
aggregate information on fare collection to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. The
requested system shall not prevent the release of personally
identifying information to law enforcement agencies when required by a
subpoena.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES CAPITAL FACILITIES
Sec. 1301 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,046,000))
$12,371,000

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 1401 2002 c 359 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT
TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($208,206,000))
$196,524,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,473,000))
$52,474,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,856,000))
$38,088,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,588,000))
$3,136,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($631,000))
$114,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($340,000))
$76,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($307,094,000))
$290,412,000

Sec. 1402 2002 c 359 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL
AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($459,000))
$334,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,000))
$18,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($534,000))
$386,000

Sec. 1403 2002 c 359 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to
cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($428,981,000))
$425,501,000
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle license, permit, and fee distributions
to cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,304,000

Sec. 1404 2002 c 359 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
(1) RV Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,344,000))
$542,000

The department of transportation shall only transfer funds provided
under this subsection (((1) of this section)) on an as-needed basis.

(2) ((Public Transportation Systems Account --
State Appropriation: For transfer to the
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,911,000
(3))) State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,657,000
(((4))) (3) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($453,279,000))
$448,264,000
(((6))) (4) Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer of excess City
Hardship Assistance Program revenues to
cities . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
(((7))) (5) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the multimodal
transportation account . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
(((8))) (6) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Tacoma
Narrows toll bridge account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($839,000,000))
$39,000,000
(((9))) (7) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the motor
vehicle account -- state . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

(((1))) If Senate Bill No. 6814 is enacted in the form passed by
the legislature, $16,191,000 of the transfer from the Washington state
patrol account -- state to the motor vehicle account -- state shall lapse.
The state treasurer shall perform the transfers from the state patrol
highway account to the motor vehicle account on a quarterly basis.
(((2) The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$800,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1405 A new section is added to 2001 2nd sp.s.
c 14 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS

Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation: For
transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$800,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1501 A new section is added to chapter 43.79
RCW to read as follows:
The state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
aircraft user fees paid by other agencies and private users as
reimbursement for the use of the patrol's aircraft that are primarily
for purposes other than highway patrol must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses
related to these aircraft. Only the chief of the Washington state
patrol or the chief's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1502 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1503 Sections 1201 through 1405 of this act
take effect immediately, and the remainder of this act takes effect
July 1, 2003.

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 9, 42
INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
INFORMATION SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 7, 38
VEHICLE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 8, 40
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 10, 43
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 15, 43
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY--PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 17, 44
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
PROGRAM D -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q--CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4, 33
LOCAL BOARDS COORDINATED PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 3, 19
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS AND EMPLOYEE HEALTH BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 29, 30, 47
MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30, 48
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
CAPITAL PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 5, 36
SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 37
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
--- END ---