BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2001-03 BIENNIUMTRANSPORTATION AGENCIES
Sec. 201 2002 c 359 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($164,147,000))
$164,347,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,278,000))
$7,544,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($169,000))
$282,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($171,594,000))
$172,173,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities of the field operations bureau:
(1) As a result of the elimination of the vehicle inspection number
(VIN) program, no permanent Washington state patrol employee shall be
displaced from employment without the opportunity to fill a vacant
patrol position for which he or she has a preference and meets the
minimum qualifications. For the purpose of the VIN program
elimination, the guidelines under chapter 356-26 WAC (Registers-Certifications) shall be suspended for those employees holding the
classification of VIN 1 or 2.
(2) To the extent possible, the agency shall transfer displaced VIN
personnel into the 20 newly created school bus inspection and motor
carrier safety assistance program positions. The agency shall fill
existing vacant positions within the commercial vehicle division with
displaced VIN personnel. The agency shall report by December 31, 2001,
to the senate and house of representatives transportation committees on
efforts to relocate displaced VIN personnel.

Sec. 202 2002 c 359 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,247,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,736,000))
$72,165,000
State Patrol Highway Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $735,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,718,000))
$78,147,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities of the support services bureau:
(1) $67,000 of the state patrol highway account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the patrol to work jointly with
the department of transportation, the military department, and the
department of natural resources, in coordination with the state
interoperability executive committee, on the development and
implementation of a secure geographical information system database to
illustrate locations and specifications of statewide radio and
microwave towers
(2) $5,247,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation and $2,299,000 of the state patrol highway account -- state
appropriation is a one time funding of general fund activities. The
general fund will resume funding these activities beginning in the
2003-05 biennium.
(3) The Washington state patrol shall review the policy of allowing
commissioned uniformed officers to use personally assigned vehicles for
commuting purposes. This provision applies to every Washington state
patrol officer except the chief and any officer that requires use of a
vehicle for work performed throughout the day. The agency shall submit
to the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by
December 1, 2002, a list of officers that use vehicles for commuting
purposes and any revisions to the vehicle use policy resulting from the
review required under this subsection.

Sec. 203 2002 c 359 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,724,000))
$7,763,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,400,000))
$4,415,000
Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $173,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,524,000))
$12,578,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities referenced:
(1) $6,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $14,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$3,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $26,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$1,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $2,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$4,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $11,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6461 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6461 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 204 2002 c 359 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- INFORMATION SYSTEMS
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,735,000))
$5,763,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,695,000))
$3,707,000
Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($213,000))
$214,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,723,000))
$9,764,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of licensing shall report to the legislative
transportation committees on the progress of the expanded internet
service no later than December 15, 2002.
(2) $4,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $4,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$2,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $19,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$1,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $1,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation and
$3,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the form
passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted in
the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $8,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6461 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6461 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 205 2002 c 359 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $578,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,191,000))
$58,764,000
Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,240,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,035,000))
$63,608,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for the activities referenced:
(1) $82,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $376,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $77,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5354 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5354 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) The department shall work cooperatively with the national guard
to develop and make available a national guard sticker which may be
affixed to a license plate. The stickers shall be available upon
application. The department shall charge a fee for the stickers
sufficient to defray the costs of production.
(5) The department shall work cooperatively with the Washington
state council of fire fighters to develop and make available a fire
fighter sticker which may be affixed to a license plate. The stickers
shall be available upon application to members of the international
association of fire fighters. The department shall charge a fee for
the stickers sufficient to defray the costs of production.
(6) $22,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 206 2002 c 359 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,573,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,175,000))
$82,667,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $788,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,536,000))
$86,028,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of licensing shall prepare a capital project
plan adopting a process for using certificates of participation to
purchase licensing services offices if the combined principle and
interest payments are the same or less than existing or future leases
on comparable facilities.
(2) $21,000 of the highway safety fund -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6748 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6748 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $36,000 of the highway safety fund -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6814 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6814 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $162,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6461 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6461 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $56,000 of the highway safety account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5626 in the
form passed by the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5626 is not enacted
in the form passed by the legislature the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 207 2002 c 359 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND
FACILITIES -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,644,000))
$50,093,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,044,000))
$50,493,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity: $3,296,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 6188.

Sec. 208 2002 c 359 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,349,000))
$5,289,000
Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,509,000))
$5,449,000

Sec. 209 2002 c 359 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U
Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(1) FOR PAYMENT OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION OFFICE OF
RISK MANAGEMENT FEES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000
(2) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,000
(3) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,047,000
(4) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,237,000
(5) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND
ADMINISTRATION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,755,000))
$34,381,000
Motor Vehicle Fund -- Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,204,000

The office of risk management shall evaluate the risk pool premium
assessments to ensure that proper tracking, measuring, and reporting
methods have been utilized to ensure funding equity has been
maintained. "Funding equity" includes but is not limited to
demonstrating that premiums assessed to the department of
transportation will, over time, not exceed claims paid in order to
ensure that premiums paid by the department of transportation are not
unconstitutionally expended for nonhighway purposes. The office of
risk management shall make a full report of its findings to the
legislature no later than January 15, 2002.

(6) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000
(7) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL
PROJECTS SURCHARGE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,547,000
(8) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $457,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,829,000))
$48,455,000

Sec. 210 2002 c 359 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($311,312,000))
$310,144,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:
(1) The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of
(($35,159,000)) $32,691,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2001-2003
biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted
amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the actual cost
exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental
appropriation.
(2) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2001-2003 biennium may not exceed $207,065,000 plus a dollar
amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management, that is
equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general government
employees in excess of $432.82 a month annualized per eligible marine
employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees for the
respective fiscal year, a dollar amount as prescribed by the office of
financial management for costs associated with pension amortization
charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial
management for salary increases during the 2001-2003 biennium. For the
purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's policies,
regulations, and procedures named under objects of expenditure "A" and
"B" (7.2.6.2).
The prescribed salary and insurance benefit increase or decrease
dollar amount that shall be allocated from the governor's compensation
appropriations is in addition to the appropriation contained in this
section and may be used to increase or decrease compensation costs,
effective July 1, 2001, and thereafter, as established in the 2001-2003
general fund operating budget.
(3) The department shall issue a request for information from
entities interested in purchasing advertising on board Washington state
ferry vessels. The department shall evaluate the proposals and report
back to the legislature's transportation committees in January 2002
regarding the potential for revenue from different types of
advertising.
(4) The department may enter into contracts with private vendors to
sell ferry tickets and medium at locations other than Washington state
ferry terminals or facilities.
(a) The department may enter into the contracts only (i) with
private vendors that are already established businesses offering goods
for sale to the general public; and (ii) if it determines that the
vendor's established location has the potential to serve a significant
percentage of the customers using a particular ferry route.
(b) The department may adopt necessary rules and procedures to
allow the use of credit and debit cards to purchase ferry tickets or
medium from a private vendor who has contracted with the department to
sell ferry tickets or medium. The department may establish a
convenience fee to be paid by all persons purchasing ferry tickets and
medium at locations other than Washington state ferry terminals or
facilities. The convenience fee must be sufficient to offset the
charges imposed on the department by the credit and debit card
companies. In no event may the use of credit or debit cards authorized
by this section create a loss of revenue to the state. The use of a
personal credit card does not rely upon the credit of the state as
prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution.
(5) The legislature recognizes the value of a regional fare
collection system to promote intermodal travel throughout Washington
state ferries' Puget Sound service area and therefore encourages the
department to resume participation in the regional fare coordination
project (smart card). The department shall develop a request for
funding of the on-going operating costs associated with the regional
fare coordination project and shall present this request to the 2003
legislature. The request for funding shall be sufficient to support a
system that prevents the disclosure of personally identifying
information of persons who use a smart card to facilitate payment of
ferry fares. The requested system may facilitate the disclosure of
aggregate information on fare collection to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. The
requested system shall not prevent the release of personally
identifying information to law enforcement agencies when required by a
subpoena.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES CAPITAL FACILITIES
Sec. 301 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,046,000))
$12,477,000

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 401 2002 c 359 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT
TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($208,206,000))
$195,869,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,473,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,856,000))
$37,994,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,588,000))
$3,588,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($631,000))
$154,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($340,000))
$134,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($307,094,000))
$290,212,000

Sec. 402 2002 c 359 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL
AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($459,000))
$622,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,000))
$22,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,000))
$45,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($534,000))
$689,000

Sec. 403 2002 c 359 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to
cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($428,981,000))
$426,608,000
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle license, permit, and fee distributions
to cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,808,000

Sec. 404 2002 c 359 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
(1) RV Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,344,000

The department of transportation shall only transfer funds provided
under this subsection (((1) of this section)) on an as-needed basis.

(2) ((Public Transportation Systems Account --
State Appropriation: For transfer to the
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,911,000
(3))) State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,657,000
(((4))) (3) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($453,279,000))
$449,836,000
(((6))) (4) Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer of excess City
Hardship Assistance Program revenues to
cities . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
(((7))) (5) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the multimodal
transportation account . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
(((8))) (6) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Tacoma
Narrows toll bridge account . . . . . . . . . . . . $839,000,000
(((9))) (7) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the motor
vehicle account -- state . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

(1) If Senate Bill No. 6814 is enacted in the form passed by the
legislature, $16,191,000 of the transfer from the Washington state
patrol account -- state to the motor vehicle account -- state shall lapse.
The state treasurer shall perform the transfers from the state patrol
highway account to the motor vehicle account on a quarterly basis.
(2) The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$800,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

INDEX PAGE #

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
INFORMATION SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
VEHICLE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 2

--- END ---