BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.527 and 1997 c 250 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county with a population over one hundred fifty thousand,
and each city or town within those counties containing a major employer
((shall, by October 1, 1992,)) may adopt by ordinance and implement a
commute trip reduction plan for all major employers. The plan shall be
developed in cooperation with local transit agencies, regional
transportation planning organizations as established in RCW 47.80.020,
major employers, and the owners of and employers at major worksites.
The plan shall be designed to achieve reductions in the proportion of
single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle
miles traveled per employee by employees of major public and private
sector employers in the jurisdiction.
(2) All other counties, and cities and towns in those counties, may
adopt and implement a commute trip reduction plan.
(3) The department of ecology may, after consultation with the
department of transportation, as part of the state implementation plan
for areas that do not attain the national ambient air quality standards
for carbon monoxide or ozone, require municipalities other than those
identified in subsection (1) of this section to adopt and implement
commute trip reduction plans if the department determines that such
plans are necessary for attainment of said standards.
(4) A commute trip reduction plan shall be consistent with the
guidelines established under RCW 70.94.537 and shall include but is not
limited to (a) goals for reductions in the proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle miles
traveled per employee; (b) designation of commute trip reduction zones;
(c) requirements for major public and private sector employers to
implement commute trip reduction programs; (d) a commute trip reduction
program for employees of the county, city, or town; (e) a review of
local parking policies and ordinances as they relate to employers and
major worksites and any revisions necessary to comply with commute trip
reduction goals and guidelines; (f) an appeals process by which major
employers, who as a result of special characteristics of their business
or its locations would be unable to meet the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan, may obtain waiver or modification of those
requirements; and (g) means for determining base year values of the
proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute
trip vehicle miles traveled per employee and progress toward meeting
commute trip reduction plan goals on an annual basis. Goals which are
established shall take into account existing transportation demand
management efforts which are made by major employers. Each
jurisdiction shall ensure that employers shall receive full credit for
the results of transportation demand management efforts and commute
trip reduction programs which have been implemented by major employers
prior to the base year. The goals for miles traveled per employee for
all major employers shall not be less than a fifteen percent reduction
from the worksite base year value or the base year value for the
commute trip reduction zone in which their worksite is located by
January 1, 1995, twenty percent reduction from the base year values by
January 1, 1997, twenty-five percent reduction from the base year
values by January 1, 1999, and a thirty-five percent reduction from the
base year values by January 1, 2005.
(5) A county, city, or town may, as part of its commute trip
reduction plan, require commute trip reduction programs for employers
with ten or more full time employees at major worksites in federally
designated nonattainment areas for carbon monoxide and ozone. The
county, city or town shall develop the programs in cooperation with
affected employers and provide technical assistance to the employers in
implementing such programs.
(6) The commute trip reduction plans adopted by counties, cities,
and towns under this chapter shall be consistent with and may be
incorporated in applicable state or regional transportation plans and
local comprehensive plans and shall be coordinated, and consistent
with, the commute trip reduction plans of counties, cities, or towns
with which the county, city, or town has, in part, common borders or
related regional issues. Such regional issues shall include assuring
consistency in the treatment of employers who have worksites subject to
the requirements of this chapter in more than one jurisdiction.
Counties, cities, or towns adopting commute trip reduction plans may
enter into agreements through the interlocal cooperation act or by
resolution or ordinance as appropriate with other jurisdictions, local
transit agencies, or regional transportation planning organizations to
coordinate the development and implementation of such plans. Transit
agencies shall work with counties, cities, and towns to take into
account the location of major employer worksites when planning transit
service changes or the expansion of public transportation services.
Counties, cities, or towns adopting a commute trip reduction plan shall
review it annually and revise it as necessary to be consistent with
applicable plans developed under RCW 36.70A.070.
(7) Each county, city, or town implementing a commute trip
reduction program shall, within thirty days submit a summary of its
plan along with certification of adoption to the commute trip reduction
task force established under RCW 70.94.537.
(8) Each county, city, or town implementing a commute trip
reduction program shall submit an annual progress report to the commute
trip reduction task force established under RCW 70.94.537. The report
shall be due July 1, 1994, and each July 1st thereafter through July 1,
2006. The report shall describe progress in attaining the applicable
commute trip reduction goals for each commute trip reduction zone and
shall highlight any problems being encountered in achieving the goals.
The information shall be reported in a form established by the commute
trip reduction task force.
(9) Any waivers or modifications of the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan granted by a jurisdiction shall be submitted for
review to the commute trip reduction task force established under RCW
70.94.537. The commute trip reduction task force may not deny the
granting of a waiver or modification of the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan by a jurisdiction but they may notify the
jurisdiction of any comments or objections.
(10) Each county, city, or town implementing a commute trip
reduction program shall count commute trips eliminated through work-at-home options or alternate work schedules as one and two-tenths vehicle
trips eliminated for the purpose of meeting trip reduction goals.
(11) Each county, city, or town implementing a commute trip
reduction program shall ensure that employers that have modified their
employees' work schedules so that some or all employees are not
scheduled to arrive at work between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. are
provided credit when calculating single-occupancy vehicle use and
vehicle miles traveled at that worksite. This credit shall be awarded
if implementation of the schedule change was an identified element in
that worksite's approved commute trip reduction program or if the
schedule change occurred because of impacts associated with chapter
36.70A RCW, the growth management act.
(12) Plans implemented under this section shall not apply to
commute trips for seasonal agricultural employees.
(13) Plans implemented under this section shall not apply to
construction worksites when the expected duration of the construction
project is less than two years.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.0287 and 2001 c 320 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply to sales of
passenger motor vehicles which are to be used for commuter ride sharing
or ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs, as
defined in RCW 46.74.010, if the vehicles are used as ride-sharing
vehicles for thirty-six consecutive months beginning from the date of
purchase.
To qualify for the tax exemption, those passenger motor vehicles
with five or six passengers, including the driver, used for commuter
ride-sharing, must be operated ((either)) within the state's ((eight))
nine largest counties that ((are required to)) develop commute trip
reduction plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW or in other counties,
or cities and towns within those counties, that elect to adopt and
implement a commute trip reduction plan. Additionally at least one of
the following conditions must apply: (1) The vehicle must be operated
by a public transportation agency for the general public; or (2) the
vehicle must be used by a major employer, as defined in RCW 70.94.524
as an element of its commute trip reduction program for their
employees; or (3) the vehicle must be owned and operated by individual
employees and must be registered either with the employer as part of
its commute trip reduction program or with a public transportation
agency serving the area where the employees live or work. Individual
employee owned and operated motor vehicles will require certification
that the vehicle is registered with a major employer or a public
transportation agency. Major employers who own and operate motor
vehicles for their employees must certify that the commuter ride-sharing arrangement conforms to a carpool/vanpool element contained
within their commute trip reduction program or used primarily for van
or car pooling purposes.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.0282 and 2001 c 320 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply with respect to the
use of passenger motor vehicles used as ride-sharing vehicles by not
less than five persons, including the driver, with a gross vehicle
weight not to exceed 10,000 pounds where the primary usage is for
commuter ride-sharing, as defined in RCW 46.74.010, by not less than
four persons including the driver when at least two of those persons
are confined to wheelchairs when riding, or passenger motor vehicles
where the primary usage is for ride-sharing for persons with special
transportation needs, as defined in RCW 46.74.010, if the vehicles are
used as ride-sharing vehicles for thirty-six consecutive months
beginning with the date of first use.
To qualify for the tax exemption, those passenger motor vehicles
with five or six passengers, including the driver, used for commuter
ride-sharing, must be operated ((either)) within the state's ((eight))
nine largest counties that ((are required to)) develop commute trip
reduction plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW or in other counties,
or cities and towns within those counties, that elect to adopt and
implement a commute trip reduction plan. Additionally at least one of
the following conditions must apply: (1) The vehicle must be operated
by a public transportation agency for the general public; or (2) the
vehicle must be used by a major employer, as defined in RCW 70.94.524
as an element of its commute trip reduction program for their
employees; or (3) the vehicle must be owned and operated by individual
employees and must be registered either with the employer as part of
its commute trip reduction program or with a public transportation
agency serving the area where the employees live or work. Individual
employee owned and operated motor vehicles will require certification
that the vehicle is registered with a major employer or a public
transportation agency. Major employers who own and operate motor
vehicles for their employees must certify that the commuter ride-sharing arrangement conforms to a carpool/vanpool element contained
within their commute trip reduction program or used primarily for van
or car pooling purposes.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.44.015 and 1996 c 244 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, in addition to the exclusions
under RCW 82.44.010, "motor vehicle" shall not include passenger motor
vehicles used primarily for commuter ride sharing and ride sharing for
persons with special transportation needs, as defined in RCW 46.74.010.
The registered owner of one of these vehicles shall notify the
department of licensing upon termination of primary use of the vehicle
in commuter ride sharing or ride sharing for persons with special
transportation needs and shall be liable for the tax imposed by this
chapter, prorated on the remaining months for which the vehicle is
licensed.
To qualify for the tax exemption, those passenger motor vehicles
with five or six passengers, including the driver, used for commuter
ride-sharing, must be operated ((either)) within the state's ((eight))
nine largest counties that ((are required to)) develop commute trip
reduction plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW or in other counties,
or cities and towns within those counties, that elect to adopt and
implement a commute trip reduction plan. Additionally at least one of
the following conditions must apply: (1) The vehicle must be operated
by a public transportation agency for the general public; or (2) the
vehicle must be used by a major employer, as defined in RCW 70.94.524
as an element of its commute trip reduction program for their
employees; or (3) the vehicle must be owned and operated by individual
employees and must be registered either with the employer as part of
its commute trip reduction program or with a public transportation
agency serving the area where the employees live or work. Individual
employee owned and operated motor vehicles will require certification
that the vehicle is registered with a major employer or a public
transportation agency. Major employers who own and operate motor
vehicles for their employees must certify that the commuter ride-sharing arrangement conforms to a carpool/vanpool element contained
within their commute trip reduction program or used primarily for van
or car pooling purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 47.01.900 (Commute trip reduction program -- Transfer from
state energy office -- References to director or state energy office) and
1998 c 245 s 93 & 1996 c 186 s 301; and
(2) RCW 82.67.050 (Commute trip reduction task force report) and
2002 c 203 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---