BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(2) "Gross income" means all revenue, without deduction, that is
derived from the performance of nursing facility services. "Gross
income" does not include other operating revenue or nonoperating
revenue.
(3) "Other operating revenue" means income from nonpatient care
services to patients, as well as sales and activities to persons other
than patients. It is derived in the course of operating the facility,
such as providing personal laundry service for patients, or from other
sources such as meals provided to persons other than patients, personal
telephones, gift shops, and vending machine commissions.
(4) "Nonoperating revenue" means income from activities not
relating directly to the day-to-day operations of an organization.
"Nonoperating revenue" includes such items as gains on disposal of a
facility's assets, dividends, and interest from security investments,
gifts, grants, and endowments.
(5) "Patient day" means a calendar day of care provided to a
nursing facility resident, excluding a medicare patient day. Patient
days include the day of admission and exclude the day of discharge;
except that, when admission and discharge occur on the same day, one
day of care shall be deemed to exist.
(6) "Medicare patient day" means a patient day for medicare
beneficiaries on a medicare Part A stay and a patient day for persons
who have opted for managed care coverage using their medicare benefit.
(7) "Nonexempt nursing facility" means a nursing facility that is
not exempt from the quality maintenance fee under section 4 of this
act.
(8) "Nursing facility" has the same meaning as the term is defined
in RCW 18.51.010; it does not include a boarding home as defined in RCW
18.20.020 or an adult family home as defined in RCW 70.128.010.
(9) "Nursing facility operator" means a person who engages in the
business of operating a nursing facility or facilities within this
state.
(10) "Nursing facility services" means health-related services to
individuals who do not require hospital care, but whose mental or
physical condition requires services that are above the level of room
and board and can be made available only through institutional
facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) In addition to any other tax, a quality
maintenance fee is imposed on every operator of a nonexempt nursing
facility in this state. The quality maintenance fee shall be six
dollars and fifty cents per patient day.
(2) Each operator of a nonexempt nursing facility shall file a
return with the department on a monthly basis. The return shall
include the following:
(a) The number of patient days for nonexempt nursing facilities
operated by that person in that month; and
(b) Remittance of the nonexempt nursing facility operator's quality
maintenance fee for that month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 All of chapter 82.32 RCW, except RCW
82.32.270, applies to the fee imposed by this chapter, in addition to
any other provisions of law for the payment and enforcement of the fee
imposed by this chapter. The department may adopt rules, in accordance
with chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to provide for the effective
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By July 1st of each year, each nursing
facility operator shall file a report with the department of social and
health services listing the patient days and the gross income for the
prior calendar year for each nursing facility that he or she operates.
(2) By August 1, 2003, the department of social and health services
shall submit for approval to the federal department of health and human
services a request for a waiver pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 433.68. The
waiver shall identify the nursing facilities that the department
proposes to exempt from the quality maintenance fee. Those facilities
shall include at least:
(a) Nursing facilities operated by any agency of the state of
Washington;
(b) Nursing facilities operated by a public hospital district; and
(c) As many nursing facilities with no or disproportionately low
numbers of medicaid-funded residents as, within the judgment of the
department, may be exempted from the fee pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 433.68.
(3) The department of social and health services shall notify the
department of revenue and the nursing facility operator of the nursing
facilities that would be exempted from the quality maintenance fee
pursuant to the waiver request submitted to the federal department of
health and human services. The nursing facilities included in the
waiver request may withhold payment of the fee pending final action by
the federal government on the request for waiver.
(4) If the request for waiver is approved, the department of social
and health services shall notify the department of revenue and the
nursing facility operator that no quality maintenance fee is due from
the facility. If the request for waiver is denied, nursing facility
operators who have withheld payment of the fee shall pay all such fees
as have been withheld. No interest or penalties shall be due upon such
withheld payments for the period during which final federal action was
pending.
(5) The department of social and health services shall take
whatever action is necessary to continue the waiver from the federal
government.
(6) The department of social and health services may adopt such
rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to provide
for effective administration of this section and section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of social and health services
shall prospectively add the medicaid cost of the quality maintenance
fee under section 2 of this act to the nursing facility component rate
allocation calculated after application of all other provisions of RCW
74.46.521.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Sections 1 through 5 of this act shall
expire on the effective date that federal medicaid matching funds are
substantially reduced or that a federal sanction is imposed due to the
quality maintenance fee under section 2 of this act, as such date is
certified by the secretary of social and health services.
(2) The expiration of sections 1 through 5 of this act shall not be
construed as affecting any existing right acquired or liability or
obligation incurred under those sections or under any rule or order
adopted under those sections, nor as affecting any proceeding
instituted under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Sections 1 through 3 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.
(2) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are each added to chapter 74.46
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---