BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.82.060 and 2001 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Planning conducted under this chapter must provide for a
process to allow the local citizens within a WRIA or multi-WRIA area to
join together in an effort to: (a) Assess the status of the water
resources of their WRIA or multi-WRIA area; and (b) determine how best
to manage the water resources of the WRIA or multi-WRIA area to balance
the competing resource demands for that area within the parameters
under RCW 90.82.120.
(2) Watershed planning under this chapter may be initiated for a
WRIA only with the concurrence of: (a) All counties within the WRIA;
(b) the largest city or town within the WRIA unless the WRIA does not
contain a city or town; and (c) the water supply utility obtaining the
largest quantity of water from the WRIA or, for a WRIA with lands
within the Columbia Basin project, the water supply utility obtaining
from the Columbia Basin project the largest quantity of water for the
WRIA. To apply for a grant for organizing the planning unit as
provided for under RCW 90.82.040(2)(a), these entities shall designate
the entity that will serve as the lead agency for the planning effort
and indicate how the planning unit will be staffed. For purposes of
this chapter, WRIA 40 shall be divided such that the portion of the
WRIA located entirely within the Stemilt and Squilchuck subbasins shall
be considered WRIA 40a and the remaining portion shall be considered
WRIA 40b. Planning may be conducted separately for WRIA 40a and 40b.
WRIA 40a shall be eligible for one-half of the funding available for a
single WRIA, and WRIA 40b shall be eligible for one-half of the funding
available for a single WRIA.
(3) Watershed planning under this chapter may be initiated for a
multi-WRIA area only with the concurrence of: (a) All counties within
the multi-WRIA area; (b) the largest city or town in each WRIA unless
the WRIA does not contain a city or town; and (c) the water supply
utility obtaining the largest quantity of water in each WRIA.
(4) If entities in subsection (2) or (3) of this section decide
jointly and unanimously to proceed, they shall invite all tribes with
reservation lands within the management area.
(5) The entities in subsection (2) or (3) of this section,
including the tribes if they affirmatively accept the invitation,
constitute the initiating governments for the purposes of this section.
(6) The organizing grant shall be used to organize the planning
unit and to determine the scope of the planning to be conducted. In
determining the scope of the planning activities, consideration shall
be given to all existing plans and related planning activities. The
scope of planning must include water quantity elements as provided in
RCW 90.82.070, and may include water quality elements as contained in
RCW 90.82.090, habitat elements as contained in RCW 90.82.100, and
instream flow elements as contained in RCW 90.82.080. The initiating
governments shall work with state government, other local governments
within the management area, and affected tribal governments, in
developing a planning process. The initiating governments may hold
public meetings as deemed necessary to develop a proposed scope of work
and a proposed composition of the planning unit. In developing a
proposed composition of the planning unit, the initiating governments
shall provide for representation of a wide range of water resource
interests.
(7) Each state agency with regulatory or other interests in the
WRIA or multi-WRIA area to be planned shall assist the local citizens
in the planning effort to the greatest extent practicable, recognizing
any fiscal limitations. In providing such technical assistance and to
facilitate representation on the planning unit, state agencies may
organize and agree upon their representation on the planning unit.
Such technical assistance must only be at the request of and to the
extent desired by the planning unit conducting such planning. The
number of state agency representatives on the planning unit shall be
determined by the initiating governments in consultation with the
governor's office.
(8) As used in this section, "lead agency" means the entity that
coordinates staff support of its own or of other local governments and
receives grants for developing a watershed plan.

--- END ---