BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.05.022 and 2002 c 56 s 302 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The legislature designates)) The following highways are of
statewide significance:
(1) That portion of state route number 509 that runs or will run
from state route number 518 in the north to the intersection with
Interstate 5 in the south ((as a state highway of statewide
significance));
(2) That portion of state route number 9 that runs from state route
number 522 to the Canadian border.

--- END ---