BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.55.060 and 1998 c 190 s 86 are each amended to read
as follows:
A dam or other obstruction across or in a bona fide stream shall be
provided with a durable and efficient fishway approved by the director.
Plans and specifications shall be provided to the department prior to
the director's approval. The fishway shall be maintained in an
effective condition and continuously supplied with sufficient water to
freely pass fish.
If a person fails to construct and maintain a fishway or to remove
the dam or obstruction in a manner satisfactory to the director, then
within thirty days after written notice to comply has been served upon
the owner, his or her agent, or the person in charge, the director may
construct a fishway or remove the dam or obstruction. Expenses
incurred by the department constitute the value of a lien upon the dam
and upon the personal property of the person owning the dam. Notice of
the lien shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county
auditor of the county in which the dam or obstruction is situated. The
lien may be foreclosed in an action brought in the name of the state.
If, within thirty days after notice to construct a fishway or
remove a dam or obstruction, the owner, his or her agent, or the person
in charge fails to do so, the dam or obstruction is a public nuisance
and the director may take possession of the dam or obstruction and
destroy it. No liability shall attach for the destruction.
This section shall not apply to installed drainage infrastructure
that was originally installed on or before the effective date of this
section or to the repair, improvement, or replacement of such drainage
infrastructure including dikes, drains, tide gates, flood gates, pumps,
drainage tiles, and drainage pipe that protects land for agricultural
uses unless these facilities are located on a bona fide stream. For
the purpose of this section, bona fide streams do not include drainage
ditches and installed drainage infrastructure.

--- END ---