BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall be responsible for any damage to public or
private property that results from a requirement the department imposed
as a condition on a hydraulic project approval issued under RCW
77.55.100 or other permit issued by the department, that changes the
operating characteristics of tide gates. A change in operating
characteristics includes but is not limited to: (a) Increasing the
elevation of the water surface behind the tide gate; (b) reducing the
reservoir capacity behind the tide gate; (c) decreasing the ability to
drain the area behind the tide gate; or (d) increasing the intrusion of
saltwater into the area above the tide gate.
(2) As used in this section, damage includes but is not limited to:
(a) Adversely affecting the operation of drain fields for septic
systems; (b) increasing the elevation of the water behind the tide gate
causing flooding, increased saturation of soil, or reduced drainage,
resulting in loss of production in the growing agricultural crops; (c)
increasing the intrusion of saltwater into areas above the tide gate
that increases the toxicity of soil and reduces soil productivity; or
(d) allowing an increase in the intrusion of saltwater adversely
affecting the use of ground or surface waters.
(3) Persons adversely affected by changes required by the
department to a tide gate shall notify in writing both the owner of the
tide gate and the department describing the damage that is occurring.
The department shall investigate all complaints received and respond
within thirty days of the receipt of the complaint. If the damage is
determined to be ongoing, the department shall either: (a) Immediately
require the return of the tide gate to its original operating
characteristics; or (b) enter into an agreement with all damaged
parties to compensate for the loss.
(4) If the department fails to take action within ninety days of
the submission of a written complaint, the person who claims to be
damaged as a result of requirements imposed by the department may file
a damage claim in the superior court in the county in which the
affected property is located and may petition the court for an order
nullifying the permit conditions that are causing the damage. The
superior court may require the department to compensate damaged parties
and to nullify permit conditions that are causing the damage. Any
payment for damages shall be from the current funds appropriated to the
division of the department that imposed the permit condition that
resulted in damage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---