BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.55.060 and 1998 c 190 s 86 are each amended to read
as follows:
A dam or other obstruction across or in a stream, including fish
barrier dams constructed at department facilities, shall be provided
with a durable and efficient fishway approved by the director. Plans
and specifications shall be provided to the department prior to the
director's approval. The fishway shall be maintained in an effective
condition and continuously supplied with sufficient water to freely
pass fish.
If a person fails to construct and maintain a fishway or to remove
the dam or obstruction in a manner satisfactory to the director, then
within thirty days after written notice to comply has been served upon
the owner, his or her agent, or the person in charge, the director may
construct a fishway or remove the dam or obstruction. Expenses
incurred by the department constitute the value of a lien upon the dam
and upon the personal property of the person owning the dam. Notice of
the lien shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county
auditor of the county in which the dam or obstruction is situated. The
lien may be foreclosed in an action brought in the name of the state.
If, within thirty days after notice to construct a fishway or
remove a dam or obstruction, the owner, his or her agent, or the person
in charge fails to do so, the dam or obstruction is a public nuisance
and the director may take possession of the dam or obstruction and
destroy it. No liability shall attach for the destruction.
By September 15, 2003, the department shall provide for an
operating fishway at the fish barrier dam located at the fish hatchery
on the Samish river. The fishway may be closed only during the period
of time that broodstock are being captured to fulfill the needs of the
hatchery. The department shall maintain a public record of the period
of time that the fishway is closed to upstream migrating anadromous
fish.
The department shall conduct an inventory of all barriers that
exist at fish hatcheries in the state that block access to natural
habitat to the upstream migration of anadromous fish. The inventory
shall include owner and operator of the hatchery, the number of stream
miles of natural habitat on the main stem and tributary streams that
are not accessible to upstream migrating anadromous fish, the months
that the blockage occurs, the species that exist in the river below the
barrier, and whether the species is listed as either a threatened or
endangered species. The inventory shall be submitted to the
legislature by December 1, 2003.

--- END ---