BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 85.38.180 and 1991 c 349 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
A special district may:
(1) Engage in flood control activities, and investigate, plan,
construct, acquire, repair, maintain, and operate improvements, works,
projects, and facilities necessary to prevent inundation or flooding
from rivers, streams, tidal waters or other waters. Such facilities
include dikes, levees, dams, banks, revetments, channels, canals,
drainage ditches, tide gates, and other works, appliances, machinery,
and equipment.
(2) Engage in drainage control, storm water control, and surface
water control activities, and investigate, plan, construct, acquire,
repair, maintain, and operate improvements, works, projects, and
facilities necessary to control and treat storm water, surface water,
and flood water. Such facilities include drains, drainage ditches,
tide gates, ditches, canals, nonsanitary sewers, pumps, and other
works, appliances, machinery, and equipment.
(3) Engage in lake or river restoration, aquatic plant control, and
water quality enhancement activities.
(4) Take actions necessary to protect life and property from
inundation or flow of flood waters, storm waters, or surface waters.
(5) Acquire, purchase, condemn by power of eminent domain pursuant
to chapters 8.08 and 8.25 RCW, or lease, in its own name, necessary
property, property rights, facilities, and equipment.
(6) Sell or exchange surplus property, property rights, facilities,
and equipment.
(7) Accept funds and property by loan, grant, gift, or otherwise
from the United States, the state of Washington, or any other public or
private source.
(8) Hire staff, employees, or services, or use voluntary labor.
(9) Sue and be sued.
(10) Cooperate with or join the United States, the state of
Washington, or any other public or private entity or person for
district purposes.
(11) Enter into contracts.
(12) Exercise any of the usual powers of a corporation for public
purposes.

--- END ---