BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary of
health, and (15) the director of financial institutions.
Such officers, except the secretary of transportation ((and the
director of fish and wildlife)), shall be appointed by the governor,
with the consent of the senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the
governor. The secretary of transportation shall be appointed by the
transportation commission as prescribed by RCW 47.01.041. ((The
director of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and
wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.))

Sec. 2 RCW 77.04.013 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The legislature supports the recommendations of the state fish and
wildlife commission with regard to the commission's responsibilities in
the merged department of fish and wildlife. It is the intent of the
legislature that, beginning July 1, 1996, the commission assume
regulatory authority for food fish and shellfish in addition to its
existing authority for game fish and wildlife. It is also the intent
of the legislature to provide to the commission the authority to review
and approve department agreements, to review and approve the
department's budget proposals, to adopt rules for the department, and
to select commission staff ((and the director of the department)).
The legislature finds that all fish, shellfish, and wildlife
species should be managed under a single comprehensive set of goals,
policies, and objectives, and that the decision-making authority should
rest with the fish and wildlife commission. The commission acts in an
open and deliberative process that encourages public involvement and
increases public confidence in department decision making.

--- END ---