BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.103 and 2002 c 68 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
State agencies shall comply with the local comprehensive plans and
development regulations and amendments thereto adopted pursuant to this
chapter except as otherwise provided in RCW 71.09.250 (1) through (3),
71.09.342, and 72.09.333. No county, city, local agency, or person may
be required to comply with any state environmental or land use
requirement imposed as a condition of plan or permit approval unless
such requirement or condition has first been implemented on state-owned
lands, facilities, or waters of reasonably similar nature, if any,
located within the same watershed.
The provisions of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess. do not
affect the state's authority to site any other essential public
facility under RCW 36.70A.200 in conformance with local comprehensive
plans and development regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter
((36.70A RCW)).

--- END ---