BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The policy-making entity is authorized to enter into agreements
with the commodity credit corporation of the United States department
of agriculture to implement a conservation reserve enhancement program
to assist in the restoration or enhancement of habitat for salmonids
that have been listed as threatened or endangered species under the
federal endangered species act and/or the improvement of water quality.
The program shall continue to be delivered by conservation districts
organized under this chapter.
The policy-making entity is encouraged to examine conservation
reserve enhancement programs offered in other states and to examine
studies conducted by other states on how to increase the rate of
participation in the program while reducing overall costs.
Among the alternatives that shall be offered in the state of
Washington, the policy-making entity shall include the national
standard for conservation practice 391, the riparian forest buffer, as
established by the federal natural resources conservation service.
In administering this program, the goal of the policy-making entity
shall be to maximize the number of miles of stream habitat that are
benefited by the program while minimizing the total number of acres of
agricultural land that are taken out of production. Additionally, the
policy-making entity shall examine how other states have incorporated
the option of a permanent easement that continues beyond the contract
period.
If sufficient funds are not appropriated to the policy-making
entity to meet the demand for the program, conservation districts may
apply for additional funding to the salmon recovery funding board.
The policy-making entity, in consultation with the governor, shall
be the sole contact person for the state of Washington with the United
States department of agriculture and members of congress in regards to
developing successful policies for implementation of the conservation
reserve enhancement program in the state of Washington.
For purposes of this section, the "policy-making entity" shall be
the lead state person or body now or hereafter designated under this
chapter to establish policy and oversee programs conducted under this
chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.065 and 2002 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The guidelines adopted by the department and master programs
developed or amended by local governments according to RCW 90.58.080
shall not require modification of or limit agricultural activities
occurring on agricultural lands. In jurisdictions where agricultural
activities occur, master programs developed or amended after June 13,
2002, shall include provisions addressing new agricultural activities
on land not meeting the definition of agricultural land, conversion of
agricultural lands to other uses, and development not meeting the
definition of agricultural activities. Nothing in this section limits
or changes the terms of the current exception to the definition of
substantial development in RCW 90.58.030(3)(e)(iv). This section
applies only to this chapter, and shall not affect any other authority
of local governments.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Agricultural activities" means agricultural uses and practices
including, but not limited to: Producing, breeding, or increasing
agricultural products; rotating and changing agricultural crops;
allowing land used for agricultural activities to lie fallow in which
it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land used for
agricultural activities to lie dormant as a result of adverse
agricultural market conditions; allowing land used for agricultural
activities to lie dormant because the land is enrolled in a local,
state, or federal conservation program, or the land is subject to a
conservation easement; enrolling and/or allowing land used for
agricultural activities to remain in a local, state, or federal
conservation program, such as the conservation reserve program or the
conservation reserve enhancement program, for the duration of the
contract and subsequent extensions; conducting agricultural operations;
maintaining, repairing, and replacing agricultural equipment;
maintaining, repairing, and replacing agricultural facilities, provided
that the replacement facility is no closer to the shoreline than the
original facility; and maintaining agricultural lands under production
or cultivation;
(b) "Agricultural products" includes but is not limited to
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, vegetable, fruit, berry,
grain, hops, hay, straw, turf, sod, seed, and apiary products; feed or
forage for livestock; Christmas trees; hybrid cottonwood and similar
hardwood trees grown as crops and harvested within twenty years of
planting; and livestock including both the animals themselves and
animal products including but not limited to meat, upland finfish,
poultry and poultry products, and dairy products;
(c) "Agricultural equipment" and "agricultural facilities"
includes, but is not limited to: (i) The following used in
agricultural operations: Equipment; machinery; constructed shelters,
buildings, and ponds; fences; upland finfish rearing facilities; water
diversion, withdrawal, conveyance, and use equipment and facilities
including but not limited to pumps, pipes, tapes, canals, ditches, and
drains; (ii) corridors and facilities for transporting personnel,
livestock, and equipment to, from, and within agricultural lands; (iii)
farm residences and associated equipment, lands, and facilities; and
(iv) roadside stands and on-farm markets for marketing fruit or
vegetables; and
(d) "Agricultural land" means those specific land areas on which
agriculture activities are conducted.
(3) The department and local governments shall assure that local
shoreline master programs use definitions consistent with the
definitions in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998 c 286 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, and each city within such county, shall adopt development
regulations on or before September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation
of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated under
RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection may not
prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption
and shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts development
regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure
that the use of lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral
resource lands shall not interfere with the continued use, in the
accustomed manner and in accordance with best management practices, of
these designated lands for the production of food, agricultural
products, or timber, or for the extraction of minerals. Counties and
cities shall require that all plats, short plats, development permits,
and building permits issued for development activities on, or within
five hundred feet of, lands designated as agricultural lands, forest
lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a notice that the subject
property is within or near designated agricultural lands, forest lands,
or mineral resource lands on which a variety of commercial activities
may occur that are not compatible with residential development for
certain periods of limited duration. The notice for mineral resource
lands shall also inform that an application might be made for mining-related activities, including mining, extraction, washing, crushing,
stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and recycling of minerals.
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) No county shall adopt development regulations under this
chapter that directly or indirectly preclude a person owning land from
being able to qualify for enrollment of a parcel or a portion of any
parcel in the conservation reserve enhancement program, or equivalent
program that provides for the restoration or enhancement of fish and
wildlife habitat and/or the improvement of water quality.
(4) Each county and city with agricultural lands designated under
RCW 36.70A.170 shall allow wineries, affiliated and ancillary tasting
rooms, and accessory uses as a permitted use acceptable and compatible
with other agricultural-related industries within all such agricultural
land designations. Such use may only be restricted in a manner
uniformly applied to all permitted uses in all agricultural zoning
classifications in each city and county.
(5) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(((4))) (6) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban
growth areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land
or agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.170 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) On or before September 1, 1991, each county, and each city,
shall designate where appropriate:
(a) Agricultural lands that are not already characterized by urban
growth and that have long-term significance for the commercial
production of food or other agricultural products;
(b) Forest lands that are not already characterized by urban growth
and that have long-term significance for the commercial production of
timber;
(c) Mineral resource lands that are not already characterized by
urban growth and that have long-term significance for the extraction of
minerals; and
(d) Critical areas.
(2) In making the designations required by this section, counties
and cities shall consider the guidelines established pursuant to RCW
36.70A.050.
(3) Enrolling land designated by a county as agricultural land of
long-term commercial significance and/or allowing such land to remain
in a local, state, or federal conservation program, such as the
conservation reserve program or the conservation reserve enhancement
program, for the duration of the contract and subsequent extensions
shall not be considered to be in violation of its designation as
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance. After
expiration of the contract and subsequent extensions, land enrolled in
such programs shall be allowed to return to its designated agricultural
use unless a permanent easement has been acquired.

--- END ---