BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.480 and 1995 c 347 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For shorelines of the state, the goals and policies of the
shoreline management act as set forth in RCW 90.58.020 are added as one
of the goals of this chapter as set forth in RCW 36.70A.020. The goals
and policies of a shoreline master program for a county or city
approved under chapter 90.58 RCW shall be considered an element of the
county or city's comprehensive plan. All other portions of the
shoreline master program for a county or city adopted under chapter
90.58 RCW, including use regulations, shall be considered a part of the
county or city's development regulations. Counties and cities shall
incorporate the provisions of RCW 90.58.065 into their development
regulations either at the next date the development regulations are
revised, or by the date for revision established in RCW 36.70A.130(4),
whichever occurs first.
(2) The shoreline master program shall be adopted pursuant to the
procedures of chapter 90.58 RCW rather than the procedures set forth in
this chapter for the adoption of a comprehensive plan or development
regulations.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.065 and 2002 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The guidelines adopted by the department and master programs
developed or amended by local governments according to RCW 90.58.080
shall not require modification of or limit agricultural activities
occurring on agricultural lands. In jurisdictions where agricultural
activities occur, master programs developed or amended after June 13,
2002, shall include provisions addressing new agricultural activities
on land not meeting the definition of agricultural land, conversion of
agricultural lands to other uses, and development not meeting the
definition of agricultural activities. Nothing in this section limits
or changes the terms of the current exception to the definition of
substantial development in RCW 90.58.030(3)(e)(iv). This section
applies only to this chapter and to regulations that shall be
considered as part of the county or city's regulations pursuant to
requirements of RCW 36.70A.480(1), ((and)) but shall not affect any
other authority of local governments.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Agricultural activities" means agricultural uses and practices
including, but not limited to: Producing, breeding, or increasing
agricultural products; rotating and changing agricultural crops;
allowing land used for agricultural activities to lie fallow in which
it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land used for
agricultural activities to lie dormant as a result of adverse
agricultural market conditions; allowing land used for agricultural
activities to lie dormant because the land is enrolled in a local,
state, or federal conservation program, or the land is subject to a
conservation easement; conducting agricultural operations; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural equipment; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural facilities, provided that the
replacement facility is no closer to the shoreline than the original
facility; and maintaining agricultural lands under production or
cultivation;
(b) "Agricultural products" includes but is not limited to
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, vegetable, fruit, berry,
grain, hops, hay, straw, turf, sod, seed, and apiary products; feed or
forage for livestock; Christmas trees; hybrid cottonwood and similar
hardwood trees grown as crops and harvested within twenty years of
planting; and livestock including both the animals themselves and
animal products including but not limited to meat, upland finfish,
poultry and poultry products, and dairy products;
(c) "Agricultural equipment" and "agricultural facilities"
includes, but is not limited to: (i) The following used in
agricultural operations: Equipment; machinery; constructed shelters,
buildings, and ponds; fences; upland finfish rearing facilities; water
diversion, withdrawal, conveyance, and use equipment and facilities
including but not limited to pumps, pipes, tapes, canals, ditches, and
drains; (ii) corridors and facilities for transporting personnel,
livestock, and equipment to, from, and within agricultural lands; (iii)
farm residences and associated equipment, lands, and facilities; and
(iv) roadside stands and on-farm markets for marketing fruit or
vegetables; and
(d) "Agricultural land" means those specific land areas on which
agriculture activities are conducted.
(3) The department and local governments shall assure that local
shoreline master programs use definitions consistent with the
definitions in this section. Local governments shall assure that
regulations adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW use definitions
consistent with the definitions in this section.

--- END ---