BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the scope and breadth of decisions by
the three growth management hearings boards and courts on appeal exceed
legislative intent for review of local growth management choices
resulting in erosion of the confidence of the public and of locally
elected officials in growth management planning. The legislature finds
that many decisions by growth management hearings boards, and superior
and appellate courts have not accorded adequate deference to planning
choices made by counties and cities. The legislature restates its
intention that implementation of the growth management act focus on
locally developed and locally implemented strategies including the
designation of natural resource and critical areas, rather than
planning based on decisions made at the state or regional level. The
purpose of this act is to reaffirm the validity of local decisions in
growth management planning and to clarify the role of the state and the
boards in the review and appeal of local plans and regulations.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.020 and 2002 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following goals are adopted to guide the development and
adoption of comprehensive plans and development regulations of those
counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040. The following goals are not listed in order of priority
and it is the responsibility of each county and city planning under
this chapter to determine how to prioritize and balance these goals.
The goals shall be used exclusively for the purpose of guiding the
development of comprehensive plans and development regulations:
(1) Urban growth. Encourage development in urban areas where
adequate public facilities and services exist or can be provided in an
efficient manner.
(2) Reduce sprawl. Reduce the inappropriate conversion of
undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density development.
(3) Transportation. Encourage efficient multimodal transportation
systems that are based on regional priorities and coordinated with
county and city comprehensive plans.
(4) Housing. Encourage the availability of affordable housing to
all economic segments of the population of this state, promote a
variety of residential densities and housing types, and encourage
preservation of existing housing stock.
(5) Economic development. Encourage economic development
throughout the state that is consistent with adopted comprehensive
plans, promote economic opportunity for all citizens of this state,
especially for unemployed and for disadvantaged persons, promote the
retention and expansion of existing businesses and recruitment of new
businesses, recognize regional differences impacting economic
development opportunities, and encourage growth in areas experiencing
insufficient economic growth, all within the capacities of the state's
natural resources, public services, and public facilities.
(6) Property rights. Private property shall not be taken for
public use without just compensation having been made. The property
rights of landowners shall be protected from arbitrary and
discriminatory actions.
(7) Permits. Applications for both state and local government
permits should be processed in a timely and fair manner to ensure
predictability.
(8) Natural resource industries. Maintain and enhance natural
resource-based industries, including productive timber, agricultural,
and fisheries industries. Encourage the conservation of productive
forest lands and productive agricultural lands, and discourage
incompatible uses.
(9) Open space and recreation. Retain open space, enhance
recreational opportunities, conserve fish and wildlife habitat,
increase access to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks
and recreation facilities.
(10) Environment. Protect the environment and enhance the state's
high quality of life, including air and water quality, and the
availability of water.
(11) Citizen participation and coordination. Encourage the
involvement of citizens in the planning process and ensure coordination
between communities and jurisdictions to reconcile conflicts.
(12) Public facilities and services. Ensure that those public
facilities and services necessary to support development shall be
adequate to serve the development at the time the development is
available for occupancy and use without decreasing current service
levels below locally established minimum standards.
(13) Historic preservation. Identify and encourage the
preservation of lands, sites, and structures, that have historical or
archaeological significance.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998 c 286 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, and each city within such county, shall adopt development
regulations on or before September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation
of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated under
RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection may not
prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption
and shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts development
regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure
that the use of lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral
resource lands shall not interfere with the continued use, in the
accustomed manner and in accordance with best management practices, of
these designated lands for the production of food, agricultural
products, or timber, or for the extraction of minerals. Counties and
cities shall require that all plats, short plats, development permits,
and building permits issued for development activities on, or within
five hundred feet of, lands designated as agricultural lands, forest
lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a notice that the subject
property is within or near designated agricultural lands, forest lands,
or mineral resource lands on which a variety of commercial activities
may occur that are not compatible with residential development for
certain periods of limited duration. The notice for mineral resource
lands shall also inform that an application might be made for mining-related activities, including mining, extraction, washing, crushing,
stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and recycling of minerals.
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) In adopting development regulations to protect natural resource
and critical areas, cities and counties have discretion to prioritize
and balance the requirements of this section. Deference shall be given
to the local decision-making process. Deference shall not be given to
state agency studies, guidelines, model ordinances, materials, or
planning guidance.
(5) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall include, pursuant to RCW 36.70A.060,
the best available science in the process of developing policies and
development regulations to protect the functions and values of critical
areas. In addition, pursuant to RCW 36.70A.060, counties and cities
shall give special consideration to conservation or protection measures
necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.
(2) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70A.320 and 1997 c 429 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section,
designations, comprehensive plans ((and)), development regulations,
other actions required under this chapter, and amendments thereto,
adopted under this chapter are presumed valid upon adoption.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (((4))) (5) of this
section, the burden is on the petitioner to demonstrate that any action
taken by a state agency, county, or city under this chapter is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
(3) In any petition under this chapter, the board, after full
consideration of the petition, shall determine whether there is
compliance with the requirements of this chapter. ((In making its
determination, the board shall consider the criteria adopted by the
department under RCW 36.70A.190(4).)) The board shall find compliance
unless it determines that the action by the state agency, county, or
city is ((clearly erroneous)) arbitrary and capricious in view of the
entire record before the board and in light of the goals and
requirements of this chapter.
(4) In recognition of the broad range of discretion that may be
exercised by counties and cities consistent with the requirements of
this chapter, the board and any reviewing court shall not substitute
its judgment for that of county or city elected officials regarding the
exercise of such authorized discretion. When determining whether a
comprehensive plan, designation, development regulation, or other
action required by this chapter is in compliance with the requirements
of this chapter, the board and reviewing courts shall find compliance
if the city or county's plan as a whole satisfies the goals of this
chapter. Further, the board and reviewing courts shall defer to
decisions by county and city elected officials on matters not
specifically addressed in this chapter.
(5) A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity made
under RCW 36.70A.300 or 36.70A.302 has the burden of demonstrating that
the ordinance or resolution it has enacted in response to the
determination of invalidity will no longer substantially interfere with
the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter under the standard in RCW
36.70A.302(1).
(((5))) (6) The shoreline element of a comprehensive plan and the
applicable development regulations adopted by a county or city shall
take effect as provided in chapter 90.58 RCW.

--- END ---