BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and
technical colleges may waive all or a portion of the tuition and
services and activities fees for children of tenured faculty and
children of full-time faculty with ten or more years of service at an
institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016. The
enrollment of these persons is subject to the following conditions:
(a) Such persons shall register for and be enrolled in courses on
a space-available basis and no new course sections shall be created as
a result of the registration;
(b) Enrollment information on persons registered under this section
shall be maintained separately from other enrollment information and
shall not be included in official enrollment reports, nor shall such
persons be considered in any enrollment statistics that would affect
budgetary determinations; and
(c) Persons registering on a space-available basis shall be charged
a registration fee of not less than five dollars.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "tenured faculty" means
persons employed at an institution of higher education, as defined in
RCW 28B.10.016, as an associate professor or professor, who holds his
or her position without discriminatory reduction of salary or loss of
position.
(3) In awarding waivers, an institution of higher education may
award waivers to eligible persons who are children of persons employed
by the institution before considering waivers for eligible persons who
are not children of persons employed by the institution.

--- END ---