BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.175 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission is
established to oversee the economic development strategies and policies
of the department of community, trade, and economic development.
(2) The Washington state economic development commission shall
consist of at least nine and no more than fifteen members appointed by
the governor, subject to confirmation of the senate. The governor
shall select the chair. The members serve at the pleasure of the
governor for four-year terms. The members shall represent the broad
geographic diversity of the state and reflect the state's various
business and labor sectors. Members of the commission shall serve
statewide interests while preserving their diverse perspectives, and
shall be recognized leaders in their fields with demonstrated
experience in disciplines related to economic development.
(3) The Washington state economic development commission shall
perform the following duties:
(a) Review and periodically update the state's economic development
strategy and performance measures, and perform an annual evaluation of
the strategy;
(b) Provide policy advice to the department of community, trade,
and economic development;
(c) Assist the department of community, trade, and economic
development with the procurement and deployment of private funds for
business development, recruitment, and promotion; and
(d) Provide planning and strategic and programmatic guidance to the
department of community, trade, and economic development, with specific
emphasis on the following:
(i) Development of strategies that promote business retention,
expansion, and creation within the state;
(ii) Development of marketing strategies for the global marketplace
that promote products and services of the state; and
(iii) Development of strategies to enhance relationships and
cooperation between local governments, economic development councils,
state agencies, and the legislature.
(4) Members of the Washington state economic development commission
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(5) Staffing for the Washington state economic development
commission shall be provided by the department of community, trade, and
economic development or other state agencies as appropriate, and within
existing resources and operations.
(6) Creation of the Washington state economic development
commission shall not be construed to modify any authority or budgetary
responsibility of the governor or the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.175.010 (Governor's small business improvement council--
Established -- Membership -- Travel expenses -- Staff support and
administrative assistance) and 1987 c 348 s 6, 1985 c 466 s 62, & 1984
c 282 s 7;
(2) RCW 43.175.020 (Duties) and 1998 c 245 s 53, 1987 c 348 s 7,
1985 c 466 s 63, & 1984 c 282 s 8; and
(3) RCW 43.175.901 (Severability -- 1984 c 282) and 1984 c 282 s 17.

--- END ---