BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.48.020 and 1997 c 324 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any employer, who knowingly misrepresents to the department
the amount of his or her payroll or employee hours upon which the
premium under this title is based, shall be liable to the state for up
to ten times the amount of the difference in premiums paid and the
amount the employer should have paid and for the reasonable expenses of
auditing his or her books and collecting such sums. Such liability may
be enforced in the name of the department.
(b) An employer is guilty of a class C felony, if:
(i) The employer, with intent to evade determination and payment of
the correct amount of the premiums, knowingly makes misrepresentations
regarding payroll or employee hours; or
(ii) The employer engages in employment covered under this title
and, with intent to evade determination and payment of the correct
amount of the premiums, knowingly fails to secure payment of
compensation under this title or knowingly fails to report the payroll
or employee hours related to that employment.
(c) Upon conviction under (b) of this subsection, the employer
shall be ordered by the court to pay the premium due and owing, a
penalty in the amount of one hundred percent of the premium due and
owing, and interest on the premium and penalty from the time the
premium was due until the date of payment. The court shall:
(i) Collect the premium and interest and transmit it to the
department of labor and industries; and
(ii) Collect the penalty and disburse it pro rata as follows: One-third to the investigative agencies involved; one-third to the
prosecuting authority; and one-third to the general fund of the county
in which the matter was prosecuted.
Payments collected under this subsection must be applied until
satisfaction of the obligation in the following order: Premium
payments; penalty; and interest.
(2)(a) Any person claiming benefits under this title, who knowingly
gives false information required in any claim or application under this
title ((shall be)) is guilty of a class C felony((, or gross
misdemeanor in accordance with the theft and anticipatory provisions of
Title 9A RCW)) unless (b) of this subsection applies.
(b) Any person claiming benefits under this title, who knowingly
gives false information required in any claim or application under this
title is guilty of a class B felony if the benefits received exceed by
one thousand dollars or more the lesser of the benefits actually due or
the benefits which, but for the false information, would have been
authorized.
(c) Upon conviction under either (a) or (b) of this subsection, in
addition to any other penalties imposed, the person shall be ordered by
the court to pay restitution to the entity from which the excess
benefits were received in the amount of the excess benefits received,
a penalty in the amount of one hundred percent of the excess benefits
received, and interest on the excess benefits and penalty from the time
the benefits were paid to the date the person repays the benefits and
penalty. The court shall:
(i) Collect the excess benefit payment and interest and transmit it
to the entity from which the excess benefits were received; and
(ii) Collect the penalty and disburse it pro rata as follows: One-third to the investigative agencies involved; one-third to the
prosecuting authority; and one-third to the general fund of the county
in which the matter was prosecuted.
(d) Payments collected under this subsection must be applied until
satisfaction of the obligation in the following order: Excess benefit
repayment; penalty; and interest.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.48.270 and 1987 c 470 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Any)) (1) A person, firm, corporation, partnership, association,
agency, institution, or other legal entity, but not including an
injured worker or beneficiary, ((that)) shall not:
(((1))) (a) Knowingly make((s)) or cause((s)) to be made any false
statement or representation of a material fact in any application for
any payment under this title; or
(((2))) (b) At any time knowingly make((s)) or cause((s)) to be
made any false statement or representation of a material fact for use
in determining rights to such payment, or knowingly ((falsifies))
falsify, conceal((s)), or cover((s)) up by any trick, scheme, or device
a material fact in connection with such application or payment; or
(((3))) (c) Having knowledge of the occurrence of any event
affecting (((a))) (i) the initial or continued right to any payment, or
(((b))) (ii) the initial or continued right to any such payment of any
other individual in whose behalf he or she has applied for or is
receiving such payment, conceal((s)) or fail((s)) to disclose such
event with an intent fraudulently to secure such payment either in a
greater amount or quantity than is due or when no such payment is
authorized((;
shall be guilty of a class C felony: PROVIDED, That the fine, if
imposed, shall not be in an amount more than twenty-five thousand
dollars, except as authorized by RCW 9A.20.030)).
(2)(a) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section is
guilty of a class C felony unless (b) of this subsection applies.
(b) If one or more false statements, representations, concealments,
or failures to disclose made in violation of subsection (1) of this
section result in payments that exceed by one thousand dollars or more
the lesser of payments that are actually due or the payments which, but
for the false information, would have been authorized, any person
responsible for any such statement, representation, concealment, or
failure is guilty of a class B felony.
(3)(a) Upon conviction under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this
section, in addition to any other penalties imposed, the person shall
be ordered by the court to pay restitution to the entity from which the
excess payments were received in the amount of the excess payments
received, a penalty in the amount of one hundred percent of the excess
payments received, and interest on the excess payments and penalty from
the time the payments were made to the date the person repays the
payments and penalty. The court shall:
(i) Collect the excess payment and interest and transmit it to the
entity from which the excess payments were received; and
(ii) Collect the penalty and disburse it pro rata as follows: One-third to the investigative agencies involved; one-third to the
prosecuting authority; and one-third to the general fund of the county
in which the matter was prosecuted.
(b) Payments collected under this subsection must be applied until
satisfaction of the obligation in the following order: Excess payment
repayment; penalty; and interest.

--- END ---