BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall carry out a program to fund family development
accounts established for eligible low-income wage earners.
(1) A family development account may be established by or on behalf
of an eligible low-income wage earner for the purpose of enabling the
recipient to accumulate funds for a qualified purpose described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A qualified purpose as described in this subsection is one or
more of the following, as provided by the qualified entity providing
assistance to the low-income wage earner:
(a) Postsecondary expenses paid from a family development account
directly to an eligible educational institution;
(b) Qualified acquisition costs with respect to a qualified
principal residence for a qualified first-time home buyer, if paid from
a family development account directly to the persons to whom the
amounts are due;
(c) Amounts paid from a family development account directly to a
business capitalization account which is established in a federally
insured financial institution and is restricted to use solely for
qualified business capitalization expenses.
(3) An eligible low-income wage earner may only contribute to a
family development account amounts derived from earned income, as
defined in section 911(d)(2) of the internal revenue code of 1986.
(4) The department shall establish rules to ensure funds held in a
family development account are only withdrawn for a qualified purpose
as provided in this section.
(5) A family development account established under this section
shall be a trust created or organized in the United States and funded
through periodic contributions by the establishing eligible working-poor individual and matched by or through a qualified entity for a
qualified purpose as provided in this section.
(6) The department shall adopt rules authorizing the use of
organizations using microcredit and microenterprise approaches to
assisting working-poor individuals to become financially self-sufficient.
(7) The department shall adopt rules implementing the use of family
development accounts by eligible low-income wage earners.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an
entitlement to matching moneys.
(9) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible educational institution," "postsecondary educational
expenses," "qualified acquisition costs," "qualified business,"
"qualified business capitalization expenses," "qualified expenditures,"
"qualified first-time home buyer," "date of acquisition," "qualified
plan," and "qualified principal residence" have the same meaning as
provided for them in P.L. 104-193.
(b) "Low-income wage earner" means a person whose adjusted income
is less than eighty percent of the median family income, adjusted for
household size, for the county or metropolitan statistical area where
they reside.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the general fund to the department
of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of this
act.

--- END ---