BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that in order to
enhance income and employment opportunities for all residents, the
state's economic development programs must:
(a) Make strategic targeted investment of limited resources in
order to have meaningful impact;
(b) Invest public resources in those efforts that offer the
greatest return to the region or local community; and
(c) Promote strong public and private partnerships that enhance the
capacity for successful regional or local economic development.
(2) It is the goal of this chapter to provide financial resources
for a limited time to assist local governments in the financing of
public infrastructure improvements that are needed to:
(a) Encourage private development of selected areas;
(b) Prevent or arrest the decay of selected areas due to the
inability of existing financing methods to provide needed public
infrastructure improvements; and
(c) Encourage private investment designed to promote and facilitate
the orderly redevelopment of selected areas.

PART I--COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION FINANCING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Apportionment district" means the geographic area from which
taxes are to be appropriated to finance a community revitalization
project.
(2) "Taxes" means excise taxes.
(3) "Excise taxes" means:
(a) Retail sales tax levied under chapter 82.08 RCW;
(b) Use tax levied under chapter 82.12 RCW; or
(c) Local retail sales and use taxes levied under RCW 82.14.030.
"Excise taxes" do not include sales and use taxes levied under RCW
82.14.340 and 82.14.350.
(4) "Local government" means any city or town located in a county
with population densities greater than one hundred and one persons per
square mile as determined by the office financial management and
published each year by the department of revenue for the period July
1st to June 30th.
(5) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(6) "Project agreement" means an agreement between an owner and a
municipality authorized under this chapter.
(7) "Sponsor" means a local government initiating and undertaking
a community revitalization project.
(8) "Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues allocated to
a sponsor under this chapter.
(9) "Taxing district" means a governmental entity that levies a tax
that is collected within a proposed or approved apportionment district.
(10) "Community revitalization project" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the apportionment district
that include, but are not limited to:
(i) Street and road construction and maintenance;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(iii) Sidewalks and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Public transportation facilities; and
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas;
(b) Health and safety improvements authorized to be publicly
financed under chapter 35.80 or 35.81 RCW;
(c) Publicly owned or leased facilities within the jurisdiction of
a local government which the sponsor has authority to provide; and
(d) Expenditure for any of the following purposes:
(i) Providing environmental analysis, professional management,
planning, and promotion within the apportionment district, including
the management and promotion of retail trade activities in the
apportionment district;
(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas
in the apportionment district; or
(iii) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395.
(11) "Community revitalization project costs" means: The costs of
land use planning and associated environmental analysis, project design
and planning, acquisition, site preparation, construction,
reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, operation, and
installation of the community revitalization project; the costs of
relocation, maintenance, and operation of property pending construction
of the community revitalization project; the costs of financing,
including interest during construction, legal and other professional
services, taxes, and insurance; the costs of apportioning the taxes and
complying with this chapter and other applicable law; and the
administrative costs reasonably necessary and related to these costs.
(12) "Community revitalization project ordinance" means the
ordinance passed under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The use of tax revenues to finance community
revitalization projects is subject to the following limitations:
(1) Regardless of the total number of community revitalization
projects approved by a local government, the aggregate total of revenue
available from the state for apportionment as the state's contribution
to an individual local government must not exceed five million dollars
annually. All revenue in excess of five million dollars in any given
year must be distributed to the appropriate taxing district as though
an apportionment district had not been created;
(2) Regardless of the number of community revitalization projects
approved by local governments, the aggregate total of revenue available
from the state for apportionment as the state's contribution is
annually limited to two-tenths of one percent of the state general fund
annual budget;
(3) An apportionment district may not be established that includes
a geographic area included within a previously established
apportionment district that has outstanding bonds payable in whole or
in part from tax revenues under this chapter or section 12 of this act;
and
(4) Only one of the following taxes may be appropriated under this
chapter:
(a) The local retail sales and use tax authorized under section 12
of this act; or
(b) The incremental increase in excise taxes in an apportionment
district approved under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) A community revitalization project
may be undertaken and coordinated with other programs or efforts
undertaken by the sponsor or others and may be funded in whole or in
part from sources other than those provided by this chapter.
(b) The sponsor shall assume all risk if sources authorized by this
chapter are not adequate to fund the community revitalization project.
(2) A sponsor may contract with a nonprofit business association
operating within the boundaries of the apportionment district or a
parking and business improvement area, created under chapter 35.87A
RCW, to administer the community revitalization project. The
administration of the community revitalization project must comply with
all applicable provisions of federal, state, or local law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In order to establish an apportionment
district and secure an allocation of excise taxes to finance a
community revitalization project:
(1) A sponsor shall propose by ordinance a plan for the community
revitalization project that includes a description of the contemplated
community revitalization project, the estimated cost of the community
revitalization project, the boundaries of the apportionment district,
the estimated period during which tax revenue apportionment is
contemplated, the specific tax to be appropriated as required in
section 3(4) of this act, and ways in which the sponsor plans to use
tax allocation revenues to finance the community revitalization
project.
(2)(a) At least sixty days in advance of a public hearing at which
the ordinance creating the apportionment district is first considered,
the local government shall deliver notice of the hearing and the
information required in subsection (1) of this section to the
department of community, trade, and economic development and the
department of revenue. The department of revenue shall review the
information and determine whether there is sufficient revenue under the
revenue apportionment cap in section 3 of this act to accommodate the
proposed community revitalization project.
(b) No tax revenue generated from an apportionment district created
under this chapter or section 12 of this act may be used to finance a
community revitalization project until the department of community,
trade, and economic development, or a successor department, has
reviewed and approved a feasibility study paid for and submitted to the
department by the sponsor. The department's review process shall
include the following criteria:
(i) The community revitalization project meets the requirements of
this chapter; and
(ii) The feasibility study demonstrates that:
(A) There is a reasonable likelihood that the present value return
to the various taxing districts is in excess of forgone tax revenue as
a result of the community revitalization project, using a discounted
rate equal to the then current state borrowing rate;
(B) The community revitalization project is not feasible without
the tax revenue generated from the apportionment district;
(C) The expected tax revenue generated from the apportionment
district is likely to be sufficient to finance that portion of the
public sources necessary to finance the community revitalization
project;
(D) The community revitalization project will reasonably be
expected to cause private investment within the apportionment district
that probably would not have occurred without financing of the
community revitalization project;
(E) The community revitalization project will result in a net
increase in employment within the apportionment district; and
(F) There is sufficient management capacity and expertise of the
organization responsible for the management of the community
revitalization project; and
(iii) Other factors the department deems necessary to safeguard the
state's contribution of tax revenue into the community revitalization
project.
(3) The department of revenue and the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall notify the sponsoring local
government, and either the county legislative authority or, in a
charter county, the county executive, of the results of the evaluation
of the project at least fifteen days in advance of the public hearing
required in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) If there are more projects proposed than apportioned revenue is
available in a given year under the limit in section 3 of this act, the
department of community, trade, and economic development shall
establish rules to determine how the available revenue will be
allocated among qualified projects.
(5) At the time and place fixed for the hearing under subsection
(2) of this section, and at such times the hearing may be adjourned, a
sponsor shall receive and consider all statements and materials as
might be submitted, and objections and letters filed before and within
ten days after the hearing. Any time during the process leading to the
establishment of the apportionment district, the county legislative
authority may notify the sponsor that it does not wish to participate
in the district, and upon such notification all taxes due the county
from the apportionment district shall remain the county's and may not
be used for the community revitalization project without separate
county approval.
(6) Within one hundred twenty days after completion of the public
hearing, a sponsor shall pass an ordinance establishing the
apportionment district and authorizing the proposed community
revitalization project, including any modifications that in the
sponsor's opinion the hearing indicated should be made, that includes
the boundaries of the apportionment district, a description of the
community revitalization project, the estimated cost of the community
revitalization project, the method used to finance the state's portion
of the community revitalization project under section 3 of this act,
the portion of the estimated cost of the community revitalization
project to be paid from tax allocation revenues, the estimated time
during which the taxes are to be apportioned, the date when the
apportionment of taxes is to commence, and a finding that the community
revitalization project meets the conditions in section 3 of this act
and this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of
this section, upon the date established in the community revitalization
project ordinance, but not sooner than the first day of the calendar
year following the passage of the ordinance, the department shall
allocate and pay to the sponsor, or the sponsor's designated agent,
until all community revitalization project costs to be paid from the
tax allocation revenues have been paid, the following amounts:
(a) That portion of the tax levied in each year under chapter 82.08
or 82.12 RCW upon any retail sale or any use of an article of tangible
personal property within an apportionment district that is in excess of
the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW on sales or uses
within the apportionment district in the year preceding the formation
of the apportionment district;
(b) That portion of the tax levied in each year under RCW 82.14.030
upon any retail sale or any use of an article of tangible personal
property within an apportionment district that is in excess of the tax
imposed under RCW 82.14.030 on sales or uses within the apportionment
district in the year preceding the formation of the apportionment
district, less any amounts that the department is entitled to retain as
provided in RCW 82.14.050 for administration and collection expenses
incurred by the department.
(2) The date upon which the apportionment district was established
is considered the date that the community revitalization project
ordinance was enacted by the sponsor.
(3) The apportionment of taxes under this section must cease when
the tax allocation revenues are no longer necessary or obligated to pay
community revitalization project costs or to pay principal and interest
on bonds issued to finance community revitalization project costs to
which tax allocation revenues are pledged. At the time of termination
of the apportionment, any excess money and any earnings held by the
sponsor must be distributed to the taxing districts that were subject
to the allocation in proportion to their tax receipts due for the year
in which the funds are returned.
(4) The amount of taxes determined to be collected in the year
preceding the formation of the apportionment district shall be adjusted
upward or downward to reflect increases or decreases in the rate of
taxation to determine the amount of excess taxes to be apportioned in
accordance with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(5) The sponsor may agree to receive less than the full amount
provided in subsection (1) of this section, in which case the
department shall distribute the balance to the respective taxing
districts in accordance with law in the same manner as if this section
did not exist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Tax allocation revenues may be applied
as follows:
(a) To pay community revitalization costs;
(b) To pay into bond redemption funds established to pay the
principal and interest on general obligation bonds issued to finance a
community revitalization project that is specified in the community
revitalization project ordinance and constructed following the
establishment of the apportionment district; or
(c) To pay any combination of (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(2) Tax allocation revenues may be pledged to the payment of bonds
issued to finance a community revitalization project.
(3) No city may lower their tax rates after the creation of an
apportionment district and using tax allocation revenues to finance a
community revitalization project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department of community, trade, and
economic development, in consultation with the department of revenue,
shall submit an annual report to appropriate legislative committees on
the amount of tax revenue allocated to local governments under the
community revitalization financing program created in this act. The
report shall also contain information on: (1) The number, description,
and location of requests for community revitalization projects, (2) the
number of community revitalization projects approved by the department,
and (3) an evaluation of how the community revitalization project is
meeting criteria of the feasibility study required in section 5 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This chapter supplements and neither
restricts nor limits any powers that the state or any municipal
corporation might otherwise have under laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The authority to establish an apportionment
district under this chapter expires July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This chapter may be known and cited as the
community revitalization financing act.

PART II--SALES AND USE TAX DEDUCTION FOR
COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION PROJECTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative authority of a city located in a county with
population densities between one hundred and one and three hundred and
ninety-nine may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with terms of
this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law
and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the city. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033 percent
of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax.
(b) The legislative authority of a city located in a county with
population densities between four hundred and six hundred and ninety-nine may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of
this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law
and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the city. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.025 percent
of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax.
(c) The legislative authority of a city located in a county with
population densities greater than seven hundred may impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the city.
The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.017 percent of the selling price in
the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a
use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of the
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(3) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used in
accordance with chapter 82.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act).
Only those community revitalization projects approved under section 5
of this act may be financed with moneys collected under this section.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 2004.
No tax may be collected under this section by a city more than twenty-five years after the date that a tax is first imposed under this
section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "population density" means the
number of persons per square mile as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department of
community, trade, and economic development for the period July 1st to
June 30th.

PART III--MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 13 RCW 35.87A.010 and 2000 c 201 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
To aid general economic development and neighborhood
revitalization, and to facilitate the cooperation of merchants,
businesses, and residential property owners which assists trade,
economic viability, and liveability, the legislature hereby authorizes
all counties and all incorporated cities and towns, including
unclassified cities and towns operating under special charters:
(1) To establish, after a petition submitted by the operators
responsible for sixty percent of the assessments by businesses and
multifamily residential or mixed-use projects within the area, parking
and business improvement areas, hereafter referred to as area or areas,
for the following purposes:
(a) The acquisition, construction or maintenance of parking
facilities for the benefit of the area;
(b) Decoration of any public place in the area;
(c) Sponsorship or promotion of public events which are to take
place on or in public places in the area;
(d) Furnishing of music in any public place in the area;
(e) Providing professional management, planning, and promotion for
the area, including the management and promotion of retail trade
activities in the area; or
(f) Providing maintenance and security for common, public areas.
(2) To levy special assessments on all businesses and multifamily
residential or mixed-use projects within the area and specially
benefited by a parking and business improvement area to pay in whole or
in part the damages or costs incurred therein as provided in this
chapter.
(3) To enter into agreements with a legislative authority to
administer community revitalization projects within an apportionment
district established under sections 1 through 11 of this act.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.14.050 and 2002 c 56 s 406 are each amended to
read as follows:
The counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW
82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57
RCW, and regional transportation investment districts shall contract,
prior to the effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a
sales and use tax, the administration and collection to the state
department of revenue, which shall deduct a percentage amount, as
provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected
for administration and collection expenses incurred by the department.
Except as provided in section 6 of this act, the remainder of any
portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is collected by the
department of revenue shall be deposited by the state department of
revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the local sales and use tax account may be
spent only for distribution to counties, cities, transportation
authorities, public facilities districts, and regional transportation
investment districts imposing a sales and use tax. All administrative
provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now
exist or may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as they are
applicable to state sales and use taxes, be applicable to taxes imposed
pursuant to this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all
earnings of investments of balances in the local sales and use tax
account shall be credited to the local sales and use tax account and
distributed to the counties, cities, transportation authorities, public
facilities districts, and regional transportation investment districts
monthly.

Sec. 15 RCW 35.80.030 and 1989 c 133 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the local governing body of a municipality finds that
one or more conditions of the character described in RCW 35.80.010
exist within its territorial limits, said governing body may adopt
ordinances relating to such dwellings, buildings, structures, or
premises. Such ordinances may provide for the following:
(a) That an "improvement board" or officer be designated or
appointed to exercise the powers assigned to such board or officer by
the ordinance as specified herein. Said board or officer may be an
existing municipal board or officer in the municipality, or may be a
separate board or officer appointed solely for the purpose of
exercising the powers assigned by said ordinance.
If a board is created, the ordinance shall specify the terms,
method of appointment, and type of membership of said board, which may
be limited, if the local governing body chooses, to public officers as
herein defined.
(b) If a board is created, a public officer, other than a member of
the improvement board, may be designated to work with the board and
carry out the duties and exercise the powers assigned to said public
officer by the ordinance.
(c) That if, after a preliminary investigation of any dwelling,
building, structure, or premises, the board or officer finds that it is
unfit for human habitation or other use, he shall cause to be served
either personally or by certified mail, with return receipt requested,
upon all persons having any interest therein, as shown upon the records
of the auditor's office of the county in which such property is
located, and shall post in a conspicuous place on such property, a
complaint stating in what respects such dwelling, building, structure,
or premises is unfit for human habitation or other use. If the
whereabouts of any of such persons is unknown and the same cannot be
ascertained by the board or officer in the exercise of reasonable
diligence, and the board or officer makes an affidavit to that effect,
then the serving of such complaint or order upon such persons may be
made either by personal service or by mailing a copy of the complaint
and order by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested,
to each such person at the address of the building involved in the
proceedings, and mailing a copy of the complaint and order by first
class mail to any address of each such person in the records of the
county assessor or the county auditor for the county where the property
is located. Such complaint shall contain a notice that a hearing will
be held before the board or officer, at a place therein fixed, not less
than ten days nor more than thirty days after the serving of said
complaint; and that all parties in interest shall be given the right to
file an answer to the complaint, to appear in person, or otherwise, and
to give testimony at the time and place in the complaint. The rules of
evidence prevailing in courts of law or equity shall not be controlling
in hearings before the board or officer. A copy of such complaint
shall also be filed with the auditor of the county in which the
dwelling, building, structure, or ((premise [premises])) premises is
located, and such filing of the complaint or order shall have the same
force and effect as other lis pendens notices provided by law.
(d) That the board or officer may determine that a dwelling,
building, structure, or premises is unfit for human habitation or other
use if it finds that conditions exist in such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises which are dangerous or injurious to the health
or safety of the occupants of such dwelling, building, structure, or
premises, the occupants of neighboring dwellings, or other residents of
such municipality. Such conditions may include the following, without
limitations: Defects therein increasing the hazards of fire or
accident; inadequate ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities,
dilapidation, disrepair, structural defects, uncleanliness,
overcrowding, or inadequate drainage. The ordinance shall state
reasonable and minimum standards covering such conditions, including
those contained in ordinances adopted in accordance with
((subdivision)) subsection (7)(a) ((herein)) of this section, to guide
the board or the public officer and the agents and employees of either,
in determining the fitness of a dwelling for human habitation, or
building, structure, or premises for other use.
(e) That the determination of whether a dwelling, building,
structure, or premises should be repaired or demolished, shall be based
on specific stated standards on (i) the degree of structural
deterioration of the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, or
(ii) the relationship that the estimated cost of repair bears to the
value of the dwelling, building, structure, or premises, with the
method of determining this value to be specified in the ordinance.
(f) That if, after the required hearing, the board or officer
determines that the dwelling is unfit for human habitation, or building
or structure or premises is unfit for other use, it shall state in
writing its findings of fact in support of such determination, and
shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner or party in interest
thereof, as is provided in ((subdivision (1)))(c) of this subsection,
and shall post in a conspicuous place on said property, an order which
(i) requires the owner or party in interest, within the time specified
in the order, to repair, alter, or improve such dwelling, building,
structure, or premises to render it fit for human habitation, or for
other use, or to vacate and close the dwelling, building, structure, or
premises, if such course of action is deemed proper on the basis of the
standards set forth as required in ((subdivision (1)))(e) of this
subsection; or (ii) requires the owner or party in interest, within the
time specified in the order, to remove or demolish such dwelling,
building, structure, or premises, if this course of action is deemed
proper on the basis of said standards. If no appeal is filed, a copy
of such order shall be filed with the auditor of the county in which
the dwelling, building, structure, or premises is located.
(g) The owner or any party in interest, within thirty days from the
date of service upon the owner and posting of an order issued by the
board under the provisions of ((subdivision)) (c) of this subsection,
may file an appeal with the appeals commission.
The local governing body of the municipality shall designate or
establish a municipal agency to serve as the appeals commission. The
local governing body shall also establish rules of procedure adequate
to assure a prompt and thorough review of matters submitted to the
appeals commission, and such rules of procedure shall include the
following, without being limited thereto: (i) All matters submitted to
the appeals commission must be resolved by the commission within sixty
days from the date of filing therewith and (ii) a transcript of the
findings of fact of the appeals commission shall be made available to
the owner or other party in interest upon demand.
The findings and orders of the appeals commission shall be reported
in the same manner and shall bear the same legal consequences as if
issued by the board, and shall be subject to review only in the manner
and to the extent provided in ((subdivision)) subsection (2) of this
section.
If the owner or party in interest, following exhaustion of his
rights to appeal, fails to comply with the final order to repair,
alter, improve, vacate, close, remove, or demolish the dwelling,
building, structure, or premises, the board or officer may direct or
cause such dwelling, building, structure, or premises to be repaired,
altered, improved, vacated, and closed, removed, or demolished.
(h) That the amount of the cost of such repairs, alterations or
improvements; or vacating and closing; or removal or demolition by the
board or officer, shall be assessed against the real property upon
which such cost was incurred unless such amount is previously paid.
Upon certification to him by the treasurer of the municipality in cases
arising out of the city or town or by the county improvement board or
officer, in cases arising out of the county, of the assessment amount
being due and owing, the county treasurer shall enter the amount of
such assessment upon the tax rolls against the property for the current
year and the same shall become a part of the general taxes for that
year to be collected at the same time and with interest at such rates
and in such manner as provided for in RCW 84.56.020, as now or
hereafter amended, for delinquent taxes, and when collected to be
deposited to the credit of the general fund of the municipality. If
the dwelling, building, structure, or premises is removed or demolished
by the board or officer, the board or officer shall, if possible, sell
the materials of such dwelling, building, structure, (([or])) or
premises in accordance with procedures set forth in said ordinance, and
shall credit the proceeds of such sale against the cost of the removal
or demolition and if there be any balance remaining, it shall be paid
to the parties entitled thereto, as determined by the board or officer,
after deducting the costs incident thereto.
The assessment shall constitute a lien against the property which
shall be of equal rank with state, county, and municipal taxes and
shall have a first priority and shall be paid before the payment of
other state, county, and municipal taxes from any tax payments
collected or the proceeds of any sale of the property through
foreclosure or sale by the county including, but not limited to, the
proceeds of sales of any property acquired by the county by tax deed.
(2) Any person affected by an order issued by the appeals
commission pursuant to ((subdivision)) subsection (1)(f) ((hereof)) of
this section may, within thirty days after the posting and service of
the order, petition to the superior court for an injunction restraining
the public officer or members of the board from carrying out the
provisions of the order. In all such proceedings the court is
authorized to affirm, reverse, or modify the order and such trial shall
be heard de novo.
(3) An ordinance adopted by the local governing body of the
municipality may authorize the board or officer to exercise such powers
as may be necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the
purposes and provisions of this section. These powers shall include
the following in addition to others herein granted: (a)(i) To
determine which dwellings within the municipality are unfit for human
habitation; (ii) to determine which buildings, structures, or premises
are unfit for other use; (b) to administer oaths and affirmations,
examine witnesses and receive evidence; and (c) to investigate the
dwelling and other property conditions in the municipality or county
and to enter upon premises for the purpose of making examinations when
the board or officer has reasonable ground for believing they are unfit
for human habitation, or for other use: PROVIDED, That such entries
shall be made in such manner as to cause the least possible
inconvenience to the persons in possession, and to obtain an order for
this purpose after submitting evidence in support of an application
which is adequate to justify such an order from a court of competent
jurisdiction in the event entry is denied or resisted.
(4) The local governing body of any municipality adopting an
ordinance pursuant to this chapter may appropriate the necessary funds
to administer such ordinance.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or
impair the powers of the courts or of any department of any
municipality to enforce any provisions of its charter or its ordinances
or regulations, nor to prevent or punish violations thereof; and the
powers conferred by this section shall be in addition and supplemental
to the powers conferred by any other law.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or limit
in any way the power of the municipality to define and declare
nuisances and to cause their removal or abatement, by summary
proceedings or otherwise.
(7) Any municipality may (by ordinance adopted by its governing
body) (a) prescribe minimum standards for the use and occupancy of
dwellings throughout the municipality, or county, (b) prescribe minimum
standards for the use or occupancy of any building, structure, or
premises used for any other purpose, (c) prevent the use or occupancy
of any dwelling, building, structure, or premises, which is injurious
to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare, and (d) prescribe
punishment for the violation of any provision of such ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 35.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The municipality, as an alternative or additional remedy, may
acquire by negotiation the substandard building, structure, or premises
and the land on which it is located, and after the acquisition may
utilize public or other available funds to improve the property
acquired and the property may be used or transferred, as authorized
under chapter 35.80A RCW, as if the property were acquired under RCW
35.80A.010, if the owner or the owner's representative notifies the
municipality in writing that the owner refuses or is unable to proceed
or fails to: (a) Repair, alter, or improve a substandard building,
structure, or premises; or (b) remove or demolish a substandard
building, structure, or premises as required by the order of the board
or officer under RCW 35.80.030.
(2) If the substandard building to be acquired is part of a
community revitalization project, the municipality may acquire property
adjacent to the substandard building, as necessary to provide for the
implementation of the approved community revitalization project, upon
a finding by resolution of the local governing body that the
acquisition is necessary in order to cure the problems associated with
the substandard building or buildings, and that redevelopment of the
site is not feasible unless the adjacent property is acquired. This
subsection provides supplemental and alternative authority for
acquisition of property by a municipality.
(3)(a) If the owner of a substandard building presents evidence
satisfactory to the municipality that the owner does not have available
sufficient funds or is unable to obtain financing on reasonable terms
to repair, alter, or improve a substandard building as required by the
order of the board or officer, under RCW 35.80.030, and in a manner
that will place the substandard building in a condition that will cure
the functional obsolescence of the building for its intended use, then
the municipality may, through its local governing body, approve a
project agreement with the owner that may provide for:
(i) Repair, alterations, and improvement of the substandard
building so as to comply with the order of the board or officer, under
RCW 35.80.030, and with the terms and conditions of the project
agreement;
(ii) The manner in which work under the project agreement will be
accomplished and how payment will be made, that may include, but is not
limited to, work let by the municipality and payment by the
municipality for work completed on the substandard building in
accordance with the project agreement; and
(iii) Repayment by the owner of the costs incurred by the
municipality under the project agreement which repayment may be made in
installments with interest on the unpaid portion as fixed by the local
legislative body or paid in such other manner as may be provided in the
project agreement.
(b) If not otherwise provided in the project agreement, the amount
of costs incurred by the municipality in accordance with the project
agreement must be treated as if it were an assessment on an approved
final assessment roll for improvements constructed within a local
improvement district, under chapter 35.44 RCW, and the costs shall be
a lien on the property improved, in the same manner and to the same
extent as a local improvement district assessment lien, and shall be
collected in the same manner as assessments, installment payments,
interest, and penalties are collected under chapter 35.49 RCW.
(c) The project agreement may provide that the lien for the
repayment of all or a portion of the costs incurred by the municipality
under the project agreement may be subordinated to a deed of trust
securing the loan of private funds to the owner for payment of project
costs incurred by the owner under the project agreement.
(4) The municipality or a public corporation created by a
municipality under RCW 35.21.660 or 35.21.730 may provide for the
payment of the costs and expenses incurred by the municipality under a
project agreement by revenue or general obligation bonds or notes
payable in whole or in part from the repayment of project costs by
owners and through enforcement of the assessments against the property
benefited or from any other federal, public, or private funds that may
be made available for such purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---