BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Automated traffic safety camera" means a device that uses a
vehicle sensor installed to work in conjunction with an intersection
traffic control system or a railroad grade crossing control system, and
a camera synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images of the rear of a
motor vehicle at the time the vehicle fails to stop when facing a
steady red traffic control signal or an activated railroad grade
crossing control signal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Automated traffic infraction notice" means a notice of a traffic
infraction generated by the use of an authorized automated traffic
safety camera issued to the registered owner of a vehicle photographed
while failing to stop at a red traffic control signal or violating an
activated railroad grade crossing control. An automated traffic
infraction notice issued by the use of an automated traffic safety
camera system must include a copy or facsimile of the photograph
showing both the vehicle license plate of the offending vehicle and the
traffic control device or the activated railroad grade crossing
control. An automated traffic infraction notice will be administered
under RCW 46.63.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The use of automated traffic safety cameras is subject to the
following regulations:
(a) The appropriate local legislative authority must first enact an
ordinance allowing for their use to detect one or more of the
following: Stoplight or railroad crossing violations. At a minimum,
the local ordinance must contain the restrictions described in this
section and provisions for public notice and signage. Cities and
counties using traffic safety cameras before the effective date of this
act are subject to the restrictions described in this section, but are
not required to enact an authorizing ordinance.
(b) Use of automated traffic safety cameras is restricted to two-arterial intersections and railroad crossings only.
(c) Automated traffic safety cameras may take pictures of the
vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is
occurring. The picture shall not reveal the face of the driver or of
passengers in the vehicle.
(d) The ordinance enacted by the local legislative authority may
provide that automated traffic safety cameras may take pictures of the
vehicle and vehicle license plate while an infraction is occurring.
(e) The law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall plainly
mark the locations where an automated traffic safety camera is used by
placing signs on street locations that clearly indicate to a driver
that he or she is entering a zone where traffic laws are enforced by an
automated traffic safety camera. Signs must be displayed one hundred
yards in advance of placement of the locations where an automated
traffic safety camera is used and must state the following in letters
at least six inches high: "TRAFFIC LIGHT AND RAILROAD CROSSING
VIOLATIONS RECORDED BY CAMERA."
(f) A notice of an infraction must be mailed to the registered
owner of the vehicle within fourteen days of the infraction occurring.
(g) A person receiving an automated traffic infraction notice based
on evidence detected by an automated traffic safety camera may respond
to the notice by mail.
(h) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an
infraction under RCW 46.63.030(2) unless within fifteen days after
notification of the infraction the registered owner furnishes the
officials or agents of the municipality that issued the notice of
infraction with:
(i) An affidavit made under oath, stating that the vehicle involved
was, at the time, stolen or in the care, custody, or control of some
person other than the registered owner; or
(ii) Testimony in open court under oath that the person was not the
operator of the vehicle at the time of the alleged infraction.
(2) Infractions detected through the use of automated traffic
safety cameras will be processed as are stopping, standing, or parking
violations under RCW 46.61.560, but are not part of the registered
owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120.
(3) If an automated traffic infraction notice is sent to the
registered owner under RCW 46.63.030(2) and the registered owner is a
rental car business, the infraction will be dismissed against the
business if it mails to the issuing agency, within fourteen days of
receiving the notice, a declaration under penalty of perjury of the
name and known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the
vehicle when the infraction occurred. If the business is unable to
determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the
infraction occurred, the business must sign a declaration under penalty
of perjury to this effect. The declaration must be mailed to the
issuing agency within fourteen days of receiving the notice of traffic
infraction. Timely mailing of this declaration to the issuing agency
relieves a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for
the notice of infraction. A declaration form suitable for this purpose
must be included with each automated traffic infraction notice issued,
along with instructions for its completion and use.
(4) If a county or city has established an authorized automated
traffic safety camera program under this section, the compensation paid
to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only
upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in
support of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine
or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment.

Sec. 4 RCW 3.46.120 and 1995 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All money received by the clerk of a municipal department
including penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees and costs shall be
paid by the clerk to the city treasurer.
(2) The city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of
the noninterest money received under this section, other than for
parking infractions or for infractions detected by an automated traffic
safety camera, and certain costs to the state treasurer. The city
treasurer shall remit monthly ten percent of the noninterest money
received under this section for infractions detected by an automated
traffic safety camera to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used
in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in
civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded
against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 5 RCW 3.50.100 and 1995 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Costs in civil and criminal actions may be imposed as provided
in district court. All fees, costs, fines, forfeitures and other money
imposed by any municipal court for the violation of any municipal or
town ordinances shall be collected by the court clerk and, together
with any other noninterest revenues received by the clerk, shall be
deposited with the city or town treasurer as a part of the general fund
of the city or town, or deposited in such other fund of the city or
town, or deposited in such other funds as may be designated by the laws
of the state of Washington.
(2) The city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of
the noninterest money received under this section, other than for
parking infractions or for infractions detected by an automated traffic
safety camera, and certain costs to the state treasurer. The city
treasurer shall remit monthly ten percent of the noninterest money
received under this section for infractions detected by an automated
traffic safety camera to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used
in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in
civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded
against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 6 RCW 35.20.220 and 1995 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The chief clerk, under the supervision and direction of the
court administrator of the municipal court, shall have the custody and
care of the books, papers and records of said court; he shall be
present by himself or deputy during the session of said court, and
shall have the power to swear all witnesses and jurors, and administer
oaths and affidavits, and take acknowledgments. He shall keep the
records of said court, and shall issue all process under his hand and
the seal of said court, and shall do and perform all things and have
the same powers pertaining to his office as the clerks of the superior
courts have in their office. He shall receive all fines, penalties and
fees of every kind, and keep a full, accurate and detailed account of
the same; and shall on each day pay into the city treasury all money
received for said city during the day previous, with a detailed account
of the same, and taking the treasurer's receipt therefor.
(2) The city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of
the noninterest money received under this section, other than for
parking infractions or for infractions detected by an automated traffic
safety camera, and certain costs to the state treasurer. The city
treasurer shall remit monthly ten percent of the noninterest money
received under this section for infractions detected by an automated
traffic safety camera to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used
in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in
civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded
against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.63.030 and 2002 c 279 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice
of traffic infraction or an automated traffic infraction notice:
(a) When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence;
(b) When the officer is acting upon the request of a law
enforcement officer in whose presence the traffic infraction was
committed; ((or))
(c) If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle
accident has reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor
vehicle involved in the accident has committed a traffic infraction; or
(d) When the notice is mailed to the registered owner or the person
renting a vehicle as authorized under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) When an automated traffic safety camera is used in compliance
with section 3 of this act, a law enforcement officer, whether present
or not during the commission of the infraction, or other issuing agency
may issue an automated traffic infraction notice by mail to the
registered owner of the vehicle, or to the person renting the vehicle.
The registered owner of the vehicle or the person renting the vehicle
is responsible for the infraction.
(3) A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt
of a written statement of the officer that there is reasonable cause to
believe that an infraction was committed.
(((3))) (4) If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked,
standing, or stopped in violation of this title or an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall take its registration
number and may take any other information displayed on the vehicle
which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the
vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.
(((4))) (5) In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle
under RCW 46.55.120, upon receiving a complaint by a registered tow
truck operator that has incurred costs in removing, storing, and
disposing of an abandoned vehicle, an officer of the law enforcement
agency responsible for directing the removal of the vehicle shall send
a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known address of
the person responsible under RCW 46.55.105. The notice must be
entitled "Littering -- Abandoned Vehicle" and give notice of the monetary
penalty. The officer shall append to the notice of infraction, on a
form prescribed by the department of licensing, a notice indicating the
amount of costs incurred as a result of removing, storing, and
disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction
will not be considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty
payable under this chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied
that the person has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency
remaining after disposal of the vehicle.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.63.140 and 1980 c 128 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any traffic infraction case or automated traffic infraction
case involving a violation of this title or equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating
to the stopping, standing, or parking of a vehicle or violations
detected by automated traffic safety cameras, proof that the particular
vehicle described in the notice of traffic infraction or automated
traffic infraction notice was stopping, standing, or parking or did
commit the violation detected by an automated traffic safety camera in
violation of any such provision of this title or an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, together with proof that the person named in the notice of
traffic infraction or automated traffic infraction notice was at the
time of the violation the registered owner of the vehicle, ((shall))
constitutes in evidence a prima facie presumption that the registered
owner of the vehicle was the person who parked or placed the vehicle at
the point where, and for the time during which, the violation occurred
or who operated the vehicle photographed by an automated traffic safety
camera.
(2) The foregoing stated presumption ((shall apply)) applies only
when the procedure prescribed in RCW 46.63.030(((3))) (4) has been
followed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The legislature respectfully requests the
Washington state supreme court to amend the Infraction Rules for Courts
of Limited Jurisdiction to conform to this act. Furthermore, the
legislature respectfully asks the court to create an automated traffic
infraction notice that is consistent with this act.

--- END ---