BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2004, a city must designate land that is zoned
exclusively for the development of newly constructed manufactured
housing communities as defined in RCW 59.20.030.
(2) After the effective date of this act, a city may not designate
a new manufactured housing community as a nonconforming use, and may
not order the removal or phased elimination of an existing manufactured
housing community because of its status as a nonconforming use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2004, a code city must designate land that is zoned
exclusively for the development of newly constructed manufactured
housing communities as defined in RCW 59.20.030.
(2) After the effective date of this act, a code city may not
designate a manufactured housing community as a nonconforming use, and
may not order the removal or phased elimination of an existing
manufactured housing community because of its status as a nonconforming
use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2004, a county must designate land that is zoned
exclusively for the development of newly constructed manufactured
housing communities as defined in RCW 59.20.030.
(2) After the effective date of this act, a county may not
designate a manufactured housing community as a nonconforming use, and
may not order the removal or phased elimination of an existing
manufactured housing community because of its status as a nonconforming
use.

--- END ---