BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature declares that counties,
cities, and towns must ensure that impact fees imposed for new
development of manufactured housing communities do not exceed the
proportionate share of costs reasonably related to their impact as
required in RCW 82.02.050. The legislature recognizes the difficulty
of determining development costs for different types of housing and
wants to ensure manufactured housing communities pay fair impact fees
as affordable housing.
(2) The staffs of the senate committee on labor, commerce, and
financial institutions and the house of representatives committee on
local government and housing shall study the manner in which local
governments impose impact fees on manufactured housing communities
compared to other residential development. The study shall be
completed no later than January 2004.

--- END ---