BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No action may lie in a court of this state seeking a ruling as
to the validity of an initiative to the people, initiative to the
legislature, referendum bill, referendum measure, constitutional
amendment, city measure, county measure, charter amendment, county
initiative, or city initiative before the certification of the election
at which the voters enact or approve the measure, except as provided in
this section.
(2) An action will lie in a court of competent jurisdiction seeking
review of a proposed measure described in subsection (1) of this
section to determine whether it is beyond the scope of the initiative
or referendum power or otherwise beyond the scope of authority for
placing a measure of that kind onto the ballot, except that a court may
decline to hear such an action before the certification of the election
based upon sound prudential concerns.
(3) To provide for the orderly conduct of elections, no such action
brought under this section may be commenced during a period that begins
at the close of business of the fifth business day after the deadline
for the filing of signature petitions and ends when the general
election results are certified under RCW 29.62.130. This period is
known as the "election period," during which such complaints may not be
filed. Nothing contained in this section diminishes or enlarges the
jurisdiction of any court of record having jurisdiction over the
language or content contained in the ballot measure.
(4) Nothing in this section limits the jurisdiction of a court to
resolve an error in election procedure that could only be corrected
before the election. This section does not apply to an appeal of the
language or content of a ballot title, summary, or explanatory
statement as otherwise provided by law, nor to the procedure to appeal
the secretary of state's decision to reject a petition under RCW
29.79.160 and 29.79.170, nor to the appeal process contained in RCW
29.79.210.

--- END ---