BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.17.160 and 1979 ex.s. c 33 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 99 is established
as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number 18 in the vicinity
of Federal Way, thence northerly by way of Midway, to a junction with
state route 518 in Tukwila; also
Beginning at a junction with state route number 599 in the vicinity
of Tukwila, thence northerly by way of Seattle, Edmonds, and Lynnwood
to a junction with state route number 5 in Everett: PROVIDED, That
until state route number 509 is constructed and opened to traffic on an
anticipated ultimate alignment from a junction with state route number
705 in Tacoma via the Port of Tacoma industrial area to a junction with
state route number 18 in the vicinity of Federal Way that portion of
state route number 99 between state route number 5 at Fife and state
route number 18 in the vicinity of Federal Way shall remain on the
state highway system.

--- END ---