BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds
that paid time off from employment is critical to the economic well-being of the state and its workers. The majority of parents, even of
the youngest children, are now in the work force. The average work
week continues to lengthen. The population is aging, which puts more
pressure on workers to care for ailing family members. Paid time off
helps workers maintain their own health, care for their families, and
maintain financial stability. It also helps employers retain trained
workers and operate competitively, and ensures that workers remain
productive members of the work force, and not face poverty or
dependence on public programs.
The legislature intends to require employers to provide workers
with a minimum amount of paid time off, to allow employers to adopt
reasonable policies concerning the administration of paid time off, and
to encourage employers to adopt or retain leave policies more generous
than the minimum requirements of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 MINIMUM PAID TIME OFF. (1) An employee
shall accrue at least forty hours of paid time off for each six months
of full-time work for an employer, or a proportionate amount of paid
time off for each six months of less than full-time work.
(2) An employee is entitled to take paid time off only after
completing the first six consecutive months of work for an employer.
An employee taking paid time off shall comply with the terms of the
collective bargaining agreement or employer policy applicable to the
purpose for which the leave is taken.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.12.005 and 1998 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) The term "department" means the department of labor and
industries.
(2) The term "director" means the director of the department of
labor and industries, or the director's designated representative.
(3) The term "employer" means any person, firm, corporation,
partnership, business trust, legal representative, or other business
entity which engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity
in this state and employs one or more employees and for the purposes of
RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295 ((and)), 49.12.450, and section 2 of
this act also includes the state, any state institution, any state
agency, political subdivisions of the state, and any municipal
corporation or quasi-municipal corporation.
(4) The term "employee" means an employee who is employed in the
business of the employee's employer whether by way of manual labor or
otherwise.
(5) The term "conditions of labor" shall mean and include the
conditions of rest and meal periods for employees including provisions
for personal privacy, practices, methods and means by or through which
labor or services are performed by employees and includes bona fide
physical qualifications in employment, but shall not include conditions
of labor otherwise governed by statutes and rules and regulations
relating to industrial safety and health administered by the
department.
(6) For the purpose of chapter 16, Laws of 1973 2nd ex. sess. a
minor is defined to be a person of either sex under the age of eighteen
years.
(7) For the purpose of section 2 of this act, the term "full-time
work" means the same as in the applicable collective bargaining
agreement, or in the absence of an agreement, a work week of forty
hours.
(8) For the purpose of section 2 of this act, the term "paid time
off" means leave from employment with full pay for illness, family
care, bereavement, vacation, or personal holiday.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 POSTER. The department of labor and
industries shall include notice of the provisions of this act in each
reprinting of the poster required under RCW 49.12.275.

Sec. 5 RCW 49.12.280 and 1988 c 236 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT. The department shall administer
and investigate violations of RCW 49.12.270 ((and)), 49.12.275, and
section 2 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 49.12.285 and 1988 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
INFRACTIONS AND PENALTIES. The department may issue a notice of
infraction if the department reasonably believes that an employer has
failed to comply with RCW 49.12.270 ((or)), 49.12.275, or section 2 of
this act. The form of the notice of infraction shall be adopted by
rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. An employer who is found to have
committed an infraction under RCW 49.12.270 ((or)), 49.12.275, or
section 2 of this act may be assessed a monetary penalty not to exceed
two hundred dollars for each violation. An employer who repeatedly
violates RCW 49.12.270 ((or)), 49.12.275, or section 2 of this act may
be assessed a monetary penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for
each violation. For purposes of this section, the failure to comply
with RCW 49.12.275 as to an employee ((or)), the failure to comply with
RCW 49.12.270 as to a period of leave sought by an employee, or the
failure to comply with any requirement of section 2 of this act shall
each constitute separate violations. An employer has twenty days to
appeal the notice of infraction. Any appeal of a violation determined
to be an infraction shall be heard and determined by an administrative
law judge. Monetary penalties collected under this section shall be
deposited into the general fund.

Sec. 7 RCW 49.12.287 and 2002 c 243 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
NONDISCRIMINATION. An employer shall not discharge, threaten to
discharge, demote, suspend, discipline, or otherwise discriminate
against an employee because the employee: (1) Has exercised, or
attempted to exercise, any right provided under RCW 49.12.270 through
49.12.295 or section 2 of this act; or (2) has filed a complaint,
testified, or assisted in any proceeding under RCW 49.12.270 through
49.12.295 or section 2 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 49.12.290 and 1988 c 236 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING. Nothing in RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295
or section 2 of this act shall be construed to reduce any provision in
a collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 OTHER LAWS. (1) The rights under section 2
of this act are not in addition to any other rights provided by law.
(2) Nothing in section 2 of this act shall be construed to
discourage employers from adopting policies which provide greater leave
rights to employees than those required by section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 CODIFICATION. Sections 1, 2, 4, and 9 of
this act are each added to chapter 49.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---