BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.115 and 2000 c 122 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
All hearings ((may)) shall be public, and conducted at any time or
place within the limits of the county((, and such cases may not be
heard in conjunction with other business of any other division of the
superior court. The public shall be excluded, and only such persons
may be admitted who are found by the judge to have a direct interest in
the case or in the work of the court. Unless the court states on the
record the reasons to disallow attendance, the court shall allow a
child's relatives and, if a child resides in foster care, the child's
foster parent, to attend all hearings and proceedings pertaining to the
child for the sole purpose of providing oral and written information
about the child and the child's welfare to the court)).
If the court finds that there is reasonable cause to believe that
the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized by
conducting a public hearing, the court may exclude the public. In
addition, both parents may request that the court exclude the public,
subject to the court's discretion.
Stenographic notes or any device which accurately records the
proceedings may be required as provided in other civil cases pursuant
to RCW 2.32.200.

--- END ---