BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.220.010 and 2000 c 253 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the geologist licensing board.
(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(4) "Engineering geologist" means a geologist who, by reason of his
or her knowledge of engineering geology, acquired by education and
practical experience, is qualified to engage in the practice of
engineering geology, has met the qualifications in engineering geology
established under this chapter, and has been issued a license in
engineering geology by the board.
(5) "Engineering geology" means a specialty of geology affecting
the planning, design, operation, and maintenance of engineering works
and other human activities where geological factors and conditions
impact the public welfare or the safeguarding of life, health,
property, and the environment.
(6) "Geologist" means a person who, by reason of his or her
knowledge of geology, mathematics, the environment, and the supporting
physical and life sciences, acquired by education and practical
experience, has met the qualifications established under this chapter,
and has been issued a certificate of licensing as a geologist by the
board.
(7) "Geology" means the science that includes: Treatment of the
earth and its origin and history, in general; the investigation of the
earth's constituent rocks, minerals, solids, fluids, including surface
and underground waters, gases, and other materials; and the study of
the natural agents, forces, and processes that cause changes in the
earth.
(8) "Hydrogeology" means a science that involves the study of the
waters of the earth, including the study of the occurrence,
circulation, distribution, chemistry, remediation, or quality of water
or its role as a natural agent that causes changes in the earth, and
the investigation and collection of data concerning waters in the
atmosphere or on the surface or in the interior of the earth, including
data regarding the interaction of water with other gases, solids, or
fluids.
(9) "Licensed specialty geologist" means a licensed geologist who
has met the qualifications in a specialty of geology established under
this chapter and has been issued a license in that specialty by the
board.
(10) "Practice of engineering geology" means performance of
geological service or work including but not limited to consultation,
investigation, evaluation, planning, geological mapping, and inspection
of geological work, and the responsible supervision thereof, the
performance of which is related to public welfare or the safeguarding
of life, health, property, and the environment, except as otherwise
specifically provided by this chapter, and includes but is not limited
to the commonly recognized geological practices of construction
geology, environmental geology, and urban geology.
(11) "Practice of geology" means performance of geological service
or work including but not limited to collection of geological data,
consultation, investigation, evaluation, interpreting, planning,
geological mapping, or inspection relating to a service or work that
applies to geology, and the responsible supervision thereof, the
performance of which is related to public welfare or the safeguarding
of life, health, property, and the environment, except as otherwise
specifically provided by this chapter.
(12) "Practice of geology for others" includes, but is not limited
to:
(a) The preparation of geologic reports, documents, or exhibits by
any commission, board, department, district, or division of the state
or any political subdivision thereof or of any county, city, or other
public body, or by the employees or staff members of the commission,
board, department, district, or division of the state or any political
subdivision thereof or of any county, city, or other public body when
the reports, documents, or exhibits are disseminated or made available
to the public in such a manner that the public may reasonably be
expected to rely thereon or be affected thereby; and
(b) The performance of geological services by any individual, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other association or by the employees or
staff members thereof, whether or not the principal business of the
organization is the practice of geology, which the geological reports,
documents, or exhibits constituting the practice of geology are
disseminated or made available to the public or any individual or
organization in such a manner that the public or individual or
combination of individuals may reasonably be expected to rely thereon
or be affected thereby.
However, geological reports, documents, or exhibits that are
prepared by the employees or staff members of any individual, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other association or commission, board,
department, district, or division of the state or any political
subdivision thereof or any county, city, or other public body that are
for use solely within such organizations are considered in-house
reports, documents, or exhibits and are not the practice of geology for
others unless or until the reports are disseminated or made available
as set forth in (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(13) "Practice of hydrogeology" means the performance of or offer
to perform any hydrogeologic service or work in which the public
welfare or the safeguarding of life, health, environment, or property
is concerned or involved. This includes the collection of geological
data, and consultation, investigation, evaluation, interpretation,
planning, or inspection relating to a service or work that applies
hydrogeology.
(14) "Responsible charge" means the exercise of fully independent
control and direction of geological work or the supervision of such
work, and being fully responsible, answerable, accountable, or liable
for the results.
(15) "Specialty" means a branch of geology that has been recognized
under this chapter for the purposes of licensure. Engineering geology
((is)) and hydrogeology are considered to be ((a specialty))
specialties of geology.
(16) "Subordinate" means any person who assists in the practice of
geology by a licensed geologist or an exempt person, without assuming
the responsible charge of the work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---