BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that an active,
informed electorate provides a strong foundation for a democratic
republic and as such, efforts to fully inform voters are critical to
sustain our democratic form of government. The initiative process, a
constitutional embodiment of an active electorate, is cherished by
Washington's independent-minded citizens. Recent initiative history
demonstrates the willingness of the public to exercise their
constitutional right to legislate by initiative. The legislature finds
that as the state officer with the responsibility of certifying
initiatives to the ballot, the secretary of state should provide a
formal opportunity for the general public to hear information about a
ballot measure in a public setting with an opportunity for both
proponents and opponents of the measure to present their arguments.
The legislature intends for the secretary to be a facilitator in this
process and as such should maintain a neutral or nonbiased course of
action throughout the public hearing process.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.07.030 and 1982 c 35 s 186 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall:
(1) Keep a register of and attest the official acts of the
governor;
(2) Affix the state seal, with his or her attestation, to
commissions, pardons, and other public instruments to which the
signature of the governor is required, and also attestations and
authentications of certificates and other documents properly issued by
the secretary;
(3) Record all articles of incorporation, deeds, or other papers
filed in the secretary of state's office;
(4) Receive and file all the official bonds of officers required to
be filed with the secretary of state;
(5) Take and file in the secretary of state's office receipts for
all books distributed by him or her;
(6) Hold public hearings on initiative measures certified to the
general election ballot;
(7) Certify to the legislature the election returns for all
officers required by the Constitution to be so certified, and certify
to the governor the names of all other persons who have received at any
election the highest number of votes for any office the incumbent of
which is to be commissioned by the governor;
(((7))) (8) Furnish, on demand, to any person paying the fees
therefor, a certified copy of all or any part of any law, record, or
other instrument filed, deposited, or recorded in the secretary of
state's office;
(((8))) (9) Present to the speaker of the house of representatives,
at the beginning of each regular session of the legislature during an
odd-numbered year, a full account of all purchases made and expenses
incurred by the secretary of state on account of the state;
(((9))) (10) File in his or her office an impression of each and
every seal in use by any state officer;
(([(10)])) (11) Keep a record of all fees charged or received by
the secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) After the secretary of state certifies an initiative measure as
qualified for the general election ballot, the secretary of state, or
the secretary's designee, shall hold a public hearing on the measure in
each congressional district in the state. When two or more
congressional districts are in a compact geographical area, the
secretary of state may hold one hearing to serve these multiple
congressional districts. The secretary or a designee shall preside
over the hearings. The secretary may combine two or more initiative
measures in a single hearing.
(2) The secretary of state shall give thirty days' notice of the
hearings to all cabinet level state agencies, county legislative
authorities, and persons designated in subsection (3)(a) of this
section.
(3) The public hearings must include opportunity for the following
persons, or their designees, to present to attendees arguments for and
against each initiative measure, including fiscal and policy impacts of
the measure:
(a) Members of the committees appointed under RCW 29.81.240 to
prepare statements for the voters' pamphlet;
(b) State, county, and municipal officers and agencies thereof who
determine that the measure affects their constitutional or statutory
responsibilities;
(c) Registered voters in the congressional district.
(4) The hearings must be held between September 1st and October
15th, and the secretary of state shall give notice of them by notifying
press, radio, and television in the congressional districts, and by
other means such as the secretary of state's web site. The secretary
may publish information in the state voter's pamphlet regarding the
availability of unedited audio or audio/video from the hearings.
(5) Elected and appointed state and local officials, with the
assistance of the employees of the official's office or agency, and
under the supervision of the official, may use public facilities to
prepare or deliver written or verbal communications at the hearings,
consisting of information on the impact of the ballot measure that
foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their constitutional
or statutory responsibilities. Copies of any written material may be
provided to the public at the time of the hearing and at any time
thereafter upon request. Other than the official voters' pamphlet, a
public official may not send, by mail or other form of communication,
any unsolicited information on the ballot measure. The secretary shall
not distribute any printed information presented by participants under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, but may supply online access
to an unedited audio or audio/video file of any hearing by means of the
office's web site. Public officials attending the hearings are
entitled to travel expenses as otherwise provided by law.
(6) Nothing in this section diminishes a citizen's constitutional
rights nor may any part of this section or the hearings authorized in
it invalidate an initiative measure.
(7) The secretary may adopt rules in accordance with this section
to ensure that the public hearings are carried out in an organized,
objective manner.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.17.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 265 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
No elective official nor any employee of his or her office nor any
person appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may use
or authorize the use of any of the facilities of a public office or
agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign
for election of any person to any office or for the promotion of or
opposition to any ballot proposition. Facilities of public office or
agency include, but are not limited to, use of stationery, postage,
machines, and equipment, use of employees of the office or agency
during working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the
office or agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the office
or agency: PROVIDED, That the foregoing provisions of this section
shall not apply to the following activities:
(1) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition so long as (a) any required notice of
the meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition,
and (b) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(2) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry;
(3) Activities ((which)) that are part of the normal and regular
conduct of the office or agency;
(4) Activities in compliance with section 3 of this act of an
elected official or an employee of the official's office or a person
appointed to or employed by a public office or agency.

Sec. 5 RCW 42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use
of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for the
promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing
acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or
influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation
of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited
to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state
employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by
the agency.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition as long as (i) required notice of the
meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition, and
(ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this subsection,
it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to
respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make
incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an
actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards
shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;
(c) Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency; ((and))
(d) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide elected
officials and legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of
permissible communications, including written and verbal communications
initiated by them of their views on ballot propositions that
foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their constitutional
or statutory responsibilities; and
(e) Activities of an elected official or state employee in
compliance with section 3 of this act.
(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to
the exclusion of RCW 42.17.130.

--- END ---