BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and advertise a pharmacy
connection program through which health care providers and members of
the public can obtain information about manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance programs. The department shall ensure
that the program has staff available who can assist persons in
procuring free or discounted medications from manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance programs by:
(a) Determining whether an assistance program is offered for the
needed drug or drugs;
(b) Evaluating the likelihood of a person obtaining drugs from an
assistance program under the guidelines formulated;
(c) Assisting persons with the application to and enrollment in an
assistance program;
(d) Coordinating and assisting physicians and others authorized to
prescribe medications with communications, including applications, made
on behalf of a person to a participating manufacturer for the purpose
of obtaining approval of the person in an assistance program; and
(e) Working with participating manufacturers to simplify the system
whereby eligible persons access drug assistance programs, including
development of a single application form and uniform enrollment
process.
(2) Implementation of the program shall initially target senior
citizens and shall include a toll-free telephone number, available
during regular business hours, which may be used to obtain information.
(3) The department may apply for and accept grants or gifts and may
enter into contracts with other state agencies or private organizations
to assist with the implementation of this program including, but not
limited to, contracts, gifts, or grants from pharmaceutical
manufacturers to assist with the direct costs of the program.
(4) The department shall notify pharmaceutical companies doing
business in Washington of the pharmacy connection program. Any
pharmaceutical company that does business in this state and that offers
a pharmaceutical assistance program shall notify the department of the
existence of the program, the drugs covered by the program, and all
information necessary to apply for assistance under the program.
(5) For purposes of this section, "manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance program" means a program offered by a
pharmaceutical company through which the company provides a drug or
drugs to eligible persons at no charge or at a reduced cost. The term
does not include the provision of a drug as part of a clinical trial.

--- END ---