BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.67.370 and 1998 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cities, towns, or counties may not require existing mobile home
parks to replace existing, functional septic systems with a sewer
system within the community unless the local board of health determines
that the septic system is failing.
(2) Cities, towns, counties, local improvement districts, utility
local improvement districts, municipal corporations, political
subdivisions, or any other persons, firms, or corporations are
prohibited from requiring existing mobile home parks to pay a utility
assessment, connection charge, or any other charge associated with a
utility until the mobile home park connects to a utility or no longer
operates as a mobile home park under chapter 59.20 RCW. This act is
remedial in nature and applies retroactively.

--- END ---