BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall study the feasibility of including the community and
technical college system in the funding system used for K-12 public
schools. The Washington state institute for public policy shall
complete its study and make recommendations no later than December 1,
2004, to the governor, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the higher education coordinating board, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and appropriate committees of the
legislature.

--- END ---