BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.80.040 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 56 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization shall create a
transportation policy board. Transportation policy boards shall
provide policy advice to the regional transportation planning
organization and shall allow representatives of major employers within
the region, the department of transportation, transit districts, port
districts, and member cities, towns, and counties within the region to
participate in policy making. Each member of a board must be a
resident of this state and be employed by a business within this state.
Any members of the house of representatives or the state senate whose
districts are within the boundaries of the regional transportation
planning organization are ex officio policy board members with full
voting powers. A regional transportation planning organization
encompassing a population of less than one million persons must include
a representative from every incorporated municipality within the
organization.

--- END ---