BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that employers are
becoming increasingly discouraged from disclosing job reference
information. The legislature further finds that full disclosure of
such information will increase productivity, enhance the safety of the
workplace, and provide greater opportunities to disadvantaged groups
who may not have the educational background or resumes of other
workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer who discloses information about a former or current
employee's job performance to an entity or person that it reasonably
believes is a prospective employer, or employment agency as defined by
RCW 49.60.040, at the specific request of that individual employer or
employment agency, is presumed to be acting in good faith and is immune
from civil liability for such disclosure or its consequences. For
purposes of this section, the presumption of good faith may only be
rebutted upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence that the
information disclosed by the employer was knowingly false or
deliberately misleading.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "job performance" means the
manner in which the employee performs the duties of a position of
employment and includes an analysis of the employee's attendance at
work; conduct, attitude, effort, knowledge, behavior, and skills, that
are work-related; and adherence to the employer's employment policies
and to safety and health laws subject to the limitation of RCW
51.48.025.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.12.250 and 1985 c 336 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each employer shall make such file(s) available locally within
a reasonable period of time after the employee requests the file(s).
(2) An employee annually may petition that the employer review all
information in the employee's personnel file(s) that are regularly
maintained by the employer as a part of his business records or are
subject to reference for information given to persons outside of the
company. The employer shall determine if there is any irrelevant or
erroneous information in the file(s), and shall remove all such
information from the file(s). If an employee does not agree with the
employer's determination, the employee may at his or her request have
placed in the employee's personnel file a statement containing the
employee's rebuttal or correction. Nothing in this subsection prevents
the employer from removing information more frequently.
(3) A former employee shall retain the right of rebuttal or
correction for a period not to exceed two years.
(4) Within a reasonable period of time after an employee or former
employee submits a written request, an employer shall make available,
in writing, information disclosed during a reference by the employer to
a prospective employer or employment agency.

--- END ---