BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of this section, "drug and alcohol free
housing" requires a rental agreement and means a dwelling in which:
(a) Each of the dwelling units on the premises is occupied or held
for occupancy by at least one tenant who is a recovering alcoholic or
drug addict and is participating in a program of recovery;
(b) The landlord is a nonprofit corporation incorporated under
Title 24 RCW, a section 501(c)(3) tax-exempt nonprofit organization
under the internal revenue code, a housing authority created under
chapter 35.82 RCW, or a for-profit business entity;
(c) The landlord provides:
(i) A drug and alcohol free environment, covering all tenants,
employees, staff, agents of the landlord, and guests;
(ii) An employee who monitors the tenants for compliance with the
requirements of (d) of this subsection;
(iii) Individual and group support for recovery; and
(iv) Access to a specified program of recovery; and
(d) The rental agreement is in writing and includes the following
provisions:
(i) The tenant may not use, possess, or share alcohol, illegal
drugs, controlled substances, or prescription drugs without a medical
prescription, either on or off the premises;
(ii) The tenant may not allow the tenant's guests to use, possess,
or share alcohol, illegal drugs, controlled substances, or prescription
drugs without a medical prescription, on the premises;
(iii) The tenant must participate in a program of recovery, which
specific program is described in the rental agreement;
(iv) On at least a quarterly basis the tenant must provide written
verification from the tenant's program of recovery that the tenant is
participating in the program of recovery and the tenant has not used
alcohol or illegal drugs;
(v) The landlord has the right to require the tenant to take a
urine analysis test regarding drug or alcohol usage, at the landlord's
discretion and expense; and
(vi) The landlord has the right to terminate the tenant's tenancy
in the drug and alcohol free housing for noncompliance with the
requirements of this section.
(2) For the purpose of this section, "program of recovery" means a
verifiable program of counseling and rehabilitation treatment services,
including a written plan, to assist recovering alcoholics or drug
addicts to recover from their addiction to alcohol or illegal drugs
while living in drug and alcohol free housing. A "program of recovery"
includes Alcoholics Anonymous, Narcotics Anonymous, and similar
programs.
(3) If a tenant living in drug and alcohol free housing uses,
possesses, or shares alcohol, illegal drugs, controlled substances, or
prescription drugs without a medical prescription, the landlord may
deliver a written notice to the tenant terminating the tenancy for
cause as provided in this subsection. The notice must specify the acts
constituting the drug or alcohol violation and must state that the
rental agreement terminates in not less than forty-eight hours after
delivery of the notice, at a specified date and time. The notice must
also state that the tenant can cure the drug or alcohol violation by a
change in conduct or otherwise within twenty-four hours after delivery
of the notice. If the tenant cures the violation within the twenty-four-hour period, the rental agreement does not terminate. If the
tenant does not cure the violation within the twenty-four-hour period,
the rental agreement terminates as provided in the notice. If
substantially the same act that constituted a prior drug or alcohol
violation of which notice was given reoccurs within six months, the
landlord may terminate the rental agreement upon at least twenty-four
hours' written notice specifying the violation and the date and time of
termination of the rental agreement. The tenant does not have a right
to cure this subsequent violation.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.290 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 207 s 29 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for the landlord to remove or exclude from
the premises the tenant thereof except under a court order so
authorizing. Any tenant so removed or excluded in violation of this
section may recover possession of the property or terminate the rental
agreement and, in either case, may recover the actual damages
sustained. The prevailing party may recover the costs of suit or
arbitration and reasonable attorney's fees.
(2) It shall be unlawful for the tenant to hold over in the
premises or exclude the landlord therefrom after the termination of the
rental agreement except under a valid court order so authorizing. Any
landlord so deprived of possession of premises in violation of this
section may recover possession of the property and damages sustained by
him, and the prevailing party may recover his costs of suit or
arbitration and reasonable attorney's fees.
(3) The requirement to obtain a court order in subsections (1) and
(2) of this section does not apply to section 1 of this act.

--- END ---