BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.010 and 1947 c 79 s .18.01 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The applicable provisions of this chapter shall apply to
insurances other than ocean marine and foreign trade insurances. This
chapter shall not apply to life or disability insurance policies not
issued for delivery in this state nor delivered in this state.)) This
chapter applies to insurance and insurance transactions in this state,
performed in this state, or affecting persons located within this
state. This chapter does not apply to ocean marine and foreign trade
insurances.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.18.030 and 1992 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any individual of competent legal capacity may ((procure or
effect an insurance contract upon)) insure his or her own life or body
for the benefit of any person. ((But no)) A person ((shall procure or
cause to be procured any insurance contract upon)) may not insure the
life or body of another individual unless the benefits under ((such))
the contract are payable to the individual insured or ((his)) the
individual's personal representative((s)), or to a person having, at
the time when ((such)) the contract was made, an insurable interest in
the individual insured.
(2) If the beneficiary, assignee or other payee under any contract
made in violation of this section receives from the insurer any
benefits ((thereunder)) accruing upon the death, ((disablement))
disability, or injury of the individual insured, the individual insured
or ((his)) the individual's executor or administrator((, as the case
may be,)) may maintain an action to recover ((such)) any benefits from
the person ((so)) receiving them.
(3)(a) "Insurable interest" as used in this section and in RCW
48.18.060 includes only the following interests ((as follows)):
(((a))) (i) In the case of individuals related closely by blood or
by law, a substantial interest engendered by love and affection; and
(((b))) (ii) In the case of other persons, a lawful and substantial
economic interest in having the life, health, or bodily safety of the
individual insured continue, as distinguished from an interest
((which)) that would arise only by, or would be enhanced in value by,
the death, ((disablement)) disability, or injury of the individual
insured.
(((c))) (b) An individual ((heretofore or hereafter)) who is party
to a contract or option for the purchase or sale of an interest in a
business partnership or firm, or of shares of stock of a close
corporation or of an interest in ((such)) those shares, has an
insurable interest in the life of each individual party to ((such)) the
contract and for the purposes of ((such)) that contract only, in
addition to any insurable interest ((which)) that may otherwise exist
as to the life of such individual.
(((d))) (c) A guardian, trustee, or other fiduciary has an
insurable interest in the life of any person for whose benefit the
fiduciary holds property, and in the life of any other individual in
whose life ((such)) the person has an insurable interest.
(((e))) (d) Subject to rules adopted under subsection (4) of this
section, upon joint application with a nonprofit organization for, or
transfer to a nonprofit organization of, an insurance policy on the
life of a person naming the organization as owner and beneficiary, a
nonprofit organization's interest in the life of a person if:
(i) The nonprofit organization was established exclusively for
religious, charitable, scientific, literary, or educational purposes,
or to promote amateur athletic competition, to conduct testing for
public safety, or to prevent cruelty to children or animals; and
(ii) The nonprofit organization:
(A) Has existed for a minimum of five years; or
(B) Has been issued a certificate of exemption to conduct a
charitable gift annuity business under RCW 48.38.010, or is authorized
to conduct a charitable gift annuity business under RCW 28B.10.485; or
(C) Has been organized, and at all times has been operated,
exclusively for benefit of, to perform the functions of, or to carry
out the purposes of one or more nonprofit organizations described in
(((e))) (d)(ii)(A) or (B) of this subsection and is operated,
supervised, or controlled by or in connection with one or more ((such))
of those nonprofit organizations; and
(iii) For a joint application, the person is not an employee,
officer, or director of the organization who receives significant
compensation from the organization and who became affiliated with the
organization in that capacity less than one year before the joint
application.
(4) The commissioner may adopt rules governing joint applications
for, and transfers of, life insurance under subsection (3)(((e))) (d)
of this section. The rules may include:
(a) Standards for full and fair disclosure that set forth the
manner, content, and required disclosure for the sale of life insurance
issued under subsection (3)(((e))) (d) of this section; and
(b) For joint applications, a grace period of thirty days during
which the insured person may direct the nonprofit organization to
return the policy and the insurer to refund any premium paid to the
party that, directly or indirectly, paid the premium; and
(c) Standards for granting an exemption from the five-year
existence requirement of subsection (3)(((e))) (d)(ii)(A) of this
section to a private foundation that files with the insurance
commissioner documents, stipulations, and information as the insurance
commissioner may require to carry out the purpose of subsection
(3)(((e))) (d) of this section.
(5) Nothing in this section permits the personal representative of
the insured's estate to recover the proceeds of a policy on the life of
a deceased insured person that was applied for jointly by, or
transferred to, an organization covered by subsection (3)(((e))) (d) of
this section, where the organization was named owner and beneficiary of
the policy.
This subsection applies to all life insurance policies applied for
by, or transferred to, an organization covered by subsection (3)(((e)))
(d) of this section, regardless of the time of application or transfer
and regardless of whether the organization would have been covered at
the time of application or transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) "Employer-owned insurance policy" as used in this section and
section 4 of this act means a life or disability insurance policy
purchased by an employer on an employee, for the benefit of a person
other than the individual insured or the individual's personal
representative.
(2) An employer-owned insurance policy is not valid unless at the
time the contract is made and throughout the term of the contract the
employer has an insurable interest in the employee, as defined by RCW
48.18.030(3), for the full face value of the policy.
(3) When the insurable interest required by RCW 48.18.030(3) is
based solely upon the employment relationship between the employee and
the employer, the insurable interest ceases upon termination of that
employment relationship.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no later
than thirty days after the date on which an employer purchases an
employer-owned insurance policy on an employee, the employer must
provide to each employee for whom the employer carries a policy a
written notice that contains the following information:
(a) A statement that the employer carries an employer-owned
insurance policy on the life of the employee;
(b) The identity of the insurance carrier of the policy;
(c) The benefit amount of the policy; and
(d) The identity of the beneficiary of the policy.
(2) For current employees covered by an employer-owned insurance
policy as of the effective date of this section, the employer must
provide the notice required under subsection (1) of this section no
later than ninety days after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.18.060 and 1947 c 79 s .18.06 are each amended to
read as follows:
((No)) An individual life, group life, or disability insurance
contract ((upon an individual)), except a contract of ((group life
insurance or of group or)) blanket disability insurance as defined in
this code, ((shall)) may not be made or ((effectuated)) take effect
unless at the time ((of the making of)) the contract is made the
individual insured((, being of competent legal capacity to contract, in
writing applies therefor or consents thereto)) is legally competent to
contract and he or she applies for or consents to the contract in
writing, except in the following cases:
(1) A spouse may ((effectuate such insurance upon)) insure the life
of the other spouse.
(2) Any person having an insurable interest in the life of a minor,
or any person upon whom a minor is dependent for support and
maintenance, may ((effectuate insurance upon)) insure the life of the
minor.

--- END ---