BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.42.050 and 1991 c 363 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The)) Precinct committee officers of major political parties will
be elected at general elections held in even-numbered years or
appointed as provided in this section. General statutory requirements
for filing ((as a candidate at the primaries shall)) declarations of
candidacy apply to ((candidates)) filing declarations of candidacy for
a precinct committee officer of a major political party, except that
the filing period for this office alone shall be extended to and
include the Friday immediately following the last day for political
parties to fill vacancies in the ticket as provided by RCW 29.18.150((,
and)). A primary may not be held for the office ((shall not be voted
upon at the primaries, but the names of all candidates must appear
under the proper party and office designations on the ballot for the
general November election for each even-numbered year and the one)), no
matter how many persons file for the same office. The position of
precinct committee officer of a major political party for a precinct
may be placed on the ballot at the general election only if two or more
persons file declarations of candidacy for that position. The
candidate receiving the highest number of votes ((shall)) will be
declared elected((: PROVIDED, That to be declared elected, a candidate
must receive at least ten percent of the number of votes cast for the
candidate of the candidate's party receiving the greatest number of
votes in the precinct. Any person elected to the office of precinct
committee officer who has not filed a declaration of candidacy shall
pay the fee of one dollar to the county auditor for a certificate of
election)). Even though the position of a precinct committee officer
of each major political party for the same precinct are separate
offices, voters in the precinct may vote for only one candidate for all
of these positions. If only one person has filed a declaration of
candidacy for the same office of precinct committee officer, the office
may not be placed on the general election ballot, and the sole
candidate will be declared to have been elected to that position.
The term of office of precinct committee officer shall be for two
years, commencing upon completion of the official canvass of votes by
the county canvassing board of election returns.
((Should any)) If a vacancy occurs in this office by reason of
death, resignation, or disqualification of the incumbent, or because of
failure to elect, the respective county chair of the county central
committee ((shall be empowered to)) may fill ((such)) the vacancy by
appointment((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However, in a legislative
district((s)) having a majority of its precincts in a county with a
population of one million or more, ((such)) the appointment ((shall))
may be made only upon the recommendation of the legislative district
chair((: PROVIDED, That the)). A person ((so)) who is appointed
((shall)) as a precinct committee officer must have the same
qualifications as ((candidates)) a candidate for that position must
have when filing for ((election to such)) that office ((for such
precinct: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). When a vacancy in the office of
precinct committee officer exists because of failure to elect at a
state general election held in an even-numbered year, ((such)) the
vacancy ((shall)) may not be filled until after the organization
meeting of the county central committee and the new county chair
selected as provided by RCW 29.42.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.36.260 and 2001 c 241 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall issue an absentee ballot for the
primary or election for which it was requested, or for the next
occurring primary or election when ongoing absentee status has been
requested if the information contained in a request for an absentee
ballot or ongoing absentee status received by the county auditor is
complete and correct and the applicant is qualified to vote under
federal or state law. Otherwise, the county auditor shall notify the
applicant of the reason or reasons why the request cannot be accepted.
Whenever two or more candidates have filed for the position of precinct
committee officer for the same party in the same precinct at a general
election held in an even-numbered year, the contest for that position
must be presented to absentee voters from that precinct by ((either))
including the contest on ((the regular absentee ballot or)) a separate
absentee ballot. The separate ballot must provide space designated for
((writing in the name of additional)) write-in candidates.
(2) A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot if the
ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by the voter. The
voter may obtain the ballot by telephone request, by mail,
electronically, or in person. The county auditor shall keep a record
of each replacement ballot provided under this subsection.
(3) A copy of the state voters' and candidates' pamphlet must be
sent to registered voters temporarily outside the state, out-of-state
voters, overseas voters, and service voters along with the absentee
ballot if such a pamphlet has been prepared for the primary or election
and is available to the county auditor at the time of mailing. The
county auditor shall mail all absentee ballots and related material to
voters outside the territorial limits of the United States and the
District of Columbia under 39 U.S.C. 3406.

--- END ---