BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29.36 RCW
to read as follows:
An absentee ballot may be tabulated only if the voter complied with
all instructions, including the voter signing the outer return
identification envelope, and the absentee ballot was returned to the
county auditor who issued the absentee ballot as follows:
(1) If mailed from anywhere in the United States, the absentee
ballot must either: (a) Be received by the county auditor no later
than 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election for which it was
issued; or (b) have a date of mailing on or before the Friday
immediately before the day of the primary or election for which it was
issued and be received by the county auditor no later than 12:00 noon
on the day the primary or election results are certified; or
(2) If mailed by an overseas voter or service voter, the absentee
ballot must have a date of mailing on or before the day of the election
or primary for which it was issued and be received by the county
auditor no later than 12:00 noon on the day the primary or election
results are certified; or
(3) The absentee ballot was deposited at a polling site in the
county of the auditor who issued the absentee ballot, during normal
voting hours of the primary or election for which it was issued; or
(4) The absentee ballot was deposited with the county auditor who
issued the absentee ballot no later than 8:00 p.m. on the date of the
primary or election for which it was issued.
The date of mailing is the date of the postmark appearing on the
outer return envelope. However, if the postmark is missing or
illegible, the date of mailing is the date a voter attests to voting,
as shown on the outer return envelope.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.36.290 and 2001 c 241 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, ((a))
an inner security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a
larger outer return identification envelope in which to return the
security envelope, and instructions on how to mark the ballot and how
to return it to the county auditor so that the ballot may be tabulated
as provided under section 1 of this act. The ((larger)) outer return
envelope must contain a declaration by the absentee voter reciting his
or her qualifications and stating that he or she has not voted in any
other jurisdiction at this primary or election, together with a summary
of the penalties for any violation of any of the provisions of this
chapter. The outer return envelope must provide space for the voter to
indicate the date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to
sign the oath. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this
chapter must be printed on the outer return envelope immediately
adjacent to the space for the voter's signature. The signature of the
voter on the return envelope must affirm and attest to the statements
regarding the qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the
ballot. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters,
the signed declaration on the outer return envelope constitutes the
equivalent of a voter registration for the election or primary for
which the ballot has been issued. ((The voter must be instructed to
either return the ballot to the county auditor by whom it was issued or
attach sufficient first class postage, if applicable, and mail the
ballot to the appropriate county auditor no later than the day of the
election or primary for which the ballot was issued.))
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ((ballot))
inner security envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on
the ballot itself. If the information is not included, the outer
return envelope must clearly indicate that the ballot is not to be
forwarded and that return postage is guaranteed.

Sec. 3 RCW 29.36.310 and 2001 c 241 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of outer return
identification envelopes for any primary or election may begin on or
after the tenth day before the primary or election. The tabulation of
absentee ballots must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of
the primary or election.
(2) After opening the outer return envelopes, the county canvassing
board or its representative shall place all of the ((ballots)) inner
security envelopes in secure storage until after 8:00 p.m. of the day
of the primary or election. However, absentee ballots that are to be
tabulated ((on)) by an electronic vote tallying system may be taken
from the inner security envelopes and all the normal procedural steps
may be performed to prepare these absentee ballots for tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the outer return envelope that contains the
inner security envelope and absentee ballot((. They)) and shall verify
that the voter's signature on the return envelope is the same as the
signature of that voter in the registration files of the county. ((For
registered voters casting absentee ballots, the date on the return
envelope to which the voter has attested determines the validity, as to
the time of voting for that absentee ballot if the postmark is missing
or is illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters, the date on the return envelope to which the voter has attested
determines the validity as to the time of voting for that absentee
ballot. For any)) An absentee ballot((,)) may be counted only if the
proper voter signature on the outer return envelope was made by no
later than 8:00 p.m. on the primary or election for which it was
issued. A variation between the signature of the voter on the outer
return envelope and the signature of that voter in the registration
files due to the substitution of initials or the use of common
nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are
clearly the same.

Sec. 4 RCW 29.38.050 and 2001 c 241 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
The voter shall return the ballot to the county auditor in the
outer return identification envelope. If ((mailed)) returned by mail,
a mail ballot ((must be postmarked not later than the date of the
primary or election)) may be tabulated only under the same conditions
that an absentee ballot may be tabulated if it is returned by mail.
Otherwise, ((the)) a mail ballot ((must be)) may be tabulated only if
it was deposited at the office of the county auditor no later than 8:00
p.m. on the date of the primary or election for which it was issued or
if it was deposited at the designated place of deposit not later than
8:00 p.m. on the date of the primary or election for which it was
issued.

Sec. 5 RCW 29.62.020 and 1999 c 259 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At least every third day after a ((special election,))
primary((,)) or ((general)) election and before certification of the
((election)) results, except Sundays and legal holidays, the county
auditor shall convene the county canvassing board or ((their)) its
designees to process absentee ballots and canvass the votes cast at
that ((special election,)) primary((,)) or ((general)) election, if the
county auditor is in possession of more than twenty-five ballots that
have yet to be canvassed. The county auditor may use his or her
discretion in determining when to convene the canvassing board or
((their)) its designees during the final four days before the
certification of ((election)) results in order to protect the secrecy
of any ballot.
Each absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by
the county auditor two days or more before the convening of the
canvassing board or ((their)) its designees and that either was
received by the county auditor before the closing of the polls on the
day of the(( special election,)) primary((,)) or ((general)) election
for which it was issued, or that bears a date of mailing on or before
the ((special election,)) primary((,)) or ((general)) election for
which it was issued, must be processed at that time. The tabulation of
votes ((that results)) resulting from that day's canvass must be made
available to the general public immediately upon completion of the
canvass.
(2) On the tenth day after a special election or a primary and on
the fifteenth day after a general election, the canvassing board shall
complete the canvass and certify the results. The canvass report must
include each absentee ballot that was ((returned before the closing of
the polls on the date of the primary or election for which it was
issued, and each absentee ballot with a date of mailing on or before
the date of the primary or election for which it was issued and
received on or before the date on which the primary or election is
certified, shall be included in the canvass report)) tabulated as
provided under section 1 of this act.
(3) At the request of any major political party caucus of the state
legislature, the county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial
returns of state and legislative primaries or elections prepared by or
for the county canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate
or the chief clerk of the house.

--- END ---