BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.96 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2004, the department and the department of fish
and wildlife shall initiate an agreement to conduct joint research
projects with the geoduck harvesters association, holders of aquatic
farm registrations, and recognized treaty tribes of Washington,
hereinafter referred to as cooperators, for an initial term of ten
years, with the option of an additional term of ten years, to examine
the subtidal geoduck aquaculture industry in the state of Washington.
(2) The geoduck aquaculture research project must use scientific
methods to determine sustainability of geoduck aquaculture and assess
potential impacts to the aquatic ecosystem.
(3) The department shall lease the use of state-owned aquatic lands
for the geoduck aquaculture research project and shall determine the
location of leases and project design jointly with the cooperators.
Each cooperator leasing land shall provide geoduck clam seed produced
in hatcheries located in Washington state, materials, and labor for
their respective lease. The department will establish lease fees on a
per acre basis, not to exceed one thousand dollars per acre.
(a) The department shall designate no fewer than five areas of
aquatic lands owned by the state to lease on which to implement the
geoduck aquaculture research project. The department and cooperators
shall determine the size and location of the areas, which shall
comprise approximately fifty acres, of approximately ten acres each.
(b) Identification of areas with density of geoduck clams below the
level that constitutes a natural bed must be made in accordance with
the tribes, pursuant to applicable federal court order. The treaty
tribes retain the right, as provided under court order, to inspect
study areas.
(4) At the end of the first year of the geoduck aquaculture
research project and each year thereafter, the department shall provide
a progress report on the project to the standing legislative committees
with jurisdiction. The second report and all subsequent reports must
include an assessment of geoduck aquaculture, its impact on the aquatic
ecosystem, and recommendations regarding continuation or expansion of
the research project. Each report must include the perspective of the
association, the geoduck aquaculture industry, and the tribes.

--- END ---