BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period ending June 30, 2005, out of the several funds specified in
this act.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
Higher Education Comparable Framework (04-4-001)

Pursuant to authorities granted under Substitute Senate Bill No.
6049, the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
joint legislative audit and review committee, in collaboration with the
legislative evaluation and accountability program, to accomplish the
following comparable framework tasks and projects during the 2003-05
biennium:
(1) Fill in comparable framework gaps related to infrastructure.
(a) Develop inventory and condition protocols/standards;
(b) Develop infrastructure cost factors;
(c) Facilitate institution data collection and reporting;
(d) Field-verify data on a sample basis;
(e) Develop translation protocols;
(f) Translate data and populate comparable framework.
(2) Explore the feasibility of including dates of renewal and
replacement of major building systems in the comparable framework.
(a) Develop protocols/standards;
(b) Facilitate institution data collection and reporting;
(c) Field-verify data on a sample basis;
(d) Develop translation protocols;
(e) Translate data and populate comparable framework.
(3) Explore how the comparable framework could be expanded to
facility modernization.
(a) Analyze the feasibility of and approaches to quantifying
modernization backlogs across institutions;
(b) Describe current modernization rating processes used by
individual institutions including how they fit into master plans,
program delivery choices, and other manifestations related to the
development of requests for capital support from the state;
(c) Explore models used in other government sectors;
(d) Assess benefits and costs of potential approaches.
(4) Explore how to integrate the comparable framework with
governmental accounting standards for accountability related to the
efficiency and effectiveness of managing public assets.
(5) Revise and update the comparable framework data base.
(a) Modify and/or develop, as needed, tables, queries, and reports;
(b) Develop reporting capabilities to share data with other
legislative agencies, the office of financial management, the higher
education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and state institutions of higher education.
In executing these tasks, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall seek technical advice and input from stakeholder groups
including but not limited to the office of financial management, the
higher education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the council of presidents.
As a general condition upon appropriations provided to higher
education institutions in part five of this act, higher education
institutions, the higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall provide any requested information to the joint
legislative audit and review committee in a timely manner to enable its
completion of the above tasks and projects so assigned.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $164,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,064,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Deferred Maintenance Reduction Backlog Projects: Regional Archive
(04-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR
Moving and Equipment Costs (2005-2-001)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (88-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $558,000
Rural Washington Loan Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,739,295
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,297,295

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,353,072
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,650,367

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (RWLF) (04-4-009)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Rural Washington Loan Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,581,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,132,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,613,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts (00-2-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The reappropriation in this section shall support the projects
listed in section 109, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,963,092

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,886,908
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (01-H-001)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,593,068

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,593,068

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts (04-4-007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The following projects are eligible for funding:

Projects Recommendation

Cornish College, Seattle $700,000

Velocity dance center, Seattle $35,000

Artspace (Tashiro Kaplan), Seattle $300,000

Friends of Gladish, Pullman $37,000

Seattle art museum, Seattle $700,000

Pratt fine arts center, Seattle $700,000

Broadway center, Tacoma $400,000

Vashon allied arts, Vashon $80,000

Columbia city gallery, Seattle $110,000

Lincoln theatre, Mt. Vernon $110,000

Squaxin Island museum, Shelton $100,000

Historic cooper school, Seattle $32,000

Olympic theatre arts, Sequim $265,000

S'Klallam longhouse, Kingston $200,000

Western Washington center for the
arts, Port Orchard $165,000

Richland players theatre, Richland $51,000

Orcas sculpture park, Eastsound $15,000

Children's museum, Everett $200,000

Pacific Northwest ballet, Bellevue $268,000

World kite museum, Long Beach $32,000

TOTAL $4,500,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (CERB) (00-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations in section 123, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,871,748

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,769,252
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,641,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization (CERB) (02-4-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations from the public
facility construction loan revolving account must be used solely to
provide loans to eligible local governments and grants to the extent
permissible by law. The department shall ensure that all principal and
interest payments from loans made on moneys from this account are paid
into this account.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,431,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,931,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (CERB) (04-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for loans to local governments.

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,491,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,718,769
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,209,769

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Seventh Street Theatre (90-2-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations of section 906(2)(b) of this act. All funds
appropriated in this section must be matched by nonstate sources.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,110

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,890
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
County Public Facility Construction (00-2-010)

Reappropriation:
Distressed County Facilities Construction Loan
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $538,989

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,461,011
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Cancer Research Facility Grant (01-S-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided as a grant for equipment and facilities improvements for a
prostate cancer research project at the University of Washington
medical center. The reappropriation must be matched by an equal amount
from nonstate sources.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (2002-4-013)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,073,001

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,893,068
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,966,079

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (04-4-001)

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $261,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $261,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Fort Vancouver National Historic Reserve (01-S-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,987,248

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,752
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Chewelah Peak Environmental Learning Center (01-S-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,221

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,977,779
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Fox Theater Project (01-S-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $688,006

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,311,994
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Des Moines Beach Park - Structure Relocation (01-S-010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,875

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,125
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Upper Kittitas County - Emergency Management Service Facility
(2001-S-012)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funds are provided as a matching grant for enhanced emergency
services related to highway travel and incidental local needs. The
funds shall be retained in allotment reserve until the office of
financial management approves a plan submitted by the recipient
organization for the generation of matching funds and the provision for
emergency services needs on Interstate 90. The office of financial
management shall identify the recipient entity or organization that is
best suited to provide enhanced emergency services for the Cle Elum/I-90 region.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $908,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
West Central Community Center (01-S-016)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,431

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,569
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Yakima Ballfields (2004-2-952)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Yakima Valley Community College shall
receive $150,000 for the purchase of Noel field from the city of
Yakima. The city of Yakima shall receive $600,000 to replace and
relocate ballfields. It is the intention of the legislature that no
funds be distributed to the city of Yakima until the transfer of the
Noel field property is complete.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Milton Skate Park (01-H-016)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,537

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,463
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
PBS Digital Upgrade (2004-2-951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $350,000 is provided to public television
station KYVE for the costs to convert to digital transmission
capability and the upgrading and replacement of equipment, studio
facilities, and contents.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Pierce County Fairgrounds (01-H-017)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature does not intend to
reappropriate amounts not expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,125

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,875
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Coastal Erosion Grants (01-S-019)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funds are provided for coastal erosion
grants in southwest Washington in partnership with other state and
federal funds. Grays Harbor county is the lead agency in the
administration of the grants.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $583,155
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,845
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
City of Woodland Infrastructure Development (2004-2-953)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided for
allocation by the department to the city of Woodland for infrastructure
development, including drainage improvements and a dike access road.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
City of Grandview Infrastructure Development (02-S-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided for allocation by the
department to the city of Grandview for infrastructure development,
including but not limited to streets, water, sewer, and other utilities
associated with the siting of a warehouse distribution center.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects: Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects
(02-S-005)

The reappropriation in this section shall support the projects as
listed in section 202, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,213,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,213,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Program (02-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125. The reappropriation in
this section shall support the projects in section 111, chapter 8, Laws
of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,814,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,911,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,725,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Program (04-4-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125. The following projects
are eligible for funding:

Project Amount

Eritrean association, Seattle $346,000

Senior services/Seattle King county,
Seattle $400,000

St. Anne's childcare center, Spokane $400,000

Southeast Washington center for the deaf,
Pasco $27,000

Children's therapy center, Kent $250,000

Assistance league, Everett $400,000

Yelm community center, Yelm $400,000

Valley boys & girls club, Clarkston $400,000

First AME child/family center, Seattle $194,000

St. James family center, Cathlamet $18,000

Kent youth/family services, Kent $400,000

Catholic community services, Seattle $400,000

Lopez children's center, Lopez $220,000

Benton affordable housing, Richland $25,000

S'Klallam development fund, Kingston $69,000

Horizons $175,000

Girl Scouts/Pacific peaks $400,000

Opportunity council $400,000

YMCA/Snohomish county $275,000

Hopelink $201,500

Boys and girls club/Pierce county $187,500

Youthcare orion center $50,000

Subtotal $5,638,000

Alternate projects

Neighborhood house $60,000

LIHI (urban rest stop) $132,000

Boys and girls club/Thurston county $102,000

Subtotal $294,000

TOTAL $5,932,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,638,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,638,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (02-4-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding from the state public works trust fund program shall be
matched with new federal sources to improve the quality of drinking
water in the state, and shall be used solely for projects that achieve
the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.
(2) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by January 1, 2004, on the progress of the program,
including administrative and technical assistance procedures, the
application process, and funding priorities.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Account (04-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,000,000 of the state building construction account
appropriation is provided solely for grant to the Klickitat public
utility district for wastewater system improvements in the community of
Klickitat.
(2)(a) The remaining state building construction account
appropriation is provided solely to provide assistance to counties,
cities, and special purpose districts to identify, acquire, and
rehabilitate public water systems that have water quality problems or
have been allowed to deteriorate to a point where public health is an
issue. Eligibility is confined to applicants that already own at least
one group A public water system and that demonstrate a track record of
sound drinking water utility management. Funds may be used for:
Planning, design, and other preconstruction activities; system
acquisition; and capital construction costs.
(b) This appropriation must be jointly administered by the
department of health, the public works board, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development using the drinking water
state revolving fund loan program as an administrative model. In order
to expedite the use of these funds and minimize administration costs,
this appropriation must be administered by guidance, rather than rule.
Projects must generally be prioritized using the drinking water state
revolving fund loan program criteria. All financing provided through
this program must be in the form of grants that must partially cover
project costs. The maximum grant to any eligible entity may not exceed
twenty-five percent of the funds allocated to this appropriation.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water SRF - Authorization to Use Loan Repayments
(04-4-010)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Farmworker Housing Assistance

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is for project number 02-4-011. The
appropriation is for project number 04-4-004.
(2) The appropriation and reappropriation are provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that operation of the
facilities built under this section be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1342.
(4) The department shall minimize the amount of these funds that
are utilized for staff and administrative purposes or other operational
expenses.
(5) The department shall work with the farmworker housing advisory
committee to prioritize funding of projects to the areas of highest
need.
(6) Funding may also be provided, to the extent qualified projects
are submitted, for health and safety projects.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(02-4-010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Meeting the conditions and limitations under section 117,
chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess. when combined with the prior
biennial expenditures.
(2) The reappropriation in this section shall not be included in
the annual funds available for determining the administrative costs
authorized under RCW 43.185.050.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(2004-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) At least $9,000,000 of the appropriation from the state taxable
building construction account is provided solely for weatherization
administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriation from the state taxable building
construction account is provided solely to promote development of safe
and affordable housing units for persons eligible for services from the
division of developmental disabilities within the department of social
and health services.
(3) $2,000,000 of the appropriation from the state taxable building
construction account is provided solely for grants to nonprofit
organizations and public housing authorities for revolving loan,
self-help housing programs for low and moderate income families.
(4) $1,000,000 of the appropriation from the state taxable building
construction account is provided solely for shelters, transitional
housing, or other housing facilities for victims of domestic violence.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing for Homeless Families with Children

(1) The reappropriation in this section is for project number
02-4-012. The appropriation in this section is for project number
04-4-005.
(2) The appropriation and reappropriation in this section are
provided solely for the development of emergency shelters and
transitional housing opportunities for homeless families with children.
The department shall minimize the amount of funds that are utilized for
staff and administrative purposes.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Highline School District Aircraft Noise Mitigation (03-H-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations in section 205, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (04-4-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
standard requirements for community projects administered by the
department.
(2) The following projects are eligible for funding:

Project Amount

McCaw hall opera house (Seattle) $2,000,000

Greenbank farm (Whidbey Island) $1,500,000

Confluence Lewis and Clark
remembrance art project $3,000,000

Art Crate field $500,000

Asotin aquatic center $500,000

Hylebos state park $250,000

Federal Way boys and girls club $100,000

Asia Pacific center $100,000

Edmonds art center $100,000

Northwest orthopedic institute $200,000

Japanese American memorial $200,000

Capital theater - Yakima $250,000

Children's therapy center - King county $250,000

Great Gorge park master plan $250,000

Museum of Flight - WWI and WWII
project $500,000

Grandmother's Hill Preserve $300,000

New Phoebe house $25,000

Paramount theater - Seattle $250,000

Pine Lake park phase II $600,000

Regional conference center and
plaza/Bremerton $1,000,000

Seattle heart alliance (at Swedish) $5,000,000

South Hill park $250,000

Tacoma seawall $250,000

Thyme Patch park $5,000

ToscoSports complex $800,000

Utsalady beach acquisition $135,000

Veterans memorial museum $255,000

William Factory business incubator $560,000

Wing Luke museum $1,500,000

Woodway wildlife reserve $300,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Merrill Hall Fire Repairs - Horticulture Building (01-H-020)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the funds provided in this section, the
University of Washington may utilize appropriated funds for minor works
to address emergent needs for Merrill hall.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate moneys not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Budget System Improvements (02-1-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations in section 147, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Budget System Improvements (04-2-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Capital Monitoring (04-2-028)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $125,000 of this appropriation shall be used for continuation
of the office of financial management's capital monitoring system and
facilities inventory system databases.
(2) $150,000 of this appropriation shall be used to conduct a study
of the realignment of military forces and alternative uses of the land
and facilities currently used by the Washington State military
department readiness centers and armories for the Washington army
national guard.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $768,700
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
East Plaza Repairs (96-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,347,200
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,425,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,992,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Office Building Two Rehabilitation (98-1-007)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Transportation Building Preservation (98-1-008)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,964,065
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,090,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,954,065

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Heritage Park/Capitol Lake (00-1-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations of sections 905 and 906 of this act.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,387,700
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,767,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Heritage Park (01-H-004)

Reappropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $976,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,124,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building: Rehabilitation and Capital Addition
(01-1-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations of section 109, chapter 238, Laws of 2002 and section
2, chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 1063), Laws of 2003.

Reappropriation:
Capital Historic District Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,450,000
Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,031,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Campus: Infrastructure Preservation (02-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,000
Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $799,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Cherberg Building: Rehabilitation (02-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $695,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,595,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 154 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
North Cascades Gateway Center Minor Works (02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $488,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 155 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Pritchard Building: Rehabilitation (02-1-006)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,155,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,455,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 156 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Thurston County Facilities: Preservation (02-1-002)

Reappropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,009,774
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,909,774

NEW SECTION. Sec. 157 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 158 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Campus Infrastructure Preservation - Minor Works (04-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,695,500
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,195,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 159 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Emergency/Small Repairs and Improvements (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 160 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services (04-2-014)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section shall be used to provide
project management services to state agencies as required by RCW
43.19.450 that are essential and mandated activities defined as core
services and are included in the engineering and architectural
services' responsibilities and task list for general public works
projects of normal complexity. The general public works projects
included are all those financed by the state capital budget, 2003
legislative session, with a total project value up to $20 million.
(2) The department may negotiate agreements with agencies for
additional fees to manage projects financed by financial contracts,
other alternative financing, projects with a total value greater than
$20 million, or for the nonstate funded portion of projects with mixed
funding sources.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,409,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,037,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,586,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,308,400
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,894,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 161 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
GA Building Rehabilitation (2004-1-013)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 162 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Security (2004-2-950)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 163 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Space Use Changes (2004-1-951)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 164 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Historic Buildings - Exteriors Preservation (04-1-012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 165 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
State Capitol Master Plan Update (04-2-002)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 166 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Security Improvements (2004-1-011)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 167 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Statewide Facilities Preservation - Minor Works (04-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,270,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,290,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,849,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 168 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Bremerton Readiness Center (02-2-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations in section 183, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,100,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,800,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $923,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,823,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 169 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Combined Support Maintenance Shop (02-2-011)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,281,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,544,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 170 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works to Support Federal Construction Projects (02-1-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,525,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 171 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Infrastructure Preservation - Statewide (04-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 172 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Preservation Projects - Statewide (02-1-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $485,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 173 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Preservation Projects - Statewide (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $968,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $968,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 174 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section shall support the projects as
listed in section 207, chapter 238, Laws of 2002 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 175 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Communication Security - Emergency Management Division-Building No.
20 (04-1-002)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 176 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works to Support Federal Construction Projects (04-1-003)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,150,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,798,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,948,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,948,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 177 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Spokane Readiness Center (04-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to the annual project progress
reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file
quarterly project progress reports with the office of financial
management. These reports will contain local, state, and federal
funding reconciliation and balance sheets for this project and will
detail any federal intentions on future readiness center projects.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,800,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,768,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,568,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,568,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 178 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Orting School District Safety Bridge Study (2004-4-951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the state building
construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
department to conduct a study of the feasibility and design of
constructing a bridge to allow safe evacuation of the Orting school
district to high ground in the event of natural disasters related to
Mt. Rainier. The study shall include the estimated cost of bridge
construction and under what circumstances the bridge is expected to
allow safe evacuation. The department shall report to the Orting
school board, the office of financial management, and the legislature
by January 1, 2004.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 179 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
Washington State Convention and Trade Center Omnibus Minor Works
(04-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,045,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,045,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center - Site: Infrastructure Improvements
(96-2-229)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,149,856
Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,719,751
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,794,607

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Green Hill School Redevelopment: 416 Bed Institution (96-2-230)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,177,721
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,477,721

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center - Vocational Education: Construction
(98-2-211)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,236,667
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,386,667

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital: Legal Offender Unit (98-2-052)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,590,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,704,341
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,294,341

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Child Study and Treatment Center - Cottages: Modifications, Phase
3 (00-1-015)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,741,600
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,641,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Campus Renovation, Phase 5 (00-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center - Eleven Cottages: Renovation
(00-1-041)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,609,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,384,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center - Secure Facility: Construction, Phase
3 (00-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations of sections 905 and 906 of this act.

To the extent that the department projects savings and efficiencies
through design or scope changes, funds appropriated in this section may
be transferred to the statewide omnibus preservation project (02-1-069)
for expenditure for minor works projects.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,158,212

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,665,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,823,212

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center - Less Restrictive Alternative: New
Building (02-2-075)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,982,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,207,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES

Special Commitment Center - Regional SCTF: New 12 Bed Facility
(04-2-502)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department is encouraged to use efficient design and
construction practices, and shall expend no more than $1,200,000 of the
total appropriation on construction.
(2) The legislature finds that the funds appropriated in this
section reflect the average projected cost of the project. To the
extent that actual site acquisition, development, and mitigation costs
do not allow for completion of the project within the funds
appropriated, the department is encouraged to request additional
sufficient funding in the 2004 supplemental capital budget.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Child Care Facilities for Students and State Employees (01-5-003)

Funds are provided to recapitalize child care facilities grant
programs. These funds may be used by state agencies and higher
education institutions to provide child care facilities for employees
and students. Grants to state agencies will be provided and
administered per chapter 41.04 RCW. The department shall develop
guidelines for grant application for student child care facilities at
institutions of higher education in conjunction with the office of
financial management, the higher education coordinating board, and the
state board for community and technical colleges. Grants for higher
education child care facilities will be transferred into accounts
administered through chapter 28B.135 RCW.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital - Activity Therapy Building: Renovation
(02-1-060)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Omnibus Preservation Projects (02-1-069)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,045,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,742

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,599,258
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Omnibus Programmatic Projects (02-2-070)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $385,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital - Power Plant: Revisions/Smokestack Removal
(03-1-012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Department of Social and Health Services: Capital Project
Management (04-1-110)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,122,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,122,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Maple Lane School - Steam Plant and Tunnels: Upgrade (04-1-207)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health: Omnibus Programmatic Projects (04-2-365)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Facility Preservation (04-1-112)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(04-1-111)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-113)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Emergency and Unanticipated Repair Projects (04-1-116)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Facilities Condition Assessment and Preservation Plan
(04-1-120)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Hazards Abatement and Demolition (04-1-119)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) No more than $50,000 of this appropriation shall be used for
hazardous materials surveys.
(2) The remainder of the appropriation shall be used to demolish
abandoned structures at Fircrest school, Rainier school and other
campus structures to be identified by the department and approved by
the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Juvenile Rehabilitation Administration Master Planning Updates
(2004-1-957)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the state building
construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract for master planning
services in light of declining overall population. The department
shall contract for planning services to include, but not necessarily be
limited to, an update to presently existing plans, and shall consider
system-wide facility, capacity, infrastructure, security, specialized
populations, and efficiencies, based on current population growth and
the possibility of lesser or greater growth than presently forecasted.
The scope of planning work shall be subject to review and approval by
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal capital
and appropriate policy committees. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration shall report to the office of financial management and
the legislature with initial information about the process and
demographic data to be used in planning by December 1, 2003.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Rainier School Infrastructure (2004-1-950)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Rainier School Cottage Renovations (2004-1-951)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Lakeland Village Cottage Renovations (2004-1-952)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Yakima Valley School Cottage Renovations and Construction (2004-1-953)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 230 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Secure Fircrest Property (2004-1-954)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 231 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Public Health Lab Steam (2004-1-955)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 232 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Rainier School Nursing Facility (2004-1-956)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 233 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (02-4-004)

The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for an
interagency agreement with the department of community, trade, and
economic development to make, in cooperation with the public works
board, loans to local governments and public water systems for projects
and activities to protect and improve the state's drinking water
facilities and resources.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 234 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (04-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation is provided solely for
an interagency agreement with the department of community, trade, and
economic development to make, in cooperation with the public works
board, loans to local governments and public water systems for projects
and activities to protect and improve the state's drinking water
facilities and resources.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,122,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,488,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 235 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Biosafety Level 3 Facility (02-2-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,231,485

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,231,485

NEW SECTION. Sec. 236 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: C Wing Remodel (02-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,900

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,900

NEW SECTION. Sec. 237 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Chiller Plant Upgrade (02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,355,142

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,355,142

NEW SECTION. Sec. 238 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: E Wing Remodel (02-2-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 239 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Retsil Veterans' Home: Minor Works Mechanical/Electrical/HVAC
(02-1-001)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 240 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Retsil: 240 Bed Nursing Facility (02-2-008)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The charitable, educational, penal, and
reformatory account appropriation is provided solely for an historical
district study as required by national funding guidelines associated
with the federal appropriation.

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,730,700
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,980,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,980,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 241 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Emergency Funds (04-1-002)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 242 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Orting Soldiers' Home: Minor Works Building (04-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 243 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Spokane Veterans Home Kitchen (04-2-004)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,441,590

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,441,590

NEW SECTION. Sec. 244 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Correctional Industries Space (98-2-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,368,519

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,431,481
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 245 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Expansion (98-2-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,054,117

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,607,834
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,661,951

NEW SECTION. Sec. 246 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Stafford Creek Corrections Center: Construction (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,436,433

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,151,952
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,588,385

NEW SECTION. Sec. 247 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Local Criminal Justice Facilities (99-2-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation from the state building construction
account--state appropriation is provided solely for grants to local
jurisdictions for jail capacity expansion projects. Grants provided in
this section shall be limited to up to $500,000 per jurisdiction.
(2) $500,000 of the state building construction account--state
reappropriation increase in this section is provided solely for grants
to local jurisdictions for the construction of jail beds.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,019,674
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,668,195
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,687,869

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,097,603
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,785,472

NEW SECTION. Sec. 248 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Violent Offender/Truth in Sentencing Grant Administration
(99-2-004)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $672,287
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,194
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $766,481

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,521
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,038,002

NEW SECTION. Sec. 249 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: 100 Bed Management and Segregation Unit
(00-2-008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,964,679
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,575,906
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,540,585

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,674,031

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,223,416
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,438,032

NEW SECTION. Sec. 250 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Intensive Management Unit
Improvements (00-1-025)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,964
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,964

NEW SECTION. Sec. 251 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: Regional Training Center (02-2-016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,812,140

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $162,860
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 252 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works: Omnibus Preservation (02-1-015)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations of sections 905 and 906 of this act.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,124,489

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $494,758
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,619,247

NEW SECTION. Sec. 253 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works: Program (02-2-030)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations of sections 905 and 906 of this act.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,291,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 254 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Olympic Corrections Center: Replace Telecomm System (02-1-041)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $406,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 255 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Pine Lodge: Replace Telecommunication System (02-1-009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $774,944

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $364,056
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 256 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide Intensive Management Unit Repairs (02-1-040)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,544,656

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,344
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,612,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 257 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Building Water Pipe Replacement
Phase 2 (02-1-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,281,299

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $682,701
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,964,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 258 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Domestic Water System Improvements
(02-1-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,531,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 259 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Replace Steam/Condensate Piping
(02-1-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 260 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Electrical Supply System
(02-1-024)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,729,706
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,242,715

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $331,294
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,016,473
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,320,188

NEW SECTION. Sec. 261 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Sanitary/Domestic Water
Lines (02-1-026)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $870,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,312,167

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,187,520
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,569,687

NEW SECTION. Sec. 262 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Expand Minimum Security Facility
by 210 Beds (03-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,804,073

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $589,927
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,394,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 263 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections Center: Water Tank Replacement
(03-1-022)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,394,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 264 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: Hospital (04-2-012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $653,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,724,190
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,377,190

NEW SECTION. Sec. 265 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections Center: Replace Submarine Electric Power
Cable (04-1-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,902,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $980,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,882,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 266 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Facility Preservation (Minor Works)
(04-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 267 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code (04-1-021)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 268 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (Minor Works)
(04-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 269 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide Emergency Projects (04-1-036)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 270 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Convert BAR Units from Medium to
Close Custody (04-2-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,809,202

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,809,202

NEW SECTION. Sec. 271 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington State Penitentiary: North Close Security Compound
(04-2-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 272 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Master Planning (2004-4-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the state building
construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
department to contract for master planning services. The department
shall not deduct any portion of this amount for administrative costs.
The contract shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, system-wide facility, capacity, security, infrastructure, and population
needs, including medical needs, based on current population growth and
the possibility of lesser or greater growth than presently forecasted.
The plan shall consider strategies to improve both capital and
operating efficiencies. The scope of planning work shall be subject to
review and approval by the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal capital committees. The department shall report to
the office of financial management and the legislature by December 1,
2003, on the selection of a contractor and any initial information
about the planning process.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 273 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Regional Infrastructure
(2004-2-008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,518,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,168,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 274 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
School Mapping and Security (2004-4-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $4,800,000 of the state building
construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to conduct a
school mapping and security project. The association and the criminal
justice training commission shall coordinate this effort with the
school safety advisory committee.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Referendum 38 Water Supply Facilities (74-2-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for projects under
contracts on or before June 30, 2003. Reappropriated funds not
associated with contracted projects lapse June 30, 2003.
(2) The office of financial management may grant waivers from this
lapse requirement for specific projects upon findings of exceptional
circumstances after notification of the chairs of the house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee.
(3) The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and house of representatives capital budget committee and
senate ways and means committee by December 1, 2003, listing all
projects funded from this section.
(4) $614,000 of the reappropriation from the state drought
preparedness account is provided solely to purchase or lease water
pursuant to section 308 of this act.

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $614,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,716,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,330,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,268,071
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,598,071

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Referendum 38 Water Supply Facilities (02-4-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to study the
development of the Lake Wenatchee water storage project.
(2) The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management, the house of representatives capital budget committee, and
the senate ways and means committee by December 1, 2003, listing all
projects funded from this section.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account (Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,394,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $606,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants to Locals for Cleanup and Prevention (88-2-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for
projects under contract on or before June 30, 2003. Reappropriated
funds not associated with contracted projects lapse June 30, 2003. The
office of financial management may grant waivers from this lapse
requirement for specific projects upon findings of exceptional
circumstances after notification of the chairs of the house of
representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee.
(2) The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and house of representatives capital budget committee and
senate ways and means committee by December 1, 2003, listing all
projects funded from this section.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,791,440

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,039,482
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,830,922

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants to Locals for Cleanup and Prevention (04-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $8,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant
to the port of Ridgefield to continue clean-up actions on port-owned
property.
(2) $1,800,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, of the
appropriation is provided solely for a grant to Klickitat county for
removal and disposal or recycling of vehicle tires. The grant shall
include conditions that require Klickitat county to contract for the
vehicle tire removal following a competitive bidding process. No funds
from the grant may be expended for any remediation activities other
than vehicle tire removal, disposal, and recycling.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,357,355

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,136,643
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,494,002

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (97-2-012)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,255,168

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,032,291
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,287,459

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Site Investigation
(04-4-010)

Appropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,141,415

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,141,415

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Rights Purchase/Lease (99-1-005)

The reappropriation in this section is provided for the purchase or
lease of water rights under the trust water rights program under
chapters 90.42 and 90.38 RCW, for the purpose of improving stream and
river flows in fish critical basins.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,343,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,145,551
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,488,551

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Rights Purchase/Lease (04-1-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided for the
purchase or lease of water rights under section 308 of this act.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (02-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations of section 315, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,210,510

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,856,464
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,066,974

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (04-4-007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The state building construction account appropriation in
this section is provided solely for grants to finance water
infrastructure and conveyance projects in the sixteen salmon critical
basins identified in the statewide strategy to recover salmon. The
purpose of this funding is to develop projects for enhanced water
supply that resolves conflicts among water needs for municipal water
supply, agricultural water supply, and fish restoration.
(b) Priority for the use of these funds must be given to projects
that have been identified for early action through watershed plans,
comprehensive irrigation district management plans, or similar plan; or
to projects that are part of an approved habitat conservation plan, or
other intergovernmental agreement. Projects may precede completion of
comprehensive watershed plans if resolution of the conflicts is
necessary and the actions are compatible with the long-term planning
effort. The department shall develop and administer this grants
program in conjunction with the departments of agriculture and fish and
wildlife. Decisions regarding which projects are funded must be by
unanimous agreement of all three departments. The department shall
seek local and federal funds to augment the funding provided by this
appropriation.
(2) Up to $7,547,044 of the water quality account appropriation is
provided for the extended grant payment to Metro/King county.
(3) Up to $10,000,000 of the water quality account appropriation is
provided for the extended grant payment to Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(4) $5,000,000 of the water quality account appropriation is
provided solely for a grant to the city of Duvall for construction of
a sewage treatment plant.
(5) $2,000,000 of the water quality account -- state appropriation is
provided for water quality facility grants for communities with a
population of less than 5,000. The department shall give priority
consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a regulatory order from
the department of ecology for noncompliance with water quality
regulations; (b) projects for which design work has been completed; and
(c) projects with a local match from reasonable water quality rates and
charges.
(6) The remaining appropriation in this section is provided for
statewide water quality implementation and planning grants and loans.
The department shall give priority consideration to projects located in
basins with critical or depressed salmonid stocks.
(7) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,400,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Expansion (02-2-006)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,472,891
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $693,353
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,166,244

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,417,196
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $568,804
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,986,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $527,756
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (02-4-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,099,023
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,474,405
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,573,428

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $166,029,368
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $354,602,796

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Program (04-4-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to the annual project progress
reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file
quarterly project progress reports with the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,663,333
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,466,666
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,129,999

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,129,999

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities Program (04-4-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $1,150,000 of the state building construction account
appropriation and $2,650,000 of the state and local improvements
revolving account appropriation are provided solely for expenditure
under a contract between the department of ecology and the United
States bureau of reclamation for the development of plans, engineering,
and financing reports and other preconstruction activities associated
with the development of water storage projects in the Yakima river
basin, consistent with the Yakima river basin water enhancement
project, P.L. 103-434. The initial water storage feasibility study
shall be for the Black Rock reservoir project. The department shall
seek federal funds to augment the funding provided by this
appropriation.
(b) The remainder of the state building construction account
appropriation is provided solely for grants for the development of
plans, engineering and financing reports, acquiring land and
facilities, and other preconstruction activities associated with the
development of water storage and groundwater storage and recovery
projects. Proposed projects must be consistent with the
recommendations of the water storage task force and the governor's
water strategy. Priority for the use of these funds must be given to:
Projects that have been identified for early action through watershed
plans, comprehensive irrigation district management plans, or similar
plans; to projects that are part of an approved habitat conservation
plan or other intergovernmental agreement; or to joint projects with
federal entities such as the bureau of reclamation. The department
shall develop and administer this grants program in conjunction with
the departments of agriculture and fish and wildlife. Decisions
regarding which projects are funded must be by unanimous agreement of
all three departments. The department shall seek local and federal
funds to augment the funding provided by this appropriation.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(3) By December 1, 2003, the department shall submit a report to
the office of financial management and standing capital budget
committees of the house of representatives and the senate listing all
projects funded under this section.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,650,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (2004-2-951)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 317 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia Basin Ground Water Management (2004-2-952)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for a grant to the Columbia basin ground water
management area to implement strategies to reduce nitrate contamination
of ground water.

Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 318 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Lewis and Clark Trail Bicentennial (00-1-010)

The reappropriation in this section is provided solely to renovate
facilities and enhance exhibits at Lewis and Clark trail interpretive
centers located at Sacajawea state park and Fort Canby state park.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,337,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 319 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Coastal Facility Relocation (2000-1-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $775,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $820,615
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,595,615

NEW SECTION. Sec. 320 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historical Structure and Land Use Program (2000-1-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,508,461
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,708,461

NEW SECTION. Sec. 321 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility Improvement (01-S-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the reappropriation is
provided solely for funding of the twin tunnels bridge on the Iron Goat
trail.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,062
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $617,062

NEW SECTION. Sec. 322 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Beacon Rock Pierce Trust (02-3-018)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 323 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Beacon Rock Pierce Trust (04-2-018)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 324 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Coastal Facility Relocation (02-1-017)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations in section 324, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,726
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,726

NEW SECTION. Sec. 325 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility Preservation (02-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely to continue minor works projects that reduce the
deferred maintenance backlog.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 326 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility Preservation (04-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations of sections 905 and 906 of this act.
(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to
continue minor works projects that reduce the deferred maintenance
backlog.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,639,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,639,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,639,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 327 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Worden (02-1-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for park preservation and for development of the
multipurpose dining and meeting facility.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,319,365
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,819,365

NEW SECTION. Sec. 328 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Worden (04-1-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the commission shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(2) The appropriation shall be held in allotment reserve until the
commission produces business and marketing plans for Fort Worden
conference center and state park that clearly identifies revenue and
associated financing plan for operational and capital renewal costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 329 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Major Park Renovation - Cama Beach (02-1-022)

The reappropriation in this section is provided to complete
electrical power, water, and sewer utilities, and for other park
development and renovation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 330 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Natural/Historic Stewardship (02-1-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 331 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historic Stewardship (04-1-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 332 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Park Housing (02-2-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 333 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition Account (02-2-016)

Reappropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,950,638

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,362
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 334 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition (04-2-013)

Appropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 335 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Recreation Development-Grayland Beach (02-2-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 336 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Statewide Boat Pumpout - Federal Clean Vessel Act (02-2-020)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,635

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,472
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $364,107

NEW SECTION. Sec. 337 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Statewide Boat Pumpout - Federal Clean Vessel Act (04-4-014)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 338 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Job Creation and Infrastructure (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section shall support the projects as
listed in section 211, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 339 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Coastal Erosion (04-1-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $960,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 340 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass State Park Renovation (04-1-019)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to the annual project progress
reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the commission shall file
quarterly project progress reports with the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 341 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Emergency and Unforeseen Needs (04-1-012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 342 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility Assessment (04-2-011)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 343 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Iron Horse Trail (04-2-016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the commission shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(2) The commission shall submit a study of potential user fees that
could support maintenance, operation, and capital renewal costs of the
agency's three cross-state trails. This study must be submitted to the
office of financial management by June 30, 2004.

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 344 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Recreation Development (04-2-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the state building construction account
appropriation shall be used to retain a consultant to conduct a
predesign study for a headquarters building located in Thurston county.
The predesign shall compare a new leased facility against options to
build and evaluate appropriate funding strategies.
(2) $900,000 of the state building construction account
appropriation shall be used to install fee collection stations at
selected parks statewide.
(3) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the commission shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(4) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account shall be
held in allotment reserve until the commission produces a business and
marketing plan for each proposed development project that clearly
identifies the expected revenue and associated financing plan for
operational and capital renewal costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 345 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Roadways (04-1-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to the annual project progress
reporting requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the commission shall file
quarterly project progress reports with the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 346 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Projects (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,929,319

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,771,659
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,700,978

NEW SECTION. Sec. 347 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms Range Program (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,078

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,276
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $533,354

NEW SECTION. Sec. 348 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (98-2-003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Reappropriated funds that are not
obligated to a specific project may be used to fund projects from the
list of alternate projects in biennia succeeding the biennium in which
the funds were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,226,384
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,682,381
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,908,765

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,881,867
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,790,632

NEW SECTION. Sec. 349 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (02-4-003)

The reappropriations in this section for the wildlife and
recreation program under chapter 43.99A RCW and RCW 43.99A.040 are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided for the approved list of
projects included in LEAP capital document No. 2001-24, as developed on
June 7, 2001, and LEAP capital document No. 2002-21, as developed on
March 12, 2002.
(2) The department of natural resources shall manage lands acquired
through project No. 00-1427 "North Bay NAP" as a natural resources
conservation area under chapter 79.71 RCW.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that no reappropriations
from the habitat conservation account--state for state agency projects
shall be made in the 2005-07 biennium.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,089,319
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,200,926
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,290,245

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,709,755
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 350 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (04-4-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided for LEAP capital
document No. 2003-45, as developed on April 16, 2003.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that any moneys remaining
unexpended from the habitat conservation account--state appropriation
for state agency projects shall be reappropriated in the 2005-07
biennium, but no reappropriations shall be made in subsequent biennia.

Appropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 351 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (FARR) (02-0-001)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $388,462

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $388,462

NEW SECTION. Sec. 352 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation Program (FARR) (04-4-006)

Appropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 353 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Management Program (02-4-009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,663,822

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,536,178
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 354 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Management Program (04-4-010)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 355 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation (LWCF) (02-4-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,500,000 of the recreation resources
account--federal is reappropriated for projects chosen by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation.

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,143,443

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $356,557
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 356 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation Fund (LWCF) (04-4-007)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,735,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,735,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 357 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails (NRTP) (98-2-006)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $261,247

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,682,794
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,944,041

NEW SECTION. Sec. 358 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (NRTP) (02-4-006)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,617,419

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $253,238
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,657

NEW SECTION. Sec. 359 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (NRTP) (04-4-008)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 360 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Program (NOVA) (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,982,180

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,676,026
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,658,206

NEW SECTION. Sec. 361 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle (NOVA) (02-4-002)

(1) The reappropriation in this section for the nonhighway and
off-road vehicle program under RCW 46.09.170(1)(d)(i) is subject to the
following conditions and limitations: A portion of the reappropriation
may be used for grants to projects to research, develop, publish, and
distribute informational guides and maps of nonhighway and off-road
vehicle trails and associated facilities meeting the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with
disabilities act.
(2) The reappropriation in this section for the nonhighway and
off-road vehicle program under RCW 46.09.170(1)(d)(ii) is subject to
the following conditions and limitations: The portion of the
reappropriation that applies to grants for capital facilities may be
used for grants to projects that meet the requirements, guidelines,
spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act and
do not compromise or impair sensitive natural resources. The portion
of the reappropriation that applies to grants for management,
maintenance, and operation of existing off-road vehicle recreation
facilities may be used to bring the facilities into compliance with the
requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans
with disabilities act.
(3) The reappropriation in this section for the nonhighway and
off-road vehicle program under RCW 46.09.170(1)(d)(iii) is subject to
the following conditions and limitations: Funds may be expended for
nonhighway road recreation facilities which may include recreational
trails that are accessed by nonhighway roads and are intended solely
for nonmotorized recreational uses.

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,479,456

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $412,725
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,892,181

NEW SECTION. Sec. 362 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (NOVA)
(04-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $450,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to maintain
existing ORV and other recreation facilities, including ORV
campgrounds, on lands managed by the department of natural resources
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004.
(2) The appropriation in this section for the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program under RCW 46.09.170(1)(d)(iii) is subject to the
following conditions and limitations: Funds may be expended for
nonhighway road recreation facilities that may include recreational
trails that are accessed by nonhighway roads and are intended solely
for nonmotorized recreational uses.

Appropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,932,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,932,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 363 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery (00-2-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,263,219
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,076,017
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,339,236

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,285,905
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,625,141

NEW SECTION. Sec. 364 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery (02-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Activities funded through grants provided in this section shall
be consistent with the salmon recovery funding board's goals, mission,
and responsibilities.
(2) Jobs for the environment projects submitted by lead entities
are eligible to receive funding, including wages for jobs for the
environment participants.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,519,996
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,748,251
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,268,247

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,724,793
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,993,040

NEW SECTION. Sec. 365 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (SRFB) (04-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
the salmon recovery funding board for salmon protection, restoration,
and enhancement projects, of which, not more than twenty percent may be
spent for land acquisition, not more than fourteen percent may be spent
for assessments and studies, and not less than fifty percent may be
spent for restoration projects.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 366 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (02-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,389,602

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,510
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,735,112

NEW SECTION. Sec. 367 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (BFP) (04-4-003)

Appropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,982,959

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,982,959

NEW SECTION. Sec. 368 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant (BIG) (02-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,926,155

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,815
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,941,970

NEW SECTION. Sec. 369 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant Program (BIG) (04-4-009)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 370 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Family Forest Fish Blockages Program (04-4-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) This appropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery
funding board in consultation with the small forest landowner office of
the department of natural resources and the department of fish and
wildlife to provide grants to correct fish passage blockages on
nonindustrial forest lands. Selection of projects must be coordinated
with the other salmon recovery grant programs provided in section 365
of this act.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(3) The committee may not expend more than $100,000 of the
appropriation for administrative or staff costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 371 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Grants

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,300,000 of the reappropriation in this
section is provided for a list of projects in LEAP capital document No.
2001-44, as developed on June 7, 2001 (project number 02-4-018).

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,549,656
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,849,656

NEW SECTION. Sec. 372 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Grants (04-4-018)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided for a list of
projects in LEAP capital document No. 2003-32 as developed on April 10,
2003.
(2) The committee shall submit a list of recommended projects to be
funded from the aquatic lands enhancement account in the 2005-2007
capital budget. The list shall result from a competitive grants
program developed by the committee based upon, at a minimum: (a) A
uniform criteria for selecting projects and awarding grants for up to
fifty percent of the total project cost; (b) local community support
for the project; and (c) environmental benefits to be derived from
projects. This process must be coordinated with the salmon recovery
funding board selection process. The list of projects must be
submitted to the office of financial management by September 15, 2004.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,356,400

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,356,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 373 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (2000-2-004)

The reappropriation in this section is for project number 00-2-004.
The appropriation is for project number 04-4-004.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 374 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Dairy Nutrient Management Grants Program (02-4-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 375 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Puget Sound District Grants (2002-4-003)

The reappropriation in this section is for project number 02-4-003.
The appropriation is for project number 04-4-005.

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 376 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Water Quality Grants Program (2002-4-001)

The reappropriation in this section is for project number 02-4-001.
The appropriation is for project number 04-4-002.

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 377 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Skykomish Flood Mitigation Project (01-H-013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 378 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish Screens (01-H-011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for the inventory, design, construction, and
installation of fish screens and fishways. To the extent practicable
and cost effective, the department shall contract for the design,
construction, and installation of fish screens and fishways. Funds
provided by this appropriation may be used to match federal funds
appropriated under HR 1444, the fisheries restoration and irrigation
mitigation act of 2000.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 379 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Code Compliance and Protection (02-1-005)

This section reappropriates a portion of the appropriations made in
section 389, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 380 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Commercial and Recreational Customer Satisfaction Improvements
(02-2-006)

Reappropriation:
Warm Water Game Fish Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,005,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,060,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 381 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Diverse Fish and Wildlife Population Health and Protection
(02-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,045,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,235,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,015,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 382 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
ESA Compliance on Agency Lands (02-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 383 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Facility and Infrastructure Standards and Renovations (02-1-009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall expend the
reappropriated funds as detailed in section 390, chapter 8, Laws of
2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,290,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,690,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,931,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,621,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 384 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Facility, Infrastructure, Lands, and Access Condition Improvement
(04-1-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,900,000 of the state building construction account
appropriation is provided solely for the construction of the eastern
region headquarters office complex to be located at Mirabeau Point.
(2) The wildlife account--state appropriation is provided solely
for design of capture and acclimation ponds at Grandy creek.
(3) $301,000 of the state building construction account
appropriation is provided solely for improvements at the Centralia game
farm, to include: (a) $175,000 for a brooder barn to replace numerous
houses; (b) $50,000 to replace flight pens; and (c) $76,000 to replace
the roofs on the several buildings.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,026,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,826,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,826,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 385 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Opportunity Improvements (04-2-006)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 386 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Forest and Fish Road Upgrade and Abandonment on Agency Lands
(02-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 387 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Partnership Improvements with Internal and External Customers
(02-2-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Expenditures of the reappropriation in
this section for fencing must comply with chapter 16.60 RCW.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $580,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,695,400
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,275,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 388 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Culvert Replacement for Fish Passage (03-S-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely to
the department of fish and wildlife to replace culverts on state lands
that impair fish passage. The department shall prioritize projects
that affect fish species listed as threatened or endangered under the
federal endangered species act.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 389 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section shall support the projects as
listed in section 212, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,290,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 390 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Watchable Fish and Wildlife Recreation Sites (02-2-07)

Reappropriation:
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $995,076

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,924
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 391 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Local and Regional Salmon Recovery Planning (03-H-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations contained in section 133, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 392 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Population and Habitat Protection (04-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $400,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for upland wildlife habitat.
(2) $500,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to maintain existing mitigation agreements in the Snake
river for upland habitat and additional agreements with landowners.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,830,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 393 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Hatchery Reform, Retrofits, and Condition Improvement (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 394 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Internal and External Partnership Improvements (04-1-007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Expenditures of the appropriation in this
section for fencing shall comply with chapter 16.60 RCW.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 395 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Tokul Creek Hatchery (04-1-013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 396 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Deschutes Hatchery (2004-2-011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 397 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Underground Storage Tank Replacement (04-1-015)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 398 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife Energy Savings
(04-1-016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 399 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Youth Sport Fishing Program (04-2-017)

Appropriation:
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 400 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy

The reappropriation in this section provides $184,309 for project
number 00-2-020 and $4,200,000 for project number 02-2-015.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,384,309

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,885,691
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works

The reappropriation in this section is for project numbers 00-2-011
and 02-2-001.

Reappropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $256,230
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $482,466
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $455,575
Agricultural College Trust Management Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,950
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,263,221

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,006,779
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Administrative Site Preservation (04-1-002)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,900
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $389,700
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,200
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $813,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $813,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Agricultural Asset Preservation (04-1-017)

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Commercial Development/Local Improvement Districts (04-2-009)

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Communication Site Repairs (04-1-024)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Community and Technical College Trust Land Acquisition (04-2-014)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Forest Reserve
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy (04-2-015)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Hazardous Waste Removal (04-1-006)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Bank (04-2-013)

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station Public Access (04-2-019)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 411 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works - Health and Safety (04-2-001)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,400
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $394,400

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $394,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 412 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Mobile Radio System Upgrade (04-2-022)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall study and evaluate
options for a comprehensive user fee system that equally distributes
the cost to operate, maintain, and capitalize the radio system to all
users on the network. The study must include an evaluation of a user
fee system based on access to the network and not on radio inventory.
The department shall report the study's findings and recommendations to
the office of financial management by September 15, 2003.

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $227,400
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,500
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,659,800
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,273,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,273,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 413 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Area Facilities Preservation (04-1-016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall submit a study of
funding source options that fully support the maintenance, operation,
and capitalization of its natural area preserve facilities. This study
must be submitted to the office of financial management by September
15, 2003.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 414 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Resource Real Property Replacement (04-2-012)

Appropriation:
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 415 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Real Estate Repair, Maintenance, and Tenant Improvements (04-1-005)

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 416 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Recreation Facilities Preservation (04-1-011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall submit a study of
funding source options that will fully support the maintenance,
operation, and capitalization of its recreational facilities to the
office of financial management by September 15, 2003.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 417 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Right of Way Acquisition (04-2-007)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 418 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Riparian Open Space Program (04-2-023)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(2) The department may not expend more than $100,000 of the
appropriation for administrative or staff costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 419 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Statewide Estuarine Restoration Projects (04-2-021)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 420 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Wetland Grants (04-2-004)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 421 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Small Timber Landowner Program (2004-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 422 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Transfer Program (04-2-010)

The state building construction account appropriation in this
section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to
transfer from trust status or enter into thirty-year timber harvest
restrictive easements for certain trust lands of statewide significance
deemed appropriate for state park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural
area preserves, natural resources conservation areas, open space, or
recreation purposes.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value. The value of the timber transferred
shall be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource management
cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The value of the land transferred
shall be deposited in the natural resources real property replacement
account. These funds shall be expended by the department for the
exclusive purpose of acquiring commercial real property of equal value
to be managed as common school trust land.
(3) Property subject to easement agreements under this section
shall be appraised at fair market value both with and without the
imposition of the easement. The entire difference in appraised value
shall be deposited by the department to the common school construction
fund in the same manner as lease revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource management
cost account under RCW 79.64.040.
(4) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement
this section are authorized to be paid out of this appropriation.
Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time,
environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs.
(5) Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust
lands of equal value may occur if the exchange is in the interest of
each trust, as determined by the board of natural resources.
(6) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department, with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall
execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the
transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of
this section for a minimum period of thirty years. The department of
natural resources, in consultation with the receiving state agencies,
shall develop a policy to address requests to replace transferred
properties subject to the recorded property instrument that are no
longer deemed appropriate for the purposes identified in subsection (1)
of this section.
(7) The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
receiving agencies may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the common
school trust or the receiving agency.
(8) The department shall execute trust land transfers and easements
such that eighty percent of the appropriation in this section is
deposited in the common school construction fund. To achieve the 80:20
ratio, the department may offset transfers of property with low timber-to-land ratios with easements on other properties.
(9) On June 30, 2005, the state treasurer shall transfer all
remaining uncommitted funds from this appropriation to the common
school construction fund and the appropriation in this section shall be
reduced by an equivalent amount.
(10) The appropriation in this section is provided for a list of
projects in LEAP capital document No. 2003-9, as developed on April 10,
2003.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 423 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station Public Access (2002-2-019)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 424 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Digitize Geology Library Collections (2004-1-950)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 425 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
SDS Lawsuit Settlement and Land Acquisition (04-2-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely to the department of
natural resources to acquire approximately 232 acres of land and timber
in Klickitat county from the SDS lumber company.
(2) Expenditure of the moneys appropriated in this section shall
not be made until the SDS lumber company accepts the land and timber
acquisition as full and complete settlement of the current litigation
brought by the SDS lumber company against the state and the litigation
is dismissed, with prejudice.
(3) The land and timber acquired with the funding in this section
shall be managed for the benefit of the common schools.
(4) By June 30, 2004, if the department has not recovered through
trust asset management the state's capital investment from the land
acquisition provided in this section, the department shall seek
reimbursement from the federal government. It is the intent of the
legislature that the state general fund appropriation for the 2005-07
fiscal biennium for the forest practices program in the department be
reduced by the amount not recovered through trust land management or
reimbursement by the federal government.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 426 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Fairground Health and Safety Improvements (2004-1-950)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Seattle Toxicology Lab (00-2-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,455,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,059,864
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,514,864

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Spokane Crime Laboratory Construction (02-2-013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $635,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy - Sanitary Sewer System (04-2-011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy: Minor Works (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Vancouver Crime Lab - Design/Construction (2002-2-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,135,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Columbia River Dredging (03-H-001)

The reappropriation in this section is provided solely to fund the
second phase of a multiphase cooperative project with the state of
Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The department shall review
project expenditures and determine the potential for cost savings or
shortages in line with matching requirements with the state of Oregon
and the federal government and report to the house of representatives
capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee by
December 31, 2003. The amount in this section lapses unless the state
of Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of
the project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,700,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
School Construction Assistance Grants (02-4-001)

The reappropriations in this section are for project numbers
00-2-001, 00-2-002, and 02-04-001.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,946
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,036,946

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $645,475,724
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $891,512,670

Sec. 602 2003 c ... (ESSB 5404) s 518 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Education Savings Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000,000
Education Construction Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($120,165,000))
$66,415,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($147,165,000))
$93,415,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $13,500,000 in fiscal year 2004 and $13,500,000 in fiscal year
2005 of the education savings account appropriation shall be deposited
in the common school construction account.
(2) (($120,165,000)) $66,415,000 of the education construction
account appropriation shall be deposited in the common school
construction account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
State Bonds Transfer to Common School Construction (04-4-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $122,050,000 of the state building and
construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for
deposit in the common school construction account.

Appropriation:
State Building and Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
School Construction Assistance Grants (04-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For state assistance grants for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced
by fifty percent.
(2) $2,000,000 from this appropriation is provided for skills
centers capital improvements. Skills centers shall submit a budget
plan to the state board of education and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature for proposed expenditures and the
proposed expenditures shall conform with state board of education rules
and procedures for reimbursement of capital items. Funds not expended
by June 30, 2005, shall lapse.
(3) $32,868,105 of this appropriation is provided solely to
increase the area cost allowance by $15.00 per square foot for grades
K-12 for fiscal year 2004 and an additional $4.49 per square foot for
grades K-12 for fiscal year 2005.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $399,768,513

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,858,456,614
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,258,225,127

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
State School Construction Assistance Program Staff

The reappropriation in this section is for project number 02-4-001.
The appropriation is for project number 04-2-001.

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,038,390

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,138,390

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Ahlsten: Material Center and Braille Production (02-2-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,084,179

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,257,009
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,341,188

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Campus Preservation (02-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $401,426

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $198,574
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Distance Learning Center/Covered Play Area (02-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,213,226

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $575,774
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,789,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Irwin: Old Main, Kennedy, and Dry Building Preservation (02-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,555

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,747,445
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,981,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Boiler House Renovation/Electrical Vault Replacement (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $668,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $668,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Campus Preservation (04-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,830,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Kennedy, Dry, and Irwin Buildings Preservation (04-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
School Campus Redevelopment (01-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for costs
associated with a comprehensive examination of the proper role of the
school for the deaf in the education and training of hearing impaired
children in the state both now and in the future. The examination
shall be conducted by a deaf education task force. The office of
financial management shall coordinate the efforts of the deaf education
task force. In conducting this examination, the task force shall
consider the information, analysis, and options presented in recent
relevant reports by the institute for public policy and the joint
legislative audit and review committee.
(2) The deaf education task force shall develop a strategic plan
for the school for the deaf. The strategic plan must include, at a
minimum, the following:
(a) The appropriate and most cost-effective service delivery model
for serving hearing impaired children throughout the state;
(b) A revised projection of the number of residential and day
students served at the school for the deaf and at the local school
district level based on this service delivery model; and
(c) Changes to be incorporated into the school for the deaf's
facility master plan based on these revised population projections and
an assessment of the cost-effective capital improvements needed.
(3) The deaf education task force shall report to the governor and
the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature no
later than December 1, 2004.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,540,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,790,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Law School Building (94-2-017)

Reappropriation:
Higher Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600,000
Higher Education Non-Proprietary Local Capital
Accounts--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,855,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,855,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Campus Phase 2A (00-2-017)

No money from the reappropriation in this section may be expended
that would be inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher
education coordinating board and the project design, scope, and
schedule approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,635,933
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,635,933

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Land Acquisition (01-2-029)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Emergency Power Expansion - Phase 1 (02-1-009)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell Phase 2B Offramp (02-2-014)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,390,000
Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,565,515
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,565,515

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Life Sciences II Building (02-2-028)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the University of
Washington providing sufficient evidence to the office of financial
management of local revenue to support issuance of bonded debt and
accompanying debt service associated with this project.

Reappropriation:
Higher Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 620 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Minor Repairs Programs (02-1-026)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 621 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Special Projects - Code Requirements (02-1-025)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 622 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Campus Phase 2B (02-2-027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,349,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,349,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 623 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Urgent Deferred Renewal/Modernization (02-1-031)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 624 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations of section 218, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 625 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Johnson Hall Renovation (04-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,103,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,552,000
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 626 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Emergency Power Expansion - Phase II (04-1-024)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,448,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,513,164
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,161,164

NEW SECTION. Sec. 627 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-950)

Subject to allotment and other conditions defined by law for this
treasury account, the appropriation in this section is provided to keep
facilities owned and used for educational and general operations of
state colleges and universities, as defined under Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6049 (higher education facilities), in adequate condition or
better. The legislature intends that maintenance, mechanical
adjustments, repairs, and minor works supported by this project extend
the remaining useful life of the facility, be of an enduring nature
lasting thirteen years or longer, and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where educational and general program
missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Higher Education Facility Preservation Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,350,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 628 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely to undertake
preservation work over a five biennium time horizon to improve existing
state-owned facilities in the worst relative condition for housed
programs and current building occupants. The legislature's performance
expectation for the provision of this money is to stabilize and better
each institution's average facility condition index as compared to
levels reported by the joint legislative audit and review committee in
January 2003 (higher education facility preservation study, report 03-1). Any building that scored "4" or "5" in the statewide comparable
framework survey establishing baseline conditions qualifies for an
allotment of funds as do the following list of eligible preservation
projects submitted by the agency:
Project Amount
Health Science H-Wing infrastructure (04-1-001) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,996,716
Guggenheim Hall renovation-Design (04-1-003) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,312,000
Architecture Hall renovation-Design (04-1-008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,634,000
Major renovation-predesign (UW critical building
list; 04-1-002) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Urgent deferred renewal/modernization (02-1-031; F15) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $227,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 629 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-952)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 630 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Program (04-2-004)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,975,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 631 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Murrow Hall Addition: New Facility (98-2-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,560,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 632 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Education Addition Cleveland Hall (98-2-032)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,765,000
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,395,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 633 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Johnson Hall Addition - Plant Bioscience Building
(00-2-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,542,000
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,658,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 634 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Shock Physics Building (00-2-080)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 635 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Engineering and Life Sciences Building (00-2-904)

No money from the reappropriation may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved
by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,470,650
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,470,650

NEW SECTION. Sec. 636 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Student Services Center (00-2-905)

No money from the reappropriation may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved
by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $605,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,555,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 637 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane Riverpoint - Academic Center Building (00-2-906)

No money from the reappropriation may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved
by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 638 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Campus Infrastructure: Preservation (02-1-073)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,150,141
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,750,141

NEW SECTION. Sec. 639 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Energy Plant (02-1-501)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,039,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,539,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 640 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Minor Capital Improvements (MCI) (02-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 641 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Multimedia/Electronic Communication Classroom
Building (02-2-907)

No money from the reappropriation may be expended that would be
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved
by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 642 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations in section 219, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 643 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Biotechnology/Life Sciences 1 (04-2-085)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 644 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Campus Infrastructure (04-1-073)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 645 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-950)

Subject to allotment and other conditions defined by law for this
treasury account, the appropriation in this section is provided to keep
facilities owned and used for educational and general operations of
state colleges and universities, as defined under Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6049 (higher education facilities), in adequate condition or
better. The legislature intends that maintenance, mechanical
adjustments, repairs, and minor works supported by this project extend
the remaining useful life of the facility, be of an enduring nature
lasting thirteen years or longer, and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where educational and general program
missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Higher Education Facility Preservation Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,865,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 646 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely to undertake
preservation work over a five biennium time horizon to improve existing
state-owned facilities in the worst relative condition for housed
programs and current building occupants. The legislature's performance
expectation for the provision of this money is to stabilize and better
each institution's average facility condition index as compared to
levels reported by the joint legislative audit and review committee in
January 2003 (higher education facility preservation study, report 03-1). Any building that scored "4" or "5" in the statewide comparable
framework survey establishing baseline conditions qualifies for an
allotment of funds as do the following list of eligible preservation
projects submitted by the agency:

Project Amount
Minor capital-Preservation/Renewal (MCR) (04-1-004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Minor capital-Safety/Security/Environment (04-2-001) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Holland library renovation-Design (04-1-023) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Public safety-LARC remodel (04-2-026) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Nuclear radiation center-Predesign and design
(06-1-045) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Avery Hall Renovation-Predesign and design
(12-1-097) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
BioMedical Science Facility-Predesign and design
(04-1-009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,115,000
Hospital renovation study (04-2-058) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $256,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $299,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 647 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Campus Utilities/Infrastructure: Infrastructure
(04-2-916)

Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 648 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU TriCities - Bioproducts and Sciences Building (04-2-940)

Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,349,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,249,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 649 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU ICN Spokane - Nursing Building at Riverpoint: New Facility
(04-2-941)

Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 650 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Prosser - Multipurpose Building: New Facility (04-2-942)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 651 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Omnibus Equipment and Program Improvements (04-2-951)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,380,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,928,500
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,308,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 652 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-952)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 653 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Computing and Engineering Sciences Building (Cheney Hall)
(00-2-009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,675,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,482
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,482

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,225,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,900,482

NEW SECTION. Sec. 654 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Senior Hall Renovation (00-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $730,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,816,165

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $581,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,664,150
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,791,315

NEW SECTION. Sec. 655 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Campus Network Upgrade (02-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 656 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Classroom Renewal (02-2-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $775,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,516,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,366,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 657 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Infrastructure Preservation (02-1-002)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 658 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Roof Replacement (02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,369,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,619,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 659 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Water System Preservation and Expansion (02-1-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $986,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,736,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 660 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Minor Works - Preservation (02-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 661 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Minor Works - Program (02-2-008)

Reappropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,618,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,218,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 662 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (03-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 663 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Campus Network Upgrade (04-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is provided to modernize the
computing environment supporting student services (enterprise system)
during the 2003-05 biennium.

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,875,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 664 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Classroom Renewal (04-2-013)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,016,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,016,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 665 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 666 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Minor Works - Program (04-2-017)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,189,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,839,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 667 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-950)

Subject to allotment and other conditions defined by law for this
treasury account, the appropriation in this section is provided to keep
facilities owned and used for educational and general operations of
state colleges and universities, as defined under Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6049 (higher education facilities), in adequate condition or
better. The legislature intends that maintenance, mechanical
adjustments, repairs, and minor works supported by this project extend
the remaining useful life of the facility, be of an enduring nature
lasting thirteen years or longer, and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where educational and general program
missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Higher Education Facility Preservation Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,935,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 668 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-952)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely to undertake
preservation work over a five biennium time horizon to improve existing
state-owned facilities in the worst relative condition for housed
programs and current building occupants. The legislature's performance
expectation for the provision of this money is to stabilize and better
each institution's average facility condition index as compared to
levels reported by the joint legislative audit and review committee in
January 2003 (higher education facility preservation study, report 03-1). As a condition of this appropriation, and by no later than the
2005 session, the university shall examine options and recommend an
action plan to replace outright or renew for future use the Robert Reid
lab school in Cheney.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 669 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU University Visitor Center and Formal Entry (04-2-010)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 670 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-953)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 671 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Music Education Facility (00-2-001)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,350,000
Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 672 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
CWU/Highline Higher Education Center (02-2-101)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,438,000
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,962,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 673 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
McConnell Stage Remodel (02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 674 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Omnibus - Preservation (02-1-001)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,645,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 675 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Omnibus - Program (02-2-002)

(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
conditions and limitations of sections 905 and 906 of this act.
(2) $350,000 of this reappropriation is provided for interior
classroom improvements within the Olympic south building of Pierce
College at Fort Steilacoom.

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,503,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,247,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 676 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Randall/Michaelsen Life Safety (02-1-003)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 677 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Steam/Electric/Chilled Water (98-1-120)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 678 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Nicholson Pavilion (NPVA) Indoor Air Quality/Asbestos (04-1-013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 679 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (04-2-028)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,347,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,347,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 680 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-950)

Subject to allotment and other conditions defined by law for this
treasury account, the appropriation in this section is provided to keep
facilities owned and used for educational and general operations of
state colleges and universities, as defined under Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6049 (higher education facilities), in adequate condition or
better. The legislature intends that maintenance, mechanical
adjustments, repairs, and minor works supported by this project extend
the remaining useful life of the facility, be of an enduring nature
lasting thirteen years or longer, and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where educational and general program
missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Higher Education Facility Preservation Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,685,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 681 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely to undertake
preservation work over a five biennium time horizon to improve existing
state-owned facilities in the worst relative condition for housed
programs and current building occupants. The legislature's performance
expectation for the provision of this money is to stabilize and better
each institution's average facility condition index as compared to
levels reported by the joint legislative audit and review committee in
January 2003 (higher education facility preservation study, report 03-1). As a condition of this appropriation and by no later than the 2005
session, the university shall examine options and recommend an action
plan to replace outright or renew for future use Dean Hall in
Ellensburg.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 682 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utility Upgrade (04-1-952)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,688,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,088,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 683 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hogue Technology Renovation/Addition (04-2-008)

Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,950,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 684 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
CWU/Wenatchee Higher Education Center (04-2-030)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 685 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
CWU/Moses Lake Higher Education Center (04-2-031)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 686 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-953)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 687 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Life Safety/Code Compliance Reappropriation (02-1-013)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 688 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works Preservation Reappropriation (02-1-014)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 689 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Seminar Building Phase II - Construction (02-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,500,000
Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 690 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Daniel J. Evans Building - Modernization (04-2-006)

Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,250,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 691 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 692 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Lab II 3rd Floor - Chemistry Labs Remodel (04-2-007)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 693 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Life Safety Code Compliance (04-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 694 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-950)

Subject to allotment and other conditions defined by law for this
treasury account, the appropriation in this section is provided to keep
facilities owned and used for educational and general operations of
state colleges and universities, as defined under Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6049 (higher education facilities), in adequate condition or
better. The legislature intends that maintenance, mechanical
adjustments, repairs, and minor works supported by this project extend
the remaining useful life of the facility, be of an enduring nature
lasting thirteen years or longer, and shall only take place in state-
owned building structures where educational and general program
missions are housed.

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Higher Education Facility Preservation Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 695 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely to undertake
preservation work over a five biennium time horizon to improve existing
state-owned facilities in the worst relative condition for housed
programs and current building occupants. The legislature's performance
expectation for the provision of this money is to stabilize and better
each institution's average facility condition index as compared to
levels reported by the joint legislative audit and review committee in
January 2003 (higher education facility preservation study, report 03-1).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 696 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works Program (04-2-003)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 697 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-952)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 698 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Campus Infrastructure Development (98-2-024)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,819,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,419,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,938,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 699 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Communications Facility (98-2-053)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,500,000
Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,973,400
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,473,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 700 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (02-1-070)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Preservation - Safety (02-1-071)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations of sections 905 and 906 of this act.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Academic Instructional Center (02-2-026)

Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,618,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,438,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,171,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (02-2-072)

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,031,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations in section 223, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-951)

Subject to allotment and other conditions defined by law for this
treasury account, the appropriation in this section is provided to keep
facilities owned and used for educational and general operations of
state colleges and universities, as defined under Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6049 (higher education facilities), in adequate condition or
better. The legislature intends that maintenance, mechanical
adjustments, repairs, and minor works supported by this project extend
the remaining useful life of the facility, be of an enduring nature
lasting thirteen years or longer, and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where educational and general program
missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Higher Education Facility Preservation Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,750,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-952)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely to undertake
preservation work over a five biennium time horizon to improve existing
state-owned facilities in the worst relative condition for housed
programs and current building occupants. The legislature's performance
expectation for the provision of this money is to stabilize and better
each institution's average facility condition index as compared to
levels reported by the joint legislative audit and review committee in
January 2003 (higher education facility preservation study, report 03-1).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (04-1-075)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (04-2-077)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,925,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Shannon Point Marine - Undergraduate Center (04-2-059)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Planetarium Improvement (04-2-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for,
and shall be expended as matching funds for the replacement of, the
Western Washington University planetarium projector. Western
Washington University shall expend at least an equal amount from
institutional funds or donated funds received for the same purpose. If
an appropriate replacement projector can be obtained for less than
$250,000, the university may reserve any excess funds for future
repair, replacement, or operation of the planetarium.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Miller Hall Renovation (08-2-078)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,750,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-999)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 FOR THE STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Tacoma: State History Museum Preservation (02-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,016
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $373,016

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Lewis and Clark Trail Interpretive Infrastructure Grant Program
(02-4-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided for development of station camp 1805 as a national historic
park in conjunction with the projected relocation of highway 101 in
Pacific county.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (02-S-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $552,226
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,552,226

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Olympia-State Capital Museum Preservation Projects (02-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $649,397
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $705,397

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma - Stadium Way Research Center Preservation Projects
(02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,830

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,017
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $339,847

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project (02-4-004)

The reappropriation in this section shall support the projects as
listed in section 734, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,194,136
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,694,136

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Stadium Way Research Center - Code Violation Correction (04-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,200

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project (04-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The appropriation is provided for the following list of
projects:

Project Amount Recommended

Museum of flight $350,000

Lopez Island historical society $60,000

Olympia Waldorf school $45,000

Spokane parks and recreation $136,000

Georgetown community council $50,000

Museum of history and industry $350,000

Fort Nisqually living history museum $350,000

Ilwaco heritage foundation $179,400

Jefferson county public works $350,000

Historic Seattle PDA $350,000

American museum of radio $151,799

Gig Harbor - peninsula historical society $140,000

Bigelow House preservation association $33,900

Northwest maritime center $350,000

Suquamish museum and tribal cultural center $7,000

City of Roslyn $181,816

Duwamish tribal service, inc. $350,000

City of Sprague $98,000

Spokane symphony $56,925

Enumclaw plateau historical society $54,054

Gallery one $115,500

World kite museum and hall of fame $115,500

City of Port Angeles $112,200

Vashon parks $12,906

TOTAL $4,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College - Allied Health Building (98-2-661)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,089

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,861,686
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,036,775

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park: Transportation Trade - Construction (96-2-662)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,380,368

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,665,032
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,045,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College Poulsbo Center: Construction (96-2-654)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,596,675
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,046,675

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Health/Business Building (98-2-672)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,737,347

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,199,252
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,936,599

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Phase 3 - New Facility
(98-2-673)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,627,984

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,377,016
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,005,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Renton Technical College: Technology Resource Center (98-2-674)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,379,770

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,391,230
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Skagit Valley Community College: Whidbey Higher Education Center
(98-2-675)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $641,516

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,278,097
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,919,613

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia College: Instructional Building Replacement (99-2-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $172,934

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,227,066
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Clark Center at Washington State University
Vancouver (00-2-680)

No money from the appropriations in this section may be expended
that would be inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher
education coordinating board and the project design, scope, and
schedule approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,096,000
Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,009,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $668,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,773,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 730 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facilities Repairs "A" (00-1-050)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,784,463
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,847
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,310

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,529,690
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 731 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Drama/Music Class - Renovation
(00-2-322)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $398,031

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,031,969
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 732 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Highline Community College: Higher Ed Center/Childcare (00-2-678)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $985,949
Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,654,000
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,898,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,552,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,359,051
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,897,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 733 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (Minor Improvements) (00-1-130)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,587,700
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,506
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,896,206

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,953,794
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 734 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Physical Plant Building Replacement (00-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,607

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,698,993
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,115,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 735 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup: Phase III Expansion (00-2-676)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $723,985
Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,374,774

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,236,215
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,334,974

NEW SECTION. Sec. 736 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Library/Technical Center (00-2-319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,408

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,034,592
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 737 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Humanities/General Education
Complex (00-2-679)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,092,690
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,350,248

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $812,310
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,255,248

NEW SECTION. Sec. 738 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Whatcom Community College: Classroom/Lab Building (00-2-677)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $372,634
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,932,400

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $599,266
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,904,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 739 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Higher Education Center
(00-2-954)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,214,248

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,285,752
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 740 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Science Building (01-2-688)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,396,409

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,407,191
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,903,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 741 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Science Building (01-2-687)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,379,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,929,265
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,408,265

NEW SECTION. Sec. 742 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Technology Institute Partner College Computer Labs (01-2-689)

The reappropriation in this section is provided to complete
construction and equip three computer science and language labs, an
approximate size being 1,200 square feet, one at each of the following
college districts: Highline, Olympic, and South Puget Sound, as
provided in section 824, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,722

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,154,278
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 743 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College: LRC/Vocational (02-2-684)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,796,206

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,346
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,168,902
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,059,454

NEW SECTION. Sec. 744 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: "A" Building Renovation (02-1-320)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,531

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,569
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,566,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 745 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Replacement (02-1-239)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,307,533

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,367
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,357,900

NEW SECTION. Sec. 746 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Big Bend Community College: Library Replacement (02-1-232)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,128,718

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,282
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,497,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 747 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Clover Park Technical College: Building 18 Machine Trades
(02-1-343)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,583,308

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,492
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,791,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 748 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Building "A" Renovation (02-1-333)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,387,456

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,046,644
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,434,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 749 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Instructional Lab Building (02-2-685)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,939,060

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,491,466
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,488,526

NEW SECTION. Sec. 750 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (02-1-050)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,716,919

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,943,409
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,660,328

NEW SECTION. Sec. 751 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Library Renovation (02-1-311)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,142,150

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,437,350
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,579,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 752 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: International Program Replacement
(02-1-222)

Reappropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $501,790

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,280
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $587,070

NEW SECTION. Sec. 753 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Replacement (02-1-240)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,536,746

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $378,554
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,915,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 754 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Physical Science Portables Replacement
(02-1-226)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,445,865

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $513,935
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,959,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 755 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Preservation (Emergency Funds) (02-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,912,186

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,087,814
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 756 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (02-1-130)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the conditions
and limitations in section 795(1), chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp.
sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,744,801
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,365,870
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,110,671

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,156,829
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,267,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 757 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Buildings D and E Renovation (02-1-310)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,656,850

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,950
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,669,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 758 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Portables Replacement (02-1-223)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,134,848

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,252
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,452,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 759 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (02-1-010)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,370,213

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,102,864
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,473,077

NEW SECTION. Sec. 760 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Edison Hall Renovation
(02-1-315)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,705,209

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,103,991
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,809,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 761 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Portables Replacement
(02-1-215)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,808,687

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,713
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,897,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 762 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Building 800 Renovation (02-1-319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,858,057

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,043
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,021,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 763 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (02-1-090)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the reappropriation from the
state building construction account--state is provided solely to South
Seattle Community College for the Seattle Chinese gardens. The
appropriation must be matched by $200,000 in additional contributions
toward the project from local government.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,852,474
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,941,474

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,601,758
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,543,232

NEW SECTION. Sec. 764 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Office Space Replacement (02-1-213)

Reappropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $752,777

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,912
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $762,689

NEW SECTION. Sec. 765 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Family Education/Child Center
(02-1-238)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,718,357

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,643
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,132,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 766 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Building "A" Replacement
(02-1-217)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,190,236

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,164
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,477,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 767 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Fine Arts Building Replacement
(02-1-231)

Reappropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $672,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $672,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 768 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Library Renovation (02-1-331)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,269,005

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $332,995
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 769 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Information Technology Vocational Center
(02-2-683)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $534,671
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,531,900

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $663,429
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 770 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Portable Buildings Replacement
(02-1-236)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,437,867

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,133
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 771 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Basic Skills/Computer Lab
(02-2-686)

Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,300
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,431,700
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,041,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 772 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Parent/Child Center Replacement
(02-1-234)

Reappropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,907

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,323
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,230

NEW SECTION. Sec. 773 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Greenhouse Replacement (02-1-220)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,360

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,360

NEW SECTION. Sec. 774 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section shall support the projects as
listed in section 224, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $865,437
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,209,178
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,074,615

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,525,560
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,600,175

NEW SECTION. Sec. 775 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Cascadia Community College/University of Washington Bothell - State
Route 522 Access (02-2-999)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,390,000
Appropriation:
Gardner Evans Bonds--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,565,516
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 10,565,516

NEW SECTION. Sec. 776 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Replacement Science and Technology Building
(04-1-208)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,752,500
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,835,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 777 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Science Building Replacement (04-1-212)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,721,600

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,721,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 778 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Welding/Auto Collision Replacement
(04-1-213)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,838,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 779 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Instructional/Fine Arts Building
Replacement (04-1-214)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,473,314

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,473,314

NEW SECTION. Sec. 780 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates-Clover Park Equipment Improvements (04-2-950)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 781 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: "D" Building Renovation (04-1-308)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,418,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,418,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 782 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Renovation - Applied Arts 5 (04-1-303)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,872,413

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,872,413

NEW SECTION. Sec. 783 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Stout Hall (04-1-203)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,049,889

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,049,889

NEW SECTION. Sec. 784 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Renovation - "T" Building (04-1-307)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,058,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,058,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 785 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Renovation - Mountlake Terrace Hall
(04-1-311)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,827,030

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,827,030

NEW SECTION. Sec. 786 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Pilchuck/Glacier (04-1-205)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,311,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,633,300
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,945,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 787 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Renovation - Monte Cristo Hall
(04-1-305)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 788 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Infrastructure Repairs
(04-1-950)

Subject to allotment and other conditions defined by law for this
treasury account, the appropriation in this section is provided to keep
facilities owned and used for educational and general operations of
state colleges and universities, as defined under Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6049 (higher education facilities), in adequate condition or
better. The legislature intends that maintenance, mechanical
adjustments, repairs, and minor works supported by this project extend
the remaining useful life of the facility, be of an enduring nature
lasting thirteen years or longer, and shall only take place in state-owned building structures where educational and general program
missions are housed.

Appropriation:
Higher Education Facility Preservation Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,183,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $121,783,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 789 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely to undertake
preservation work over a three biennium time horizon to improve
existing state-owned facilities in the worst relative condition for
housed programs and current building occupants. The legislature's
performance expectation for the provision of this money is to stabilize
and better the system's average facility condition index as compared to
levels reported by the joint legislative audit and review committee in
January 2003 (higher education facility preservation study, report 03-1). Any building that scored "4" or "5" in the statewide comparable
framework survey establishing baseline conditions qualifies for an
allotment of funds as do predesign studies for future preservation
projects, and the following list of eligible preservation projects
submitted by the board:

Project Amount
Pierce-Ft. Steilacoom renovation-Fitness center
(04-1-306) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,928,802
Highline childcare center (replaces
portables; 00-2-678) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Yakima classroom replacement
(Anton/Glenn; 04-1-207)-Design . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Minor Works - Preservation (RMI; 04-1-001) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,500,000
Olympic Science and Technology Replacement
(04-12-02) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,110,000
South Seattle replacement portables (04-1-210) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,882,200
Seattle Central-Broadway Edison (student
services; 04-1-310) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,995,800
Facility repairs (04-1-050) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,428,699

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $229,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $294,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 790 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Replacement - Instructional Building
(04-1-204)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,263,300

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,371,700
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 791 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Computer Technology Center
(04-2-682)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $356,193
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,984,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $658,507
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,999,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 792 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Renovation - East/West
Buildings (04-1-312)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,420,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,420,800

NEW SECTION. Sec. 793 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (Minor Improvements) (04-2-130)
(1) Funding is provided as capital project matching funds to the
following colleges: Pierce College-Ft. Steilacoom $500,000; Bellevue
$500,000; Lake Washington $500,000; Peninsula $500,000. Matching funds
provided in this section do not imply commitments or guarantees that
the legislature will provide future expenses of properties and
facilities acquired, constructed, or improved. State funds must be
matched by an equal or greater amount of nonstate moneys.
(2) Within appropriated funds, the state board for community and
technical colleges may allocate sums necessary to support new
programmatic predesign studies for the following college districts:
Bellevue (04-2-690), Everett (04-2-692), Cascadia (04-2-693), and South
Puget Sound (04-2-695).

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,040,317

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,040,317

NEW SECTION. Sec. 794 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Arts and Science Renovation
(04-1-309)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,785,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,785,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 795 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Science and Technology Building Replacement
(04-1-202)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,998,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 796 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup: Community Arts/Allied Health (04-1-691)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,797,400
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,947,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 797 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College-Ft. Steilacoom: Science and Technology (04-1-694)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,060,400
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,250,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 798 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "B" (04-1-790)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,408,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 799 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: NWCET Expansion (04-2-402)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $938,100

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $938,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 800 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Childcare Center (04-2-401)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,248,892

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,248,892

NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Community Resource Center (04-2-406)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $939,908

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $939,908

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Renton Technical College: Portable Replacement (04-1-215)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $419,300

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,630,300
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,049,600

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (04-1-010)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,265,677

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,265,677

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "B" (04-1-710)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central: Replacement North Plaza Building (04-1-275)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,976,200

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,976,200

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (04-1-090)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,305,624

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,305,624

NEW SECTION. Sec. 807 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Science Building Replacement (04-1-209)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 808 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Instructional Technology Center
(04-2-681)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,759
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,236,600

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $910,641
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,861,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 809 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Renovation - Pastry Vocational
Program (04-1-314)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,613,100

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,613,100

NEW SECTION. Sec. 810 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Renovation - Building 7 (04-1-313)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,988,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,988,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 811 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Replacement - Portable Buildings
(04-1-206)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,622,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,622,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 812 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Health Science Facility (04-1-211)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,261,400

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,261,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 813 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Portable Replacement (04-1-201)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 814 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Renovation - Sundquist Annex
(04-1-302)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,852,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,852,700

NEW SECTION. Sec. 815 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Infrastructure Savings (04-1-952)

Projects that are completed in accordance with section 915 of this
act may have their remaining funds transferred to this appropriation
for other preservation projects approved by the office of financial
management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 The estimated debt service costs impacting
future general fund expenditures related solely to new capital
appropriations within this act are $18,827,417 during the 2003-2005
fiscal period; $111,194,423 during the 2005-2007 fiscal period;
$155,435,444 during the 2007-2009 fiscal period; $155,435,444 during
the 2009-2011 fiscal period; and $155,435,444 during the 2011-2013
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 To ensure that major construction projects
are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent,
appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be
expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has
reviewed and approved the agency's predesign and other documents, and
approved an allotment for the project granting specific authority to
expend or encumber funds. The predesign document shall include but not
be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in accordance with the
predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management. To
improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports
shall be submitted by the agency administering the project to the
office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the
house of representatives and senate. Reports will be submitted on July
1st and December 31st each year in a format to be developed by the
office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 Allotments for appropriations shall be
provided in accordance with the capital project review requirements
adopted by the office of financial management. The office of financial
management shall notify the house of representatives capital budget
committee and the senate ways and means committee of allotment releases
based on review by the office of financial management. No expenditure
may be incurred or obligation entered into for appropriations in this
act until the office of financial management has given final approval
to the allotment of the funds to be expended or encumbered. Projects
that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures
under chapter 39.10 RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined
in this section and RCW 43.88.110. Contracts shall not be executed
that call for expenditures in excess of the approved allotment, and the
total amount shown in such contracts for the cost of future work that
has not been appropriated shall not exceed the amount identified for
such work in the level of funding approved by the office of financial
management at the completion of predesign.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 Appropriations for design and construction
of facilities on higher education campuses shall be expended only after
funds are allotted to institutions of higher education on the basis of:
(1) Comparable unit cost standards, as determined by the office of
financial management in consultation with the higher education
coordinating board; (2) costs consistent with other higher education
teaching facilities in the state; and (3) student full-time equivalent
enrollment levels as established by the office of financial management
in consultation with the higher education coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 To ensure that minor works appropriations
are carried out in accordance with legislative intent, funds shall not
be allotted until project lists are on file at the office of financial
management. No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into
for appropriations referring to this section until the office of
financial management has approved the allotment of the funds to be
expended. The office of financial management shall encourage state
agencies to incorporate accessibility planning and improvements into
the normal and customary capital program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 (1) The legislature expects projects to be
ready to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of
the project or program that is the subject of the appropriation.
Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two
biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large
infrastructure grantor loan or loan programs supporting projects that
often take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally
does not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for
smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.
(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and
appropriations in order to: (a) Rehabilitate infrastructure resources;
(b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation and restoration projects
for the improvement of the state's natural environment; (c) reduce
additional costs associated with acquisition and construction
inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional employment
opportunities associated with capital expenditures.
(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.
(4) The office of financial management shall report the following
to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by January 30,
2005: (a) A listing of reappropriations in the governor's 2005-2007
capital budget recommendation that have been reappropriated one or more
times and have ten percent or more of the original appropriation
unexpended; and (b) an explanation of why the appropriation remains
unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES
THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into
financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or
nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the
principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under
this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract
option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase
agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or
financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures
made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue
date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of
participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of
the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to
the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the
state finance committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
(1) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for an amount approved by the office of financial management
for costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to lease develop or lease purchase a state office
building of 150,000 to 200,000 square feet on state-owned property in
Tumwater according to the terms of the agreement with the Port of
Olympia when the property was acquired or within the preferred
development/leasing areas in Thurston county. The building shall be
constructed and financed so that agency occupancy costs will not exceed
comparable private market rental rates. The comparable general office
space rate shall be calculated based on the three latest Thurston
county leases of new space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet
adjusted for inflation as determined by the department of general
administration. The department of general administration shall
coordinate with potential state agency tenants whose current lease
expire near the time of occupancy so that buyout of current leases do
not add to state expense. The office of financial management shall
certify to the state treasurer: (a) The project description and dollar
amount; and (b) that all requirements of this subsection (1) have been
met.
(2) Department of corrections:
(a) Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $400,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a waste transfer station and purchase a garbage truck at
the McNeil Island corrections center.
(b) Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $4,588,000
plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94
RCW to construct a transportation services warehouse and offices for
correctional industries.
(3) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound
Community College in the amount of $660,000 plus financing expenses and
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct parking and
stormwater mitigation facilities.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Seattle Central
Community College in the amount of $3,000,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an
above-ground parking garage.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Big Bend Community
College in the amount of $6,500,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an
international conference and training center and dining services center
building.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community
College in the amount of $725,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellevue Community
College in the amount of $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase North
Center.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark Community
College in the amount of $9,839,464 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a
bookstore, meeting rooms, student lounge, and study space.
(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College in the amount of $2,175,100 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land
and construct a building for professional-technical instruction.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College in the amount of $504,400 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and
buildings at the Clarkston center.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College in the amount of $7,000,000 plus financing expenses
and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a 20,000 square
foot Kent Campus development.
(j) Authority provided in this subsection (4) does not imply
commitments or guarantees that the legislature will provide future
expenses of properties and facilities acquired, constructed, or
improved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated
in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is
provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington
state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects
in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order
to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of any public building by a state agency as
defined in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW
43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission may combine the
proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art
or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.
(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
Washington state arts commission during the 2003-2005 biennium for the
purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended
solely for direct acquisition of works of art.
(5) Funds established by subsection (4) of this section not
expended by June 30, 2005, shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 The amounts shown under the headings
"Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for
informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval
of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate
prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia
in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount of zero
does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide
funding for the project or program in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 "Reappropriations" in this act are
appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are
subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to
appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended
balances remaining on June 30, 2003, from the 2001-2003 biennial
appropriations for each project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912 If any federal moneys appropriated by this
act for capital projects are not received by the state, the department
or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace the federal
moneys with funds available from private or local sources. No
replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval of
the director of financial management in consultation with the senate
ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914 Any capital improvements or capital
projects involving construction or major expansion of a state office
facility, including, but not limited to, district headquarters,
detachment offices, and off-campus faculty offices, must be reviewed by
the department of general administration for possible consolidation,
collocation, and compliance with state office standards before
allotment of funds. The intent of the requirement imposed by this
section is to eliminate duplication and reduce total office space
requirements where feasible, while ensuring proper service to the
public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915 The governor, through the office of
financial management, may authorize a transfer of appropriation
authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of the
amount required for the completion of such project to another capital
project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer
may be used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended
by the legislature in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be
effected only between capital appropriations to a specific department,
commission, agency, or institution of higher education and only between
capital projects that are funded from the same fund or account. No
transfers may occur between projects to local government agencies
except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus
appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by
the implementing statutes that govern the grants.
For purposes of this section, the governor may find that an amount
is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project
only if: (1) The project as defined in the notes to the budget
document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or
(2) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial
certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget
document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount
appropriated in this act.
For the purposes of this section, the legislature intends that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916 NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the
state building construction account may be transferred to the state
taxable building construction account as deemed necessary by the state
finance committee to comply with the federal internal revenue service
rules and regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond
proceeds. The state treasurer shall submit written notification to the
director of financial management if it is determined that a shift of
appropriation authority from the state building construction account to
the state taxable building construction account is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917 The office of financial management, in
consultation with the department of general administration, shall
identify capital projects that may benefit from an energy analysis to
determine whether there are alternate, more economical, and energy
efficient means of completing the work. The office of financial
management shall hold appropriations in allotment reserve on the
following types of capital projects until this analysis can be
completed: Heating, ventilation, and air conditioning modifications,
chiller plants, steam plants, boilers, chilled water or steam lines,
building control systems, lighting improvements, or other major energy
using systems that may warrant additional analysis. Agencies receiving
appropriations for such projects are encouraged to utilize energy
performance contracts or alternative financing for equipment in lieu of
state appropriated funds. The office of financial management may
transfer funds remaining in allotment reserve to infrastructure savings
projects within the agency that has realized savings from energy
efficiency alternatives.

Sec. 918 RCW 43.135.045 and 2002 c 33 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter. However, during the 2001-2003 biennium, the
legislature may transfer moneys from the emergency reserve fund to the
general fund only with approval of a majority of the members of each
house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation does not
cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit under
this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund hereby
created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2003, and
ending June 30, 2005, funds may also be used for higher education
facilities preservation.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.
(6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated.

Sec. 919 RCW 43.135.045 and 2001 c 3 s 9, 2000 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1,
and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund hereby
created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2003, and
ending June 30, 2005, funds may also be used for higher education
facilities preservation.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.
(6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 920 On July 1, 2003, $53,750,000 from the
education construction account is transferred to the higher education
facility preservation account.

Sec. 921 RCW 46.09.170 and 1995 c 166 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on the tax rate in effect January 1, 1990, less proper deductions
for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090. The
treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as follows:
(a) Forty percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for planning, maintenance, and management of ORV recreation
facilities, nonhighway roads, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than five percent may be expended for information
programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than ten percent and not more than fifty percent may
be expended for ORV recreation facilities;
(iii) Not more than twenty-five percent may be expended for
maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(iv) Not more than fifty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(v) Ten percent shall be transferred to the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation for grants to law enforcement agencies in those
counties where the department of natural resources maintains ORV
facilities. This amount is in addition to those distributions made by
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under (d)(i) of this
subsection;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of nonhighway roads and recreation
facilities;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the maintenance and management of ORV use areas and facilities; and
(d) Fifty-four and one-half percent, together with the funds
received by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW
46.09.110, shall be credited to the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
activities program account to be administered by the committee for
planning, acquisition, development, maintenance, and management of ORV
recreation facilities and nonhighway road recreation facilities; ORV
user education and information; and ORV law enforcement programs.
During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004, a portion of these funds
may be appropriated to the department of natural resources to maintain
existing ORV and other recreation facilities, including ORV
campgrounds, and for other activities identified in this section. The
funds under this subsection shall be expended in accordance with the
following limitations, except that during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2004, funds appropriated to the committee from motor vehicle fuel
tax revenues for the activities in (d)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection
shall be reduced by the amounts appropriated to the department of
natural resources as provided in this subsection:
(i) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for ORV education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than an amount equal to the funds received by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110 and
not more than sixty percent may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(iii) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities.
(2) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 922 Section 918 of this act expires June 30,
2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 923 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 924 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 919 of this act which takes effect June
30, 2003.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 88
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 107
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 125
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 76
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 108
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 111
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 109
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 135
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 112
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 118
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
--- END ---