BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 For the purpose of providing funds to
finance the projects described and authorized by the legislature in the
capital and operating appropriation acts for the 2003-2005 fiscal
biennium, and all costs incidental thereto, the state finance committee
is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of
Washington in the sum of one billion two hundred million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be required, to finance these projects and all
costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold
at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds
authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior
legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the state
building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds
shall be transferred as follows:
(1) One billion fifty million dollars to remain in the state
building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020;
(2) Twenty million dollars to the outdoor recreation account
created by RCW 79A.25.060;
(3) Twenty million dollars to the habitat conservation account
created by RCW 79A.15.020;
(4) Nine million six hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state
and local improvements revolving account--water supply facilities;
(5) Fifty million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state
taxable building construction account. All receipts from taxable bond
issues are to be deposited into the account. If the state finance
committee deems it necessary to issue more than fifty million dollars
of the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act as taxable bonds in
order to comply with federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds, the
proceeds of such additional taxable bonds shall be transferred to the
state taxable building construction account in lieu of any transfer
otherwise provided by this section. The state treasurer shall submit
written notice to the director of financial management if it is
determined that any such additional transfer to the state taxable
building construction account is necessary. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation.
These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified
in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the
issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section,
and shall be administered by the office of financial management subject
to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2 (1), (2), (3), (4),
and (5) of this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 2 (1), (2), (3), (4),
and (5) of this act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of section 2 (1), (2),
(3), (4), and (5) of this act the state treasurer shall withdraw from
any general state revenues received in the state treasury and deposit
in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an amount equal
to the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the
payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Bonds issued under sections 1 through 3
of this act shall state that they are a general obligation of the state
of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to
the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and
shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and
interest as the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature may provide additional means
for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and sections 2 and 3 of
this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for the
payment.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.42.060 and 2002 c 240 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
No bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed
money shall be issued by the state which will cause the aggregate debt
contracted by the state to exceed that amount for which payments of
principal and interest in any fiscal year would require the state to
expend more than ((seven)) eight and one-half percent of the arithmetic
mean of its general state revenues, as defined in RCW 39.42.070, for
the three immediately preceding fiscal years as certified by the
treasurer in accordance with RCW 39.42.070. It shall be the duty of
the state finance committee to compute annually the amount required to
pay principal of and interest on outstanding debt. In making such
computation, the state finance committee shall include all borrowed
money represented by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness
which are secured by the full faith and credit of the state or are
required to be paid, directly or indirectly, from general state
revenues and which are incurred by the state, any department,
authority, public corporation or quasi public corporation of the state,
any state university or college, or any other public agency created by
the state but not by counties, cities, towns, school districts, or
other municipal corporations, and shall include debt incurred pursuant
to section 3 of Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution((,
but shall exclude the following:
(1) Obligations for the payment of current expenses of state
government;
(2) Indebtedness incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;
(3) Principal of and interest on bond anticipation notes;
(4) Any indebtedness which has been refunded;
(5) Financing contracts entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;
(6) Indebtedness authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993,
pursuant to statute which requires that the state treasury be
reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and the interest on such
indebtedness, from money other than general state revenues or from the
special excise tax imposed pursuant to chapter 67.40 RCW;
(7) Indebtedness authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993,
pursuant to statute that requires that the state treasury be
reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and the interest on such
indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the state treasury, except higher
education operating fees, (b) higher education building fees, (c)
indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts, and (d)
fees and charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by
institutions of higher education;
(8) Any agreement, promissory note, or other instrument entered
into by the state finance committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection
with its acquisition of bond insurance, letters of credit, or other
credit support instruments for the purpose of guaranteeing the payment
or enhancing the marketability, or both, of any state bonds, notes, or
other evidence of indebtedness;
(9) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes identified in RCW
43.99N.020;
(10) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the school district
bond guaranty established by chapter 39.98 RCW;
(11) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of replacing the
waterproof membrane over the east plaza garage and revising related
landscaping construction pursuant to RCW 43.99Q.070; and
(12) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the state
legislative building rehabilitation, to the extent that principal and
interest payments of such indebtedness are paid from the capitol
building construction account pursuant to RCW 43.99Q.140(2)(b))).
To the extent necessary because of the constitutional or statutory
debt limitation, priorities with respect to the issuance or
guaranteeing of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness by the
state shall be determined by the state finance committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---