BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject
to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several
amounts specified in parts I through VIII of this act, or so much
thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated,
are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries,
wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and
for other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1,
2003, and ending June 30, 2005, except as otherwise provided, out of
the several funds of the state hereinafter named.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2004" or "FY 2004" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2004.
(b) "Fiscal year 2005" or "FY 2005" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2005.
(c) "FTE" means full time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose which is unnecessary to fulfill the specified purpose shall
lapse.

PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,207,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,252,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
for allocation to Project Citizen, a program of the national conference
of state legislatures to promote student civic involvement.
(2) $171,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
for the legislative ethics board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,222,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,396,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,663,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
for allocation to Project Citizen, a program of the national conference
of state legislatures to promote student civic involvement.
(2) $171,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
for the legislative ethics board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,673,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,763,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,436,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section provide
for several studies required by 2003 legislation, including Senate Bill
No. 5325 (impact funds to cities). In addition to the study of
positive and negative impacts of state facilities described in the
bill, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall also study
the impacts of the Rainier school for developmentally disabled persons
in Buckley, Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,597,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,745,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,342,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $25,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, in
consultation with the state office of the forecast council, to
establish and maintain a set of economic indicators that could be used
for adjusting the statewide salary schedule by a regional cost-of-living index. The economic indicators to be included in this index
include but are not limited to the median cost of housing.
(1) In developing the regional cost-of-living index, the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee shall
collect data on the economic activity comprising the cost-of-living
indexes for geographic areas of the state coterminous with the
boundaries of the nine educational service districts established under
RCW 28A.310.010.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2004, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee shall submit the regional cost-of-living index to an advisory committee for its review. The advisory
committee shall be appointed by the governor and shall consist of one
member representing the office of financial management, one member
representing the employment security department, one member
representing the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and three representatives of the private sector having demonstrated
expertise in regional economics. The advisory committee shall not
receive compensation for performance of its duties but may be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(3) Not later than October 1, 2004, the advisory committee created
under this section shall submit to the director of the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee written comment on the
proposed regional cost-of-living index. The written comment may
include recommendations for revision to the index or its components.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,143,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,767,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,766,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,533,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,897,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,897,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES. In order to achieve
operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the
legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the
senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of
representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee,
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
legislative transportation committee, office of the state actuary,
joint legislative systems committee, and statute law committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,487,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,690,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,177,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,001,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,006,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,007,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,595,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,831,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,426,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $859,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $861,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,720,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,465,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,310,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,673,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,549,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,997,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The judicial information systems account appropriation shall be
used for the operations and maintenance of technology systems that
improve services provided by the supreme court, the court of appeals,
the office of public defense, and the administrator for the courts.
(2) $531,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for allocation to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for civil indigent legal
services.
(3) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2002 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2003 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependency matters. The administrator for the courts,
after consulting with the association of juvenile court administrators
and the association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed
special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of
funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally
accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain
more than six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any
other agency costs.
(4) $750,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for judicial program enhancements.
Within the funding provided in this subsection, the administrator for
the courts, in consultation with the supreme court, shall determine the
program or programs to receive an enhancement. Among the programs that
may be funded from the amount provided in this subsection are unified
family courts.
(5) $9,937,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for improvements and enhancements to
the judicial information system. This funding shall only be expended
after the office of the administrator for the courts certifies to the
office of financial management that there will be at least a $1,000,000
ending fund balance in the judicial information systems account at the
end of the 2003-05 biennium.
(6) $3,000,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for school district petitions to
juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and
28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this
subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be
based on the number of petitions filed.
(7) $13,224,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to county juvenile
court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children
in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The office of the
administrator for the courts shall not retain any portion of these
funds to cover administrative costs. The office of the administrator
for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula
shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average
per-petition processing costs.
(8) The distributions made under subsection (7) of this section and
distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made
pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate
reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of
service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.
(9) Each quarter during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, each county
shall report the number of petitions processed and the total actual
costs of processing the petitions in each of the following categories:
Truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth. Counties
shall submit the reports to the department no later than 45 days after
the end of the quarter. The office of the administrator for the courts
shall forward this information to the chair and ranking minority member
of the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a quarter ends.
These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for the
purpose of distributing funds.
(10) $1,813,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,562,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the purposes of Senate Bill
No. 6002 (financial obligations). If the bill is not enacted by July
1, 2003, this funding shall lapse. Of these amounts, $813,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $762,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided
solely for billing and directly related costs for the office for the
administrator for the courts. The remaining general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 of $1,000,000 and the remaining
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided
solely for distribution to the county clerks for collection of legal
financial obligations. The funding shall be distributed by the office
for the administrator for the courts to the county clerks, based on a
funding formula determined by the Washington association of county
officials, as described in Senate Bill No. 6002.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $884,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,383,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,933,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $51,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 303,
Laws of 1999 (extraordinary criminal justice costs).
(2) Amounts provided from the public safety and education account
appropriation in this section include funding for investigative
services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,089,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,892,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,120,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,716,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,817,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,716,000 of the water quality account appropriation and
$1,120,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for the Puget Sound water quality action team to implement the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action items PSAT-01 through PSAT-05.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 shall be used to develop and disseminate
scientifically-based, voluntary, kindergarten readiness standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $548,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,795,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,778,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,573,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,742,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,276,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,058,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,960,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,023,000
Department of Personnel Service Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $693,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,752,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,296,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $1,826,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,686,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29.27.072.
(4)(a) $1,944,004 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and $1,986,772 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2003-2005 biennium. The funding
level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be
required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions,
in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state
contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection
have been satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a four-year contract with the nonprofit organization to
provide public affairs coverage through June 30, 2006.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5) $867,000 of the archives and records management account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for operation of the central
microfilming bureau under RCW 40.14.020(8).
(6) $6,340,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely to reimburse the counties for the state's
share of the cost of conducting the presidential primary.
(7) $600,000 of the archives and record management--private/local
appropriation is provided solely to assist local governments in
disaster recovery efforts to protect and preserve archival documents,
upon approval of the director of financial management. A committee
composed of the secretary of state, or designee, the state archivist,
one county auditor, one county clerk member of the archives oversight
committee, and a representative from the office of financial management
shall establish the funding criteria and process by September 30, 2003.
The division of archives shall submit an annual report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
disaster recovery costs from this appropriation by individual disaster.
The report shall include: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b) actual
expenditures to date; and (c) estimates of total remaining expenditures
to be paid.
(8) Funding is provided for the continued operation of the
institutional libraries operated by the state library.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $247,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $482,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $10,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 is provided solely to facilitate the
colocation, including remodeling costs, of the office of Indian Affairs
into the same facility shared by the commission on Asian Pacific
American Affairs, commission on African American Affairs, and the
commission on Hispanic Affairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $384,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,713,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,506,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $707,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,015,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,228,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $706,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $707,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No.
5909 (governmental accountability). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES
FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $227,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,134,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,190,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,841,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,810,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,180,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $164,809,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $179,234,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state, that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $639,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,082,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,430,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,218,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,598,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,103,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,929,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,065,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,774,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,293,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,335,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $258,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,909,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,770,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $626,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,390,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,838,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center. For work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities, the
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $61,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $62,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item OCD-01.
(3) $10,180,797 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the drug control and system improvement formula
grant program, to be distributed in state fiscal year 2004 as follows:
(a) $3,551,972 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $611,177 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $1,343,603 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces and for methamphetamine education and response;
(d) $197,154 to the department for grants to support tribal law
enforcement needs;
(e) $976,897 to the department of social and health services,
division of alcohol and substance abuse, for drug courts in eastern and
western Washington;
(f) $298,246 to the department for training and technical
assistance of public defenders representing clients with special needs;
(g) $687,155 to the department to continue domestic violence legal
advocacy;
(h) $890,150 to the department of social and health services,
juvenile rehabilitation administration, to continue youth violence
prevention and intervention projects;
(i) $89,705 to the department to continue the governor's council on
substance abuse;
(j) $97,591 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne
formula grant programs;
(k) $572,919 to the office of financial management for criminal
history records improvement;
(l) $864,228 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on Byrne formula grant programs.
These amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure
authority for each program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in
excess of the amounts provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess
of those appropriated in this subsection become available, whether from
prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant distributions, the department
shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not expend them without
specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried forward and
applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs
and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and
request authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result
of this subsection.
(4) $5,085,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $5,085,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $6,145,000 of the Washington housing trust
account are provided solely for providing housing and shelter for
homeless people, including but not limited to grants to operate,
repair, and staff shelters; grants to operate transitional housing;
partial payments for rental assistance; consolidated emergency
assistance; overnight youth shelters; and emergency shelter assistance.
(5) Up to $300,000 of the Washington housing trust account
appropriation shall be used to study the impacts of publicly funded
housing projects on local services such as, but not limited to, fire
and police services.
(6) $697,000 of the community economic development account
appropriation is provided solely for support of the developmental
disabilities endowment governing board and costs of the endowment
program. The governing board may use appropriations to implement a
sliding-scale fee waiver for families earning below 150 percent of the
state median family income.
(7) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall contract with a lender or contract collection agent to
act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and
deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the
account may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and
shall be considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the
state. Repayments of loans granted under chapter 43.63A RCW shall be
made to the lender or contract collection agent as long as the loan is
outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(8) $4,609,000 of the public safety and education account and
$2,824,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account are
provided solely for civil indigent legal services.
(9) $26,862,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $26,862,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for providing early childhood
education assistance.
(10) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
manufacturing services.
(11) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the foreign offices (overseas
representatives) to expand local capacity for China, expand operations
in Shanghai, Beijing and Hong Kong, and in Mexico to assist Washington
exporters in expanding their sales opportunities.
(12) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the business retention and
expansion program to fund contracts with locally based development
organizations for local business and job retention activities.
(13) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the tourism office to market
Washington state as a travel destination to northwest states,
California, and British Columbia. By December 1, 2004, the department
shall report to the relevant legislative policy and fiscal committees
on the effectiveness of these expenditures.
(14) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for business development
activities to conduct statewide and/or regional business recruitment
and client lead generation services.
(15) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a contract with international
trade alliance of Spokane.
(16) $205,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $205,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for grants to Washington Columbia
River Gorge counties to implement their responsibilities under the
national scenic area management plan. Of this amount, $390,000 is
provided for Skamania county and $20,000 is provided for Clark county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST
COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $518,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $519,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,037,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,736,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,454,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,492,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,937,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $607,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $599,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5909 (governmental accountability). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement a pilot project to
develop an integrated environmental permit system pursuant to
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5909. If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2003, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,561,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,988,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,638,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,618,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department is authorized to enter into
a financing contract for up to $30,700,000, plus necessary financing
expenses and required reserves, pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. The
contract shall be to purchase, develop, and operationalize a new
statewide payroll system and shall be for a term of not more than
twelve years. The legislature recognizes the critical nature of the
human resource management system and its relationship to successful
implementation of civil service reform, collective bargaining, and the
ability to permit contracting out of services to the private sector.
Projects of this size and complexity have many risks associated with
their successful and timely completion, therefore, to help ensure
project success, the department of personnel and the office of
financial management shall jointly report to the legislature by January
15, 2004, on progress toward implementing the human resource management
system. The report shall include a description of mitigation
strategies employed to address the risks related to: Business
requirements not fully defined at the project outset; short time frame
for system implementation; and delays experienced by other states. The
report shall assess the probability of meeting the system
implementation schedule and recommend contingency strategies as needed.
The report shall establish the timelines, the critical path, and the
dependencies for realizing each of the benefits articulated in the
system feasibility study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,492,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $393,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,729,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,396,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,496,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 is provided solely for a contract
with a real estate investment consultant to prepare options and a
recommended strategy for the disposal of surplus property that results
from the closure of Fircrest School. The report shall be submitted to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2003. In
developing the recommended strategy, the contractor shall consult with
representatives of the city of Shoreline and shall identify the
disposal strategy that is estimated to produce the greatest long-term
investment return on the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
Dependent Care Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $389,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,532,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,921,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,083,000 of the retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely for the support of the information
systems project known as the electronic document image management
system.
(2) $124,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5094 (substitute teachers' retirement credit). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $77,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 5100 (fallen hero survivor benefits). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $21,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 1206 (plan 3 contributions). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $30,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 1207 (employee death benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $320,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute
House Bill No. 1829 (retire-rehire reform). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $125,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute
House Bill No. 1202 (emergency medical technicians' retirement). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,698,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,270,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,144,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $162,294,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5034
(property tax relief for senior citizens due to disability). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5783
(implementation of the streamlined sales tax agreement). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,135,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $981,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,116,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL
County Research Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $769,000
City and Town Research Services -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,852,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,621,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S
BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,534,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $263,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,217,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,328,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,073,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Beginning on the effective date of this
act, the department of general administration shall not purchase or
lease any additional automobiles for the state motor pool unless the
director of general administration determines that the purchase or
lease is necessary for the safety of state personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,587,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $635,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,148,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,783,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the death investigation
account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial
assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations.
The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding
these funds for multiple death investigations involving an
unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving
multiple jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,621,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,481,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,482,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,717,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,047,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,727,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,000,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is
provided solely for the costs associated with the completion of the
merchandising business system. Actual expenditures are limited to the
balance of funds remaining from the $4,803,000 appropriation provided
for the merchandise business system in the 2001-03 budget.
(2) $1,309,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is
provided solely for the costs associated with purchasing merchandise
business system software and hardware-related items, and hiring system-related staff.
(3) No moneys under this appropriation shall be spent for
authorizing or adopting an alcohol impact area under chapter 314-12 WAC
or any additional modifications to an existing alcohol impact area
under chapter 314-12 WAC until an existing study of a current alcohol
impact area is completed by the board or by April 1, 2004, whichever is
later.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Public Service Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,835,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,774,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,049,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,658,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Consistent with the purposes of RCW
80.01.080, the commission may accept reimbursement for travel by its
employees to participate in multi-state regulatory matters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers' Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $699,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,493,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,230,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,967,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,941,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,424,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,083,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,699,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,489,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $190,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation
is provided solely to develop and implement a disaster grant management
system. The military department shall also submit a report quarterly
to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing information on the disaster response account,
including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the account; (b)
the current available fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c)
the projected fund balance at the end of the 2003-05 biennium based on
current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) $10,083,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state
appropriation and $48,699,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--federal appropriation are provided solely for response and recovery
costs associated with the February 28, 2001, earthquake. The military
department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing earthquake
recovery costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(e) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and by amount paid on
behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The military
department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2003-05 biennium based on current revenue and
expenditure patterns.
(3) $3,000,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state
appropriation is provided solely to cover other response and recovery
costs associated with the Nisqually earthquake that are not eligible
for federal emergency management agency reimbursement. Prior to
expending funds provided in this subsection, the military department
shall obtain prior approval of the director of financial management.
Prior to approving any single project of over $1,000,000, the office of
financial management shall notify the fiscal committees of the
legislature. The military department is to submit a quarterly report
detailing the costs authorized under this subsection to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees.
(4) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $53,555,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for homeland security, to be distributed as
follows:
(a) $9,469,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to units
of local government for homeland security purposes. Any communications
equipment purchased shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $200,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to
the department to conduct the terrorism consequence management program;
(c) $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
department to conduct a critical infrastructure assessment;
(d) $500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
office of financial management for the citizen corps and the community
emergency response teams;
(e) $1,384,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to the
department to provide homeland security exercise and training
opportunities to state and local governments, and to develop, monitor,
coordinate, and manage statewide homeland security programs, including
required grant administration, monitoring, and reporting;
(f) $39,917,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
other anticipated homeland security needs. This amount shall not be
allotted until a spending plan is approved by the governor's domestic
security advisory group and the office of financial management;
(g) The remaining general fund--federal appropriation may be
expended according to federal requirements;
(h) Federal moneys shall be carried forward and applied to the pool
of moneys available for appropriation for programs and projects in the
succeeding fiscal year. Funding is contingent upon receipt of federal
awards. As part of its budget request in each year, the department
shall estimate and request authority to spend any federal funds
remaining available as a result of this subsection;
(i) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for Washington state; incremental changes from
the previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security
expenditures by the state and local governments with this federal
funding; and matching or accompanying state or local expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,381,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,455,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,545,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,381,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $40,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 is provided solely for the
implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5012 (charter
schools). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,037,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,581,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,618,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in this act to the department of
social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by
this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include
transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other
than that purpose, except as expressly provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,855,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,167,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,067,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,920,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,358,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $903,767,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,271,000 of the fiscal year 2004 general fund--state
appropriation, $2,271,000 of the fiscal year 2005 general fund--state
appropriation, and $1,584,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the category of services titled
"intensive family preservation services."
(2) $701,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2004
appropriation and $701,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2005
appropriation are provided to contract for the operation of one
pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2004
appropriation, $375,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2005
appropriation, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) Within funding provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures. The
department shall adjust adoption support benefits to account for the
availability of the new federal adoption support tax credit for special
needs children.
(5) $50,000 of the fiscal year 2004 general fund--state
appropriation and $50,000 of the fiscal year 2005 general fund--state
appropriation are provided solely for a street youth program in
Spokane.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,282,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,773,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,207,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,471,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,139,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,970,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $711,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $6,051,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts
provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county
impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $1,201,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $1,201,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $5,264,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely to implement
community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection
may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the
grants.
(4) $2,557,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely to implement alcohol and
substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on
a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision
of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for
evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and
shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for juvenile rehabilitation
administration to contract with the institute for public policy for
responsibilities assigned in chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions).
(6) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a contract for expanded
services of the teamchild project.
(7) $16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
167, Laws of 1999 (firearms on school property). The amounts provided
in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 167, Laws of 1999, and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(8) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the continued implementation
of the juvenile violence prevention grant program established in
section 204, chapter 309, Laws of 1999.
(9) The juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation
with the juvenile court administrators, may agree on a formula to allow
the transfer of funds among amounts appropriated for consolidated
juvenile services, community juvenile accountability act grants, the
chemically dependent disposition alternative, and the special sex
offender disposition alternative. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration shall report to the legislature on the formula used and
the transferred funding amounts, on a semiannual basis, by county.
(10) For the purposes of a pilot project recommended by the family
policy council, the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall
provide a block grant, rather than categorical funding, for
consolidated juvenile services, community juvenile accountability act
grants, the chemically dependent disposition alternative, and the
special sex offender disposition alternative to the Pierce county
juvenile court. To evaluate the effect of decategorizing funding for
youth services, the juvenile court shall do the following:
(a) Develop intermediate client outcomes according to the risk
assessment tool (RAT) currently used by juvenile courts and in
coordination with the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the
family policy council;
(b) Track the number of youth participating in each type of
service, intermediate outcomes, and the incidence of recidivism within
twenty-four months of completion of services;
(c) Track similar data as in (b) of this subsection with an
appropriate control group, selected in coordination with the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council;
(d) Document the process for managing block grant funds on a
quarterly basis, and provide this report to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the family policy council; and
(e) Provide an initial process evaluation to the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council by January
30, 2004, and an intermediate evaluation by December 31, 2004. The
court shall develop this evaluation in consultation with the juvenile
rehabilitation administration, the family policy council, and the
Washington state institute of public policy.
(11) $1,416,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,417,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for additional research-based
services to the juvenile parole population, including quality control
efforts to ensure appropriate implementation of research-based
services. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall consult
with the institute for public policy in deciding which interventions to
provide to the parole population and appropriate levels of quality
control. Of the total general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, up to $55,000 may be used for additional suicide precaution
training for staff.
(12) $2,853,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,907,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for reimbursement to counties for
local juvenile disposition alternatives implemented in Senate Bill No.
5903 (juvenile offender sentencing). The juvenile rehabilitation
administration shall adjust this funding level in the event that
utilization rates of the disposition alternatives are lower than the
level anticipated by the total appropriations to the juvenile
rehabilitation administration. To the extent that youth in community
commitment placement are placed in alternatives to secure detention and
become eligible for state-funded chemical dependency treatment, the
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall reduce daily rates paid to
counties for this disposition alternative to a level consistent with
actual costs of the community placement and offset the cost of state-funded chemical dependency treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $206,202,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,961,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,335,000
General Fund--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,970,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $786,918,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Regional support networks shall use portions of the general
fund--state appropriation for implementation of working agreements with
the vocational rehabilitation program which will maximize the use of
federal funding for vocational programs.
(b) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and adult services program for the
general fund--state cost of medicaid personal care services that
enrolled regional support network consumers use because of their
psychiatric disability.
(c) Within funds appropriated in this subsection, the department
shall contract with the Clark county regional support network for
development and operation of a project demonstrating collaborative
methods for providing intensive mental health services in the school
setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who are medicaid
eligible. Project services are to be delivered by teachers and
teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision
of, mental health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter
275-57 WAC. The department shall increase medicaid payments to the
regional support network by the amount necessary to cover the necessary
and allowable costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the upper
payment limit specified for the regional support network in the
department's medicaid waiver agreement with the federal government
after meeting all other medicaid spending requirements assumed in this
subsection. The regional support network shall provide the department
with (i) periodic reports on project service levels, methods, and
outcomes; and (ii) an intergovernmental transfer equal to the state
share of the increased medicaid payment provided for operation of this
project.
(d) The health services account appropriation is provided solely
for implementation of strategies which the department and the affected
regional support networks conclude will best assure continued
availability of community-based inpatient psychiatric services in all
areas of the state. Such strategies may include, but are not limited
to, emergency contracts for continued operation of inpatient facilities
otherwise at risk of closure because of demonstrated uncompensated
care; start-up grants for development of evaluation and treatment
facilities; and increases in the rate paid for inpatient psychiatric
services for medically indigent and/or general assistance for the
unemployed patients. The funds provided in this subsection must be:
(i) Prioritized for use in those areas of the state which are at
greatest risk of lacking sufficient inpatient psychiatric treatment
capacity, rather than being distributed on a formula basis; (ii)
prioritized for use by those hospitals that do not receive low-income
disproportionate share hospital payments as of the date of application
for funding; and (iii) matched on a one-quarter local and three-quarters state basis by funding from the regional support network or
networks in the area in which the funds are expended. Payments from
the amount provided in this subsection shall not be made to any
provider that has not agreed that, except for prospective rate
increases, the payment shall offset, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, any
liability that may be established against, or any settlement that may
be agreed to by the state, regarding the rate of state reimbursement
for inpatient psychiatric care. The funds provided in this subsection
shall not be considered "available resources" as defined in RCW
71.24.025 and are not subject to the distribution formula established
pursuant to RCW 71.24.035.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,626,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,404,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,274,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,342,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $344,646,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this
subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) The mental health program at Western state hospital shall
continue to use labor provided by the Tacoma prerelease program of the
department of corrections.
(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,770,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,178,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,948,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,381,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,090,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for operational costs associated
with a less restrictive step-down placement facility on McNeil Island.
(b) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for mitigation funding for
jurisdictions affected by the placement of less restrictive alternative
facilities on McNeil Island for persons conditionally released from the
special commitment center facility. Of this amount, $45,000 per year
shall be paid to the City of Lakewood on September 1, 2003, and
September 1, 2004, for police protection at western state hospital and
adjacent areas as partial reimbursement for services provided, up to
$45,000 per year is provided for training police personnel on chapter
12, Laws of 2001, 2nd sp. sess. (3ESSB 6151), up to $125,000 per year
is provided for Pierce county for reimbursement of additional costs,
and the remaining amounts are for other documented costs by
jurisdictions directly impacted by the placement of the secure
community transition facility on McNeil Island. Pursuant to chapter
12, Laws of 2001, 2nd sp. sess. (3ESSB 6151), the department shall
continue to work with local jurisdictions towards reaching agreement
for mitigation costs.
(c) $1,065,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $111,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 are provided solely for the purchase of a vessel to
provide transportation to McNeil Island, consistent with increased
staffing.
(d) $924,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,429,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for operational costs associated
with a less restrictive step-down placement facility located outside of
Pierce county. In selecting a site, the department is encouraged to
purchase or lease a site in an industrial area close to employment
opportunities and treatment services, in an effort to reduce operating
expenditures related to transportation and staff time.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,082,000

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,729,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,637,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,759,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,224,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,628,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $435,844,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,038,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,734,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The health services account appropriation and $1,038,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for health care
benefits for home care workers with family incomes below 175 percent of
the federal poverty level who are employed through state contracts for
twenty hours per week or more. Premium payments for individual
provider home care workers shall be made only to the subsidized basic
health plan. Home care agencies may obtain coverage either through the
basic health plan or through an alternative plan with substantially
equivalent benefits.
(b) The department shall work with representatives of community
residential service providers and representatives of persons served in
community residential programs to identify current rules and policies
that are redundant and/or are not helpful to positive client outcomes.
The department shall modify or repeal the rules and policies identified
and report the results to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by July 1, 2004.
(c) $10,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for one-time expenditures needed to meet
the federally required level for state supplemental payments (SSP).
The department may transfer a portion of this amount to other programs
within the agency to accomplish this purpose. To the extent that the
required expenditure level must be met by funding new services,
expansion of the high school transition program shall be the first
priority.
(d) The department may transfer funding provided in this subsection
to meet the purposes of subsection (2) of this section to the extent
that fewer residents of residential habilitation centers choose to move
to community placements than was assumed in this appropriation.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,782,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,380,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,296,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,228,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $283,686,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department may transfer funding
provided in this subsection to meet the purposes of subsection (1) of
this section to the extent that additional residents of residential
habilitation centers choose to move to community placements than was
assumed in this appropriation.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,201,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,898,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing
and Speech Impaired Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,782,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,081,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall submit a report to
the fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2003,
describing progress in consolidating program administrative functions
within the aging and disabilities administration to ensure that the
overspending of the appropriations for program support in the
developmental disabilities program in prior fiscal periods does not
continue.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,997,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $548,451,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $555,567,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,137,168,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,644,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,888,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,264,718,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, $1,476,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2004, $1,476,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and
$7,284,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for health care benefits for home care workers who are employed
through state contracts for at least twenty hours per week. Premium
payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made only
to the subsidized basic health plan, and only for persons with incomes
below 175 percent of the federal poverty level. Home care agencies may
obtain coverage either through the basic health plan or through an
alternative plan with substantially equivalent benefits.
(2) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall be no more than $144.54 for
fiscal year 2004, and no more than $147.43 for fiscal year 2005. For
all facilities, the direct care, therapy care, support services, and
operations component rates established in accordance with chapter 74.46
RCW shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by 3.0 percent
effective July 1, 2003.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to $32
million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2004; in up to $32 million of increased asset value
completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2005; and in up to $32
million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2006.
(4) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(5) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement a medicaid waiver program for persons who do not qualify for
such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval and
the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver program shall not
exceed 600 persons by the end of fiscal year 2004, nor 600 persons by
the end of fiscal year 2005.
(b) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on the
medically needy waiver program, on monthly management reports.
(c) The department shall track and report to the health care and
fiscal committees of the legislature by November 15, 2004, on the types
of long-term care support a sample of waiver participants were
receiving prior to their enrollment in the waiver program, how those
services were being paid for, and an assessment of their adequacy.
(6) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for payments to any nursing
facility licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW that meets all of the
following criteria: (a) The nursing home entered into an arm's length
agreement for a facility lease prior to January 1, 1980; (b) the lessee
purchased the leased nursing home after January 1, 1980; and (c) the
lessor defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the assets of the home
after January 1, 1991, and prior to January 1, 1992. Payments provided
pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to the settlement,
audit, or rate-setting requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.
(7) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(8) $163,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $162,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5904 (senior drug assistance). If Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5904 is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $6,736,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $7,563,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $13,171,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for direct client services under the
adult day health program. The department shall not use any of the
funds appropriated in this subsection to employ staff or contractors to
conduct eligibility determination or service plan development for
current or prospective recipients of adult day health services.
(10) $1,768,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,768,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $403,182,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $395,401,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,373,091,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,704,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,208,378,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within funds provided for the WorkFirst program, the department
shall:
(a) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Valid outcome measures of job retention and wage
progression shall be developed and reported quarterly to appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for families who leave
assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. The
department shall also report the percentage of families who have
returned to temporary assistance for needy families after 12 months, 24
months, and 36 months.
(b) Submit a report by October 1, 2003, to the fiscal committees of
the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst program.
The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2003-2005 biennium
will be adjusted to stay within available federal grant levels and the
appropriated state-fund levels. The office of financial management
shall place an amount of the general fund--federal appropriation in
unallotted status in order to align the appropriations for WorkFirst to
the submitted spending plan.
(c) Include an urban adjustment factor for child care providers in
urban areas of region 1.
(2) $42,759,120 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $35,650,261 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for cash assistance and other
services to recipients in the general assistance--unemployable program.
Within these amounts, the department may expend funds for services that
assist recipients to reduce their dependence on public assistance,
provided that expenditures for these services and cash assistance do
not exceed the funds provided.
(3) $3,940,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,940,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the food assistance program
for legal immigrants. The level of benefits shall be equivalent to the
benefits provided by the federal food stamp program.
(4) $13,852,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for increased reimbursement of county legal-clerk
services for child support enforcement. The department shall ensure
this increase in cost does not reduce federal incentive payments.
(5) In reviewing the budget for the division of child support, the
legislature has conducted a review of the Washington state child
support schedule, chapter 26.19 RCW, and supporting documentation as
required by federal law. The legislature concludes that the
application of the support schedule continues to result in the correct
amount of child support to be awarded. No further changes will be made
to the support schedule or the economic table at this time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,398,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,385,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,655,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,860,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,950,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,925,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,803,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for
expansion of treatment services in the alcoholism and drug addiction
treatment support act (ADATSA) program. If Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6017 is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount provided
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,176,552,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,256,131,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,667,894,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,040,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $698,228,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,070,845,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $52,057,000 of the fiscal
year 2004 health services account appropriation, $35,016,000 of the
fiscal year 2005 health services account appropriation, and $87,074,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by rural public
hospital districts. The payments shall be conditioned upon (a) a
contractual commitment by the association of public hospital districts
and participating rural public hospital districts to make an
intergovernmental transfer to the state treasurer, for deposit into the
health services account, equal to at least 95 percent of the
supplemental payments; (b) a contractural commitment by the association
of public hospital districts to return at least 5 percent of the
supplemental payments to the participating rural hospital districts;
and (c) a contractual commitment by the participating districts to not
allow expenditures covered by the supplemental payments to be used for
medicaid nursing home rate- setting. The participating districts shall
retain no more than a total of $3,500,000 for the 2003-05 biennium.
(2) $14,616,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2004, $12,394,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2005, and $27,010,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for additional
disproportionate share and medicare upper payment limit payments to
public hospital districts.
The payments shall be conditioned upon a contractual commitment by
the participating public hospital districts to make an
intergovernmental transfer to the health services account equal to at
least 91 percent of the additional payments. The state's teaching
hospitals shall retain at least 28 percent of the amounts retained by
hospitals under these programs, or the maximum allowable under the
state teaching hospitals' limits as set under federal rules, whichever
is less.
(3) For purposes of RCW 74.09.510(6) and 74.09.450, no funds are
appropriated in this section for medical coverage of children not
otherwise eligible for medical assistance whose family incomes are in
excess of 175 percent of the federal poverty level.
(4) For purposes of RCW 74.09.800, no funds are appropriated in
this section to provide maternity care services to low-income women who
are not eligible to receive such services under the medical assistance
program, Title XIX of the federal social security act.
(5) No funds are appropriated in this section for continued
operation of the buy-in program authorized in RCW 74.09.510(7) and
74.09.540.
(6) Sufficient funds are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue to provide podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(7) Sufficient funds are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit equivalent to
approximately 70 percent of the dental benefit provided during the
2001-03 biennium. The department shall establish the scope of services
to be provided within the available funds in consultation with dental
providers and consumer representatives.
(8) $3,100,000 of the health services account appropriation,
$8,416,000 of the general fund--local appropriation, and $11,516,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for grants
to rural hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds under a
formula that provides a relatively larger share of the available
funding to hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients, and (b) have relatively smaller
net financial margins.
(9) $20,000,000 of the health services account appropriation and
$20,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for grants to nonrural hospitals. The department shall
distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively larger
share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients,
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins.
(10) The department shall establish managed care rates within
available funds in a manner that promotes health plan efficiency,
encourages continuity of service, and assures access in underserved
areas.
(11) The department shall separately track the total amount of any
rebates obtained from drug manufacturers that are supplemental to the
amounts required by federal law. The department shall report to the
fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate by January
15, 2004, and by January 15, 2005, on supplemental rebates negotiated
to date, and their projected value through the end of the current and
the next succeeding fiscal year. The report shall include options for
using any rebate amounts in excess of those assumed in this budget to
increase pharmacy reimbursement rates.
(12) $156,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,403,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for a study to assess alternatives for replacing the
existing medicaid management information system. The department shall
report to the information services board and to the fiscal committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2003, on the anticipated costs and
benefits of the major alternative approaches. The department shall
receive specific authorization in the 2003-05 appropriations act before
proceeding with procurement of the replacement system.
(13) The department of social and health services, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, and the department of health
should jointly identify opportunities for early intervention and
prevention activities that can help prevent disease and reduce oral
health issues among children. Disease prevention among infants at the
age of one year and among children entering the K-12 education system
provides cost-effective ways to avoid higher health care spending later
in life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,151,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,121,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,705,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $440,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,417,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,454,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,423,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,258,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,945,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,962,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004, $1,963,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for 2005, and $3,925,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for transition costs
associated with the closure of Fircrest school as directed by Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 5971. To minimize the disruption to the ongoing work
plan of the developmental disabilities program, the department shall
organize the Fircrest school closure and resident transition effort to
report to an organizational unit outside the division of developmental
disabilities. Within the funds provided in this subsection, the
department shall:
(a) Contract with a cost report expert to determine appropriate
ways to maximize federal reimbursement during the closure of the
facility;
(b) Negotiate with representatives of employees affected by the
closure to determine how to assist employees who need help to relocate
to other state jobs, to transition to private sector positions, to
retire early, or to cover the costs of unemployment benefits.
(c) Keep the appropriate committees of the legislature informed of
the development of and revisions to a work plan to close the facility
through regular written reports, periodic e-mail updates to committee
members and staff, and/or through other means that keep the committees
up-to-date on the progress of the closure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,882,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,882,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,674,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,438,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,358,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,499,000
Medical Aid Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,656,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $436,641,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within funds appropriated in this section and sections 205 and
206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to provide an
enhanced basic health plan subsidy option for foster parents licensed
under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care programs.
Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and home care
workers with family incomes at or below 175 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at a
cost of twelve dollars and fifty cents per covered worker per month.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
which choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay the following: (i) A minimum of twenty-five dollars per
enrollee per month for persons below 100 percent of the federal poverty
level; and (ii) a minimum of thirty dollars per enrollee per month for
persons whose family income is 100 percent to 125 percent of the
federal poverty level.
(3) Until January 1, 2004, the health care authority shall admit
new members to the basic health plan only to the extent authorized
under the authority's September 6, 2001, administrative policy on basic
health plan enrollment management.
(4) $162,500,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for expenditure in calendar year 2004, and $91,000,000
of the health services account appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure in calendar year 2005, to subsidize basic health plan
coverage for persons with family incomes at or below 175 percent of the
federal poverty level.
(5) $500,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for a contract with a university or other qualified
organization to link state residents with manufacturer-sponsored drug
discount programs as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5904. If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5904 is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $1,365,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for start-up funding for a purchasing pool that will
enable certain state residents to benefit from the discounted prices
the state is able to achieve as a result of its volume purchasing power
as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5904. If Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5904 is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $5,000,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for distribution to community clinics for provision of
prenatal care for women no longer eligible for such services from the
department of social and health services due to their immigration
status. These funds shall be distributed among clinics proportional to
their historic levels of service to such persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,370,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,409,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,480,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,359,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE
APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,152,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,151,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,323,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $192,000 of the accident account--state
appropriation and $192,000 of the medical aid account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementing the provisions of
Senate Bill No. 5271 (workers compensation/hearing loss). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,920,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,528,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $124,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to allow the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to increase the technical and training
support provided to the local criminal justice agencies on the new
incident-based reporting system and the national incident-based
reporting system.
(2) $136,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to allow the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys to enhance the training provided to criminal
justice personnel.
(3) $65,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for regionalized training programs for
school district and local law enforcement officials on school safety
issues.
(4) $250,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs for the staffing and support of a web site
to provide information about sex offenders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,843,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,826,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,338,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,462,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $683,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,320,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,507,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,281,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $189,300,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,384,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,468,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,948,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,442,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,036,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $474,866,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 7.68.015, the department shall operate the
crime victims' compensation program within the public safety and
education account funds appropriated in this section. In the event
that cost containment measures are necessary, the department may (a)
institute copayments for services; (b) develop preferred provider
contracts; or (c) utilize other cost containment measures. Cost
containment measures shall not include holding invoices received in one
fiscal period for payment from appropriations in subsequent fiscal
periods. No more than $5,200,000 of the public safety and education
account appropriation shall be expended for department administration
of the crime victims' compensation program.
(2) $314,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$56,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementing Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5890
(agricultural workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2003,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $1,000,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$1,000,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementing Substitute Senate Bill No. 5378 (workers
compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2003, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $207,000 of the plumbing certificate account--state
appropriation and $268,000 of the pressure systems safety account--state appropriation are provided solely for implementing Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5713 (electrical contractors). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW
BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $989,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $989,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,978,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,561,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,562,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,134,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,598,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,598,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $304,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,675,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,175,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,403,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,823,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,936,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,582,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,744,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $405,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $252,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $657,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $150,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 is provided solely for the design
and development of the home care provider registry mandated by
Initiative Measure No. 775.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,285,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,450,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $349,128,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,723,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,490,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,042,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,053,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,736,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,518,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $637,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,373,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,629,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,806,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,293,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,516,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $737,703,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise
existing fees charged for health care assistants, commercial shellfish
paralytic shellfish poisoning, commercial shellfish licenses, and
newborn screening programs in excess of the fiscal growth factor under
chapter 43.135 RCW if necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting
business and the appropriation levels in this section.
(2) $1,488,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year 2004
appropriation and $1,489,000 of the general fund -- state fiscal year
2005 appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound water work plan and agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02,
DOH-03, and DOH-04.
(3) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(4) $21,650,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the state's program of universal access to
essential childhood vaccines. The department shall utilize all
available federal funding before expenditure of these funds.
(5) $2,984,000 of the general fund--local appropriation is provided
solely for development and implementation of an internet-based system
for preparing and retrieving death certificates as provided in
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5545. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5545 is
not enacted by June 30, 2003, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(6) The department of social and health services, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and the department of health
should jointly identify opportunities for early intervention and
prevention activities that can help prevent disease and reduce oral
health issues among children. Disease prevention among infants at the
age of one year and among children entering the K-12 education system
provides cost-effective ways to avoid higher health care spending later
in life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act
shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified herein.
However, after May 1, 2004, after approval by the director of financial
management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the
department may transfer general fund--state appropriations for fiscal
year 2004 between programs. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing prior to approving any deviations from
appropriation levels.
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,376,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,579,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,624,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,605,000

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $444,514,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $449,634,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,746,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,350,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $907,244,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as a recovery
of costs.
(b) The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel
reductions with the least possible impact on correctional custody
staff, community custody staff, and correctional industries. For the
purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff means employees
responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.
(c) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 50 work release beds in
facilities throughout the state for $3,500,000.
(d) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(e) During the 2003-2005 biennium, when contracts are established
or renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided
to inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(f) $2,984,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
appropriation is provided solely for chemical dependency treatment to
offenders pursuant to the drug reform act of 2002.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,926,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,189,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,492,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,607,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel
reductions with the least possible impact on correctional custody
staff, community custody staff, and correctional industries. For the
purposes of this subsection, correctional custody staff means employees
responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the department of corrections
to contract with the institute for public policy for responsibilities
assigned in chapter 196, Laws of 1999 (offender accountability act) and
sections 7 through 12 of chapter 197, Laws of 1999 (drug offender
sentencing).
(c) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for a pilot project to test the
availability, reliability, and effectiveness of an electronic
monitoring system based on passive data logging global positioning
system technology for monitoring sex offenders.
(i) The department of corrections shall work with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs and the department of social
and health services to establish the pilot project.
(ii) The pilot project shall be of sufficient size to test the
reliability of the technology in a variety of geographical
circumstances including both urban and rural locations.
(iii) The pilot project shall test the system using sex or
kidnapping offenders under the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections and persons civilly committed under chapter 71.09 RCW under
a variety of supervision circumstances. Offenders included in the
pilot project shall be offenders who have been classified as level
three offenders by the end of sentence review committee and over whom
the department of corrections has authority to establish conditions of
supervision or persons who have been ordered to be electronically
monitored by the court in a proceeding under chapter 71.09 RCW and who
have been classified as level three offenders by the end of sentence
review committee.
(iv) The pilot project shall specifically examine the feasibility
of electronic monitoring for level three sex offenders or kidnapping
offenders who register as homeless or transient.
(v) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the
governor on the results of the pilot project by January 31, 2004. The
report must include, but is not limited to:
(A) The availability of the technology, including a description of
the system used and a discussion of the various types of global
positioning system-based monitoring available and appropriate for a sex
offender population;
(B) Any geographic or weather-related limitations posed by the
technology;
(C) The reliability, including the false alarm rate of the
technology;
(D) Any training requirements for department of corrections staff
or supervised persons;
(E) Any distinctions in effectiveness or feasibility for different
supervision populations;
(F) Costs, including equipment costs, monitoring fees, and any
changes to department of corrections staffing levels;
(G) The ability of the subjects of the pilot to pay for daily
and/or equipment costs;
(H) The rate of loss or damage to equipment used by the subjects of
the pilot; and
(I) Limitations in the pilot to determining the answers to the
items in this subsection (3)(c)(v).
The association shall make a recommendation in the report about the
frequency and timing of monitoring reports, and the need for further
study of the issue to determine efficacy and reliability.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $642,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $642,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,284,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $110,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $110,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,951,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,986,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,937,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE
BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,773,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,773,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,334,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,960,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $737,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $741,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,478,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,438,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,861,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,405,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,970,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,084,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,758,000

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $527,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,079,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,588,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,313,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,820,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,658,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,752,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,012,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $551,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,656,000
State Drought Preparedness -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,707,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account (Water
Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $591,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,163,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $356,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,317,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,134,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $352,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,837,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,997,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,689,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $782,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,150,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,643,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,674,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,667,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,502,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $379,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $297,384,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,708,196 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $2,708,196 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, $394,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation,
$2,581,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation, $217,830
of the water quality account--state appropriation, $322,976 of the
state drought preparedness account--state appropriation, $3,748,220 of
the water quality permit account--state appropriation, and $2,104,942
of the oil spill prevention account are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items
DOE-01, DOE-02, DOE-04, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.
(2) $4,059,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for methamphetamine lab clean-up activities.
(3) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action
item UW-02 through a contract with the University of Washington's sea
grant program to develop an educational program targeted to small
spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports,
and marinas.
(4) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2003-05
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(5) $200,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with Washington State
University cooperative extension program to provide statewide
coordination and support for coordinated resource management.
(6) The water quality account--state appropriation is deemed
sufficient to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5027 (watershed
planning).
(7) The appropriations in this section are deemed sufficient to
implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5024 (municipal water rights).
(8) The department of ecology is authorized to take one of the
following actions related to the grant awarded in the 2001-03 biennium
to Lincoln county for the Negro Creek flood control project, flood
control assistance account program grant G0200049: (a) Carry forward
to the 2003-05 biennium any unspent portion of the grant, or (b) extend
the time of performance for the grant contract to the end of the 2003-2005 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,099,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,086,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,647,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,074,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $266,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,668,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
Water Trail Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,261,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,563,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2003-05 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $8,000 of the winter recreation program account -- state
appropriation are provided solely for a grant for the operation of the
Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
and agency action item P+RC-02.
(4) At each state park at which a parking fee is collected, the
state parks and recreation commission shall provide notice that the
revenue collected from the parking fee shall be used to fund
expenditures to maintain and improve the state park system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,261,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,271,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,358,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,538,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $659,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,563,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement priority
recommendations developed by the monitoring oversight committee as
directed by RCW 77.85.210. Within these funds, activity shall be
directed to improve monitoring oversight within watersheds, enhance
data coordination and access among recovery partners, and produce a
state watershed health report card.
(2) $16,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the forest and fish agreement
rules. These funds will be allocated to the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife.
(3) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operation and maintenance
of the natural resources data portal.
(4) $813,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $813,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $5,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided to the salmon recovery funding board for distribution to
lead entities and regional recovery boards. The board shall establish
policies to require coordination of funding requests from lead entities
and regional recovery boards to ensure that recovery efforts are
synchronized. At the discretion of the board, funding shall be
concentrated in watersheds within the highest priority salmon recovery
regions as defined by the statewide strategy to recover salmon. The
board shall also coordinate funding decisions with the northwest power
planning council to ensure maximum efficiency and investment return.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $876,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $923,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,799,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,119,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,127,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,164,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,410,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $247,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $247,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item CC-01.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,393,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,818,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,507,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,190,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $471,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,570,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $562,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,370,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,533,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,986,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,990,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,110,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,936,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,582,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $977,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,001,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,355,714 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $1,355,713 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $402,000 of the wildlife account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-06.
(2) $150,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the development and implementation of an agency
strategic marketing plan. The department shall contract for
professional services to develop the commission's strategic marketing
plan. Implementation of the watchable wildlife decal program, as
outlined in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5204, may not occur prior to the
fish and wildlife commission's approval of the final strategic
marketing plan. This plan shall be completed by September 3, 2004.
(3) $225,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $225,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $550,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery reform
recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(4) $850,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for stewardship and maintenance needs on agency-owned
lands and water access sites.
(5) $900,000 of the wildlife fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for wetland restoration activities for migratory waterfowl by
providing landowner incentives to create or maintain waterfowl habitat
and management activities.
(6) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(7) $2,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation is provided for cooperative volunteer projects.
(8) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(9) The department shall develop and implement an activity-based
costing system. The system shall be operational no later than January
1, 2004.
(10) $400,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement the department's information systems
strategic plan to include continued implementation of a personal
computer leasing plan, an upgrade of computer back-up systems, systems
architecture assessment, and network security analysis.
(11) Within funds provided, the department shall make available
enforcement and biological staff to respond and take appropriate action
to ensure public safety in response to public complaints regarding bear
and cougar.
(12) $14,680,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the operation of the wildlife program and is
contingent upon the department meeting the following conditions: In
Okanogan, Ferry, Stevens, and Pend Oreille counties, the department
shall not acquire properties with funds provided by the federal
government, except in noncontiguous parcels less than five acres in
size.
(13) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for staffing and operation of the
Tennant Lake interpretive center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,699,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,629,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,809,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,482,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,380,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,670,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,693,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,904,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,594,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,407,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,294,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $518,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,128,000
Disaster Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,818,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,525,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and $1,006,950 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action items DNR-01, DNR-02, and DNR-04.
(2) $908,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $910,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(3) $2,159,500 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $8,359,500 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $6,200,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.
(4) $582,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for spartina control.
(5) Fees approved by the board of natural resources in the 2003-05
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(6) The department shall prepare a report of actual and planned
expenditures by task and activity from all fund sources for all aspects
of the forest and fish program for the 2001-03 and 2003-05 biennia.
The report shall be submitted to the director of financial management
and the legislative fiscal committees by August 31, 2003.
(7) Authority to expend funding for acquisition of technology
equipment and software associated with development of a new revenue
management system is conditioned on compliance with section 902 of this
act.
(8) $1,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to meet its
obligations with the U.S. environmental protection agency for the
clean-up of Commencement Bay.
(9) For the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the department has revised the
methodology by which administrative costs of the department are
allocated among the state general fund and the various dedicated funds
and accounts from which the department receives appropriations. The
legislature recognizes that the revised methodology represents a fair
and equitable allocation of costs under state law and accounting rules.
The legislature further finds that retroactive application of the
revised methodology is neither practical nor desirable.
(10) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to compensate the forest board
trust for a portion of the lease to the Crescent television improvement
district consistent with RCW 79.12.055.
(11) The department of natural resources shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature, the office of financial
management, the office of the attorney general, and the board of
natural resources concerning the costs and effectiveness of the
contract harvesting program as authorized by Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5074 (contract harvesting). The report shall be submitted by
December 31, 2006, and shall include the following information:
(a) Number of sales conducted through contract harvesting;
(b) For each sale conducted, the (i) number of board feet sold;
(ii) stumpage and pond prices; (iii) difference in revenues received
compared to revenues that would have accrued through noncontract
harvest sales, and the distribution of revenues to the contract
harvesting revolving account, and to applicable management and trust
accounts; and (iv) total cost to conduct the contract harvest, by fund
and object of expenditure; and
(c) Other costs and benefits attributable to contract harvesting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,414,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,244,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,017,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,110,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,931,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,566,000
Water Quality Permit Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,032,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action item WSDA-01.
(2) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2003-05
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(3) The water quality account--state appropriation and the water
quality permit account--state appropriation are provided solely to
implement the dairy nutrient management program as transferred from the
department of ecology by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5889
(animal feeding operations). If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5889 is not enacted by June 30, 2003, these appropriations shall be
transferred to the department of ecology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY
REINSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $914,000

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,009,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,013,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $695,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,036,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,133,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,125,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,987,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,000
Funeral Directors and Embalmers Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $521,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,306,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is
the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each
professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. For
each licensing program covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall
set fees at levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering
the licensing program, including any costs associated with policy
enhancements funded in the 2003-05 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the department may
increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the increases
are necessary to fully fund the costs of the licensing programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,150,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,260,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,503,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,696,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $612,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,771,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,151,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,634,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $438,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,421,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,415,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the fire services account--state appropriation is provided solely for two FTE's in the office of
state fire marshal to exclusively review K-12 construction documents
for fire and life safety in accordance with the state building code.
It is the intent of this appropriation to provide these services only
to those districts that are located in counties without qualified
review capabilities.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,196,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,185,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,509,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,890,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $10,237,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $10,234,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for the operation and expenses of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) $407,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $407,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities.
(c) $395,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $395,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the Washington professional educator standards board.
(d) $157,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $149,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5012 (charter schools). If the bill is not
enacted before June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(e) The department of social and health services, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and the department of health
should work together to identify opportunities for early intervention
and prevention activities that can help prevent disease and reduce oral
health issues among children. Disease prevention among infants at the
age of one year and among children entering the K-12 education system
provide cost-effective ways to avoid higher health spending later in
life.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,724,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,720,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,405,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,849,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) A maximum of $89,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $89,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for the school
safety center in the office of the superintendent of public instruction
subject to the following conditions and limitations.
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The superintendent of public instruction shall participate in
a school safety center advisory committee that includes representatives
of educators, classified staff, principals, superintendents,
administrators, the American society for industrial security, the state
criminal justice training commission, and others deemed appropriate and
approved by the school safety center advisory committee. Members of
the committee shall be chosen by the groups they represent. In
addition, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall appoint representatives of law enforcement to participate on the
school safety center advisory committee. The advisory committee shall
select a chair.
(C) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(ii) $400,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
transferred from the department of health is provided for a program
that provides grants to school districts for media campaigns promoting
sexual abstinence and addressing the importance of delaying sexual
activity, pregnancy, and childbearing until individuals are ready to
nurture and support their children. Grants to the school districts
shall be for projects that are substantially designed and produced by
students. The grants shall require a local private sector match, which
may include in-kind contribution of technical or other assistance from
consultants or firms involved in public relations, advertising,
broadcasting, and graphics or video production or other related fields.
(iii) $13,663,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies.
(iv) A maximum $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for a corps of
nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by the
superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most
needy schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and
training for school staff.
(v) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for a nonviolence
and leadership training program provided by the institute for community
leadership. The program shall provide the following:
(A) Statewide nonviolence leadership coaches training program for
certification of educational employees and community members in
nonviolence leadership workshops;
(B) Statewide leadership nonviolence student exchanges, training,
and speaking opportunities for student workshop participants; and
(C) A request for proposal process, with up to 80 percent funding,
for nonviolence leadership workshops serving at least 12 school
districts with direct programming in 36 elementary, middle, and high
schools throughout Washington state.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
(i) A maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $1,939,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for
K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network. A maximum of $650,000 of this
amount may be expended for state-level administration and staff
training on the K-20 network.
(ii) A maximum of $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for the
Washington state leadership assistance for science education reform
(LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the Pacific Science Center.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) A maximum of $761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $757,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for alternative
certification routes. Funds may be used for the professional educator
standards board to continue existing alternative-route grant programs
and create new alternative-route programs in regions of the state with
service shortages.
(ii) A maximum of $612,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $612,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for in-service
training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific Science
Center.
(iii) A maximum of $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided to support
vocational student leadership organizations.
(iv) $1,433,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the advanced placement fee program to increase
opportunities for low-income students and under-represented populations
to participate in advanced placement courses and to increase the
capacity of schools to provide advanced placement courses to students.
(v) $9,510,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for comprehensive school reform demonstration projects to
provide grants to low-income schools for improving student achievement
through adoption and implementation of research-based curricula and
instructional programs.
(vi) $12,977,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for 21st century learning center grants, providing after-school and inter-session activities for students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,949,796,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,966,361,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,916,157,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2003-04 and
2004-05 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (d) through (f) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (c) through
(f) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) 49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding.
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent
vocational students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) For the 2003-04 and 2004-05 school years, indirect cost
charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not
exceed 15 percent of the combined basic education and vocational
enhancement allocations of state funds.
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2003-04 and 2004-05
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each three certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
sixty average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
9.31 percent in the 2003-04 school year and 9.31 percent in the 2004-05
school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 12.53 percent in the
2003-04 school year and 12.53 percent in the 2004-05 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(4) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$8,785 per certificated staff unit in the 2003-04 school year and a
maximum of $8,952 per certificated staff unit in the 2004-05 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $21,573 per certificated
staff unit in the 2003-04 school year and a maximum of $21,983 per
certificated staff unit in the 2004-05 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $16,739 per certificated
staff unit in the 2003-04 school year and a maximum of $17,057 per
certificated staff unit in the 2004-05 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $531.09 for the 2003-04 and
2004-05 school years per allocated classroom teacher exclusive of
salary increase amounts, if any, provided in section 504 of this act.
Solely for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom
teachers shall be equal to the number of certificated instructional
staff units allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied
by the ratio between the number of actual basic education certificated
teachers and the number of actual basic education certificated
instructional staff reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $3,190,000 for
fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $3,202,000 during fiscal year 2005
outside the basic education formula as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $495,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2004
and a maximum of $504,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2005; and
(b) A maximum of $353,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies;
(c) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,035,000 may be expended each fiscal year; and
(d) A maximum of $485,000 for each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs.
(10) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 3.4 percent from the 2002-03 school year to the
2003-04 school year and 2.5 percent from the 2003-04 school year to the
2004-05 school year.
(11) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(12) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,181,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5012 (charter schools). If the bill is not
enacted before June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund
allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units under section 502 of this
act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
shall be determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 12E
for the appropriate year, by the district's average staff mix factor
for certificated instructional staff in that school year, computed
using LEAP Document 1Sa for the 2003-04 school year and LEAP Document
1Sb for the 2004-05 school year; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district shall be based on the
district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation
amounts shown on LEAP Document 12E for the appropriate year.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1Sa" means the computerized tabulation
establishing staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff for
the 2003-04 school year according to education and years of experience,
as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on March 31, 2003, at 09:06 hours;
(b) "LEAP Document 1Sb" means the computerized tabulation
establishing staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff for
the 2004-05 school year according to education and years of experience,
as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on March 31, 2003, at 09:06 hours; and
(c) "LEAP Document 12E" means the computerized tabulation of 2003-04 and 2004-05 school year salary allocations for certificated
administrative staff and classified staff and derived and total base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on March
31, 2003, at 09:06 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of 8.67 percent for school years 2003-04 and
2004-05 for certificated staff and 9.03 percent for school years 2003-04 and 2004-05 for classified staff.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following statewide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2003-04 School Year

Years of MA+90

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 or PHD

0 29,149 29,936 30,752 31,568 34,192 35,881 34,947 37,570 39,262

1 29,540 30,339 31,165 32,019 34,669 36,350 35,335 37,985 39,665

2 30,060 30,870 31,709 32,633 35,289 36,995 35,901 38,556 40,262

3 30,747 31,574 32,429 33,392 36,069 37,833 36,630 39,306 41,071

4 31,285 32,151 33,017 34,018 36,724 38,510 37,208 39,914 41,701

5 31,840 32,716 33,594 34,655 37,365 39,196 37,798 40,509 42,340

6 32,251 33,108 34,016 35,131 37,827 39,667 38,213 40,910 42,750

7 33,139 34,012 34,937 36,118 38,868 40,769 39,185 41,934 43,836

8 34,202 35,122 36,069 37,348 40,135 42,106 40,414 43,202 45,172

9 36,272 37,266 38,591 41,443 43,481 41,656 44,510 46,548

10 38,477 39,898 42,788 44,894 42,964 45,855 47,960

11 41,243 44,196 46,344 44,309 47,263 49,410

12 42,545 45,642 47,854 45,707 48,708 50,921

13 47,123 49,401 47,154 50,189 52,467

14 48,611 51,006 48,644 51,775 54,073

15 49,876 52,333 49,908 53,121 55,479

16 or More 50,873 53,379 50,906 54,183 56,588

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2004-05 School Year

Years of MA+90

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 or PHD

0 30,023 30,834 31,674 32,516 35,218 36,958 35,995 38,697 40,439

1 30,427 31,249 32,100 32,979 35,709 37,440 36,395 39,125 40,855

2 30,812 31,642 32,502 33,449 36,171 37,920 36,798 39,520 41,269

3 31,209 32,047 32,916 33,893 36,610 38,401 37,180 39,895 41,687

4 31,598 32,473 33,347 34,358 37,091 38,895 37,580 40,313 42,118

5 32,000 32,879 33,762 34,829 37,552 39,392 37,987 40,711 42,551

6 32,413 33,273 34,186 35,306 38,016 39,866 38,404 41,114 42,963

7 33,139 34,012 34,937 36,118 38,868 40,769 39,185 41,934 43,836

8 34,202 35,122 36,069 37,348 40,135 42,106 40,414 43,202 45,172

9 36,272 37,266 38,591 41,443 43,481 41,656 44,510 46,548

10 38,477 39,898 42,788 44,894 42,964 45,855 47,960

11 41,243 44,196 46,344 44,309 47,263 49,410

12 42,545 45,642 47,854 45,707 48,708 50,921

13 47,123 49,401 47,154 50,189 52,467

14 48,611 51,006 48,644 51,775 54,073

15 49,876 52,333 49,908 53,121 55,479

16 or More 50,873 53,379 50,906 54,183 56,588

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any replacement schedules and
documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for
each district in LEAP Document 12E and the salary schedules in
subsection (4)(a) of this section include two learning improvement
days. A school district is eligible for the learning improvement day
funds for school years 2003-04 and 2004-05, only if two learning
improvement days have been added to the 180-day contract year. If
fewer than two days are added, the additional learning improvement
allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The additional days shall be
for activities related to improving student learning consistent with
education reform implementation, and shall not be considered part of
basic education. The length of a learning improvement day shall not be
less than the length of a full day under the base contract. The
superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that school districts
adhere to the intent and purposes of this subsection.
(8) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2),
subsection (7) of this section, and section 504(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,586,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,073,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $423,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,082,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,017,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $20,920,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to provide a salary adjustment for
state formula certificated instructional staff units in their first
seven years of service. Consistent with the statewide certificated
instructional staff salary allocation schedule in section 503 of this
act, sufficient funding is provided to increase the salary of
certificated instructional staff units in the 2003-04 school year and
the 2004-05 school year by the following percentages: Three percent
for certificated instructional staff in their first and second years of
service; two and one-half percent for certificated instructional staff
in their third year of service; one and one-half percent for
certificated instructional staff in their fourth year of service; one
percent for certificated instructional staff in their fifth year of
service; and one-half of a percent for certificated instructional staff
in their sixth and seventh years of service. These increases will take
effect September 1, 2003 and September 1, 2004.
(a) In order to receive funding provided in this subsection, school
districts shall certify to the office of superintendent of public
instruction that they will provide the percentage increases in the
amounts specified in this subsection. In cases where a school district
providing the increases in the amounts specified in this subsection
would cause that school district to be out of compliance with RCW
28A.400.200, they may provide salary increases in different amounts but
only to the extent necessary to come into compliance with RCW
28A.400.200. Funds provided in this subsection shall be used
exclusively for providing the percentage increases specified in this
subsection to the certificated staff units in their first seven years
of service and shall not be used to supplant any other state or local
funding for compensation for these staff.
(b) The appropriations include associated incremental fringe
benefit allocations at rates of 8.67 percent for school year 2003-04
and 8.67 percent for school year 2004-05 for certificated staff.
Increases for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the
salary allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of
this act. Increases for special education result from increases in
each district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(2) $5,424,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $12,258,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to provide a salary adjustment for
state formula classified staff units of one percent effective September
1, 2003, and another salary adjustment of one percent effective on
September 1, 2004.
(a) In order to receive funding provided in this subsection, school
districts shall certify to the office of superintendent of public
instruction that they will provide the percentage increases in the
amounts specified in this subsection. Funds provided in this
subsection shall be used exclusively for providing the percentage
increases specified in this subsection to classified staff units and
shall not be used to supplant any other state or local funding for
compensation for these staff.
(b) The appropriations include associated incremental fringe
benefit allocations at rates of 9.03 percent for the 2003-04 school
year and 9.03 percent for the 2004-05 school year for classified staff.
The appropriations in this section include the increased portion of
salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded
school programs in this part V of this act. Increases for general
apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary allocation
schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this act.
Increases for special education result from increases in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(3) The appropriations in this section provide salary adjustments
and incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments
as follows:

School Year

2003-04 2004-05

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.22 $0.45

Highly Capable (per formula student) $0.93 $1.88

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $2.45 $4.95

Learning Assistance (per entitlement unit) $2.23 $4.50

(4) $83,251,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit
allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$457.07 per month for the 2003-04 and 2004-05 school years. The
appropriations in this section provide for a rate increase to $471.12
per month for the 2003-04 school year and $542.48 per month for the
2004-05 school year at the following rates:

School Year

2003-04 2004-05

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.13 $0.78

Highly Capable (per formula student) $0.83 $5.26

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $2.27 $13.83

Learning Assistance (per entitlement unit) $1.79 $10.87

(5) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,856,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,555,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $412,411,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $768,000 of this fiscal year 2004 appropriation
and a maximum of $782,000 of the fiscal year 2005 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2004 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2005 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $39.26 per weighted mile in the 2003-04 school
year and $39.49 per weighted mile in the 2004-05 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments, if any, provided in section 504 of
this act. Allocations for transportation of students transported more
than one radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) Beginning in the 2003-04 school year, the office of
superintendent of public instruction shall provide reimbursement
funding to a school district only after the superintendent of public
instruction determines that the school bus was purchased from the list
established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive
bid process based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus
categories to those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW
28A.160.195. The competitive specifications shall meet federal motor
vehicle safety standards, minimum state specifications as established
by rule by the superintendent, and supported options as determined by
the superintendent in consultation with the regional transportation
coordinators of the educational service districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,069,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,269,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $100,000 of the 2005 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $434,011,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $429,750,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $409,783,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,273,544,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall use the
excess cost methodology developed and implemented for the 2001-02
school year using the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related
accounting requirements to ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The S-275 and accounting changes in effect since the 2001-02
school year shall supercede any prior excess cost methodologies and
shall be required of all school districts.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
and federal funds to school districts based on two categories: The
optional birth through age two program for special education eligible
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers, and the mandatory special
education program for special education eligible students ages three to
twenty-one. A "special education eligible student" means a student
receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with a properly
formulated individualized education program.
(5)(a) For the 2003-04 and 2004-05 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers ages birth through two,
multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
two enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment. For the 2003-04 and the 2004-05
school years, each district's general fund--state funded special
education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual
enrollment percent or 12.7 percent. Increases in enrollment percent
from 12.7 percent to 13.0 percent shall be funded from the general
fund--federal appropriation.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $25,746,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided for safety net awards for districts
with demonstrated needs for state special education funding beyond the
amounts provided in subsection (5) of this section. If safety net
awards exceed the amount appropriated in this subsection (8), the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal and local sources.
Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy,
service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate
basis for safety net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(d) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(f) The superintendent may expend up to $120,000 per year of the
amount provided from the general fund--federal appropriation in this
subsection (8) to provide staff assistance to the committee in
analyzing applications for safety net funds received by the committee.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with
appropriate job and independent living skills, including work
experience where possible, to facilitate their successful transition
out of the public school system. The funds provided by this subsection
shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(13) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(14) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services. The superintendent shall
prepare an information database on laws, best practices, examples of
programs, and recommended resources. The information may be
disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
development activities.
(15) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of general fund--state funds allocated under this
program; however, carry over funds shall be expended in the special
education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,032,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,032,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,064,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The educational service districts shall
continue to furnish financial services required by the superintendent
of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $162,236,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $167,073,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $329,309,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,563,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,040,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,603,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $279,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $286,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,853,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,706,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,559,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $334.07 per funded
student for the 2003-04 school year and $334.07 per funded student for
the 2004-05 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments,
if any, pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded
students shall be a maximum of 1.75 percent of each district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2004 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2005 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND
SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,919,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,398,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,402,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $198,719,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $295,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $295,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the academic achievement and
accountability commission.
(2) $15,119,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $12,916,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005, and $15,455,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided for development and implementation of the
Washington assessments of student learning. Up to $689,000 of the
appropriation may be expended for data analysis and data management of
test results.
(3) $274,000 of the fiscal year 2004 general fund--state
appropriation and $274,000 of the fiscal year 2005 general fund--state
appropriation are provided solely for training of paraprofessional
classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom
assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(4) $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(a) A teacher assistance program is a program that provides to a
first year beginning teacher peer mentor services that include but are
not limited to:
(i) An orientation process and individualized assistance to help
beginning teachers who have been hired prior to the start of the school
year prepare for the start of a school year;
(ii) The assignment of a peer mentor whose responsibilities to the
beginning teacher include but are not limited to constructive feedback,
the modeling of instructional strategies, and frequent meetings and
other forms of contact;
(iii) The provision by peer mentors of strategies, training, and
guidance in critical areas such as classroom management, student
discipline, curriculum management, instructional skill, assessment,
communication skills, and professional conduct. A district may provide
these components through a variety of means including one-on-one
contact and workshops offered by peer mentors to groups, including
cohort groups, of beginning teachers;
(iv) The provision of release time, substitutes, mentor training in
observation techniques, and other measures for both peer mentors and
beginning teachers, to allow each an adequate amount of time to observe
the other and to provide the classroom experience that each needs to
work together effectively;
(v) Assistance in the incorporation of the essential academic
learning requirements into instructional plans and in the development
of complex teaching strategies, including strategies to raise the
achievement of students with diverse learning styles and backgrounds;
and
(vi) Guidance and assistance in the development and implementation
of a professional growth plan. The plan shall include a professional
self-evaluation component and one or more informal performance
assessments. A peer mentor may not be involved in any evaluation under
RCW 28A.405.100 of a beginning teacher whom the peer mentor has
assisted through this program.
(b) In addition to the services provided in (a) of this subsection,
an eligible peer mentor program shall include but is not limited to the
following components:
(i) Strong collaboration among the peer mentor, the beginning
teacher's principal, and the beginning teacher;
(ii) Stipends for peer mentors and, at the option of a district,
for beginning teachers. The stipends shall not be deemed compensation
for the purposes of salary lid compliance under RCW 28A.400.200 and are
not subject to the continuing contract provisions of Title 28A RCW; and
(iii) To the extent that resources are available for this purpose
and that assistance to beginning teachers is not adversely impacted,
the program may serve second year and more experienced teachers who
request the assistance of peer mentors.
(5) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for improving technology infrastructure,
monitoring and reporting on school district technology development,
promoting standards for school district technology, promoting statewide
coordination and planning for technology development, and providing
regional educational technology support centers, including state
support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW. The superintendent of
public instruction shall coordinate a process to facilitate the
evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to school
districts which includes the following: Creation of a general listing
of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey conducted
by each regional educational technology support center of school
districts in its region regarding the types of online curriculum
courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate and
recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.
(6) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the meals for kids program
under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155.
(7) $705,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $705,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(8) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the mathematics helping corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) The school improvement specialists shall provide the following:
(i) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(ii) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(iii) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(iv) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(v) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(vi) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(vii) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(9) $3,713,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,713,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) Grants shall be allocated to schools and school districts to
implement proven, research-based mentoring and tutoring programs in
reading that may include research-based reading skills development
software for low-performing students in grades K-6. If the grant is
made to a school district, the principals of schools enrolling targeted
students shall be consulted concerning design and implementation of the
program.
(b) The programs may be implemented before, after, or during the
regular school day, or on Saturdays, summer, intercessions, or other
vacation periods.
(c) Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps
programs.
(d) A program is eligible for a grant if it meets the following
conditions:
(i) The program employs methods of teaching and student learning
based on reliable reading/literacy research and effective practices;
(ii) The program design is comprehensive and includes instruction,
on-going student assessment, professional development,
parental/community involvement, and program management aligned with the
school's reading curriculum;
(iii) It provides quality professional development and training for
teachers, staff, and volunteer mentors and tutors;
(iv) It has measurable goals for student reading aligned with the
essential academic learning requirements;
(v) It contains an evaluation component to determine the
effectiveness of the program; and
(vi) The program may include a software-based solution to increase
the student/tutor ratio to a minimum of 5:1. The selected software
program shall be scientifically research-based.
(e) Funding priority shall be given to low-performing schools.
(f) Beginning and end-of-program testing data shall be available to
determine the effectiveness of funded programs and practices. Common
evaluative criteria across programs, such as grade-level improvements
shall be available for each reading corps program. The superintendent
of public instruction shall provide program evaluations to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature. Administrative and
evaluation costs may be assessed from the annual appropriation for the
program.
(g) Grants provided under this section may be used by schools and
school districts for expenditures from July 2003 through August 31,
2005.
(10) $1,487,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,169,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for salary bonuses for teachers
who attain certification by the national board for professional
teaching standards subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) Teachers who have attained certification by the national board
in the 2000-01 school year, 2001-02 school year, 2002-03 school year,
2003-04 school year, or 2004-05 school year shall receive an annual
bonus not to exceed $3,500.
(b) The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall
not be included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10).
(c) It is the intent of the legislature that teachers achieving
certification by the national board of professional teaching standards
will receive no more than four annual bonus payments for attaining
certification by the national board.
(11) $70,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $70,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the second grade reading test.
The funds shall be expended for assessment training for new second
grade teachers and replacement of assessment materials.
(12) A maximum of $220,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2004 and a maximum of $220,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided for the
superintendent to assist schools in implementing high academic
standards, aligning curriculum with these standards, and training
teachers to use assessments to improve student learning. Funds may
also be used to increase community and parental awareness of education
reform.
(13) $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment data, and other information that
assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic standards.
(14) $1,746,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,746,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance to schools.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Of the amounts
provided, $350,000 of the fiscal year 2004 appropriation and $350,000
of the fiscal year 2005 appropriation are provided to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the administrative duties
arising under this subsection. Each educational audit shall include
recommendations for best practices and ways to address identified needs
and shall be presented to the community in a public meeting to seek
input on ways to implement the audit and its recommendations.
(15) $87,901,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the elementary and secondary education
act. To extent allowed under federal rules and regulations, the funds
provided in this subsection may also be used for training and
professional development activities of paraprofessional classroom
assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom assistants.
(16) $25,046,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the elementary
and secondary education act.
(17) $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for grants to school districts to provide
a continuum of care for children and families to help children become
ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall contain
local plans designed collaboratively with community service providers.
If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which the school
district is located, the local plan shall provide for coordination with
existing programs to the greatest extent possible. Grant funds shall
be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,669,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,905,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,309,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,883,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $722.91 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2003-04 school year and $722.91 in
the 2004-05 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments,
if any, provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to $700,000 in school year
2003-04 and up to $700,000 in school year 2004-05, and adjust the per
eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this section accordingly, for
the central provision of assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1)
and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section is provided
solely to develop a system for the tracking of current and former
transitional bilingual program students.
(5) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I, Part C and English
language acquisition and language enhancement grants under Title III of
the elementary and secondary education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,365,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,027,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,178,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $436,570,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund--state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) Each general fund--state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $431.99 per funded unit for the 2003-04 school year and $432.87 per funded unit for the 2004-05 school year
exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under section 504
of this act.
(c) For purposes of this section, "test results" refers to the
district results from the norm-referenced test administered in the
specified grade level. The norm-referenced test results used for the
third and sixth grade calculations shall be consistent with the third
and sixth grade tests required under RCW 28A.230.190 and 28A.230.193.
(d) A school district's general fund--state funded units for the
2003-04 and 2004-05 school years shall be the sum of the following:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6,
multiplied by the 5-year average 4th grade lowest quartile test results
as adjusted for funding purposes in the school years prior to
1999-2000, multiplied by 0.82. As the 3rd grade test becomes
available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average on a 1-year lag;
(ii) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9,
multiplied by the 5-year average 8th grade lowest quartile test results
as adjusted for funding purposes in the school years prior to
1999-2000, multiplied by 0.82. As the 6th grade test becomes
available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades
on a 1-year lag; and
(iii) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades
10-11 multiplied by the 5-year average 11th grade lowest quartile test
results, multiplied by 0.82. As the 9th grade test becomes available,
it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades on a 1-year
lag; and
(iv) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free and
reduced price lunch exceeded the state average, subtract the state
average percentage of students eligible for free and reduced price
lunch from the district's percentage and multiply the result by the
district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the
current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent.
(e) In addition to amounts allocated under (d) of this subsection,
for school districts in which the effective Title I Part A (basic
program) increase is insufficient to cover the formula change in the
multiplier from .92 to .82, a state allocation shall be provided that,
when combined with the effective increase in federal Title I Part A
(basic program) funds from the 2001-02 school year, is sufficient to
cover this amount. The effective Title I Part A (basic program)
increase is the current school year federal Title I Part A (basic
program) allocation minus the 2001-02 school year federal Title I Part
A (basic program) allocation, after the 2001-02 Title I Part A
allocation has been inflated by three percent.
(2) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM
Student Achievement Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,848,000
Student Achievement Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $243,851,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $454,699,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and extend
day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection.
(2) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $219.72 per FTE student for the 2003-04 school year and $254.00 per FTE student for the 2004-05 school year.
For the purposes of this section and in accordance with RCW 84.52.068,
FTE student refers to the annual average full-time equivalent
enrollment of the school district in grades kindergarten through twelve
for the prior school year.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
distribute ten percent of the annual allocation to districts each month
for the months of September through June.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR
ADJUSTMENTS. State general fund appropriations provided to the
superintendent of public instruction for state entitlement programs in
the public schools in this part V of this act may be expended as needed
by the superintendent for adjustments to apportionment for prior fiscal
periods. Recoveries of state general fund moneys from school districts
and educational service districts for a prior fiscal period shall be
made as reductions in apportionment payments for the current fiscal
period and shall be shown as prior year adjustments on apportionment
reports for the current period. Such recoveries shall not be treated
as revenues to the state, but as a reduction in the amount expended
against the appropriation for the current fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Education Savings Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000,000
Education Construction Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,165,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,165,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $13,500,000 in fiscal year 2004 and $13,500,000 in fiscal year
2005 of the education savings account appropriation shall be deposited
in the common school construction account.
(2) $120,165,000 of the education construction account
appropriation shall be deposited in the common school construction
account.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The appropriations in sections 603 through
609 of this act are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.
(2)(a) The salary increases provided or referenced in this
subsection shall be the only allowable salary increases provided at
institutions of higher education, excluding increases associated with
normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and
professional staff retention, and excluding increases associated with
employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1).
(b) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW
pursuant to provisions of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1), salary
increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective
bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to
any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range
maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.
(c) Each institution of higher education receiving appropriations
under sections 604 through 609 of this act may provide salary increases
from other sources to instructional and research faculty, exempt
professional staff, academic administrators, academic librarians,
counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the
office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but
not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Any salary increase
granted under the authority of this subsection (2)(c) shall not be
included in an institution's salary base for future state funding. It
is the intent of the legislature that general fund--state support for
an institution shall not increase during the current or any future
biennium as a result of any salary increases authorized under this
subsection (2)(c) or under rights granted to award additional
compensation with local, nonstate funds under RCW 41.56.203 or chapter
41.76 RCW.
(d) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other
state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from
institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes.
Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the
department of personnel for inclusion in the department's data
warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the
department of personnel for use by the reporting institutions,
including provisions for common job classifications and common
definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts,
number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently
reported for employees under contract.
(3) The tuition fees, as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to
full-time students at the state's colleges and universities for the
2003-04 and 2004-05 academic years, other than the summer term, shall
be increased or decreased by the governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and
the state board for community and technical colleges. Tuition fees may
be increased in excess of the fiscal growth factor.
For the 2003-04 academic year the governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and
the state board for community and technical colleges may implement an
increase no greater than nine percent over tuition fees charged to
full-time resident undergraduate students for the 2002-03 academic
year.
For the 2004-05 academic year the governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and
the state board for community and technical colleges may implement an
increase no greater than nine percent over tuition fees charged to
full-time resident undergraduate students for the 2003-04 academic
year.
(4) For the 2003-05 biennium, the state board for community and
technical colleges may increase tuition fees differentially based on
student credit hour load at their discretion.
(5) For the 2003-05 biennium, the governing boards and the state
board may adjust full-time operating fees for factors that may include
time of day and day of week, as well as delivery method and campus, to
encourage full use of the state's educational facilities and resources.
(6) For the duration of the 2003-05 biennium, the legislature
hereby lowers the limit on total gross authorized operating fees
revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by state institutions of higher
education pursuant to RCW 28B.15.910 as follows:
(a) University of Washington, 18.9 percent
(b) Washington State University, 18.0 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University, 9.9 percent
(d) Central Washington University, 7.2 percent
(e) Western Washington University, 9.0 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College, 5.4 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole, 34 percent.
Further, the governing boards and the state board are encouraged to
reduce waiver activity in recognition of the need to retain available
resources to preserve the educational quality of higher education
institutions. State general fund appropriations shall not be provided
to replace tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers
granted under authority of RCW 28B.15.915.
(7) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are
authorized to increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal
growth factor during the 2003-05 biennium. Tuition levels increased
pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the per credit hour rate
calculated from the academic year tuition levels adopted under this
act.
(8) Community colleges may increase services and activities fee
charges in excess of the fiscal growth factor up to the maximum level
authorized by the state board for community and technical colleges.
(9) Each institution receiving appropriations under sections 604
through 609 of this act shall submit a biennial plan to achieve
measurable and specific improvements each academic year as part of a
continuing effort to make meaningful and substantial progress towards
the achievement of long-term performance goals. The plans, to be
prepared at the direction of the higher education coordinating board,
shall be submitted by August 15, 2003. The higher education
coordinating board shall set biennial performance targets for each
institution and shall review actual achievements annually.
Institutions shall track their actual performance on the statewide
measures as well as faculty productivity, the goals and targets for
which may be unique to each institution. A report on progress towards
statewide and institution-specific goals, with recommendations for the
ensuing biennium, shall be submitted to the fiscal and higher education
committees of the legislature by November 15, 2005.
(10) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
develop a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific improvements
each academic year as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful
and substantial progress to achieve long-term performance goals. The
board shall set biennial performance targets for each college or
district, where appropriate, and shall review actual achievements
annually. Colleges shall track their actual performance on the
statewide measures. A report on progress towards the statewide goals,
with recommendations for the ensuing biennium, shall be submitted to
the fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature by
November 15, 2005.
(11) The general fund--state appropriations in sections 603 through
609 of this act represent reductions in current funding levels. In
order to provide each institution of higher education with the
capability of effectively managing their unique requirements,
flexibility in implementing these reductions is permitted. This will
assure the continuation of the highest quality higher education system
possible within available resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 The appropriations in sections 603 through
610 of this act provide state general fund support for full-time
equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher education.
It is the intent of the legislature that institutions of higher
education should adjust their actual enrollment levels to reflect a
sustainable alignment with state funding levels. Listed below are the
annual full-time equivalent student enrollments by institutions or
agency as assumed in this act.

2003-04
Annual
Average 2004-05
Annual
Average

University of Washington

Main campus 32,427 32,427

Bothell branch 1,235 1,235

Tacoma branch 1,484 1,484

Washington State University

Main campus 17,348 17,364

Spokane branch 593 593

Tri-Cities branch 616 616

Vancouver branch 1,153 1,153

Central Washington University 7,604 7,604

Eastern Washington University 8,017 8,017

The Evergreen State College 3,837 3,837

Western Washington University 11,126 11,126

State Board for Community and Technical Colleges 126,290 126,290

Higher Education Coordinating Board 0 1,050

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,996,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $493,198,000
Administrative Contingency Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $993,594,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess
of the fiscal growth factor to conform with the percentage increase in
community college operating fees.
(2) $495,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,005,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to increase salaries and related
benefits for part-time faculty. The board shall report by January 30
of each fiscal year to the office of financial management and
legislative fiscal and higher education committees on (a) the
distribution of state funds; (b) wage adjustments for part-time
faculty; and (c) progress to achieve the long-term performance targets
for each district, with respect to use of part-time faculty, pursuant
to the faculty mix study conducted under section 603, chapter 309, Laws
of 1999.
(3) $1,155,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,345,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for faculty salary increments and
associated benefits and may be used in combination with salary and
benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide salary increments and
associated benefits.
(4) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for a program to fund the start-up of new
community and technical college programs in rural counties as defined
under RCW 43.160.020(12) and in communities impacted by business
closures and job reductions. Successful proposals must respond to
local economic development strategies and must include a plan to
continue programs developed with this funding.
(5) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for allocation to Clark Community
College and Lower Columbia Community College to prepare a total of 168
full-time equivalent students for transfer to the engineering and
science institute at the Vancouver branch campus of Washington State
University. The appropriations in this section are intended to
supplement, not supplant, general enrollment allocations by the board
to districts named in this subsection.
(6) $640,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $640,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for allocation to twelve college
districts identified in (a) through (l) of this subsection to prepare
students for transfer to the state technology institute at the Tacoma
branch campus of the University of Washington. The appropriations in
this section are intended to supplement, not supplant, general
enrollment allocations by the board to the districts under (a) through
(l) of this subsection:
(a) Bates Technical College;
(b) Bellevue Community College;
(c) Centralia Community College;
(d) Clover Park Community College;
(e) Grays Harbor Community College;
(f) Green River Community College;
(g) Highline Community College;
(h) Tacoma Community College;
(i) Olympic Community College;
(j) Pierce District;
(k) Seattle District; and
(l) South Puget Sound Community College.
(7) $28,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $28,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in
chapter 226, Laws of 1993 (employment and training for unemployed
workers). Funding is provided to support up to 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in each fiscal year.
(8) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for tuition support for students
enrolled in work-based learning programs.
(9) $4,150,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program, which shall be made
available broadly and not to the exclusion of private nonprofit
baccalaureate degree granting institutions or vocational arts career
schools operating in Washington state who partner with a firm,
hospital, group, or industry association concerned with commerce,
trade, manufacturing, or the provision of services to train current or
prospective employees. The state board shall make an annual report to
the governor and appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature regarding the implementation of this section listing the
scope of grant awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector
and region of the state, as well as successful partnerships being
supported by these state funds.
(10) $250,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely and on a one-time basis to start up a
college district consortium organized under the name "alliance for
corporate education." Financial operations shall be self-sustaining by
no later than June 30, 2005, after which time any amount remaining
unexpended from this amount shall lapse.
(11) $2,540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for 250 full-time equivalent
students in high-demand fields and programs where enrollment access is
limited and employers are experiencing difficulty finding qualified
graduates to fill job openings. In allocating these instructional
resources, the state board may apply a portion of the amount provided
in this subsection towards the development of new direct transfer
agreements. Allocation of FTE enrollments to college districts shall
be granted principally to those preparing students for careers in (a)
nursing, dentistry, and other health services; (b) teaching; (c)
computing and information technology; (d) applied science and
engineering; and (e) viticulture and enology. All districts that
receive a high-demand enrollment allocation from the state board must
evidence work that fosters collaboration and eases the prospect for
articulation across educational sectors for students who have or will
participate in high-demand fields and programs supported by the state.
The state board shall report on implementation of this section by
November of each fiscal year to both the governor and the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.
(12) $111,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $86,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to support the development of a
comprehensive viticulture (grape growing) and enology (wine making)
higher education program in Washington state. From these sums, the
state board shall allocate:
(a) $75,000 a year to Walla Walla community college for its
associate science and associate arts degree programs for the purpose of
vineyard and wine-making equipment purchases, student labor,
instructional supplies, field work, and travel expenses;
(b) $25,000 on a one-time basis to Wenatchee community college for
the purpose of adapting its orchard employee educational program; and
(c) $22,000 on a one-time basis to Yakima Valley community college
for the purpose of vineyard and wine-making equipment and supply
purchases.
The college districts named in this subsection are encouraged to
seek a portion of the high-demand student enrollment funding made
available on a competitive basis through the state board or the higher
education coordinating board to fill-out their respective need for
additional instructors and professional staff.
(13) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are solely for higher education student child care
matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(14) $212,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $212,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided for allocation to Olympic college. The
college shall contract with accredited baccalaureate institution(s) to
bring a program of upper-division courses to Bremerton. The state
board for community and technical colleges shall report to the office
of financial management and the fiscal and higher education committees
of the legislature on the implementation of this subsection by December
1st of each fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 FOR UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,932,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $299,951,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,767,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,797,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $619,702,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,875,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,875,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for technology education in the
form of an institute located at the University of Washington, Tacoma.
The university will continue to provide undergraduate and graduate
degree programs that focus and respond to regional technology needs of
employers and enrolled students including, but not limited to,
computing and software systems. As a condition of these
appropriations:
(a) The university will work with the state board for community and
technical colleges, or individual colleges where necessary, to
establish articulation agreements in addition to the existing associate
of arts and associate of science transfer degrees. Such agreements
shall improve the transferability of students and in particular,
students with substantial applied information technology credits.
(b) The university will establish performance measures for
recruiting, retaining, and graduating students, including
nontraditional students, and report to the governor and legislature by
September 2004 as to its progress and future steps.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for research faculty clusters in
the advanced technology initiative program.
(3) $255,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is
provided solely for the forensic pathologist fellowship program.
(4) $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item UW-01.
(5) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the Olympic natural resource
center.
(6) $1,526,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $3,096,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered
recruitment and retention salary adjustments for instructional and
research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic administrators,
academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as
classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015.
Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this
section to further provide recruitment and retention salary
adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,712,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,136,000
Washington State University Building Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,998,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $734,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to expand the entering class of
veterinary medicine students by 16 full-time equivalent residents each
academic year during the 2003-05 biennium.
(2) $657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $180,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and the entire Washington state university building account
appropriation are provided solely to support the development of a
comprehensive viticulture (grape growing) and enology (wine making)
higher education program in Washington state. In consideration of
these appropriations, the legislature intends to provide ongoing
support of not less than $180,000 a year for extension field personnel
and services. The balance of the amount provided from the fiscal year
2004 appropriation is provided on a one-year basis to enable the
university to appoint jointly shared faculty between the Pullman main
campus and its branch campus in the TriCities. The legislature expects
the university to meet ongoing faculty, staff, and related expenses to
support the delivery of baccalaureate degree programs in viticulture
and enology by making a successful bid for a portion of high-demand
enrollment funding that will be distributed on a competitive basis by
the state higher education coordinating board for student instruction
during the 2004-05 academic year under section 610(4) of this act.
(3) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for allocation in full to the
branch campus in Vancouver to create and operate a state institute for
engineering and science in partnership with Clark and Lower Columbia
community colleges and regional industry leaders in southwest
Washington. As a condition of this appropriation, the university shall
develop and provide to the satisfaction of the office of financial
management a business plan for the new institute. The university,
together with its two-year college and industry partners, shall provide
the governor, legislature, and state higher education coordinating
board with an annual summary of its progress to produce more graduates
trained in applied science technologies and engineering. Annual
reports to inform and advise policymakers of the partners' success,
emerging issues, and resource needs if any shall occur by no later than
November 15 during the 2003-05 biennium.
(4) $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $150,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for research faculty clusters in
the advanced technology initiative program.
(5) $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $166,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item WSU-01.
(6) $949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,927,000 of general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered
recruitment and retention salary adjustments for instructional and
research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic administrators,
academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as
classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015.
Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this
section to further provide recruitment and retention salary
adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,718,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,607,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,325,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $248,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $503,000 of general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for
competitively offered recruitment and retention salary adjustments for
instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic
administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those
required by this section to further provide recruitment and retention
salary adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,784,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,230,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,014,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided to expand university enrollment by 134
full-time equivalent undergraduate students.
(2) $206,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $418,000 of general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment and
retention salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty,
exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified
by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified
staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Tuition
revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section
to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,363,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,383,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,746,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $124,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $252,000 of general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment and
retention salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty,
exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified
by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified
staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Tuition
revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section
to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
(2) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for the institute for public policy to
examine and report to the legislature by November 15, 2003, on
potential enrollment levels, costs, and offsetting savings of
alternative approaches for providing prescription drug benefits under
a waiver of federal rules for low-income, elderly, and disabled
residents who would not otherwise qualify for Medicaid.
(3) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the institute for public
policy to conduct the evaluation outlined in Substitute Senate Bill No.
5012 (charter schools).
(4) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to develop adherence and outcome standards for measuring
the effectiveness of treatment programs referred to in Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5903 (juvenile offender sentencing). The
standards shall be developed and presented to the governor and
legislature by no later than January 1, 2004.
(5) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to examine the results of the changes in earned
release under Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5990 (changing times
and supervision standards for release of offenders). The study shall
determine whether the changes in earned release affect the rate of
recidivism or the type of offenses committed by persons whose release
dates were affected by the changes under the bill. The institute shall
report its findings to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by no later than December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,342,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,914,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,256,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $980,400 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $980,400 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the operations of the North
Snohomish, Island, Skagit (NSIS) higher education consortium.
(2) $248,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $503,000 of general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment and
retention salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty,
exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified
by the office of financial management, and all other nonclassified
staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Tuition
revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section
to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,453,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,311,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $642,000
Higher Education Agency Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,690,000

The appropriations in this section are provided to carry out the
policy coordination, planning, studies and administrative functions of
the board and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to continue a demonstration
project to improve rural access to post-secondary education by matching
students up with distance learning technologies and education providers
in Jefferson County. The board shall examine the feasibility and
provide the governor and legislature with a report by July of 2004,
that outlines how the state might proceed to transfer this experience
and replicate or test an alternative model in another region of the
state.
(2) $173,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004, $122,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2005, and the entire higher education agency account--local
appropriation, are provided to meet the student petition requirements
assigned to the board pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5135 (creating tuition surcharge). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2003, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) Within the appropriations provided in this section, funds are
provided to continue the teacher training pilot pursuant to chapter
28B.80 RCW until standing authority for this program expires as
scheduled on January 1, 2005.
(4) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $14,995,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to contract for 1,050 full-time
equivalent students in high-demand fields in fiscal year 2005. High-demand fields are programs where enrollment access is limited and
employers are experiencing difficulty finding qualified graduates to
fill job openings. Of the amounts provided, a reasonable amount may be
used for management of the competitive process for awarding high-demand
student FTEs.
(a) The board will manage a competitive process for awarding high-demand student FTEs. Any two- or four-year post-secondary institution
may apply however, in all cases, a public or nonprofit, accredited
educational corporation or institution based in Washington shall serve
as the grant-recipient of record and participate with the private
independent or proprietary school in curriculum planning and its
execution. Priority will go to competitive proposals that include
cooperative partnerships and articulation agreements.
(b) Among coequals, the board shall make it a priority to fund
proposals that prepare students for careers in (i) nursing, dentistry,
and other health services; (ii) teaching; (iii) computing and
information technology; (iv) applied science and engineering; (v)
viticulture and enology, but not to the exclusion of compelling
proposals that document specific regional student and employer demand
in fields not listed in this subsection. Proposals and grant awards
will separately identify one-time, nonrecurring costs and ongoing
costs.
(c) The board will establish a proposal review committee that will
include representatives from the board, the office of financial
management, out-of-state higher education institutions or associations,
western interstate commission on higher education, and economic
development and labor market analysts. The board will develop the
request for proposals, including the criteria for awarding grants, in
consultation with the proposal review committee.
(d) Colleges and universities that receive grants shall provide the
board and the forecast division of the office of financial management
with data specified by the board or the office of financial management
that shows the impact of this subsection, particularly the degree of
improved access to high-demand programs for students and successful job
placements for graduates. During the 2003-05 biennium, the board will
prepare an annual report on the impact of this subsection and provide
it to the office of financial management and the fiscal and higher
education committees of the legislature by November 1 for the prior
academic year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,907,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,100,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,534,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,541,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $259,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $273,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the western interstate
commission for higher education.
(2) $1,100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $1,100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the health professional
conditional scholarship and loan program under chapter 28B.115 RCW.
This amount shall be deposited to the health professional loan
repayment and scholarship trust fund to carry out the purposes of the
program.
(3) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(4) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the benefit of students who
participate in college assistance migrant programs (CAMP) operating in
Washington state. To ensure timely state aid, the board may establish
a date after which no additional grants would be available for the
2003-04 and 2004-05 academic years. The board shall disperse grants in
equal amounts to eligible post-secondary institutions so that state
money in all cases supplements federal CAMP awards.
(5) $113,212,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2004 and $125,193,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the state
need grant program. After April 1 of each fiscal year, up to one
percent of the annual appropriation for the state need grant program
may be transferred to the state work study program.
(6) $17,048,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $17,048,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the state work study program.
After April 1 of each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual
appropriation for the state work study program may be transferred to
the state need grant program. In addition to the administrative
allowance in subsection (12) of this section, four percent of the
general fund -- state amount in this subsection may be expended for state
work study program administration.
(7) $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for educational opportunity
grants. The board may deposit sufficient funds from its appropriation
into the state education trust fund as established in RCW 28B.10.821 to
provide a one-year renewal of the grant for each new recipient of the
educational opportunity grant award. Unless otherwise provided by the
enactment of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5676 or Substitute House Bill
No. 1731 by June 30, 2003, and for the purpose of establishing
eligibility for the educational opportunity grant program for
placebound students under RCW 28B.101.020, Thurston county lies within
the branch campus service area of the Tacoma branch campus of the
University of Washington.
(8) $1,957,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,231,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement the Washington
scholars program. Any Washington scholars program moneys not awarded
by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board to the
Washington award for vocational excellence.
(9) $808,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $875,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely to implement Washington award for
vocational excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational
program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred
by the board to the Washington scholars program.
(10) $246,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $246,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for community scholarship matching
grants of $2,000 each. To be eligible for the matching grant, a
nonprofit community organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has raised $2,000 in
new moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
act. An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching grant
and preference shall be given to organizations affiliated with the
citizens' scholarship foundation.
(11) Subject to state need grant service requirements pursuant to
chapter 28B.119 RCW, $6,050,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $6,050,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
Washington promise scholarship program.
(12) $2,721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $2,577,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for financial aid administration,
in addition to the four percent cost allowance provision for state work
study under subsection (6) of this section. These funds are provided
to administer all the financial aid and grant programs assigned to the
board by the legislature and administered by the agency. To the extent
the executive director finds the agency will not require the full sum
provided in this subsection, a portion may be transferred to supplement
financial grants-in-aid to eligible clients after notifying the board
and the office of financial management of the intended transfer.
(13) $539,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $540,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the displaced homemakers
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,682,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,640,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,796,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,118,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $485,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2004 and $485,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the
operations and development of the inland northwest technology education
center (INTEC) as a regional resource and model for the rapid
deployment of skilled workers trained in the latest technologies for
Washington. The board shall serve as an advisor to and fiscal agent
for INTEC, and will report back to the governor and legislature by
September 2004 as to the progress and future steps for INTEC.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH
AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,404,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,415,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,819,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,725,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,026,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,469,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,462,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,529,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,991,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,459,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,490,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,949,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,591,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,602,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,335,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,528,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,536,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,496,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,264,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $580,312,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $627,938,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,014,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $322,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,587,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,218,173,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES
State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,014,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,113,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,113,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,394,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,805,000
Higher Education Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
State Vehicle Parking Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000
Capital Historic District Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $299,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,375,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,213,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
Higher Education Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
State Vehicle Parking Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,032,000
Capital Historic District Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,231,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- EMERGENCY FUND
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for
the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL. The sum of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the
disaster response account for the purpose of making allocations to the
military department for fire mobilizations costs or to the department
of natural resources for fire suppression costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR TRAVEL, EQUIPMENT,
AND PERSONAL SERVICE CONTRACTS. The office of financial management
shall reduce allotments for all agencies for personal service
contracts, equipment, and travel by $20,151,000 from 2003-05 biennial
general fund appropriations in this act to reflect the elimination of
expenditures identified in LEAP document 32, a computerized tabulation
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on April 2, 2003. The general fund allotment reduction shall
be placed in unallotted status and remain unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR LEGISLATIVE
LIAISONS. During the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, no state agency or
institution may expend any moneys appropriated in this act to employ
legislative liaisons or contract for legislative liaisons. However,
each independently elected statewide official may employ one FTE
legislative liaison during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium. The office of
financial management shall reduce allotments for agencies by $3,257,000
from 2003-05 biennial general fund appropriations in this act to
reflect the elimination of the expenditures identified in LEAP document
34, a computerized tabulation developed by the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee on April 3, 2003. The general
fund allotment reduction shall be placed in unallotted status and
remain unexpended.
State funds provided in Part V of this act may not be expended by
or for any organization, association, or other entity attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature
of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR TORT LIABILITY.
The office of financial management shall reduce allotments for all
agencies by $18,000,000 from 2003-05 biennial general fund
appropriations in this act to reflect the reduction in state tort
liability under Senate Bill No. 5728 or 5999. The general fund
allotment reduction shall be placed in unallotted status and remain
unexpended.

Sec. 710 2003 c . . . (SSB 5403) s 707 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
STATE EMPLOYMENT. (1) From the effective date of this act until
the conclusion of the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2003, and
consistent with the governor's Executive Directive No. 02-04, state
agencies of the executive branch shall not establish new staff
positions except as specifically authorized by this supplemental
appropriations act or fill vacant existing staff positions except as
specifically authorized by this section.
(2) Public safety agencies may fill two-thirds of staff positions
becoming vacant; all other agencies may fill two-fifths of vacant
positions. In filling vacant positions pursuant to this subsection,
agencies shall place the highest priority on front-line positions
engaged in service delivery to the public.
(3) Exceptions to subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be
granted only by the governor and only for critical or emergent
situations that threaten public health or safety, as determined by the
governor. The governor shall notify the legislative fiscal committees
within ten days of the granting of any exception under this subsection.
(4) This section applies to all agencies of the executive branch,
including all boards, commissions, and agencies headed by elected
officials. This section does not apply to the institutions of higher
education and state institutional programs. This section does not
apply to the filling of temporary, seasonal positions by the following
agencies: The department of natural resources, the department of fish
and wildlife, the department of agriculture, the department of ecology,
and the state parks and recreation commission. It is the intent of the
legislature that agencies of the legislative and judicial branches of
state government shall also observe the employment policies established
by this section, subject to such procedures as may be adopted by the
legislative and judicial branches, respectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or
so much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the general
fund, unless otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals,
firms, and corporations for sundry claims. These appropriations are to
be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of financial
management, except as otherwise provided, as follows:
(1) Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of
self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110:
(a) Kelly C. Schwartz, claim number SCJ 03-10 . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,250
(2) Payment from the state wildlife account for damage to crops by
wildlife, pursuant to RCW 77.36.050:
(a) Circle S Landscape Supplies, claim number SCG 03-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,379
(b) Marilyn Lund Farms, claim number SCG 03-08 . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,175
(c) Paul Gibbons, claim number SCG 03-09 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,414
(3) Reimbursement of legal costs, Building Industry Association of
Washington, claim number SCO 03-26 . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,912

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and
institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act,
upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of
supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior
fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 COMPENSATION -- INSURANCE BENEFITS.
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,606,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,546,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,012,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $773,000
Salary and Insurance Increase Revolving Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,174,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,111,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $495.30 per eligible employee
for fiscal year 2004, and $567.67 for fiscal year 2005.
(b) Within the rates in (a) of this subsection, $4.13 per eligible
employee shall be included in the employer funding rate for fiscal year
2004, and $2.11 per eligible employee shall be included in the employer
funding rate for fiscal year 2005, solely to increase life insurance
coverage in accordance with a court approved settlement in Burbage et
al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no.
94-2-02560-8).
(c) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or
make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.
(d) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and
accounts, the state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys
from each dedicated fund or account to the special fund salary and
insurance contribution increase revolving fund in accordance with
schedules provided by the office of financial management.
(3) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for parts A and B of
medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2004, through
December 31, 2004, the subsidy shall be $102.03. Starting January 1,
2005, the subsidy shall be $115.49 per month.
(4) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $42.75 per month beginning
September 1, 2003, and $48.92 beginning September 1, 2004;
(b) For each part-time employee who, at the time of the remittance,
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $42.75 each month beginning September 1, 2003, and
$48.92 beginning September 1, 2004, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives.
The remittance requirements specified in this subsection shall not
apply to employees of a technical college, school district, or
educational service district who purchase insurance benefits through
contracts with the health care authority.
(5) The salary and insurance increase revolving account
appropriation includes amounts sufficient to fund health benefits for
ferry workers at the premium levels specified in subsection (1) of this
section, consistent with the 2003-2005 transportation appropriations
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in this
section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis consistent with
chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial
retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with
chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,171,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,829,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $674,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $683,000
Judicial Information Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,627,000

The appropriations in this section are provided solely to fund
pension contributions to the public employees' retirement system and
teachers' retirement systems for judicial and legislative employees,
effective July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- PENSION CONTRIBUTION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($10,524,000)
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($10,618,000)
Projected Unit Credit Offset Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($13,696,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($34,838,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to make
adjustments to agency appropriations to reflect savings resulting from
the adoption of the projected unit credit actuarial funding method for
plans 2 and 3 of the public employees', teachers', and school
employees' retirement systems as provided in Senate Bill No. 6029
(funding PERS, TERS, and SERS). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2003, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and
accounts, the state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys
from each dedicated fund or account to the projected unit credit offset
account, hereby created in the state treasury, in accordance with
schedules provided by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,468,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,468,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,936,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is for
appropriation to the education technology revolving account for the
purpose of covering operational and transport costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in providing telecommunication services
to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- REVOLVING FUND ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,350,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,350,000
Revolving Fund Revolving Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,792,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,492,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to make
adjustments to agency revolving fund assessments for internal services
to reflect policy changes made to the governor's proposed omnibus
appropriations act. Policy changes include increased appropriations
for legal and archival services ($1,400,000 each), the restoration of
the office of minority and women's business enterprises ($2,400,000),
and the cancellation of the governor's proposed merger of the
department of personnel and the department of retirement systems
($5,300,000).
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and
accounts, the state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys
from each dedicated fund or account to the revolving fund revolving
account, hereby created in the state treasury, in accordance with
schedules provided by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2004. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2004, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2004 state
general fund appropriations is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2005. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2005, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2005 state
general fund appropriations is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH -- COUNTY
PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE
Health Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of the department of health
shall distribute the appropriation as follows: $48,000,000 is provided
to the department of health to support protection and improvement of
the public's health and to increase the efficiency and effectiveness of
the public health system. Funds will be provided to local public
health departments and districts through performance-based contracts to
help attain the standards for public health and to implement the
recommendations of the public health improvement plan. A monitoring
and reporting mechanism will be established to demonstrate progress
toward these goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT--COUNTY ASSISTANCE

General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2005) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of community, trade, and
economic development shall distribute the appropriations in this
section to the following counties in the amounts designated:

2004 2005

Garfield $290,000 $290,000

Columbia $200,500 $200,500

Wahkiakum $129,500 $129,500

Ferry $99,500 $99,500

Okanogan $140,000 $140,000

Asotin $108,500 $108,500

Stevens $209,000 $209,000

Douglas $132,000 $132,000

Lincoln $75,500 $75,500

Pend Oreille $71,500 $71,500

Skamania $44,000 $44,000

TOTAL $1,500,000 $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT--MUNICIPAL ASSISTANCE

General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2004) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of community, trade, and
economic development shall distribute the appropriation in this section
to the following cities in the amounts designated:

2004

Airway Heights $5,000

Albion $24,000

Almira $1,000

Asotin $10,000

Benton City $15,000

Black Diamond $18,000

Bridgeport $68,000

Brier $129,000

Bucoda $15,000

Carbonado $15,000

Cashmere $13,000

Cheney $19,000

Chewelah $1,000

Colfax $1,000

College Place $138,000

Colton $5,000

Conconully $4,000

Concrete $1,000

Connell $27,000

Coulee Dam $6,000

Covington $117,000

Creston $2,000

Cusick $750

Darrington $6,000

Davenport $4,000

Dayton $1,000

Des Moines $161,000

Edgewood $272,000

Electric City $27,000

Elma $2,000

Elmer City $11,000

Endicott $10,000

Entiat $10,000

Everson $5,000

Fairfield $1,000

Farmington $3,000

Fircrest $50,000

Forks $5,000

Garfield $12,000

George $2,000

Gold Bar $29,000

Grandview $15,000

Granger $28,000

Hamilton $4,000

Harrah $16,000

Harrington $1,000

Hartline $3,000

Hatton $4,000

Hoquiam $19,000

Index $500

Ione $2,000

Kahlotus $6,000

Kenmore $132,000

Kettle Falls $4,000

Kittitas $17,000

Krupp $1,000

Lacrosse $3,000

Lake Forest Park $136,000

Lake Stevens $5,000

Lakewood $350,000

Lamont $2,000

Latah $3,000

Lyman $3,000

Mabton $51,000

Malden $8,000

Mansfield $8,000

Maple Valley $17,000

Marcus $3,000

Mattawa $17,000

McCleary $15,000

Medical Lake $10,000

Mesa $2,000

Metaline $2,000

Metaline Falls $1,000

Mossyrock $1,000

Mountlake Terrace $32,000

Moxee $2,000

Napavine $19,000

Nespelem $6,000

Newcastle $2,000

Nooksack $13,000

Normandy Park $82,000

North Bonneville $2,000

Northport $7,000

Oakesdale $3,000

Oakville $7,000

Orting $12,000

Palouse $7,000

Pateros $1,000

Pe Ell $20,000

Pomeroy $3,000

Prescott $1,000

Pullman $21,000

Rainier $27,000

Raymond $750

Reardan $8,000

Republic $1,000

Riverside $7,000

Rock Island $6,000

Rockford $2,000

Rosalia $6,000

Roslyn $11,000

Royal City $12,000

Ruston $8,000

Sammamish $320,000

Shoreline $65,000

Soap Lake $19,000

South Bend $5,000

South Cle Elum $11,000

South Prairie $2,000

Sprague $1,000

Springdale $1,000

Starbuck $3,000

Steilacoom $19,000

Tekoa $5,000

Tenino $7,000

Tieton $12,000

Toppenish $63,000

Uniontown $3,000

University Place $306,000

Vader $12,000

Waitsburg $15,000

Wapato $35,000

Warden $10,000

Washtucna $7,000

Waterville $13,000

Waverly $3,000

West Richland $84,000

White Salmon $1,000

Wilbur $1,000

Wilkeson $1,000

Wilson Creek $3,000

Yacolt $4,000

Zillah $5,000

TOTAL $3,500,000

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance premium
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,920,350
General Fund Appropriation for public utility district
excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,273,684
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorney
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,441,197
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and
education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,074,300
General Fund Appropriation for other tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,750
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly funded
autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,123,723
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for
harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $187,068
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to timber counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,192,170
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation for
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,160,837
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,175,755
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,086,550
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor
excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,624,831
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,511,693
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,806,908

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE MUNICIPAL
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,228,840

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2003-2005 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,843,260

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2003-2005 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,293,828
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control
funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,050
Federal Forest Revolving Fund Appropriation for
federal forest reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,492,373
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,811,251

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS

For transfers in this section to the state general fund, pursuant
to RCW 43.135.035(5), the state expenditure limit shall be increased by
the amount of the transfer. The increase shall occur in the fiscal
year in which the transfer occurs.
General Fund: For transfer to the water
quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,651,600
Water Quality Account: For transfer to the
water pollution control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000
State Convention and Trade Center Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
County Sale/Use Tax Equalization Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,000
Financial Services Regulation Fund: For
transfer to the state general fund at
the beginning of fiscal year 2005 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,632,000
Municipal Sale/Use Tax Equalization Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $374,000
Asbestos Account: For transfer to the state
general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Industrial Insurance Premium Refund Account:
For transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $577,000
Electrical License Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Public Service Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
State Treasurer's Service Account: For
transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account: For transfer to the state
general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Gambling Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Woodstove Education and Enforcement Account:
For transfer to the air pollution control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer
to the state toxics control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,059,000
Flood Control Assistance Account: For transfer
to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account--State: For
transfer to the state disaster response
account for fiscal year 2004 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,234,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
tobacco prevention and control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,216,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
violence reduction and drug enforcement
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,789,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
water quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,182,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2005 . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to
the health services account, in an amount
not to exceed the actual balance of the
tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,000,000
Emergency Reserve Fund: For transfer to the
state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,046,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--
TRANSFERS
General Fund--State Appropriation: For transfer to the
department of retirement systems expense account:
For the administrative expenses of the judicial
retirement system . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,901

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS. The
appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure
authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the
treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as
loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To
the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed
from the treasury during the 2003-05 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The department
of information services shall act as lead agency in coordinating video
telecommunications services for state agencies. As lead agency, the
department shall develop standards and common specifications for leased
and purchased telecommunications equipment and assist state agencies in
developing a video telecommunications expenditure plan. No agency may
spend any portion of any appropriation in this act for new video
telecommunication equipment, new video telecommunication transmission,
or new video telecommunication programming, or for expanding current
video telecommunication systems without first complying with chapter
43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW 43.105.041(2), and
without first submitting a video telecommunications expenditure plan,
in accordance with the policies of the department of information
services, for review and assessment by the department of information
services under RCW 43.105.052. Prior to any such expenditure by a
public school, a video telecommunications expenditure plan shall be
approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall submit the plans to the
department of information services in a form prescribed by the
department. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications in public schools
by providing educational information to local school districts and
shall assist local school districts and educational service districts
in telecommunications planning and curriculum development. Prior to
any such expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary
education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by
the higher education coordinating board. The higher education
coordinating board shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications
for instruction and instructional support in postsecondary education,
including the review and approval of instructional telecommunications
course offerings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 VOLUNTARY DEFICIT REDUCTION CONTRIBUTION
ACCOUNT. The voluntary deficit reduction contribution account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from citizens' voluntary
contributions, donations, gifts, bequests, grants, or other sources
granted or given for this account must be deposited in the account.
Money in the account shall be used exclusively for public purposes and
may be spent only after appropriation. Unless the donor has directed
that his or her contribution be used for a particular state program or
function, expenditures from the account may be used for any general
fund or transportation purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 PROGRAM COST SHIFTS. Any program costs
or moneys in this act that are shifted to the general fund from another
fund or account require an adjustment to the expenditure limit under
RCW 43.135.035(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS. Whenever
allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation
to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general
fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the
repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance
in the fund or funds which finance the agency. No appropriation shall
be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition
to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, and bond retirement and interest including
ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94 and
39.96 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 BOND EXPENSES. In addition to such other
appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to
the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the
applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as
are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES. As a
management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of
resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies
may offer voluntary separation and/or downshifting incentives and
options according to procedures and guidelines established by the
department of personnel and the department of retirement systems in
consultation with the office of financial management. The options may
include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for: Voluntary
resignation and retirement, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary
workweek or work hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, or
temporary separation for development purposes. No employee shall have
a contractual right to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this
section and employees accepting a voluntary separation incentive are
not eligible for unemployment compensation based on their separation
from state employment under Title 50 RCW.
Agencies shall report on the outcomes of their plans, and offers
shall be reviewed and monitored jointly by the department of personnel
and the department of retirement systems, for reporting to the office
of financial management by December 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES. It is
the intent of the legislature that agencies may implement a voluntary
retirement incentive program that is cost neutral or results in cost
savings provided that such a program is approved by the director of
retirement systems and the office of financial management. No employee
shall have a contractual right to a financial incentive offered
pursuant to this section, and employees accepting a voluntary
retirement incentive are not eligible for unemployment compensation
based on their separation from state employment under Title 50 RCW.
Agencies participating in this authorization are required to submit a
report by June 30, 2005, to the legislature and the office of financial
management on the outcome of their approved retirement incentive
program. The report should include information on the details of the
program including resulting service delivery changes, agency
efficiencies, the cost of the retirement incentive per participant, the
total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings
over the 2003-05 biennium.

Sec. 911 RCW 9.46.100 and 2002 c 371 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created the gambling revolving fund which shall
consist of all moneys receivable for licensing, penalties, forfeitures,
and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the commission.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys
received by the commission or any employee thereof, except for change
funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by rule or regulation of the
commission, shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the
state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited
to the gambling revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund
shall be on authorization of the commission or a duly authorized
representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective expenditure
and revenue control the gambling revolving fund shall be subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund. All
expenses relative to commission business, including but not limited to
salaries and expenses of the director and other commission employees
shall be paid from the gambling revolving fund.
During the ((2001-2003)) 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the gambling revolving fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund ((and
reductions made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for
administrative efficiencies and savings)).

Sec. 912 RCW 19.28.351 and 1988 c 81 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
All sums received from licenses, permit fees, or other sources,
herein shall be paid to the state treasurer and placed in a special
fund designated as the "electrical license fund," and ((by him)) paid
out upon vouchers duly and regularly issued therefor and approved by
the director of labor and industries or the director's designee
following determination by the board that the sums are necessary to
accomplish the intent of chapter 19.28 RCW. The treasurer shall keep
an accurate record of payments into, or receipts of, ((said)) the fund,
and of all disbursements therefrom.
During the 2003-2005 biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys
from the electrical license fund to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 913 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2002 c 317 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Allocation of state matching funds to eligible districts for local
effort assistance shall be determined as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; to
(b) The statewide average twelve percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance shall be the district's twelve
percent levy amount, multiplied by the following percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's twelve percent levy rate.
(3) Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) From January 1, 2004, to June 30, 2005, allocations and maximum
eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.937.

Sec. 914 RCW 36.18.010 and 2002 c 294 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
County auditors or recording officers shall collect the following
fees for their official services:
For recording instruments, for the first page eight and one-half by
fourteen inches or less, five dollars; for each additional page eight
and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar. The fee for
recording multiple transactions contained in one instrument will be
calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing as required
under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or transaction
is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded document;
the fee for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional
pages for any recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may
be collected only once and may not be collected for each title or
transaction;
For preparing and certifying copies, for the first page eight and
one-half by fourteen inches or less, three dollars; for each additional
page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar;
For preparing noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half
by fourteen inches or less, one dollar;
For administering an oath or taking an affidavit, with or without
seal, two dollars;
For issuing a marriage license, eight dollars, (this fee includes
taking necessary affidavits, filing returns, indexing, and transmittal
of a record of the marriage to the state registrar of vital statistics)
plus an additional ((five)) fifteen-dollar fee for use and support of
the prevention of child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted
monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund
plus an additional ten-dollar fee to be transmitted monthly to the
state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund. The
legislature intends to appropriate an amount at least equal to the
revenue generated by this fee for the purposes of the displaced
homemaker act, chapter 28B.04 RCW;
For searching records per hour, eight dollars;
For recording plats, fifty cents for each lot except cemetery plats
for which the charge shall be twenty-five cents per lot; also one
dollar for each acknowledgment, dedication, and description: PROVIDED,
That there shall be a minimum fee of twenty-five dollars per plat;
For recording of miscellaneous records not listed above, for the
first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five dollars;
for each additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less,
one dollar;
For modernization and improvement of the recording and indexing
system, a surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.170.
For recording an emergency nonstandard document as provided in RCW
65.04.047, fifty dollars, in addition to all other applicable recording
fees.
For recording instruments, a surcharge as provided in RCW
36.22.178.

Sec. 915 RCW 38.52.106 and 2002 c 371 s 904 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Nisqually earthquake account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys may be placed in the account from tax revenues, budget transfers
or appropriations, federal appropriations, gifts, or any other lawful
source. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Moneys in the account shall be used only to support state and local
government disaster response and recovery efforts associated with the
Nisqually earthquake. During the ((2001-)) 2003-2005 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer moneys from the Nisqually earthquake
account to the disaster response account for fire suppression and
mobilization costs((, and costs associated with national security
preparedness activities)).

Sec. 916 RCW 41.50.110 and 1998 c 341 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department and the
expenses of administration of the retirement systems created in
chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, and 43.43 RCW
shall be paid from the department of retirement systems expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its proportional
share of the entire expense of the administration of the retirement
system that the employer participates in during the ensuing biennium or
fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be computed in
an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire expense of the
administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's
members bears to the total salaries of all members in the entire
system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to include in
their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of
each month for the amount due for that month to the department of
retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are its
other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be made
on a percentage rate of salary established by the department. However,
the department may at its discretion establish a system of billing
based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said billing shall
be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(((2))) (3) shall
be paid pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the department of retirement systems' expense fund to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the fund.

Sec. 917 RCW 43.08.190 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 83 are each amended
to read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be
known as the "state treasurer's service fund". Such fund shall be used
solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation
and administration of the state treasurer's office.
Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state
treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the
trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings
generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other
than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and
accounts specified in RCW 43.79.040(((2)(b))) or 43.84.092(((2)(b)))
(4)(b). The allocation shall precede the distribution of the remaining
earnings as prescribed under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state
treasurer shall establish a uniform allocation rate based on the
appropriations for the treasurer's office.
During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the state treasurer's service fund to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 918 RCW 43.03.050 and 1990 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall prescribe reasonable
allowances to cover reasonable and necessary subsistence and lodging
expenses for elective and appointive officials and state employees
while engaged on official business away from their designated posts of
duty. The director of financial management may prescribe and regulate
the allowances provided in lieu of subsistence and lodging expenses and
may prescribe the conditions under which reimbursement for subsistence
and lodging may be allowed. The schedule of allowances adopted by the
office of financial management may include special allowances for
foreign travel and other travel involving higher than usual costs for
subsistence and lodging. The allowances established by the director
shall not exceed the rates set by the federal government for federal
employees. However, during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the allowances
for any county that is part of a metropolitan statistical area, the
largest city of which is in another state, shall equal the allowances
prescribed for that larger city.
(2) Those persons appointed to serve without compensation on any
state board, commission, or committee, if entitled to payment of
travel expenses, shall be paid pursuant to special per diem rates
prescribed in accordance with subsection (1) of this section by the
office of financial management.
(3) The director of financial management may prescribe reasonable
allowances to cover reasonable expenses for meals, coffee, and light
refreshment served to elective and appointive officials and state
employees regardless of travel status at a meeting where: (a) The
purpose of the meeting is to conduct official state business or to
provide formal training to state employees or state officials; (b) the
meals, coffee, or light refreshment are an integral part of the meeting
or training session; (c) the meeting or training session takes place
away from the employee's or official's regular workplace; and (d) the
agency head or authorized designee approves payments in advance for the
meals, coffee, or light refreshment. In order to prevent abuse, the
director may regulate such allowances and prescribe additional
conditions for claiming the allowances.
(4) Upon approval of the agency head or authorized designee, an
agency may serve coffee or light refreshments at a meeting where: (a)
The purpose of the meeting is to conduct state business or to provide
formal training that benefits the state; and (b) the coffee or light
refreshment is an integral part of the meeting or training session.
The director of financial management shall adopt requirements necessary
to prohibit abuse of the authority authorized in this subsection.
(5) The schedule of allowances prescribed by the director under the
terms of this section and any subsequent increases in any maximum
allowance or special allowances for areas of higher than usual costs
shall be reported to the ways and means committees of the house of
representatives and the senate at each regular session of the
legislature.

Sec. 919 RCW 43.10.180 and 1979 c 151 s 95 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The attorney general shall keep such records as are necessary
to facilitate proper allocation of costs to funds and agencies served
and the director of financial management shall prescribe appropriate
accounting procedures to accurately allocate costs to funds and
agencies served. Billings shall be adjusted in line with actual costs
incurred at intervals not to exceed six months.
(2) During the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, all expenses for
administration of the office of the attorney general shall be allocated
to and paid from the legal services revolving fund in accordance with
accounting procedures prescribed by the director of financial
management.

Sec. 920 RCW 43.08.250 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 914 and 2001 c
289 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The money received by the state treasurer from fees, fines,
forfeitures, penalties, reimbursements or assessments by any court
organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, or chapter 2.08 RCW, shall be
deposited in the public safety and education account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. The legislature shall appropriate the
funds in the account to promote traffic safety education, highway
safety, criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation,
judicial education, the judicial information system, civil
representation of indigent persons, winter recreation parking, drug
court operations, and state game programs. During the fiscal biennium
ending June 30, ((2003)) 2005, the legislature may appropriate moneys
from the public safety and education account for purposes of appellate
indigent defense and other operations of the office of public defense,
the criminal litigation unit of the attorney general's office, the
treatment alternatives to street crimes program, crime victims advocacy
programs, justice information network telecommunication planning,
treatment for supplemental security income clients, sexual assault
treatment, operations of the office of administrator for the courts,
security in the common schools, alternative school start-up grants,
programs for disruptive students, criminal justice data collection,
Washington state patrol criminal justice activities, drug court
operations, unified family courts, local court backlog assistance,
financial assistance to local jurisdictions for extraordinary costs
incurred in the adjudication of criminal cases, domestic violence
treatment and related services, the department of corrections' costs in
implementing chapter 196, Laws of 1999, reimbursement of local
governments for costs associated with implementing criminal and civil
justice legislation, the replacement of the department of corrections'
offender-based tracking system, public notification about registered
sex offenders, the family policy council, crisis residential centers or
secure crisis residential centers, payments to school districts for
truancy petitions, payments to superior courts for truancy, child-in-need-of-services or at-risk youth petitions, and narcotics or
methamphetamine-related enforcement, education, training, and drug and
alcohol treatment services.

Sec. 921 RCW 43.43.944 and 1999 c 117 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the
state treasury. The fund shall consist of:
(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire
service training;
(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol
under RCW 43.43.940; and
(c) Twenty percent of all moneys received by the state on fire
insurance premiums.
(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for fire service
training. During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate funds from this account for school fire prevention
activities within the Washington state patrol.

Sec. 922 RCW 43.135.045 and 2001 c 3 s 9, 2000 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 1,
and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund hereby
created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.
(6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated. No transfers from
the emergency reserve fund to the multimodal transportation account
shall be made during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 923 RCW 43.320.110 and 2002 c 371 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created a local fund known as the "financial services
regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the
divisions of the department of financial institutions, except for the
division of securities which shall deposit thirteen percent of all
moneys received, and which shall be used for the purchase of supplies
and necessary equipment; the payment of salaries, wages, and utilities;
the establishment of reserves; and other incidental costs required for
the proper regulation of individuals and entities subject to regulation
by the department. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the
fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the
director of financial institutions or the director's designee. In
order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the
fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from the fund.
((Between July 1, 2001, and December 31, 2001, the legislature may
transfer up to two million dollars from the financial services
regulation fund to the digital government revolving account.)) During
the ((2001-)) 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund and
appropriations reductions made by the ((2002 supplemental))
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings.

Sec. 924 RCW 46.09.170 and 1995 c 166 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on the tax rate in effect January 1, 1990, less proper deductions
for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090. The
treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as follows:
(a) Forty percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for planning, maintenance, and management of ORV recreation
facilities, nonhighway roads, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than five percent may be expended for information
programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than ten percent and not more than fifty percent may
be expended for ORV recreation facilities;
(iii) Not more than twenty-five percent may be expended for
maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(iv) Not more than fifty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(v) Ten percent shall be transferred to the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation for grants to law enforcement agencies in those
counties where the department of natural resources maintains ORV
facilities. This amount is in addition to those distributions made by
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under (d)(i) of this
subsection;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of nonhighway roads and recreation
facilities;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the maintenance and management of ORV use areas and facilities; and
(d) Fifty-four and one-half percent, together with the funds
received by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW
46.09.110, shall be credited to the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
activities program account to be administered by the committee for
planning, acquisition, development, maintenance, and management of ORV
recreation facilities and nonhighway road recreation facilities; ORV
user education and information; and ORV law enforcement programs. The
funds under this subsection shall be expended in accordance with the
following limitations:
(i) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for ORV education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than an amount equal to the funds received by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110 and
not more than sixty percent may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(iii) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities.
(2) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(3) During the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the ORV
account to the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
and the state parks and recreation commission. This appropriation is
not required to follow the specific distribution specified in
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 925 RCW 48.02.190 and 2002 c 371 s 913 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Organization" means every insurer, as defined in RCW
48.01.050, having a certificate of authority to do business in this
state and every health care service contractor registered to do
business in this state. "Class one" organizations shall consist of all
insurers as defined in RCW 48.01.050. "Class two" organizations shall
consist of all organizations registered under provisions of chapter
48.44 RCW.
(b) "Receipts" means (i) net direct premiums consisting of direct
gross premiums, as defined in RCW 48.18.170, paid for insurance written
or renewed upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be
performed in this state, less return premiums and premiums on policies
not taken, dividends paid or credited to policyholders on direct
business, and premiums received from policies or contracts issued in
connection with qualified plans as defined in RCW 48.14.021, and (ii)
prepayments to health care service contractors as set forth in RCW
48.44.010(3) less experience rating credits, dividends, prepayments
returned to subscribers, and payments for contracts not taken.
(2) The annual cost of operating the office of insurance
commissioner shall be determined by legislative appropriation. A pro
rata share of the cost shall be charged to all organizations. Each
class of organization shall contribute sufficient in fees to the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to pay the reasonable
costs, including overhead, of regulating that class of organization.
(3) Fees charged shall be calculated separately for each class of
organization. The fee charged each organization shall be that portion
of the cost of operating the insurance commissioner's office, for that
class of organization, for the ensuing fiscal year that is represented
by the organization's portion of the receipts collected or received by
all organizations within that class on business in this state during
the previous calendar year: PROVIDED, That the fee shall not exceed
one-eighth of one percent of receipts: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
minimum fee shall be one thousand dollars.
(4) The commissioner shall annually, on or before June 1, calculate
and bill each organization for the amount of its fee. Fees shall be
due and payable no later than June 15 of each year: PROVIDED, That if
the necessary financial records are not available or if the amount of
the legislative appropriation is not determined in time to carry out
such calculations and bill such fees within the time specified, the
commissioner may use the fee factors for the prior year as the basis
for the fees and, if necessary, the commissioner may impose
supplemental fees to fully and properly charge the organizations. The
penalties for failure to pay fees when due shall be the same as the
penalties for failure to pay taxes pursuant to RCW 48.14.060. The fees
required by this section are in addition to all other taxes and fees
now imposed or that may be subsequently imposed.
(5) All moneys collected shall be deposited in the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account in the state treasury which is hereby
created.
(6) Unexpended funds in the insurance commissioner's regulatory
account at the close of a fiscal year shall be carried forward in the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the succeeding fiscal
year and shall be used to reduce future fees. During the ((2001-2003))
2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 926 RCW 49.26.130 and 1989 c 154 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall administer this chapter.
(2) The director of the department shall adopt, in accordance with
chapters 34.05 and 49.17 RCW, rules necessary to carry out this
chapter.
(3) The department shall prescribe fees for the issuance and
renewal of certificates, including recertification, and the
administration of examinations, and for the review of training courses.
(4) The asbestos account is hereby established in the state
treasury. All fees collected under this chapter shall be deposited in
the account. Moneys in the account shall be spent after appropriation
only for costs incurred by the department in the administration and
enforcement of this chapter. Disbursements from the account shall be
on authorization of the director of the department or the director's
designee.
(5) During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the asbestos account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 927 RCW 50.16.010 and 2002 c 371 s 914 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart from
all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment compensation
fund, an administrative contingency fund, and a federal interest
payment fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner
exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050
shall not be applicable.
The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of
(1) all contributions and payments in lieu of contributions
collected pursuant to the provisions of this title,
(2) any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys
belonging to the fund,
(3) all earnings of such property or securities,
(4) any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in
the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social
security act, as amended,
(5) all money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund,
(6) all money credited to this state's account in the unemployment
trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as
amended,
(7) all money received from the federal government as reimbursement
pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended compensation act
of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304), and
(8) all moneys received for the fund from any other source.
All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be
commingled and undivided.
The administrative contingency fund shall consist of all interest
on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to this title, all fines
and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions of this title, all
sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by the fund, and
revenue received under RCW 50.24.014: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines,
forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district court
because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided
in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended.
Moneys available in the administrative contingency fund, other than
money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014, shall be
expended upon the direction of the commissioner, with the approval of
the governor, whenever it appears to him or her that such expenditure
is necessary for:
(a) The proper administration of this title and no federal funds
are available for the specific purpose to which such expenditure is to
be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for appropriations
from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys, would be made
available.
(b) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be
reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.
(c) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
(d) During the ((2001-))2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the cost of
((worker retraining programs)) the job skills program and the alliance
for corporate education at community and technical colleges as
appropriated by the legislature.
Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014 may only
be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified in RCW
50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.04.070, 50.04.072, 50.16.010,
50.29.025, 50.24.014, 50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

Sec. 928 RCW 51.44.170 and 2002 c 371 s 916 are each amended to
read as follows:
The industrial insurance premium refund account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All industrial insurance refunds
earned by state agencies or institutions of higher education under the
state fund retrospective rating program shall be deposited into the
account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures
from the account. Only the executive head of the agency or institution
of higher education, or designee, may authorize expenditures from the
account. No agency or institution of higher education may make an
expenditure from the account for an amount greater than the refund
earned by the agency. If the agency or institution of higher education
has staff dedicated to workers' compensation claims management,
expenditures from the account must be used to pay for that staff, but
additional expenditure from the account may be used for any program
within an agency or institution of higher education that promotes or
provides incentives for employee workplace safety and health and early,
appropriate return-to-work for injured employees. During the ((2001-2003)) 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
industrial insurance premium refund account to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the ((reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings)) excess
fund balance of the account.

Sec. 929 RCW 67.40.040 and 1995 c 386 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
67.40.030, proceeds of the taxes imposed under RCW 67.40.090 and
67.40.130, and all other moneys received by the state convention and
trade center from any public or private source which are intended to
fund the acquisition, design, construction, expansion, exterior cleanup
and repair of the Eagles building, conversion of various retail and
other space to meeting rooms, purchase of the land and building known
as the McKay Parcel, development of low-income housing, or renovation
of the center, and those expenditures authorized under RCW 67.40.170
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account
hereby created in the state treasury and in such subaccounts as are
deemed appropriate by the directors of the corporation.
(2) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in
the following priority:
(a) For reimbursement of the state general fund under RCW
67.40.060;
(b) After appropriation by statute:
(i) For payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030;
(ii) For expenditures authorized in RCW 67.40.170;
(iii) For acquisition, design, and construction of the state
convention and trade center; and
(iv) For reimbursement of any expenditures from the state general
fund in support of the state convention and trade center; and
(c) For transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account.
(3) The corporation shall identify with specificity those
facilities of the state convention and trade center that are to be
financed with proceeds of general obligation bonds, the interest on
which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal income
tax purposes. The corporation shall not permit the extent or manner of
private business use of those bond-financed facilities to be
inconsistent with treatment of such bonds as governmental bonds under
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) In order to ensure consistent treatment of bonds authorized
under RCW 67.40.030 with applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, investment
earnings on bond proceeds deposited in the state convention and trade
center account in the state treasury shall be retained in the account,
and shall be expended by the corporation for the purposes authorized
under chapter 386, Laws of 1995 and in a manner consistent with
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state convention and trade center account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account.

Sec. 930 RCW 69.50.520 and 2002 c 371 s 920 are each amended to
read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(i)(1), 82.08.150(5),
82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989
shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws
of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state
incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also be appropriated
to reimburse local governments for costs associated with implementing
criminal justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997.
During the ((2001-))2003-2005 biennium, funds from the account may also
be used for costs associated with providing grants to local governments
in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, the replacement of the
department of corrections' offender-based tracking system, maintenance
and operating costs of the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs jail reporting system, civil indigent legal
representation, drug treatment costs for offenders, and for
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. After July 1, 2003, at
least seven and one-half percent of expenditures from the account shall
be used for providing grants to community networks under chapter 70.190
RCW by the family policy council.

Sec. 931 RCW 70.79.350 and 1979 c 151 s 171 are each amended to
read as follows:
The chief inspector shall give an official receipt for all fees
required by chapter 70.79 RCW and shall transfer all sums so received
to the treasurer of the state of Washington as ex officio custodian
thereof and ((by him, as such custodian,)) the treasurer shall place
((said)) all sums in a special fund hereby created and designated as
the "pressure systems safety fund". ((Said)) Funds ((by him)) shall be
paid out upon vouchers duly and regularly issued therefor and approved
by the director of the department of labor and industries. The
treasurer, as ex officio custodian of ((said)) the fund, shall keep an
accurate record of any payments into ((said)) the fund, and of all
disbursements therefrom. ((Said)) The fund shall be used exclusively
to defray only the expenses of administering chapter 70.79 RCW by the
chief inspector as authorized by law and the expenses incident to the
maintenance of ((his)) the office. The fund shall be charged with its
pro rata share of the cost of administering ((said)) the fund which is
to be determined by the director of financial management and by the
director of the department of labor and industries.
During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the pressure systems safety fund to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 932 RCW 70.146.030 and 2002 c 371 s 921 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390,
principal and interest from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant
to this chapter, and any other moneys appropriated to the account by
the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, ((2001)) 2003, to June 30, ((2003)) 2005, moneys in the account may
be used to process applications received by the department that seek to
make changes to or transfer existing water rights and for grants and
technical assistance to public bodies for watershed planning under
chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three percent of the moneys deposited
in the account may be used by the department to pay for the
administration of the grant and loan program authorized by this
chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31 of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

Sec. 933 RCW 80.01.080 and 2002 c 371 s 924 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created in the state treasury a public service revolving
fund. Regulatory fees payable by all types of public service companies
shall be deposited to the credit of the public service revolving fund.
Except for expenses payable out of the pipeline safety account, all
expense of operation of the Washington utilities and transportation
commission shall be payable out of the public service revolving fund.
During the ((2001-2003)) 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the public service revolving fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the ((appropriations reductions
made by the 2002 supplemental appropriations act for administrative
efficiencies and savings)) excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 934 RCW 82.14.200 and 1998 c 321 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created in the state treasury a special account to be
known as the "county sales and use tax equalization account." Into
this account shall be placed a portion of all motor vehicle excise tax
receipts as provided in RCW 82.44.110. Funds in this account shall be
allocated by the state treasurer according to the following procedure:
(1) Prior to April 1st of each year the director of revenue shall
inform the state treasurer of the total and the per capita levels of
revenues for the unincorporated area of each county and the statewide
weighted average per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated
areas of all counties imposing the sales and use tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.
(2) At such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150,
the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and receiving
less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars from the tax for the
previous calendar year, an amount from the county sales and use tax
equalization account sufficient, when added to the amount of revenues
received the previous calendar year by the county, to equal one hundred
fifty thousand dollars.
The department of revenue shall establish a governmental price
index as provided in this subsection. The base year for the index
shall be the end of the third quarter of 1982. Prior to November 1,
1983, and prior to each November 1st thereafter, the department of
revenue shall establish another index figure for the third quarter of
that year. The department of revenue may use the implicit price
deflators for state and local government purchases of goods and
services calculated by the United States department of commerce to
establish the governmental price index. Beginning on January 1, 1984,
and each January 1st thereafter, the one hundred fifty thousand dollar
base figure in this subsection shall be adjusted in direct proportion
to the percentage change in the governmental price index from 1982
until the year before the adjustment. Distributions made under this
subsection for 1984 and thereafter shall use this adjusted base amount
figure.
(3) Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (2) of this
section and at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and
receiving less than seventy percent of the statewide weighted average
per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of all
counties as determined by the department of revenue under subsection
(1) of this section, an amount from the county sales and use tax
equalization account sufficient, when added to the per capita level of
revenues for the unincorporated area received the previous calendar
year by the county, to equal seventy percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of
all counties determined under subsection (1) of this section, subject
to reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section. When
computing distributions under this section, any distribution under
subsection (2) of this section shall be considered revenues received
from the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar
year.
(4) Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (3) of this
section and at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (2) of this section, a third
distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization account.
The distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to the
distribution to the county under subsection (2) of this section,
subject to the reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section.
To qualify for the total distribution under this subsection, the county
must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar
year. Counties imposing the tax for less than the full year shall
qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate to
the number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.
(5) Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (4) of this
section and at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (3) of this section, a fourth
distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization account.
The distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to the
distribution to the county under subsection (3) of this section,
subject to the reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section.
To qualify for the distributions under this subsection, the county must
impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar year.
Counties imposing the tax for less than the full year shall qualify for
prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate to the number
of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.
(6) Revenues distributed under subsections (2) through (5) of this
section in any calendar year shall not exceed an amount equal to
seventy percent of the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues for the unincorporated areas of all counties during the
previous calendar year. If distributions under subsections (3) through
(5) of this section cannot be made because of this limitation, then
distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section shall
be reduced ratably among the qualifying counties.
(7) If inadequate revenues exist in the county sales and use tax
equalization account to make the distributions under subsections (3)
through (5) of this section, then the distributions under subsections
(3) through (5) of this section shall be reduced ratably among the
qualifying counties. At such time during the year as additional funds
accrue to the county sales and use tax equalization account, additional
distributions shall be made under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section to the counties.
(8) If the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax
equalization account exceeds the amount necessary to make the
distributions under subsections (2) through (5) of this section, at
such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150, the state
treasurer shall apportion an amount to the county public health account
created in RCW 70.05.125 equal to the adjustment under RCW
70.05.125(2)(b).
(9) If the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax
equalization account exceeds the amount necessary to make the
distributions under subsections (2) through (5) and (8) of this
section, then the additional revenues shall be credited and transferred
as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the public facilities construction loan
revolving account under RCW 43.160.080; and
(b) Fifty percent to the distressed county public facilities
construction loan account under RCW 43.160.220, or so much thereof as
will not cause the balance in the account to exceed twenty-five million
dollars. Any remaining funds shall be deposited into the public
facilities construction loan revolving account.
(10) During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the county sales and use tax equalization account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account.

Sec. 935 RCW 82.14.210 and 1996 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created in the state treasury a special account to be
known as the "municipal sales and use tax equalization account." Into
this account shall be placed such revenues as are provided under RCW
82.44.110(1)(e). Funds in this account shall be allocated by the state
treasurer according to the following procedure:
(1) Prior to January 1st of each year the department of revenue
shall determine the total and the per capita levels of revenues for
each city and the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues for all cities imposing the sales and use tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.
(2) At such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150,
the state treasurer shall apportion to each city not imposing the sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) an amount from the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account equal to the amount distributed to the
city under RCW 82.44.155, multiplied by forty-five fifty-fifths.
(3) Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (2) of this
section, and at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150, the state treasurer shall apportion to each city imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and
receiving less than seventy percent of the statewide weighted average
per capita level of revenues for all cities as determined by the
department of revenue under subsection (1) of this section, an amount
from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account sufficient,
when added to the per capita level of revenues received the previous
calendar year by the city, to equal seventy percent of the statewide
weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities determined
under subsection (1) of this section, subject to reduction under
subsection (6) of this section.
(4) Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (3) of this
section, and at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150, the state treasurer shall apportion to each city imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (3) of this section, a third
distribution from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account.
The distribution to each qualifying city shall be equal to the
distribution to the city under subsection (3) of this section, subject
to the reduction under subsection (6) of this section. To qualify for
the distributions under this subsection, the city must impose the tax
under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar year. Cities imposing
the tax for less than the full year shall qualify for prorated
allocations under this subsection proportionate to the number of months
of the year during which the tax is imposed.
(5) For a city with an official incorporation date after January 1,
1990, municipal sales and use tax equalization distributions shall be
made according to the procedures in this subsection. Municipal sales
and use tax equalization distributions to eligible new cities shall be
made at the same time as distributions are made under subsections (3)
and (4) of this section. The department of revenue shall follow the
estimating procedures outlined in this subsection until the new city
has received a full year's worth of revenues under RCW 82.14.030(1) as
of the January municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution.
(a) Whether a newly incorporated city determined to receive funds
under this subsection receives its first equalization payment at the
January, April, July, or October municipal sales and use tax
equalization distribution shall depend on the date the city first
imposes the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1).
(i) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) effective as of January 1st shall be eligible to receive
funds under this subsection beginning with the April municipal sales
and use tax equalization distribution of that year.
(ii) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) effective as of February 1st, March 1st, or April 1st
shall be eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning with
the July municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution of that
year.
(iii) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) effective as of May 1st, June 1st, or July 1st shall
be eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning with the
October municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution of that
year.
(iv) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under
RCW 82.14.030(1) effective as of August 1st, September 1st, or October
1st shall be eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning
with the January municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution
of the next year.
(v) A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) effective as of November 1st or December 1st shall be
eligible to receive funds under this subsection beginning with the
April municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution of the next
year.
(b) For purposes of calculating the amount of funds the new city
should receive under this subsection, the department of revenue shall:
(i) Estimate the per capita amount of revenues from the tax
authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) that the new city would have received
had the city received revenues from the tax the entire calendar year;
(ii) Calculate the amount provided under subsection (3) of this
section based on the per capita revenues determined under (b)(i) of
this subsection;
(iii) Prorate the amount determined under (b)(ii) of this
subsection by the number of months the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) is imposed.
(c) A new city imposing the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the
maximum rate and receiving a distribution calculated under (b) of this
subsection shall receive another distribution from the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account. This distribution shall be equal to
the calculation made under (b)(ii) of this subsection, prorated by the
number of months the city imposes the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(2) at the full rate.
(d) The department of revenue shall advise the state treasurer of
the amounts calculated under (b) and (c) of this subsection and the
state treasurer shall distribute these amounts to the new city from the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account subject to the
limitations imposed in subsection (6) of this section.
(e) Revenues estimated under this subsection shall not affect the
calculation of the statewide weighted average per capita level of
revenues for all cities made under subsection (1) of this section.
(6) If inadequate revenues exist in the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account to make the distributions under subsection (3),
(4), or (5) of this section, then the distributions under subsections
(3), (4), and (5) of this section shall be reduced ratably among the
qualifying cities. At such time during the year as additional funds
accrue to the municipal sales and use tax equalization account,
additional distributions shall be made under subsections (3), (4), and
(5) of this section to the cities.
(7) If the level of revenues in the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account exceeds the amount necessary to make the
distributions under subsections (2) through (5) of this section, then
the additional revenues shall be apportioned among the several cities
within the state ratably on the basis of population as last determined
by the office of financial management: PROVIDED, That no such
distribution shall be made to those cities receiving a distribution
under subsection (2) of this section.
(8) During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
in the account.

Sec. 936 RCW 86.26.007 and 1997 c 149 s 914 are each amended to
read as follows:
The flood control assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. At the beginning of the 1997-99 fiscal biennium and
each biennium thereafter the state treasurer shall transfer four
million dollars from the general fund to the flood control assistance
account. Moneys in the flood control assistance account may be spent
only after appropriation for purposes specified under this chapter
((or, during the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, for transfer to the disaster
response account)). During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the flood control assistance account to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
of the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 937 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 938 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR LEGISLATIVE LIAISONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 134
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR TORT LIABILITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 134
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR TRAVEL, EQUIPMENT, PERSONAL SERVICE CONTRACTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 134
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
BELATED CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 136
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
BOND EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
COMMISSION ON ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
COMPENSATION -- INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 136
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 65
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
COUNTY ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
MUNICIPAL ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 65
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 65
EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 127
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 125
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
INCENTIVE SAVINGS
FY 2004 . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
FY 2005 . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 109
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
EMERGENCY FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 133
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 133
PENSION CONTRIBUTION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
REVOLVING FUND ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
PROGRAM COST SHIFTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
STATE EMPLOYMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 135
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 132, 133
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 148
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 135
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 99
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 78
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 99
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 91
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 88
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 93
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 108
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
VOLUNTARY DEFICIT REDUCTION CONTRIBUTION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 157
VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 71
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 120
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 124
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
--- END ---