BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The racial and ethnic diversity of the population of Washington
is increasing;
(b) Employers' demand for well-educated and well-trained graduates
of all ethnic backgrounds is increasing;
(c) Special efforts should be made to increase the participation of
people of color in higher education programs;
(d) Some of Washington's students of color would benefit from an
opportunity to study in specialized programs or institutions of higher
education located in other states;
(e) The state could benefit by creating pilot projects that study
creative, cost-effective ways to meet the postsecondary education needs
of Washington's students; and
(f) Historically Black colleges enroll and graduate the majority of
African-American professionals and Ph.D. candidates in the United
States.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to direct the higher
education coordinating board to establish a pilot project that permits
a limited number of students to use their state need grant awards to
study at Morehouse College, Howard University, Spelman College,
Grambling State University, and Tuskegee University.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The historically Black college fund pilot project is created.
Through the pilot project, up to one hundred students may use their
state-funded need grant awards when they study at Morehouse College,
Howard University, Spelman College, Grambling State University, or
Tuskegee University.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board shall administer the
historically Black college fund pilot project.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall permit up to one
hundred needy Washington residents domiciled in Washington for at least
one year before enrollment to use their state need grant awards if the
students are enrolled half-time or more in Morehouse College, Howard
University, Spelman College, Grambling State University, or Tuskegee
University.
(3) The higher education coordinating board may adopt rules to
establish eligibility criteria for student and institutional
participation in the pilot project.
(4) The board shall limit participation in the pilot project to no
more than a total of one hundred students during the course of the
project.
(5) By December 15, 2008, the higher education coordinating board
shall report to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature on the results of the pilot project. The report shall
include a recommendation on the extent financial aid portability
programs should be revised or expanded for Washington's students.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2008.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.10.790 and 1985 c 370 s 54 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Washington residents attending any nonprofit college or
university in another state which has a reciprocity agreement with the
state of Washington shall be eligible for the student financial aid
program outlined in RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824 if (((1))) (a)
they qualify as a "needy student" under RCW 28B.10.802(3), and (((2)))
(b) the institution attended is a member institution of an accrediting
association recognized by rule of the higher education coordinating
board for the purposes of this section and is specifically encompassed
within or directly affected by such reciprocity agreement and agrees to
and complies with program rules and regulations pertaining to such
students and institutions adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.10.822.
(2) Washington residents participating in the pilot project under
section 2 of this act are eligible for the student financial aid
program outlined in RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824 if the residents
(a) qualify as needy students under RCW 28B.10.802(3), (b) are enrolled
at an eligible institution as defined by the board under section 3 of
this act, and (c) meet any additional criteria established by the
higher education coordinating board for participation in the pilot
project.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.10.802 and 2002 c 187 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824:
(1) "Institutions of higher education" shall mean (((1) [(a)])) (a)
any public university, college, community college, or vocational-technical institute operated by the state of Washington or any
political subdivision thereof ((or (2) [(b)])); (b) until June 30,
2008, any institution of higher education that meets the eligibility
requirements established by the higher education coordinating board
under section 3 of this act; or (c) any other university, college,
school, or institute in the state of Washington offering instruction
beyond the high school level which is a member institution of an
accrediting association recognized by rule of the board for the
purposes of this section: PROVIDED, That any institution, branch,
extension or facility operating within the state of Washington which is
affiliated with an institution operating in another state must be a
separately accredited member institution of any such accrediting
association, or a branch of a member institution of an accrediting
association recognized by rule of the board for purposes of this
section, that is eligible for federal student financial aid assistance
and has operated as a nonprofit college or university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a minimum of twenty consecutive years
within the state of Washington, and has an annual enrollment of at
least seven hundred full-time equivalent students: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That no institution of higher education shall be eligible to
participate in a student financial aid program unless it agrees to and
complies with program rules and regulations adopted pursuant to RCW
28B.10.822.
(2) The term "financial aid" shall mean loans and/or grants to
needy students enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at
institutions of higher education.
(3) The term "needy student" shall mean a post high school student
of an institution of higher learning as defined in subsection (1) of
this section who demonstrates to the board the financial inability,
either through the student's parents, family and/or personally, to meet
the total cost of board, room, books, and tuition and incidental fees
for any semester or quarter.
(4) The term "disadvantaged student" shall mean a post high school
student who by reason of adverse cultural, educational, environmental,
experiential, familial or other circumstances is unable to qualify for
enrollment as a full time student in an institution of higher learning,
who would otherwise qualify as a needy student, and who is attending an
institution of higher learning under an established program designed to
qualify the student for enrollment as a full time student.
(5) "Commission" or "board" shall mean the higher education
coordinating board.

--- END ---