BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that identity theft
and the other types of fraud is a significant problem in the state of
Washington, costing our citizens and businesses millions each year.
The most common method of accomplishing identity theft and other
fraudulent activity is by securing a fraudulently issued driver's
license. It is the purpose of this act to significantly reduce
identity theft and other fraud by preventing the fraudulent issuance of
driver's licenses and identicards.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.35.020 and 2003 c 53 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may knowingly obtain, possess, use, or transfer a
means of identification or financial information of another person,
living or dead, with the intent to commit, or to aid or abet, any
crime.
(2) Violation of this section when the accused or an accomplice
uses the victim's means of identification or financial information and
obtains an aggregate total of credit, money, goods, services, or
anything else of value in excess of one thousand five hundred dollars
in value shall constitute identity theft in the first degree. Identity
theft in the first degree is a class B felony punishable according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) Violation of this section when the accused or an accomplice
uses the victim's means of identification or financial information and
obtains an aggregate total of credit, money, goods, services, or
anything else of value that is less than one thousand five hundred
dollars in value, or when no credit, money, goods, services, or
anything of value is obtained shall constitute identity theft in the
second degree. Identity theft in the second degree is a class C felony
punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(4) A person who violates this section is liable for civil damages
of ((five hundred)) one thousand dollars or actual damages, whichever
is greater, including costs to repair the victim's credit record, and
reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by the court.
(5) In a proceeding under this section, the crime will be
considered to have been committed in any locality where the person
whose means of identification or financial information was appropriated
resides, or in which any part of the offense took place, regardless of
whether the defendant was ever actually in that locality.
(6) The provisions of this section do not apply to any person who
obtains another person's driver's license or other form of
identification for the sole purpose of misrepresenting his or her age.
(7) In a proceeding under this section in which a person's means of
identification or financial information was used without that person's
authorization, and when there has been a conviction, the sentencing
court may issue such orders as are necessary to correct a public record
that contains false information resulting from a violation of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No later than January 1, 2006, the department shall implement
a voluntary biometric matching system for driver's licenses and
identicards.
(2) The biometric matching system selected by the department shall
be capable of highly accurate matching, and shall be compliant with
biometric standards established by the American association of motor
vehicle administrators.
(3) Upon the establishment of a biometric driver's license and
identicard system as described in this section, the department shall
allow every person applying for an original, renewal, or duplicate
driver's license or identicard to voluntarily submit a biometric
identifier.
(4) The department may not disclose biometric information to the
public or any governmental entity except when authorized by court
order.
(5) If Senate Bill No. 5428 or House Bill No. 1681 is enacted into
law, this section does not apply when an applicant renews his or her
driver's license or identicard by mail or electronic commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to charge persons opting to submit
a biometric identifier under section 3 of this act an additional fee of
no more than two dollars at the time of application for an original,
renewal, or duplicate driver's license or identicard issued by the
department. This fee shall be used exclusively to defray the cost of
implementation and ongoing operation of a biometric security system.
(2) The biometric security account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from subsection (1) of this section shall be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used only
for the purpose of defraying the cost of implementation and ongoing
operation of a biometric security system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2004, in the omnibus transportation appropriations act,
sections 1, 3, 4, and 5 of this act are null and void.

--- END ---