BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a more informed
voter is a better voter. Most of the time, initiatives do not truly
reveal their intent to voters and what their costs might be. It is
necessary that full disclosure be made. Occasionally, initiative
supporters are not aware of the unintended consequences of their
attempts to establish laws by the initiative process. Therefore, the
legislature further finds that the initiative process must be protected
and accountable.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.79.075 and 2002 c 139 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of financial management, in consultation with the
secretary of state, the attorney general, and any other appropriate
state or local agency, shall prepare a fiscal impact statement for each
of the following state ballot measures: (1) An initiative to the
people that is certified to the ballot; (2) an initiative to the
legislature that will appear on the ballot; (3) an alternative measure
appearing on the ballot that the legislature proposes to an initiative
to the legislature; (4) a referendum bill referred to voters by the
legislature; and (5) a referendum measure appearing on the ballot.
Fiscal impact statements must be written in clear and concise language
and avoid legal and technical terms when possible, and may include
easily understood graphics.
((A fiscal impact)) The statement prepared by the office of
financial management must describe any projected increase or decrease
in the sales tax or other appropriate existing state revenues, costs,
expenditures, or indebtedness that the state or local governments will
experience if the ballot measure were approved by state voters.
Where appropriate, a fiscal impact statement may include both
estimated dollar amounts and a description placing the estimated dollar
amounts into context. A fiscal impact statement must include both a
summary of not to exceed one hundred words and a more detailed
statement that includes the assumptions that were made to develop the
fiscal impacts.
Fiscal impact statements must be available online from the
secretary of state's web site and included in the state voters'
pamphlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29.79 RCW
to read as follows:
For a ballot measure that proposes to reduce, in any way, revenues
for state government or indirectly for local governments, the ballot
measure proponents shall explain clearly in a prepared statement which
government services or programs should be reduced or eliminated as a
result of the decrease in revenues.

Sec. 4 RCW 29.81.250 and 2002 c 139 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall determine the format and layout of the
voters' pamphlet. The secretary of state shall print the pamphlet in
clear, readable type on a size, quality, and weight of paper that in
the judgment of the secretary of state best serves the voters. The
pamphlet must contain a table of contents. Federal and state offices
must appear in the pamphlet in the same sequence as they appear on the
ballot. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order specified
by RCW 29.79.300.
The voters' pamphlet must provide the following information for
each statewide issue on the ballot:
(1) The legal identification of the measure by serial designation
or number;
(2) The official ballot title of the measure;
(3) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the law
as it presently exists;
(4) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the
effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;
(5) The fiscal impact statements prepared under RCW 29.79.075;
(6) The service or program reduction statement by the proponents of
the ballot measure;
(7) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in
the senate and house of representatives, if the measure has been passed
by the legislature;
(((7))) (8) An argument advocating the voters' approval of the
measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing
argument;
(((8))) (9) An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the
measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing
argument;
(((9))) (10) Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed
by the names of the committee members who submitted them, and may be
followed by a telephone number that citizens may call to obtain
information on the ballot measure;
(((10))) (11) The full text of each measure.

--- END ---