BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.335.060 and 1989 c 86 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each school district's board of directors shall deposit moneys
derived from the lease, rental, or occasional use of surplus school
property as follows:
(1) Moneys derived from real property shall be deposited ((into the
district's debt service fund and/or capital projects fund except for
moneys required to be expended for general maintenance, utility,
insurance costs, and any other costs associated with the lease or
rental of such property, which moneys shall be deposited in the
district's general)) as follows:
(a) Amounts required to be expended for general maintenance,
utility, insurance costs, and other costs associated with the lease or
rental of such property shall be deposited in the district's general
fund;
(b) Additional amounts shall be deposited in the district's general
fund for general maintenance, utility, insurance costs, and other costs
directly associated with district property; the district's debt service
fund; and/or the district's capital projects fund;
(2) Moneys derived from pupil transportation vehicles shall be
deposited in the district's transportation vehicle fund;
(3) Moneys derived from other personal property shall be deposited
in the district's general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect September 1, 2003.

--- END ---