BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 83.100.020 and 2001 c 320 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Decedent" means a deceased individual;
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue, the director of
that department, or any employee of the department exercising authority
lawfully delegated to him by the director;
(3) "Federal credit" means (a) for a transfer, the maximum amount
of the credit for state taxes allowed by section 2011 of the Internal
Revenue Code; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, the maximum
amount of the credit for state taxes allowed by section 2604 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(4) "Federal return" means any tax return required by chapter 11 or
13 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(5) "Federal tax" means (a) for a transfer, a tax under chapter 11
of the Internal Revenue Code; and (b) for a generation-skipping
transfer, the tax under chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(6) "Generation-skipping transfer" means a "generation-skipping
transfer" as defined and used in section 2611 of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(7) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used in
section 2031 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(8) "Nonresident" means a decedent who was domiciled outside
Washington at his death;
(9) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof;
(10) "Person required to file the federal return" means any person
required to file a return required by chapter 11 or 13 of the Internal
Revenue Code, such as the personal representative of an estate; or a
transferor, trustee, or beneficiary of a generation-skipping transfer;
or a qualified heir with respect to qualified real property, as defined
and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(11) "Property" means (a) for a transfer, property included in the
gross estate; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, all real and
personal property subject to the federal tax;
(12) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in Washington at
time of death;
(13) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of the
Internal Revenue Code, or a disposition or cessation of qualified use
as defined and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(14) "Trust" means "trust" under Washington law and any arrangement
described in section 2652 of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(15) "Internal Revenue Code" means, for the purposes of this
chapter and RCW 83.110.010, the United States Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, ((2001)) 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies retroactively
to January 1, 2002.

--- END ---