BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT--FINDINGS. The legislature finds
that encouraging outstanding students to enter the special education
teaching profession is of paramount importance to the state of
Washington. By creating the special education teachers' conditional
scholarship program, the legislature intends to assist in the effort to
recruit special education teachers students who have distinguished
themselves through outstanding academic achievement. The legislature
urges business, industry, and philanthropic community organizations to
join with state government in making this program successful.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Approved special education program" means a special education
program in the state of Washington for knowledge and skills generally
learned in preschool through twelfth grade. Approved special education
programs are:
(a) K-12 schools under Title 28A RCW; or
(b) An approved school under chapter 28A.195 RCW.
(2) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(3) "Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in
whole or in part if the recipient renders service as a special
education teacher for five years in an approved education program in
this state.
(4) "Eligible student" means a student who is registered for at
least ten credit hours or the equivalent, demonstrates achievement of
at least a 3.30 grade point average for students entering an
institution of higher education directly from high school or maintains
at least a 3.00 grade point average or the equivalent for each academic
year in an institution of higher education, is a resident student as
defined by RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, and has a declared intention
to complete an approved preparation program leading to initial special
education teacher certification or required for earning an additional
endorsement, or a college or university graduate who meets the same
credit hour requirements and is seeking an additional teaching
endorsement or initial teacher certification. Resident students
defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(f) are not eligible students under this
chapter.
(5) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to render
service as a special education teacher for five years in an approved
education program in the state of Washington in lieu of monetary
repayment.
(6) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a
college or university in the state of Washington that is accredited by
an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the higher
education coordinating board.
(7) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a
conditional scholarship under this chapter.
(8) "Public school" means an elementary school, a middle school,
junior high school, or high school within the public school system
referred to in Article IX of the state Constitution.
(9) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PROGRAM CREATED--POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD.
The special education teachers conditional scholarship program is
established. The program shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. In administering the program, the board shall:
(1) Select students to receive conditional scholarships, with the
assistance of a screening committee composed of special education
teachers and leaders in government, business, and education;
(2) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(3) Publicize the program;
(4) Collect and manage repayments from students who do not meet
their teaching obligations under this chapter; and
(5) Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private
sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 PLANNING COMMITTEE--DEVELOPMENT OF CRITERIA
FOR SELECTING SCHOLARSHIP RECIPIENTS. The board shall establish a
planning committee to develop criteria for the screening and selection
of recipients of the conditional scholarships. These criteria also may
include, for approximately half of the recipients, requirements that
those recipients meet the definition of "needy student" under RCW
28B.10.802.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 WAIVERS OF GRADE POINT REQUIREMENTS. The
board may waive grade point requirements for an otherwise eligible
individual student under special circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 AWARD OF CONDITIONAL SCHOLARSHIPS. The
board may award conditional scholarships to eligible students from the
funds appropriated to the board for this purpose, or from any private
donations, or any other funds given to the board for this program. The
amount of the conditional scholarship awarded an individual shall not
exceed three thousand dollars per academic year. Students are eligible
to receive conditional scholarships for a maximum of five years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 REPAYMENT OBLIGATION. (1) Participants in
the conditional scholarship program incur an obligation to repay the
conditional scholarship, with interest, unless they teach for five
years in an approved special education program, under rules adopted by
the board.
(2) The interest rate shall be eight percent for the first four
years of repayment and ten percent beginning with the fifth year of
repayment.
(3) The period for repayment shall be ten years, with payments of
principal and interest accruing quarterly commencing nine months from
the date the participant completes or discontinues the course of study.
Provisions for deferral of payment shall be determined by the board.
(4) The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be
forgiven for each payment period in which the participant teaches in an
approved special education program until the entire repayment
obligation is satisfied. Should the participant cease to teach in an
approved special education program in this state before the
participant's repayment obligation is completed, payments on the
unsatisfied portion of the principal and interest shall begin the next
payment period and continue until the remainder of the participant's
repayment obligation is satisfied.
(5) The board is responsible for collection of repayments made
under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection,
maintaining all necessary records to insure that maximum repayments are
made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section shall
be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary. The board is responsible to forgive all or parts of such
repayments under the criteria established in this section and shall
maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.
(6) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other
subsidies to which the board as administrator is entitled, that are
paid by or on behalf of participants under this section, shall be
deposited with the higher education coordinating board and shall be
used to cover the costs of granting the conditional scholarships,
maintaining necessary records, and making collections under subsection
(5) of this section. The board shall maintain accurate records of
these costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs
shall be used to grant conditional scholarships to eligible students.
(7) The board shall temporarily or, in special circumstances,
permanently defer the requirements of this section for eligible
students as defined in RCW 28B.10.017.
(8) The board may cancel a recipient's repayment obligation due to
the recipient's total and permanent disability or death, subject to
documentation as required by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---