BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.08.010 and 2002 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title or rules adopted under this title, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.
(2) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.
(3) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.
(4) "Person" means and includes an individual; a corporation; a
public or private entity or organization; a local, state, or federal
agency; all business organizations, including corporations and
partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals acting with a
common purpose whether acting in an individual, representative, or
official capacity.
(5) "Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed and
commissioned by the director, with authority to enforce this title and
rules adopted pursuant to this title, and other statutes as prescribed
by the legislature. Fish and wildlife officer includes a person
commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a wildlife agent or a fisheries
patrol officer.
(6) "Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned
officer of a municipal, county, state, or federal agency having as its
primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general, while the
officer is in the appropriate jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish
and wildlife officer" includes special agents of the national marine
fisheries service, state parks commissioned officers, United States
fish and wildlife special agents, department of natural resources
enforcement officers, and United States forest service officers, while
the agents and officers are within their respective jurisdictions.
(7) "To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure,
capture, or harass a wild animal or wild bird.
(8) "To trap" and its derivatives means a method of hunting using
devices to capture wild animals or wild birds.
(9) "To fish," "to harvest," and "to take," and their derivatives
means an effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch a fish or shellfish.
(10) "Open season" means those times, manners of taking, and places
or waters established by rule of the commission for the lawful hunting,
fishing, taking, or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish,
food fish, or shellfish that conform to the special restrictions or
physical descriptions established by rule of the commission or that
have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest, or
possess by rule of the commission. "Open season" includes the first
and last days of the established time.
(11) "Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and places
or waters other than those established by rule of the commission as an
open season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or
shellfish that do not conform to the special restrictions or physical
descriptions established by rule of the commission as an open season or
that have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest,
or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.
(12) "Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some or all
species of wild animals or wild birds is prohibited.
(13) "Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or
other body of water, where fishing or harvesting is prohibited.
(14) "Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild
animals and wild birds is prohibited.
(15) "Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game
birds, or game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by
a person, as specified by rule of the commission for a particular
period of time, or as to size, sex, or species.
(16) "Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but is not
limited to mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and
invertebrates. The term "wildlife" does not include feral domestic
mammals, old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order
Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish, and marine invertebrates classified
as food fish or shellfish by the director. The term "wildlife"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of wildlife
members.
(17) "Wild animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state and the species Rana
catesbeiana (bullfrog). The term "wild animal" does not include feral
domestic mammals or old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of
the order Rodentia.
(18) "Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state.
(19) "Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the
commission that shall not be hunted or fished.
(20) "Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the
commission as seriously threatened with extinction.
(21) "Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted
except as authorized by the commission.
(22) "Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall not be
trapped except as authorized by the commission.
(23) "Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except
as authorized by the commission.
(24) "Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted
throughout the year as authorized by the commission.
(25) "Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the animal
kingdom not native to Washington and designated as dangerous to the
environment or wildlife of the state.
(26) "Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held or raised
for commercial purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not
include publicly owned facilities.
(27) "Person of disability" means a permanently disabled person who
is not ambulatory without the assistance of a wheelchair, crutches, or
similar devices.
(28) "Fish" includes all species classified as game fish or food
fish by statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently
classified as food fish or game fish if such species exist in state
waters. The term "fish" includes all stages of development and the
bodily parts of fish species.
(29) "Raffle" means an activity in which tickets bearing an
individual number are sold for not more than twenty-five dollars each
and in which a permit or permits are awarded to hunt or for access to
hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the basis of a drawing from
the tickets by the person or persons conducting the raffle.
(30) "Youth" means a person fifteen years old for fishing and under
sixteen years old for hunting.
(31) "Senior" means a person seventy years old or older.
(32) "License year" means the period of time for which a
recreational license is valid. The license year begins April 1st, and
ends March 31st.
(33) "Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of river mouths.
(34) "Freshwater" means all waters not defined as saltwater
including, but not limited to, rivers upstream of the river mouth,
lakes, ponds, and reservoirs.
(35) "State waters" means all marine waters and fresh waters within
ordinary high water lines and within the territorial boundaries of the
state.
(36) "Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific Ocean
outside the territorial boundaries of the state, including the marine
waters of other states and countries.
(37) "Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those waters
of the Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state
boundary.
(38) "Resident" means a person who has maintained a permanent place
of abode within the state for at least ninety days immediately
preceding an application for a license, has established by formal
evidence an intent to continue residing within the state, and who is
not licensed to hunt or fish as a resident in another state.
(39) "Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the
qualifications of a resident.
(40) "Shellfish" means those species of marine and freshwater
invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not be taken
except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term "shellfish"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of shellfish
species.
(41) "Commercial" means related to or connected with buying,
selling, or bartering.
(42) "To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or preserving
fish, wildlife, or shellfish.
(43) "Personal use" means for the private use of the individual
taking the fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.
(44) "Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable
of being held in hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line
operated without rod or reel.
(45) "Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species
of fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical
area.
(46) "Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a license
limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.
(47) "Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are
dependent upon the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in
either an attached or free floating form, and includes but is not
limited to marine aquatic plants in the classes Chlorophyta,
Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.
(48) "Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or
engaging in sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or
deleterious exotic wildlife.
(49) "Invasive species" means a plant species or a nonnative animal
species that either:
(a) Causes or may cause displacement of, or otherwise threatens,
native species in their natural communities;
(b) Threatens or may threaten natural resources or their use in the
state;
(c) Causes or may cause economic damage to commercial or
recreational activities that are dependent upon state waters; or
(d) Threatens or harms human health.
(50) "Prohibited aquatic animal species" means an invasive species
of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a prohibited aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(51) "Regulated aquatic animal species" means a potentially
invasive species of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a
regulated aquatic animal species by the commission.
(52) "Unregulated aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has been classified as an unregulated aquatic animal
species by the commission.
(53) "Unlisted aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has not been classified as a prohibited aquatic animal
species, a regulated aquatic animal species, or an unregulated aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(54) "Aquatic plant species" means an emergent, submersed,
partially submersed, free-floating, or floating-leaving plant species
that grows in or near a body of water or wetland.
(55) "Retail-eligible species" means commercially harvested salmon,
crab, and sturgeon.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.65.510 and 2002 c 301 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department must establish and administer a direct retail
endorsement to serve as a single license that permits the holder of a
Washington ((salmon or crab commercial fishing)) license to
commercially harvest retail-eligible species and to clean, dress, and
sell his or her catch directly to consumers at retail, including over
the internet. The direct retail endorsement must be issued as an
optional addition to all holders of a ((salmon or crab)) commercial
fishing license for retail-eligible species that the department offers
under this chapter.
(2) The direct retail endorsement must be offered at the time of
application for the qualifying commercial fishing license. Individuals
in possession of a qualifying commercial fishing license issued under
this chapter may add a direct retail endorsement to their current
license at ((the)) any time ((they renew their commercial fishing
license)). Individuals who do not have a commercial fishing license
for ((salmon or crab)) retail-eligible species issued under this
chapter may not receive a direct retail endorsement. The costs,
conditions, responsibilities, and privileges associated with the
endorsed commercial fishing license is not affected or altered in any
way by the addition of a direct retail endorsement. These costs
include the base cost of the license and any revenue and excise taxes.
(3) An individual need only add one direct retail endorsement to
his or her license portfolio. If a direct retail endorsement is
selected by an individual holding more than one commercial fishing
license issued under this chapter, a single direct retail endorsement
is considered to be added to all qualifying commercial fishing licenses
held by that individual, and is the only license required for the
individual to sell at retail ((the harvest of salmon or crab)) any
retail-eligible species permitted by all of the underlying endorsed
licenses. The direct retail endorsement applies only to the person
named on the endorsed license, and may not be used by an alternate
operator named on the endorsed license.
(4) In addition to any fees charged for the endorsed licenses and
harvest documentation as required by this chapter or the rules of the
department, the department may set a reasonable annual fee not to
exceed the administrative costs to the department for a direct retail
endorsement.
(5) The holder of a direct retail endorsement is responsible for
documenting the commercial harvest of salmon and crab according to the
provisions of this chapter, the rules of the department for a wholesale
fish dealer, and the reporting requirements of the endorsed license.
Any ((salmon or crab)) retail-eligible species caught by the holder of
a direct retail endorsement must be ((landed in the round and))
documented on fish tickets((, as provided for by the department, before
further processing)).
(6) The direct retail endorsement must be displayed in a readily
visible manner by the seller wherever and whenever a sale to someone
other than a licensed wholesale dealer occurs. The commission may
require that the holder of a direct retail endorsement notify the
department up to eighteen hours before conducting an in-person sale of
retail-eligible species, except for in-person sales that have a
cumulative retail sales value of less than one hundred fifty dollars in
a twenty-four hour period that are sold directly from the vessel. For
sales occurring in a venue other than in person, such as over the
internet, through a catalog, or on the phone, the direct retail
endorsement number of the seller must be provided to the buyer both at
the time of sale and the time of delivery. All internet sales must be
conducted in accordance with federal laws and regulations.
(7) The direct retail endorsement is to be held by a natural person
and is not transferrable or assignable. If the endorsed license is
transferred, the direct retail endorsement immediately becomes void,
and the transferor is not eligible for a full or prorated reimbursement
of the annual fee paid for the direct retail endorsement. Upon
becoming void, the holder of a direct retail endorsement must surrender
the physical endorsement to the department.
(8) The holder of a direct retail endorsement must abide by the
provisions of Title 69 RCW as they apply to the processing and retail
sale of seafood. The department must distribute a pamphlet, provided
by the department of agriculture, with the direct retail endorsement
generally describing the labeling requirements set forth in chapter
69.04 RCW as they apply to seafood.
(9) The holder of a qualifying commercial fishing license issued
under this chapter must either possess a direct retail endorsement or
a wholesale dealer license provided for in RCW 77.65.280 in order to
lawfully sell their catch or harvest in the state to anyone other than
a licensed wholesale dealer.
(10) The direct retail endorsement entitles the holder to sell
((wild-caught salmon or crab)) a retail-eligible species only at a
temporary food service establishment as that term is defined in RCW
69.06.045, or directly to a restaurant or other nonretail food service
business.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.65.515 and 2002 c 301 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to being issued a direct retail endorsement, an
individual must:
(a) Obtain and submit to the department a signed letter on
appropriate letterhead from the health department of the county in
which the individual makes his or her official residence or where the
hailing port for any documented vessel owned by the individual is
located as to the fulfillment of all requirements related to county
health rules, including the payment of all required fees. The local
health department generating the letter may charge a reasonable fee for
any necessary inspections. The letter must certify that the methods
used by the individual to transport, store, and display any fresh
((salmon and crabs)) retail-eligible species meets that county's
standards and the statewide standards adopted by the board of health
for food service operations; and
(b) Submit proof to the department that the individual making the
direct retail sales is in possession of a valid food and beverage
service worker's permit, as provided for in chapter 69.06 RCW.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section must be
completed each license year before a renewal direct retail endorsement
can be issued.
(3) Any individual possessing a direct retail endorsement must
notify the local health department of the county in which retail sales
are to occur, except for the county that conducted the initial
inspection, forty-eight hours before any transaction and make his or
her facilities available for inspection by a fish and wildlife officer,
the local health department of any county in which he or she sells
((salmon or crab)) any legally harvested retail-eligible species, and
any designee of the department of health or the department of
agriculture.
(4) Neither the department or a local health department may be held
liable in any judicial proceeding alleging that consumption of or
exposure to seafood sold by the holder of a direct retail endorsement
resulted in a negative health consequence, as long as the department
can show that the individual holding the direct retail endorsement
complied with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section prior
to being issued his or her direct retail license, and neither the
department nor a local health department acted in a reckless manner.
For the purposes of this subsection, the department or a local health
district shall not be deemed to be acting recklessly for not conducting
a permissive inspection.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.65.520 and 2002 c 301 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The direct retail endorsement is conditioned upon compliance:
(a) With the requirements of this chapter as they apply to
wholesale fish dealers and to the rules of the department relating to
the payment of fines for violations of rules for the accounting of the
commercial harvest of ((salmon or crabs)) retail eligible species; and
(b) With the state board of health and local rules for food service
establishments.
(2) Violations of the requirements and rules referenced in
subsection (1) of this section may result in the suspension of the
direct retail endorsement. The suspended individual must not be
reimbursed for any portion of the suspended endorsement. Suspension of
the direct retail endorsement may not occur unless and until:
(a) The director has notified by order the holder of the direct
retail endorsement when a violation of subsection (1) of this section
has occurred. The notification must specify the type of violation, the
liability to be imposed for damages caused by the violation, a notice
that the amount of liability is due and payable by the holder of the
direct retail endorsement, and an explanation of the options available
to satisfy the liability; and
(b) The holder of the direct retail endorsement has had at least
ninety days after the notification provided in (a) of this subsection
was received to either make full payment for all liabilities owed or
enter into an agreement with the department to pay off all liabilities
within a reasonable time.
(3)(a) If, within ninety days after receipt of the order provided
in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the amount specified in the order
is not paid or the holder of the direct retail endorsement has not
entered into an agreement with the department to pay off all
liabilities, the prosecuting attorney for any county in which the
persons to whom the order is directed do business, or the attorney
general upon request of the department, may bring an action on behalf
of the state in the superior court for Thurston county, or any county
in which the persons to whom the order is directed do business, to seek
suspension of the individual's direct retail endorsement for up to five
years.
(b) The department may temporarily suspend the privileges provided
by the direct retail endorsement for up to one hundred twenty days
following the receipt of the order provided in subsection (2)(a) of
this section, unless the holder of the direct retail endorsement has
deposited with the department an acceptable performance bond on forms
prescribed and provided by the department. This performance bond must
be a corporate surety bond executed in favor of the department by a
corporation authorized to do business in the state of Washington under
chapter 48.28 RCW and approved by the department. The bond must be
filed and maintained in an amount equal to one thousand dollars.
(4) For violations of state board of health and local rules under
subsection (1)(b) of this section only, any person inspecting the
facilities of a direct retail endorsement holder under RCW 77.65.515
may suspend the privileges granted by the endorsement for up to seven
days. Within twenty-four hours of the discovery of the violation, the
inspecting entity must notify the department of the violation. Upon
notification, the department may proceed with the procedures outlined
in this section for suspension of the endorsement. If the violation of
a state board of health rule is discovered by a local health
department, that local jurisdiction may fine the holder of the direct
retail endorsement according to the local jurisdiction's rules as they
apply to retail food operations.
(5) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to a
holder of a direct retail endorsement that executes a surety bond and
abides by the conditions established in RCW 77.65.320 and 77.65.330 as
they apply to wholesale dealers.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.71.090 and 2002 c 301 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be lawful for any farmer, gardener, or other person,
without license, to sell, deliver, or peddle any fruits, vegetables,
berries, eggs, or any farm produce or edibles raised, gathered,
produced, or manufactured by such person and no city or town shall pass
or enforce any ordinance prohibiting the sale by or requiring license
from the producers and manufacturers of farm produce and edibles as
((herein)) defined((: PROVIDED, That)) in this section. However,
nothing ((herein)) in this section authorizes any person to sell,
deliver, or peddle, without license, in any city or town, any dairy
product, meat, poultry, eel, fish, mollusk, or shellfish where a
license is required to engage legally in such activity in such city or
town.
(2) It is lawful for an individual in possession of a valid direct
retail endorsement, as established in RCW 77.65.510, to sell, deliver,
or peddle ((wild-caught salmon or crab)) any legally harvested retail-eligible species, as that term is defined in RCW 77.08.010, that is
caught, harvested, or collected under rule of the department of fish
and wildlife by such a person at a temporary food service
establishment, as that term is defined in RCW 69.06.045, and no city,
town, or county may pass or enforce an ordinance prohibiting the sale
by or requiring additional licenses or permits from the holder of the
valid direct retail endorsement. However, this subsection does not
prohibit a city, town, or county from inspecting an individual
displaying a direct retail endorsement to verify that the person is in
compliance with state board of health and local rules for food service
operations.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.27.020 and 2001 c 320 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to all other taxes, licenses, or fees provided by
law there is established an excise tax on the commercial possession of
enhanced food fish as provided in this chapter. The tax is levied upon
and shall be collected from the owner of the enhanced food fish whose
possession constitutes the taxable event. The taxable event is the
first possession in Washington by an owner after the enhanced food fish
has been landed. Processing and handling of enhanced food fish by a
person who is not the owner is not a taxable event to the processor or
handler.
(2) A person in possession of enhanced food fish and liable to this
tax may deduct from the price paid to the person from which the
enhanced food fish (except oysters) are purchased an amount equal to a
tax at one-half the rate levied in this section upon these products.
(3) The measure of the tax ((is the value of the)) for all enhanced
food fish, including retail-eligible fish sold with a direct retail
endorsement pursuant to RCW 77.65.510, is the comparable sales price
for similar species of fish at the point of landing.
(4) The tax shall be equal to the measure of the tax multiplied by
the rates for enhanced food fish as follows:
(a) Chinook, coho, and chum salmon and anadromous game fish: Five
and twenty-five one-hundredths percent;
(b) Pink and sockeye salmon: Three and fifteen one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Other food fish and shellfish, except oysters, sea urchins, and
sea cucumbers: Two and one-tenth percent;
(d) Oysters: Eight one-hundredths of one percent;
(e) Sea urchins: Four and six-tenths percent through December 31,
2005, and two and one-tenth percent thereafter; and
(f) Sea cucumbers: Four and six-tenths percent through December
31, 2005, and two and one-tenth percent thereafter.
(5) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (4) of this
section.

--- END ---