BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Electronic commerce" may include, but is not limited to,
transactions conducted over the Internet or by telephone or other
electronic means.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.035 and 1999 c 6 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
The department may not issue an identicard or a Washington state
driver's license that is valid for identification purposes unless the
applicant meets the identification requirements of subsection (1), (2),
or (3) of this section.
(1) A driver's license or identicard applicant must provide the
department with at least one of the following pieces of valid
identifying documentation that contains the signature and a photograph
of the applicant:
(a) A valid or recently expired driver's license or instruction
permit that includes the date of birth of the applicant;
(b) A Washington state identicard or an identification card issued
by another state;
(c) An identification card issued by the United States, a state, or
an agency of either the United States or a state, of a kind commonly
used to identify the members or employees of the government agency;
(d) A military identification card;
(e) A United States passport; or
(f) An Immigration and Naturalization Service form.
(2) An applicant who is a minor may establish identity by providing
an affidavit of the applicant's parent or guardian. The parent or
guardian must accompany the minor and display or provide:
(a) At least one piece of documentation in subsection (1) of this
section establishing the identity of the parent or guardian; and
(b) Additional documentation establishing the relationship between
the parent or guardian and the applicant.
(3) A person unable to provide identifying documentation as
specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section may request that the
department review other available documentation in order to ascertain
identity. The department may waive the requirement if it finds that
other documentation clearly establishes the identity of the applicant.
(4) An identicard or a driver's license that includes a photograph
that has been renewed by mail or by electronic commerce is valid for
identification purposes if the applicant met the identification
requirements of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section at the time
of previous issuance.
(5) The form of an applicant's name, as established under this
section, ((must be)) is the person's name of record for the purposes of
this chapter.
(((5))) (6) If the applicant is unable to prove his or her identity
under this section, the department shall plainly label the license "not
valid for identification purposes."

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.055 and 2002 c 352 s 10 and 2002 c 195 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee of fifteen dollars, and meets the following
requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction or
offered by a ((driving [driver])) driver training school licensed and
inspected by the department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW, that
includes practice driving.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280(1).
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit; and
(b) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.
(c) A person applying to renew an instruction permit must submit
the application to the department in person.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.070 and 2002 c 352 s 11 and 2002 c 195 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Agricultural driving permit authorized. The director may issue
a juvenile agricultural driving permit to a person under the age of
eighteen years if:
(a) The application is signed by the applicant and the applicant's
father, mother, or legal guardian;
(b) The applicant has passed the driving examination required by
RCW 46.20.120;
(c) The department has investigated the applicant's need for the
permit and determined that the need justifies issuance;
(d) The department has determined the applicant is capable of
operating a motor vehicle without endangering himself or herself or
other persons and property; and
(e) The applicant has paid a fee of fifteen dollars.
The permit must contain a photograph of the person.
(2) Effect of agricultural driving permit. (a) The permit
authorizes the holder to:
(i) Drive a motor vehicle on the public highways of this state in
connection with farm work. The holder may drive only within a
restricted farming locality described on the permit; and
(ii) Participate in the classroom portion of a traffic safety
education course authorized under RCW 28A.220.030 or the classroom
portion of a traffic safety education course offered by a driver
training school licensed and inspected by the department of licensing
under chapter 46.82 RCW offered in the community where the holder
resides.
(b) The director may transfer the permit from one farming locality
to another. A transfer is not a renewal of the permit.
(3) Term and renewal of agricultural driving permit. An
agricultural driving permit expires one year from the date of issue.
(a) A person under the age of eighteen who holds a permit may renew
the permit by paying a fee of fifteen dollars.
(b) A person applying to renew an agricultural driving permit must
submit the application to the department in person.
(c) An agricultural driving permit is invalidated when a permittee
attains age eighteen. In order to drive a motor vehicle on a highway
he or she must obtain a motor vehicle driver's license under this
chapter.
(4) Suspension, revocation, or cancellation. The director has sole
discretion to suspend, revoke, or cancel a juvenile agricultural
driving permit if:
(a) The permittee has been found to have committed an offense that
requires mandatory suspension or revocation of a driver's license; or
(b) The director is satisfied that the permittee has violated the
permit's restrictions.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.117 and 2002 c 352 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing
a picture, if the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and
(c) Pays the required fee. The fee is fifteen dollars unless an
applicant is a recipient of continuing public assistance grants under
Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary of social and
health services. For those persons the fee must be the actual cost of
production of the identicard.
(2) Design and term. The identicard must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the
official driver's license; and
(b) Expire on the fifth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate
after issuance.
(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be
submitted by means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of an identicard
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce
unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of
the identicard holder.
(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the
holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the
card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.120 and 2002 c 352 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant for a new or renewed driver's license must
successfully pass a driver licensing examination to qualify for a
driver's license. The department shall give examinations at places and
times reasonably available to the people of this state.
(1) Waiver. The department may waive:
(a) All or any part of the examination of any person applying for
the renewal of a driver's license unless the department determines that
the applicant is not qualified to hold a driver's license under this
title; or
(b) The actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motor
vehicle if the applicant:
(i) Surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's
previous home state; and
(ii) Is otherwise qualified to be licensed.
(2) Fee. Each applicant for a new license must pay an examination
fee of ten dollars.
(a) The examination fee is in addition to the fee charged for
issuance of the license.
(b) "New license" means a license issued to a driver:
(i) Who has not been previously licensed in this state; or
(ii) Whose last previous Washington license has been expired for
more than five years.
(3) An application for driver's license renewal may be submitted by
means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her license by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of a driver's license
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
(4) A person whose license expired or will expire ((on or after
January 1, 1998,)) while he or she ((was or)) is living outside the
state, may:
(a) Apply to the department to extend the validity of his or her
license for no more than twelve months. If the person establishes to
the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to
Washington before the date his or her license expires, the department
shall extend the person's license. The department may grant
consecutive extensions, but in no event may the cumulative total of
extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted under this
section does not change the expiration date of the license for purposes
of RCW 46.20.181. The department shall charge a fee of five dollars
for each license extension;
(b) Apply to the department to renew his or her license by mail or,
if permitted by rule of the department, by electronic commerce even if
subsection (3)(b) of this section would not otherwise allow renewal by
that means. If the person establishes to the department's satisfaction
that he or she is unable to return to Washington within twelve months
of the date that his or her license expires, the department shall renew
the person's license by mail or, if permitted by rule of the
department, by electronic commerce.
(5) If a qualified person ((qualifies for a mail-in)) submits an
application for renewal under subsection (3)(b) or (4)(b) of this
section, he or she is not required to pass an examination nor provide
an updated photograph. ((He or she must, however, pay the fee required
by RCW 46.20.181 plus an additional five-dollar mail-in renewal fee.))
A license renewed by mail or by electronic commerce that does not
include a photograph of the licensee must be labeled "not valid for
identification purposes."
(((4) If a person's driver's license is extended or renewed under
subsection (3) of this section while he or she is outside the state, he
or she must submit to the examination required under this section
within sixty days of returning to this state. The department will not
assess a penalty or examination fee for the examination.))

Sec. 7 RCW 46.20.155 and 2001 c 41 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before issuing an original license or ((identification card))
identicard or renewing a license or ((identification card)) identicard
under this chapter, the licensing agent shall determine if the
applicant wants to register to vote or transfer his or her voter
registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register to vote or transfer your voter
registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register or transfer a registration,
the agent shall state the following:

"I would like to remind you that you must be a United States
citizen and at least eighteen years of age in order to vote."

The agent shall then provide the applicant with a voter
registration form and instructions and shall record that the applicant
has requested to register to vote or transfer a voter registration.
(2) The department shall establish a procedure that substantially
meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section when
permitting an applicant to renew a license or identicard by mail or by
electronic commerce.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.25.080 and 1996 c 30 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commercial driver's license must be marked "commercial
driver's license" or "CDL," and must be, to the maximum extent
practicable, tamperproof. It must include, but not be limited to, the
following information:
(a) The name and residence address of the person;
(b) The person's color photograph;
(c) A physical description of the person including sex, height,
weight, and eye color;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) The person's Social Security number or any number or identifier
deemed appropriate by the department;
(f) The person's signature;
(g) The class or type of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles that
the person is authorized to drive, together with any endorsements or
restrictions;
(h) The name of the state; and
(i) The dates between which the license is valid.
(2) Commercial driver's licenses may be issued with the
classifications, endorsements, and restrictions set forth in this
subsection. The holder of a valid commercial driver's license may
drive all vehicles in the class for which that license is issued and
all lesser classes of vehicles except motorcycles and vehicles that
require an endorsement, unless the proper endorsement appears on the
license.
(a) Licenses may be classified as follows:
(i) Class A is a combination of vehicles with a gross combined
weight rating (GCWR) of 26,001 pounds or more, if the GVWR of the
vehicle being towed is in excess of 10,000 pounds.
(ii) Class B is a single vehicle with a GVWR of 26,001 pounds or
more, and any such vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of 10,000
pounds.
(iii) Class C is a single vehicle with a GVWR of less than 26,001
pounds or any such vehicle towing a vehicle with a GVWR not in excess
of 10,000 pounds consisting of:
(A) Vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more passengers,
including the driver; or
(B) Vehicles used in the transportation of hazardous materials that
requires the vehicle to be identified with a placard under 49 C.F.R.,
part 172, subpart F.
(b) The following endorsements and restrictions may be placed on a
license:
(i) "H" authorizes the driver to drive a vehicle transporting
hazardous materials.
(ii) "K" restricts the driver to vehicles not equipped with air
brakes.
(iii) "T" authorizes driving double and triple trailers.
(iv) "P1" authorizes driving all vehicles carrying passengers.
(v) "P2" authorizes driving vehicles with a GVWR of less than
26,001 pounds carrying sixteen or more passengers, including the
driver.
(vi) "N" authorizes driving tank vehicles.
(vii) "X" represents a combination of hazardous materials and tank
vehicle endorsements.
The license may be issued with additional endorsements and
restrictions as established by rule of the director.
(3) All school bus drivers must have either a "P1" or "P2"
endorsement depending on the GVWR of the school bus being driven.
(4) Before issuing a commercial driver's license, the department
shall obtain driving record information through the commercial driver's
license information system, the national driver register, and from the
current state of record.
(5) Within ten days after issuing a commercial driver's license,
the department must notify the commercial driver's license information
system of that fact, and provide all information required to ensure
identification of the person.
(6) A commercial driver's license shall expire in the same manner
as provided in RCW 46.20.181.
(7) When applying for renewal of a commercial driver's license, the
applicant shall:
(a) Complete the application form required by RCW 46.25.070(1),
providing updated information and required certifications((.));
(b) Submit the application to the department in person; and
(c) If the applicant wishes to retain a hazardous materials
endorsement, ((the applicant shall)) take and pass the written test for
a hazardous materials endorsement.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.01.235 and 1999 c 271 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may adopt necessary rules and procedures to allow
use of credit and debit cards for payment of fees and excise taxes to
the department and its agents or subagents related to the licensing of
drivers, the issuance of identicards, and vehicle and vessel titling
and registration. The department may establish a convenience fee to be
paid by the credit or debit card user whenever a credit or debit card
is chosen as the payment method. The fee must be sufficient to offset
the charges imposed on the department and its agents and subagents by
credit and debit card companies. In no event may the use of credit or
debit cards authorized by this section create a loss of revenue to the
state.
The use of a personal credit card does not rely upon the credit of
the state as prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the state
Constitution.

--- END ---