BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.091 and 2001 c 211 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No license under the provision of this chapter shall be
required from any utility or any person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity employed by a utility because of work in
connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines,
wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of a
utility and used for transmission or distribution of electricity from
the source of supply to the point of contact at the premises and/or
property to be supplied and service connections and meters and other
apparatus or appliances used in the measurement of the consumption of
electricity by the customer.
(2) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any utility because of work in connection with the
installation, repair, or maintenance of the following:
(a) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment used in the lighting of
streets, alleys, ways, or public areas or squares;
(b) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by a commercial,
industrial, or public institution customer that are an integral part of
a transmission or distribution system, either overhead or underground,
providing service to such customer and located outside the building or
structure: PROVIDED, That a utility does not initiate the sale of
services to perform such work;
(c) Lines and wires, together with ancillary apparatus, and
equipment, owned by a customer that is an independent power producer
who has entered into an agreement for the sale of electricity to a
utility and that are used in transmitting electricity from an
electrical generating unit located on premises used by such customer to
the point of interconnection with the utility's system.
(3) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
licensed under RCW 19.28.041 may enter into a contract with a utility
for the performance of work under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of the work of installing and repairing ignition or
lighting systems for motor vehicles.
(5) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or
maintenance of wires and equipment, and installations thereof, exempted
in RCW 19.28.010.
(6) The department may by rule exempt from licensing requirements
under this chapter work performed on premanufactured electric power
generation equipment assemblies and control gear involving the testing,
repair, modification, maintenance, or installation of components
internal to the power generation equipment, the control gear, or the
transfer switch.
(7) A certified electrician who is not licensed as an electrical
contractor may perform installation, repair, or maintenance of wires
and equipment for a nonprofit corporation that holds a current tax
exempt status as provided under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501 (c)(3), or a
nonprofit religious organization, provided that these repairs are
performed for no compensation, and provided that the cost of the work
would not exceed two hundred thousand dollars for the project if
compensation was received for the work.

--- END ---