BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature has seen an increase in the
demand from constituent groups seeking recognition and funding through
the establishment of commemorative or special license plates. The high
cost of implementing a new special license plate series coupled with
the uncertainty of the state's ability to recoup its costs, has led the
legislature to delay the implementation of new special license plates.
In order to address these issues, it is the intent of the legislature
to create a mechanism that will allow for the evaluation of special
license plate requests and establish a funding policy that will
alleviate the financial burden currently placed on the state. Using
these two strategies, the legislature will be better equipped to
efficiently process special license plate legislation.

PART I
SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE REVIEW BOARD
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE REVIEW BOARD CREATED. (1) The special
license plate review board is created.
(2) The board will consist of seven members: One member appointed
by the governor and who will serve as chair of the board; four members
of the legislature, one from each caucus of the house of
representatives and the senate; a department of licensing
representative appointed by the director; and a Washington state patrol
representative appointed by the chief.
(3) Members shall serve terms of four years, except that four of
the members initially appointed will be appointed for terms of two
years. No member may be appointed for more than three consecutive
terms.
(4) The legislative transportation committee may remove members
from the board before the expiration of their terms only for cause
based upon a determination of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of
duty, or malfeasance in office as ordered by the Thurston county
superior court, upon petition and show cause proceedings brought for
that purpose in that court and directed to the board member in
question.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
ADMINISTRATION OF THE BOARD. (1) The board shall meet periodically
at the call of the chair, but must meet at least one time each year
within ninety days before an upcoming regular session of the
legislature. The board may adopt its own rules and may establish its
own procedures. It shall act collectively in harmony with recorded
resolutions or motions adopted by a majority vote of the members, and
it must have a quorum present to take a vote on a special license plate
application.
(2) The board will be compensated from the general appropriation
for the legislative transportation committee in accordance with RCW
43.03.250. Each board member will be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for actual necessary traveling and other
expenses in going to, attending, and returning from meetings of the
board or that are incurred in the discharge of duties requested by the
chair. However, in no event may a board member be compensated in any
year for more than one hundred twenty days, except the chair may be
compensated for not more than one hundred fifty days. Service on the
board does not qualify as a service credit for the purposes of a public
retirement system.
(3) The board shall keep proper records and is subject to audit by
the state auditor or other auditing entities.
(4) The department of licensing shall provide administrative
support to the board, which must include at least the following:
(a) Provide general staffing to meet the administrative needs of
the board;
(b) Report to the board on the reimbursement status of any new
special license plate series for which the state had to pay the start-up costs;
(c) Process special license plate applications and confirm that the
sponsoring organization has submitted all required documentation. If
an incomplete application is received, the department must return it to
the sponsoring organization;
(d) Compile the annual financial reports submitted by sponsoring
organizations with active special license plate series and present
those reports to the board for review and approval.
(5) The legislative transportation committee shall provide general
oversight of the board, which must include at least the following:
(a) Process and approve board member compensation requests;
(b) Review the annual financial reports submitted to the board by
sponsoring organizations;
(c) Review annually the list of the board's approved and rejected
special license plate proposals submitted by sponsoring organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
AUTHORITY AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE BOARD. (1) The creation of
the board does not in any way preclude the authority of the legislature
to independently propose and enact special license plate legislation.
(2) The board must review and either approve or reject special
license plate applications submitted by sponsoring organizations.
(3) Duties of the board include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) Review and approve the annual financial reports submitted by
sponsoring organizations with active special license plate series and
present those annual financial reports to the legislative
transportation committee;
(b) Report annually to the legislative transportation committee on
the special license plate applications that were considered by the
board;
(c) Issue approval and rejection notification letters to sponsoring
organizations, the department, the chairs of the senate and house of
representatives transportation committees, and the legislative sponsors
identified in each application. The letters must be issued within
seven days of making a determination on the status of an application;
(d) Review annually the number of plates sold for each special
license plate series created after January 1, 2003. The board may
submit a recommendation to discontinue a special plate series to the
chairs of the senate and house of representatives transportation
committees.

PART II
ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR A SPONSORING ORGANIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS. (1) For an organization to qualify for
a special license plate under the special license plate approval
program created in sections 101 through 303 of this act, the sponsoring
organization must submit documentation in conjunction with the
application to the department that verifies:
(a) That the organization is a nonprofit organization, as defined
in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3). The department may request a copy of an
Internal Revenue Service ruling to verify an organization's nonprofit
status; and
(b) That the organization is located in Washington and has
registered as a charitable organization with the secretary of state's
office as required by law.
(2) For a governmental body to qualify for a special license plate
under the special license plate approval program created in sections
101 through 303 of this act, a governmental body must be:
(a) A political subdivision, including but not limited to any
county, city, town, municipal corporation, or special purpose taxing
district that has the express permission of the political subdivision's
executive body to sponsor a special license plate;
(b) A federally recognized tribal government that has received the
approval of the executive body of that government to sponsor a special
license plate;
(c) A state agency that has both received approval from the
director of the agency or the department head, and has the express
statutory authority to sponsor a special license plate; or
(d) A community or technical college that has the express
permission of the college's board of trustees to sponsor a special
license plate.

PART III
GENERAL REQUIREMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS. (1) A sponsoring organization meeting
the requirements of section 201 of this act, applying for the creation
of a special license plate to the special license plate review board
must, on an application supplied by the department, provide the minimum
application requirements in subsection (2) of this section. If the
sponsoring organization cannot meet the payment requirements of
subsection (2) of this section, then the organization must meet the
requirements of subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The sponsoring organization shall:
(a) Submit prepayment of all start-up costs associated with the
creation and implementation of the special license plate in an amount
determined by the department. The department shall place this money
into the special license plate applicant trust account created under
section 302(3) of this act until the special license plate receives
legislative approval. If the special license plate does not receive
legislative approval the money must be fully refunded within thirty
days. The organization may withdraw the application at any time and
receive a full refund of the money within thirty days;
(b) Provide a proposed license plate design;
(c) Provide a marketing strategy outlining short and long-term
marketing plans for the special license plate and a financial analysis
outlining the anticipated revenue and the planned expenditures of the
revenues derived from the sale of the special license plate;
(d) Provide a signature of a legislative sponsor and proposed
legislation creating the special license plate; and
(e) Provide proof of organizational qualifications as determined by
the department as provided for in section 201 of this act.
(3) If the sponsoring organization is not able to meet the payment
requirements of subsection (2)(a) of this section and can demonstrate
this fact to the satisfaction of the department, the sponsoring
organization shall:
(a) Submit an application and fee of one hundred dollars, for
deposit in the motor vehicle account, to the department;
(b) Provide signature sheets that include signatures from
individuals who intend to purchase the special license plate and the
number of plates each individual intends to purchase. The sheets must
reflect a minimum of two thousand intended purchases of the special
license plate;
(c) Provide a proposed license plate design;
(d) Provide a marketing strategy outlining short and long-term
marketing plans for the special license plate and a financial analysis
outlining the anticipated revenue and the planned expenditures of the
revenues derived from the sale of the special license plate;
(e) Provide a signature of a legislative sponsor and proposed
legislation creating the special license plate; and
(f) Provide proof of organizational qualifications as determined by
the department as provided in section 201 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
DISPOSITION OF REVENUES. (1) Revenues generated from the sale of
special license plates for those sponsoring organizations who used the
application process in section 301(3) of this act must be deposited
into the motor vehicle account until the department determines that the
state's portion of the implementation costs have been fully reimbursed.
When it is determined that the state has been fully reimbursed the
department must notify the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees, the sponsoring organization, and the
treasurer, and commence the distribution of the revenue as otherwise
provided by law.
(2) If reimbursement does not occur within the two-year time frame,
the special license plate series must be placed in probationary status
for a period of one year from that date. If the state is still not
fully reimbursed for its implementation costs after the one-year
probation, the plate series must be discontinued immediately. Special
plates issued before discontinuation are valid until replaced under RCW
46.16.233. The state must be reimbursed for its portion of the
implementation costs within two years from the date the new plate
series goes on sale to the public.
(3) The special license plate applicant trust account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from special license
plate applicants, except the application fee as provided in section
301(3) of this act, must be deposited into the account. Only the
director of the department or the director's designee may authorize
disbursements from the account. The account is not subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, nor is an appropriation
required for disbursements.
(4) The department shall provide the special license plate
applicant with a written receipt for the payment.
(5) The department shall maintain a record of each special license
plate applicant trust account deposit, including, but not limited to,
the name and address of each special license plate applicant whose
funds are being deposited, the amount paid, and the date of the
deposit.
(6) After the department receives written notice that the special
license plate applicant's application has been:
(a) Approved by the legislature the director shall request that the
money be transferred to the motor vehicle account;
(b) Denied by the special license plate review board or the
legislature the director shall provide a refund to the applicant within
thirty days; or
(c) Withdrawn by the special license plate applicant the director
shall provide a refund to the applicant within thirty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE ON-GOING REQUIREMENTS. (1) Within thirty
days of legislative enactment of a new special license plate series for
a qualifying organization meeting the requirements of section 201(1) of
this act, the department shall enter into a written agreement with the
organization that sponsored the special license plate. The agreement
must identify the services to be performed by the sponsoring
organization. The agreement must be consistent with all applicable
state law and include the following provision:

"No portion of any funds disbursed under the agreement may be used,
directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(a) Attempting to influence: (i) The passage or defeat of
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by a county,
city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington,
or by the Congress; or (ii) the adoption or rejection of a rule,
standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of a state agency;
(b) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(c) Providing a: (i) Gift; (ii) honoraria; or (iii) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee."

(2) The sponsoring organization must submit an annual financial
report by September 30th of each year to the department detailing
actual revenues and expenditures of the revenues received from sales of
the special license plate. Consistent with the agreement under
subsection (1) of this section, the sponsoring organization must expend
the revenues generated from the sale of the special license plate
series for the benefit of the public, and it must be spent within this
state. Disbursement of the revenue generated from the sale of the
special license plate to the sponsoring organization is contingent upon
the organization meeting all reporting and review requirements as
required by the department.
(3) If the sponsoring organization ceases to exist or the purpose
of the special license plate series ceases to exist, revenues generated
from the sale of the special license plates must be deposited into the
motor vehicle account.
(4) A sponsoring organization may not seek to redesign its plate
series until all of the inventory is sold or purchased by the
organization itself. All cost for redesign of a plate series must be
paid by the sponsoring organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 46.16
RCW to read as follows:
NONREVIEWED PLATES. (1) A special license plate series created by
the legislature after January 1, 2004, that has not been reviewed and
approved by the special license plate review board is subject to the
following requirements:
(a) The organization sponsoring the license plate series shall,
within thirty days of enactment of the legislation creating the plate
series, submit prepayment of all start-up costs associated with the
creation and implementation of the special license plate in an amount
determined by the department. The prepayment will be credited to the
motor vehicle fund. The creation and implementation of the plate
series may not commence until payment is received by the department.
(b) If the sponsoring organization is not able to meet the
prepayment requirements in (a) of this subsection and can demonstrate
this fact to the satisfaction of the department, the revenues generated
from the sale of the special license plates must be deposited in the
motor vehicle account until the department determines that the state's
portion of the implementation costs have been fully reimbursed. When
it is determined that the state has been fully reimbursed the
department must notify the treasurer to commence distribution of the
revenue according to statutory provisions.
(c) The sponsoring organization must provide a proposed license
plate design to the department within thirty days of enactment of the
legislation creating the plate series.
(2) The state must be reimbursed for its portion of the
implementation costs within two years from the date the new plate
series goes on sale to the public. If the reimbursement does not occur
within the two-year time frame, the special license plate series must
be placed in probationary status for a period of one year from that
date. If the state is still not fully reimbursed for its
implementation costs after the one-year probation, the plate series
must be discontinued immediately. Those plates issued before
discontinuation are valid until replaced under RCW 46.16.233.
(3) If the sponsoring organization ceases to exist or the purpose
of the special plate series ceases to exist, revenues generated from
the sale of the special license plates must be deposited into the motor
vehicle account.
(4) A sponsoring organization may not seek to redesign their plate
series until all of the existing inventory is sold or purchased by the
organization itself. All cost for redesign of a plate series must be
paid by the sponsoring organization.

PART IV
STANDARD BACKGROUND
Sec. 401 RCW 46.16.233 and 2000 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for those license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1)
before January 1, 1987, under RCW 46.16.305(3), and to commercial
vehicles with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds,
effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1,
2001, all vehicle license plates must be issued on a standard
background, as designated by the department. Additionally, to ensure
maximum legibility and reflectivity, the department shall periodically
provide for the replacement of license plates, except for commercial
vehicles with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds.
Frequency of replacement shall be established in accordance with
empirical studies documenting the longevity of the reflective materials
used to make license plates.
(2) Special license plate series approved by the special license
plate review board created under section 101 of this act and enacted by
the legislature are exempt from the standard background requirements of
subsection (1) of this section and may display a symbol or artwork
approved by the special license plate review board.

PART V
PRIOR SPECIAL PLATE SERIES CONTINUATION
Sec. 501 RCW 46.16.314 and 1997 c 291 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
((After a period of three years from the initial issuance of a
special license plate series,)) The department has the sole discretion,
based upon the number of sales to date, to determine whether or not to
continue issuing ((the)) license plates in a special series created
before January 1, 2003.

PART VI
TECHNICAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Part headings used in this act are not
part of the law.

PART VII
NULL AND VOID
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2003, in the omnibus transportation appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---