BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds:
(a) Childhood obesity has reached epidemic levels in Washington and
throughout the nation. Nearly one in five Washington adolescents in
grades nine through twelve were recently found to be either overweight
or at risk of being overweight;
(b) Overweight and obese children are at higher risk for developing
severe long-term health problems, including but not limited to Type 2
diabetes, cardiovascular disease, high blood pressure, and certain
cancers;
(c) Overweight youth also are often affected by discrimination,
psychological stress, and low self-esteem;
(d) Obesity and subsequent diseases are largely preventable through
diet and regular physical activity;
(e) A child who has eaten a well-balanced meal and is healthy is
more likely to be prepared to learn in the classroom;
(f) Encouraging adolescents to adopt healthy lifelong eating habits
can increase their productivity and reduce their risk of dying
prematurely;
(g) Frequent eating of carbohydrate-rich foods or drinking sweet
liquids throughout the day increases a child's risk for dental decay,
the most common chronic childhood disease;
(h) Schools are a logical place to address the issue of obesity in
children and adolescents; and
(i) Increased emphasis on physical activity at all grade levels is
essential to enhancing the well-being of Washington's youth.
(2) While the United States department of agriculture regulates the
nutritional content of meals sold in schools under its school breakfast
and lunch program, limited standards are in place to regulate
"competitive foods," which may be high in added sugars, sodium, and
saturated fat content. However, the United States department of
agriculture does call for states and local entities to add restrictions
on competitive foods, as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Consistent with the essential academic
learning requirements for health and fitness, including nutrition, the
Washington state school directors association, with the assistance of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department
of health, and the Washington alliance for health, physical education,
recreation and dance, shall convene an advisory committee to develop a
model policy regarding access to nutritious foods, opportunities for
developmentally appropriate exercise, and accurate information related
to these topics. The policy shall address the nutritional content of
foods and beverages, including fluoridated bottled water, sold or
provided throughout the school day or sold in competition with the
federal school breakfast and lunch program and the availability and
quality of health, nutrition, and physical education curricula.
(2) The school directors association shall submit the model policy
and recommendations on the related issues, along with a recommendation
for local adoption, to the governor and the legislature and shall post
the model policy on its web site by January 1, 2005.
(3) Each district's board of directors shall establish its own
policy by August 1, 2005. Districts are encouraged to place no
restrictions on the sale or consumption of dairy products on school
premises during the school hours in their model policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---