BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.315.205 and 1999 c 315 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The chair of the regional committee shall schedule a hearing on
the proposed transfer of territory at a location in the educational
service district within sixty calendar days of being notified under RCW
28A.315.195 (7) or (8).
(2) Within thirty calendar days of the hearing under subsection (1)
of this section, or final hearing if more than one is held by the
committee, the committee shall issue its written findings and decision
to approve or disapprove the proposed transfer of territory. The
educational service district superintendent shall transmit a copy of
the committee's decision to the superintendents of the affected school
districts within ten calendar days.
(3) In carrying out the purposes of RCW 28A.315.015 and in making
decisions as authorized under RCW 28A.315.095(1), the regional
committee shall base its judgment upon whether and to the extent the
proposed change in school district organization complies with RCW
28A.315.015(2) and rules adopted by the state board under chapter 34.05
RCW.
(4) State board rules under subsection (3) of this section shall
provide for giving consideration to all of the following:
(a) The annual school performance reports required under RCW
((28A.320.205)) 28A.655.110 in the affected districts and improvement
of the educational opportunities of pupils in the territory proposed
for a change in school district organization;
(b) The safety and welfare of pupils. For the purposes of this
subsection, "safety" means freedom or protection from danger, injury,
or damage and "welfare" means a positive condition or influence
regarding health, character, and well-being;
(c) The history and relationship of the property affected to the
students and communities affected, including, for example, inclusion
within a single school district, for school attendance and
corresponding tax support purposes, of entire master planned
communities that were or are to be developed pursuant to an integrated
commercial and residential development plan with over one thousand
dwelling units;
(d) Whether or not geographic accessibility warrants a favorable
consideration of a recommended change in school district organization,
including remoteness or isolation of places of residence and time
required to travel to and from school; and
(e) All funding sources of the affected districts, equalization
among school districts of the tax burden for general fund and capital
purposes through a reduction in disparities in per pupil valuation when
all funding sources are considered, improvement in the economies in the
administration and operation of schools, and the extent the proposed
change would potentially reduce or increase the individual and
aggregate transportation costs of the affected school districts.
(5)(a)(i) A petitioner or school district may appeal a decision by
the regional committee ((to approve a change in school district
organization)) to the state board based on the claim that the regional
committee failed to follow the applicable statutory and regulatory
procedures or acted in an arbitrary and capricious manner. Any such
appeal shall be based on the record and the appeal must be filed within
thirty days of the final decision of the regional committee, except
that appeals of decisions made by the regional committee in 2002 to
deny a change in school district organization shall be made within
thirty days of the effective date of this section.
(ii) If the state board finds that all applicable procedures were
not followed or that the regional committee acted in an arbitrary and
capricious manner, it shall refer the matter back to the regional
committee with an explanation of the board's findings. The regional
committee shall rehear the proposal.
(iii) If the state board finds that all applicable procedures were
followed or that the regional committee did not act in an arbitrary and
capricious manner, depending on the appeal, the educational service
district shall be notified and directed to implement the changes.
(b) Any school district or citizen petitioner affected by a final
decision of the regional committee may seek judicial review of the
committee's decision in accordance with RCW 34.05.570.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The change in appeals process in RCW
28A.315.205 applies to decisions made by the regional committee
beginning January 1, 2002, and thereafter.

--- END ---