BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to (a) the sale
of tangible goods used in the construction of qualified buildings; (b)
the sale of qualified machinery and equipment that will be part of a
qualified building; or (c) the sale of services and labor performed in
respect to the construction of a qualified building.
(2) Application for exemption of taxes under this section must be
made before initiation of the construction of the qualified building or
acquisition of qualified equipment or machinery. The application shall
be made to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The application shall contain information regarding the
location of the qualified building, the applicant's average employment
in the state for the prior year, estimated or actual new employment
related to the project, estimated or actual wages of employees related
to the project, estimated or actual costs, time schedules for
completion and operation, and other information required by the
department. The department shall rule on the application within sixty
days.
(3) The department shall issue a sales and use tax exemption
certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under this
chapter and chapters 82.12 and 82.14 RCW, if the applicant establishes
that at the time the construction is operationally complete the
applicant will create at least fifteen qualified employment positions
per one million dollars of investment.
(4) The qualified employment position must be filled by the end of
the calendar year following the year in which the project is certified
as operationally complete. If a person does not meet the requirements
for qualified employment positions by the end of the second calendar
year following the year in which the project is certified as
operationally complete, the department shall determine the total amount
of taxes that have been exempted under this section and section 2 of
this act and collect the taxes in the same manner as other deficient
taxes. The taxes shall be considered deficient from the time the
department determines that the person has not met the requirements of
this subsection (4) and has notified the person.
(5) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
definitions apply throughout this section.
(a) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax exemption under
this section.
(b) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software and hardware, and other computer-related services,
and the activities performed by research and development laboratories
and commercial testing laboratories.
(c) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(d) "Qualified building" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for manufacturing
and research and development activities, including plant offices and
warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw material or
finished goods if the facilities are an essential or an integral part
of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for manufacturing or
research and development and will create upon completion of the
qualified building at least fifteen qualified employment positions per
one million dollars of investment. The qualified building may be
partly used for other purposes, as long as the construction costs for
these other purposes do not constitute more than twenty-five percent of
the total cost of the qualified building as determined by the
department.
(e) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed at the qualified building during the entire year.
(f) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research and
development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes:
Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment;
manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving
parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment
used to control or operate the machinery.
(g) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this
subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to (a) the sale
of tangible goods used in the construction of qualified buildings; (b)
the sale of qualified machinery and equipment that will be part of a
qualified building; or (c) the sale of services and labor performed in
respect to the construction of qualified buildings.
(2) The provisions of section 1 of this act apply to this section.

--- END ---