BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tax equal to one percent of the income determined under
subsection (2) of this section is imposed on an individual who is a
nonresident of Washington and who is an athlete or entertainer.
(2) Income from compensation for labor or personal services
performed within this state will be determined in the following manner:
(a) The amount of income to be assigned to Washington for an
individual who is a nonresident salaried athletic team employee will be
determined by using a fraction in which the denominator contains the
total number of days in which the individual is under a duty to perform
for the employer, and the numerator is the total number of those days
spent in Washington. For purposes of this section, off-season training
activities, unless conducted at the team's facilities as part of a team
imposed program, are not included in the total number of duty days.
Bonuses earned as a result of play during the regular season or for
participation in championship, play-off, or all-star games must be
allocated under the formula. Signing bonuses are not subject to
allocation under the formula if they are not conditional on playing any
games for the team, are payable separately from any other compensation,
and are nonrefundable; and
(b) The amount of income to be assigned to Washington for an
individual who is a nonresident, and who is an athlete or entertainer
not listed in (a) of this subsection, the person's athletic or
entertainment performance in Washington will be determined by assigning
to this state all income directly earned from performances or athletic
contests in this state.
(3) Revenue collected under this section will be deposited in the
youth athletic facility account created in RCW 43.99N.060.
(4) This tax shall not take effect unless a state income tax is
approved by the voters of Washington state.

--- END ---