BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature wishes to recognize: The
value of poetry and the contribution Washington poets make to the
culture of our state; that poetry is a literary form respected and
growing throughout all segments of Washington's population; that
awareness and appreciation of poetry encourages increased literacy and
advanced communication skills; and that Washington state has produced
many excellent and nationally recognized poets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state of Washington shall create the position of state poet
laureate. The poet laureate shall engage in activities to promote and
encourage poetry within the state, including but not limited to a
minimum of twenty readings, workshops, lectures, and/or presentations
for Washington educational institutions and communities in
geographically diverse areas over a two-year term.
(2) Selection of a poet laureate shall be made by a committee
appointed by the Washington commission for the humanities or successor
agency and may include representatives of the Washington state library,
education community, Washington state arts commission, Washington
commission for the humanities, publishing, and the community of
Washington poets, to be coordinated by the Washington commission for
the humanities or successor agency.
(3) The poet laureate must be a published poet, resident of
Washington state, active in the poetry community, and willing and able
to promote poetry in the state of Washington throughout the two-year
term.
(4) The poet laureate may not serve more than two consecutive two-year terms. Administration of the poet laureate program shall be by
the Washington commission for the humanities or successor agency.

--- END ---