BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.401 and 1998 c 290 s 1 and 1998 c 82 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(a) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any
person to manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture
or deliver, a controlled substance.
(1) Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:
(i) a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II which is
a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, is guilty
of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten
years, or (A) fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars if the
crime involved less than two kilograms of the drug, or both such
imprisonment and fine; or (B) if the crime involved two or more
kilograms of the drug, then fined not more than one hundred thousand
dollars for the first two kilograms and not more than fifty dollars for
each gram in excess of two kilograms, or both such imprisonment and
fine;
(ii) amphetamine or delivery or possession with intent to deliver
methamphetamine, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be
imprisoned for not more than ten years, or (A) fined not more than
twenty-five thousand dollars if the crime involved less than two
kilograms of the drug, or both such imprisonment and fine; or (B) if
the crime involved two or more kilograms of the drug, then fined not
more than one hundred thousand dollars for the first two kilograms and
not more than fifty dollars for each gram in excess of two kilograms,
or both such imprisonment and fine. Three thousand dollars of the fine
may not be suspended. As collected, the first three thousand dollars
of the fine must be deposited with the law enforcement agency having
responsibility for cleanup of laboratories, sites, or substances used
in the manufacture of the methamphetamine. The fine moneys deposited
with that law enforcement agency must be used for such clean-up cost;
(iii) manufacture of methamphetamine, is guilty of a class A felony
and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than twenty years,
or (A) fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars if the crime
involved less than two kilograms of the drug, or both such imprisonment
and fine; or (B) if the crime involved two or more kilograms of the
drug, then fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars for the
first two kilograms and not more than fifty dollars for each gram in
excess of two kilograms, or both such imprisonment and fine. Five
thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended. As collected, the
first five thousand dollars of the fine must be deposited with the law
enforcement agency having responsibility for cleanup of laboratories,
sites, or substances used in the manufacture of the methamphetamine.
The fine moneys deposited with that law enforcement agency must be used
for such clean-up cost;
(iv) any other controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II,
or III, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for
not more than five years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars, or
both;
(((iv))) (v) a substance classified in Schedule IV, except
flunitrazepam, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be
imprisoned for not more than five years, fined not more than ten
thousand dollars, or both;
(((v))) (vi) a substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a
crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five
years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars, or both.
(b) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any
person to create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit substance.
(1) Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:
(i) a counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I or II which is
a narcotic drug, or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, is guilty
of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten
years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;
(ii) a counterfeit substance which is methamphetamine, is guilty of
a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten
years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or both;
(iii) any other counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, II,
or III, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for
not more than five years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars, or
both;
(iv) a counterfeit substance classified in Schedule IV, except
flunitrazepam, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be
imprisoned for not more than five years, fined not more than ten
thousand dollars, or both;
(v) a counterfeit substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of
a crime and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five
years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars, or both.
(c) It is unlawful, except as authorized in this chapter and
chapter 69.41 RCW, for any person to offer, arrange, or negotiate for
the sale, gift, delivery, dispensing, distribution, or administration
of a controlled substance to any person and then sell, give, deliver,
dispense, distribute, or administer to that person any other liquid,
substance, or material in lieu of such controlled substance. Any
person who violates this subsection is guilty of a crime and upon
conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five years, fined not
more than ten thousand dollars, or both.
(d) It is unlawful for any person to possess a controlled substance
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a
valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the
course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise
authorized by this chapter. Any person who violates this subsection is
guilty of a crime, and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more
than five years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars, or both,
except as provided for in subsection (e) of this section.
(e) Except as provided for in subsection (a)(1)(((iii))) (iv) of
this section any person found guilty of possession of forty grams or
less of marihuana shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(f) It is unlawful to compensate, threaten, solicit, or in any
other manner involve a person under the age of eighteen years in a
transaction unlawfully to manufacture, sell, or deliver a controlled
substance. A violation of this subsection shall be punished as a class
C felony punishable in accordance with RCW 9A.20.021.
This section shall not apply to offenses defined and punishable
under the provisions of RCW 69.50.410.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.406 and 1998 c 290 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(a) Any person eighteen years of age or over who violates RCW
69.50.401(a) by distributing a controlled substance listed in Schedules
I or II which is a narcotic drug or methamphetamine, or flunitrazepam
listed in Schedule IV, to a person under eighteen years of age is
punishable by the fine authorized by RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii),
by a term of imprisonment of up to twice that authorized by RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii), or by both.
(b) Any person eighteen years of age or over who violates RCW
69.50.401(a) by distributing any other controlled substance listed in
Schedules I, II, III, IV, and V to a person under eighteen years of age
who is at least three years his junior is punishable by the fine
authorized by RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (((iii))) (iv), (((iv))) (v), or
(((v))) (vi), by a term of imprisonment up to twice that authorized by
RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (((iii))) (iv), (((iv))) (v), or (((v))) (vi), or
both.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.50.415 and 1996 c 205 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(a) A person who unlawfully delivers a controlled substance in
violation of RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i), (ii), or (((iii))) (iv) which
controlled substance is subsequently used by the person to whom it was
delivered, resulting in the death of the user, is guilty of controlled
substances homicide.
(b) Controlled substances homicide is a class B felony punishable
according to RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.510 and 2000 c 132 s 2 and 2000 c 28 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)

TABLE 1

Sentencing Grid

SERIOUSNESS

LEVEL
OFFENDER SCORE

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8 9 or
more

XVI Life Sentence without Parole/Death Penalty

XV 23y4m 24y4m 25y4m 26y4m 27y4m 28y4m 30y4m 32y10m 36y 40y

240- 250- 261- 271- 281- 291- 312- 338- 370- 411-

320 333 347 361 374 388 416 450 493 548

XIV 14y4m 15y4m 16y2m 17y 17y11m 18y9m 20y5m 22y2m 25y7m 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397

XIII 12y 13y 14y 15y 16y 17y 19y 21y 25y 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

164 178 192 205 219 233 260 288 342 397

XII 9y 9y11m 10y9m 11y8m 12y6m 13y5m 15y9m 17y3m 20y3m 23y3m

93- 102- 111- 120- 129- 138- 162- 178- 209- 240-

123 136 147 160 171 184 216 236 277 318

XI 7y6m 8y4m 9y2m 9y11m 10y9m 11y7m 14y2m 15y5m 17y11m 20y5m

78- 86- 95- 102- 111- 120- 146- 159- 185- 210-

102 114 125 136 147 158 194 211 245 280

X 5y 5y6m 6y 6y6m 7y 7y6m 9y6m 10y6m 12y6m 14y6m

51- 57- 62- 67- 72- 77- 98- 108- 129- 149-

68 75 82 89 96 102 130 144 171 198

IX 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 5y 5y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m 12y6m

31- 36- 41- 46- 51- 57- 77- 87- 108- 129-

41 48 54 61 68 75 102 116 144 171

VIII 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m

21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 46- 67- 77- 87- 108-

27 34 41 48 54 61 89 102 116 144

VII 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m

15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 57- 67- 77- 87-

20 27 34 41 48 54 75 89 102 116

VI 13m 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y6m 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m

12+- 15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 46- 57- 67- 77-

14 20 27 34 41 48 61 75 89 102

V 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y 5y 6y 7y

6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 41- 51- 62- 72-

12 14 17 20 29 43 54 68 82 96

IV 6m 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y2m 6y2m

3- 6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 43- 53- 63-

9 12 14 17 20 29 43 57 70 84

III 2m 5m 8m 11m 14m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y

1- 3- 4- 9- 12+- 17- 22- 33- 43- 51-

3 8 12 12 16 22 29 43 57 68

II 4m 6m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m

0-90 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22- 33- 43-

Days 6 9 12 14 18 22 29 43 57

I 3m 4m 5m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m

0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22-

Days Days 5 6 8 12 14 18 22 29

Numbers in the first horizontal row of each seriousness category
represent sentencing midpoints in years(y) and months(m). Numbers in
the second and third rows represent standard sentence ranges in months,
or in days if so designated. 12+ equals one year and one day.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
75 percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection.
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection.
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection.
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4).
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony.
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection.
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection.
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection.
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4).
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony.
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (i) ((or)), (ii), or (iii) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)
(((iii),)) (iv), ((and)) (v), and (vi);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(d).
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.605.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2002 c 290 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (i) ((or)), (ii), or (iii) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)
(((iii),)) (iv), ((and)) (v), and (vi);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(d).
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.605.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2002 c 340 s 2, 2002 c 324 s 2, 2002 c
290 s 2, 2002 c 253 s 4, 2002 c 229 s 2, 2002 c 134 s 2, and 2002 c 133
s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Manufacture of methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(((ii))) (iii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin,
methamphetamine, a narcotic
from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
to someone under 18 (RCW
69.50.406)

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW
69.50.415)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or a
nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam
or methamphetamine, from
Schedule I-V to someone under 18
and 3 years junior (RCW
69.50.406)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver or possess with intent to
deliver methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver amphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver heroin or cocaine
(when the offender has a criminal
history in this state or any other
state that includes a sex offense or
serious violent offense or the
Washington equivalent) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession of Ephedrine or any of its
Salts or Isomers or Salts of
Isomers, Pseudoephedrine or any
of its Salts or Isomers or Salts of
Isomers, Pressurized Ammonia
Gas, or Pressurized Ammonia Gas
Solution with intent to
manufacture methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or
counterfeit) any controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Involving a minor in drug dealing
(RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver heroin or cocaine
(except when the offender has a
criminal history in this state or
any other state that includes a sex
offense or serious violent offense
or the Washington equivalent)
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule I or II (except heroin or
cocaine) or flunitrazepam from
Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Delivery of imitation controlled
substance by person eighteen or
over to person under eighteen
(RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW
9A.56.070(1))

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(a))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen
Property (RCW 9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule III, IV, or V or
nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or
flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (((iii))) (iv)
through (((v))) (vi))

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery of a material in lieu of a
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(c))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for
Controlled Substances (RCW
69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver marijuana (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(((iii))) (iv))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess
with intent to distribute an
imitation controlled substance
(RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen
Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW
9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug
Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(b))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(2)(b))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of controlled substance that
is either heroin or narcotics from
Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam
from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP)
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled
Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a
Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or
V or Non-narcotic from Schedule
I-V (except phencyclidine or
flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.070(2))

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.518 and 2002 c 290 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:

TABLE 4

DRUG OFFENSES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH
SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

III Any felony offense under chapter
69.50 RCW with a deadly weapon
special verdict under RCW
9.94A.602

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW
69.50.415)

Delivery of imitation controlled
substance by person eighteen or
over to person under eighteen
(RCW 69.52.030(2))

Involving a minor in drug dealing
(RCW 69.50.401(f))

Manufacture of methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(((ii))) (iii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin,
methamphetamine, a narcotic
from Schedule I or II, or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
to someone under 18 (RCW
69.50.406)

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or a
nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam
or methamphetamine, from
Schedule I-V to someone under 18
and 3 years junior (RCW
69.50.406)

Possession of Ephedrine or any of its
Salts or Isomers or Salts of
Isomers, Pseudoephedrine or any
of its Salts or Isomers or Salts of
Isomers, ((or Anhydrous))
Pressurized Ammonia Gas, or
Pressurized Ammonia Gas
Solution with intent to
manufacture methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.440)

Selling for profit (controlled or
counterfeit) any controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.410)

II Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(b))

Deliver or possess with intent to
deliver methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.401(c))

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for
Controlled Substances (RCW
69.50.402(a)(6))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver amphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam
from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule III, IV, or V or
nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine,
methamphetamines, or
flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (((iii))) (iv)
through (((v))) (vi))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess
with intent to distribute an
imitation controlled substance
(RCW 69.52.030(1))

I Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled
Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver marijuana (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(((iii))) (iv))

Possess Controlled Substance that is a
Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or
V or Nonnarcotic from Schedule
I-V (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Controlled Substance
that is either heroin or narcotics
from Schedule I or II (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug
Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Sec. 8 RCW 9.94A.610 and 1996 c 205 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the earliest possible date, and in no event later than ten
days before release except in the event of escape or emergency
furloughs as defined in RCW 72.66.010, the department of corrections
shall send written notice of parole, community placement, work release
placement, furlough, or escape about a specific inmate convicted of a
serious drug offense to the following if such notice has been requested
in writing about a specific inmate convicted of a serious drug offense:
(a) Any witnesses who testified against the inmate in any court
proceedings involving the serious drug offense; and
(b) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.
Information regarding witnesses requesting the notice, information
regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting
attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and
shall not be available to the inmate.
(2) If an inmate convicted of a serious drug offense escapes from
a correctional facility, the department of corrections shall
immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means
available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the
county in which the inmate resided immediately before the inmate's
arrest and conviction. If previously requested, the department shall
also notify the witnesses who are entitled to notice under this
section. If the inmate is recaptured, the department shall send notice
to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in
no event later than two working days after the department learns of
such recapture.
(3) If any witness is under the age of sixteen, the notice required
by this section shall be sent to the parents or legal guardian of the
child.
(4) The department of corrections shall send the notices required
by this section to the last address provided to the department by the
requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department
with a current address.
(5) For purposes of this section, "serious drug offense" means an
offense under RCW 69.50.401 (a)(1)(i) ((or)), (ii), or (iii) or
(b)(1)(i) or (ii).

Sec. 9 RCW 13.40.0357 and 2002 c 324 s 3 and 2002 c 175 s 20 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

JUVENILE
DISPOSITION
OFFENSE
CATEGORY DESCRIPTION (RCW CITATION) JUVENILE DISPOSITION
CATEGORY FOR
ATTEMPT, BAILJUMP,
CONSPIRACY, OR
SOLICITATION

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (<$50 is E class)
(9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)
B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary (9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol
(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug
(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug
with Intent to Sell (69.41.030) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug (69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Narcotic,
Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1) (i) ((or)), (ii), or (iii)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1)(((iii))) (iv)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40 grams
(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled
Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit
(69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Narcotic,
Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam
Counterfeit Substances (69.50.401(b)(1) (i)
or (ii)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit
Substances (69.50.401(b)(1) (iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled
Substance (69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled
Substance (69.50.401(c))
C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm (9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18)
(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon
(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use of
Weapon (9.41.270)
E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)
D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)
C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon (9A.84.010) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure (Victim <14)
(9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over)
(9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)(a)) D

D Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(2)(b)) E

D Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (9.35.010) E

B Possession of Stolen Property 1
(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2
(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3
(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
1 and 2 (9A.56.070 (1) and (2))
D

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License (46.20.005) E

B+ Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502 and 46.61.504)
E

Other

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls
(9.61.230) E

A Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
A Felony B+

B Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
B Felony C

C Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
C Felony D

D Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation of Order of Restitution,
Community Supervision, or Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses
and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks
confinement
2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks
confinement
3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month
period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order,
it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may
select sentencing option A, B, or C.

OPTION A
JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID
STANDARD RANGE

A+
180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

EXCEPT

30-40

WEEKS FOR

15-17

YEAR OLDS

Current B+ 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

Offense WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL 52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) 15-36 WEEKS WEEKS

C+ LS

15-36 WEEKS

C LS 15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions:

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Restitution

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4
or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of
confinement.
(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category.
The current offense category is determined by the offense of
adjudication.
(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior
adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior
felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation,
misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4
point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.
(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined
by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications
and the row defined by the current offense category.
(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense.
(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an
offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall
not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B

CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not
committed an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition
under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION C

MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A or B would
effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition
outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 4 and 6 of this act expire July 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 5 and 7 of this act take effect
July 1, 2004.

--- END ---