BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.36.220 and 2001 c 241 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, a registered voter or out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter desiring to cast an
absentee ballot at a single election or primary must request the
absentee ballot from his or her county auditor no earlier than ninety
days nor later than the day before the election or primary at which the
person seeks to vote. Except as otherwise provided by law, the request
may be made orally in person, by telephone, electronically, or in
writing. An application or request for an absentee ballot made under
the authority of a federal statute or regulation will be considered and
given the same effect as a request for an absentee ballot under this
chapter.
(2) A voter requesting an absentee ballot for a primary may also
request an absentee ballot for the following general election. A
request by an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter for
an absentee ballot for a primary election will be considered as a
request for an absentee ballot for the following general election.
(3) In requesting an absentee ballot, the voter shall state the
address to which the absentee ballot should be sent. A request for an
absentee ballot from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service
voter must include the address of the last residence in the state of
Washington and either a written application or the oath on the
((return)) security envelope must include a declaration of the other
qualifications of the applicant as an elector of this state. A request
for an absentee ballot from any other voter must state the address at
which that voter is currently registered to vote in the state of
Washington or the county auditor shall verify that information from the
voter registration records of the county.
(4) A request for an absentee ballot from a registered voter who is
within this state must be made directly to the auditor of the county in
which the voter is registered. An absentee ballot request from a
registered voter who is temporarily outside this state or from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter may be made either to
the appropriate county auditor or to the secretary of state, who shall
promptly forward the request to the appropriate county auditor. No
person, organization, or association may distribute absentee ballot
applications within this state that contain a return address other than
that of the appropriate county auditor.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.36.290 and 2001 c 241 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The
((larger return)) security envelope must contain a declaration by the
absentee voter reciting his or her qualifications and stating that he
or she has not voted in any other jurisdiction at this election,
together with a summary of the penalties for any violation of any of
the provisions of this chapter. The ((return)) security envelope must
provide space for the voter to indicate the date on which the ballot
was voted and for the voter to sign the oath. A summary of the
applicable penalty provisions of this chapter must be printed on the
((return)) security envelope immediately adjacent to the space for the
voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the ((return))
security envelope must affirm and attest to the statements regarding
the qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot.
For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the
signed declaration on the ((return)) security envelope constitutes the
equivalent of a voter registration for the election or primary for
which the ballot has been issued. The voter must be instructed to
either return the ballot to the county auditor by whom it was issued or
attach sufficient first class postage, if applicable, and mail the
ballot to the appropriate county auditor no later than the day of the
election or primary for which the ballot was issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

Sec. 3 RCW 29.36.310 and 2001 c 241 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin on or after the tenth day before the
primary or election. The tabulation of absentee ballots must not
commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election.
(2) After opening the return envelopes, the county canvassing board
shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until after 8:00 p.m.
of the day of the primary or election. Absentee ballots that are to be
tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system may be taken from the
inner envelopes and all the normal procedural steps may be performed to
prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the return envelope ((that contains)) and
the security envelope ((and absentee ballot)). They shall verify that
the voter's signature on the ((return)) security envelope is the same
as the signature of that voter in the registration files of the county.
For registered voters casting absentee ballots, the date on the
((return)) security envelope to which the voter has attested determines
the validity, as to the time of voting for that absentee ballot if the
postmark is missing or is illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas
voters, and service voters, the date on the ((return)) security
envelope to which the voter has attested determines the validity as to
the time of voting for that absentee ballot. For any absentee ballot,
a variation between the signature of the voter on the ((return))
security envelope and the signature of that voter in the registration
files due to the substitution of initials or the use of common
nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are
clearly the same.

Sec. 4 RCW 29.36.350 and 2001 c 241 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The qualifications of any absentee voter may be challenged at the
time the signature on the ((return)) security envelope is verified and
the ballot is processed by the canvassing board. The board has the
authority to determine the legality of any absentee ballot challenged
under this section. Challenged ballots must be handled in accordance
with chapter 29.10 RCW.

--- END ---