BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, as a partner in
financing public higher education with students and parents who pay
tuition and fees, periodic increases in state funding, state financial
aid, and tuition must be authorized to provide high quality higher
education for the citizens of Washington. It is the intent of the
legislature to address higher education through a cooperative
bipartisan effort that includes the legislative and executive branches
of government, parents, students, educators, as well as business,
labor, and community leaders. The legislature recognizes the
importance of keeping the public commitment to public higher education
and will continue searching for policies that halt the trend for the
growth in tuition revenue to outpace the revenue provided by the state.
The legislature believes that a well-educated citizenry is essential to
both the private and the public good. The economic and civic health of
the state require both an educated citizenry and a well-trained work
force. The six-year time limitation authorizing the governing boards
to establish tuition rates for all students other than undergraduate
resident students will give the legislature, the governor, and the
higher education institutions an opportunity to determine whether this
policy achieves the goal of maintaining quality and access for all who
are eligible for and can benefit from a higher education. Using data
from six years of this tuition policy, the state will be able to
identify options for long-term funding of higher education including
not only tuition but general fund and financial aid sources.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.031 and 1996 c 142 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term "operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include the
fees, other than building fees, charged all students registering at the
state's colleges and universities but shall not include fees for short
courses, self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine
station work, experimental station work, correspondence or extension
courses, and individual instruction and student deposits or rentals,
disciplinary and library fines, which colleges and universities shall
have the right to impose, laboratory, gymnasium, health, technology and
student activity fees, or fees, charges, rentals, and other income
derived from any or all revenue producing lands, buildings and
facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or hereafter
acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to income
from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing
or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or
the appurtenances thereon, or such other special fees as may be
established by any college or university board of trustees or regents
from time to time. All moneys received as operating fees at any
institution of higher education shall be deposited in a local account
containing only operating fees revenue and related interest: PROVIDED,
That a minimum of three and one-half percent of operating fees shall be
retained by the institutions((, except the technical colleges,)) for
the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. Local operating fee accounts shall not
be subject to appropriation by the legislature or allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.066 and 2000 c 152
s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that:
In making appropriations from the state's general fund to
institutions of higher education, each appropriation shall conform to
the following:
(1) The appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of
operating fees revenue estimated to be collected from students enrolled
at the state-funded enrollment level specified in the omnibus biennial
operating appropriations act;
(2) The appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of
operating fees revenue collected from students enrolled above the
state-funded level((, but within the over-enrollment limitations,))
specified in the omnibus biennial operating appropriations act; and
(3) The general fund state appropriation shall not be reduced by
the amount of operating fees revenue collected as a result of waiving
less operating fees revenue than the amounts authorized under RCW
28B.15.910. State general fund appropriations shall not be provided
for revenue foregone as a result of or for waivers granted under RCW
28B.15.915.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.15.067 and 1997 c 403 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) ((Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education for the 1997-98 academic year, other
than the summer term, shall be as provided in this subsection.
(a) At the University of Washington and Washington State
University:
(i) For resident undergraduate students and other resident students
not in graduate, law, or first professional programs, two thousand nine
hundred eighty-eight dollars;
(ii)(A) For nonresident undergraduate students and other
nonresident students at the University of Washington not in graduate,
law, or first professional programs, ten thousand two hundred seventy-eight dollars;
(B) For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident
students at Washington State University not in graduate or first
professional programs, nine thousand eight hundred seventy dollars;
(iii) For resident graduate students, four thousand eight hundred
fifty-four dollars;
(iv) For nonresident graduate students, twelve thousand five
hundred eighty-eight dollars;
(v) For resident law students, five thousand ten dollars;
(vi) For nonresident law students, twelve thousand nine hundred
fifteen dollars;
(vii) For resident first professional students, eight thousand one
hundred twelve dollars; and
(viii) For nonresident first professional students, twenty-one
thousand twenty-four dollars.
(b) At the regional universities and The Evergreen State College:
(i) For resident undergraduate and all other resident students not
in graduate programs, two thousand two hundred eleven dollars;
(ii) For nonresident undergraduate and all other nonresident
students not in graduate programs, eight thousand six hundred forty-six
dollars;
(iii) For resident graduate students, three thousand seven hundred
twenty-six dollars; and
(iv) For nonresident graduate students, eleven thousand nine
hundred seventy-six dollars.
(c) At the community colleges:
(i) For resident students, one thousand three hundred eleven
dollars; and
(ii) For nonresident students, five thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars.
(3) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with the 1998-99 academic
year, other than the summer term, shall be as provided in this
subsection unless different rates are adopted in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(a) At the University of Washington and Washington State
University:
(i) For resident undergraduate students and other resident students
not in graduate, law, or first professional programs, three thousand
one hundred eight dollars;
(ii)(A) For nonresident undergraduate students and other
nonresident students at the University of Washington not in graduate,
law, or first professional programs, eleven thousand one hundred thirty
dollars;
(B) For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident
students at Washington State University not in graduate or first
professional programs, ten thousand two hundred sixty-six dollars;
(iii) For resident graduate students, five thousand forty-six
dollars;
(iv) For nonresident graduate students, thirteen thousand ninety-two dollars;
(v) For resident law students, five thousand three hundred seventy-six dollars;
(vi) For nonresident law students, thirteen thousand seven hundred
eighty-two dollars;
(vii) For resident first professional students, eight thousand four
hundred thirty-six dollars; and
(viii) For nonresident first professional students, twenty-one
thousand eight hundred sixty-four dollars.
(b) At the regional universities and The Evergreen State College:
(i) For resident undergraduate and all other resident students not
in graduate programs, two thousand two hundred ninety-eight dollars;
(ii) For nonresident undergraduate and all other nonresident
students not in graduate programs, eight thousand nine hundred ninety-one dollars;
(iii) For resident graduate students, three thousand eight hundred
seventy-six dollars; and
(iv) For nonresident graduate students, twelve thousand four
hundred fifty-six dollars.
(c) At the community colleges:
(i) For resident students, one thousand three hundred sixty-two
dollars; and
(ii) For nonresident students, five thousand eight hundred eight
dollars.
(4) For the 1997-98 and 1998-99 academic years, the University of
Washington shall use at least ten percent of the revenue received from
the difference between a four percent increase in tuition fees and the
actual increase charged to law students to assist needy low and middle-income resident law students. For the 1997-98 and 1998-99 academic
years, the University of Washington shall use at least ten percent of
the revenue received from the difference between a four percent
increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to nonresident
undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in
graduate, law, or first professional programs to assist needy low and
middle-income resident undergraduate students and all other resident
students not enrolled in graduate, law, or first professional programs.
This requirement is in addition to the deposit requirements of the
institutional aid fund under RCW 28B.15.820.
(5))) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2009-10, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2008-09 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through ((28A.600.395))
28A.600.400.
(6) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle income resident law students.
(7) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.15.069 and 1997 c 403 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((As used in this section, each of the following subsections is
a separate tuition category:
(a) Resident undergraduate students and all other resident students
not in first professional, graduate, or law programs;
(b) Nonresident undergraduate students and all other nonresident
students not in first professional graduate or law programs;
(c) Resident graduate students;
(d) Resident law students;
(e) Nonresident graduate students;
(f) Nonresident law students;
(g) Resident first professional students; and
(h) Nonresident first professional students.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
section "first professional programs" means programs leading to one of
the following degrees: Doctor of medicine, doctor of dental surgery,
or doctor of veterinary medicine.
(3))) The building fee for each academic year shall be a percentage
of total tuition fees. This percentage shall be calculated by the
higher education coordinating board and be based on the actual
percentage the building fee is of total tuition for each tuition
category in the 1994-95 academic year, rounded up to the nearest half
percent.
(((4))) (2) The governing boards of each institution of higher
education, except for the technical colleges, shall charge to and
collect from each student a services and activities fee. A governing
board may increase the existing fee annually, consistent with budgeting
procedures set forth in RCW 28B.15.045, by a percentage not to exceed
the annual percentage increase in student tuition fees for ((the
applicable tuition category)) resident undergraduate students:
PROVIDED, That such percentage increase shall not apply to that portion
of the services and activities fee previously committed to the
repayment of bonded debt. These rate adjustments may exceed the fiscal
growth factor. For the 2003-04 academic year, the services and
activities fee shall be based upon the resident undergraduate services
and activities fee in 2002-03. The services and activities fee
committee provided for in RCW 28B.15.045 may initiate a request to the
governing board for a fee increase.
(((5))) (3) Tuition and services and activities fees consistent
with subsection (((4))) (2) of this section shall be set by the state
board for community and technical colleges for community college summer
school students unless the community college charges fees in accordance
with RCW 28B.15.515.
(((6))) (4) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, each
governing board of a community college may charge such fees for
ungraded courses, noncredit courses, community services courses, and
self-supporting courses as it, in its discretion, may determine,
consistent with the rules of the state board for community and
technical colleges.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.15.100 and 1999 c 321 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges
shall charge to and collect from each of the students registering at
the particular institution for any quarter or semester such tuition
fees and services and activities fees, and other fees as such board
shall in its discretion determine. The total of all fees shall be
rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount: PROVIDED, That such
tuition fees ((for other than the summer term)) shall be ((in the
amounts for the respective institutions as otherwise set forth in))
established in accordance with RCW 28B.15.067.
(2) Part-time students shall be charged tuition and services and
activities fees proportionate to full-time student rates established
for residents and nonresidents: PROVIDED, That except for students
registered at community colleges, students registered for fewer than
two
credit hours shall be charged tuition and services and activities
fees at the rate established for two credit hours: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, residents of Idaho
or Oregon who are enrolled in community college district number twenty
for six or fewer credits during any quarter or semester may be exempted
from payment of all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees
differential upon a declaration by the higher education coordinating
board that it finds Washington residents from the community college
district are afforded substantially equivalent treatment by such other
states.
(3) Full-time students registered for more than eighteen credit
hours shall be charged an additional operating fee for each credit hour
in excess of eighteen hours at the applicable established per credit
hour tuition fee rate for part-time students: PROVIDED, That, subject
to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state
universities and the community colleges may exempt all or a portion of
the additional charge, for students who are registered exclusively in
first professional programs in medicine, dental medicine, veterinary
medicine, doctor of pharmacy, or law, or who are registered exclusively
in required courses in vocational preparatory programs.

--- END ---