BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.037 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2)(a) A retiree from plan 1 who has satisfied the break in
employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section and who enters
employment with an employer may continue to receive pension payments
while engaged in such service for up to ((one thousand five)) eight
hundred sixty-seven hours of service in a calendar year without a
reduction of pension.
(b)(i) A retiree from plan 1 who has been separated for at least
ninety days may:
(A) Enter employment with their former employer and continue to
receive pension payments while engaged in such service for up to one
thousand five hundred hours of service in a calendar year without a
reduction of pension;
(B) Enter employment with an employer and continue to receive
pension payments while engaged in such service for up to one thousand
five hundred hours of service in a calendar year without a reduction of
pension; and
(ii) When a plan 1 member renders service beyond eight hundred
sixty-seven hours, the department shall collect from the employer the
applicable employer retirement contributions for the entire duration of
the member's employment during that calendar year.
(((b))) (c) A retiree from plan 2 or plan 3 who has satisfied the
break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may
work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours in a calendar year in an
eligible position, as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or
41.40.010, or as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, without suspension of his or her benefit.
(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with
information relevant to the use of this section for the joint committee
on pension policy.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to be employed for more than five months in a calendar year
without a reduction of his or her pension.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Employers shall establish specific human resource policies
regarding the hiring of retirees under RCW 41.40.037(2)(b) and publish
those policies in their human resource manual and attach a document
containing those policies to each job announcement. Among those
policies shall be the requirement that final approval for hiring a
retiree under RCW 41.40.037(2)(b)(i) must come from the highest public
officer of the employer.
(2) Employers shall keep recruitment and interviewing records of
each human resource transaction in which a retiree was hired under RCW
41.40.037(2)(b). These records may be subject to audit under chapter
43.09 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.09.050 and 1992 c 118 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The auditor shall:
(1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, audit the
accounts of all collectors of the revenue and other holders of public
money required by law to pay the same into the treasury;
(2) In his or her discretion, inspect the books of any person
charged with the receipt, safekeeping, and disbursement of public
moneys;
(3) Investigate improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40
RCW;
(4) Audit human resource practices under RCW 41.40.037(2)(b);
(5) Inform the attorney general in writing of the necessity for the
attorney general to direct prosecutions in the name of the state for
all official delinquencies in relation to the assessment, collection,
and payment of the revenue, against all persons who, by any means,
become possessed of public money or property, and fail to pay over or
deliver the same, and against all debtors of the state;
(((5))) (6) Give information in writing to the legislature,
whenever required, upon any subject relating to the financial affairs
of the state, or touching any duties of his or her office;
(((6))) (7) Report to the director of financial management in
writing the names of all persons who have received any moneys belonging
to the state, and have not accounted therefor;
(((7))) (8) Authenticate with his or her official seal papers
issued from his or her office;
(((8))) (9) Make his or her official report annually on or before
the 31st of December.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state auditor has the power to examine the human resource
practices related to RCW 41.40.037(2)(b) of every local government and
its officers and employees.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The examination of the human resource practices of all local
governments shall be made at the reasonable and periodic intervals as
the state auditor determines. "Local governments" for purposes of this
act include but are not limited to all counties, cities, and other
political subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal
corporations, however denominated.
The state auditor shall establish a schedule to govern the auditing
of local governments that includes: A designation of the various
classifications of local governments; a designation of the frequency
for auditing each type of local government; and a description of events
that cause a more frequent audit to be conducted.
On every examination, inquiry shall be made as to: The human
resource practices of the local government; whether the Constitution
and laws of the state, the ordinances and orders of the local
government, and the requirements of the state auditor have been
properly complied with; and the methods and accuracy of the accounts
and reports.
A report of each examination must be made and filed in the office
of the state auditor, and one copy must be transmitted to the local
government. A copy of any report containing findings of noncompliance
with state law must be transmitted to the attorney general. If any
report discloses malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office on
the part of any public officer or employee, within thirty days from the
receipt of a copy of the report, the attorney general shall institute,
in the proper county, legal action that is proper and necessary to give
effect to the findings of the examination.
It is unlawful for any local government, or the responsible
officer, to make a settlement or compromise of any claim arising out of
malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance, or any action commenced
therefor, or for any court to enter upon any compromise or settlement
of the action, without the written approval and consent of the attorney
general and the state auditor.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act expires December 31,
2007.

--- END ---