BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A pilot program is created to study the viability and
efficiency of authorizing vehicle licensing subagents to issue renewals
for drivers' licenses. The department of licensing, in conjunction
with the title and registration advisory committee, shall administer
the pilot program. The pilot program may not exceed a two-year period
and may consist of no fewer than six and no more than eight subagents
from across the state.
(2) To the extent specific funds are appropriated for the pilot
program in this section, the department of licensing, in conjunction
with the title and registration advisory committee, must develop a
competitive selection process to authorize the subagents to participate
in the program. To the extent possible, the department of licensing
and the title and registration advisory committee must ensure that the
subagents selected represent different regions of the state in order to
provide an adequate measure of the effectiveness of this program to
better serve the citizens of the state.
(3) The department of licensing must adopt the necessary rules and
procedures to implement the pilot program.
(4) The subagents selected to participate in the pilot program may
collect a service fee in the amount provided in RCW 46.01.140(5)(b) for
issuing a driver's license renewal.
(5) In addition to any other fees required by law, persons renewing
their driver's license at a subagent participating in the pilot program
shall pay a one-dollar fee. The fee must be collected and remitted to
the state treasurer for deposit into the department of licensing
services account.
(6) The title and registration advisory committee shall present a
final report of the findings of the pilot program to the legislative
transportation committee by March 30, 2006.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2003, in the omnibus transportation budget, this act is null
and void.

--- END ---