BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.36.200 and 1984 c 7 s 202 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When construction, repair, or maintenance work is conducted on
or adjacent to a public highway, county road, street, bridge, or other
thoroughfare commonly traveled and when the work interferes with the
normal and established mode of travel on the highway, county road,
street, bridge, or thoroughfare, the location shall be properly posted
by prominently displayed signs or flagmen or both. Signs used for
posting in such an area shall be consistent with the provisions found
in the state of Washington "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices
for Streets and Highways" obtainable from the department of
transportation.
(2) If the construction, repair, or maintenance work includes or
uses grooved pavement, abrupt lane edges, steel plates, or gravel or
earth surfaces, the construction, repair, or maintenance zone must be
posted with signs stating the condition, and in addition, must warn
motorcyclists of the potential hazard. For the purposes of this
subsection, the department shall adopt by rule a uniform sign or signs
for this purpose, including at least the following language,
"MOTORCYCLES USE EXTREME CAUTION."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2003, in the omnibus transportation appropriations act, this
act is null and void.

--- END ---