BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.96.020 and 1989 c 415 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the definitions contained in RCW 46.70.011, which
are incorporated by reference into this chapter, the definitions set
forth in this section apply only for the purposes of this chapter.
(1) A "new motor vehicle" is a vehicle that has not been titled by
a state and ownership of which may be transferred on a manufacturer's
statement of origin (MSO).
(2) "New motor vehicle dealer" means a motor vehicle dealer engaged
in the business of buying, selling, exchanging, or otherwise dealing in
new motor vehicles or new and used motor vehicles at an established
place of business, under a franchise, sales and service agreement, or
contract with the manufacturer of the new motor vehicles. However, the
term "new motor vehicle dealer" does not include a miscellaneous
vehicle dealer as defined in RCW 46.70.011(3)(c) or a motorcycle dealer
as defined in chapter 46.94 RCW.
(3) "Franchise" means one or more agreements, whether oral or
written, between a manufacturer and a new motor vehicle dealer, under
which the new motor vehicle dealer is authorized to sell, service, and
repair new motor vehicles, parts, and accessories under a common name,
trade name, trademark, or service mark of the manufacturer.
"Franchise" includes an oral or written contract and includes a
dealer agreement, either expressed or implied, between a manufacturer
and a new motor vehicle dealer that purports to fix the legal rights
and liabilities between the parties and under which (a) the dealer is
granted the right to purchase and resell motor vehicles manufactured,
distributed, or imported by the manufacturer; (b) the dealer's business
is associated with the trademark, trade name, commercial symbol, or
advertisement designating the franchisor or the products distributed by
the manufacturer; and (c) the dealer's business relies on the
manufacturer for a continued supply of motor vehicles, parts, and
accessories.
(4) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and fair dealing in the
trade as defined and interpreted in RCW 62A.2-103.
(5) "Designated successor" means:
(a) The spouse, biological or adopted child, stepchild, grandchild,
parent, brother, or sister of the owner of a new motor vehicle
dealership who, in the case of the owner's death, is entitled to
inherit the ownership interest in the new motor vehicle dealership
under the terms of the owner's will or similar document, and if there
is no such will or similar document, then under applicable intestate
laws;
(b) A qualified person experienced in the business of a new motor
vehicle dealer who has been nominated by the owner of a new motor
vehicle dealership as the successor in a written, notarized, and
witnessed instrument submitted to the manufacturer; or
(c) In the case of an incapacitated owner of a new motor vehicle
dealership, the person who has been appointed by a court as the legal
representative of the incapacitated owner's property.
(6) "Owner" means a person holding an ownership interest in the
business entity operating as a new motor vehicle dealer and who is the
designated dealer in the new motor vehicle franchise agreement.
(7) "Person" means every natural person, partnership, corporation,
association, trust, estate, or any other legal entity.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.96.105 and 1998 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each manufacturer shall specify in its franchise agreement, or
in a separate written agreement, with each of its dealers licensed in
this state, the dealer's obligation to perform warranty work or service
on the manufacturer's products. Each manufacturer shall provide each
of its dealers with a schedule of compensation to be paid to the dealer
for any warranty work or service, including parts, labor, and
diagnostic work, required of the dealer by the manufacturer in
connection with the manufacturer's products.
(2) All claims for warranty work for parts and labor made by
dealers under this section shall be submitted to the manufacturer
within one year of the date the work was performed. All claims
submitted must be paid by the manufacturer within thirty days following
receipt, provided the claim has been approved by the manufacturer. The
manufacturer has the right to audit claims for warranty work and to
charge the dealer for any unsubstantiated, incorrect, or false claims
for a period of one year following payment. However, the manufacturer
may audit and charge the dealer for any fraudulent claims during any
period for which an action for fraud may be commenced under applicable
state law.
(3) All claims submitted by dealers on the forms and in the manner
specified by the manufacturer shall be either approved or disapproved
within thirty days following their receipt. The manufacturer shall
notify the dealer in writing of any disapproved claim, and shall set
forth the reasons why the claim was not approved. Any claim not
specifically disapproved in writing within thirty days following
receipt is approved, and the manufacturer is required to pay that claim
within thirty days of receipt of the claim.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.96.185 and 2000 c 203 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise agreement, a
manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative,
or an agent, officer, parent company, wholly or partially owned
subsidiary, affiliated entity, or other person controlled by or under
common control with a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, shall not:
(a) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by selling or
offering to sell a like vehicle to one dealer at a lower actual price
than the actual price offered to another dealer for the same model
similarly equipped;
(b) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by selling or
offering to sell parts or accessories to one dealer at a lower actual
price than the actual price offered to another dealer;
(c) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by using a
promotion plan, marketing plan, or other similar device that results in
a lower actual price on vehicles, parts, or accessories being charged
to one dealer over another dealer;
(d) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by adopting a
method, or changing an existing method, for the allocation, scheduling,
or delivery of new motor vehicles, parts, or accessories to its dealers
that is not fair, reasonable, and equitable. Upon the request of a
dealer, a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative shall disclose in writing to the dealer the method by
which new motor vehicles, parts, and accessories are allocated,
scheduled, or delivered to its dealers handling the same line or make
of vehicles;
(e) Give preferential treatment to some new motor vehicle dealers
over others by refusing or failing to deliver, in reasonable quantities
and within a reasonable time after receipt of an order, to a dealer
holding a franchise for a line or make of motor vehicles sold or
distributed by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, a new vehicle, parts, or accessories, if the
vehicle, parts, or accessories are being delivered to other dealers, or
require a dealer to purchase unreasonable advertising displays or other
materials, or unreasonably require a dealer to remodel or renovate
existing facilities as a prerequisite to receiving a model or series of
vehicles;
(f) Compete with a new motor vehicle dealer by acting in the
capacity of a new motor vehicle dealer, or by owning, operating, or
controlling, whether directly or indirectly, a motor vehicle dealership
in this state. It is not, however, a violation of this subsection for:
(i) A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative to own or operate a dealership for a temporary period,
not to exceed two years, during the transition from one owner of the
dealership to another where the dealership was previously owned by a
franchised dealer and is currently for sale to any qualified
independent person at a fair and reasonable price. The temporary
operation may be extended for one twelve-month period on petition of
the temporary operator to the department. The matter will be handled
as an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. A dealer who is
a franchisee of the petitioning manufacturer or distributor may
intervene and participate in a proceeding under this subsection
(1)(f)(i). The temporary operator has the burden of proof to show
justification for the extension and a good faith effort to sell the
dealership to an independent person at a fair and reasonable price;
(ii) A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative to own or operate a dealership in conjunction with an
independent person in a bona fide business relationship for the purpose
of broadening the diversity of its dealer body and enhancing
opportunities for qualified persons who are part of a group who have
historically been underrepresented in its dealer body, or other
qualified persons who lack the resources to purchase a dealership
outright, and where the independent person: (A) Has made, or within a
period of two years from the date of commencement of operation will
have made, a significant, bona fide capital investment in the
dealership that is subject to loss; (B) has an ownership interest in
the dealership; and (C) operates the dealership under a bona fide
written agreement with the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch,
or factory representative under which he or she will acquire all of the
ownership interest in the dealership within a reasonable period of time
and under reasonable terms and conditions. The manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative has the burden
of proof of establishing that the acquisition of the dealership by the
independent person was made within a reasonable period of time and
under reasonable terms and conditions. Nothing in this subsection
(1)(f)(ii) relieves a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative from complying with RCW 46.96.185(1) (a) through
(e);
(iii) A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative to own or operate a dealership in conjunction with an
independent person in a bona fide business relationship where the
independent person: (A) Has made, or within a period of two years from
the date of commencement of operation will have made, a significant,
bona fide capital investment in the dealership that is subject to loss;
(B) has an ownership interest in the dealership; and (C) operates the
dealership under a bona fide written agreement with the manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative under which he
or she will acquire all of the ownership interest in the dealership
within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions. The manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative has the burden of proof of establishing that the
acquisition of the dealership by the independent person was made within
a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and conditions.
The number of dealerships operated under this subsection (1)(f)(iii)
may not exceed four percent rounded up to the nearest whole number of
a manufacturer's total of new motor vehicle dealer franchises in this
state. Nothing in this subsection (1)(f)(iii) relieves a manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative from complying
with RCW 46.96.185(1) (a) through (e);
(iv) A truck manufacturer to own, operate, or control a new motor
vehicle dealership that sells only trucks of that manufacturer's line
make with a gross vehicle weight rating of 12,500 pounds or more, and
the truck manufacturer has been continuously engaged in the retail sale
of the trucks at least since January 1, 1993; or
(v) A manufacturer to own, operate, or control a new motor vehicle
dealership trading exclusively in a single line make of the
manufacturer if (A) the manufacturer does not own, directly or
indirectly, in the aggregate, in excess of forty-five percent of the
total ownership interest in the dealership, (B) at the time the
manufacturer first acquires ownership or assumes operation or control
of any such dealership, the distance between any dealership thus owned,
operated, or controlled and the nearest new motor vehicle dealership
trading in the same line make of vehicle and in which the manufacturer
has no ownership or control is not less than fifteen miles and complies
with the applicable provisions in the relevant market area sections of
this chapter, (C) all of the manufacturer's franchise agreements confer
rights on the dealer of that line make to develop and operate within a
defined geographic territory or area, as many dealership facilities as
the dealer and the manufacturer agree are appropriate, and (D) as of
January 1, 2000, the manufacturer had no more than four new motor
vehicle dealers of that manufacturer's line make in this state, and at
least half of those dealers owned and operated two or more dealership
facilities in the geographic territory or area covered by their
franchise agreements with the manufacturer;
(g) Compete with a new motor vehicle dealer by owning, operating,
or controlling, whether directly or indirectly, a service facility in
this state for the repair or maintenance of motor vehicles under the
manufacturer's new car warranty and extended warranty. Nothing in this
subsection (1)(g), however, prohibits a manufacturer, distributor,
factory branch, or factory representative from owning or operating a
service facility for the purpose of providing or performing
maintenance, repair, or service work on motor vehicles that are owned
by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative;
(h) Use confidential or proprietary information obtained from a new
motor vehicle dealer to unfairly compete with the dealer. For purposes
of this subsection (1)(h), "confidential or proprietary information"
means trade secrets as defined in RCW 19.108.010, business plans,
marketing plans or strategies, customer lists, contracts, sales data,
revenues, or other financial information;
(i) Terminate, cancel, or fail to renew a franchise with a new
motor vehicle dealer based upon any of the following events, which do
not constitute good cause for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal
under RCW 46.96.060: (A) The fact that the new motor vehicle dealer
owns, has an investment in, participates in the management of, or holds
a franchise agreement for the sale or service of another make or line
of new motor vehicles, or (B) the fact that the new motor vehicle
dealer has established another make or line of new motor vehicles or
service in the same dealership facilities as those of the manufacturer
or distributor with the prior written approval of the manufacturer or
distributor, if the approval was required under the terms of the new
motor vehicle dealer's franchise agreement; or
(j) Coerce or attempt to coerce a motor vehicle dealer to refrain
from, or prohibit or attempt to prohibit a new motor vehicle dealer
from acquiring, owning, having an investment in, participating in the
management of, or holding a franchise agreement for the sale or service
of another make or line of new motor vehicles or related products, or
establishing another make or line of new motor vehicles or service in
the same dealership facilities, if the prohibition against acquiring,
owning, investing, managing, or holding a franchise for such additional
make or line of vehicles or products, or establishing another make or
line of new motor vehicles or service in the same dealership
facilities, is not supported by reasonable business considerations,
including but not limited to capitalization requirements, sales and
service facilities, personnel, market share, return on investment,
minimizing the likelihood of brand confusion, and dealer compliance
with the performance standards required under the terms of the dealer's
franchise agreement. The burden of proving that reasonable business
considerations support or justify the prohibition against the
additional make or line of new motor vehicles or products or
nonexclusive facilities is on the manufacturer.
(2) Subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section do not apply to
sales to a motor vehicle dealer: (a) For resale to a federal, state,
or local government agency; (b) where the vehicles will be sold or
donated for use in a program of driver's education; (c) where the sale
is made under a manufacturer's bona fide promotional program offering
sales incentives or rebates; (d) where the sale of parts or accessories
is under a manufacturer's bona fide quantity discount program; or (e)
where the sale is made under a manufacturer's bona fide fleet vehicle
discount program. For purposes of this subsection, "fleet" means a
group of fifteen or more new motor vehicles purchased or leased by a
dealer at one time under a single purchase or lease agreement for use
as part of a fleet, and where the dealer has been assigned a fleet
identifier code by the department of licensing.
(3) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Actual price" means the price to be paid by the dealer less
any incentive paid by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, whether paid to the dealer or the ultimate
purchaser of the vehicle.
(b) "Control" or "controlling" means (i) the possession of, title
to, or control of ten percent or more of the voting equity interest in
a person, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or
other intermediary, or (ii) the possession, direct or indirect, of the
power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of
a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, through
director control, by contract, or otherwise, except as expressly
provided under the franchise agreement.
(c) "Motor vehicles" does not include trucks that are 14,001 pounds
gross vehicle weight and above or recreational vehicles as defined in
RCW 43.22.335.
(d) "Operate" means to manage a dealership, whether directly or
indirectly.
(e) "Own" or "ownership" means to hold the beneficial ownership of
one percent or more of any class of equity interest in a dealership,
whether the interest is that of a shareholder, partner, limited
liability company member, or otherwise. To hold an ownership interest
means to have possession of, title to, or control of the ownership
interest, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or
other intermediary.
(4) A violation of this section is deemed to affect the public
interest and constitutes an unlawful and unfair practice under chapter
19.86 RCW. A person aggrieved by an alleged violation of this section
may petition the department to have the matter handled as an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.96 RCW
to read as follows:
Right of First Refusal. (1) In the event of a proposed sale or
transfer of a new motor vehicle dealership involving the transfer or
sale of more than fifty percent of the ownership interest in, or more
than fifty percent of the assets of, the dealership at the time of the
transfer or sale, where the franchise agreement for the dealership
contains a right of first refusal in favor of the manufacturer or
distributor, then notwithstanding the terms of the franchise agreement,
the manufacturer or distributor must be permitted to exercise a right
of first refusal to acquire the dealership only if all of the following
requirements are met:
(a) The manufacturer or distributor sends by certified mail, return
receipt requested, or delivers by personal service, notice of its
intent to exercise its right of first refusal within the lesser of (i)
forty-five days of receipt of the completed proposal for the proposed
sale or transfer, or (ii) the time period specified in the dealership's
franchise agreement; and
(b) The exercise of the right of first refusal will result in the
motor vehicle dealer receiving consideration, terms, and conditions
that are equal to or better than that for which the dealer has
contracted in connection with the proposed transaction.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the
manufacturer's or distributor's right of first refusal does not apply
to transfer of a dealership under RCW 46.96.110, and does not apply to
a proposed transaction involving any of the following purchasers or
transferees:
(a) A purchaser or transferee who has been preapproved by the
manufacturer or distributor with respect to the transaction;
(b) A family member or members, including the spouse, biological or
adopted child, stepchild, grandchild, spouse of a child or grandchild,
brother, sister, or parent of the dealer-operator, or one or more of
the dealership's owners;
(c) A manager continuously employed by the motor vehicle dealer in
the dealership during the previous three years who is otherwise
qualified as a dealer-operator by meeting the reasonable and uniformly
applied standards for approval of an application as a new motor vehicle
dealer-operator by the manufacturer;
(d) A partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other
entity controlled by any of the family members, identified in (b) of
this subsection, of the dealer-operator; or
(e) A trust established or to be established for the purpose of
allowing the new motor vehicle dealer to continue to qualify as such
under the manufacturer's or distributor's standards, or provides for
the succession of the franchise agreement to designated family members
identified in (b) of this subsection, or qualified management
identified in (c) of this subsection, in the event of the death or
incapacity of the dealer-operator or its principal owner or owners.
(3) As a condition to the manufacturer or distributor exercising
its right of first refusal, the manufacturer or distributor shall pay
the reasonable expenses, including attorneys' fees, incurred by the
dealer's proposed purchaser or transferee in negotiating, and
undertaking any action to consummate, the contract for the proposed
sale of the dealership up to the time of the manufacturer's or
distributor's exercise of that right. In addition, the manufacturer or
distributor shall pay any fees and expenses of the motor vehicle dealer
arising on and after the date the manufacturer or distributor gives
notice of the exercise of its right of first refusal, and incurred by
the motor vehicle dealer as a result of alterations to documents, or
additional appraisals, valuations, or financial analyses caused or
required of the dealer by the manufacturer or distributor to consummate
the contract for the sale of the dealership to the manufacturer's or
distributor's proposed transferee, that would not have been incurred
but for the manufacturer's or distributor's exercise of its right of
first refusal. These expenses and fees must be paid by the
manufacturer or distributor to the dealer and to the dealer's proposed
purchaser or transferee on or before the closing date of the sale of
the dealership to the manufacturer or distributor if the party entitled
to reimbursement has submitted or caused to be submitted to the
manufacturer or distributor, an accounting of these expenses and fees
within thirty days after receipt of the manufacturer's or distributor's
written request for the accounting. A manufacturer or distributor may
request the accounting before exercising its right of first refusal.
(4) As a further condition to the exercise of its right of first
refusal, a manufacturer or distributor shall assume and guarantee the
lease or shall acquire the real property on which the motor vehicle
franchise is conducted. Unless otherwise agreed to by the dealer and
manufacturer or distributor, the lease terms or the real property
acquisition terms must be the same as those on which the lease or
property was to be transferred or sold to the dealer's proposed
purchaser or transferee.
(5) If the selling dealer has disclosed to the proposed purchaser
or transferee, in writing, the existence of the manufacturer's or
distributor's right of first refusal, then the selling dealer has no
liability to the proposed purchaser or transferee for a claim for
damages resulting from the manufacturer or distributor exercising its
right of first refusal. If the existence of the manufacturer's or
distributor's right of first refusal was disclosed by the selling
dealer to the proposed purchaser or transferee, in writing, before or
at the time of execution of the purchase and sale or transfer
agreement, the manufacturer or distributor shall indemnify, hold
harmless, and defend the selling dealer from and against any and all
claims, damages, losses, actions, or causes of action asserted by the
dealer's proposed purchaser or transferee against the selling dealer
arising from the manufacturer's or distributor's exercise of its right
of first refusal, and has the right, under this section, to file a
motion on behalf of the dealer to dismiss the actions or causes of
action asserted by the dealer's proposed purchaser or transferee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.96 RCW
to read as follows:
Manufacturer Incentive Programs. (1) A manufacturer or distributor
shall pay a motor vehicle dealer's claim for payment or other
compensation due under a manufacturer incentive program within thirty
days after approval of the claim. A claim that is not disapproved or
disallowed within thirty days after the manufacturer or distributor
receives the claim is deemed automatically approved. If the motor
vehicle dealer's claim is not approved, the manufacturer or distributor
shall provide the dealer with written notice of the reasons for the
disapproval at the time notice of disapproval is given.
(2) A manufacturer may not deny a claim based solely on a motor
vehicle dealer's incidental failure to comply with a specific claim-processing requirement that results in a clerical error or other
administrative technicality.
(3) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise agreement or other
contract with a manufacturer or distributor, a motor vehicle dealer has
one year after the expiration of a manufacturer or distributor
incentive program to submit a claim for payment or compensation under
the program.
(4) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise agreement or other
contract with a dealer and except as provided in subsection (5) of this
section, after the expiration of one year after the date of payment of
a claim under a manufacturer or distributor incentive program, a
manufacturer or distributor may not:
(a) Charge back to a motor vehicle dealer, whether directly or
indirectly, the amount of a claim that has been approved and paid by
the manufacturer or distributor under an incentive program;
(b) Charge back to a motor vehicle dealer, whether directly or
indirectly, the cash value of a prize or other thing of value awarded
to the dealer under an incentive program; or
(c) Audit the records of a motor vehicle dealer to determine
compliance with the terms of an incentive program. Where, however, a
manufacturer or distributor has reasonable grounds to believe that the
dealer committed fraud with respect to the incentive program, the
manufacturer or distributor may audit the dealer for a fraudulent claim
during any period for which an action for fraud may be commenced under
applicable state law.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(a) and (b) of this section, a
manufacturer or distributor may make charge-backs to a motor vehicle
dealer if, after completion of an audit of the dealer's records, the
manufacturer or distributor can show, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that (a) the claim was intentionally false or fraudulent at
the time it was submitted to the manufacturer or distributor, or (b)
with respect to a claim under a service incentive program, the repair
work was improperly performed in a substandard manner or was
unnecessary to correct a defective condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 46.96 RCW
to read as follows:
Venue. Notwithstanding the provisions of a franchise agreement or
other provision of law to the contrary, the venue for a cause of
action, claim, lawsuit, administrative hearing or proceeding,
arbitration, or mediation, whether arising under this chapter or
otherwise, in which the parties or litigants are a manufacturer or
distributor and one or more motor vehicle dealers, is the state of
Washington. It is the public policy of this state that venue provided
for in this section may not be modified or waived in any contract or
other agreement, and any provision contained in a franchise agreement
that requires arbitration or litigation to be conducted outside the
state of Washington is void and unenforceable.
This section does not apply to a voluntary dispute resolution
procedure that is not binding on the dealer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Captions used in this act are not part of
the law.

--- END ---