BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.381 and 2002 c 175 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall grant special parking privileges to any
person who has a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk
and meets one of the following criteria, as determined by a licensed
physician or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW:
(a) Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest;
(b) Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic,
neurological, or orthopedic condition;
(c) Is so severely disabled, that the person cannot walk without
the use of or assistance from a brace, cane, another person, prosthetic
device, wheelchair, or other assistive device;
(d) Uses portable oxygen;
(e) Is restricted by lung disease to such an extent that forced
expiratory respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry is less than
one liter per second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty
mm/hg on room air at rest;
(f) Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to
the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified as
class III or IV under standards accepted by the American Heart
Association; or
(g) Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to
automobile emissions which limits or impairs the ability to walk. The
personal physician of the applicant shall document that the disability
is comparable in severity to the others listed in this subsection.
(2) The applications for disabled parking permits and temporary
disabled parking permits are official state documents. Knowingly
providing false information in conjunction with the application is a
gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. The following
statement must appear on each application form immediately below the
physician's signature and immediately below the applicant's signature:
"A disabled parking permit may be issued only for a medical necessity
that severely affects mobility (RCW 46.16.381). Knowingly providing
false information on this application is a gross misdemeanor. The
penalty is up to one year in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both."
(3) Persons who qualify for special parking privileges are entitled
to receive from the department of licensing a removable windshield
placard bearing the international symbol of access and an individual
serial number, along with a special identification card bearing the
name and date of birth of the person to whom the placard is issued, and
the placard's serial number. The special identification card shall be
issued no later than January 1, 2000, to all persons who are issued
parking placards, including those issued for temporary disabilities,
and special disabled parking license plates. The department shall
design the placard to be displayed when the vehicle is parked by
suspending it from the rearview mirror, or in the absence of a rearview
mirror the card may be displayed on the dashboard of any vehicle used
to transport the disabled person. Instead of regular motor vehicle
license plates, disabled persons are entitled to receive special
license plates bearing the international symbol of access for one
vehicle registered in the disabled person's name. Disabled persons who
are not issued the special license plates are entitled to receive a
second special placard upon submitting a written request to the
department. Persons who have been issued the parking privileges and
who are using a vehicle or are riding in a vehicle displaying the
special license plates or placard may park in places reserved for
mobility disabled persons. The director shall adopt rules providing
for the issuance of special placards and license plates to public
transportation authorities, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW, boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, senior citizen
centers, private nonprofit agencies as defined in chapter 24.03 RCW,
and vehicles registered with the department as cabulances that
regularly transport disabled persons who have been determined eligible
for special parking privileges provided under this section. The
director may issue special license plates for a vehicle registered in
the name of the public transportation authority, nursing home, boarding
homes, senior citizen center, private nonprofit agency, or cabulance
service if the vehicle is primarily used to transport persons with
disabilities described in this section. Public transportation
authorities, nursing homes, boarding homes, senior citizen centers,
private nonprofit agencies, and cabulance services are responsible for
insuring that the special placards and license plates are not used
improperly and are responsible for all fines and penalties for improper
use.
(4) Whenever the disabled person transfers or assigns his or her
interest in the vehicle, the special license plates shall be removed
from the motor vehicle. If another vehicle is acquired by the disabled
person and the vehicle owner qualifies for a special plate, the plate
shall be attached to the vehicle, and the director shall be immediately
notified of the transfer of the plate. If another vehicle is not
acquired by the disabled person, the removed plate shall be immediately
surrendered to the director.
(5) The special license plate shall be renewed in the same manner
and at the time required for the renewal of regular motor vehicle
license plates under this chapter. No special license plate may be
issued to a person who is temporarily disabled. A person who has a
condition expected to improve within six months may be issued a
temporary placard for a period not to exceed six months. If the
condition exists after six months a new temporary placard shall be
issued upon receipt of a new certification from the disabled person's
physician. The permanent parking placard and identification card of a
disabled person shall be renewed at least every five years, as required
by the director, by satisfactory proof of the right to continued use of
the privileges. In the event of the permit holder's death, the parking
placard and identification card must be immediately surrendered to the
department. The department shall match and purge its disabled permit
data base with available death record information at least every twelve
months.
(6) Each person who has been issued a permanent disabled parking
permit on or before July 1, 1998, must renew the permit no later than
July 1, 2003, subject to a schedule to be set by the department, or the
permit will expire.
(7) Additional fees shall not be charged for the issuance of the
special placards or the identification cards. No additional fee may be
charged for the issuance of the special license plates except the
regular motor vehicle registration fee and any other fees and taxes
required to be paid upon registration of a motor vehicle.
(8) Any unauthorized use of the special placard, special license
plate, or identification card is a traffic infraction with a monetary
penalty of two hundred fifty dollars.
(9) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars for a person to make inaccessible the access
aisle located next to a space reserved for physically disabled persons.
The clerk of the court shall report all violations related to this
subsection to the department.
(10) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars for any person to park a vehicle in a parking
place provided on private property without charge or on public property
reserved for physically disabled persons without a special license
plate or placard. If a person is charged with a violation, the person
shall not be determined to have committed an infraction if the person
produces in court or before the court appearance the special license
plate or placard required under this section. A local jurisdiction
providing nonmetered, on-street parking places reserved for physically
disabled persons may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less
than four hours on the use of these parking places. A local
jurisdiction may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less than
four hours on the use of nonreserved, on-street parking spaces by
vehicles displaying the special parking placards. All time
restrictions must be clearly posted.
(11) The penalties imposed under subsections (9) and (10) of this
section shall be used by that local jurisdiction exclusively for law
enforcement. The court may also impose an additional penalty
sufficient to reimburse the local jurisdiction for any costs it may
have incurred in removal and storage of the improperly parked vehicle.
(12) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, it is a
traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars
for any person willfully to obtain a special license plate, placard, or
identification card in a manner other than that established under this
section.
(13)(a) A law enforcement agency authorized to enforce parking laws
may appoint volunteers, with a limited commission, to issue notices of
infractions for violations of this section or RCW 46.61.581.
Volunteers must be at least twenty-one years of age. The law
enforcement agency appointing volunteers may establish any other
qualifications the agency deems desirable.
(b) An agency appointing volunteers under this section must provide
training to the volunteers before authorizing them to issue notices of
infractions.
(c) A notice of infraction issued by a volunteer appointed under
this subsection has the same force and effect as a notice of infraction
issued by a police officer for the same offense.
(d) A police officer or a volunteer may request a person to show
the person's identification card or special parking placard when
investigating the possibility of a violation of this section. If the
request is refused, the person in charge of the vehicle may be issued
a notice of infraction for a violation of this section.
(14) For second or subsequent violations of this section, in
addition to a monetary fine, the violator must complete a minimum of
forty hours of:
(a) Community restitution for a nonprofit organization that serves
the disabled community or persons having disabling diseases; or
(b) Any other community restitution that may sensitize the violator
to the needs and obstacles faced by persons who have disabilities.
(15) The court may not suspend more than one-half of any fine
imposed under subsection (8), (9), (10), or (12) of this section.

--- END ---