BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.225 RCW
to read as follows:
A person licensed under this chapter shall not disclose the written
acknowledgment of the disclosure statement pursuant to RCW 18.225.100,
nor any information acquired from persons consulting the individual in
a professional capacity when the information was necessary to enable
the individual to render professional services to those persons except:
(1) With the written authorization of that person or, in the case
of death or disability, the person's personal representative;
(2) If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against
the person licensed under this chapter;
(3) In response to a subpoena from the secretary. The secretary
may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under RCW
18.130.050; or
(4) As mandatory reporting under chapter 26.44 or 74.34 RCW or RCW
71.05.250, or as permissive disclosure under RCW 70.02.050.

--- END ---