BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Cities, code cities, and towns may not impose a business and
occupation tax measured by "gross proceeds of sales," "gross income of
the business," or "value proceeding or accruing," as those terms are
used in chapter 82.04 RCW, on the activity of creating intellectual
property unless the city, code city, or town imposed such a tax on
January 1, 2002. Effective January 1, 2004, all cities, code cities,
and towns are prohibited from imposing a tax measured by "gross
proceeds of sales," "gross income of the business," or "value
proceeding or accruing," as those terms are used in chapter 82.04 RCW,
upon any intellectual property creating activity as a taxable incident.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature in enacting this section to
distinguish between nontaxable activity undertaken by a business for
which the business receives no gross income in the form of payments,
contract amounts, fees, or other income, and taxable activity for which
the business receives gross income from goods or services that it has
sold or receives royalty income which may be taxed only in the city,
code city, or town in which the business is domiciled.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Domicile" means the principal place from which the trade or
business of the taxpayer is directed or managed;
(b) "Intellectual property creating activity" means research,
development, authorship, creation, or general or specific inventive
activity without regard to whether the intellectual property creating
activity actually results in the creation of patents, trademarks, trade
secrets, subject matter subject to copyright, or other intellectual
property.

--- END ---