BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the use of motor vehicles has a
significant impact on the air quality of the state of Washington.
Motor vehicle emissions account for more than half of all air
pollutants, almost sixty percent of total carbon dioxide emissions, and
a significant portion of toxic contaminants in Washington state. These
emissions result in deteriorating air quality, with additional negative
impacts on the environment and public health. The legislature further
recognizes that motor vehicles account for the largest percentage of
oil consumption in the United States, exposing Washington state
businesses and citizens to an uncertain and volatile global petroleum
market. The legislature finds it is important to begin addressing
these negative impacts of gasoline and diesel-powered vehicles.
Addressing the impacts of motor vehicles is further necessitated by the
expected increases in population and vehicle miles traveled in the
state. To make net progress in improving air quality, reducing the
threat of climate change, protecting public health and the environment,
and improving energy security, the legislature finds it is necessary to
encourage the use of clean alternative fuel vehicles.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.94.030 and 1993 c 252 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings:
(1) "Air contaminant" means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other
particulate matter, vapor, gas, odorous substance, or any combination
thereof.
(2) "Air pollution" is presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or
more air contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such
characteristics and duration as is, or is likely to be, injurious to
human health, plant or animal life, or property, or which unreasonably
interfere with enjoyment of life and property. For the purpose of this
chapter, air pollution shall not include air contaminants emitted in
compliance with chapter 17.21 RCW.
(3) "Air quality standard" means an established concentration,
exposure time, and frequency of occurrence of an air contaminant or
multiple contaminants in the ambient air which shall not be exceeded.
(4) "Ambient air" means the surrounding outside air.
(5) "Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or
more counties.
(6) "Best available control technology" (BACT) means an emission
limitation based on the maximum degree of reduction for each air
pollutant subject to regulation under this chapter emitted from or that
results from any new or modified stationary source, that the permitting
authority, on a case-by-case basis, taking into account energy,
environmental, and economic impacts and other costs, determines is
achievable for such a source or modification through application of
production processes and available methods, systems, and techniques,
including fuel cleaning, clean fuels, or treatment or innovative fuel
combustion techniques for control of each such a pollutant. In no
event shall application of "best available control technology" result
in emissions of any pollutants that will exceed the emissions allowed
by any applicable standard under 40 C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they
exist on July 25, 1993, or their later enactments as adopted by
reference by the director by rule. Emissions from any source utilizing
clean fuels, or any other means, to comply with this subsection shall
not be allowed to increase above levels that would have been required
under the definition of BACT as it existed prior to enactment of the
(([federal])) federal clean air act amendments of 1990.
(7) "Best available retrofit technology" (BART) means an emission
limitation based on the degree of reduction achievable through the
application of the best system of continuous emission reduction for
each pollutant that is emitted by an existing stationary facility. The
emission limitation must be established, on a case-by-case basis,
taking into consideration the technology available, the costs of
compliance, the energy and nonair quality environmental impacts of
compliance, any pollution control equipment in use or in existence at
the source, the remaining useful life of the source, and the degree of
improvement in visibility that might reasonably be anticipated to
result from the use of the technology.
(8) "Board" means the board of directors of an authority.
(9)(a) "Clean alternative fuel vehicle" means a motor vehicle, as
defined in RCW 46.04.320, originally designed and equipped by the
manufacturer to operate: (i) Exclusively on natural gas, liquefied
petroleum gas, hydrogen, or electricity; (ii) as a fuel cell vehicle;
or (iii) as a hybrid vehicle. Hybrid vehicles rated at or below eight
thousand five hundred pounds gross vehicle weight rating must have an
average estimated fuel economy rating, as determined by the
environmental protection agency, of at least forty miles per gallon.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, (i) "fuel cell vehicle" is
defined as a vehicle that operates on an electric motor drawing current
from combining hydrogen and oxygen in an electrochemical process; and
(ii) "hybrid vehicle" means a vehicle that draws propulsion energy from
both an internal combustion or heat engine and an onboard rechargeable
energy storage device or similar system and employs a vehicle braking
system that recovers waste energy to charge an onboard energy storage
device or any other vehicle that is defined as a hybrid vehicle in
regulations prescribed by the secretary of energy for the
administration of title III of the energy policy act of 1992.
(10) "Control officer" means the air pollution control officer of
any authority.
(((10))) (11) "Department" or "ecology" means the department of
ecology.
(((11))) (12) "Emission" means a release of air contaminants into
the ambient air.
(((12))) (13) "Emission standard" and "emission limitation" mean a
requirement established under the federal clean air act or this chapter
that limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air
contaminants on a continuous basis, including any requirement relating
to the operation or maintenance of a source to assure continuous
emission reduction, and any design, equipment, work practice, or
operational standard adopted under the federal clean air act or this
chapter.
(((13))) (14) "Lowest achievable emission rate" (LAER) means for
any source that rate of emissions that reflects:
(a) The most stringent emission limitation that is contained in the
implementation plan of any state for such class or category of source,
unless the owner or operator of the proposed source demonstrates that
such limitations are not achievable; or
(b) The most stringent emission limitation that is achieved in
practice by such class or category of source, whichever is more
stringent.
In no event shall the application of this term permit a proposed
new or modified source to emit any pollutant in excess of the amount
allowable under applicable new source performance standards.
(((14))) (15) "Modification" means any physical change in, or
change in the method of operation of, a stationary source that
increases the amount of any air contaminant emitted by such source or
that results in the emission of any air contaminant not previously
emitted. The term modification shall be construed consistent with the
definition of modification in Section 7411, Title 42, United States
Code, and with rules implementing that section.
(((15))) (16) "Multicounty authority" means an authority which
consists of two or more counties.
(((16))) (17) "New source" means (a) the construction or
modification of a stationary source that increases the amount of any
air contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the emission
of any air contaminant not previously emitted, and (b) any other
project that constitutes a new source under the federal clean air act.
(((17))) (18) "Permit program source" means a source required to
apply for or to maintain an operating permit under RCW 70.94.161.
(((18))) (19) "Person" means an individual, firm, public or private
corporation, association, partnership, political subdivision of the
state, municipality, or governmental agency.
(((19))) (20) "Reasonably available control technology" (RACT)
means the lowest emission limit that a particular source or source
category is capable of meeting by the application of control technology
that is reasonably available considering technological and economic
feasibility. RACT is determined on a case-by-case basis for an
individual source or source category taking into account the impact of
the source upon air quality, the availability of additional controls,
the emission reduction to be achieved by additional controls, the
impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT requirements for a
source or source category shall be adopted only after notice and
opportunity for comment are afforded.
(((20))) (21) "Silvicultural burning" means burning of wood fiber
on forest land consistent with the provisions of RCW 70.94.660.
(((21))) (22) "Source" means all of the emissions units including
quantifiable fugitive emissions, that are located on one or more
contiguous or adjacent properties, and are under the control of the
same person, or persons under common control, whose activities are
ancillary to the production of a single product or functionally related
group of products.
(((22))) (23) "Stationary source" means any building, structure,
facility, or installation that emits or may emit any air contaminant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons who are taxable under this chapter may take a credit
for the purchase, or the lease for a period of at least three years, of
new clean alternative fuel vehicles as defined in RCW 70.94.030, if the
vehicles are exclusively used in business operations. The credit is
based upon the following schedule:

VEHICLE TONNAGE CREDIT

Less than 10,000 pounds
gross vehicle weight 30 percent of the cost or
$5,000, whichever is less

10,000 pounds or more
gross vehicle weight 30 percent of the cost or
$25,000, whichever is
less

(2) The credit may not exceed the amount of tax that would
otherwise be due under this chapter. The credit may be accrued and
carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be granted in place
of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section that may
be claimed, by each person, for any calendar year shall not exceed two
hundred thousand dollars.
(3) Tax credit may not be claimed for expenditures that occurred
before the effective date of this section or expenditures that occur
after the date specified in section 5 of this act.
(4) The tax credit for hybrid vehicles at or below eight thousand
five hundred pounds gross vehicle weight rating defined under RCW
70.94.030(9) expires June 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons who are taxable under this chapter may take a credit
for the costs expended for acquiring and installing alternative fuel
equipment and electric vehicle recharging equipment, including
alternative fuel storage tanks.
(2) For the purposes of this section, (a) "alternative fuel" means
natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas, hydrogen, fuel containing a
minimum of eighty-five percent ethanol, and fuel containing a minimum
of twenty percent biodiesel; and (b) "biodiesel" means a fuel as
defined in ASTM Standard D6751.
(3) The credit is based upon the following schedule:
(a) Fifty percent of the costs incurred at facilities open to the
public not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars; and
(b) Twenty-five percent of the costs incurred at facilities not
open to the public not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars.
(4) The credit may not exceed the amount of tax that would
otherwise be due under this chapter. The credit may be accrued and
carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be granted in place
of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section that may
be claimed by each person for any calendar year shall not exceed one
million dollars.
(5) Tax credit may not be claimed for expenditures that occurred
before the effective date of this section or expenditures that occur
after the date specified in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Sections 3 and 4 of this act expire December 31, 2012, and credits
are not allowed for expenditures that occur after this date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington State University energy program, in consultation
with the departments of ecology, revenue, and licensing; local
governments; vehicle manufacturers and suppliers; and other interested
parties, shall collect and review the relevant data associated with the
provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 (this act) and evaluate the
effectiveness of these incentives in improving air quality and
increasing the use of clean alternative fuel vehicles. The Washington
State University energy program shall present its findings and make
recommendations as appropriate to the legislature biennially on or
before November 30th, beginning in 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act take effect
August 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 6 of this act takes effect January
1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 6 of this act expires December 31,
2012.

--- END ---