BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
prevent terrorist attacks, and thereby save the lives of Washington
residents by providing appropriate investigative tools that facilitate
and promote cooperation between local, state, and federal law
enforcement agencies, that remove barriers to cooperation in terrorism
investigations, and that continue to protect the privacy rights of
residents of the state. In balancing these goals, the legislature is
creating an additional investigative tool to be used by law enforcement
only if authorized by the courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.73 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The attorney general or a prosecuting attorney may request that
a superior court issue an order providing a law enforcement agency,
responsible for investigating potential acts of terrorism, with
authority to intercept a wire, oral, or electronic communication. The
superior court may enter the order if it finds that:
(a) There is probable cause for belief that a person is committing,
has committed, or is about to commit an act of terrorism;
(b) There is probable cause for belief that a particular
communication concerning the offense will be obtained through the
interception;
(c) If the interception is to occur at a fixed location, there is
probable cause for belief that the place where the wire or electronic
communication is to be intercepted is being used or is about to be used
in connection with the commission of the act of terrorism; and
(d) Normal investigative procedures have been tried and have failed
or reasonably appear to be unlikely to succeed if tried or to be too
dangerous.
(2) The interception cannot exceed thirty days. Upon termination
of the interception, any recordings made in connection with the
interception shall be presented to the court and sealed under the
court's direction.
(3) Within ninety days of the termination of the interception,
unless delayed for good cause, the court shall notify the person
recorded of the order to intercept, and the date and time of the
interception.

--- END ---