BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.73 RCW
to read as follows:
Except as provided in Rules of Appellate Procedure 2.2 (c), the
state or a local government may appeal in a criminal case only from the
following superior court decisions and only if the appeal will not
place the defendant in double jeopardy:
(1) Final decision except not guilty. A decision which in effect
abates, discontinues, or determines the case other than by a judgment
or verdict of not guilty, including but not limited to a decision
setting aside, quashing, or dismissing an indictment or information;
(2) Pretrial order suppressing evidence. A pretrial order
suppressing evidence, if the trial court expressly finds that the
practical effect of the order is to terminate the case;
(3) Arrest or vacation of judgment. An order arresting or vacating
a judgment;
(4) New trial. An order granting a new trial;
(5) Disposition in juvenile offense proceeding. (a) A disposition
in a juvenile offense proceeding which is below the standard range of
disposition for the offense or which the state or local government
believes involves a miscalculation of the standard range; (b) a
disposition that fails to impose mandatory legal financial obligations;
or (c) a disposition that fails to impose statutorily required
conditions of sentence;
(6) Sentence in criminal case. (a) A sentence in a criminal case
which is outside the standard range for the offense or which the state
or local government believes involves a miscalculation of the standard
range; (b) a sentence that fails to impose mandatory legal financial
obligations; (c) a sentence for which the offender's eligibility is at
issue; or (d) a disposition that fails to impose statutorily required
conditions of sentence.

--- END ---