BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.115 and 1985 c 218 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The courses of instruction of both the University of Washington and
Washington State University shall embrace as major lines, pharmacy,
architecture, civil engineering, ((electrical engineering,)) mechanical
engineering, chemical engineering, and forest management as
distinguished from forest products and logging engineering which are
exclusive to the University of Washington. These major lines shall be
offered and taught at said institutions only.

--- END ---