BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 65.04.090 and 1996 c 229 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The recording officer must also endorse upon such an instrument,
paper, or notice, the time when and the book and page in which it is
recorded, and must thereafter electronically transmit or deliver it((,
upon request,)) to the party leaving the same for record or to the
address on the face of the document.

--- END ---