BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.170 and 1993 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A surcharge of ((two)) three dollars per instrument shall be
charged by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be
in addition to any other charge authorized by law. Fifty percent of
the revenue generated through this surcharge shall be transmitted
monthly to the state treasurer who shall distribute such funds to each
county treasurer within the state in July of each year in accordance
with the formula described in RCW 36.22.190. The county treasurer
shall place the funds received in a special account titled the
auditor's centennial document preservation and modernization account to
be used solely for ongoing preservation of historical documents of all
county offices and departments and shall not be added to the county
current expense fund. Fifty percent of the revenue generated by this
surcharge shall be retained by the county and deposited in the
auditor's operation and maintenance fund for ongoing preservation of
historical documents of all county offices and departments.
The centennial document preservation and modernization account is
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer and shall be
classified as a treasury trust account. State distributions from the
centennial document preservation and modernization account shall be
made without appropriation.

--- END ---