BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.140 and 1995 c 301 s 61 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each county auditor or, in charter counties, the chief financial
officer, shall be ex officio deputy of the state auditor for the
purpose of accounting and reporting on municipal corporations and in
such capacity shall be under the direction of the state auditor, but he
or she shall receive no additional salary or compensation by virtue
thereof and shall perform no duties as such, except in connection with
county business.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.40.030 and 1995 c 301 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
The estimates required in RCW 36.40.010 and 36.40.020 shall be
submitted on forms provided by the county auditor or, in charter
counties, the chief financial officer, and classified according to the
classification established by the state auditor. The county auditor
or, in charter counties, the chief financial officer, shall provide
such forms. He or she shall also prepare the estimates for interest
and debt redemption requirements and any other estimates the
preparation of which properly falls within the duties of his or her
office.
Each such official shall file his or her estimates within the time
and in the manner provided in the notice and form and the county
auditor or, in charter counties, the chief financial officer, shall
deduct and withhold as a penalty from the salary of each official
failing or refusing to file such estimates as herein provided, the sum
of ten dollars for each day of delay: PROVIDED, That the total penalty
against any one official shall not exceed fifty dollars in any one
year.
In the absence or disability of any official the duties required
herein shall devolve upon the official or employee in charge of the
office, department, service, or institution for the time being. The
notice shall contain a copy of this penalty clause.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.40.040 and 1995 c 301 s 63 and 1995 c 194 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Upon receipt of the estimates the county auditor or, in charter
counties, chief financial officer, shall prepare the county budget
which shall set forth the complete financial program of the county for
the ensuing fiscal year, showing the expenditure program and the
sources of revenue by which it is to be financed.
The revenue section shall set forth the estimated receipts from
sources other than taxation for each office, department, service, or
institution for the ensuing fiscal year, the actual receipts for the
first six months of the current fiscal year and the actual receipts for
the last completed fiscal year, the estimated surplus at the close of
the current fiscal year and the amount proposed to be raised by
taxation.
The expenditure section shall set forth in comparative and tabular
form by offices, departments, services, and institutions the estimated
expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year, the appropriations for the
current fiscal year, the actual expenditures for the first six months
of the current fiscal year including all contracts or other obligations
against current appropriations, and the actual expenditures for the
last completed fiscal year.
All estimates of receipts and expenditures for the ensuing year
shall be fully detailed in the annual budget and shall be classified
and segregated according to a standard classification of accounts to be
adopted and prescribed by the state auditor after consultation with the
Washington state association of counties and the Washington state
association of county officials.
The county auditor or, in charter counties, chief financial
officer, shall set forth separately in the annual budget to be
submitted to the county legislative authority the total amount of
emergency warrants issued during the preceding fiscal year, together
with a statement showing the amount issued for each emergency, and the
legislative authority shall include in the annual tax levy, a levy
sufficient to raise an amount equal to the total of such warrants:
PROVIDED, That the legislative authority may fund the warrants or any
part thereof into bonds instead of including them in the budget levy.

--- END ---