BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that providing a cost-of-living increase to school district employees funded by the state is
part of the state's duty to fund basic education under Article IX of
the Washington state Constitution. The legislature also recognizes
that the cost-of-living increase is part of meeting the state's duty to
provide compensation sufficient to attract and retain qualified
educational staff. The legislature intends to provide funds to pay for
cost-of-living increases for nonstate-funded school employees. The
legislature finds that this fulfills the intent of the voters in
passing Initiative No. 732 and meets the requirements established by
the Washington State Supreme Court in McGowan v. State of Washington,
Docket # 71947-1 (2002).

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2001 c 4 s 2 (Initiative Measure No.
732) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, each school district shall
be provided a state-funded cost-of-living allocation sufficient to
grant this cost-of-living increase for the salaries, including
mandatory salary-related benefits, of all employees of the district.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for all school
employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other certificated
instructional staff, the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase
funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied to the
base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used
to recognize school district personnel costs.
(d) Beginning with the 2001-02 school year, the state shall fully
fund the cost-of-living increase in this section as part of its
obligation to meet the basic education requirements under Article IX of
the Washington Constitution for state-funded employees. Beginning with
the 2001-02 school year, the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living
increase in this section for school employees who are funded with
nonbasic education funds.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

--- END ---