BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.175 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission is
established to oversee and direct the economic development strategies
and policies of the department of community, trade, and economic
development.
(2) The Washington state economic development commission shall
consist of nine members appointed by the governor, with the advice and
consent of the senate. In making appointments, the governor shall
consult with organizations that have an interest in economic
development, including, but not limited to, economic development
councils, chambers of commerce, port associations, industry
associations, labor organizations, minority business associations, and
the chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over
economic development. No member may serve more than one year without
senate confirmation. The governor shall select the chair. The members
serve at the pleasure of the governor for six-year terms. Of the
initial members, three must be appointed for two-year terms, three must
be appointed for four-year terms, and the remainder must be appointed
for six-year terms. Thereafter, members must be appointed for six-year
terms. The members shall represent eastern Washington, central
Washington, southwest Washington, the peninsula, central Puget Sound,
and northern Puget Sound and reflect the state's various business
sectors. Members of the commission shall serve statewide interests
while preserving their diverse perspectives, and shall be recognized
leaders in their fields with demonstrated experience in disciplines
related to economic development. At least seven members must be
selected from private businesses within Washington state.
(3) The Washington state economic development commission shall
perform the following duties:
(a) Review and periodically update the state's economic development
strategy and performance measures, and perform an annual evaluation of
the strategy;
(b) Provide policy direction to the department of community, trade,
and economic development;
(c) Assist the department of community, trade, and economic
development with the procurement and deployment of private funds for
business development, recruitment, and promotion; and
(d) Provide planning and strategic and programmatic direction to
the department of community, trade, and economic development, with
specific emphasis on the following:
(i) Development of strategies that promote business retention,
expansion, and creation within the state;
(ii) Development of marketing strategies for the global marketplace
that promote products and services of the state; and
(iii) Development of strategies to enhance relationships and
cooperation between local governments, economic development councils,
state agencies, and the legislature.
(4) Members of the Washington state economic development commission
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060 and are considered a class three group for purposes of
compensation under RCW 43.03.240.
(5) Staffing for the Washington state economic development
commission shall be provided by the department of community, trade, and
economic development or other state agencies as appropriate, and within
existing resources and operations.
(6) Creation of the Washington state economic development
commission shall not be construed to modify any authority or budgetary
responsibility of the governor or the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.175.010 (Governor's small business improvement council--Established -- Membership -- Travel expenses -- Staff support and
administrative assistance) and 1987 c 348 s 6, 1985 c 466 s 62, & 1984
c 282 s 7;
(2) RCW 43.175.020 (Duties) and 1998 c 245 s 53, 1987 c 348 s 7,
1985 c 466 s 63, & 1984 c 282 s 8; and
(3) RCW 43.175.901 (Severability -- 1984 c 282) and 1984 c 282 s 17.

--- END ---