BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares:
(1) The national board for professional teaching standards has
established high and rigorous standards for what highly accomplished
teachers should know and be able to do in order to increase student
learning results;
(2) The national board certifies teachers who meet these standards
through a rigorous, performance-based assessment process;
(3) A certificate awarded by the national board attests that a
teacher has met high and rigorous standards and has demonstrated the
ability to make sound professional judgments about how to best meet
students' learning needs and effectively help students meet challenging
academic standards; and
(4) Teachers who attain national board certification should be
acknowledged and rewarded in order to encourage more teachers to pursue
certification for the benefit of Washington students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
Certificated instructional staff who have attained certification
from the national board for professional teaching standards shall
receive a bonus of three thousand five hundred dollars each year in
which they maintain their certification from the national board for
professional teaching standards. The annual bonus for national board
certification is provided in addition to compensation received under a
district's salary schedule adopted in accordance with RCW 28A.405.200
and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average
salary and associated salary limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.

--- END ---