BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The sum of two million one hundred eighty-eight thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the general
fund to the emergency management division of the Washington state
military department for the purposes of this act. The appropriated
funds shall be distributed by the emergency management division as
grants to city fire departments and fire protection districts that have
purchased thermal imaging cameras. A grant to a city fire department
or fire protection district shall not exceed fifty percent of the cost
of purchase by a fire department or district, and shall be based on
actual documented costs incurred. Grants shall be based upon
applications submitted to the emergency management division and
distributed throughout the state in a fair and rational manner. To the
extent that funds remain unexpended from this appropriation on June 30,
2003, these funds are hereby reappropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---