BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that prescription
drugs play an increasingly significant role in maintaining and
improving the health of Washington residents. But the cost of these
drugs is placing a growing strain on state health care programs. For
those people not covered by these programs, or otherwise uninsured, the
high costs may limit their access to medications altogether. However,
by maximizing its purchasing power and taking better advantage of its
position as a major buyer of prescription drugs, the state should be
able to reduce the price it pays for such drugs across all state
programs, and offer some relief to others in need who lack prescription
drug coverage. To further this purpose, there is created the aggregate
purchasing prescription drug discount program.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.011 and 2001 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees
of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and
appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including
full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; and includes
any or all part-time and temporary employees under the terms and
conditions established under this chapter by the authority; justices of
the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior
courts; and members of the state legislature or of the legislative
authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if
the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of
the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with
the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option
of each such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995,
employees of employee organizations currently pooled with employees of
school districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at
the option of each such employee organization; and (c) employees of a
school district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350.
(7) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(8) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(9) "Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only contribution
plan, a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan
whereby state and public employees may agree to a contribution to
benefit costs which will allow the employee to participate in benefits
offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(10) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(11) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.
(12) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(13) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(14) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
and reserve officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who
die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment as
determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and
industries.
(15) "Prescription drug program" means a program administered by a
state agency pursuant to which prescription drugs are purchased or
reimbursement for the purchase of prescription drugs is provided, or
any state agency making such a purchase or reimbursement.
(16) "Wholesaler" means a corporation, individual, or other entity
that buys drugs or devices for resale and distributes the drugs or
devices to corporations, individuals, or entities other than consumers.
(17) "Manufacturer" means anyone who is engaged in manufacturing,
preparing, propagating, compounding, processing, packaging,
repackaging, or labeling a drug. However, a pharmacist compounding
drugs to be dispensed from the pharmacy in which the drugs are
compounded pursuant to prescriptions for individual patients is not a
manufacturer.
(18) "Supplier" means a wholesaler or manufacturer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
No later than July 1, 2004, the health care authority must
implement a program to aggregate the purchase of prescription drugs
from suppliers for prescription drug programs in this state, to be
known as the "aggregate purchasing prescription drug discount program."
The authority may contract with an outside manager to administer this
program, which includes the following components:
(1) Price discounts on prescription drugs negotiated by the health
care authority or manager with prescription drug suppliers on behalf of
prescription drug programs in this state.
(2) A means to make the negotiated price discounts available to any
person who is:
(a) A resident of the state of Washington;
(b) Ineligible for medicaid prescription benefits;
(c) Ineligible for, or not receiving, or both, a prescription drug
benefit under a medicare supplemental policy or any other third-party
payer prescription benefit; and
(d)(i) At least fifty-five years old; or
(ii) Between the ages of nineteen and fifty-four who is otherwise
eligible for benefits under Title II of the social security act
(federal old-age, survivors, and disability insurance benefits).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The health care authority may adopt rules to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 By January 1, 2004, the administrator of the
health care authority must submit to the governor and the legislature
a progress report regarding the implementation of the aggregate
purchasing prescription drug discount program.

--- END ---