BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.02.070 and 1995 c 292 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the request of the person requesting the record, the
health care provider or facility shall certify the record furnished and
may charge for such certification in accordance with RCW 36.18.016(5).
No record need be certified until the fee is paid. The certification
shall be affixed to the record and disclose:
(((1))) (a) The identity of the patient;
(((2))) (b) The kind of health care information involved;
(((3))) (c) The identity of the person to whom the information is
being furnished;
(((4))) (d) The identity of the health care provider or facility
furnishing the information;
(((5))) (e) The number of pages of the health care information;
(((6))) (f) The date on which the health care information is
furnished; and
(((7))) (g) That the certification is to fulfill and meet the
requirements of this section.
(2) In a court of law, in an action to recover damages for personal
injury, the amount stated in a health care provider's billing statement
certified under this section for treatment provided to a patient is
presumed to be the usual and customary value of health care treatment,
and the statement is admissible in evidence to establish that the
charges are usual and customary charges in the community. The
presumption that the charges are usual and customary may be rebutted by
a preponderance of the evidence. The presumption does not shift the
burden of proof that the health care treatment was for health
conditions proximately caused by another's fault.

--- END ---