BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington's
citizens should have access to environmental benchmarks information,
and should have the opportunity to participate in developing and
maintaining a benchmark program. An enormous amount of environmental
quality data is collected for many purposes, but primarily for
administering environmental quality and public health programs. Key
benchmark information is distilled from this great quantity of data in
only rare instances. Such information should be compiled and be
presented in a manner that the public will find useful in making
choices about individual actions and in expressing their views on
priorities for governmental action. This information should address
those key parameters that the public finds most important in staying
informed on environmental quality conditions and trends over time.
(2) The legislature further finds that a system of environmental
quality benchmarks is an integral component of transitioning from
traditional command and control regulatory strategies to protect
environmental quality to performance-based strategies that allow
greater flexibility in choosing the means to attain goals that are
publicly developed and supported. The success of such performance-based strategies is dependent upon high quality information that is
widely available and useable by the regulated community and the public
generally.
(3) Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to authorize the
development of a proposal for an environmental quality benchmarks
program for future legislative consideration, and to make better use of
existing monitoring data and analysis to inform the public and to
further performance-based environmental quality strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall provide to the legislature a report that includes
a proposal for a Washington environmental benchmarks program. The
institute shall review benchmark programs currently operating at the
local and state level, and in other states, including those
environmental benchmarks tracked by the Oregon program board for over
a decade. The institute's review shall address and provide options as
well as recommendations on:
(a) Ensuring a continuous and meaningful role for the public in
adopting benchmarks and advising on how the benchmark information
should be used in governmental programs;
(b) Administering and funding the benchmark program;
(c) Addressing key environmental and natural resources, such as:
(i) Water resources;
(ii) Air resources;
(iii) Soil;
(iv) Public health effects from environmental contaminants or
conditions;
(v) Forest land and farmland resources;
(vi) Fish and wildlife resources; and
(vii) Important and unique natural areas;
(d) Methods to rely primarily on existing monitoring data sources
and analysis;
(e) A long-term strategy for tracking trends on key benchmarks and
ensuring that data will be collected continuously over time to make
such trends' information useful and accurate; and
(f) Identifying benchmark parameters for which information widely
accessible by the public and regulated community would support
performance-based strategies.
(2) In conducting the study, the institute shall consult with
legislators, local, state, and federal environmental agency program
staff, and interested stakeholder groups.
(3) The institute may accept nonstate funds to conduct the study.
(4) The institute's report and recommendations shall be submitted
no later than December 15, 2004.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.21A.510 and 1995 c 399 s 66 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to assist the department of community, trade, and
economic development in providing information to businesses interested
in locating in Washington state and to assist Washington citizens in
making informed decisions regarding actions to protect and restore the
state's environmental quality, the department shall develop and
periodically update an environmental profile of the state. This
profile shall identify the state's natural resources and environmental
quality conditions, and provide information on trends over time on such
resources and conditions. The profile shall describe how these assets
are valuable to the public and to industry. Examples of information to
be included are water resources and quality, air quality, and
recreational opportunities related to natural resources.
(2) The department shall complete the initial profile by June 30,
2004, and shall incorporate benchmark information that may be developed
as a result of the report in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.70.175 and 1985 c 410 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Funds in the worker and community right to know fund established
under RCW 49.70.170 may be spent by the department of ecology to
implement RCW 70.102.020 (1) through (3) following legislative
appropriation, and through June 30, 2005, may be expended for the
development of a proposal for an environmental benchmark program under
chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 (this act). Disbursements from the fund
shall be on authorization of the director of the department of ecology.

--- END ---