BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The chief of police may require pawnbrokers and second-hand
dealers to collect a fee, not to exceed ten dollars or the actual per
transaction cost, whichever is less, for each transaction for which
each pawnbroker or second-hand dealer is required to record information
under RCW 19.60.020. The county's chief law enforcement officer may
require pawnbrokers and second-hand dealers to pay the transaction fee
for pawnbrokers and second-hand dealers having their registered place
of business in the unincorporated area of a county.
(2) Every month pawnbrokers and second-hand dealers required to
collect the transaction fee under subsection (1) of this section shall
remit the transaction fee to the city or county treasurer. The city or
county treasurer shall deposit the money in a special account to be
used by the law enforcement agency only for establishing and
maintaining an electronic pawnbroker and second-hand dealer transaction
reporting system.
(3) A law enforcement agency collecting the fee authorized under
subsection (1) of this section shall adopt the electronic reporting
system recommended by the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs shall convene a work group of law enforcement officers to
identify and by July 1, 2004, recommend an electronic pawnbroker and
second-hand dealer transaction reporting system.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.60.060 and 1995 c 133 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
All pawnbrokers are authorized to charge and receive interest and
other fees at the following rates for money on the security of personal
property actually received in pledge:
(1) The interest for the loan period shall not exceed:
(a) For an amount loaned up to $9.99 - interest at $1.00 for each
thirty-day period to include the loan date.
(b) For an amount loaned from $10.00 to $19.99 - interest at the
rate of $1.25 for each thirty-day period to include the loan date.
(c) For an amount loaned from $20.00 to $24.99 - interest at the
rate of $1.50 for each thirty-day period to include the loan date.
(d) For an amount loaned from $25.00 to $34.99 - interest at the
rate of $1.75 for each thirty-day period to include the loan date.
(e) For an amount loaned from $35.00 to $39.99 - interest at the
rate of $2.00 for each thirty-day period to include the loan date.
(f) For an amount loaned from $40.00 to $49.99 - interest at the
rate of $2.25 for each thirty-day period to include the loan date.
(g) For the amount loaned from $50.00 to $59.99 - interest at the
rate of $2.50 for each thirty-day period to include the loan date.
(h) For the amount loaned from $60.00 to $69.99 - interest at the
rate of $2.75 for each thirty-day period to include the loan date.
(i) For the amount loaned from $70.00 to $79.99 - interest at the
rate of $3.00 for each thirty-day period to include the loan date.
(j) For the amount loaned from $80.00 to $89.99 - interest at the
rate of $3.25 for each thirty-day period to include the loan date.
(k) For the amount loaned from $90.00 to $99.99 - interest at the
rate of $3.50 for each thirty-day period to include the loan date.
(l) For the amount loaned from $100.00 or more - interest at the
rate of three percent for each thirty-day period to include the loan
date.
(2) The fee for the preparation of loan documents, pledges, or
reports required under the laws of the United States of America, the
state of Washington, or the counties, cities, towns, or other political
subdivisions thereof, shall not exceed:
(a) For the amount loaned up to $4.99 - the sum of $.50;
(b) For the amount loaned from $5.00 to $9.99 - the sum of $2.00;
(c) For the amount loaned from $10.00 to $14.99 - the sum of $3.00;
(d) For the amount loaned from $15.00 to $19.99 - the sum of $3.50.
(e) For the amount loaned from $20.00 to $24.99 - the sum of $4.00.
(f) For the amount loaned from $25.00 to $29.99 - the sum of $4.50.
(g) For the amount loaned from $30.00 to $34.99 - the sum of $5.00.
(h) For the amount loaned from $35.00 to $39.99 - the sum of $5.50.
(i) For the amount loaned from $40.00 to $44.99 - the sum of $6.00.
(j) For the amount loaned from $45.00 to $49.99 - the sum of $6.50.
(k) For the amount loaned from $50.00 to $54.99 - the sum of $7.00.
(l) For the amount loaned from $55.00 to $59.99 - the sum of $7.50.
(m) For the amount loaned from $60.00 to $64.99 - the sum of $8.00.
(n) For the amount loaned from $65.00 to $69.99 - the sum of $8.50.
(o) For the amount loaned from $70.00 to $74.99 - the sum of $9.00.
(p) For the amount loaned from $75.00 to $79.99 - the sum of $9.50.
(q) For the amount loaned from $80.00 to $84.99 - the sum of
$10.00.
(r) For the amount loaned from $85.00 to $89.99 - the sum of
$10.50.
(s) For the amount loaned from $90.00 to $94.99 - the sum of
$11.00.
(t) For the amount loaned from $95.00 to $99.99 - the sum of
$11.50.
(u) For the amount loaned from $100.00 to $104.99 - the sum of
$12.00.
(v) For the amount loaned from $105.00 to $109.99 - the sum of
$12.25.
(w) For the amount loaned from $110.00 to $114.99 - the sum of
$12.75.
(x) For the amount loaned from $115.00 to $119.99 - the sum of
$13.25.
(y) For the amount loaned from $120.00 to $124.99 - the sum of
$13.50.
(z) For the amount loaned from $125.00 to $129.99 - the sum of
$13.75.
(aa) For the amount loaned from $130.00 to $149.99 - the sum of
$14.50.
(bb) For the amount loaned from $150.00 to $174.99 - the sum of
$14.75.
(cc) For the amount loaned from $175.00 to $199.99 - the sum of
$15.00.
(dd) For the amount loaned from $200.00 to $224.99 - the sum of
$16.00.
(ee) For the amount loaned from $225.00 to $249.99 - the sum of
$17.00.
(ff) For the amount loaned from $250.00 to $274.99 - the sum of
$18.00.
(gg) For the amount loaned from $275.00 to $299.99 - the sum of
$19.00.
(hh) For the amount loaned from $300.00 to $324.99 - the sum of
$20.00.
(ii) For the amount loaned from $325.00 to $349.99 - the sum of
$21.00.
(jj) For the amount loaned from $350.00 to $374.99 - the sum of
$22.00.
(kk) For the amount loaned from $375.00 to $399.99 - the sum of
$23.00.
(ll) For the amount loaned from $400.00 to $424.99 - the sum of
$24.00.
(mm) For the amount loaned from $425.00 to $449.99 - the sum of
$25.00.
(nn) For the amount loaned from $450.00 to $474.99 - the sum of
$26.00.
(oo) For the amount loaned from $475.00 to $499.99 - the sum of
$27.00.
(pp) For the amount loaned from $500.00 to $524.99 - the sum of
$28.00.
(qq) For the amount loaned from $525.00 to $549.99 - the sum of
$29.00.
(rr) For the amount loaned from $550.00 to $599.99 - the sum of
$30.00.
(ss) For the amount loaned from $600.00 to $699.99 - the sum of
$35.00.
(tt) For the amount loaned from $700.00 to $799.99 - the sum of
$40.00.
(uu) For the amount loaned from $800.00 to $899.99 - the sum of
$40.00.
(vv) For the amount loaned from $900.00 to $999.99 - the sum of
$50.00.
(ww) For the amount loaned from $1000.00 to $1499.99 - the sum of
$55.00.
(xx) For the amount loaned from $1500.00 to $1999.99 - the sum of
$60.00.
(yy) For the amount loaned from $2000.00 to $2499.99 - the sum of
$65.00.
(zz) For the amount loaned from $2500.00 to $2999.99 - the sum of
$70.00.
(aaa) For the amount loaned from $3000.00 to $3499.99 - the sum of
$75.00.
(bbb) For the amount loaned from $3500.00 to $3999.99 - the sum of
$80.00.
(ccc) For the amount loaned from $4000.00 to $4499.99 - the sum of
$85.00.
(ddd) For the amount loaned from $4500.00 or more - the sum of
$90.00.
(3) Fees under subsection (2) of this section may be charged one
time only for each loan period((;)). Except as provided in section 1
of this act, no additional fees, other than interest allowed under
subsection (1) of this section, shall be charged for making the loan.
A copy of this section, set in twelve point type or larger, shall
be posted prominently in each premises subject to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 3 of this act take effect
July 1, 2004.

--- END ---