BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.645.010 and 1990 c 33 s 544 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person, ((or)) persons, or school district, either severally or
collectively, aggrieved by or involved in an action resulting in any
decision or order of any school official or board, within thirty days
after the rendition of such decision or order, or of the failure to act
upon the same when properly presented, may appeal the same to the
superior court of the county in which the school district or part
thereof is situated, by filing with the secretary of the school board
if the appeal is from board action or failure to act, otherwise with
the proper school official, and filing with the clerk of the superior
court, a notice of appeal which shall set forth in a clear and concise
manner the errors complained of.
Appeals by teachers, principals, supervisors, superintendents, or
other certificated employees from the actions of school boards with
respect to discharge or other action adversely affecting their contract
status, or failure to renew their contracts for the next ensuing term
shall be governed by the appeal provisions of chapters 28A.400 and
28A.405 RCW therefor and in all other cases shall be governed by
chapter 28A.645 RCW.

--- END ---