BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.52.030 and 1997 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless a report is to be made by a law enforcement officer
under subsection (3) of this section, the driver of any vehicle
involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person
or damage to the property of any one person to an apparent extent equal
to or greater than the minimum amount established by rule adopted by
the chief of the Washington state patrol in accordance with subsection
(5) of this section, shall, within four days after such accident, make
a written report of such accident to the chief of police of the city or
town if such accident occurred within an incorporated city or town or
the county sheriff or state patrol if such accident occurred outside
incorporated cities and towns. Nothing in this subsection prohibits
accident reports from being filed by drivers where damage to property
is less than the minimum amount or where a law enforcement officer has
submitted a report.
(2) The original of the report shall be immediately forwarded by
the authority receiving the report to the ((chief of the Washington
state patrol)) secretary of transportation at Olympia, Washington.
However, the Washington state patrol shall retain, until an electronic
copy of the report is available, a copy of any report taken by its law
enforcement personnel. The ((Washington state patrol)) department of
transportation shall give the department of licensing and the
Washington state patrol full access to the report or any other compiled
reports as the chief deems necessary.
(3) Any law enforcement officer who investigates an accident for
which a report is required under subsection (1) of this section shall
submit an investigator's report as required by RCW 46.52.070.
(4) The chief of the Washington state patrol may require any driver
of any vehicle involved in an accident, of which report must be made as
provided in this section, to file supplemental reports whenever the
original report in the chief's opinion is insufficient, and may
likewise require witnesses of any such accident to render reports. For
this purpose, the secretary of transportation with the approval of the
chief of the Washington state patrol shall prepare and, upon request,
supply to any police department, coroner, sheriff, and any other
suitable agency or individual, sample forms of accident reports
required hereunder, which reports shall be upon a form devised by the
secretary of transportation with the approval of the chief of the
Washington state patrol and shall call for sufficiently detailed
information to disclose all material facts with reference to the
accident to be reported thereon, including the location, the
circumstances, the conditions then existing, the persons and vehicles
involved, the insurance information required under RCW 46.30.030,
personal injury or death, if any, the amounts of property damage
claimed, the total number of vehicles involved, whether the vehicles
were legally parked, legally standing, or moving, and whether such
vehicles were occupied at the time of the accident. Every required
accident report shall be made on a form prescribed by the secretary of
transportation with the approval of the chief of the Washington state
patrol, and each authority charged with the duty of receiving such
reports shall provide sufficient report forms in compliance with the
form devised. The report forms shall be designated so as to provide
that a copy may be retained by the reporting person.
(5) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall adopt rules
establishing the accident-reporting threshold for property damage
accidents. ((Beginning October 1, 1987, the accident-reporting
threshold for property damage accidents shall be five hundred
dollars.)) The accident-reporting threshold for property damage
accidents shall be revised when necessary, but not more frequently than
every two years. The revisions shall only be for the purpose of
recognizing economic changes as reflected by an inflationary index
recommended by the office of financial management. The revisions shall
be guided by the change in the index for the time period since the last
revision.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.52.050 and 1961 c 12 s 46.52.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every coroner or other official performing like functions shall, on
or before the tenth day of each month, report in writing to the sheriff
of the county in which he or she holds office and to the chief of the
Washington state patrol, the director of the traffic safety commission,
and the secretary of transportation the death of any person within his
or her jurisdiction during the preceding calendar month as a result of
an accident involving any vehicle, together with the circumstances of
such accident.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.52.060 and 1998 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((It shall be the duty of the chief of the Washington state patrol
to)) The secretary of transportation shall file, tabulate, and analyze
all accident reports and ((to)) publish annually, immediately following
the close of each ((fiscal)) calendar year, and monthly during the
course of the year, statistical information based thereon showing the
number of accidents, the location, the frequency and circumstances
thereof, and other statistical information ((which)) that may prove of
assistance in determining the cause of vehicular accidents.
Such accident reports and analysis or reports thereof shall be
available to the director of licensing, the ((department of
transportation)) chief of the Washington state patrol, the utilities
and transportation commission, the traffic safety commission, and other
public entities authorized by the ((chief of the Washington state
patrol)) secretary of transportation, or their duly authorized
representatives, for further tabulation and analysis for pertinent data
relating to the regulation of highway traffic, highway construction,
vehicle operators and all other purposes, and to publish information so
derived as may be deemed of publication value. In addition, the
department of transportation shall give the Washington state patrol
full access to compiled reports as the chief deems necessary.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.52.065 and 1977 ex.s. c 50 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every coroner or other official performing like functions shall
submit to the state toxicologist a blood sample taken from all drivers
and all pedestrians who are killed in any traffic accident where the
death occurred within four hours after the accident. Blood samples
shall be taken and submitted in the manner prescribed by the state
toxicologist. The state toxicologist shall analyze these blood samples
to determine the concentration of alcohol and, where feasible, the
presence of drugs or other toxic substances. The reports and records
of the state toxicologist relating to analyses made pursuant to this
section shall be confidential: PROVIDED, That the results of these
analyses shall be reported to the state patrol and department of
transportation and made available to the prosecuting attorney or law
enforcement agency having jurisdiction: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
results of these analyses may be admitted in evidence in any civil or
criminal action where relevant and shall be made available to the
parties to any such litigation on application to the court.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.52.080 and 1979 c 158 s 162 are each amended to
read as follows:
All required accident reports and supplemental reports and copies
thereof shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting and
shall be for the confidential use of the county prosecuting attorney
and chief of police or county sheriff, as the case may be, ((and)) the
director of licensing, the secretary of transportation, and the chief
of the Washington state patrol, and other officer or commission as
authorized by law, except that any such officer shall disclose the
names and addresses of persons reported as involved in an accident or
as witnesses thereto, the vehicle license plate numbers and
descriptions of vehicles involved, and the date, time, and location of
an accident, to any person who may have a proper interest therein,
including the driver or drivers involved, or the legal guardian
thereof, the parent of a minor driver, any person injured therein, the
owner of vehicles or property damaged thereby, or any authorized
representative of such an interested party, or the attorney or insurer
thereof. No such accident report or copy thereof shall be used as
evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of an accident,
except that any officer above named for receiving accident reports
shall furnish, upon demand of any person who has, or who claims to
have, made such a report, or, upon demand of any court, a certificate
showing that a specified accident report has or has not been made to
the ((chief of the Washington state patrol)) secretary of
transportation solely to prove a compliance or a failure to comply with
the requirement that such a report be made in the manner required by
law: PROVIDED, That the reports may be used as evidence when necessary
to prosecute charges filed in connection with a violation of RCW
46.52.088.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.52.085 and 1979 c 34 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any information authorized for release under RCW 46.52.080 and
46.52.083 may be furnished in written form for a fee sufficient to
meet, but not exceed, the costs incurred. All fees received by the
((Washington state patrol)) department of transportation for such
copies shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.52.120 and 1998 c 218 s 1 and 1998 c 165 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The director shall keep a case record on every motor vehicle
driver licensed under the laws of this state, together with information
on each driver, showing all the convictions and findings of traffic
infractions certified by the courts, together with an index cross-reference record of each accident reported relating to such individual
with a brief statement of the cause of the accident and whether or not
the accident resulted in any fatality. The ((chief of the Washington
state patrol)) secretary of transportation shall furnish the index
cross-reference record to the director, with reference to each driver
involved in the reported accidents.
(2) The records shall be for the confidential use of the director,
the chief of the Washington state patrol, the director of the
Washington traffic safety commission, and for such police officers or
other cognizant public officials as may be designated by law. Such
case records shall not be admitted into evidence in any court, except
where relevant to the prosecution or defense of a criminal charge, or
in case appeal is taken from the order of the director, suspending,
revoking, canceling, or refusing a vehicle driver's license.
(3) The director shall tabulate and analyze vehicle driver's case
records and suspend, revoke, cancel, or refuse a vehicle driver's
license to a person when it is deemed from facts contained in the case
record of such person that it is for the best interest of public safety
that such person be denied the privilege of operating a motor vehicle.
The director shall also suspend a person's driver's license if the
person fails to attend or complete a driver improvement interview or
fails to abide by conditions of probation under RCW 46.20.335.
Whenever the director orders the vehicle driver's license of any such
person suspended, revoked, or canceled, or refuses the issuance of a
vehicle driver's license, such suspension, revocation, cancellation, or
refusal is final and effective unless appeal from the decision of the
director is taken as provided by law.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.29.060 and 1987 c 463 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter, requiring deposit of security and
suspensions for failure to deposit security, subject to certain
exemptions, shall apply to the driver and owner of any vehicle of a
type subject to registration under the motor vehicle laws of this state
which is in any manner involved in an accident within this state, which
accident has resulted in bodily injury or death of any person or damage
to the property of any one person to an apparent extent equal to or
greater than the minimum amount established by rule adopted by the
director. The director shall adopt rules establishing the property
damage threshold at which the provisions of this chapter apply with
respect to the deposit of security and suspensions for failure to
deposit security. ((Beginning October 1, 1987, the property damage
threshold shall be five hundred dollars.)) The thresholds shall be
revised when necessary, but not more frequently than every two years.
The revisions shall only be for the purpose of recognizing economic
changes as reflected by an inflationary index recommended by the office
of financial management. The revisions shall be guided by the change
in the index for the time period since the last revision and by the
threshold established by the chief of the Washington state patrol for
the filing of accident reports as provided in RCW 46.52.030.

--- END ---