BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that over five
thousand state residents per year file cases and complaints with the
department of labor and industries alleging they have been denied
payment for work they performed. The department of labor and
industries currently does not have an effective means of addressing
these complaints in order to ensure workers are paid the wages they are
owed.
The legislature further finds that the Washington state minimum
wage law and wage claim laws do not authorize adequate penalties
against violators. To improve compliance, the department of labor and
industries should be allowed to assess interest on back wages and
impose civil penalties against employers who are found to be not in
compliance with chapters 49.46 and 49.48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer shall pay each worker all wages due on an
established payday for each pay period.
(2) An employer found to have violated a provision requiring
payment of wages under chapter 49.12, 49.28, 49.30, 49.46, or 49.52 RCW
or this chapter in a citation or notice of assessment issued by the
director of labor and industries or the director's authorized
representative: Must pay the wages to the employee, including interest
of up to one percent per month on the unpaid wages, also to be paid to
the worker; shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one
hundred dollars and not more than one thousand dollars for each
violation per employee; and may be assessed a civil penalty of not more
than one thousand dollars for each subsequent violation found in the
citation or notice of assessment. Each day a violation occurs may
constitute a separate violation. The director or director's authorized
representative may also claim the remedies in RCW 49.52.070.
(3) The director of labor and industries may waive collection of a
portion or all of the penalties assessed under this chapter in favor of
the full payment of wages owed to the employee.
(4) The director of labor and industries, or the director's
authorized representative, may require payment of unpaid wages and may
assess all civil penalties authorized by this section. When
considering the amount of penalties for multiple violations found in a
citation and notice of assessment, the director, or the director's
authorized representative, may consider the appropriateness of the
penalty with respect to the number of affected employees of the
employer being charged for each violation, the gravity of the
violations, the duration of the violations, the size of the employer's
business, the good faith of the employer, the history of previous
violations, and other relevant factors.
(5) Civil penalties imposed under this chapter shall be paid to the
director of labor and industries for deposit in the supplemental
pension fund established under RCW 51.44.033.
(6) The employer shall pay wages and the civil penalty amount
assessed under this section within thirty days of receipt of the
assessment or notify the director of his or her intent to appeal the
citation or the assessment penalty as provided in section 9 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer found to have violated any of the provisions of
this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one
hundred dollars and not more than one thousand dollars for each
violation per employee, and may be assessed a civil penalty of not more
than one thousand dollars for each subsequent violation found in the
citation or notice of assessment. Each day a violation occurs may
constitute a separate violation.
(2) Civil penalties imposed under this chapter shall be paid to the
director for deposit in the supplemental pension fund established under
RCW 51.44.033.
(3) The employer shall pay the civil penalty amount assessed under
this section within thirty days of receipt of the assessment or notify
the director of his or her intent to appeal the citation or the
assessment penalty as provided in section 10 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.46.100 and 1959 c 294 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any employer who hinders or delays the director or ((his)) the
director's authorized representatives in the performance of ((his)) the
director's duties in the enforcement of this chapter, or refuses to
admit the director or ((his)) the director's authorized representatives
to any place of employment, or fails to make, keep, and preserve any
records as required under the provisions of this chapter, or falsifies
any such record, or refuses to make any record accessible to the
director or ((his)) the director's authorized representatives upon
demand, or refuses to furnish a sworn statement of such record or any
other information required for the proper enforcement of this chapter
to the director or ((his)) the director's authorized representatives
upon demand, or pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate less than the
rate applicable under this chapter, or otherwise violates any provision
of this chapter or of any regulation issued under this chapter shall be
deemed in violation of this chapter and shall, upon conviction
therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) Any employer who discharges or in any other manner
discriminates against any employee because such employee has made any
complaint to his or her employer, to the director, or ((his)) the
director's authorized representatives that he or she has not been paid
wages in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or that the
employer has violated any provision of this chapter, or because such
employee has caused to be instituted or is about to cause to be
instituted any proceeding under or related to this chapter, or because
such employee has testified or is about to testify in any such
proceeding shall be deemed in violation of this chapter and shall, upon
conviction therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 5 RCW 49.48.020 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person, firm, or corporation which violates any of the
provisions of RCW 49.48.010 through 49.48.030 ((and)), 49.48.060, and
section 2 of this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 6 RCW 49.48.040 and 1987 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of labor and industries may:
(a) Conduct investigations to enforce section 2 of this act and to
ensure compliance with this chapter and chapters 39.12, 49.12, 49.28,
49.30, 49.46, and 49.52 RCW, upon obtaining information indicating an
employer may be committing a violation under these chapters ((39.12,
49.46, and 49.48 RCW, conduct investigations to ensure compliance with
chapters 39.12, 49.46, and 49.48 RCW));
(b) Order the payment of all wages owed the workers, including
interest of up to one percent per month on the unpaid wages, also to be
paid to the worker, and institute actions necessary for the collection
of the sums determined owed either under section 2 of this act or in a
civil action in the name of the department brought in superior court or
other court of competent jurisdiction of the county where the violation
is alleged to have occurred, or the department may use the procedures
for collection of wages in a court action set forth in this chapter and
chapter 49.52 RCW; and
(c) ((Take assignments of wage claims and)) Prosecute actions for
the collection of wages ((of)), including interest of up to one percent
per month on the unpaid wages, also to be paid to the worker, for
persons who are financially unable to employ counsel when in the
judgment of the director of the department the claims are valid and
enforceable ((in the courts)).
(2) The director of the department or any authorized representative
may, for the purpose of carrying out RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080
and section 2 of this act: (a) Issue subpoenas to compel the
attendance of witnesses or parties and the production of books, papers,
or records; (b) administer oaths and examine witnesses under oath; (c)
take the verification of proof of instruments of writing; and (d) take
depositions and affidavits. If assignments for wage claims are taken,
court costs shall not be payable by the department for prosecuting such
suits.
(3) The director shall have a seal inscribed "Department of Labor
and Industries--State of Washington" and all courts shall take judicial
notice of such seal. Obedience to subpoenas issued by the director or
authorized representative shall be enforced by the courts in any
county.
(4) The director or authorized representative shall have free
access to all places and works of labor. Any employer or any agent or
employee of such employer who refuses the director or authorized
representative admission therein, or who, when requested by the
director or authorized representative, willfully neglects or refuses to
furnish the director or authorized representative any statistics or
information pertaining to his or her lawful duties, which statistics or
information may be in his or her possession or under the control of the
employer or agent, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(5) An action for relief under this section shall be commenced
within three years after the cause of action accrues, unless a longer
period of time applies under law.

Sec. 7 RCW 49.48.060 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If upon investigation by the director, ((after taking
assignments of any wage claim under RCW 49.48.040,)) it appears to the
director that the employer is representing to his or her employees that
he or she is able to pay wages for their services and that the
employees are not being paid for their services, the director may
require the employer to give a bond in such sum as the director deems
reasonable and adequate in the circumstances, with sufficient surety,
conditioned that the employer will for a definite future period not
exceeding six months conduct his or her business and pay his or her
employees in accordance with the laws of the state of Washington.
(2) If within ten days after demand for such bond the employer
fails to provide the same, the director may commence a suit against the
employer in the superior court of appropriate jurisdiction to compel
him or her to furnish such bond or cease doing business until he or she
has done so. The employer shall have the burden of proving the amount
thereof to be excessive.
(3) If the court finds that there is just cause for requiring such
bond and that the same is reasonable, necessary or appropriate to
secure the prompt payment of the wages of the employees of such
employer and his or her compliance with RCW 49.48.010 through
49.48.080, the court shall enjoin such employer from doing business in
this state until the requirement is met, or shall make other, and may
make further, orders appropriate to compel compliance with the
requirement.
Upon being informed of a wage claim against an employer or former
employer, the director shall, if such claim appears to be just,
immediately notify the employer or former employer, of such claim by
mail. If the employer or former employer fails to pay the claim or
make satisfactory explanation to the director of his or her failure to
do so, within thirty days thereafter, the employer or former employer
shall be liable to a penalty of ten percent of that portion of the
claim found to be justly due. The director shall have a cause of
action against the employer or former employer for the recovery of such
penalty, and the same may be included in any subsequent action by the
director on said wage claim, or may be exercised separately after
adjustment of such wage claim without court action.

Sec. 8 RCW 49.48.070 and 1935 c 96 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the director of labor and industries to
inquire diligently for any violations of RCW 49.48.040 through
49.48.080 and section 2 of this act, and to institute the actions for
penalties herein provided, and to enforce generally the provisions of
RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080 and section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
A person, firm, or corporation aggrieved by a citation or notice of
assessment issued by the department of labor and industries under this
chapter may appeal the action or decision to the director of labor and
industries by filing notice of the appeal with the director within
thirty days of the department's issuance of a citation or notice of
assessment, otherwise the citation or notice of assessment is final and
binding. A notice of appeal filed under this section shall stay the
effectiveness of a citation or notice of the assessment of a penalty
pending review of the appeal by the director. Upon receipt of an
appeal, a hearing shall be held in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
The director shall issue all final orders after the hearing. The final
orders are subject to appeal in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, with
the prevailing party entitled to recover reasonable costs and
attorneys' fees. Orders that are not appealed within the time period
specified in chapter 34.05 RCW are final and binding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
A person, firm, or corporation aggrieved by a citation or notice of
assessment issued by the department of labor and industries under this
chapter may appeal the action or decision to the director of labor and
industries by filing notice of the appeal with the director within
thirty days of the department's issuance of a citation or notice of
assessment, otherwise the citation or notice of assessment is final and
binding. A notice of appeal filed under this section shall stay the
effectiveness of a citation or notice of the assessment of a penalty
pending review of the appeal by the director. Upon receipt of an
appeal, a hearing shall be held in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
The director shall issue all final orders after the hearing. The final
orders are subject to appeal in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, with
the prevailing party entitled to recover reasonable costs and
attorneys' fees. Orders that are not appealed within the time period
specified in chapter 34.05 RCW are final and binding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits an employee from pursuing a
private right of action against an employer for unpaid wages. The
remedies provided for in this chapter are not exclusive and are
concurrent with any other remedy provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits an employee from pursuing a
private right of action against an employer for unpaid wages. The
remedies provided for in this chapter are not exclusive and are
concurrent with any other remedy provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an employer defaults in a payment, penalty, or fine due to
the department of labor and industries after a final order is issued
under this chapter the director of labor and industries or the
director's designee may file with the clerk of any county within the
state, a warrant in the amount of the notice of assessment, plus
interest, penalties, and a filing fee of twenty dollars. The clerk of
the county in which the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a
superior court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause
to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court cause
number assigned to the warrant, the name of the employer mentioned in
the warrant, the amount of payment, penalty, fine due on it, or filing
fee, and the date when the warrant was filed. The aggregate amount of
the warrant as docketed becomes a lien upon the title to, and interest
in, all real and personal property of the employer against whom the
warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case docketed in
the office of the clerk. The sheriff shall proceed upon the warrant in
all respects and with like effect as prescribed by law with respect to
execution or other process issued against rights or property upon
judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction. The warrant so docketed
is sufficient to support the issuance of writs of garnishment in favor
of the state in a manner provided by law in case of judgment, wholly or
partially unsatisfied. The clerk of the court is entitled to a filing
fee which will be added to the amount of the warrant. A copy of the
warrant shall be mailed to the employer within three days of filing
with the clerk.
(2)(a) The director of labor and industries or the director's
designee may issue to any person, firm, corporation, other entity,
municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, a public
corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and order to withhold
and deliver property of any kind when he or she has reason to believe
that there is in the possession of the person, firm, corporation, other
entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state,
public corporation, or agency of the state, property that is or will
become due, owing, or belonging to an employer upon whom a notice of
assessment has been served by the department of labor and industries
for payments, penalties, or fines due to the department. The effect of
a notice and order is continuous from the date the notice and order is
first made until the liability out of which the notice and order arose
is satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time. The
department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of
which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable
by reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the
notice and order was made that the notice and order has been released.
(b) The notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by
the sheriff of the county or by the sheriff's deputy, by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or by an authorized representative of
the director. A person, firm, corporation, other entity, municipal
corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or
agency of the state upon whom service has been made shall answer the
notice within twenty days exclusive of the day of service, under oath
and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired of
in the notice and order. Upon service of the notice and order, if the
party served possesses any property that may be subject to the claim of
the department, the party shall promptly deliver the property to the
director or the director's authorized representative. The director
shall hold the property in trust for application on the employer's
indebtedness to the department, or for return without interest, in
accordance with a final determination of a petition for review. In the
alternative, the party shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond
satisfactory to the director conditioned upon final determination of
liability. If a party served and named in the notice fails to answer
the notice within the time prescribed in this section, the court may
render judgment by default against the party for the full amount
claimed by the director in the notice, together with costs. If a
notice is served upon an employer and the property subject to it is
wages, the employer may assert in the answer all exemptions provided
for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner is entitled.
(3) In addition to the procedure for collection of a payment,
penalty, or fine due to the department of labor and industries as set
forth in this section, the department may recover civil penalties
imposed under this chapter in a civil action in the name of the
department brought in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county
where the violation is alleged to have occurred.
(4) This section does not affect other collection remedies that are
otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an employer defaults in a payment, penalty, or fine due to
the department of labor and industries after a final order is issued
under this chapter the director of labor and industries or director's
designee may file with the clerk of any county within the state, a
warrant in the amount of the notice of assessment, plus interest,
penalties, and a filing fee of twenty dollars. The clerk of the county
in which the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a superior
court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause to be
entered in the judgment docket under the superior court cause number
assigned to the warrant, the name of the employer mentioned in the
warrant, the amount of payment, penalty, fine due on it, or filing fee,
and the date when the warrant was filed. The aggregate amount of the
warrant as docketed becomes a lien upon the title to, and interest in,
all real and personal property of the employer against whom the warrant
is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case docketed in the
office of the clerk. The sheriff shall proceed upon the warrant in all
respects and with like effect as prescribed by law with respect to
execution or other process issued against rights or property upon
judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction. The warrant so docketed
is sufficient to support the issuance of writs of garnishment in favor
of the state in a manner provided by law in case of judgment, wholly or
partially unsatisfied. The clerk of the court is entitled to a filing
fee which will be added to the amount of the warrant. A copy of the
warrant shall be mailed to the employer within three days of filing
with the clerk.
(2)(a) The director of labor and industries or the director's
designee may issue to any person, firm, corporation, other entity,
municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, a public
corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and order to withhold
and deliver property of any kind when he or she has reason to believe
that there is in the possession of the person, firm, corporation, other
entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state,
public corporation, or agency of the state, property that is or will
become due, owing, or belonging to an employer upon whom a notice of
assessment has been served by the department of labor and industries
for payments, penalties, or fines due to the department. The effect of
a notice and order is continuous from the date the notice and order is
first made until the liability out of which the notice and order arose
is satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time. The
department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of
which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable
by reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the
notice and order was made that the notice and order has been released.
(b) The notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by
the sheriff of the county or by the sheriff's deputy, by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or by an authorized representative of
the director. A person, firm, corporation, other entity, municipal
corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or
agency of the state upon whom service has been made shall answer the
notice within twenty days exclusive of the day of service, under oath
and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired of
in the notice and order. Upon service of the notice and order, if the
party served possesses any property that may be subject to the claim of
the department, the party shall promptly deliver the property to the
director or the director's authorized representative. The director
shall hold the property in trust for application on the employer's
indebtedness to the department, or for return without interest, in
accordance with a final determination of a petition for review. In the
alternative, the party shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond
satisfactory to the director conditioned upon final determination of
liability. If a party served and named in the notice fails to answer
the notice within the time prescribed in this section, the court may
render judgment by default against the party for the full amount
claimed by the director in the notice, together with costs. If a
notice is served upon an employer and the property subject to it is
wages, the employer may assert in the answer all exemptions provided
for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner is entitled.
(3) In addition to the procedure for collection of a payment,
penalty, or fine due to the department of labor and industries as set
forth in this section, the department may recover civil penalties
imposed under this chapter in a civil action in the name of the
department brought in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county
where the violation is alleged to have occurred.
(4) This section does not affect other collection remedies that are
otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of labor and industries may adopt rules to carry out
the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The director may adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

--- END ---