BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.010 and 1990 c 33 s 237 are each amended to
read as follows:
School district boards of directors shall identify and offer
courses with content that meet or exceed: (1) The basic education
skills identified in RCW 28A.150.210; (2) the graduation requirements
under RCW 28A.230.090; ((and)) (3) the courses required to meet the
minimum college entrance requirements under RCW 28A.230.130; and (4)
the course options for career development under RCW 28A.230.130. Such
courses may be applied or theoretical, academic, or vocational.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.130 and 1991 c 116 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community college or another school
district, for students whose educational plans include application for
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. The program shall help these students to meet at
least the minimum entrance requirements under RCW 28B.10.050.
(2) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community or technical college, a
skills center, an apprenticeship committee, or another school district,
for students who plan to pursue career or work opportunities other than
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. These programs may:
(a) Help students demonstrate the application of essential academic
learning requirements to the world of work, occupation-specific skills,
knowledge of more than one career in a chosen pathway, and
employability and leadership skills; and
(b) Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to
prepare for industry certification, and/or have the opportunity to
articulate to postsecondary education and training programs.
(3) The state board of education, upon request from local school
districts, may grant ((temporary exemptions)) waivers from the
requirements to provide the program described in subsections (1) and
(2) of this section for reasons relating to school district size and
the availability of staff authorized to teach subjects which must be
provided. In considering waiver requests related to programs in
subsection (2) of this section, the state board of education shall
consider the extent to which the school district has offered such
programs before the 2003-04 school year.

--- END ---