BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.300 and 1997 c 429 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a final order that shall be based
exclusively on whether or not a state agency, county, or city is in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs, or
chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development
regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the final
order shall be issued within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the
petition for review, or, if multiple petitions are filed, within one
hundred eighty days of receipt of the last petition that is
consolidated.
(b) The board may extend the period of time for issuing a decision
to enable the parties to settle the dispute if additional time is
necessary to achieve a settlement, and (i) an extension is requested by
all parties, or (ii) an extension is requested by the petitioner and
respondent and the board determines that a negotiated settlement
between the remaining parties could resolve significant issues in
dispute. The request must be filed with the board not later than seven
days before the date scheduled for the hearing on the merits of the
petition. The board may authorize one or more extensions for up to
ninety days each, subject to the requirements of this section.
(3) In the final order, the board shall either:
(a) Find that the state agency, county, or city is in compliance
with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates
to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter
43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development regulations,
and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or
(b) Find that the state agency, county, or city is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs,
or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development
regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW, in which case the board shall remand the matter to the
affected state agency, county, or city. The board shall specify a
reasonable time not in excess of one hundred eighty days, or such
longer period as determined by the board in cases of unusual scope or
complexity, within which the state agency, county, or city shall comply
with the requirements of this chapter. The board may require periodic
reports to the board on the progress the jurisdiction is making towards
compliance.
(4) Unless the board makes a determination of invalidity as
provided in RCW 36.70A.302, a finding of noncompliance and an order of
remand shall not affect the validity of comprehensive plans and
development regulations during the period of remand.
(5) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the hearings board
may appeal the decision to superior court as provided in RCW 34.05.514
or 36.01.050 within thirty days of the final order of the board.
(6) A final order must clearly state the requirements for
compliance with the order. If a board subsequently finds that the
state agency, county, or city complies with the requirements of the
prior final order of the board, then the board must find compliance in
that case.

--- END ---