BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When an offender convicted of a sex or kidnapping offense
committed on or after July 1, 2003, is classified as a level III
offender, the department may not approve release to, or any later
residence that is within one mile of any licensed day care facility,
preschool, or any public or private primary or secondary school during
any period that the offender is under supervision in the community.
(2)(a) The department shall require, as a condition of supervision,
that all sex and kidnapping offenders under its authority convicted of
a sex or kidnapping offense committed on or after July 1, 2003, and
classified as level III offenders to wear an electronic home monitoring
device at all times during their period of supervision in the
community. To the extent that electronic home monitoring devices
employing global positioning system technology or other advanced
technology to provide a precise real-time location are available, they
shall be utilized.
(b) The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring
as part of his or her cost of supervision. The department may add the
cost to the current cost of supervision fees. If the offender is
indigent, or the payment of the cost of electronic home monitoring
would make the offender unable to pay restitution, child support, or
other legal financial obligations, the department may waive or reduce
the payment of the cost of electronic home monitoring.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When an offender convicted of a sex or kidnapping offense
committed on or after July 1, 2003, is classified as a level III
offender, the board may not approve release to, or any later residence
that is within one mile of any licensed day care facility, preschool,
or any public or private primary or secondary school during any period
that the offender is under supervision in the community.
(2)(a) The board shall require, as a condition of supervision, that
all sex and kidnapping offenders under its authority convicted of a sex
or kidnapping offense committed on or after July 1, 2003, and
classified as level III offenders to wear an electronic home monitoring
device at all times during their period of supervision in the
community. To the extent that electronic home monitoring devices
employing global positioning system technology or other advanced
technology to provide a precise real-time location are available, they
shall be utilized.
(b) The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring
as part of his or her cost of supervision. The board may add the cost
to the current cost of supervision fees. If the offender is indigent,
or the payment of the cost of electronic home monitoring would make the
offender unable to pay restitution, child support, or other legal
financial obligations, the board may waive or reduce the payment of the
cost of electronic home monitoring.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---