BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this chapter is to provide
for the development, establishment, and enforcement of standards for
the maintenance and operation of assisted living facilities. Assisted
living is a housing option in long-term care that maximizes residents'
independence and dignity in combining personal care and possibly
health-related services in a residential setting. An assisted living
residence is not a nursing home. The distinguishing characteristic of
assisted living is its philosophy of supporting the particular and
changing needs of the individual, supporting lifestyle choices, and
minimizing the need to move. Taking into account the advancing
knowledge in the care of the aged, assisted living facilities promote
safe and adequate care as well as accommodate individual resident's
changing needs and preferences; protect residents' rights; maximize
residents' dignity, autonomy, privacy, independence, choice, safety,
quality of life, and quality of care and encourage family and community
involvement of the individuals who have chosen to make an assisted
living facility their home.
It is further the intent of the legislature that assisted living
facilities be available to meet the needs of those for whom they care
by recognizing the capabilities of individuals to direct their self-medication or to use supervised self-medication techniques when ordered
and approved by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW
or a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW.
The legislature finds that many residents of community-based long-term care facilities are vulnerable, and their health and well-being
are dependent on their caregivers. The quality, skills, and knowledge
of their caregivers are often the key to good care. The legislature
finds that the need for well-trained caregivers is growing as the
state's population ages and residents' needs increase. The legislature
intends that current training standards be enhanced without unduly
creating impediments for those who wish to become caregivers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aged person" means a person of age sixty-five years or more,
or a person of less than sixty-five years who by reason of infirmity
requires assistance with the activities of daily living.
(2) "Assisted living facility" means any residential setting that
provides twenty-four-hour response to assistance with the activities of
daily living on a scheduled and unscheduled basis determined by a
negotiated service plan, and that may provide or coordinate health-related services. Other services provided include, but are not limited
to: Social and recreational services, meals, housekeeping, and
laundry. "Assisted living facility" does not include facilities
certified as group training homes pursuant to RCW 71A.22.040, boarding
homes licensed under RCW 18.20.030, nor any home, institution, or
section thereof which is otherwise licensed and regulated under the
provisions of state law providing specifically for the licensing and
regulation of such home, institution, or section thereof. Nor does it
include any independent senior housing, independent living units in
continuing care retirement communities, or other similar living
situations including those subsidized by the department of housing and
urban development.
(3) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal
successor thereof.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(5) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 After January 1, 2004, no person may
operate or maintain an assisted living facility within this state
without a license under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 An application for a license must be made
to the department upon forms provided by the department and must
contain such information as the department reasonably requires, which
includes affirmative evidence of ability to comply with rules adopted
by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Upon receipt of an application for a
license, if the applicant and the assisted living facilities meet the
requirements established under this chapter and the facilities are
approved under section 11 of this act, the department shall issue a
license. If there is a failure to comply with the provisions of this
chapter or the standards and rules adopted under this chapter, the
department may in its discretion issue to an applicant for a license,
or for the renewal of a license, a provisional license that permits the
operation of the assisted living facility for a period to be determined
by the department, but not to exceed twelve months. The provisional
license is not subject to renewal. At the time of the application for
or renewal of a license or provisional license, the licensee shall pay
a license fee as established by the department under RCW 43.20B.110.
All licenses issued under this chapter expire on a date to be set by
the department, but no license issued pursuant to this chapter may
exceed twelve months in duration. However, when the annual license
renewal date of a previously licensed assisted living facility is set
by the department on a date less than twelve months prior to the
expiration date of a license in effect at the time of reissuance, the
license fee must be prorated on a monthly basis and a credit allowed at
the first renewal of a license for any period of one month or more
covered by the previous license. All applications for renewal of a
license must be made not later than thirty days prior to the date of
expiration of the license. Each license must be issued only for the
premises and persons named in the application, and no license is
transferable or assignable. Licenses must be posted in a conspicuous
place on the licensed premises.
A licensee who receives notification of the department's initiation
of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of an assisted
living facility license may, in lieu of appealing the department's
action, surrender or relinquish the license. The department shall not
issue a new license to or contract with the licensee, for the purposes
of providing care to vulnerable adults or children, for a period of
twenty years following the surrender or relinquishment of the former
license. The licensing record must indicate that the licensee
relinquished or surrendered the license, without admitting the
violations, after receiving notice of the department's initiation of a
denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall adopt rules with
respect to all assisted living facilities and operators to be licensed
under this chapter designed to further the accomplishment of the
purposes of this chapter to promote safe and adequate care; respect
resident's rights; and maximize residents' dignity, autonomy, privacy,
independence, choice, safety, quality of life, and the interest of
public health, safety, and welfare. These rules may not restrict the
ability of individuals to negotiate their care with the assisted living
providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department shall make or cause to be
made at least a yearly inspection of all assisted living facilities.
Every inspection must focus primarily on actual or potential resident
outcomes and satisfaction, and may include an inspection of every part
of the premises and an examination of all records other than financial
records, methods of administration, the general and special dietary,
and the stores and methods of supply. The focus of the inspection
shall not be on physical plant, procedural, and documentations
standards. Following such an inspection, written notice of any
violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter must
be given to the applicant or licensee and the department. The written
notice must include specific statutes or rules violated, the specific
facts of the violation, and the rationale for any remedy or punitive
action imposed on the assisted living facility, including any
department policies, procedures, interpretative guidelines, or advisory
letters. The department may require by rule that any licensee or
applicant desiring to make specified types of alterations or additions
to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before
commencing such alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans
and specifications to the agencies responsible for plan reviews for
preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with respect to
compliance with state and local building codes. After the final
approval of the alterations or additions to facilities or the
construction of new facilities has been granted, the department shall
no longer inspect the physical plant for compliance, unless a
substantial change to the physical plant is noticed by the inspector
during an inspection or compliance investigation. Oversight of the
housing component is a function of local health and safety enforcement
agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department shall develop and make
available to assisted living facilities a quality improvement
consultation program using the following principles:
(1) The program must be resident-centered and promote privacy,
independence, dignity, choice, and a home or home-like environment for
residents consistent with chapter 70.129 RCW.
(2) The goal of the program is continuous quality improvement with
the focus on resident satisfaction and outcomes for residents. The
quality improvement consultation program must be offered to assisted
living facilities on a voluntary basis. Based on requests for the
services of the quality improvement consultation program, the
department may establish a process for prioritizing service
availability.
(3) Assisted living facilities should be supported in their efforts
to improve quality and address problems, as identified by the licensee,
initially through training, consultation, and technical assistance. At
a minimum, the department may, within available funding, at the request
of the assisted living facility, conduct on-site visits and telephone
consultations.
(4) To facilitate collaboration and trust between the assisted
living facility and the department's quality improvement consultation
program staff, the consultation program staff shall not simultaneously
serve as department licensors, complaint investigators, or participants
in any enforcement-related decisions, within the region in which they
perform consultation activities; except such staff may investigate, on
an emergency basis, complaints anywhere in the state when the complaint
indicates high risk to resident health or safety. Any records or
information gained as a result of quality improvement consultation
program work may not be disclosed to or shared with nonmanagerial
department licensing or complaint investigation staff, unless necessary
to carry out duties described under chapter 74.34 RCW. The emphasis
should be on problem prevention. Nothing in this section limits or
interferes with the consultant's mandated reporting duties under
chapter 74.34 RCW.
(5) The department shall promote the development of a training
system that is practical and relevant to the needs of residents and
staff. To improve access to training, especially for rural
communities, the training system may include, but is not limited to,
the use of satellite technology distance learning that is coordinated
through community colleges or other appropriate organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Information received by the department
through filed reports or inspections, or as otherwise authorized under
this chapter, may not be disclosed publicly in any manner that
identifies individuals or assisted living facilities, except at the
specific request of a member of the public if disclosure is consistent
with RCW 42.17.260(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Monitoring must be outcome-based and
responsive to resident complaints and a clear set of health, quality of
care, and safety standards that are easily understandable and have been
made available to facilities. When conducting licensing inspections,
the department shall interview an appropriate percentage of residents,
family members, and advocates in addition to interviewing appropriate
staff.
(2) Prompt and specific enforcement remedies must be implemented
without delay, consistent with section 18 of this act, for facilities
found to have delivered care or failed to deliver care resulting in
problems that are serious, recurring, or uncorrected, or that create a
hazard that is causing or likely to cause death or serious harm to one
or more residents. Enforcement remedies may also include, when
appropriate, reasonable conditions on a license. In the selection of
remedies, the safety, health, and well-being of residents must be of
paramount importance.
(3) To the extent funding is available, the licensee,
administrator, and their staff must be screened through background
checks in a uniform and timely manner to ensure that they do not have
a criminal history that would disqualify them from working with
vulnerable adults. Employees may be provisionally hired pending the
results of the background check if they have been given three positive
references.
(4) No licensee, administrator, or staff, or prospective licensee,
administrator, or staff, with a stipulated finding of fact, conclusion
of law, and agreed order, or finding of fact, conclusion of law, or
final order issued by a disciplining authority, a court of law, or
entered into the state registry, finding him or her guilty of abuse,
neglect, exploitation, or abandonment of a minor or a vulnerable adult
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW may be employed in the care of and have
unsupervised access to vulnerable adults.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Standards for fire protection and their
enforcement, with respect to all assisted living facilities to be
licensed under this chapter, is the responsibility of the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, who
shall adopt standards applicable to assisted living facilities for the
protection of life against the cause and spread of fire and fire
hazards. The department, upon receipt of an application for a license,
shall submit to the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection, in writing, a request for an inspection,
giving the applicant's name and the location of the premises to be
licensed. Upon receipt of the request, the chief of the Washington
state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or his or her
deputy, shall make an inspection of the assisted living facility to be
licensed. If it is found that the premises do not comply with the
required safety standards and fire rules, the chief of the Washington
state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall promptly
make a written report to the assisted living facility and the
department as to the manner and time allowed for the premises to
qualify for a license and the conditions to be remedied with respect to
fire rules. The department, applicant, or licensee shall notify the
chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, upon completion of any requirements, and the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or
his or her deputy, shall make a reinspection of the premises. The
chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, shall submit to the department a written report when the
assisted living facility is approved with respect to fire protection.
The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, shall make or cause to be made inspections of assisted
living facilities at least annually.
In cities which have a paid chief of a paid fire department and
have in force a comprehensive building code, the provisions of which
are determined by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection, to be equal to the minimum standards of
the code for assisted living facilities adopted by the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, the
chief of the fire department shall make the inspection with the chief
of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, or his or her deputy, and they must jointly approve the
premises.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Any person operating or maintaining an
assisted living facility without a license under this chapter is guilty
of a misdemeanor. Each day of a continuing violation is to be
considered a separate offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Notwithstanding the existence or use of
any other remedy, the department may, in the manner provided by law,
upon the advice of the attorney general who shall represent the
department in the proceedings, maintain an action in the name of the
state for an injunction or other process against any person to restrain
or prevent the operation or maintenance of an assisted living facility
without a license under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 No person operating an assisted living
facility licensed under this chapter shall admit to or retain in the
assisted living facility any aged person requiring nursing or medical
care of a type provided by institutions licensed under chapter 18.51,
70.41, or 71.12 RCW, except that supervised medication service may be
provided when registered nurses are available and upon a doctor's order
that a supervised medication service is needed. Supervised medication
services, as defined by the department, may include an approved program
of self-medication or self-directed medication. Such medication
service may be provided only to residents who otherwise meet all
requirements for residency in an assisted living facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Nothing in this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter are to be construed as authorizing the
supervision, regulation, or control of the remedial care or treatment
of residents in any assisted living facility conducted for those who
rely upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the
creed or tenets of any well-recognized church or religious
denomination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 RCW 70.129.005 through 70.129.030,
70.129.040(1), and 70.129.050 through 70.129.170 apply to this chapter
and persons regulated under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) The department shall establish and
maintain a toll-free telephone number for receiving complaints
regarding a facility that the department licenses.
(2) All facilities that are licensed under this chapter shall post
in a place and manner clearly visible to residents and visitors the
department's toll-free complaint telephone number and the toll-free
number and program description of the long-term care ombudsman as
provided by RCW 43.190.050.
(3) The department shall investigate complaints if the subject of
the complaint is within its authority unless the department determines
that: (a) The complaint is intended to willfully harass a licensee or
employee of the licensee; or (b) there is no reasonable basis for
investigation; or (c) corrective action has been taken as determined by
the ombudsman or the department.
(4) The department shall refer complaints to appropriate state
agencies, law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, the long-term
care ombudsman, or other entities if the department lacks authority to
investigate or if its investigation reveals that a follow-up referral
to one or more of these entities is appropriate.
(5) The department shall adopt rules that include the following
complaint investigation protocols:
(a) Upon receipt of a complaint, the department shall make a
preliminary review of the complaint, assess the severity of the
complaint, and assign an appropriate response time. Complaints
involving imminent danger to the health, safety, or well-being of a
resident must be responded to within two days. When appropriate, the
department shall make an on-site investigation within a reasonable time
after receipt of the complaint or otherwise ensure that complaints are
responded to.
(b) The complainant must be: Promptly contacted by the department,
unless anonymous or unavailable despite several attempts by the
department, and informed of the right to discuss alleged violations
with the inspector and to provide other information the complainant
believes will assist the inspector; informed of the department's course
of action; and informed of the right to receive a written copy of the
investigation report.
(c) In conducting the investigation, the department shall interview
the complainant, unless anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to
interview the resident or residents allegedly harmed by the violations,
and, in addition to facility staff, any available independent sources
of relevant information, including if appropriate the family members of
the resident.
(d) Substantiated complaints involving harm to a resident, if an
applicable law or rule has been violated, are subject to one or more of
the actions provided in Section 18 of this act. Whenever appropriate,
the department shall also give consultation and technical assistance to
the facility.
(e) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been ordered, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from request for
revisit to ensure correction of the violation. For violations that are
serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous citation, and
create actual or threatened harm to one or more residents' well-being,
including violations of residents' rights, the department shall make an
on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to ensure correction of the
violation. Verification of correction of all other violations may be
made by either a department on-site revisit or by written or
photographic documentation found by the department to be credible.
This subsection does not prevent the department from enforcing license
suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this subsection interferes with
or diminishes the department's authority and duty to ensure that the
provider adequately cares for residents, including departmental on-site
revisits as needed to ensure that the provider protects residents and
to enforce compliance with this chapter.
(f) Substantiated complaints of neglect, abuse, exploitation, or
abandonment of residents, or suspected criminal violations, must also
be referred by the department to the appropriate law enforcement
agencies, the attorney general, and appropriate professional
disciplining authority.
(6) The department may provide the substance of the complaint to
the licensee before the completion of the investigation by the
department unless such disclosure would reveal the identity of a
complainant, witness, or resident, who chooses to remain anonymous.
Neither the substance of the complaint provided to the licensee or
contractor nor any copy of the complaint or related report published,
released, or made otherwise available may disclose, or reasonably lead
to the disclosure of, the name, title, or identity of any complainant,
or other person mentioned in the complaint, except that the name of the
provider and the name or names of any officer, employee, or agent of
the department conducting the investigation must be disclosed after the
investigation has been closed and the complaint has been substantiated.
The department may disclose the identity of the complainant if such
disclosure is requested in writing by the complainant. Nothing in this
subsection is to be construed to interfere with the obligation of the
long-term care ombudsman program to monitor the department's licensing,
contract, and complaint investigation files for long-term care
facilities.
(7) A resident has the right to be free of interference, coercion,
discrimination, and reprisal from a facility in exercising his or her
rights, including the right to voice grievances about treatment
furnished or not furnished. A facility licensed under this chapter
shall not discriminate or retaliate in any manner against a resident,
employee, or any other person on the basis or for the reason that such
resident or any other person made a complaint to the department, the
attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the long-term care
ombudsman, provided information, or otherwise cooperated with the
investigation of such a complaint. Any attempt to discharge a resident
against the resident's wishes, or any type of retaliatory treatment of
a resident by whom or upon whose behalf a complaint substantiated by
the department has been made to the department, the attorney general,
law enforcement agencies, or the long-term care ombudsman, within one
year of the filing of the complaint, raises a rebuttable presumption
that such action was in retaliation for the filing of the complaint.
"Retaliatory treatment" means, but is not limited to, monitoring a
resident's phone, mail, or visits; involuntary seclusion or isolation;
transferring a resident to a different room unless requested or based
upon legitimate management reasons; withholding or threatening to
withhold food or treatment unless authorized by a terminally ill
resident or his or her representative pursuant to law; or persistently
delaying responses to a resident's request for service or assistance.
A facility licensed under this chapter shall not willfully interfere
with the performance of official duties by a long-term care ombudsman.
The department shall sanction and may impose a civil penalty of not
more than three thousand dollars for a violation of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) The department may take one or more of
the actions listed in subsection (2) of this section in any case in
which the department finds that an assisted living facility provider
has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Operated an assisted living facility without a license or under
a revoked license;
(c) Knowingly, or with reason to know, made a false statement of
material fact on his or her application for license or any attached
data, or in any matter under investigation by the department; or
(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or
investigation by the department.
(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the
department may take one or more of the following actions:
(a) Refuse to issue a license;
(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a license, such as correction
within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of clients
the provider may admit or serve;
(c) Impose civil penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per
day per violation;
(d) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license; or
(e) Suspend admissions to the assisted living facility by ordering
stop placement.
(3) When the department orders stop placement, the facility shall
not admit any new resident until the stop placement order is
terminated. The department may approve readmission of a resident to
the facility from a hospital or nursing home during the stop placement.
The department shall terminate the stop placement when: (a) The
violations necessitating the stop placement have been corrected; and
(b) the provider exhibits the capacity to maintain correction of the
violations previously found deficient. However, if upon the revisit
the department finds new violations that the department reasonably
believes will result in a new stop placement, the previous stop
placement remains in effect until the new stop placement is imposed.
(4) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been ordered, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from a request for
revisit to ensure correction of the violation. For violations that are
serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous citation, and
create actual or threatened harm to one or more residents' well-being,
including violations of residents' rights, the department shall make an
on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to ensure correction of the
violation. Verification of correction of all other violations may be
made by either a department on-site revisit or by written or
photographic documentation found by the department to be credible.
This subsection does not prevent the department from enforcing license
suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this subsection interferes with
or diminishes the department's authority and duty to ensure that the
provider adequately cares for residents, including departmental on-site
revisits as needed to ensure that the provider protects residents and
to enforce compliance with this chapter.
(5) RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial, revocation,
suspension, or modification. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department
actions under this section, except that orders of the department
imposing license suspension, stop placement, or conditions for
continuation of a license are effective immediately upon notice and
continue pending any hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) The licensee or its designee has the
right to an informal dispute resolution process to dispute any
violation found or enforcement remedy imposed by the department during
a licensing inspection or complaint investigation. The purpose of the
informal dispute resolution process is to provide an opportunity for an
exchange of information that may lead to the modification, deletion, or
removal of a violation, or parts of a violation, or enforcement remedy
imposed by the department.
(2) The informal dispute resolution process provided by the
department must include, but is not necessarily limited to, an
opportunity for review by a department employee who did not participate
in, or oversee, the determination of the violation or enforcement
remedy under dispute. The department shall develop, or further
develop, an informal dispute resolution process consistent with this
section.
(3) A request for an informal dispute resolution must be made to
the department within ten working days from the receipt of a written
finding of a violation or enforcement remedy. The request must
identify the violation or violations and enforcement remedy or remedies
being disputed. The department shall convene a meeting, when possible,
within ten working days of receipt of the request for informal dispute
resolution, unless by mutual agreement a later date is agreed upon.
(4) If the department determines that a violation or enforcement
remedy should not be cited or imposed, the department shall delete the
violation or immediately rescind or modify the enforcement remedy.
Upon request, the department shall issue a clean copy of the revised
report, statement of deficiencies, or notice of enforcement action.
(5) The request for informal dispute resolution does not delay the
effective date of an enforcement remedy imposed by the department,
except that civil monetary fines are not payable until the exhaustion
of any formal hearing and appeal rights provided under this chapter.
The licensee shall submit to the department, within the time period
prescribed by the department, a plan of correction to address any
undisputed violations, and including any violations that still remain
following the informal dispute resolution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The secretary shall suspend the license of
any person who has been certified by a lending agency and reported to
the secretary for nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional scholarship. Prior
to the suspension, the lending agency shall provide the person an
opportunity for a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485
through 34.05.494 and issue a finding of nonpayment or default on a
federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional
scholarship. The person's license may not be reissued until the person
provides the secretary a written release issued by the lending agency
stating that the person is making payments on the loan in accordance
with a repayment agreement approved by the lending agency. If the
person has continued to meet all other requirements for licensure
during the suspension, reinstatement is automatic upon receipt of the
notice and payment of any reinstatement fee the secretary may impose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 The department shall immediately suspend
the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department as a person who is not in compliance with
a support order or visitation order. If the person has continued to
meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license is automatic upon the department's receipt of
a release issued by the department stating that the licensee is in
compliance with the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) The department shall review training
standards for administrators and resident caregiving staff in
coordination with the department of health, the nursing care quality
assurance commission, adult family home providers, assisted living
facility providers, in-home personal care providers, and long-term care
consumers and advocates. Any proposed enhancements must be consistent
with this section, take into account and not duplicate other training
requirements applicable to assisted living facilities and staff, and be
developed with the input of assisted living facilities and resident
representatives, health care professionals, and other vested interest
groups. Training standards and the delivery system must be relevant to
the needs of residents served by the assisted living facilities and
recipients of long-term in-home personal care services and must be
sufficient to ensure that administrators and caregiving staff have the
skills and knowledge necessary to provide high quality, appropriate
care.
(2) The recommendations on training standards and the delivery
system developed under subsection (1) of this section must be based on
a review and consideration of the following: Quality of care;
availability of training; affordability, including the training costs
incurred by the department and private providers; portability of
existing training requirements; competency testing; practical and
clinical coursework; methods of delivery of training; standards for
management and caregiving staff training; and necessary enhancements
for special needs populations and resident rights training. Residents
with special needs include, but are not limited to, residents with a
diagnosis of mental illness, dementia, or developmental disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The secretary may adopt rules and policies
as necessary to entitle the state to participate in federal funding
programs and opportunities and to facilitate state and federal
cooperation in programs under the department's jurisdiction. The
secretary shall ensure that any internal reorganization carried out
under the terms of this chapter complies with prerequisites for the
receipt of federal funding for the various programs under the
department's control. When interpreting any department-related section
or provision of law susceptible to more than one interpretation, the
secretary shall construe that section or provision in the manner most
likely to comply with federal laws and rules entitling the state to
receive federal funds for the various programs of the department. If
any law or rule dealing with the department is ruled to be in conflict
with federal prerequisites to the allocation of federal funding to the
state, the department, or its agencies, the secretary shall declare
that law or rule inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 (1) In an effort to ensure a cooperative
process among the department, assisted living facility provider
representatives, and resident and family representatives on matters
pertaining to the assisted living program, the secretary, or his or her
designee, shall designate an advisory board. The advisory board must
include representatives of the statewide associations representing
assisted living facilities, the state long-term care ombudsman program,
the statewide resident council program, consumers, and family
representatives. Depending on the topic to be discussed, the
department may invite other representatives in addition to the named
members of the advisory board. The secretary, or his or her designee,
shall periodically, but not less than quarterly, convene a meeting of
the advisory board to encourage open dialogue on matters affecting the
assisted living facility program. It is, minimally, expected that the
department will discuss with the advisory board the department's
inspection, enforcement, and quality improvement activities, in
addition to seeking their comments and recommendations on matters
described under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The secretary, or his or her designee, shall seek comments and
recommendations from the advisory board prior to the adoption of rules
and standards, implementation of assisted living facility provider
programs, or development of methods and rates of payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 (1) The definitions in this subsection
apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Caregiver" includes any person who provides residents with
hands-on personal care on behalf of an assisted living facility, except
volunteers who are directly supervised.
(b) "Direct supervision" means oversight by a person who has
demonstrated competency in the core areas or has been fully exempted
from the training requirements pursuant to this section, is on the
premises, and is quickly and easily available to the caregiver.
(2) Training must have the following components: Orientation,
basic training, specialty training as appropriate, and continuing
education. All assisted living facility employees or volunteers who
routinely interact with residents shall complete orientation. Assisted
living facility administrators, or their designees, and caregivers
shall complete orientation, basic training, specialty training as
appropriate, and continuing education.
(3) Orientation consists of introductory information on residents'
rights, communication skills, fire and life safety, and universal
precautions. Orientation must be provided at the facility by
appropriate assisted living facility staff to all assisted living
facility employees before the employees have routine interaction with
residents.
(4) Basic training consists of modules on the core knowledge and
skills that caregivers need to learn and understand to effectively and
safely provide care to residents. Basic training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the basic training must be measured by
demonstrated competency in the core areas through the use of a
competency test. Basic training must be completed by caregivers within
one hundred twenty days of the date on which they begin to provide
hands-on care or within one hundred twenty days of September 1, 2003,
whichever is later. Until competency in the core areas has been
demonstrated, caregivers shall not provide hands-on personal care to
residents without direct supervision. Assisted living administrators,
or their designees, must complete basic training and demonstrate
competency within one hundred twenty days of employment or within one
hundred twenty days of September 1, 2003, whichever is later.
(5) For assisted living facilities that serve residents with
special needs such as dementia, developmental disabilities, or mental
illness, specialty training is required of administrators, or
designees, and caregivers. Specialty training consists of modules on
the core knowledge and skills that caregivers need to effectively and
safely provide care to residents with special needs. Specialty
training should be integrated into basic training wherever appropriate.
Specialty training must be outcome-based, and the effectiveness of the
specialty training measured by demonstrated competency in the core
specialty areas through the use of a competency test. Specialty
training must be completed by caregivers within one hundred twenty days
of the date on which they begin to provide hands-on care to a resident
having special needs or within one hundred twenty days of September 1,
2003, whichever is later. However, if specialty training is not
integrated with basic training, the specialty training must be
completed within ninety days of completion of basic training. Until
competency in the core specialty areas has been demonstrated,
caregivers shall not provide hands-on personal care to residents with
special needs without direct supervision. Assisted living
administrators, or their designees, must complete specialty training
and demonstrate competency within one hundred twenty days of September
1, 2003, or one hundred twenty days from the date on which the
administrator or his or her designee is hired, whichever is later, if
the assisted living facility serves one or more residents with special
needs.
(6) Continuing education consists of ongoing delivery of
information to caregivers on various topics relevant to the care
setting and care needs of residents. Competency testing is not
required for continuing education. Continuing education is not
required in the same calendar year in which basic or modified basic
training is successfully completed. Continuing education is required
in each calendar year thereafter. If specialty training is completed,
the specialty training applies toward any continuing education
requirement for up to two years following the completion of the
specialty training.
(7) Persons who successfully challenge the competency test for
basic training are fully exempt from the basic training requirements of
this section. Persons who successfully challenge the specialty
training competency test are fully exempt from the specialty training
requirements of this section.
(8) Licensed persons who perform the tasks for which they are
licensed are fully or partially exempt from the training requirements
of this section, as specified by the department in rule.
(9) In an effort to improve access to training and education and
reduce costs, especially for rural communities, the coordinated system
of long-term care training and education must include the use of
innovative types of learning strategies such as internet resources,
videotapes, and distance learning using satellite technology
coordinated through community colleges or other entities, as defined by
the department.
(10) The department shall develop criteria for the approval of
orientation, basic training, and specialty training programs.
(11) Assisted living facilities that desire to deliver facility-based training with facility designated trainers, or assisted living
facilities that desire to pool their resources to create shared
training systems, must be encouraged by the department in their
efforts. The department shall develop criteria for reviewing and
approving trainers and training materials that are substantially
similar to or better than the materials developed by the department.
The department may approve a curriculum based upon attestation by an
assisted living facility administrator that the assisted living
facility's training curriculum addresses basic and specialty training
competencies identified by the department. The department shall review
a curriculum to verify that it meets these requirements. The
department may conduct the review as part of the next regularly
scheduled yearly inspection and investigation required under section 7
of this act. The department shall rescind approval of any curriculum
if it determines that the curriculum does not meet these requirements.
(12) The department shall adopt rules by September 1, 2003, for the
implementation of this section.
(13) The orientation, basic training, specialty training, and
continuing education requirements of this section commence September 1,
2003, or one hundred twenty days from the date of employment, whichever
is later, and shall be applied to (a) employees hired subsequent to
September 1, 2003; and (b) existing employees that on September 1,
2003, have not successfully completed the training requirements under
RCW 74.39A.010 or 74.39A.020 and this section. Existing employees who
have not successfully completed the training requirements under RCW
74.39A.010 or 74.39A.020 are subject to all applicable requirements of
this section. However, prior to September 1, 2003, nothing in this
section affects the current training requirements under RCW 74.39A.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 Sections 1 through 26 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---