BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.090 and 1969 ex.s. c 173 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department is hereby authorized to make rules and
regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this title to the
end that this title shall be administered uniformly throughout the
state, and that the spirit and purpose of this title may be complied
with. The department shall have the power to compel compliance with
the rules and regulations established by it. Such rules and
regulations shall be filed in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act, as it is now or hereafter amended, and copies shall be
available for public inspection in the office of the department and in
each county office.
(2) No rule adopted after January 1, 2003, that changes eligibility
standards for adult day services, including requirements that
department of social and health services case managers refer clients to
adult day services, may be implemented until a review of reimbursement
rates to these programs has been conducted by the department and a
report submitted to the legislature no later than December 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---