BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.022 and 2002 c 354 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, "manager" means any employee who:
(1) Formulates statewide policy or directs the work of an agency or
agency subdivision((;
(2))), is responsible to administer one or more statewide policies
or programs of an agency or agency subdivision((;
(3) Manages, administers, and controls a local branch office of an
agency or agency subdivision, including the physical, financial, or
personnel resources;
(4) Has substantial responsibility in personnel administration,
legislative relations, public information, or the preparation and
administration of budgets; or
(5))), and functionally is above the first level of supervision and
exercises authority that is not merely routine or clerical in nature
and requires the consistent use of independent judgment; or
(2) Has substantial responsibility in personnel administration,
legislative relations, public information, or the preparation and
administration of budget.
No employee who is a member of the Washington management service
may be included in a collective bargaining unit established under RCW
41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130.

--- END ---