BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A state agency or department may not purchase in fee simple a
privately owned parcel of land in excess of five contiguous acres in
any county for habitat conservation, ecosystem preservation, wetland
mitigation, or endangered species protection except under the
provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) An agency may purchase more than five contiguous acres under
the provisions of this section if: (a) The appropriate county
legislative authority or authorities have been given the opportunity to
hold a public hearing on the transaction; and (b) following the county
legislative authorities hearing, the legislature takes specific action
directing the agency to make the purchase.
(3) When land is purchased by a state agency or department, the
agency or department must post a bond or otherwise financially
guarantee that the land will be managed for the control of noxious
weeds.

--- END ---