BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.020 and 2001 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Alternative public works contracting procedure" means the
design-build and the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedures authorized in RCW 39.10.051 and 39.10.061,
respectively.
(2) "Public body" means the state department of general
administration; the University of Washington; Washington State
University; every city with a population greater than seventy thousand
and any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730
through 35.21.755 and specifically authorized as provided in RCW
39.10.120(4); every county with a population greater than four hundred
fifty thousand; every port district with total revenues greater than
fifteen million dollars per year; every public utility district with
revenues from energy sales greater than twenty-three million dollars
per year; ((and)) those school districts proposing projects that are
considered and approved by the school district project review board
under RCW 39.10.115; and the state ferry system.
(3) "Public works project" means any work for a public body within
the definition of the term public work in RCW 39.04.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.10.051 and 2002 c 46 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and after complying
with RCW 39.10.030, the following public bodies may utilize the design-build procedure of public works contracting for public works projects
authorized under this section: The state department of general
administration; the state ferry system; the University of Washington;
Washington State University; every city with a population greater than
seventy thousand and any public authority chartered by such city under
RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755 and specifically authorized as provided
in RCW 39.10.120(4); every county with a population greater than four
hundred fifty thousand; every public utility district with revenues
from energy sales greater than twenty-three million dollars per year;
and every port district with total revenues greater than fifteen
million dollars per year. The authority granted to port districts in
this section is in addition to and does not affect existing contracting
authority under RCW 53.08.120 and 53.08.130. For the purposes of this
section, "design-build procedure" means a contract between a public
body and another party in which the party agrees to both design and
build the facility, portion of the facility, or other item specified in
the contract.
(2) Public bodies authorized under this section may utilize the
design-build procedure for public works projects valued over ten
million dollars where:
(a) The construction activities or technologies to be used are
highly specialized and a design-build approach is critical in
developing the construction methodology or implementing the proposed
technology; or
(b) The project design is repetitive in nature and is an incidental
part of the installation or construction; or
(c) Regular interaction with and feedback from facilities users and
operators during design is not critical to an effective facility
design.
(3) Public bodies authorized under this section may also use the
design-build procedure for the following projects that meet the
criteria in subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this section:
(a) The construction or erection of preengineered metal buildings
or prefabricated modular buildings, regardless of cost; or
(b) The construction of new student housing projects valued over
five million dollars.
(4) Contracts for design-build services shall be awarded through a
competitive process utilizing public solicitation of proposals for
design-build services. The public body shall publish at least once in
a legal newspaper of general circulation published in or as near as
possible to that part of the county in which the public work will be
done, a notice of its request for proposals for design-build services
and the availability and location of the request for proposal
documents. The request for proposal documents shall include:
(a) A detailed description of the project including programmatic,
performance, and technical requirements and specifications, functional
and operational elements, minimum and maximum net and gross areas of
any building, and, at the discretion of the public body, preliminary
engineering and architectural drawings;
(b) The reasons for using the design-build procedure;
(c) A description of the qualifications to be required of the
proposer including, but not limited to, submission of the proposer's
accident prevention program;
(d) A description of the process the public body will use to
evaluate qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors and
the relative weight of factors. Evaluation factors shall include, but
not be limited to: Proposal price; ability of professional personnel;
past performance on similar projects; ability to meet time and budget
requirements; ability to provide a performance and payment bond for the
project; recent, current, and projected work loads of the firm;
location; and the concept of the proposal;
(e) The form of the contract to be awarded;
(f) The amount to be paid to finalists submitting best and final
proposals who are not awarded a design-build contract; and
(g) Other information relevant to the project.
(5) The public body shall establish a committee to evaluate the
proposals based on the factors, weighting, and process identified in
the request for proposals. Based on its evaluation, the public body
shall select not fewer than three nor more than five finalists to
submit best and final proposals. The public body may, in its sole
discretion, reject all proposals. Design-build contracts shall be
awarded using the procedures in (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(a) Best and final proposals shall be evaluated and scored based on
the factors, weighting, and process identified in the initial request
for proposals. The public body may score the proposals using a system
that measures the quality and technical merits of the proposal on a
unit price basis. Final proposals may not be considered if the
proposal cost is greater than the maximum allowable construction cost
identified in the initial request for proposals. The public body shall
initiate negotiations with the firm submitting the highest scored best
and final proposal. If the public body is unable to execute a contract
with the firm submitting the highest scored best and final proposal,
negotiations with that firm may be suspended or terminated and the
public body may proceed to negotiate with the next highest scored firm.
Public bodies shall continue in accordance with this procedure until a
contract agreement is reached or the selection process is terminated.
(b) If the public body determines that all finalists are capable of
producing plans and specifications that adequately meet project
requirements, the public body may award the contract to the firm that
submits the responsive best and final proposal with the lowest price.
(6) The firm awarded the contract shall provide a performance and
payment bond for the contracted amount. The public body shall provide
appropriate honorarium payments to finalists submitting best and final
proposals who are not awarded a design-build contract. Honorarium
payments shall be sufficient to generate meaningful competition among
potential proposers on design-build projects.
(7) The authority provided to the state ferry system in this
section is limited to projects concerning construction, renovation,
preservation, demolition, and reconstruction of ferry terminals and
associated land-based facilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.10.061 and 2002 c 46 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and after complying
with RCW 39.10.030, a public body may utilize the general
contractor/construction manager procedure of public works contracting
for public works projects authorized under subsection (2) of this
section. For the purposes of this section, "general
contractor/construction manager" means a firm with which a public body
has selected and negotiated a maximum allowable construction cost to be
guaranteed by the firm, after competitive selection through formal
advertisement and competitive bids, to provide services during the
design phase that may include life-cycle cost design considerations,
value engineering, scheduling, cost estimating, constructability,
alternative construction options for cost savings, and sequencing of
work, and to act as the construction manager and general contractor
during the construction phase.
(2) Except those school districts proposing projects that are
considered and approved by the school district project review board,
public bodies authorized under this section may utilize the general
contractor/construction manager procedure for public works projects
valued over ten million dollars where:
(a) Implementation of the project involves complex scheduling
requirements; or
(b) The project involves construction at an existing facility which
must continue to operate during construction; or
(c) The involvement of the general contractor/construction manager
during the design stage is critical to the success of the project.
(3) Public bodies should select general contractor/construction
managers early in the life of public works projects, and in most
situations no later than the completion of schematic design.
(4) Contracts for the services of a general contractor/construction
manager under this section shall be awarded through a competitive
process requiring the public solicitation of proposals for general
contractor/construction manager services. The public solicitation of
proposals shall include: A description of the project, including
programmatic, performance, and technical requirements and
specifications when available; the reasons for using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure; a description of the
qualifications to be required of the proposer, including submission of
the proposer's accident prevention program; a description of the
process the public body will use to evaluate qualifications and
proposals, including evaluation factors and the relative weight of
factors; the form of the contract to be awarded; the estimated maximum
allowable construction cost; and the bid instructions to be used by the
general contractor/construction manager finalists. Evaluation factors
shall include, but not be limited to: Ability of professional
personnel, past performance in negotiated and complex projects, and
ability to meet time and budget requirements; the scope of work the
general contractor/construction manager proposes to self-perform and
its ability to perform it; location; recent, current, and projected
work loads of the firm; and the concept of their proposal. A public
body shall establish a committee to evaluate the proposals. After the
committee has selected the most qualified finalists, these finalists
shall submit final proposals, including sealed bids for the percent
fee, which is the percentage amount to be earned by the general
contractor/construction manager as overhead and profit, on the
estimated maximum allowable construction cost and the fixed amount for
the detailed specified general conditions work. The public body shall
select the firm submitting the highest scored final proposal using the
evaluation factors and the relative weight of factors published in the
public solicitation of proposals.
(5) The maximum allowable construction cost may be negotiated
between the public body and the selected firm after the scope of the
project is adequately determined to establish a guaranteed contract
cost for which the general contractor/construction manager will provide
a performance and payment bond. The guaranteed contract cost includes
the fixed amount for the detailed specified general conditions work,
the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, the percent fee on
the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, and sales tax. If
the public body is unable to negotiate a satisfactory maximum allowable
construction cost with the firm selected that the public body
determines to be fair, reasonable, and within the available funds,
negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated and the public
body shall negotiate with the next highest scored firm and continue
until an agreement is reached or the process is terminated. If the
maximum allowable construction cost varies more than fifteen percent
from the bid estimated maximum allowable construction cost due to
requested and approved changes in the scope by the public body, the
percent fee shall be renegotiated.
(6) All subcontract work shall be competitively bid with public bid
openings. When critical to the successful completion of a
subcontractor bid package and after publication of notice of intent to
determine bidder eligibility in a legal newspaper of general
circulation published in or as near as possible to that part of the
county in which the public work will be done at least twenty days
before requesting qualifications from interested subcontract bidders,
the owner and general contractor/construction manager may determine
subcontractor bidding eligibility using the following evaluation
criteria:
(a) Adequate financial resources or the ability to secure such
resources;
(b) History of successful completion of a contract of similar type
and scope;
(c) Project management and project supervision personnel with
experience on similar projects and the availability of such personnel
for the project;
(d) Current and projected workload and the impact the project will
have on the subcontractor's current and projected workload;
(e) Ability to accurately estimate the subcontract bid package
scope of work;
(f) Ability to meet subcontract bid package shop drawing and other
coordination procedures;
(g) Eligibility to receive an award under applicable laws and
regulations; and
(h) Ability to meet subcontract bid package scheduling
requirements.
The owner and general contractor/construction manager shall weigh
the evaluation criteria and determine a minimum acceptable score to be
considered an eligible subcontract bidder.
After publication of notice of intent to determine bidder
eligibility, subcontractors requesting eligibility shall be provided
the evaluation criteria and weighting to be used by the owner and
general contractor/construction manager to determine eligible
subcontract bidders. After the owner and general
contractor/construction manager determine eligible subcontract bidders,
subcontractors requesting eligibility shall be provided the results and
scoring of the subcontract bidder eligibility determination.
Subcontract bid packages shall be awarded to the responsible bidder
submitting the low responsive bid. The requirements of RCW 39.30.060
apply to each subcontract bid package. All subcontractors who bid work
over three hundred thousand dollars shall post a bid bond and all
subcontractors who are awarded a contract over three hundred thousand
dollars shall provide a performance and payment bond for their contract
amount. All other subcontractors shall provide a performance and
payment bond if required by the general contractor/construction
manager. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a
contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or
subsequent call for bids is made for the project. Except as provided
for under subsection (7) of this section, bidding on subcontract work
by the general contractor/construction manager or its subsidiaries is
prohibited. The general contractor/construction manager may negotiate
with the low-responsive bidder in accordance with RCW 39.10.080 or, if
unsuccessful in such negotiations, rebid.
(7) The general contractor/construction manager, or its
subsidiaries, may bid on subcontract work if:
(a) The work within the subcontract bid package is customarily
performed by the general contractor/construction manager;
(b) The bid opening is managed by the public body; and
(c) Notification of the general contractor/construction manager's
intention to bid is included in the public solicitation of bids for the
bid package.
In no event may the value of subcontract work performed by the
general contractor/construction manager exceed thirty percent of the
negotiated maximum allowable construction cost.
(8) A public body may include an incentive clause in any contract
awarded under this section for savings of either time or cost or both
from that originally negotiated. No incentives granted may exceed five
percent of the maximum allowable construction cost. If the project is
completed for less than the agreed upon maximum allowable construction
cost, any savings not otherwise negotiated as part of an incentive
clause shall accrue to the public body. If the project is completed
for more than the agreed upon maximum allowable construction cost,
excepting increases due to any contract change orders approved by the
public body, the additional cost shall be the responsibility of the
general contractor/construction manager.
(9) The authority provided to the state ferry system in this
section is limited to projects concerning construction, renovation,
preservation, demolition, and reconstruction of ferry terminals and
associated land-based facilities.

--- END ---