BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.21.045 and 1995 c 265 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) By January 1, 2004, an insurer offering any health benefit
plan to a small employer shall offer and actively market to the small
employer a health benefit plan ((providing benefits identical to the
schedule of covered health services that are required to be delivered
to an individual enrolled in the basic health plan)) featuring a
limited schedule of covered health care services. Nothing in this
subsection shall preclude an insurer from offering, or a small employer
from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more ((or
less)) comprehensive benefits than ((the basic health plan, provided
such plans are in accordance with this chapter)) those included in the
product offered under this subsection. An insurer offering a health
benefit plan ((that does not include benefits in the basic health
plan)) under this subsection shall clearly disclose ((these
differences)) all covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure
approved by the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW ((but is not
subject to the requirements of)). The plan may, but is not required
to, comply with RCW 48.21.130, ((48.21.140, 48.21.141,)) 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, ((48.21.160 through 48.21.197,)) 48.21.200,
48.21.220, ((48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235,)) 48.21.240, 48.21.244,
48.21.250, ((48.21.300,)) 48.21.310, or 48.21.320 ((if: (i) The health
benefit plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection
that provides benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the
extent these requirements differ from the basic health plan; or (ii)
the health benefit plan is offered to employers with not more than
twenty-five employees)).
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan services)) health benefit
plan offered under subsection (1) of this section. All forms,
policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the
commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this section
shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; ((and))
(iv) Wellness activities;
(v) Industry; and
(vi) Other factors that the commissioner may approve by rule.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) ((The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e))) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs ((not to exceed twenty percent)).
(((f))) (e) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered
under this section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually
except that the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(((g))) (f) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical
groups that differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design,
with the exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(((h))) (g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan
that contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered
similar coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(((i))) (h) Adjusted community rates established under this section
((shall pool the medical experience of all small groups purchasing
coverage)) may include relativity adjustments, based on deductible
leverage, or other actuarially demonstrated differences.
(4) ((The health benefit plans authorized by this section that are
lower than the required offering shall not supplant or supersede any
existing policy for the benefit of employees in this state.)) Nothing
in this section shall restrict the right of employees to collectively
bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of those provided
herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
an insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(6) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a
small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage
to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer group or
to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify a health plan
with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or dependent,
through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude
coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7)(a) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," (("basic health plan," "adjusted community rate,")) and
"wellness activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
(b) As used in this section, "adjusted community rate" means the
rating method used to establish the premium for health plans adjusted
to reflect actuarially demonstrated differences in utilization or cost
attributable to geographic area, family size, age, use of wellness
activities, industry, and other factors that the commissioner may
approve by rule.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.43.005 and 2001 c 196 s 5 and 2001 c 147 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to
establish the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially
demonstrated differences in utilization or cost attributable to
geographic region, age, family size, and use of wellness activities.
(2) "Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter
70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.
(3) "Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required
in RCW 70.47.060(2)(d).
(4) "Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered
health services, including the description of how those benefits are to
be administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under
the basic health plan, as revised from time to time.
(5) "Catastrophic health plan" means:
(a) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering a
single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand five hundred dollars and an
annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other
than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three thousand
dollars; and
(b) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering more
than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other than for
premiums) for covered benefits of at least five thousand five hundred
dollars; or
(c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, professional and prescription drugs
provided in conjunction with such hospital inpatient and outpatient
services, and excludes or substantially limits outpatient physician
services and those services usually provided in an office setting.
(6) "Certification" means a determination by a review organization
that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or
procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information provided,
meets the clinical requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness,
level of care, or effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable
health benefit plan.
(7) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during
a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.
(8) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder,
beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health
plan.
(9) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse
and unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the
enrollee's health benefit plan.
(10) "Eligible employee" means an employee who works on a full-time
basis with a normal work week of thirty or more hours. The term
includes a self-employed individual, including a sole proprietor, a
partner of a partnership, and may include an independent contractor, if
the self-employed individual, sole proprietor, partner, or independent
contractor is included as an employee under a health benefit plan of a
small employer, but does not work less than thirty hours per week and
derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade
or business through which he or she has attempted to earn taxable
income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal
revenue service form. Persons covered under a health benefit plan
pursuant to the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1986
shall not be considered eligible employees for purposes of minimum
participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws of 1995.
(11) "Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute
onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead
a prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe that a health
condition exists that requires immediate medical attention, if failure
to provide medical attention would result in serious impairment to
bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ or part, or
would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.
(12) "Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care
services medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical
condition, provided in a hospital emergency department.
(13) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to
health carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or
health care facilities by enrollees and may include copayments,
coinsurance, or deductibles.
(14) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on
behalf of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services included in the
covered person's health benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues
other than denial of payment for medical services or nonprovision of
medical services, including dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting
time for medical services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or
dissatisfaction with service provided by the health carrier.
(15) "Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices licensed
under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under
chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical
facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment
facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health agencies
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes such facilities if
owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the
state and such other facilities as required by federal law and
implementing regulations.
(16) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:
(a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to
practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law; or
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this
subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.
(17) "Health care service" means that service offered or provided
by health care facilities and health care providers relating to the
prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(18) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.
(19) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any policy,
contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide, arrange,
reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:
(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 RCW;
(b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter
48.66 RCW;
(c) Limited health care services offered by limited health care
service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;
(d) Disability income;
(e) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance
policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage and
homeowner guest medical;
(f) Workers' compensation coverage;
(g) Accident only coverage;
(h) Specified disease and hospital confinement indemnity when
marketed solely as a supplement to a health plan;
(i) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;
(j) Dental only and vision only coverage; and
(k) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term
limited purpose or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is
guaranteed renewable while the covered person is enrolled as a regular
full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited higher
education institution, after a written request for such classification
by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(20) "Material modification" means a change in the actuarial value
of the health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than
fifteen percent.
(21) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness,
or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.
(22) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited by a
health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of
a health plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a health
carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.
(23) "Review organization" means a disability insurer regulated
under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined
in RCW 48.46.020, and entities affiliated with, under contract with, or
acting on behalf of a health carrier to perform a utilization review.
(24) "Small employer" or "small group" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision, sole
proprietor, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that, on at least fifty percent of its working days during the
preceding calendar quarter, employed at least two but no more than
fifty eligible employees, with a normal work week of thirty or more
hours, the majority of whom were employed within this state, and is not
formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance and in which
a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the
number of eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies,
or that are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of
taxation by this state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to
the issuance of a health plan to a small employer and for the purpose
of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be
determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided, a
small employer shall continue to be considered a small employer until
the plan anniversary following the date the small employer no longer
meets the requirements of this definition. ((The term "small employer"
includes a self-employed individual or sole proprietor. The term
"small employer" also includes a self-employed individual or sole
proprietor who derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her
income from a trade or business through which the individual or sole
proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she
has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, schedule
C or F, for the previous taxable year.))
(25) "Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent, or
retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the
allocation of health care resources and services of a provider or
facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of
enrollees.
(26) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an activity
consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle
safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education for the
purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health service
costs.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.43.035 and 2000 c 79 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
For group health benefit plans, the following shall apply:
(1) All health carriers shall accept for enrollment any state
resident within the group to whom the plan is offered and within the
carrier's service area and provide or assure the provision of all
covered services regardless of age, sex, family structure, ethnicity,
race, health condition, geographic location, employment status,
socioeconomic status, other condition or situation, or the provisions
of RCW 49.60.174(2). The insurance commissioner may grant a temporary
exemption from this subsection, if, upon application by a health
carrier the commissioner finds that the clinical, financial, or
administrative capacity to serve existing enrollees will be impaired if
a health carrier is required to continue enrollment of additional
eligible individuals.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, all
health plans shall contain or incorporate by endorsement a guarantee of
the continuity of coverage of the plan. For the purposes of this
section, a plan is "renewed" when it is continued beyond the earliest
date upon which, at the carrier's sole option, the plan could have been
terminated for other than nonpayment of premium. The carrier may
consider the group's anniversary date as the renewal date for purposes
of complying with the provisions of this section.
(3) The guarantee of continuity of coverage required in health
plans shall not prevent a carrier from canceling or nonrenewing a
health plan for:
(a) Nonpayment of premium;
(b) Violation of published policies of the carrier approved by the
insurance commissioner;
(c) Covered persons entitled to become eligible for medicare
benefits by reason of age who fail to apply for a medicare supplement
plan or medicare cost, risk, or other plan offered by the carrier
pursuant to federal laws and regulations;
(d) Covered persons who fail to pay any deductible or copayment
amount owed to the carrier and not the provider of health care
services;
(e) Covered persons committing fraudulent acts as to the carrier;
(f) Covered persons who materially breach the health plan; or
(g) Change or implementation of federal or state laws that no
longer permit the continued offering of such coverage.
(4) The provisions of this section do not apply in the following
cases:
(a) A carrier has zero enrollment on a product; ((or))
(b) A carrier replaces a product and the replacement product is
provided to all covered persons within that class or line of business,
includes all of the services covered under the replaced product, and
does not significantly limit access to the kind of services covered
under the replaced product. The health plan may also allow
unrestricted conversion to a fully comparable product; ((or))
(c) No sooner than January 1, 2004, a carrier discontinues offering
a particular type of health benefit plan offered in the small or large
group market if: (i) The carrier provides notice to each covered group
provided coverage of this type of the discontinuation at least ninety
days prior to the date of the discontinuation; (ii) the carrier offers
to each group provided coverage of this type the option to enroll, with
regard to small groups, in any other small group plan, or with regard
to large groups, in any other large group plan, currently being offered
by the carrier in the applicable group market; and (iii) in exercising
the option to discontinue coverage of this type and in offering the
option of coverage under (c)(ii) of this subsection, the carrier acts
uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor of
enrolled individuals or individuals who may become eligible for this
coverage;
(d) A carrier discontinues offering all health coverage in the
small group market or the large group market, or both markets, in the
state and discontinues coverage under all existing group health benefit
plans in the large or small group market involved if: (i) The carrier
provides notice to the commissioner of its intent to discontinue
offering all such coverage in the state and its intent to discontinue
coverage under all such existing health benefit plans at least one
hundred eighty days prior to the date of the discontinuation of
coverage under all such existing health benefit plans; and (ii) the
carrier provides notice to each covered group of the intent to
discontinue the existing health benefit plan at least one hundred
eighty days prior to the date of discontinuation. In the case of
discontinuation under this subsection, the carrier may not issue any
group health coverage in this state in the group market involved for a
five-year period beginning on the date of the discontinuation of the
last health benefit plan not so renewed. This subsection (4) does not
require a carrier to provide notice to the commissioner of its intent
to discontinue offering a health benefit plan to new applicants when
the carrier does not discontinue coverage of existing enrollees under
that health benefit plan; or
(e) A carrier is withdrawing from a service area or from a segment
of its service area because the carrier has demonstrated to the
insurance commissioner that the carrier's clinical, financial, or
administrative capacity to serve enrollees would be exceeded.
(5) The provisions of this section do not apply to health plans
deemed by the insurance commissioner to be unique or limited or have a
short-term purpose, after a written request for such classification by
the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
guarantee of continuity of coverage applies to a group of one only if:
(a) The carrier continues to offer the particular plan in which the
group of one was enrolled on the day prior to the effective date of
this act; and (b) the person continues to qualify as a group of one
under the criteria in place on the day prior to the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.43.045 and 1997 c 231 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every individual health plan delivered, issued for delivery, or
renewed by a health carrier on and after January 1, 1996, shall:
(1) Permit every category of health care provider to provide health
services or care for conditions included in the basic health plan
services to the extent that:
(a) The provision of such health services or care is within the
health care providers' permitted scope of practice; and
(b) The providers agree to abide by standards related to:
(i) Provision, utilization review, and cost containment of health
services;
(ii) Management and administrative procedures; and
(iii) Provision of cost-effective and clinically efficacious health
services.
(2) Annually report the names and addresses of all officers,
directors, or trustees of the health carrier during the preceding year,
and the amount of wages, expense reimbursements, or other payments to
such individuals. This requirement does not apply to a foreign or
alien insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW that files a
supplemental compensation exhibit in its annual statement as required
by law.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.44.022 and 2000 c 79 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be
subject to the following provisions:
(a) The health care service contractor shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health care service contractor shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs not to exceed twenty percent.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage, and
shall not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of
health benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.44.023.
(3) As used in this section ((and RCW 48.44.023)), "health benefit
plan," "small employer," "adjusted community rates," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.44.023 and 1995 c 265 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) By January 1, 2004, a health care services contractor
offering any health benefit plan to a small employer shall offer and
actively market to the small employer a health benefit plan ((providing
benefits identical to the schedule of covered health services that are
required to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health
plan)) featuring a limited schedule of covered health care services.
Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a contractor from offering,
or a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that
may have more ((or less)) comprehensive benefits than ((the basic
health plan, provided such plans are in accordance with this chapter))
those included in the product offered under this subsection. A
contractor offering a health benefit plan ((that does not include
benefits in the basic health plan)) under this subsection shall clearly
disclose ((these differences)) all covered benefits to the small
employer in a brochure approved by the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW ((but is not
subject to the requirements of)). The plan may, but is not required
to, comply with RCW 48.44.225, ((48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300,)) 48.44.310, 48.44.320, ((48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335,))
48.44.340, 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, ((48.44.440,)) 48.44.450,
and 48.44.460 ((if: (i) The health benefit plan is the mandatory
offering under (a) of this subsection that provides benefits identical
to the basic health plan, to the extent these requirements differ from
the basic health plan; or (ii) the health benefit plan is offered to
employers with not more than twenty-five employees)).
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan services))
health benefit plan offered under subsection (1) of this section. All
forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the
commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this section
shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; ((and))
(iv) Wellness activities;
(v) Industry; and
(vi) Other factors that the commissioner may approve by rule.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) ((The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e))) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs ((not to exceed twenty percent)).
(((f))) (e) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered
under this section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually
except that the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(((g))) (f) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical
groups that differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design,
with the exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(((h))) (g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan
that contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered
similar coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(((i))) (h) Adjusted community rates established under this section
((shall pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage))
may include relativity adjustments, based on deductible leverage, or
other actuarially demonstrated differences.
(4) ((The health benefit plans authorized by this section that are
lower than the required offering shall not supplant or supersede any
existing policy for the benefit of employees in this state.)) Nothing
in this section shall restrict the right of employees to collectively
bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of those provided
herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(6) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible employees of
a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may not offer
coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer
group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not modify a
health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7)(a) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," and "wellness activities" mean the same as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(b) As used in this section, "adjusted community rate" means the
rating method used to establish the premium for health plans adjusted
to reflect actuarially demonstrated differences in utilization or cost
attributable to geographic area, family size, age, use of wellness
activities, industry, and other factors that the commissioner may
approve by rule.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.46.064 and 2000 c 79 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be
subject to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age;
(iv) Tenure discounts; and
(v) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection.
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs not to exceed twenty percent.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the family composition;
(ii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the
individual; or
(iii) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(h) A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan
of two years or more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage, and
shall not be required to be pooled with the medical experience of
health benefit plans offered to small employers under RCW 48.46.066.
(3) As used in this section ((and RCW 48.46.066)), "health benefit
plan," "adjusted community rate," "small employer," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.46.066 and 1995 c 265 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) By January 1, 2004, a health maintenance organization
offering any health benefit plan to a small employer shall offer and
actively market to the small employer a health benefit plan ((providing
benefits identical to the schedule of covered health services that are
required to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health
plan)) featuring a limited schedule of covered health care services.
Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other
health benefit plans that may have more ((or less)) comprehensive
benefits than ((the basic health plan, provided such plans are in
accordance with this chapter)) those included in the product offered
under this subsection. A health maintenance organization offering a
health benefit plan ((that does not include benefits in the basic
health plan)) under this subsection shall clearly disclose ((these
differences)) all the covered benefits to the small employer in a
brochure approved by the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW ((but is not
subject to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285,)).
The plan may, but is not required to, comply with RCW 48.46.290,
((48.46.350, 48.46.355,)) 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480,
((48.46.510,)) 48.46.520, and 48.46.530 ((if: (i) The health benefit
plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that
provides benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the extent
these requirements differ from the basic health plan; or (ii) the
health benefit plan is offered to employers with not more than twenty-five employees)).
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the ((basic health plan services))
health benefit plan offered under subsection (1) of this section. All
forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the
commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this section
shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; ((and))
(iv) Wellness activities;
(v) Industry; and
(vi) Other factors that the commissioner may approve by rule.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).
(d) ((The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e))) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs ((not to exceed twenty percent)).
(((f))) (e) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered
under this section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually
except that the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(((g))) (f) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical
groups that differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design,
with the exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(((h))) (g) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan
that contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered
similar coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(((i))) (h) Adjusted community rates established under this section
((shall pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage))
may include relativity adjustments, based on deductible leverage, or
other actuarially demonstrated differences.
(4) ((The health benefit plans authorized by this section that are
lower than the required offering shall not supplant or supersede any
existing policy for the benefit of employees in this state.)) Nothing
in this section shall restrict the right of employees to collectively
bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of those provided
herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a health maintenance organization in determining whether to provide
coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small
employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum
participation level greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A health maintenance organization may not increase any
requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small
employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.
(6) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage to all
eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A health
maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain
individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. A health maintenance organization may not modify a health
plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or
dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7)(a) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," and "wellness activities" mean the same as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(b) As used in this section, "adjusted community rate" means the
rating method used to establish the premium for health plans adjusted
to reflect actuarially demonstrated differences in utilization or cost
attributable to geographic area, family size, age, use of wellness
activities, industry, and other factors that the commissioner may
approve by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act applies to all group health benefit
plans issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---