BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.502 and 1998 c 213 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug if the person drives a vehicle within
this state:
(a) And the person has, within two hours after driving, an alcohol
concentration of 0.08 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's
breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or
(b) While the person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or any drug; or
(c) While the person is under the combined influence of or affected
by intoxicating liquor and any drug; or
(d) And the person has any schedule I or II controlled substance or
any metabolite or analog of any schedule I or II controlled substance
in his or her body.
(2) The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section
is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state
shall not constitute a defense against a charge of violating this
section.
(3)(a)(i) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(a) of this section which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence that the defendant consumed a sufficient
quantity of alcohol after the time of driving and before the
administration of an analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause
the defendant's alcohol concentration to be 0.08 or more within two
hours after driving.
(ii) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(d) of this section which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence that the controlled substance was being
used according to a valid prescription including the prescription
directions and warnings.
(b) The court shall not admit evidence of ((this)) the defenses
under this subsection unless the defendant notifies the prosecution
prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's
intent to assert the affirmative defense.
(4) Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two
hours after the alleged driving may be used as evidence that within two
hours of the alleged driving, a person had an alcohol concentration of
0.08 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in
any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration above
0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of
or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of
subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.
(5) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.504 and 1998 c 213 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of being in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug if the person has actual physical control of a vehicle within this
state:
(a) And the person has, within two hours after being in actual
physical control of the vehicle, an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or
higher as shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under
RCW 46.61.506; or
(b) While the person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or any drug; or
(c) While the person is under the combined influence of or affected
by intoxicating liquor and any drug; or
(d) And the person has any schedule I or II controlled substance or
any metabolite or analog of any schedule I or II controlled substance
in his or her body.
(2) The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section
is or has been entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state does
not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.
No person may be convicted under this section if, prior to being
pursued by a law enforcement officer, the person has moved the vehicle
safely off the roadway.
(3)(a)(i) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(a) of this section which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence that the defendant consumed a sufficient
quantity of alcohol after the time of being in actual physical control
of the vehicle and before the administration of an analysis of the
person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration
to be 0.08 or more within two hours after being in such control.
(ii) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection
(1)(d) of this section which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence that the controlled substance was being
used according to a valid prescription including the prescription
directions and warnings.
(b) The court shall not admit evidence of ((this)) the defenses
under this subsection unless the defendant notifies the prosecution
prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's
intent to assert the affirmative defense.
(4) Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two
hours after the alleged being in actual physical control of a vehicle
may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged being in
such control, a person had an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more in
violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any case in
which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be
used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected
by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b) or
(c) of this section.
(5) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.308 and 1999 c 331 s 2 and 1999 c 274 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is
deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW
46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood for the
purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or presence of any
drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested for any offense where,
at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has reasonable grounds
to believe the person: (a) Had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug; (b) had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle with any schedule I or II controlled
substance or any metabolite or analog of any schedule I or II
controlled substance in his or her body and the vehicle was involved in
an accident resulting in the injury to or death of any person or damage
to a vehicle or other property; or (c) was in violation of RCW
46.61.503.
(2) The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the
direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to
believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to have been driving or
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in
a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system and
being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where
the person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or
other physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the
person is being treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office,
emergency medical vehicle, ambulance, or other similar facility in
which a breath testing instrument is not present or where the officer
has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is under the
influence of a drug or the person has any schedule I or II controlled
substance or any metabolite or analog of any schedule I or II
controlled substance in his or her body and the vehicle was involved in
an accident resulting in the injury to or death of any person or damage
to a vehicle or other property, a blood test shall be administered by
a qualified person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(4). The officer shall
inform the person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood
test, and of his or her right to have additional tests administered by
any qualified person of his or her choosing as provided in RCW
46.61.506. The officer shall warn the driver that:
(a) His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be
revoked or denied if he or she refuses to submit to the test;
(b) His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be
suspended, revoked, or denied if the test is administered and the test
indicates the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood is
0.08 or more or the person has any schedule I or II controlled
substance or any metabolite or analog of any schedule I or II
controlled substance in his or her body, in the case of a person age
twenty-one or over, or in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or
46.61.504 in the case of a person under age twenty-one; and
(c) His or her refusal to take the test may be used in a criminal
trial.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall
be of the breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under
arrest for the crime of vehicular homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520
or vehicular assault as provided in RCW 46.61.522, or if an individual
is under arrest for ((the crime of driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided in)) a violation of RCW
46.61.502, which arrest results from an accident in which there has
been serious bodily injury to another person, a breath or blood test
may be administered without the consent of the individual so arrested.
(4) Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a
condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed
not to have withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this
section and the test or tests may be administered, subject to the
provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and the person shall be deemed to have
received the warnings required under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under
subsection (2) of this section, the person arrested refuses upon the
request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a test or tests of
his or her breath or blood, no test shall be given except as authorized
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(6) If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and
requirements of this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of
the person's blood or breath is administered and the test results
indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood
is 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or is in
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person is
under the age of twenty-one, or the person has any schedule I or II
controlled substance or any metabolite or analog of any schedule I or
II controlled substance in his or her body, or the person refuses to
submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law enforcement
officer at whose direction any test has been given, or the department,
where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of the person's
blood, shall:
(a) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of its intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's
license, permit, or privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of
this section;
(b) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of his or her right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or
she must take to obtain a hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this
section;
(c) Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit
to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department;
(d) Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if
any, is a temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date
of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is
given by the department following a blood test, or until the
suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8)
of this section, whichever occurs first. No temporary license is valid
to any greater degree than the license or permit that it replaces; and
(e) Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to
the department within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the
result of a blood test, a sworn report or report under a declaration
authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that states:
(i) That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of twenty-one years and
had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while having an alcohol concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503, or
the person had any schedule I or II controlled substance or any
metabolite or analog of any schedule I or II controlled substance in
his or her body;
(ii) That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2)
of this section the person refused to submit to a test of his or her
blood or breath, or a test was administered and the results indicated
that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08
or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or was in violation of
RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person is under the age
of twenty-one, or the person had any schedule I or II controlled
substance or any metabolite or analog of any schedule I or II
controlled substance in his or her body; and
(iii) Any other information that the director may require by rule.
(7) The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report
or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under
subsection (6)(e) of this section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive or any nonresident
operating privilege, as provided in RCW 46.20.3101, such suspension,
revocation, or denial to be effective beginning sixty days from the
date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event
notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section,
whichever occurs first.
(8) A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this
section may, within thirty days after the notice has been given,
request in writing a formal hearing before the department. The person
shall pay a fee of one hundred dollars as part of the request. If the
request is mailed, it must be postmarked within thirty days after
receipt of the notification. Upon timely receipt of such a request for
a formal hearing, including receipt of the required one hundred dollar
fee, the department shall afford the person an opportunity for a
hearing. The department may waive the required one hundred dollar fee
if the person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and shall
be scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and
46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest,
except that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of the
department, be conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The
hearing shall be held within sixty days following the arrest or
following the date notice has been given in the event notice is given
by the department following a blood test, unless otherwise agreed to by
the department and the person, in which case the action by the
department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license marked
under subsection (6)(c) of this section extended, if the person is
otherwise eligible for licensing. For the purposes of this section,
the scope of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a law
enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had
been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug or had been driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her
system in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 and was under
the age of twenty-one, or the person had any schedule I or II
controlled substance or any metabolite or analog of any schedule I or
II controlled substance in his or her body, whether the person was
placed under arrest, and (a) whether the person refused to submit to
the test or tests upon request of the officer after having been
informed that such refusal would result in the revocation of the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive, or (b) if a test or
tests were administered, whether the applicable requirements of this
section were satisfied before the administration of the test or tests,
whether the person submitted to the test or tests, or whether a test
was administered without express consent as permitted under this
section, and whether the test or tests indicated that the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more if the
person was age twenty-one or over at the time of the arrest, or was in
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person was
under the age of twenty-one at the time of the arrest, or the person
had any schedule I or II controlled substance or any metabolite or
analog of any schedule I or II controlled substance in his or her body.
The sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW
9A.72.085 submitted by a law enforcement officer is prima facie
evidence that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person
had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
drugs, or both, or the person had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having
alcohol in his or her system in a concentration in violation of RCW
46.61.503 and was under the age of twenty-one, or the person had any
schedule I or II controlled substance or any metabolite or analog of
any schedule I or II controlled substance in his or her body and that
the officer complied with the requirements of this section.
A hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas
for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and
shall administer oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not
issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at the request of the
person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required by RCW
5.56.010 for a witness in district court. The sworn report or report
under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 of the law enforcement
officer and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be
admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary
foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may question
witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department shall
order that the suspension, revocation, or denial either be rescinded or
sustained.
(9) If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after
such a hearing, the person whose license, privilege, or permit is
suspended, revoked, or denied has the right to file a petition in the
superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of
revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal from a
decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be
filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ
1.1, or other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal
shall be limited to a review of the record of the administrative
hearing. The appellant must pay the costs associated with obtaining
the record of the hearing before the hearing officer. The filing of
the appeal does not stay the effective date of the suspension,
revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must
include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the
department's final order of suspension, revocation, or denial as
expeditiously as possible. The review must be limited to a
determination of whether the department has committed any errors of
law. The superior court shall accept those factual determinations
supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be
inferred from the final order of the department. The superior court
may reverse, affirm, or modify the decision of the department or remand
the case back to the department for further proceedings. The decision
of the superior court must be in writing and filed in the clerk's
office with the other papers in the case. The court shall state the
reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a stay or
other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is
likely to prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant
will suffer irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension,
revocation, or denial it may impose conditions on such stay.
(10) If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to
drive has been or will be suspended, revoked, or denied under
subsection (7) of this section, other than as a result of a breath or
blood test refusal, and who has not committed an offense for which he
or she was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW,
petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges
arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be taken
under subsection (7) of this section, the court may direct the
department to stay any actual or proposed suspension, revocation, or
denial for at least forty-five days but not more than ninety days. If
the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose
conditions on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for
licensing, the department shall issue a temporary license, or extend
any valid temporary license marked under subsection (6) of this
section, for the period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution
treatment plan is not recommended in the report made under RCW
10.05.050, or if treatment is rejected by the court, or if the person
declines to accept an offered treatment plan, or if the person violates
any condition imposed by the court, then the court shall immediately
direct the department to cancel the stay and any temporary marked
license or extension of a temporary license issued under this
subsection.
A suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be
stayed if the person is accepted for deferred prosecution as provided
in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon which the suspension,
revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred prosecution is
terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or
denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed, the stay
shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.
(11) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of
this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle
in this state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department
shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor
vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any
state in which he or she has a license.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.25.090 and 2002 c 272 s 3 and 2002 c 193 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of not less than one year if a report has been
received by the department pursuant to RCW 46.25.120, or if the person
has been convicted of a first violation, within this or any other
jurisdiction, of:
(a) Driving a commercial motor vehicle under the influence of
alcohol or any drug;
(b) Driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol
concentration in the person's system is 0.04 or more, or with any
schedule I or II controlled substance or any metabolite or analog of
any schedule I or II controlled substance in his or her body, as
determined by any testing methods approved by law in this state or any
other state or jurisdiction;
(c) Leaving the scene of an accident involving a commercial motor
vehicle driven by the person;
(d) Using a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of a felony;
(e) Refusing to submit to a test to determine the driver's alcohol
concentration while driving a motor vehicle.
If any of the violations set forth in this subsection occurred
while transporting a hazardous material required to be identified by a
placard, the person is disqualified for a period of not less than three
years.
(2) A person is disqualified for life if it has been determined
that the person has committed or has been convicted of two or more
violations of any of the offenses specified in subsection (1) of this
section, or any combination of those offenses, arising from two or more
separate incidents. Only offenses committed after October 1, 1989, may
be considered in applying this subsection.
(3) The department may adopt rules, in accordance with federal
regulations, establishing guidelines, including conditions, under which
a disqualification for life under subsection (2) of this section may be
reduced to a period of not less than ten years.
(4) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for life who uses a commercial motor vehicle in the commission
of a felony involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of
a controlled substance, as defined by chapter 69.50 RCW, or possession
with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled
substance, as defined by chapter 69.50 RCW.
(5) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of not less than sixty days if convicted of or
found to have committed two serious traffic violations, or one hundred
twenty days if convicted of or found to have committed three serious
traffic violations, committed in a commercial motor vehicle arising
from separate incidents occurring within a three-year period.
(6) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(a) Not less than ninety days nor more than one year if convicted
of or found to have committed a first violation of an out-of-service
order while driving a commercial vehicle;
(b) Not less than one year nor more than five years if, during a
ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to have
committed two violations of out-of-service orders while driving a
commercial vehicle in separate incidents;
(c) Not less than three years nor more than five years if, during
a ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to have
committed three or more violations of out-of-service orders while
driving commercial vehicles in separate incidents;
(d) Not less than one hundred eighty days nor more than two years
if the person is convicted of or is found to have committed a first
violation of an out-of-service order while transporting hazardous
materials required to be placarded under the Hazardous Materials
Transportation Act (46 U.S.C. Sec. 1801-1813), or while operating motor
vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including
the driver. A person is disqualified for a period of not less than
three years nor more than five years if, during a ten-year period, the
person is convicted of or is found to have committed subsequent
violations of out-of-service orders, in separate incidents, while
transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded under the
Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, or while operating motor
vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including
the driver.
(7) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle if a report has been received by the department under RCW
46.25.125 that the person has received a confirmed positive drug or
alcohol test either as part of the testing program required by 49
C.F.R. 382 or 49 C.F.R. 40 or as part of a preemployment drug test. A
disqualification under this subsection remains in effect until the
person undergoes a drug and alcohol assessment by an agency certified
by the department of social and health services and, if the person is
classified as an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol abuser, or drug
abuser, until the person presents evidence of satisfactory
participation in or successful completion of a drug or alcohol
treatment program that has been certified by the department of social
and health services under chapter 70.96A RCW and until the person has
met the requirements of RCW 46.25.100. The agency making a drug and
alcohol assessment under this section shall forward a diagnostic
evaluation and treatment recommendation to the department of licensing
for use in determining the person's eligibility for driving a
commercial motor vehicle. Persons who are disqualified under this
subsection more than twice in a five-year period are disqualified for
life.
(8)(a) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for the period of time specified in (b) of this subsection if
he or she is convicted of or is found to have committed one of the
following six offenses at a railroad-highway grade crossing while
operating a commercial motor vehicle in violation of a federal, state,
or local law or regulation:
(i) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
slow down and check that the tracks are clear of an approaching train;
(ii) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
stop before reaching the crossing, if the tracks are not clear;
(iii) For drivers who are always required to stop, failing to stop
before driving onto the crossing;
(iv) For all drivers, failing to have sufficient space to drive
completely through the crossing without stopping;
(v) For all drivers, failing to obey a traffic control device or
the directions of an enforcement officer at the crossing;
(vi) For all drivers, failing to negotiate a crossing because of
insufficient undercarriage clearance.
(b) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(i) Not less than sixty days if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a first violation of a railroad-highway grade
crossing violation;
(ii) Not less than one hundred twenty days if the driver is
convicted of or is found to have committed a second railroad-highway
grade crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year
period;
(iii) Not less than one year if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a third or subsequent railroad-highway grade
crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year period.
(9) Within ten days after suspending, revoking, or canceling a
commercial driver's license, the department shall update its records to
reflect that action. After suspending, revoking, or canceling a
nonresident commercial driver's privileges, the department shall notify
the licensing authority of the state that issued the commercial
driver's license.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.60.040 and 1998 c 213 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a vessel in a
reckless manner.
(2) It shall be a violation for a person to operate a vessel while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug. A person is
considered to be under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
if:
(a) The person has 0.08 grams or more of alcohol per two hundred
ten liters of breath, as shown by analysis of the person's breath made
under RCW 46.61.506; or
(b) The person has 0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in the
person's blood, as shown by analysis of the person's blood made under
RCW 46.61.506; or
(c) The person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or any drug; or
(d) The person is under the combined influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor and any drug; or
(e) The person has any schedule I or II controlled substance or
metabolite or analog of any schedule I or II controlled substance in
his or her body, as shown by analysis of the person's blood made under
RCW 46.61.506.
The fact that any person charged with a violation of this section
is or has been entitled to use such drug under the laws of this state
shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this
section. A person cited under this subsection may upon request be
given a breath test for breath alcohol or may request to have a blood
sample taken for blood alcohol analysis. An arresting officer shall
administer field sobriety tests when circumstances permit.
(3) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable as
provided under RCW 9.92.030. In addition, the court may order the
defendant to pay restitution for any damages or injuries resulting from
the offense.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.56.540 and 2000 c 69 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of operating a vessel while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs if the person operates a
covered vessel within this state while:
(a) The person has 0.06 grams or more of alcohol per two hundred
ten liters of breath, as shown by analysis of the person's breath made
under RCW 90.56.550; or
(b) The person has 0.06 percent or more by weight of alcohol in the
person's blood as shown by analysis of the person's blood made under
RCW 90.56.550; or
(c) The person is under the influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or drugs; or
(d) The person is under the combined influence of or affected by
intoxicating liquor or drugs; or
(e) The person has any schedule I or II controlled substance or
metabolite or analog of any schedule I or II controlled substance in
his or her body as shown by analysis of the person's blood made under
RCW 90.56.550.
(2) The fact that any person charged with a violation of this
section is or has been entitled to use such drug under the laws of this
state shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating
this section.
(3) Operating a vessel while intoxicated is a class C felony under
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

--- END ---