BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Domestic violence, sexual assault, and stalking are widespread
societal problems that have devastating effects for individual victims,
their children, and their communities. Victims of violence may be
forced to remain in unsafe situations because they are bound by
residential rental agreements. The legislature finds that the
inability of victims to terminate their rental agreements hinders or
prevents victims from being able to safely flee domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking. The legislature further finds that
victims of these crimes who do not have access to safe housing are more
likely to remain in or return to abusive or dangerous situations.
Also, the legislature finds that victims of these crimes are further
victimized when they are unable to obtain or retain rental housing due
to their history as a victim of these crimes. The legislature further
finds that evidence that a prospective tenant has been a victim of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking is not relevant to the
decision whether to rent to that prospective tenant.
(2) By this act, the legislature intends to increase safety for
victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, and stalking by removing
barriers to safety and offering protection against discrimination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
sections 3 and 4 of this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
26.50.010.
(2) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
70.125.030.
(3) "Stalking" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 9A.46.110.
(4) "Qualified third party" means a law enforcement officer, person
subject to the provisions of chapter 18.120 RCW, an employee of a court
of the state, licensed mental health professional or other licensed
counselors, advocates working at an agency that assists victims of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or other recognized
professionals including clergy, attorneys, and social workers who have
substantial experience or expertise in working with victims of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking.
(5) "Household member" means a child or adult residing with the
tenant other than the perpetrator of domestic violence, stalking, or
sexual assault.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a tenant notifies the landlord in writing that he or she
or a household member is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault,
or stalking, and either (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection applies, then
subsection (2) of this section applies:
(i) The tenant or the household member has a valid order for
protection under one or more of the following: Chapters 26.50 or 26.26
RCW or RCW 9A.46.040, 9A.46.050, 10.14.080, 10.99.040 (2) or (3), or
26.09.050; or
(ii) The tenant or the household member has reported the domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking to a qualified third party acting
in his or her official capacity.
(b) When a copy of the order for protection, police report, or
verification of a report to a qualified third party, as required under
(a) of this subsection, is made available to the landlord, the tenant
may terminate the rental agreement and quit the premises without
further obligation under the rental agreement or under chapter 59.12
RCW. However, the request to terminate the rental agreement must occur
within ninety days of a reported act, event, or circumstance that gave
rise to the protective order or report to a qualified third party.
Verification of the report to a qualified third party may consist of a
document signed and dated by the third party stating that the tenant
notified him or her of an act or acts of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking. Verification may also be accomplished by
completion of a form provided by the qualified third party. The form
must be in substantially the following form:

(2) A tenant who terminates a rental agreement under this section
is discharged from the payment of rent for any period following the
last day of the month of the quitting date. The tenant shall remain
liable for the rent for the month in which he or she terminated the
rental agreement unless the termination is in accordance with RCW
59.18.200(1). Notwithstanding rental agreement provisions that allow
for forfeiture of a deposit for early termination, a tenant who
terminates under this section is entitled to the return of the full
deposit, subject to RCW 59.18.020 and 59.18.280. Other tenants who are
parties to the rental agreement, except household members who are the
victims of sexual assault, stalking, or domestic violence, are not
released from their obligations under the rental agreement or other
obligations under this chapter.
(3) The provision of verification of a report under subsection
(1)(b) of this section does not waive the confidential or privileged
nature of the communication between a victim of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking with a qualified third party pursuant to
RCW 5.60.060, 70.123.075, or 70.125.065. No record or evidence
obtained from such disclosure may be used in any civil, administrative,
or criminal proceeding against the victim unless a written waiver of
applicable evidentiary privilege is obtained, except that the
verification itself, and no other privileged information, under
subsection (1)(b) of this section may be used in civil proceedings
brought under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A landlord may not terminate a tenancy based on the tenant's or
household member's status as a victim of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking as long as the victim has a valid order of
protection against the perpetrator as defined in section 3(1)(a)(i) of
this act.
(2) A landlord may not fail to renew a tenancy, or refuse to enter
into a rental agreement based on the tenant's or applicant's or a
household member's status as a victim of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking, or based on the tenant or applicant having
terminated a rental agreement under section 2 of this act.
(3) A landlord who refuses to enter into a rental agreement in
violation of this section may be liable to the tenant or applicant in
a civil action for damages sustained by the tenant or applicant. The
prevailing party may also recover court costs and reasonable attorneys'
fees.
(4) It is a defense to an unlawful detainer action under chapter
59.12 RCW that the action to remove the tenant and recover possession
of the premises is in violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this
section.
(5) This section does not limit the rights of landlords, tenants,
or prospective tenants as otherwise provided in the residential
landlord-tenant act, chapter 59.18 RCW, or other applicable laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tenant who has obtained a court order from a court of
competent jurisdiction granting him or her possession of a dwelling
unit to the exclusion of one or more cotenants may request that a lock
be replaced or configured for a new key at the tenant's expense. The
landlord shall, if provided a copy of the order, comply with the
request and shall not provide copies of the new keys to the tenant
restrained or excluded by the court's order. This section does not
release a cotenant, other than a household member who is the victim of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, from liability or
obligations under the rental agreement.
(2) A landlord who replaces a lock or configures for a new key of
a residential housing unit in accordance with subsection (1) of this
section shall be held harmless from liability for any damages that
result directly from the lock change.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act does not limit the rights of
landlords, tenants, or prospective tenants as otherwise provided in the
residential landlord-tenant act, chapter 59.18 RCW, or other applicable
laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 59.18.356 (Threatening behavior--Violation of order for protection -- Termination of agreement -- Financial
obligations) and 1992 c 38 s 7 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---