BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.44.500 and 1995 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is established an escrow commission of the state of
Washington, to consist of the director of financial institutions or his
or her designee as ((chairman)) chair, and five other members who shall
act as advisors to the director as to the needs of the escrow
profession, including but not limited to the design and conduct of
tests to be administered to applicants for escrow licenses, the
schedule of license fees to be applied to the escrow licensees,
educational programs, audits and investigations of the escrow
profession designed to protect the consumer, and such other matters
determined appropriate. The director is hereby empowered to and shall
appoint the other members, each of whom shall have been a resident of
this state for at least five years and shall have at least five years
experience in the practice of escrow as an escrow agent or as a person
in responsible charge of escrow transactions.
The members of the first commission shall serve for the following
terms: One member for one year, one member for two years, one member
for three years, one member for four years, and one member for five
years, from the date of their appointment, or until their successors
are duly appointed and qualified. Every member of the commission shall
receive a certificate of appointment from the director and before
beginning the member's term of office shall file with the secretary of
state a written oath or affirmation for the faithful discharge of the
member's official duties. On the expiration of the term of each
member, the director shall appoint a successor to serve for a term of
five years or until the member's successor has been appointed and
qualified.
The director may remove any member of the commission for cause.
Vacancies in the commission for any reason shall be filled by
appointment for the unexpired term.
Appointments made under this section are subject to the advice and
consent of the senate. No appointee may serve in the position to which
he or she is appointed for a period of more than one year without the
confirmation and approval of that appointee by the senate, during an
officially convened legislative session.
Members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, and
shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses incurred in carrying out
the provisions of this chapter in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.85.071 and 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is established the real estate commission of the state of
Washington, consisting of the director of the commission and six
commission members who shall act in an advisory capacity to the
director.
The six commission members shall be appointed by the governor in
the following manner: For a term of six years each, with the exception
of the first appointees, who shall be appointed one for a term of one
year, one for a term of two years, one for a term of three years, one
for a term of four years, one for a term of five years, and one for a
term of six years, with all other subsequent appointees to be appointed
for a six year term. At least two of the commission members shall be
selected from the area in the state west of the Cascade mountain range
and at least two shall be selected from that area of the state east of
the Cascade mountain range. No commission member shall be appointed
who has had less than five years experience in the sale, operation, or
management of real estate in this state, or has had at least three
years experience in investigative work of a similar nature, preferably
in connection with the administration of real estate license law of
this state or elsewhere. Any vacancies on the commission shall be
filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term.
Appointments made under this section are subject to the advice and
consent of the senate. No appointee may serve in the position to which
he or she is appointed for a period of more than one year without the
confirmation and approval of that appointee by the senate, during an
officially convened legislative session.

Sec. 3 RCW 21.20.550 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 171 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a state advisory committee which shall
consist of seven members to be appointed by the governor on the basis
of their experience and qualifications. The membership shall be
selected, insofar as possible, on the basis of giving both geographic
representation and representation to all phases of the securities
business including the legal and accounting professions.
Appointments made under this section are subject to the advice and
consent of the senate. No appointee may serve in the position to which
he or she is appointed for a period of more than one year without the
confirmation and approval of that appointee by the senate, during an
officially convened legislative session.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary of
health, and (15) the director of financial institutions.
Such officers, except the secretary of transportation and the
director of fish and wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with
the consent of the senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the
governor. The secretary of transportation shall be appointed by the
transportation commission as prescribed by RCW 47.01.041. The director
of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife
commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.
Appointments made under this section are subject to the advice and
consent of the senate. No appointee may serve in the position to which
he or she is appointed for a period of more than one year without the
confirmation and approval of that appointee by the senate, during an
officially convened legislative session.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.180.040 and 1995 c 399 s 98 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a public body corporate and
politic, with perpetual corporate succession, to be known as the
Washington state housing finance commission. The commission is an
instrumentality of the state exercising essential government functions
and, for purposes of the code, acts as a constituted authority on
behalf of the state when it issues bonds pursuant to this chapter. The
commission is a "public body" within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.
(2) The commission shall consist of the following voting members:
(a) The state treasurer, ex officio;
(b) The director of community, trade, and economic development, ex
officio;
(c) An elected local government official, ex officio, with
experience in local housing programs, who shall be appointed by the
governor ((with the consent of the senate));
(d) A representative of housing consumer interests, appointed by
the governor ((with the consent of the senate));
(e) A representative of labor interests, appointed by the governor,
((with the consent of the senate,)) after consultation with
representatives of organized labor;
(f) A representative of low-income persons, appointed by the
governor ((with the consent of the senate));
(g) Five members of the public appointed by the governor, ((with
the consent of the senate,)) on the basis of geographic distribution
and their expertise in housing, real estate, finance, energy
efficiency, or construction, one of whom shall be appointed by the
governor as chair of the commission and who shall serve on the
commission and as chair of the commission at the pleasure of the
governor.
(3) The term of the persons appointed by the governor, other than
the chair, shall be four years from the date of their appointment,
except that the terms of three of the initial appointees shall be for
two years from the date of their appointment. The governor shall
designate the appointees who will serve the two-year terms. An
appointee may be removed by the governor for cause pursuant to RCW
43.06.070 and 43.06.080. The governor shall fill any vacancy in an
appointed position by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired
term. If the department of community, trade, and economic development
is abolished, the resulting vacancy shall be filled by a state official
who shall be appointed to the commission by the governor. ((If this
official occupies an office or position for which senate confirmation
is not required, then his or her appointment to the commission shall be
subject to the consent of the senate.)) The members of the commission
shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and may be
reimbursed, solely from the funds of the commission, for expenses
incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter, subject
to the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A majority of the
commission constitutes a quorum. Designees shall be appointed in such
manner and shall exercise such powers as are specified by the rules of
the commission.
(((3))) (4) Appointments made under this section are subject to the
advice and consent of the senate. No appointee may serve in the
position to which he or she is appointed for a period of more than one
year without the confirmation and approval of that appointee by the
senate, during an officially convened legislative session.
(5) The commission may adopt an official seal and may select from
its membership a vice chair, a secretary, and a treasurer. The
commission shall establish rules concerning its exercise of the powers
authorized by this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in conformance
with chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---