BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.63.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 5 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for
state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project.
(2) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 or 82.61 RCW or this
chapter, except that an investment project for qualified research and
development that has already received a deferral may also receive an
additional deferral certificate for adapting the investment project for
use in pilot scale manufacturing.
(3) This section shall expire July 1, ((2004)) 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 50.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Based upon information provided to the department by the
department of revenue and data obtained by the department from
employers for other lawful purposes, the department shall identify for
the year before and every five years after the renewal of the tax
deferral in RCW 82.63.030 the following information:
(a) North American industry classification for businesses utilizing
the tax deferral;
(b) The number of employees, reported in aggregate by North
American industry classification, employed by businesses utilizing the
tax deferral;
(c) The average wages received by persons, reported by North
American industry classification, employed by businesses utilizing the
tax deferral.
(2) The department shall provide to the joint legislative audit and
review committee, for the year before and every five years after the
renewal of the tax deferral in RCW 82.63.030, a report containing the
following information:
(a) The number of businesses, reported in aggregate by North
American industry classification, utilizing the tax deferral;
(b) The number of employees, reported in aggregate by North
American industry classification, employed by businesses utilizing the
tax deferral;
(c) The average wages of employees employed by businesses utilizing
the tax deferral reported in aggregate, and grouped by North American
industry classification.
(3) All information shall be based on calendar year data and shall
be provided to the joint legislative audit and review committee by the
fifteenth day of March of the year before and every five years after
the renewal of the tax deferral in RCW 82.63.030.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect in any way
the right of privacy and confidentiality as to individual and employer
records maintained by the department, as provided under RCW 50.13.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Based upon information provided by taxpayers, on Form 26-0003e-
1, or its successor form, or Form Rev 81-1013-1, or its successor form,
or Form 81-1012, or its successor form, to the department, the
department shall identify for the year before and every five years
after the renewal of the tax deferral in RCW 82.63.030 the following
information:
(a) The businesses utilizing the tax deferral;
(b) The total value of the tax deferral taken by each business for
that year;
(c) The qualifying investment made by the business utilizing the
tax deferral.
(2) The department shall provide to the employment security
department a list of all businesses utilizing the tax deferral and the
North American industry classification of each business. This
information shall be based on calendar year data and shall be provided
to the employment security department by the fifteenth day of February
of the year before and every five years after the renewal of the tax
deferral in RCW 82.63.030.
(3) The department shall provide to the joint legislative audit and
review committee the number of businesses utilizing the tax deferral,
the value of the deferral received, and the value of qualifying
investments made by businesses utilizing the tax deferral, reported in
aggregate by North American industry classification. This information
shall be based on calendar year data and shall be provided to the joint
legislative audit and review committee by the fifteenth day of February
of the year before and every five years after the renewal of the tax
deferral in RCW 82.63.030.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect in any way
the right of privacy and confidentiality as to individual and employer
records maintained by the department as provided under RCW 82.32.330.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall provide
a report to the legislature the year before and every five years after
the renewal of the tax deferral in RCW 82.63.030. The report shall be
based upon information provided by the employment security department
and the department of revenue. Proprietary information shall remain
confidential as otherwise provided by law. The report shall include,
but is not limited to:
(a) Total value of tax revenue forgone or deferred as a result of
the tax deferral;
(b) Total value of qualifying investments made under the tax
deferral;
(c) Direct employment created or retained that is associated with
the tax deferral and average wages, reported in aggregate by North
American industry classification;
(d) Total indirect employment created or retained associated with
the tax deferral;
(e) Additional sales, property, and business and occupation tax
revenues associated with the tax deferral.
(2) In conducting this evaluation, the joint legislative audit and
review committee shall use a generally accepted economic model and may
contract with outside economic experts.

--- END ---