BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.220.010 and 2002 c 115 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each international matchmaking organization doing business in
Washington state shall disseminate to a recruit, upon request, state
background check information and ((marital)) personal history
information relating to any Washington state resident about whom any
information is provided to the recruit, in the recruit's native
language. The organization shall notify all recruits that background
check and ((marital)) personal history information is available upon
request. The notice that background check and ((marital)) personal
history information is available upon request shall be in the recruit's
native language and shall be displayed in a manner that separates it
from other information, is highly noticeable, and in lettering not less
than one-quarter of an inch high.
(2) If an international matchmaking organization receives a request
for information from a recruit pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, the organization shall notify the Washington state resident of
the request. Upon receiving notification, the Washington state
resident shall obtain from the state patrol and provide to the
organization the complete transcript of any background check
information provided pursuant to RCW 43.43.760 based on a submission of
fingerprint impressions and provided pursuant to RCW 43.43.838 and
shall provide to the organization his or her ((marital)) personal
history information. The organization shall require the resident to
affirm that ((marital)) personal history information is complete and
accurate((, and includes any information regarding marriages,
annulments, and dissolutions which occurred in other states or
countries)). The organization shall refrain from knowingly providing
any further services to the recruit or the Washington state resident in
regards to facilitating future interaction between the recruit and the
Washington state resident until the organization has obtained the
requested information and provided it to the recruit.
(3) This section does not apply to a traditional matchmaking
organization of a religious nature that otherwise operates in
compliance with the laws of the countries of the recruits of such
organization and the laws of the United States nor to any organization
that does not charge a fee to any party for the service provided.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "International matchmaking organization" means a corporation,
partnership, business, or other legal entity, whether or not organized
under the laws of the United States or any state, that does business in
the United States and for profit offers to Washington state residents,
including aliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence and residing
in Washington state, dating, matrimonial, or social referral services
involving citizens of a foreign country or countries who are not
residing in the United States, by: (i) An exchange of names, telephone
numbers, addresses, or statistics; (ii) selection of photographs; or
(iii) a social environment provided by the organization in a country
other than the United States.
(b) "((Marital)) Personal history information" means a declaration
of the person's current marital status, the number of ((times))
previous marriages, annulments, and dissolutions for the person ((has
previously been married)), and whether any previous marriages occurred
as a result of receiving services from an international matchmaking
organization; founded allegations of child abuse or neglect; and any
existing no contact or antiharrassment protection orders. Personal
history information shall include information from the state of
Washington and any information from other states or countries.
(c) "Recruit" means a noncitizen, nonresident person, recruited by
an international matchmaking organization for the purpose of providing
dating, matrimonial, or social referral services.

--- END ---