BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that state law
requires criminal background checks of applicants for school district
employment. However, the legislature finds that, because they
generally are limited to criminal conviction histories, results of
background checks are more complete when supplemented by an applicant's
history of past sexual misconduct. Therefore, the legislature finds
that additional safeguards are necessary in the hiring of school
district employees to ensure the safety of Washington's school
children. In order to provide the safest educational environment for
children, school districts must provide known information regarding
employees' sexual misconduct when those employees attempt to transfer
to different school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Applicant" means an applicant for employment in a certificated
or classified position who is currently or was previously employed by
a school district.
(b) "Employer" means a school district employer.
(2) Before hiring an applicant, a school district shall request the
applicant to sign a statement:
(a) Authorizing the applicant's current and past employers to
disclose to the hiring school district sexual misconduct, if any, by
the applicant and making available to the hiring school district copies
of all documents in the previous employer's personnel, investigative,
or other files relating to sexual misconduct by the applicant; and
(b) Releasing the applicant's current and past employers, and
employees acting on behalf of that employer, from any liability for
providing information described in (a) of this subsection, as provided
in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Before hiring an applicant, a school district shall request in
writing, electronic or otherwise, the applicant's current and past
employers to provide the information described in subsection (2)(a) of
this section, if any. The request shall include a copy of the
statement signed by the applicant under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Not later than twenty business days after receiving a request
under subsection (3) of this section, a school district shall provide
the information requested and make available to the requesting school
district copies of all documents in the applicant's personnel record
relating to the sexual misconduct. The school district, or an employee
acting on behalf of the school district, who in good faith discloses
information under this section is immune from civil liability for the
disclosure.
(5) A hiring district shall request from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction verification of certification
status, including information relating to sexual misconduct as
established by the provisions of subsection (11) of this section, if
any, for applicants for certificated employment.
(6) A school district shall not hire an applicant who does not sign
the statement described in subsection (2) of this section.
(7) School districts may employ applicants on a conditional basis
pending the district's review of information obtained under this
section.
(8) Information received under this section shall be used by a
school district only for the purpose of evaluating an applicant's
qualifications for employment in the position for which he or she has
applied. Except as otherwise provided by law, a board member or
employee of a school district shall not disclose the information to any
person, other than the applicant, who is not directly involved in the
process of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for employment.
A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(9) Beginning September 1, 2004, the board or an official of a
school district shall not enter into a collective bargaining agreement,
individual employment contract, resignation agreement, severance
agreement, or any other contract or agreement that has the effect of
suppressing information about verbal or physical abuse or sexual
misconduct of a present or former employee or of expunging information
about that abuse or sexual misconduct from all documents in the
previous employer's personnel, investigative, or other files relating
to verbal or physical abuse or sexual misconduct by the applicant. Any
provision of a contract or agreement that is contrary to this
subsection is void and unenforceable, and may not be withheld from
disclosure by the entry of any administrative or court order. This
subsection does not restrict the expungement from a personnel file of
information about alleged verbal or physical abuse or sexual misconduct
that has not been substantiated.
(10) This section does not prevent a school district from
requesting or requiring an applicant to provide information other than
that described in this section.
(11) By September 1, 2004, the state board of education has the
authority to and shall adopt rules defining "verbal abuse," "physical
abuse," and "sexual misconduct" as used in this section for application
to all classified and certificated employees. The definitions of
verbal and physical abuse and sexual misconduct adopted by the state
board of education must include the requirement that the school
district has made a determination that there is sufficient information
to conclude that the abuse or misconduct occurred and that the abuse or
misconduct resulted in the employee's leaving his or her position at
the school district.
(12) School personnel have the right to review their entire
personnel file relating to sexual misconduct as addressed in this
section and attach rebuttals to any documents as the employee deems
necessary. These rebuttal documents shall be disclosed in the same
manner as the document to which they refer. The provisions of this
subsection shall not override any protections provided individuals
under the state whistleblower laws as established in chapter 42.41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
School districts shall provide parents with information regarding
their rights under the Washington public disclosure act, chapter 42.17
RCW, to request the public records regarding school employee
discipline. This information shall be provided to all parents on an
annual basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of reporting disciplinary actions taken against
certificated staff to other states via a national data base used by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the following
actions shall be reported: Suspension, surrender, revocation, denial,
stayed suspension, reinstatement, and any written reprimand related to
abuse and sexual misconduct. These actions will only be reported to
the extent that they are accepted by the national clearinghouse, but if
there are categories not included, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall seek modification to the national
clearinghouse format.

--- END ---