BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.520 and 1997 c 73 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as specified in subsection (3) of this section, upon
receipt of proper proofs of death of any member before retirement or
before the first installment of his or her retirement allowance shall
become due his or her accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
and/or other benefits payable upon his or her death shall be paid to
his or her estate or to such persons, trust, or organization as he or
she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed
with the department. If a member fails to file a new beneficiary
designation subsequent to marriage, divorce, or reestablishment of
membership following termination by withdrawal, lapsation, or
retirement, payment of his or her accumulated contributions, less any
amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
and/or other benefits upon death before retirement shall be made to the
surviving spouse, if any; otherwise, to his or her estate. If a member
had established ten or more years of Washington membership service
credit or was eligible for retirement, the beneficiary or the surviving
spouse if otherwise eligible may elect, in lieu of a cash refund of the
member's accumulated contributions, the following survivor benefit plan
actuarially reduced, except under subsection (4) of this section, by
the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to an obligee
upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order
filed under RCW 41.50.670:
(a) A widow or widower, without a child or children under eighteen
years of age, may elect a monthly payment of fifty dollars to become
effective at age fifty, provided the member had fifteen or more years
of Washington membership service credit. A benefit paid under this
subsection (1)(a) shall terminate at the marriage of the beneficiary.
(b) The beneficiary, if a surviving spouse or a dependent (as that
term is used in computing the dependent exemption for federal internal
revenue purposes) may elect to receive a joint and one hundred percent
retirement allowance under RCW 41.32.530.
(i) In the case of a dependent child the allowance shall continue
until attainment of majority or so long as the department judges that
the circumstances which created his or her dependent status continue to
exist. In any case, if at the time dependent status ceases, an amount
equal to the amount of accumulated contributions of the deceased member
has not been paid to the beneficiary, the remainder shall then be paid
in a lump sum to the beneficiary.
(ii) If at the time of death, the member was not then qualified for
a service retirement allowance, the benefit shall be based upon the
actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay the accrued regular
retirement allowance commencing when the deceased member would have
first qualified for a service retirement allowance.
(2) If no qualified beneficiary survives a member, at his or her
death his or her accumulated contributions, less any amount identified
as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions
pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to
his or her estate, or his or her dependents may qualify for survivor
benefits under benefit plan (1)(b) in lieu of a cash refund of the
members accumulated contributions in the following order: Widow or
widower, guardian of a dependent child or children under age eighteen,
or dependent parent or parents.
(3) If a member dies within sixty days following application for
disability retirement under RCW 41.32.550, the beneficiary named in the
application may elect to receive the benefit provided by:
(a) This section; or
(b) RCW 41.32.550, according to the option chosen under RCW
41.32.530 in the disability application.
(4) The retirement allowance of a member who is killed in the
course of employment, as determined by the director of the department
of labor and industries, is not subject to an actuarial reduction. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.32.480.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.32.805 and 2000 c 247 s 1002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested
member who has not completed at least ten years of service dies, the
amount of the accumulated contributions standing to such member's
credit in the retirement system, less any amount identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, at the time of such member's
death shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons,
trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there be
no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the
member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing to
such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such
spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no
such surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.
(2) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or
eligible children shall elect to receive either:
(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.32.765, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and
actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred percent
survivor option under RCW 41.32.785 and, except under subsection (4) of
this section, if the member was not eligible for normal retirement at
the date of death a further reduction as described in RCW 41.32.765; if
a surviving spouse who is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving
a child or children of the member under the age of majority, then such
child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount
equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse, share
and share alike, until such child or children reach the age of
majority; if there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an
allowance at the time of the member's death, such member's child or
children under the age of majority shall receive an allowance share and
share alike calculated as herein provided making the assumption that
the ages of the spouse and member were equal at the time of the
member's death; or
(b) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670.
(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies after October 1, 1977, and
is not survived by a spouse or an eligible child, then the accumulated
contributions standing to the member's credit, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid:
(a) To an estate, a person or persons, trust, or organization as
the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed
and filed with the department; or
(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(4) A member who is killed in the course of employment, as
determined by the director of the department of labor and industries,
is not subject to an actuarial reduction under RCW 41.32.765. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.32.760.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.32.895 and 2000 c 247 s 1003 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a member dies prior to retirement, the surviving spouse or
eligible child or children shall receive a retirement allowance
computed as provided in RCW 41.32.851 actuarially reduced to reflect a
joint and one hundred percent survivor option and, except under
subsection (2) of this section, if the member was not eligible for
normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as described
in RCW 41.32.875.
If the surviving spouse who is receiving the retirement allowance
dies leaving a child or children under the age of majority, then such
child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount
equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse, share
and share alike, until such child or children reach the age of
majority.
If there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an allowance at
the time of the member's death, such member's child or children under
the age of majority shall receive an allowance, share and share alike.
The allowance shall be calculated with the assumption that the age of
the spouse and member were equal at the time of the member's death.
(2) A member who is killed in the course of employment, as
determined by the director of the department of labor and industries,
is not subject to an actuarial reduction under RCW 41.32.875. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.32.840.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.35.460 and 1998 c 341 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested
member who has not completed at least ten years of service dies, the
amount of the accumulated contributions standing to such member's
credit in the retirement system at the time of such member's death,
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW
41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If
there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time
of the member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing
to such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such
spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no
such surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.
(2) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or
eligible child or children shall elect to receive either:
(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.35.420, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and
actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred percent
survivor option under RCW 41.35.220 and, except under subsection (4) of
this section, if the member was not eligible for normal retirement at
the date of death a further reduction as described in RCW 41.35.420; if
a surviving spouse who is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving
a child or children of the member under the age of majority, then such
child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount
equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse, share
and share alike, until such child or children reach the age of
majority; if there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an
allowance at the time of the member's death, such member's child or
children under the age of majority shall receive an allowance, share
and share alike, calculated as herein provided making the assumption
that the ages of the spouse and member were equal at the time of the
member's death; or
(b) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670.
(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies and is not survived by a
spouse or an eligible child, then the accumulated contributions
standing to the member's credit, less any amount identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid:
(a) To a person or persons, estate, trust, or organization as the
member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and
filed with the department; or
(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(4) A member who is killed in the course of employment, as
determined by the director of the department of labor and industries,
is not subject to an actuarial reduction under RCW 41.35.420. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.35.400.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.35.710 and 1998 c 341 s 212 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a member dies prior to retirement, the surviving spouse or
eligible child or children shall receive a retirement allowance
computed as provided in RCW 41.35.620 actuarially reduced to reflect a
joint and one hundred percent survivor option and, except under
subsection (2) of this section, if the member was not eligible for
normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as described
in RCW 41.35.680.
If the surviving spouse who is receiving the retirement allowance
dies leaving a child or children under the age of majority, then such
child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount
equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse, share
and share alike, until such child or children reach the age of
majority.
If there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an allowance at
the time of the member's death, such member's child or children under
the age of majority shall receive an allowance, share and share alike.
The allowance shall be calculated with the assumption that the age of
the spouse and member were equal at the time of the member's death.
(2) A member who is killed in the course of employment, as
determined by the director of the department of labor and industries,
is not subject to an actuarial reduction under RCW 41.35.680. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.35.620.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.40.270 and 1997 c 73 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, should
a member die before the date of retirement the amount of the
accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit in the
employees' savings fund, less any amount identified as owing to an
obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, at the time of death:
(a) Shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department; or
(b) If there be no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, or if a member fails to file a new
beneficiary designation subsequent to marriage, remarriage, dissolution
of marriage, divorce, or reestablishment of membership following
termination by withdrawal or retirement, such accumulated
contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon
withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed
under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the surviving spouse as if in
fact such spouse had been nominated by written designation as
aforesaid, or if there be no such surviving spouse, then to the
member's legal representatives.
(2) Upon the death in service, or while on authorized leave of
absence for a period not to exceed one hundred and twenty days from the
date of payroll separation, of any member who is qualified but has not
applied for a service retirement allowance or has completed ten years
of service at the time of death, the designated beneficiary, or the
surviving spouse as provided in subsection (1) of this section, may
elect to waive the payment provided by subsection (1) of this section.
Upon such an election, a joint and one hundred percent survivor option
under RCW 41.40.188, calculated under the retirement allowance
described in RCW 41.40.185 or 41.40.190, whichever is greater,
actuarially reduced, except under subsection (5) of this section, by
the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to an obligee
upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order
filed under RCW 41.50.670 shall automatically be given effect as if
selected for the benefit of the designated beneficiary. If the member
is not then qualified for a service retirement allowance, such benefit
shall be based upon the actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to
pay the accrued regular retirement allowance commencing when the
deceased member would have first qualified for a service retirement
allowance.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section, unless elected, shall not apply
to any member who has applied for service retirement in RCW 41.40.180,
as now or hereafter amended, and thereafter dies between the date of
separation from service and the member's effective retirement date,
where the member has selected a survivorship option under RCW
41.40.188. In those cases the beneficiary named in the member's final
application for service retirement may elect to receive either a cash
refund, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon
withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed
under RCW 41.50.670, or monthly payments according to the option
selected by the member.
(4) If a member dies within sixty days following application for
disability retirement under RCW 41.40.230, the beneficiary named in the
application may elect to receive the benefit provided by:
(a) This section; or
(b) RCW 41.40.235, according to the option chosen under RCW
41.40.188 in the disability application.
(5) The retirement allowance of a member who is killed in the
course of employment, as determined by the director of the department
of labor and industries, is not subject to an actuarial reduction. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.40.185.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.40.700 and 2000 c 247 s 1004 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested
member who has not completed at least ten years of service dies, the
amount of the accumulated contributions standing to such member's
credit in the retirement system at the time of such member's death,
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW
41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If
there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time
of the member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing
to such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such
spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no
such surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.
(2) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or
eligible child or children shall elect to receive either:
(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.40.630, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and
actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred percent
survivor option under RCW 41.40.660 and, except under subsection (4) of
this section, if the member was not eligible for normal retirement at
the date of death a further reduction as described in RCW 41.40.630; if
a surviving spouse who is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving
a child or children of the member under the age of majority, then such
child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount
equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse, share
and share alike, until such child or children reach the age of
majority; if there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an
allowance at the time of the member's death, such member's child or
children under the age of majority shall receive an allowance share and
share alike calculated as herein provided making the assumption that
the ages of the spouse and member were equal at the time of the
member's death; or
(b) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670.
(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies after October 1, 1977, and
is not survived by a spouse or an eligible child, then the accumulated
contributions standing to the member's credit, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid:
(a) To a person or persons, estate, trust, or organization as the
member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and
filed with the department; or
(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(4) A member who is killed in the course of employment, as
determined by the director of the department of labor and industries,
is not subject to an actuarial reduction under RCW 41.40.630. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.40.620.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.40.835 and 2000 c 247 s 312 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a member dies prior to retirement, the surviving spouse or
eligible child or children shall receive a retirement allowance
computed as provided in RCW 41.40.790 actuarially reduced to reflect a
joint and one hundred percent survivor option and, except under
subsection (2) of this section, if the member was not eligible for
normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as described
in RCW 41.40.820.
If the surviving spouse who is receiving the retirement allowance
dies leaving a child or children under the age of majority, then such
child or children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount
equal to that which was being received by the surviving spouse, share
and share alike, until such child or children reach the age of
majority.
If there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an allowance at
the time of the member's death, such member's child or children under
the age of majority shall receive an allowance, share and share alike.
The allowance shall be calculated with the assumption that the age of
the spouse and member were equal at the time of the member's death.
(2) A member who is killed in the course of employment, as
determined by the director of the department of labor and industries,
is not subject to an actuarial reduction under RCW 41.40.820. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.40.790.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act applies to any member killed in the
course of employment, as determined by the director of the department
of labor and industries, on or after July 1, 2001.

--- END ---