BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A regional transit authority shall submit to the voters
within its service area, at the next general election after the
effective date of this act, a ballot proposition to provide for funding
and implementation of a light rail transit system in a county with a
population over one million five hundred thousand persons.
(b) A simple majority of those voting within the service area is
required for approval. If the vote is affirmative, the authority may
implement a light rail transit system in a county with a population
over one million five hundred thousand persons. If the vote is
negative, the authority shall not make any expenditure, incur any debt,
issue any bonds, nor enter into any agreement, for purposes of
implementing a light rail transit system in a county with a population
over one million five hundred thousand persons, except to make
expenditures solely for the purposes of retiring debt or fulfilling
contractual obligations, if any, relative to a light rail system,
incurred or entered into before the effective date of this act.
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section prohibits a regional
transit authority from implementing programs other than a light rail
transit system in a county with a population over one million five
hundred thousand persons, including but not limited to commuter rail,
a bus rapid transit system, intercity bus service, park and ride lots,
other programs, or a light rail transit system in other counties within
an authority's service area.
(3)(a) A regional transit authority shall assess all resources
actually used, or intended or expected to be used, for a light rail
transit system in a county with a population over one million five
hundred thousand persons (including but not limited to all cash or
other assets, debt capacity or limits, and rights under agreements with
other entities), and determine the best alternative use of all such
resources, as between any of the following alternatives or any
combination of them:
(i) A bus rapid transit system;
(ii) Expanded commuter rail service;
(iii) Expanded bus or vanpool service; and
(iv) Any other allowed service.
(b) In connection with the assessment under (a) of this subsection,
a regional transit authority shall conduct at least six public hearings
and shall consult with, and obtain the views of, a city transportation
authority under chapter 35.95A RCW, and shall consider the need for
rapid regional transit connecting major destinations for employment,
shopping, recreation, and transportation purposes.
(c) If voter approval of implementing a light rail transit system
in a county with a population over one million five hundred thousand
persons is not obtained under subsection (1) of this section, a
regional transit authority shall reprogram the light rail resources to
the chosen alternatives and proceed with implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is remedial in nature and applies
to all regional transit authorities established before or after the
effective date of this act.

--- END ---