BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A regional transit authority is governed by an elected board
consisting of nine members elected from nine numbered districts in
nonpartisan primary and general elections commencing with the elections
held in 2003. Commencing with such elections, a person seeking
election or serving on the board may not hold other public office and
must be a registered voter residing in the relevant electoral district
during the term in office and for a period from at least thirty days
before filing a petition for candidacy.
(2) A five-member districting commission appointed by the governor
shall define the districts as soon as possible after the effective date
of this act. Each commission member must reside in a different
authority subarea. The districting commission has all reasonably
necessary powers and shall determine a reasonable budget, which must be
funded upon its request, by an authority. The districting commission
shall promptly approve a plan for nine numbered electoral districts in
a service area, and publicize and file the plan with the county clerks
of the counties within a service area. The plan must be drawn to
ensure that the electoral districts have nearly equal populations (in
accord with the one-person-one-vote principle); do not divide a
precinct; are compact, convenient, and contiguous; and minimize the
number of districts that consist of portions of different counties or
different authority subareas. An objection to the plan must commence
within thirty days, and be heard within sixty days, of filing the plan.
(3) Upon certification of the 2003 general election, terms of
office of an authority's board members expire, if any are existing on
the effective date of this act, and the nine elected members shall take
office. Each elected member shall serve the remainder of 2003 plus an
additional period of two or four years. Lots must be drawn to
determine which five of the nine elected members shall serve an
additional four years, and which four of the nine elected members shall
serve an additional two years. All successors elected in subsequent
elections in odd-numbered years will have terms of office for four
years, commencing January 1st after the election.
(4) An authority's board positions become vacant upon failure to
maintain residence or other qualification, recall, death, resignation,
or adjudication of permanent disability. The vacancy must be filled as
provided in chapter 42.12 RCW. The appointed temporary member shall
serve until a successor for the remainder of the vacated term is chosen
in the next primary and general election.
(5) Every decade, after release of federal census information, the
governor shall appoint a new districting commission in accord with
subsection (2) of this section. The commission shall operate in accord
with the standards provided in subsection (2) of this section, and
shall prepare a timetable for transition to any new districts.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to allow staggered
terms after a redistricting, a board member who has an uncompleted
four-year term and no longer resides in his or her prior district
solely due to redistricting, shall serve the remainder of the four-year
term.
(7) Major decisions of the authority require a favorable vote of
two-thirds of the entire membership. "Major decisions" include at
least the following: System plan adoption and amendment; system
phasing decisions; annual budget adoption; authorization of
annexations; modification of board composition; and executive director
employment.
(8) Each member of the board is eligible to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to
receive compensation as provided in RCW 43.03.250. However, a board
member may elect to be alternatively compensated upon the same terms
and conditions as a member of any port district in the area served by
such authority.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.112.010 and 1992 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes that existing transportation facilities
in the central Puget Sound area are inadequate to address mobility
needs of the area. The geography of the region, travel demand growth,
and public resistance to new roadways combine to further necessitate
the rapid development of alternative modes of travel.
The legislature finds that local governments have been effective in
cooperatively planning a multicounty, high capacity transportation
system. However, a continued multijurisdictional approach to funding,
construction, and operation of a multicounty high capacity
transportation system may impair the successful implementation of such
a system.
The legislature finds that a single agency will be more effective
than several local jurisdictions working collectively at planning,
developing, operating, and funding a high capacity transportation
system. The single agency's services must be carefully integrated and
coordinated with public transportation services currently provided. As
the single agency's services are established, any public transportation
services currently provided that are duplicative should be eliminated.
Further, the single agency must coordinate its activities with other
agencies providing local and state roadway services, implementing
comprehensive planning, and implementing transportation demand
management programs and assist in developing infrastructure to support
high capacity systems including but not limited to feeder systems, park
and ride facilities, intermodal centers, and related roadway and
operational facilities. Because the legislature finds an overriding
need to ensure that the single agency is accountable to the people,
coordination can be best achieved through ((common governance, such as
integrated governing boards)) election of board members by districts.
It is therefore the policy of the state of Washington to empower
counties in the state's most populous region to create a local agency
for planning and implementing a high capacity transportation system
within that region. The authorization for such an agency, except as
specifically provided in this chapter, is not intended to limit the
powers of existing transit agencies.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.112.020 and 1999 c 20 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Authority" means a regional transit authority authorized under
this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the board of a regional transit authority.
(3) "Service area" or "area" means the area included within the
boundaries of a regional transit authority.
(4) "System" means a regional transit system authorized under this
chapter and under the jurisdiction of a regional transit authority.
(5) "Facilities" means any lands, interest in land, air rights over
lands, and improvements thereto including vessel terminals, and any
equipment, vehicles, vessels, and other components necessary to support
the system.
(6) "Proof of payment" means evidence of fare prepayment authorized
by a regional transit authority for the use of trains, including but
not limited to commuter trains and light rail trains.
(7) "Subarea" means one of the five areas within an authority's
boundaries as identified in an authority's system plan adopted in May
1996.

Sec. 4 RCW 81.112.030 and 1994 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Two or more contiguous counties each having a population of four
hundred thousand persons or more may establish a regional transit
authority to develop and operate a high capacity transportation system
as defined in chapter 81.104 RCW.
The authority shall be formed in the following manner:
(1) The joint regional policy committee created pursuant to RCW
81.104.040 shall adopt a system and financing plan, including the
definition of the service area. This action shall be completed by
September 1, 1992, contingent upon satisfactory completion of the
planning process defined in RCW 81.104.100. The final system plan
shall be adopted no later than June 30, 1993. In addition to the
requirements of RCW 81.104.100, the plan for the proposed system shall
provide explicitly for a minimum portion of new tax revenues to be
allocated to local transit agencies for interim express services. Upon
adoption the joint regional policy committee shall immediately transmit
the plan to the county legislative authorities within the adopted
service area.
(2) The legislative authorities of the counties within the service
area shall decide by resolution whether to participate in the
authority. This action shall be completed within forty-five days
following receipt of the adopted plan or by August 13, 1993, whichever
comes first.
(3) ((Each county that chooses to participate in the authority
shall appoint its board members as set forth in RCW 81.112.040 and
shall submit its list of members to the secretary of the Washington
state department of transportation. These actions must be completed
within thirty days following each county's decision to participate in
the authority.
(4))) The secretary shall call the first meeting of the authority,
to be held within thirty days following receipt of the ((appointments))
names of the elected board members. At its first meeting, the
authority shall elect officers and provide for the adoption of rules
and other operating procedures.
(((5))) (4) The authority is formally constituted at its first
meeting and the board shall begin taking steps toward implementation of
the system and financing plan adopted by the joint regional policy
committee. If the joint regional policy committee fails to adopt a
plan by June 30, 1993, the authority shall proceed to do so based on
the work completed by that date by the joint regional policy committee.
Upon formation of the authority, the joint regional policy committee
shall cease to exist. The authority may make minor modifications to
the plan as deemed necessary and shall at a minimum review local
transit agencies' plans to ensure feeder service/high capacity transit
service integration, ensure fare integration, and ensure avoidance of
parallel competitive services. The authority shall also conduct a
minimum thirty-day public comment period.
(((6))) (5) If the authority determines that major modifications to
the plan are necessary before the initial ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters, the authority may make those modifications
with a favorable vote of two-thirds of the entire membership. Any such
modification shall be subject to the review process set forth in RCW
81.104.110. The modified plan shall be transmitted to the legislative
authorities of the participating counties. The legislative authorities
shall have forty-five days following receipt to act by motion or
ordinance to confirm or rescind their continued participation in the
authority.
(((7))) (6) If any county opts to not participate in the authority,
but two or more contiguous counties do choose to continue to
participate, the authority's board shall be revised accordingly. The
authority shall, within forty-five days, redefine the system and
financing plan to reflect elimination of one or more counties, and
submit the redefined plan to the legislative authorities of the
remaining counties for their decision as to whether to continue to
participate. This action shall be completed within forty-five days
following receipt of the redefined plan.
(((8))) (7) The authority shall place on the ballot within two
years of the authority's formation, a single ballot proposition to
authorize the imposition of taxes to support the implementation of an
appropriate phase of the plan within its service area. In addition to
the system plan requirements contained in RCW 81.104.100(2)(d), the
system plan approved by the authority's board before the submittal of
a proposition to the voters shall contain an equity element which:
(a) Identifies revenues anticipated to be generated by corridor and
by county within the authority's boundaries;
(b) Identifies the phasing of construction and operation of high
capacity system facilities, services, and benefits in each corridor.
Phasing decisions should give priority to jurisdictions which have
adopted transit-supportive land use plans; and
(c) Identifies the degree to which revenues generated within each
county will benefit the residents of that county, and identifies when
such benefits will accrue.
A simple majority of those voting within the boundaries of the
authority is required for approval. If the vote is affirmative, the
authority shall begin implementation of the projects identified in the
proposition. However, the authority may not submit any authorizing
proposition for voter-approved taxes prior to July 1, 1993; nor may the
authority issue bonds or form any local improvement district prior to
July 1, 1993.
(((9))) (8) If the vote on a proposition fails, the board may
redefine the proposition, make changes to the authority boundaries, and
make corresponding changes to the composition of the board, subject to
section 1 of this act. If the composition of the board is changed, the
participating counties shall revise the membership of the board
accordingly, subject to section 1 of this act. The board may then
submit the revised proposition or a different proposition to the
voters. No single proposition may be submitted to the voters more than
twice. The authority may place additional propositions on the ballot
to impose taxes to support additional phases of plan implementation.
If the authority is unable to achieve a positive vote on a
proposition within two years from the date of the first election on a
proposition, the board may, by resolution, reconstitute the authority
as a single-county body. With a two-thirds vote of the entire
membership of the voting members, the board may also dissolve the
authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, an authority board
that was not elected as provided for in section 1 of this act may not
make expenditures, incur any debt, issue any bonds, or enter into any
agreement, for the purpose of implementing a light rail transit system
in a county with a population over one million five hundred thousand
persons.
(2) An authority may make expenditures under this section solely
for the purpose of retiring debt or fulfilling contractual obligations,
if any, relative to a light rail system, incurred or entered into
before the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 81.112.040 (Board appointments -- Voting -- Expenses) and 1994 c 109 s 1 & 1992 c 101 s 4 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is remedial in nature and applies
to all regional transit authorities established before or after the
effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---