BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 15.49 RCW
to read as follows:
Fees established under this chapter pertaining to laboratory
testing and seed certification may be increased by the department by
rule during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004, in excess of the
fiscal growth factor as determined under chapter 43.135 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2003.

--- END ---