BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 63.14.080 and 1967 c 234 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this section "periodic time balance" means the
unpaid portion of the time balance as of the last day of each month, or
other uniform time interval established by the regular consecutive
payment period scheduled in a retail installment contract.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any retail installment contract
to the contrary, and if the rights of the purchaser have not been
terminated or forfeited under the terms of the contract, any buyer may
prepay in full the unpaid portion of the time balance thereof at any
time before its final due date and, if ((he)) the buyer does so, he or
she shall receive a refund credit of the unearned portion of the
service charge for such prepayment. The amount of such refund credit
shall be computed ((according to the "rule of seventy-eighths", that is
it shall represent at least as great a portion of the original service
charge, as the sum of the periodic time balances not yet due bears to
the sum of all the periodic time balances under the schedule of
payments in the contract: PROVIDED, That where the earned service
charge (total service charge minus refund credit) thus computed is less
than the following minimum service charge: fifteen dollars where the
principal balance is not in excess of two hundred and fifty dollars,
twenty-five dollars where the principal balance exceeds two hundred and
fifty dollars but is not in excess of five hundred dollars, thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents where the principal balance exceeds five
hundred dollars but is not in excess of one thousand dollars, and fifty
dollars where the principal balance exceeds one thousand dollars; then
such minimum service charge shall be deemed to be the earned service
charge: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That where the amount of such refund
credit is less than one dollar, no refund credit need be made)) using
the actuarial method, unless a sum equal to two or more installments
has been prepaid and the account is not in arrears and continues to be
paid ahead, in which case the interest on the account must be
recalculated by the simple interest method with the refund of unearned
interest made as if the contract had been made using the simple
interest method. When computing an actuarial refund, the seller may
round the annual rate used to the nearest quarter of one percent.
In computing a required refund of unearned interest, a prepayment
made on or before the fifteenth day after the scheduled payment date is
deemed to have been made on the payment date preceding the prepayment.
In the case of prepayment before the first installment due date, the
seller may retain an amount not to exceed one-thirtieth of the first
month's interest charge for each day between the origination date of
the contract and the actual date of prepayment.

--- END ---