BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.92.090 and 1963 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state of Washington, ((whether)) while acting in its
((governmental or)) proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages
arising out of its tortious conduct to the same extent as if it were a
private person or corporation. While acting in its governmental
capacity, the state is liable only to the extent that the actions or
omissions of its officers, employees, or agents constitute gross
negligence. For purposes of this section, "gross negligence" means the
failure to exercise slight care. "Governmental capacity" includes, but
is not limited to, the supervision of offenders, protection of
vulnerable citizens, fire fighting, police activities, and highway
design and construction.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.96.010 and 2001 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All local governmental entities, ((whether)) acting in a
((governmental or)) proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages
arising out of their tortious conduct, or the tortious conduct of their
past or present officers, employees, or volunteers while performing or
in good faith purporting to perform their official duties, to the same
extent as if they were a private person or corporation. While acting
in its governmental capacity, local governmental entities are liable
only to the extent that the actions or omissions of its officers,
employees, or agents constitute gross negligence. "Governmental
capacity" includes, but is not limited to, the supervision of
offenders, protection of vulnerable citizens, fire fighting, police
activities, and highway design and construction. Filing a claim for
damages within the time allowed by law shall be a condition precedent
to the commencement of any action claiming damages. The laws
specifying the content for such claims shall be liberally construed so
that substantial compliance therewith will be deemed satisfactory.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, for the purposes
of this chapter, "local governmental entity" means a county, city,
town, special district, municipal corporation as defined in RCW
39.50.010, quasi-municipal corporation, or public hospital.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter, "volunteer" is defined
according to RCW 51.12.035.
(4) For purposes of this chapter, "gross negligence" means the
failure to exercise slight care.

--- END ---