BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.107 and 1997 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of health shall charge a fee of ((thirteen))
seventeen dollars for certified copies of records and for copies or
information provided for research, statistical, or administrative
purposes, and eight dollars for a search of the files or records when
no copy is made. The department shall prescribe by regulation fees to
be paid for preparing sealed files and for opening sealed files.
No fee may be demanded or required for furnishing certified copies
of a birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, annulment, or legal
separation record for use in connection with a claim for compensation
or pension pending before the veterans administration.
The department shall keep a true and correct account of all fees
received and turn the fees over to the state treasurer on a weekly
basis.
Local registrars shall charge the same fees as the state as
hereinabove provided and as prescribed by department regulation((,
except that local registrars shall charge thirteen dollars for the
first copy of a death certificate and eight dollars for each additional
copy of the same death certificate when the additional copies are
ordered at the same time as the first copy)). All such fees collected,
except for ((five)) seven dollars of each fee collected for the
issuance of ((a certified copy)) birth certificates and first copies of
death certificates and fourteen dollars of each fee collected for
additional copies of the same death certificate ordered at the same
time as the first copy, shall be paid to the jurisdictional health
department.
All local registrars in cities and counties shall keep a true and
correct account of all fees received under this section for the
issuance of certified copies and shall turn ((five)) seven dollars of
the fees collected for birth certificates and first copies of death
certificates and fourteen dollars of the fee collected for additional
copies of death certificates over to the state treasurer on or before
the first day of January, April, July, and October. All but five
dollars of the fees turned over to the state treasurer by local
registrars shall be paid to the department of health for the purpose of
developing and maintaining the state vital records systems, including
a web-based electronic death registration system.
Five dollars of each fee imposed for the issuance of certified
copies, except for copies suitable for display issued under RCW
70.58.085, at both the state and local levels shall be held by the
state treasurer in the death investigations' account established by RCW
43.79.445.

--- END ---