BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is an
increasing awareness of the importance of the first five years of life
in a child's development. The legislature further finds that research
has demonstrated that high quality early childhood education and
learning programs can have significant and lasting benefits for a child
during those early years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
By August 2003 and annually thereafter, the superintendent of
public instruction shall prepare, distribute, and post on the agency
web site information for parents, preschools, and child care providers
about how to select early childhood education programs for children,
how best to prepare children for kindergarten, and guidelines for
preparing children for success in school, including kindergarten
readiness guidelines. In preparing the information, the superintendent
shall consult with individuals with knowledge of early childhood
education and learning, including but not limited to early childhood
educators, nonprofit associations for early childhood education,
parents, child care providers, and early childhood education faculty at
institutions of higher education.

--- END ---