BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.305.010 and 1992 c 56 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall be comprised of citizen
members, and may include business leaders, community leaders, and
parents, and shall reflect the racial and ethnic diversity of the
state's K-12 student population and ensure that the geographic regions
of the state are represented. The board's voting membership shall be
as follows: (a) One member from each congressional district of the
state, not including any congressional district at large, elected by
the members of the boards of directors of school districts thereof, as
hereinafter in this chapter provided((,)); (b) the superintendent of
public instruction ((and)); (c) one member elected at large, as
provided in this chapter, by the members of the boards of directors of
all private schools in the state meeting the requirements of RCW
28A.195.010; and (d) three members appointed by the governor and
subject to confirmation by the senate. The member representing private
schools shall not vote on matters affecting public schools. If there
is a dispute about whether or not an issue directly affects public
schools, the dispute shall be settled by a majority vote of the other
members of the board.
(2) The governor's initial appointments shall be made by December
31, 2003.
(3) Appointed members shall serve for terms of four years, with the
terms expiring on December 31st of the fourth year of the term.
However, in the case of the initial members, two members shall serve
four-year terms and one member shall serve a two-year term, with each
of the terms expiring December 31st of the applicable year. Appointees
may be reappointed to serve more than one term.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.305.080 and 1992 c 56 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term of office of each elected member of the state board of
education shall begin on the second Monday in January next following
the election at which he or she was elected, and he or she shall hold
office for the term for which he or she was elected and until his or
her successor is elected and qualified. Except as otherwise provided
in RCW 28A.305.030, each elected member of the state board of education
shall ((be elected)) serve for a term of four years.

--- END ---