BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to establish a
certification process for public and nonpublic prekindergarten programs
to seek voluntary approval, by the state board of education, of their
child development and educational offerings. The purpose of the
approval is to give parents and other consumers of prekindergarten
programs some standard to use to assess the quality of prekindergarten
programs and the program's ability to prepare children for
kindergarten.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By rule, the state board of education shall
adopt standards and procedures for the certification and approval of
all public and nonpublic prekindergarten programs. The standards for
approval shall require that the programs provide the children with the
academic skills that are needed for the children to be successful as
they enter into the next level of school. Such programs are encouraged
to apply for approval. In developing standards, the state board of
education shall review nationally developed standards. However, before
any standards or procedures for approval of prekindergarten programs
are implemented, the state board of education shall present the
standards and procedures to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The state board of education shall post a
list of approved prekindergarten programs on the board's internet web
site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.215 RCW.

--- END ---