BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that international
trade is an important part of Washington's economy with Washington as
the fifth largest exporting state in the nation. The legislature
further finds that World Trade Organization agreements and the North
American Free Trade Agreement have implications for Washington state
laws governing agriculture, services, environmental regulation, and
economic subsidies. The legislature further finds that future trade
agreements such as the proposed Free Trade Area of the Americas may
also impact Washington state. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to create a joint legislative oversight committee on trade
policy to monitor the impact of these trade agreements on Washington
state laws, and to provide a mechanism for legislators and citizens to
voice their opinions and concerns about the potential impacts of these
trade agreements to state and federal government officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A joint legislative oversight committee on
trade policy is created, to consist of four senators and four
representatives from the legislature and three ex officio members. The
president of the senate shall appoint the senate members of the
committee, and the speaker of the house shall appoint the house members
of the committee. No more than two members from each house may be from
the same political party. A list of appointees must be submitted by
July 1, 2003, and before the close of each regular session during an
even-numbered year. Vacancies on the committee will be filled by
appointment and must be filled from the same political party and from
the same house as the member whose seat was vacated. The ex officio
members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and the president of the senate, and include a
representative from the department of agriculture, the state trade
representative, and a representative from the office of the attorney
general.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The committee shall appoint its own chair
and other officers and make rules for orderly procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The committee has the following powers and
duties:
(1) At least once a year, hear public testimony on the actual and
potential impacts of international trade agreements and negotiations on
Washington state and submit an annual report to the state trade
representative's office and to the legislature regarding the public
testimony;
(2) Maintain active communication with the state trade
representative's office, the United States trade representative's
office, Washington's congressional delegation, the national conference
of state legislatures, and any other bodies the committee deems
appropriate regarding ongoing developments in international trade
agreements and policy;
(3) Conduct an annual assessment of the impacts of international
trade agreements upon Washington law and submit the report to the
legislature;
(4) Examine any aspects of international trade, international
economic integration, and trade agreements that the members deem
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The committee will receive the necessary
staff support from both the senate committee services and the house
office of program research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The members of the committee shall serve
without additional compensation, but are entitled to receive per diem,
mileage, and incidental expense allowances at the rates provided in
chapter 44.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 2 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---