BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.58.080 and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Local governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four
months after the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,))
a master program for regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state
consistent with the required elements of the guidelines adopted by the
department in accordance with a schedule of time limits to be
established by the legislature.
(2) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (1) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.250 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 25 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to amend the shoreline management act
to facilitate the implementation of guidelines that provide for review
and amendment of local government shoreline master programs. To this
end, the legislature affirms the schedule of time limits provided in
RCW 90.58.080 for updating shoreline master programs by local
governments and eliminates the limits on state funding of shoreline
master program updating costs. It is the intent of the legislature
that the state provide funding to local governments that is reasonable
and adequate to accomplish the task of updating shoreline master
programs, and consistent with the schedule for the local governments to
adopt the updates of shoreline master programs. Except as specifically
described in this subsection, nothing in this act is intended to alter
the existing obligations, duties, and benefits provided by the
shoreline management act to local governments and the department.
(2) The department is directed to cooperate fully with local
governments in discharging their responsibilities under this chapter.
Funds shall be available for distribution to local governments on the
basis of applications for preparation of master programs. Such
applications shall be submitted in accordance with regulations
developed by the department. The department is authorized to make and
administer grants within appropriations authorized by the legislature
to any local government within the state for the purpose of developing
a master shorelines program.
((No grant shall be made in an amount in excess of the recipient's
contribution to the estimated cost of such program.))

--- END ---