BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the resident
population of orca whales in Washington waters, commonly referred to as
the "southern residents," are enormously significant to the state.
These highly social, intelligent, and playful marine mammals are a
totem of the entire Pacific Northwest and wonderfully illustrate the
biological diversity and rich natural heritage that all Washington
citizens and its visitors enjoy. However, the southern resident orcas
are currently in a serious decline, likely from multiple causes
including PCB poisoning, declines in salmon, which are favorite orca
prey species, general ecosystem deterioration, growing whale watching
pressure, and the lingering effects of many whales being captured for
display in the 1960s and 1970s. There are additional threats to the
survival of the existing orca whale populations from oil spills, boat
collisions, fishing net entanglement, strandings, and disease. The
small size of the southern resident population and its recent
catastrophic decline qualify it for listing as "endangered" under the
strict scientific criteria established by the international union for
the conservation of nature, but the United States government has
declined to list this population under the federal endangered species
act. It was listed as "threatened" by the government of British
Columbia in 1999.
Therefore, it is important that Washington state take strong
measures to develop and implement a recovery strategy for the southern
resident orcas, working closely with governmental and nongovernmental
organizations with scientific, management, and regulatory
responsibilities throughout the Pacific Northwest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The fish and wildlife commission shall
prepare a recovery plan for orca whale populations that are seasonally
resident in Washington waters. The department of fish and wildlife is
the lead agency in preparing the plan under the commission's direction.
The fish and wildlife commission shall form an interagency team to
assist in preparing the recovery plan, that includes the departments of
ecology, health, and natural resources, and the Puget Sound water
quality action team. The fish and wildlife commission shall invite
participation on the team by the national oceanic and atmospheric
administration and Indian tribes with treaty fishing rights. In
preparing the plan, the fish and wildlife commission and the
interagency team should consult with provincial and federal government
agencies in Canada with the objective of coordinating recovery planning
activities for the southern resident orca populations. The fish and
wildlife commission shall encourage an agency participating on the team
to take lead responsibility for developing a recovery plan element
where that element involves a program responsibility primarily of that
agency.
(2) The recovery plan must focus primarily upon monitoring,
management, and regulatory measures that state and local governments
may undertake to address the full range of factors limiting recovery.
The plan should include, but is not limited to:
(a) Identifying needed field and laboratory research to learn more
about southern resident orca genetics, biology, and ecology. Among the
studies to be considered in the plan are:
(i) An enhanced and coordinated stranding network to provide
immediate response to reports of orca and other marine mammal stranding
events;
(ii) Shore-based observations of vessel and whale interactions; and
(iii) Funding for continuing and new photo-identification studies;
(b) Measures to protect and restore the food sources for orcas,
including protecting herring and forage fish habitat that are critical
for restoration of chinook salmon, a principal prey species of orcas;
(c) Measures to protect and restore estuarine, riparian, and
shoreline habitats;
(d) Measures to reduce sources of toxic waste and other
contaminants to the waters frequented by orcas, including but not
limited to:
(i) Reviewing water quality discharge permits governing discharges
to Puget Sound and other marine waters;
(ii) The remediation of sites in or adjacent to marine waters
contaminated with polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) and other toxic
pollutants; and
(iii) Coordinated efforts to prevent oil spills and for responses
when spills occur;
(e) Consideration of reintroduction of captive orcas that were
taken from southern resident populations; and
(f) Measures to reduce pollution and other negative impacts from
whale watching vessels.
(3) The recovery plan shall be adopted by the fish and wildlife
commission no later than June 30, 2005. Where plan elements require
additional funding or additional statutory authority to implement, the
fish and wildlife commission shall use its best efforts to make
recommendations to the legislature by January 15, 2005.

--- END ---