BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.95A.120 and 2002 c 248 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The city transportation authority may be dissolved by a vote of the
people residing within the boundaries of the authority if the authority
is faced with significant financial problems. However, the authority
may covenant with holders of its bonds that it may not be dissolved and
shall continue to exist solely for the purpose of continuing to levy
and collect any taxes or assessments levied by it and pledged to the
repayment of debt and to take other actions, including the appointment
of a trustee, as necessary to allow it to repay any remaining debt.
Any referendum petition to dissolve the city transportation authority
must be filed with the city council and contain provisions for
dissolution of the authority. Within seven days, the city prosecutor
must review the validity of the petition and submit its report to the
petitioner and city council. If the petitioner's claims are deemed
valid by the city prosecutor, within ten days of the petitioner's
filing, the city council will confer with the petitioner concerning the
form and style of the petition, issue an identification number for the
petition, and write a ballot title for the measure. The ballot title
must be posed as a question and an affirmative vote on the measure
results in authority retention and a negative vote on the measure
results in the authority's dissolution. The petitioner will be
notified of the identification number and ballot title within this ten-day period.
After this notification, the petitioner has ninety days in which to
secure on petition forms, the signatures of not less than fifteen
percent of the registered voters in the authority area and to file the
signed petitions with the filing officer. Each petition form must
contain the ballot title and the full text of the measure to be
referred. The filing officer will verify the sufficiency of the
signatures on the petitions. If sufficient valid signatures are
properly submitted, the filing officer shall submit the initiative to
the authority area voters at a general or special election held on one
of the dates provided in RCW 29.13.010 as determined by the city
council, which election will not take place later than one hundred
twenty days after the signed petition has been filed with the filing
officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.95A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this chapter for any resident of the
authority area to register a motor vehicle owned by the resident
outside the authority area where the registration is for the purpose of
evading the collection of the special excise tax levied by the
authority for the privilege of using a motor vehicle under RCW
35.95A.080(1). When a violation of this chapter occurs, the resident
of the authority area is subject to a civil penalty equal to three
times the amount of the evaded special excise tax. For purposes of
this subsection, each and every time a registration is made with the
intent to evade the special excise tax constitutes a separate and
distinct violation.
(2) A city transportation authority is authorized to impose civil
penalties in accordance with this chapter and the procedural
requirements providing for notice, hearing, and review contained in
chapter 34.05 RCW. An authority shall adopt a formal policy to
implement the required procedures.
(3) The penalty provided for in this section must be imposed by
written notice to the person against whom the civil penalty is assessed
and must describe the violation. The imposed penalty is due twenty-eight days after the mailing of the written notice unless an
application for an adjudicative hearing is filed as provided for in
chapter 34.05 RCW and an authority's implementing policy.
(4) In addition to other remedies provided by law, a city
transportation authority may seek enforcement of a final order imposing
the civil penalty by filing a petition for civil enforcement in
accordance with RCW 34.05.578.
(5) Civil penalties collected must be placed into the general fund
of a city transportation authority and used for any lawful purpose of
the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---