BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 66.44.190 (Sales on university grounds
prohibited -- Exceptions) and 1999 c 281 s 10, 1997 c 321 s 62, 1979
ex.s. c 104 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 68 s 1, 1967 c 21 s 1, 1951 c 120 s
1, 1933 ex.s. c 49 s 1, & 1895 c 75 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.44 RCW
to read as follows:
If an institution of higher education chooses to allow the sale of
alcoholic beverages on campus, the legislature encourages the
institution to feature products produced in the state of Washington.

--- END ---