BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.110 and 2000 c 47 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall make or cause to be made, at least ((a
yearly)) every twenty-four months, an inspection and investigation of
all boarding homes. Every inspection shall focus primarily on actual
or potential resident outcomes, and may include an inspection of every
part of the premises and an examination of all records (other than
financial records), methods of administration, the general and special
dietary, and the stores and methods of supply. Following such an
inspection or inspections, written notice of any violation of this law
or the rules adopted hereunder shall be given to the applicant or
licensee and the department. The department may prescribe by rule that
any licensee or applicant desiring to make specified types of
alterations or additions to its facilities or to construct new
facilities shall, before commencing such alteration, addition, or new
construction, submit plans and specifications therefor to the agencies
responsible for plan reviews for preliminary inspection and approval or
recommendations with respect to compliance with the rules and standards
herein authorized.

--- END ---