BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.68A.090 and 1989 c 32 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person who communicates with a minor for immoral purposes, or a
person who communicates with someone the person believes to be a minor
for immoral purposes, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, unless that
person has previously been convicted under this section or of a felony
sexual offense under chapter 9.68A, 9A.44, or 9A.64 RCW or of any other
felony sexual offense in this or any other state, in which case the
person is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20
RCW.

--- END ---