BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.
(1) "Human cloning" means human asexual reproduction, accomplished
by introducing nuclear material from one or more human somatic cells
into a fertilized or unfertilized oocyte whose nuclear material has
been removed or inactivated so as to produce a living organism, at any
stage of development, that is genetically virtually identical to an
existing or previously existing human organism.
(2) "Human somatic cell" means a diploid cell that is obtained or
derived from a living or deceased human at any stage of development.
(3) "Oocyte" means the human ovum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) No person may knowingly engage or assist
in human cloning or attempted human cloning. No person may knowingly
ship, receive, import, or export for any purpose any product derived
from human cloning.
(2) The attorney general may bring an action to enjoin any person
from violating any provision of this chapter.
(3) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section is
subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars
for each violation. Civil penalties authorized by this subsection may
be imposed in any civil action brought by the attorney general.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits research not expressly
prohibited in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---