BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.100 and 1997 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon all roadways of sufficient width a vehicle shall be driven
upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:
(a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the
same direction under the rules governing such movement;
(b) When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the
left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall
yield the right of way to all vehicles traveling in the proper
direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such
distance as to constitute an immediate hazard;
(c) Upon a roadway divided into three marked lanes and providing
for two-way movement traffic under the rules applicable thereon; or
(d) Upon a street or highway restricted to one-way traffic.
(2) Upon all roadways having two or more lanes for traffic moving
in the same direction, all vehicles shall be driven in the right-hand
lane then available for traffic, except (a) when overtaking and passing
another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, (b) when traveling at
a speed greater than the traffic flow, (c) when moving left to allow
traffic to merge, or (d) when preparing for a left turn at an
intersection, exit, or into a private road or driveway when such left
turn is legally permitted. On any such roadway, a vehicle or
combination over ten thousand pounds shall be driven only in the right-hand lane except under the conditions enumerated in (a) through (d) of
this subsection.
(3) No vehicle towing a trailer or no vehicle or combination over
ten thousand pounds may be driven in the left-hand lane of a limited
access roadway having three or more lanes for traffic moving in one
direction except between the hours of 7:00 p.m. and 5:00 a.m. or when
preparing for a left turn at an intersection, exit, or into a private
road or driveway when a left turn is legally permitted. This
subsection does not apply to a vehicle using a high-occupancy vehicle
lane. A high-occupancy vehicle lane is not considered the left-hand
lane of a roadway. The department of transportation, in consultation
with the Washington state patrol, shall adopt rules specifying (a)
those circumstances where it is permissible for other vehicles to use
the left lane in case of emergency or to facilitate the orderly flow of
traffic, and (b) those segments of limited access roadway to be exempt
from this subsection due to the operational characteristics of the
roadway.
(4) It is a traffic infraction to drive continuously in the left
lane of a multilane roadway when it impedes the flow of other traffic.
(5) Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic
and providing for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle shall not be
driven to the left of the center line of the roadway except when
authorized by official traffic control devices designating certain
lanes to the left side of the center of the roadway for use by traffic
not otherwise permitted to use such lanes, or except as permitted under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. However, this subsection shall not
be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the center line in making
a left turn into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.410 and 1996 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to subsection (2) of this section the secretary may
increase the maximum speed limit on any highway or portion thereof to
not more than seventy miles per hour in accordance with the design
speed thereof (taking into account all safety elements included
therein), or whenever the secretary determines upon the basis of an
engineering and traffic investigation that such greater speed is
reasonable and safe under the circumstances existing on such part of
the highway.
(b) The greater maximum limit established under (a) of this
subsection shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice
thereof are erected, or if a maximum limit is established for auto
stages which is lower than the limit for automobiles, the auto stage
speed limit shall become effective thirty days after written notice
thereof is mailed in the manner provided in subsection (4) of this
section.
(c) Such maximum speed limit may be declared to be effective at all
times or at such times as are indicated upon said signs or in the case
of auto stages, as indicated in said written notice; and differing
limits may be established for different times of day, different types
of vehicles, varying weather conditions, and other factors bearing on
safe speeds, which shall be effective when posted upon appropriate
fixed or variable signs or if a maximum limit is established for auto
stages which is lower than the limit for automobiles, the auto stage
speed limit shall become effective thirty days after written notice
thereof is mailed in the manner provided in subsection (4) of this
section.
(2) The maximum speed limit for vehicles over ten thousand pounds
gross weight and vehicles in combination except auto stages shall not
exceed sixty miles per hour and may be established at a lower limit by
the secretary as provided in RCW 46.61.405. However, during the hours
between 7:00 p.m. and 5:00 a.m. the maximum speed limit for trucks, as
defined in subsection (3) of this section, is seventy miles per hour.
(3) The word "trucks" used by the department on signs giving notice
of maximum speed limits means vehicles over ten thousand pounds gross
weight and all vehicles in combination except auto stages.
(4) Whenever the secretary establishes maximum speed limits for
auto stages lower than the maximum limits for automobiles, the
secretary shall cause to be mailed notice thereof to each auto
transportation company holding a certificate of public convenience and
necessity issued by the Washington utilities and transportation
commission. The notice shall be mailed to the chief place of business
within the state of Washington of each auto transportation company or
if none then its chief place of business without the state of
Washington.

--- END ---