BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.370 and 2002 c 329 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) All applications for reservoir permits are subject to the
provisions of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320. But the party or
parties proposing to apply to a beneficial use the water stored in any
such reservoir shall also file an application for a permit, to be known
as the secondary permit, which shall be in compliance with the
provisions of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320. Such secondary
application shall refer to such reservoir as its source of water supply
and shall show documentary evidence that an agreement has been entered
into with the owners of the reservoir for a permanent and sufficient
interest in said reservoir to impound enough water for the purposes set
forth in said application. When the beneficial use has been completed
and perfected under the secondary permit, the department shall take the
proof of the water users under such permit and the final certificate of
appropriation shall refer to both the ditch and works described in the
secondary permit and the reservoir described in the primary permit.
The department may accept for processing a single application form
covering both a proposed reservoir and a proposed secondary permit or
permits for use of water from that reservoir.
(b) The department shall expedite processing applications for the
following types of storage proposals:
(i) Development of storage facilities that will not require a new
water right for diversion or withdrawal of the water to be stored;
(ii) Adding or changing one or more purposes of use of stored
water;
(iii) Adding to the storage capacity of an existing storage
facility; and
(iv) Applications for secondary permits to secure use from existing
storage facilities.
(c) A secondary permit for the beneficial use of water shall not be
required for use of water stored in a reservoir where the water right
for the source of the stored water authorizes the beneficial use.
(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, "reservoir" includes, in
addition to any surface reservoir, any naturally occurring underground
geological formation where water is collected and stored for subsequent
use as part of an underground artificial storage and recovery project.
To qualify for issuance of a reservoir permit an underground geological
formation must meet standards for review and mitigation of adverse
impacts identified, for the following issues:
(i) Aquifer vulnerability and hydraulic continuity;
(ii) Potential impairment of existing water rights;
(iii) Geotechnical impacts and aquifer boundaries and
characteristics;
(iv) Chemical compatibility of surface waters and ground water;
(v) Recharge and recovery treatment requirements;
(vi) System operation;
(vii) Water rights and ownership of water stored for recovery; and
(viii) Environmental impacts.
(b) Standards for review and standards for mitigation of adverse
impacts for an underground artificial storage and recovery project
shall be established by the department by rule. Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320, analysis of each
underground artificial storage and recovery project and each
underground geological formation for which an applicant seeks the
status of a reservoir shall be through applicant-initiated studies
reviewed by the department.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "underground artificial
storage and recovery project" means any project in which it is intended
to artificially store water in the ground through injection, surface
spreading and infiltration, or other department-approved method, and to
make subsequent use of the stored water. However, (a) this subsection
does not apply to irrigation return flow, or to operational and seepage
losses that occur during the irrigation of land, or to water that is
artificially stored due to the construction, operation, or maintenance
of an irrigation district project, or to projects involving water
reclaimed in accordance with chapter 90.46 RCW; and (b) RCW 90.44.130
applies to those instances of claimed artificial recharge occurring due
to the construction, operation, or maintenance of an irrigation
district project or operational and seepage losses that occur during
the irrigation of land, as well as other forms of claimed artificial
recharge already existing at the time a ground water subarea is
established.
(4) Nothing in chapter 98, Laws of 2000 changes the requirements of
existing law governing issuance of permits to appropriate or withdraw
the waters of the state.
(5) The department shall report to the legislature by December 31,
2001, on the standards for review and standards for mitigation
developed under subsection (3) of this section and on the status of any
applications that have been filed with the department for underground
artificial storage and recovery projects by that date.
(6) Where needed to ensure that existing storage capacity is
effectively and efficiently used to meet multiple purposes, the
department may authorize reservoirs to be filled more than once per
year or more than once per season of use.
(7) This section does not apply to small irrigation impoundments.
For purposes of this section, "small irrigation impoundments" means
lined surface storage ponds less than ten acre feet in volume used to
impound irrigation water under an existing water right where use of the
impoundment: (a)(i) Facilitates efficient use of water; or (ii)
promotes compliance with an approved recovery plan for endangered or
threatened species; and (b) does not expand the number of acres
irrigated or the annual consumptive quantity of water used. Water
remaining in a small irrigation impoundment at the end of an irrigation
season may be carried over for use in the next season. However, the
limitations of this subsection (7) apply. Development and use of a
small irrigation impoundment does not constitute a change or amendment
for purposes of RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.055.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.380 and 2001 c 237 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows,
averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point
of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any
person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as
provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such transfer or
such change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights,
the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate
granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be
made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued
to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner
and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or
permit to divert water.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(7), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.44.100 and 1997 c 316 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
ground water right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
ground waters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public ground water as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public ground water as the original
well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(7), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section.

--- END ---