BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.39A.030 and 2002 c 3 s 10 (Initiative Measure No.
775) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) To the extent of available funding, the department shall expand
cost-effective options for home and community services for consumers
for whom the state participates in the cost of their care.
(2) In expanding home and community services, the department shall:
(a) Take full advantage of federal funding available under Title XVIII
and Title XIX of the federal social security act, including home
health, adult day care, waiver options, and state plan services; and
(b) be authorized to use funds available under its community options
program entry system waiver granted under section 1915(c) of the
federal social security act to expand the availability of in-home,
adult residential care, adult family homes, enhanced adult residential
care, and assisted living services. By June 30, 1997, the department
shall undertake to reduce the nursing home medicaid census by at least
one thousand six hundred by assisting individuals who would otherwise
require nursing facility services to obtain services of their choice,
including assisted living services, enhanced adult residential care,
and other home and community services. If a resident, or his or her
legal representative, objects to a discharge decision initiated by the
department, the resident shall not be discharged if the resident has
been assessed and determined to require nursing facility services. In
contracting with nursing homes and boarding homes for enhanced adult
residential care placements, the department shall not require, by
contract or through other means, structural modifications to existing
building construction.
(3)(a) The department shall by rule establish payment rates for
home and community services that support the provision of cost-effective care. In the event of any conflict between any such rule and
a collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW 74.39A.270 and
74.39A.300, the collective bargaining agreement prevails.
(b) The department may authorize an enhanced adult residential care
rate for nursing homes that temporarily or permanently convert their
bed use for the purpose of providing enhanced adult residential care
under chapter 70.38 RCW, when the department determines that payment of
an enhanced rate is cost-effective and necessary to foster expansion of
contracted enhanced adult residential care services. As an incentive
for nursing homes to permanently convert a portion of its nursing home
bed capacity for the purpose of providing enhanced adult residential
care, the department may authorize a supplemental add-on to the
enhanced adult residential care rate.
(c) The department may authorize a supplemental assisted living
services rate for up to four years for facilities that convert from
nursing home use and do not retain rights to the converted nursing home
beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, if the department determines that payment
of a supplemental rate is cost-effective and necessary to foster
expansion of contracted assisted living services.
(4) In contracting with facilities for assisted living services,
adult residential care, and enhanced adult residential care, the
department will provide payments to facilities, including the amount
that the department has determined the resident is required to pay
towards his or her care. It is the department's responsibility to
collect that portion of the cost of care from the resident.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.620 and 1998 c 322 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department will pay a contractor for service rendered under
the facility contract and billed in accordance with RCW 74.46.610.
(2) The amount paid will be computed using the appropriate rates
assigned to the contractor.
(3) For each recipient, the department will pay an amount equal to
the appropriate rates, multiplied by the number of medicaid resident
days each rate was in effect, ((less)) including the amount the
recipient is required to pay for his or her care as set forth by RCW
74.46.630.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.630 and 1998 c 322 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department will notify a contractor of the amount each
medical care recipient is required to pay for care provided under the
contract and the effective date of such required contribution. It is
the ((contractor's)) department's responsibility to collect that
portion of the cost of care from the patient((, and to account for any
authorized reduction from his or her contribution in accordance with
rules established by the department)).
(2) If a contractor receives documentation showing a change in the
income or resources of a recipient which will mean a change in his or
her contribution toward the cost of care, this shall be reported in
writing to the department within seventy-two hours and in a manner
specified by rules established by the department. ((If necessary,
appropriate corrections will be made in the next facility statement,
and a copy of documentation supporting the change will be attached.))
If increased funds for a recipient are received by ((a contractor)) the
department, an amount determined by the department shall be allowed for
clothing and personal and incidental expense, and the balance applied
to the cost of care.
(3) The contractor shall accept the payment rates established and
paid by the department as full compensation for all services provided
under the contract, certification as specified by Title XIX, and
licensure under chapter 18.51 RCW. The contractor shall not seek or
accept additional compensation from or on behalf of a recipient for any
or all such services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---