BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a boarding home contracts with the department to provide
adult residential care services, enhanced adult residential care
services, or assisted living services under chapter 74.39A RCW, the
boarding home must hold a medicaid eligible resident's room or unit
when short-term care is needed in a nursing home or hospital, the
resident is likely to return to the boarding home, and payment is made
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The medicaid resident's bed or unit shall be held for up to
twenty days. The per day bed or unit hold compensation amount shall be
seventy percent of the daily rate paid for the first seven days the bed
or unit is held for the resident who needs short-term nursing home care
or hospitalization. The rate for the eighth through the twentieth day
a bed is held shall be established in rule, but shall be no lower than
ten dollars per day the bed or unit is held.
(3) The boarding home may seek third-party payment to hold a bed or
unit for twenty-one days or longer. If third-party payment is not
available, the medicaid resident may return to the first available and
appropriate bed or unit, if the resident continues to meet the
admission criteria under this chapter.

--- END ---