BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that, in
keeping with the traditional concept of the dignity of the individual
in our democratic society, the older citizens of this state and persons
with disabilities are entitled to live in comfort, honor, and dignity
in a manner that maximizes freedom and independence.
The legislature further finds that licensed boarding homes are an
essential component of home and community-based services, and that the
noninstitutional nature of this care setting must be preserved and
protected by ensuring a regulatory structure that focuses on the actual
care and services provided to residents, consumer satisfaction, and
continuous quality improvement.
The legislature also finds that residents and consumers of services
in licensed boarding homes should be encouraged to exercise maximum
independence, and the legislature declares that the state's rules for
licensed boarding homes must also be designed to encourage individual
dignity, autonomy, and choice.
The legislature further finds that consumers should be afforded
access to affordable long-term care services in licensed boarding
homes, and believes that care delivery must remain responsive to
consumer preferences. Residents and consumers in licensed boarding
homes should be afforded the right to self-direct care, and this right
should be reflected in the rules governing licensed boarding homes.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.20.020 and 2000 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) (("Aged person" means a person of the age sixty-five years or
more, or a person of less than sixty-five years who by reason of
infirmity requires domiciliary care.
(2))) "Boarding home" means any home or other institution, however
named, which is advertised, announced, or maintained for the express or
implied purpose of providing board and domiciliary care to seven or
more ((aged persons not related by blood or marriage to the operator))
residents after July 1, 2000. However, a boarding home that is
licensed to provide board and domiciliary care to three to six
((persons)) residents on July 1, 2000, may maintain its boarding home
license as long as it is continually licensed as a boarding home.
"Boarding home" shall not include facilities certified as group
training homes pursuant to RCW 71A.22.040, nor any home, institution or
section thereof which is otherwise licensed and regulated under the
provisions of state law providing specifically for the licensing and
regulation of such home, institution or section thereof. Nor shall it
include any independent senior housing, independent living units in
continuing care retirement communities, or other similar living
situations including those subsidized by the department of housing and
urban development.
(((3))) (2) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and the
legal successor thereof.
(((4))) (3) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((5))) (4) "Department" means the state department of social and
health services.
(5) "Domiciliary care" means: Assistance with activities of daily
living provided by the boarding home either directly or indirectly; or
assuming general responsibility for the safety and well-being of the
resident; or intermittent nursing services, if provided directly or
indirectly by the boarding home. "Domiciliary care" does not include
general observation or preadmission assessment for the purposes of
transitioning to a licensed care setting.
(6) "General responsibility for the safety and well-being of the
resident" does not include: (a) Emergency assistance provided on an
intermittent or nonroutine basis to any nonresident individual; or (b)
services customarily provided under landlord tenant agreements governed
by the residential landlord-tenant act, chapter 59.18 RCW. Such
services do not include care or supervision.
(7) "Resident" means an individual who: Lives in a boarding home,
including those receiving respite care; is not related by blood or
marriage to the operator of the boarding home; and by reason of age or
disability, receives domiciliary care provided either directly or
indirectly by the boarding home.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.20.030 and 1957 c 253 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After January 1, 1958, no person shall operate or maintain a
boarding home as defined in this chapter within this state without a
license under this chapter.
(2) A boarding home license is not required for the housing, or
services, that are customarily provided under landlord tenant
agreements governed by the residential landlord-tenant act, chapter
59.18 RCW, or when housing nonresident individuals who, without ongoing
assistance from the boarding home, initiate and arrange for services
provided by persons other than the boarding home licensee or the
licensee's contractor. This subsection does not prohibit the licensee
from furnishing written information concerning available community
resources to the nonresident individual or the individual's family
members or legal representatives. The licensee may not require the use
of any particular service provider.
(3) Residents receiving domiciliary care, directly or indirectly by
the boarding home, are not considered nonresident individuals for the
purposes of this section.
(4) A boarding home license is not required for emergency
assistance when that emergency assistance is not provided on a frequent
or routine basis to any one nonresident individual and the nonresident
individual resides in independent senior housing, independent living
units in continuing care retirement communities, independent living
units having common ownership with a licensed boarding home, or other
similar living situations including those subsidized by the department
of housing and urban development.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.20.050 and 2001 c 193 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of an application for license, if the applicant and
the boarding home facilities meet the requirements established under
this chapter, the department shall issue a license. If there is a
failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the standards
and rules adopted pursuant thereto, the department may in its
discretion issue to an applicant for a license, or for the renewal of
a license, a provisional license which will permit the operation of the
boarding home for a period to be determined by the department, but not
to exceed twelve months, which provisional license shall not be subject
to renewal. The department may also place conditions on the license
under RCW 18.20.190. At the time of the application for or renewal of
a license or provisional license the licensee shall pay a license fee
as established by the department under RCW 43.20B.110. All licenses
issued under the provisions of this chapter shall expire on a date to
be set by the department, but no license issued pursuant to this
chapter shall exceed twelve months in duration. However, when the
annual license renewal date of a previously licensed boarding home is
set by the department on a date less than twelve months prior to the
expiration date of a license in effect at the time of reissuance, the
license fee shall be prorated on a monthly basis and a credit be
allowed at the first renewal of a license for any period of one month
or more covered by the previous license. All applications for renewal
of a license shall be made not later than thirty days prior to the date
of expiration of the license. Each license shall be issued only for
the premises and persons named in the application, and no license shall
be transferable or assignable. Licenses shall be posted in a
conspicuous place on the licensed premises.
A licensee who receives notification of the department's initiation
of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a boarding home
license may, in lieu of appealing the department's action, surrender or
relinquish the license. The department shall not issue a new license
to or contract with the licensee, for the purposes of providing care to
vulnerable adults or children, for a period of twenty years following
the surrendering or relinquishment of the former license. The
licensing record shall indicate that the licensee relinquished or
surrendered the license, without admitting the violations, after
receiving notice of the department's initiation of a denial,
suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.20.125 and 2001 c 85 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Monitoring should)) Inspections must be outcome based and
responsive to resident complaints and based on a clear set of health,
quality of care, and safety standards that are easily understandable
and have been made available to facilities. This includes that when
conducting licensing inspections, the department shall interview an
appropriate percentage of residents, family members, and advocates in
addition to interviewing appropriate staff.
(2) Prompt and specific enforcement remedies shall also be
implemented without delay, consistent with RCW 18.20.190, for
facilities found to have delivered care or failed to deliver care
resulting in problems that are serious, recurring, or uncorrected, or
that create a hazard that is causing or likely to cause death or
serious harm to one or more residents. These enforcement remedies may
also include, when appropriate, reasonable conditions on a license. In
the selection of remedies, the safety, health, and well-being of
residents shall be of paramount importance.
(3) To the extent funding is available, the licensee,
administrator, and their staff should be screened through background
checks in a uniform and timely manner to ensure that they do not have
a criminal history that would disqualify them from working with
vulnerable adults. Employees may be provisionally hired pending the
results of the background check if they have been given three positive
references.
(4) No licensee, administrator, or staff, or prospective licensee,
administrator, or staff, with a stipulated finding of fact, conclusion
of law, and agreed order, or finding of fact, conclusion of law, or
final order issued by a disciplining authority, a court of law, or
entered into the state registry finding him or her guilty of abuse,
neglect, exploitation, or abandonment of a minor or a vulnerable adult
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW shall be employed in the care of and
have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.20.190 and 2001 c 193 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services is authorized to
take one or more of the actions listed in subsection (2) of this
section in any case in which the department finds that a boarding home
provider has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Operated a boarding home without a license or under a revoked
license;
(c) Knowingly, or with reason to know, made a false statement of
material fact on his or her application for license or any data
attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the
department; or
(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or
investigation by the department.
(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the
department may take one or more of the following actions:
(a) Refuse to issue a license;
(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a license, such as correction
within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of clients
the provider may admit or serve;
(c) Impose civil penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per
day per violation;
(d) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license; ((or))
(e) Suspend admissions to the boarding home by imposing stop
placement; or
(f) Suspend admission of a specific category or categories of
residents as related to the violation by imposing a limited stop
placement.
(3) When the department orders stop placement or a limited stop
placement, the facility shall not admit any new resident until the stop
placement or limited stop placement order is terminated. The
department may approve readmission of a resident to the facility from
a hospital or nursing home during the stop placement or limited stop
placement. The department shall terminate the stop placement or
limited stop placement when: (a) The violations necessitating the stop
placement or limited stop placement have been corrected; and (b) the
provider exhibits the capacity to maintain correction of the violations
previously found deficient. However, if upon the revisit the
department finds new violations that the department reasonably believes
will result in a new stop placement or new limited stop placement, the
previous stop placement or limited stop placement shall remain in
effect until the new stop placement or new limited stop placement is
imposed.
(4) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement or limited stop placement has been imposed, the department
shall make an on-site revisit of the provider within fifteen working
days from the request for revisit, to ensure correction of the
violation. For violations that are serious or recurring or uncorrected
following a previous citation, and create actual or threatened harm to
one or more residents' well-being, including violations of residents'
rights, the department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as
appropriate to ensure correction of the violation. Verification of
correction of all other violations may be made by either a department
on-site revisit or by written or photographic documentation found by
the department to be credible. This subsection does not prevent the
department from enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing
in this subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's
authority and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for
residents, including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to
ensure that the provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance
with this chapter.
(5) RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial, revocation,
suspension, or modification. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department
actions under this section, except that orders of the department
imposing license suspension, stop placement, limited stop placement, or
conditions for continuation of a license are effective immediately upon
notice and shall continue pending any hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The boarding home must assume general responsibility for each
resident and must promote each resident's health, safety, and well-being consistent with the resident negotiated care plan.
(2) The boarding home is not required to supervise the activities
of a person providing care or services to a resident when the resident,
or legal representative, has independently arranged for or contracted
with the person and the person is not directly or indirectly controlled
or paid by the boarding home. However, the boarding home is required
to coordinate services with such person to the extent allowed by the
resident, or legal representative, and consistent with the resident's
negotiated care plan. Further, the boarding home is required to
observe the resident and respond appropriately to any changes in the
resident's overall functioning consistent with chapter 70.129 RCW, this
chapter, and rules adopted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) By December 12, 2004, the department
shall report on the payment system for licensed boarding homes to the
chairs of the health care committees of both houses of the legislature.
The department shall include in the report its findings regarding the
validity of the comprehensive assessment tool for categorizing
residents into meaningful care and payment groups; its findings
regarding the actual costs of providing care and services in each of
the care payment levels; and its findings regarding the rates of
payment, by level, that are necessary and reasonably related to the
costs of providing care and services to medicaid residents.
(2) To the extent funds are specifically provided for this purpose
in the biennial appropriations act, boarding home medicaid clients'
payment rates shall not be lower than their payment rate existing as of
April 7, 2003.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The department shall by December 12, 2003,
report to the chairs of the health care committees of both houses of
the legislature, the results of the dementia care pilot program,
including a report on the dementia care standards, the benefits of the
dementia care program to residents, and the actual costs of providing
dementia care and services to residents under the dementia care pilot
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Within existing funds, the department may
implement a two-year statewide informal dispute resolution pilot
program in order to determine the efficiencies and effectiveness of a
centralized informal dispute resolution program. The provider must be
allowed to appear at informal dispute resolution meetings either in
person or by telephone. The department shall provide an opportunity
for input from a resident or a resident representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---