BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature makes the following
clarification: Boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW are
engaged in the renting or leasing of real property to consumers and,
accordingly, are exempt from taxation under chapter 82.04 RCW.

--- END ---