BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.030 and 1997 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land
use plan.
(2) "Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the
commercial production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural,
dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay,
straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax
imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish in upland
hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.
(3) "City" means any city or town, including a code city.
(4) "Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan"
means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the
governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.
(5) "Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems:
(a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers
used for potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation
areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous
areas.
(6) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(7) "Development regulations" or "regulation" means the controls
placed on development or land use activities by a county or city,
including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas
ordinances, shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit
development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan
ordinances together with any amendments thereto. A development
regulation does not include a decision to approve a project permit
application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the decision may
be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of
the county or city.
(8) "Enhance" means to improve from the current condition, to
increase from the current amount, or intensify the current use.
(9) "Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically
and practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees
subject to the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, and that has long-term commercial significance. In
determining whether forest land is primarily devoted to growing trees
for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be
economically and practically managed for such production, the following
factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for
timber production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and
services conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.
(((9))) (10) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that
because of their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or
other geological events, are not suited to the siting of commercial,
residential, or industrial development consistent with public health or
safety concerns.
(((10))) (11) "Long-term commercial significance" includes the
growing capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for
long-term commercial production, in consideration with the land's
proximity to population areas, and the possibility of more intense
uses of the land.
(((11))) (12) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable
metallic substances.
(((12))) (13) "Protect" and "preserve" means to maintain the
current condition, to maintain the current amount, or to avoid a net
loss.
(14) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways,
sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic
water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational
facilities, and schools.
(((13))) (15) "Public services" include fire protection and
suppression, law enforcement, public health, education, recreation,
environmental protection, and other governmental services.
(((14))) (16) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use
and development established by a county in the rural element of its
comprehensive plan:
(a) In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation
predominate over the built environment;
(b) That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based
economies, and opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;
(c) That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in
rural areas and communities;
(d) That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and
for fish and wildlife habitat;
(e) That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development;
(f) That generally do not require the extension of urban
governmental services; and
(g) That are consistent with the protection of natural surface
water flows and ground water and surface water recharge and discharge
areas.
(((15))) (17) "Rural development" refers to development outside the
urban growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral
resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural
development can consist of a variety of uses and residential densities,
including clustered residential development, at levels that are
consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural
areas.
(((16))) (18) "Rural governmental services" or "rural services"
include those public services and public facilities historically and
typically delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and
may include domestic water systems, fire and police protection
services, transportation and public transit services, and other public
utilities associated with rural development and normally not associated
with urban areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary
sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).
(((17))) (19) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive
use of land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable
surfaces to such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of
land for the production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber,
or the extraction of mineral resources, rural uses, rural development,
and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A
pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over
wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental
services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban
growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area
with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.
(((18))) (20) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by
a county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.
(((19))) (21) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services"
include those public services and public facilities at an intensity
historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including
storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street
cleaning services, fire and police protection services, public transit
services, and other public utilities associated with urban areas and
normally not associated with rural areas.
(((20))) (22) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are
inundated or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency
and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances
do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in
saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes,
bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial
wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but
not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales,
canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm
ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1,
1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction
of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial
wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

--- END ---