BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4456 and 2000 c 106 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of manufacturing
software or programming, as those terms are defined in this section.
(2) A person who partially or totally relocates a business from one
rural county to another rural county is eligible for any qualifying new
jobs created as a result of the relocation but is not eligible to
receive credit for the jobs moved from one county to the other.
(3)(a) To qualify for the credit, the qualifying activity of the
person must be conducted in a rural county and the qualified employment
position must be located in the rural county.
(b) If an activity is conducted both from a rural county and
outside of a rural county, the credit is available if at least ninety
percent of the qualifying activity is conducted within a rural county.
If the qualifying activity is a service taxable activity, the place
where the work is performed is the place at which the activity is
conducted.
(4)(a) The credit under this section shall equal one thousand
dollars for each qualified employment position created after July 1,
1999, in an eligible area. A credit is earned for the calendar year
the person is hired to fill the position. Additionally a credit is
earned for each year the position is maintained over the subsequent
consecutive years, up to four years. The county must meet the
definition of a rural county at the time the position is filled. If
the county does not have a rural county status the following year or
years, the position is still eligible for the remaining years if all
other conditions are met.
(b) Credit may not be taken for hiring of persons into positions
that exist before July 1, 1999. Credit is authorized for new employees
hired for new positions created on or after July 1, 1999. New
positions filled by existing employees are eligible for the credit
under this section only if the position vacated by the existing
employee is filled by a new hire. A business that is a sole
proprietorship without any employees is equivalent to one employee
position and this type of business is eligible to receive credit for
one position.
(c) If a position is filled before July 1st, this position is
eligible for the full yearly credit for that calendar year. If it is
filled after June 30th, this position is eligible for half of the
credit for that calendar year.
(d) A person that has engaged in qualifying activities in the rural
county before August 1, 1999, qualifies for the credit under this
section for positions created and filled after August 1, 1999.
(5) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. This information includes information relating to
description of qualifying activity conducted in the rural county and
outside the rural county by the person as well as detailed records on
positions and employees.
(6) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed shall be immediately due. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken,
and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.
(7) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. A person is not eligible to receive a
credit under this section if the person is receiving credit for the
same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW 82.04.44525 or is taking
the credit under RCW 82.04.4457. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(8) A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an
annual report to the department. The report shall be in a letter form
and shall include the following information: Number of positions for
which credit is being claimed, type of position for which credit is
being claimed, type of activity in which the person is engaged in the
county, how long the person has been located in the county, and
taxpayer name and registration number. The report must be filed by
January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed during the
previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in the loss of
eligibility under this section. However, the department, through its
research division, shall contact taxpayers who have not filed the
report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the taxpayer in
the filing of the report, so that the data and information necessary to
measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.
(9) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the successive credits are available to the successor for
remaining periods in the five years only if the eligibility conditions
of this section are met.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" under RCW
82.04.120. Manufacturing includes the activities of both manufacturers
and processors for hire.
(b) "Programming" means the activities that involve the creation or
modification of software, as that term is defined in this chapter, and
that are taxable as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) or as a retail
sale under RCW 82.04.050.
(c) "Qualifying activity" means manufacturing of software or
programming.
(d) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
position doing programming of software or manufacturing of software.
This excludes administrative, professional, service, executive, and
other similar positions. If an employee is either voluntarily or
involuntarily separated from employment, the employment position is
considered filled on a full-time basis if the employer is either
training or actively recruiting a replacement employee. Full-time
means a position for at least thirty-five hours a week.
(e) "Rural county" ((means a county with a population density of
less than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the
office of financial management and published each year by the
department for the period July 1st to June 30th)) has the same meaning
as provided in RCW 82.14.370.
(f) "Software" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.215.
(11) No credit may be taken or accrued under this section on or
after January 1, 2004.
(12) This section expires December 31, 2003.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4457 and 2000 c 106 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of providing
information technology help desk services to third parties.
(2) To qualify for the credit, the help desk services must be
conducted from a rural county.
(3) The amount of the tax credit for persons engaged in the
activity of providing information technology help desk services in
rural counties shall be equal to one hundred percent of the amount of
tax due under this chapter that is attributable to providing the
services from the rural county. In order to qualify for the credit
under this subsection, the county must meet the definition of rural
county at the time the person begins to conduct qualifying business in
the county.
(4) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. These records include information relating to
description of activity engaged in a rural county by the person.
(5) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used is immediately due. The department shall
assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for which the
person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be
assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and shall
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(6) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(7) A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an
annual report to the department. The report shall be in a letter form
and shall include the following information: Type of activity in which
the person is engaged in the county, number of employees in the rural
county, how long the person has been located in the county, and
taxpayer name and registration number. The report must be filed by
January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed during the
previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in the loss of
eligibility under this section. However, the department, through its
research division, shall contact taxpayers who have not filed the
report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the taxpayer in
the filing of the report, so that the data and information necessary to
measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.
(8) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the credit is available to the successor only if the
eligibility conditions of this section are met.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) "Information technology help desk services" means the following
services performed using electronic and telephonic communication:
(i) Software and hardware maintenance;
(ii) Software and hardware diagnostics and troubleshooting;
(iii) Software and hardware installation;
(iv) Software and hardware repair;
(v) Software and hardware information and training; and
(vi) Software and hardware upgrade.
(b) "Rural county" ((means a county with a population density of
less than one hundred persons per square mile, as determined by the
office of financial management and published each year by the
department for the period July 1st to June 30th)) has the same meaning
as provided in RCW 82.14.370.
(10) This section expires December 31, 2003.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.16.0491 and 1999 c 311 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Qualifying project" means a project designed to achieve job
creation or business retention, to add or upgrade nonelectrical
infrastructure, to add or upgrade health and safety facilities, to
accomplish energy and water use efficiency improvements, including
renewable energy development, or to add or upgrade emergency services
in any designated qualifying rural area.
(b) "Qualifying rural area" means:
(i) A rural county((, which is a county with a population density
of less than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the
office of financial management and published each year by the
department for the period July 1st to June 30th)) as defined in RCW
82.14.370; or
(ii) Any geographic area in the state that receives electricity
from a light and power business with twelve thousand or fewer customers
and with fewer than twenty-six meters per mile of distribution line as
determined and published by the department of revenue effective July
1st of each year. The department shall use current data provided by
the electricity industry.
(c) "Electric utility rural economic development revolving fund"
means a fund devoted exclusively to funding qualifying projects in
qualifying rural areas.
(d) "Local board" is a board of directors with at least, but not
limited to, three members representing local businesses and community
groups who have been appointed by the sponsoring electric utility to
oversee and direct the activities of the electric utility rural
economic development revolving fund.
(2) A light and power business with fewer than twenty-six active
meters per mile of distribution line in any geographic area in the
state shall be allowed a credit against taxes due under this chapter in
an amount equal to fifty percent of contributions made in any calendar
year directly to an electric utility rural economic development
revolving fund. The credit shall be taken in a form and manner as
required by the department. The credit under this section shall not
exceed twenty-five thousand dollars per calendar year per light and
power business. The credit may not exceed the tax that would otherwise
be due under this chapter. Refunds shall not be granted in the place
of credits. Expenditures not used to earn a credit in one calendar
year may not be used to earn a credit in subsequent years.
(3) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires
December 31, 2005.
(4) To qualify for the credit in subsection (2) of this section,
the light and power business shall establish an electric utility rural
economic development revolving fund which is governed by a local board
whose members shall reside in the qualifying rural area served by the
light and power business. The local board shall have authority to
determine all criteria and conditions for the expenditure of funds from
the electric utility rural economic development (([revolving]))
revolving fund, and for the terms and conditions of repayment.
(5) Any funds repaid to the electric utility rural economic
development (([revolving])) revolving fund by recipients shall be made
available for additional qualifying projects.
(6) If at any time the electric utility rural economic development
(([revolving])) revolving fund is dissolved, any moneys claimed as a
tax credit under this section shall either be granted to a qualifying
project or refunded to the state within two years of termination.
(7) The total amount of credits that may be used in any fiscal year
shall not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars in any fiscal
year. The department shall allow the use of earned credits on a first-
come, first-served basis. Unused earned credits may be carried over to
subsequent years.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.60.020 and 1999 sp.s. c 9 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means a ((county with fewer than one hundred
persons per square mile as determined annually by the office of
financial management and published by the department of revenue
effective for the period July 1st through June 30th)) rural county as
defined in RCW 82.14.370.
(4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
an eligible area as defined in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The lessor/owner of a qualified building is not eligible for a
deferral unless the underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery,
and equipment vests exclusively in the same person, or unless the
lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the
deferral to the lessee in the form of reduced rent payments.
(c) "Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of
an investment project undertaken by a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010(5), other than that portion of a cogeneration
project that is used to generate power for consumption within the
manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an integral
part, or investment projects which have already received deferrals
under this chapter.
(5) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(6) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the
activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories.
(7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(8) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for manufacturing
and research and development activities, including plant offices and
warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw material or
finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an integral part
of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for manufacturing or
research and development. If a building is used partly for
manufacturing or research and development and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(9) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research and
development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes:
Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment;
manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving
parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment
used to control or operate the machinery.
(10) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(11) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this
subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

--- END ---