BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A regional transit authority may be dissolved by a vote of the
people residing within the boundaries of the authority. Any referendum
petition to dissolve the authority must be filed with the legislative
authority of each county that is within, in whole or in part, the
boundaries of the authority. The referendum petition must contain
provisions for dissolution of the authority, subject to subsection (2)
of this section. Within fourteen days of the filing of the petition,
each affected county legislative authority shall confer with the
petitioner concerning the form and style of the petition, issue an
identification number for the petition, and write a ballot title for
the measure. The ballot title must be posed as a question so that an
affirmative vote on the measure results in authority retention and a
negative vote on the measure results in the authority's dissolution.
The petitioner must be notified of the identification number and ballot
title within this fourteen-day period.
After this notification, the petitioner must have ninety days in
which to secure on petition forms, the signatures of not less than
fifteen percent of the registered voters in the authority area and to
file the signed petitions with the filing officer in each county. Each
petition form must contain the ballot title and the full text of the
measure to be referred. The filing officer shall verify the
sufficiency of the signatures on the petitions. If sufficient valid
signatures are properly submitted, the filing officer shall submit the
referendum measure to the authority area voters at a general or special
election held on one of the dates provided in RCW 29.13.010 as
determined by the county legislative authorities, which election may
not take place later than one hundred twenty days after the signed
petition has been filed.
(2) If an authority is dissolved under this process, within thirty
days of the election conducted under subsection (1) of this section the
authority shall terminate day-to-day operations and exist solely as a
limited entity that oversees the collection of revenue and the payment
of debt service or financing still in effect, if any. The authority
shall terminate work on the transportation project or series of
transportation projects, except that the authority may take reasonable
steps to use, preserve, or connect any improvement already constructed.
The authority shall accordingly adjust downward its employees,
administration, and overhead expenses. Any taxes, fees, tolls, fares,
or charges, imposed under an approved system and financing plan,
terminate when the financing or debt service on the transportation
project or series of transportation projects constructed is completed
and paid, thirty days from which point the authority shall dissolve
itself and cease to exist. If there is no debt outstanding, then the
authority shall dissolve within thirty days of the election conducted
in subsection (1) of this section. Notice of dissolution must be
published in newspapers of general circulation within the authority at
least three times in a period of thirty days. Creditors shall file
claims due within thirty days of the last published notice or the claim
is extinguished.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is remedial in nature and applies
to all regional transit authorities established before or after the
effective date of this act.

--- END ---