BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
Noncompliance with a design or construction standard shall not be
a reason to deny or revoke a nursing home license if the building is in
a county with fewer than forty thousand people, and the building for
which the license is sought or held is licensed as a boarding home and
meets the design and construction standards of the licensed nursing
home to which it was attached at the time of original construction,
provided that the number of licensed nursing home beds is not
increased.

--- END ---