BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21B.001 and 1987 c 109 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter((,)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business days" means Monday through Friday exclusive of any
state or federal holiday.
(2) "Date of receipt" means:
(a) Five business days after the date of mailing; or
(b) The date of actual receipt, when the actual receipt date can be
proven by a preponderance of the evidence. The recipient's sworn
affidavit or declaration indicating the date of receipt, which is
unchallenged by the agency, shall constitute sufficient evidence of
actual receipt. The date of actual receipt, however, may not exceed
forty-five days from the date of mailing.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology((, and)).
(4) "Director" means the director of ecology.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21B.190 and 1995 c 382 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Within thirty days)) After the final decision and order of the
hearings board ((upon such an appeal)) has been ((communicated to))
received by the ((interested)) parties, ((such interested)) any party
aggrieved by the decision and order of the hearings board may appeal to
the superior court within thirty days from the date of receipt of the
final decision and order.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.21B.230 and 1997 c 125 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Consistent with RCW 43.21B.110, any person having received notice
of ((a)) denial of a petition, a notice of determination, or notice of
((or)) an order made by the department may appeal to the hearings
board, within thirty days from the date of receipt of the notice of
such denial, order, or determination ((is posted in the United States
mail, properly addressed, postage prepaid, to)) by the appealing party.
The appeal shall be perfected by serving a copy of the notice of appeal
upon the department or air pollution authority established pursuant to
chapter 70.94 RCW, as the case may be, within the time specified herein
and by filing the original thereof with proof of service with the clerk
of the hearings board.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.21B.300 and 2001 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330 shall be imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified
mail with return receipt requested or by personal service, to the
person incurring the penalty from the department or the local air
authority, describing the violation with reasonable particularity.
Within ((fifteen)) thirty days after the notice is received, the person
incurring the penalty may apply in writing to the department or the
authority for the remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt
of the application, the department or authority may remit or mitigate
the penalty upon whatever terms the department or the authority in its
discretion deems proper. The department or the authority may ascertain
the facts regarding all such applications in such reasonable manner and
under such rules as it may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the
penalty only upon a demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such
as the presence of information or factors not considered in setting the
original penalty.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the
appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or
authority thirty days after the date of receipt by the person penalized
of the notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after the date of
receipt of the notice of disposition of the application for relief from
penalty.
(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:
(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;
(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition on
application for relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or
(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the
hearings board if the penalty is appealed.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney
general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior
court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in
which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and
rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.
(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed
pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation
account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), RCW 70.94.431, the
disposition of which shall be governed by that provision, RCW
70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and
elimination account, created by RCW 70.105.180, and RCW 90.56.330,
which shall be credited to the coastal protection fund created by RCW
90.48.390.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.21B.310 and 2001 c 220 s 4 and 2001 c 36 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), any order issued by the
department or local air authority pursuant to RCW 70.94.211, 70.94.332,
70.105.095, 43.27A.190, 86.16.020, 88.46.070, or 90.48.120(2) or any
provision enacted after July 26, 1987, or any permit, certificate, or
license issued by the department may be appealed to the pollution
control hearings board if the appeal is filed with the board and served
on the department or authority within thirty days after the date of
receipt of the order. Except as provided under chapter 70.105D RCW and
RCW 90.03.210(2), this is the exclusive means of appeal of such an
order.
(2) The department or the authority in its discretion may stay the
effectiveness of an order during the pendency of such an appeal.
(3) At any time during the pendency of an appeal of such an order
to the board, the appellant may apply pursuant to RCW 43.21B.320 to the
hearings board for a stay of the order or for the removal thereof.
(4) Any appeal must contain the following in accordance with the
rules of the hearings board:
(a) The appellant's name and address;
(b) The date and docket number of the order, permit, or license
appealed;
(c) A description of the substance of the order, permit, or license
that is the subject of the appeal;
(d) A clear, separate, and concise statement of every error alleged
to have been committed;
(e) A clear and concise statement of facts upon which the requester
relies to sustain his or her statements of error; and
(f) A statement setting forth the relief sought.
(5) Upon failure to comply with any final order of the department,
the attorney general, on request of the department, may bring an action
in the superior court of the county where the violation occurred or the
potential violation is about to occur to obtain such relief as
necessary, including injunctive relief, to insure compliance with the
order. The air authorities may bring similar actions to enforce their
orders.
(6) An appealable decision or order shall be identified as such and
shall contain a conspicuous notice to the recipient that it may be
appealed only by filing an appeal with the hearings board and serving
it on the department within thirty days of the date of receipt.

--- END ---