BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 6.27.020 and 1987 c 442 s 1002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The clerks of the superior courts and district courts of this
state may issue writs of garnishment returnable to their respective
courts for the benefit of a judgment creditor who has a judgment wholly
or partially unsatisfied in the court from which the garnishment is
sought.
(2) Writs of garnishment may be issued in district court with like
effect by the attorney of record for the judgment creditor, and the
form of writ shall be substantially the same as when issued by the
court except that it shall be subscribed only by the signature of such
attorney.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 6.27.040 and 6.27.330, the
superior courts and district courts of this state may issue prejudgment
writs of garnishment to a plaintiff at the time of commencement of an
action or at any time afterward, subject to the requirements of chapter
6.26 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 6.27.040 and 1987 c 442 s 1004 and 1987 c 202 s 134
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state of Washington, all counties, cities, towns, school
districts and other municipal corporations shall be subject to
garnishment after judgment has been entered in the principal action,
but not before, in the superior and district courts, in the same manner
and with the same effect, as provided in the case of other garnishees.
(2) The venue of any such garnishment proceeding shall be the same
as for the original action, and the writ shall be issued by the clerk
of the court having jurisdiction of such original action or by the
attorney of record for the judgment creditor in district court.
(3) The writ of garnishment shall be served ((in the same manner
and)) upon the same officer as is required for service of summons upon
the commencement of a civil action against the state, county, city,
town, school district, or other municipal corporation, as the case may
be.

Sec. 3 RCW 6.27.070 and 1987 c 442 s 1007 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When application for a writ of garnishment is made by a
judgment creditor and the requirements of RCW 6.27.060 have been
complied with, the clerk shall docket the case in the names of the
judgment creditor as plaintiff, the judgment debtor as defendant, and
the garnishee as garnishee defendant, and shall immediately issue and
deliver a writ of garnishment to the judgment creditor in the form
prescribed in RCW 6.27.100, directed to the garnishee, commanding the
garnishee to answer said writ on forms served with the writ and
complying with RCW 6.27.190 within twenty days after the service of the
writ upon the garnishee. The clerk shall likewise docket the case when
a writ of garnishment issued by the attorney of record of a judgment
creditor is filed. Whether a writ is issued by the clerk or an
attorney, the clerk shall bear no responsibility for errors contained
in the writ.
(2) The writ of garnishment shall be dated and attested as in the
form prescribed in RCW 6.27.100. The name and office address of the
plaintiff's attorney shall be indorsed thereon or, in case the
plaintiff has no attorney, the name and address of the plaintiff shall
be indorsed thereon. The address of the clerk's office shall appear at
the bottom of the writ.

Sec. 4 RCW 6.27.100 and 2000 c 72 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The writ shall be substantially in the following form((:
PROVIDED, That)), but if the writ is issued under a court order or
judgment for child support, the following statement shall appear
conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment
or court order for child support"((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)); and
if the garnishment is for a continuing lien, the form shall be modified
as provided in RCW 6.27.340((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)); and if
the writ is not directed to an employer for the purpose of garnishing
a defendant's earnings, the paragraph relating to the earnings
exemption may be omitted and the paragraph relating to the deduction of
processing fees may be omitted; and if the writ is issued by an
attorney, the writ shall be revised as indicated in subsection (2) of
this section:

YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED, unless otherwise directed by the court,
by the attorney of record for the plaintiff, or by this writ, not to
pay any debt, whether earnings subject to this garnishment or any other
debt, owed to the defendant at the time this writ was served and not to
deliver, sell, or transfer, or recognize any sale or transfer of, any
personal property or effects of the defendant in your possession or
control at the time when this writ was served. Any such payment,
delivery, sale, or transfer is void to the extent necessary to satisfy
the plaintiff's claim and costs for this writ with interest.
YOU ARE FURTHER COMMANDED to answer this writ by filling in the
attached form according to the instructions in this writ and in the
answer forms and, within twenty days after the service of the writ upon
you, to mail or deliver the original of such answer to the court, one
copy to the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, and one copy to the
defendant, in the envelopes provided.
If, at the time this writ was served, you owed the defendant any
earnings (that is, wages, salary, commission, bonus, or other
compensation for personal services or any periodic payments pursuant to
a pension or retirement program), the defendant is entitled to receive
amounts that are exempt from garnishment under federal and state law.
You must pay the exempt amounts to the defendant on the day you would
customarily pay the compensation or other periodic payment. As more
fully explained in the answer, the basic exempt amount is the greater
of seventy-five percent of disposable earnings or a minimum amount
determined by reference to the employee's pay period, to be calculated
as provided in the answer. However, if this writ carries a statement
in the heading that "This garnishment is based on a judgment or court
order for child support," the basic exempt amount is forty percent of
disposable earnings.
IF THIS IS A WRIT FOR A CONTINUING LIEN ON EARNINGS, YOU MAY DEDUCT
A PROCESSING FEE FROM THE REMAINDER OF THE EMPLOYEE'S EARNINGS AFTER
WITHHOLDING UNDER THIS WRIT. THE PROCESSING FEE MAY NOT EXCEED TWENTY
DOLLARS FOR THE FIRST ANSWER AND TEN DOLLARS AT THE TIME YOU SUBMIT THE
SECOND ANSWER.
If you owe the defendant a debt payable in money in excess of the
amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ, hold only the
amount set forth in the first paragraph and any processing fee if one
is charged and release all additional funds or property to defendant.

IF YOU FAIL TO ANSWER THIS WRIT AS COMMANDED, A JUDGMENT MAY BE
ENTERED AGAINST YOU FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE PLAINTIFF'S CLAIM
AGAINST THE DEFENDANT WITH ACCRUING INTEREST, ATTORNEY FEES, AND COSTS
WHETHER OR NOT YOU OWE ANYTHING TO THE DEFENDANT. IF YOU PROPERLY
ANSWER THIS WRIT, ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST YOU WILL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT
OF ANY NONEXEMPT DEBT OR THE VALUE OF ANY NONEXEMPT PROPERTY OR EFFECTS
IN YOUR POSSESSION OR CONTROL.
JUDGMENT MAY ALSO BE ENTERED AGAINST THE DEFENDANT FOR COSTS AND
FEES INCURRED BY THE PLAINTIFF.

Witness, the Honorable . . . . . . . ., Judge of the above-entitled
Court, and the seal thereof, this . . . . day of . . . . . ., 20. . .

[Seal]

(2) If an attorney issues the writ of garnishment, the final
paragraph of the writ, containing the date, and the subscripted
attorney and clerk provisions, shall be replaced with text in
substantially the following form:

"This writ is issued by the undersigned attorney of record for
plaintiff under the authority of chapter 6.27 of the Revised Code of
Washington, and must be complied with in the same manner as a writ
issued by the clerk of the court.

Sec. 5 RCW 6.27.130 and 1988 c 231 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a writ is issued under a judgment, on or before the date
of service of the writ on the garnishee, the judgment creditor shall
mail or cause to be mailed to the judgment debtor, by certified mail,
addressed to the last known post office address of the judgment debtor,
(a) a copy of the writ and a copy of the ((judgment or, if it is a
district court judgment, a copy of the)) judgment creditor's affidavit
submitted in application for the writ, and (b) if the judgment debtor
is an individual, the notice and claim form prescribed in RCW 6.27.140.
In the alternative, on or before the day of the service of the writ on
the garnishee or within two days thereafter, the stated documents shall
be served on the judgment debtor in the same manner as is required for
personal service of summons upon a party to an action.
(2) The requirements of this section shall not be jurisdictional,
but (a) no disbursement order or judgment against the garnishee
defendant shall be entered unless there is on file the return or
affidavit of service or mailing required by subsection (3) of this
section, and (b) if the copies of the writ and judgment or affidavit,
and the notice and claim form if the defendant is an individual, are
not mailed or served as herein provided, or if any irregularity appears
with respect to the mailing or service, the court, in its discretion,
on motion of the judgment debtor promptly made and supported by
affidavit showing that the judgment debtor has suffered substantial
injury from the plaintiff's failure to mail or otherwise to serve such
copies, may set aside the garnishment and award to the judgment debtor
an amount equal to the damages suffered because of such failure.
(3) If the service on the judgment debtor is made by a sheriff, the
sheriff shall file with the clerk of the court that issued the writ a
signed return showing the time, place, and manner of service and that
the copy of the writ was accompanied by a copy of a judgment or
affidavit, and by a notice and claim form if required by this section,
and shall note thereon fees for making such service. If service is
made by any person other than a sheriff, such person shall file an
affidavit including the same information and showing qualifications to
make such service. If service on the judgment debtor is made by mail,
the person making the mailing shall file an affidavit including the
same information as required for return on service and, in addition,
showing the address of the mailing and attaching the return receipt or
the mailing should it be returned to the sender as undeliverable.

Sec. 6 RCW 6.27.140 and 1997 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The notice required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or
served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form,
printed or typed in type no smaller than elite type:

NOTICE OF GARNISHMENT
AND OF YOUR RIGHTS

A Writ of Garnishment issued ((by)) in a Washington court has
been or will be served on the garnishee named in the attached
copy of the writ. After receipt of the writ, the garnishee is
required to withhold payment of any money that was due to you
and to withhold any other property of yours that the garnishee
held or controlled. This notice of your rights is required by
law.

YOU HAVE THE FOLLOWING EXEMPTION RIGHTS:

WAGES. If the garnishee is your employer who owes wages or
other personal earnings to you, your employer is required to
pay amounts to you that are exempt under state and federal
laws, as explained in the writ of garnishment. You should
receive a copy of your employer's answer, which will show how
the exempt amount was calculated. If the garnishment is for
child support, the exempt amount paid to you will be forty
percent of wages due you, but if you are supporting a spouse or
dependent child, you are entitled to claim an additional ten
percent as exempt.

BANK ACCOUNTS. If the garnishee is a bank or other institution
with which you have an account in which you have deposited
benefits such as Temporary Assistance for Needy Families,
Supplemental Security Income (SSI), Social Security, veterans'
benefits, unemployment compensation, or a United States
pension, you may claim the account as fully exempt if you have
deposited only such benefit funds in the account. It may be
partially exempt even though you have deposited money from
other sources in the same account. An exemption is also
available under RCW 26.16.200, providing that funds in a
community bank account that can be identified as the earnings
of a stepparent are exempt from a garnishment on the child
support obligation of the parent.

OTHER EXEMPTIONS. If the garnishee holds other property of
yours, some or all of it may be exempt under RCW 6.15.010, a
Washington statute that exempts up to five hundred dollars of
property of your choice (including up to one hundred dollars in
cash or in a bank account) and certain property such as
household furnishings, tools of trade, and a motor vehicle (all
limited by differing dollar values).

HOW TO CLAIM EXEMPTIONS. Fill out the enclosed claim form and
mail or deliver it as described in instructions on the claim
form. If the plaintiff does not object to your claim, the
funds or other property that you have claimed as exempt must be
released not later than 10 days after the plaintiff receives
your claim form. If the plaintiff objects, the law requires a
hearing not later than 14 days after the plaintiff receives
your claim form, and notice of the objection and hearing date
will be mailed to you at the address that you put on the claim
form.

THE LAW ALSO PROVIDES OTHER EXEMPTION RIGHTS. IF NECESSARY, AN
ATTORNEY CAN ASSIST YOU TO ASSERT THESE AND OTHER RIGHTS, BUT
YOU MUST ACT IMMEDIATELY TO AVOID LOSS OF RIGHTS BY DELAY.

(2) The claim form required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or
served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form,
printed or typed in type no smaller than elite type:

CAUTION: If the plaintiff objects to your claim, you will have to go
to court and give proof of your claim. For example, if you claim that
a bank account is exempt, you may have to show the judge your bank
statements and papers that show the source of the money you deposited
in the bank. Your claim may be granted more quickly if you attach
copies of such proof to your claim.

IF THE JUDGE DENIES YOUR EXEMPTION CLAIM, YOU WILL HAVE TO PAY THE
PLAINTIFF'S COSTS. IF THE JUDGE DECIDES THAT YOU DID NOT MAKE THE
CLAIM IN GOOD FAITH, HE OR SHE MAY DECIDE THAT YOU MUST PAY THE
PLAINTIFF'S ATTORNEY FEES.

Sec. 7 RCW 6.27.160 and 2002 c 265 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A defendant may claim exemptions from garnishment in the manner
specified by the statute that creates the exemption or by delivering to
or mailing by first class mail to the clerk of the court out of which
the writ was issued a declaration in substantially the following form
or in the form set forth in RCW 6.27.140 and mailing a copy of the form
by first class mail to the plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney at the
address shown on the writ of garnishment, all not later than twenty-eight days after the date stated on the writ except that the time shall
be extended to allow a declaration mailed or delivered to the clerk
within twenty-one days after service of the writ on the garnishee if
service on the garnishee is delayed more than seven days after the date
of the writ.

(2) A plaintiff who wishes to object to an exemption claim must,
not later than seven days after receipt of the claim, cause to be
delivered or mailed to the defendant by first class mail, to the
address shown on the exemption claim, a declaration by self, attorney,
or agent, alleging the facts on which the objection is based, together
with notice of date, time, and place of a hearing on the objection,
which hearing the plaintiff must cause to be noted for a hearing date
not later than fourteen days after the receipt of the claim. After a
hearing on an objection to an exemption claim, the court shall award
costs to the prevailing party and may also award an attorney's fee to
the prevailing party if the court concludes that the exemption claim or
the objection to the claim was not made in good faith. The defendant
bears the burden of proving any claimed exemption, including the
obligation to provide sufficient documentation to identify the source
and amount of any claimed exempt funds.
(3) If the plaintiff elects not to object to the claim of
exemption, the plaintiff shall, not later than ten days after receipt
of the claim, obtain from the court and deliver to the garnishee an
order directing the garnishee to release such part of the debt,
property, or effects as is covered by the exemption claim. If the
plaintiff fails to obtain and deliver the order as required or
otherwise to effect release of the exempt funds or property, the
defendant shall be entitled to recover fifty dollars from the
plaintiff, in addition to actual damages suffered by the defendant from
the failure to release the exempt property. The attorney of record for
the plaintiff may, as an alternative to obtaining a court order
releasing exempt funds, property, or effects, deliver to the garnishee
and file with the court an authorization to release claimed exempt
funds, property, or effects, signed by the attorney, in substantially
the following form:

Sec. 8 RCW 6.27.190 and 2000 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
The answer of the garnishee shall be signed by the garnishee or
attorney or if the garnishee is a corporation, by an officer, attorney
or duly authorized agent of the garnishee, under penalty of perjury,
and the original delivered, either personally or by mail, to the clerk
of the court ((that issued the writ)), one copy to the plaintiff or the
plaintiff's attorney, and one copy to the defendant. The answer shall
be made on a form substantially as appears in this section, served on
the garnishee with the writ((, with minimum exemption amounts for the
different pay periods filled in by the plaintiff before service of the
answer forms: PROVIDED, That,)). Prior to serving the answer forms
for a writ for continuing lien on earnings, the plaintiff shall fill in
the minimum exemption amounts for the different pay periods, and the
maximum percentages of disposable earnings subject to lien and exempt
from lien. If the garnishment is for a continuing lien, the answer
forms shall be as prescribed in RCW 6.27.340 and 6.27.350((: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). If the writ is not directed to an employer
for the purpose of garnishing the defendant's wages, the paragraphs in
section II of the answer relating to ((the)) earnings ((exemptions))
and calculations of withheld amounts may be omitted.

SECTION I. On the date the writ of garnishment was issued ((by the
court)) as indicated by the date appearing on the last page of the
writ((, defendant (check one) . . . was . . . was not employed by
garnishee; defendant (check one) . . . did . . . did not maintain a
financial account with garnishee; and garnishee (check one) . . . did
. . . did not have possession of or control over any funds, personal
property, or effects of defendant.
At the time of service of the writ of garnishment on the garnishee
there was due and owing from the garnishee to the above-named defendant
$ . . . . . . (On the reverse side of this answer form, or on an
attached page, give an explanation of the dollar amount stated, or give
reasons why there is uncertainty about your answer.)
If the above amount or any part of it is for personal earnings
(that is, compensation payable for personal services, whether called
wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, and including periodic
payments pursuant to a pension or retirement program): Garnishee has
deducted from this amount $ . . . . . which is the exemption to which
the defendant is entitled, leaving $ . . . . . . that garnishee holds
under the writ. The exempt amount is calculated as follows:

If the title of this writ indicates that this is a garnishment
under a child support judgment, enter forty percent of disposable
earnings: $ . . . . . . This amount is exempt and must be paid to the
defendant at the regular pay time after deducting any processing fee
you may charge.
If this is not a garnishment for child support, enter seventy-five
percent of disposable earnings: $ . . . . . . . From the listing in
the following paragraph, choose the amount for the relevant pay period
and enter that amount: $ . . . . . . (If amounts for more than one
pay period are due, multiply the preceding amount by the number of pay
periods and/or fraction of pay period for which amounts are due and
enter that amount: $ . . . . . .) The greater of the amounts entered
in this paragraph is the exempt amount and must be paid to the
defendant at the regular pay time after deducting any processing fee
you may charge.
Minimum exempt amounts for different pay periods: Weekly
$ . . . . . .; Biweekly $ . . . . . .; Semimonthly $ . . . . . .;
Monthly $ . . . . . .
List all of the personal property or effects of defendant in the
garnishee's possession or control when the writ was served. (Use the
reverse side of this answer form or attach a schedule if necessary.))):
(A) The defendant: (check one) . . . . was, . . . . was not employed
by garnishee. If not employed and you have no possession or control of
any funds of defendant, indicate the last day of employment: . . . . .
. .; and complete section III of this answer and mail or deliver the
forms as directed in the writ;
(B) The defendant: (check one) . . . . did, . . . . did not maintain
a financial account with garnishee; and
(C) The garnishee: (check one) . . . . did, . . . . did not have
possession of or control over any funds, personal property, or effects
of the defendant. (List all of defendant's personal property or
effects in your possession or control on the last page of this answer
form or attach a schedule if necessary.)
SECTION II. At the time of service of the writ of garnishment on
the garnishee there was due and owing from the garnishee to the above-named defendant $ . . . . .
This writ attaches a maximum of . . . . percent of the defendant's
disposable earnings (that is, compensation payable for personal
services, whether called wages, salary, commission, bonus, or
otherwise, and including periodic payments pursuant to a
nongovernmental pension or retirement program). Calculate the
attachable amount as follows:

Gross Earnings $. . . . . . . . (1)

Less deductions required by law (social security,
federal withholding tax, etc. Do not include
deductions for child support orders or government
liens here. Deduct child support orders and liens
on line 7): $. . . . . . . . (2)

Disposable Earnings (subtract line 2 from
line 1): $. . . . . . . . (3)

Enter . . . . percent of line 3: $. . . . . . . . (4)

Enter one of the following exempt amounts*: $. . . . . . . . (5)

If paid: Weekly $. . . . . Semi-monthly $. . . . .

Bi-weekly $. . . . . Monthly $. . . . .

*These are minimum exempt amounts that the
defendant must be paid. If your answer
covers more than one pay period, multiply
the preceding amount by the number of pay
periods and/or fraction thereof your answer
covers. If you use a pay period not shown,
prorate the monthly exempt amount.

Subtract the larger of lines 4 and 5 from
line 3: $. . . . . . . . (6)

Enter amount (if any) withheld for ongoing
government liens such as child support: $. . . . . . . . (7)

Subtract line 7 from line 6. This amount
must be held out for the plaintiff: $. . . . . . . . (8)

This is the formula that you will use for withholding each pay period
over the required sixty-day garnishment period. Deduct any allowable
processing fee you may charge from the amount that is to be paid to the
defendant.

If there is any uncertainty about your answer, give an explanation
on the last page or on an attached page.

SECTION III. An attorney may answer for the garnishee.
Under penalty of perjury, I affirm that I have examined this
answer, including accompanying schedules, and to the best of my
knowledge and belief it is true, correct, and complete.

Sec. 9 RCW 6.27.200 and 1997 c 296 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the garnishee fails to answer the writ within the time
prescribed in the writ, after the time to answer the writ has expired
and after required returns or affidavits have been filed, showing
service on the garnishee and service on or mailing to the defendant, it
shall be lawful for the court to render judgment by default against
such garnishee, after providing a notice to the garnishee by personal
service or first class mail deposited in the mail at least ten calendar
days prior to entry of the judgment, for the full amount claimed by the
plaintiff against the defendant, or in case the plaintiff has a
judgment against the defendant, for the full amount of the plaintiff's
unpaid judgment against the defendant with all accruing interest and
costs as prescribed in RCW 6.27.090: PROVIDED, That upon motion by the
garnishee at any time within seven days following service on, or
mailing to, the garnishee of a copy of ((a)) the first writ of
execution or ((a)) writ of garnishment under such judgment, the
judgment against the garnishee shall be reduced to the amount of any
nonexempt funds or property which was actually in the possession of the
garnishee at the time the writ was served, plus the cumulative amount
of the nonexempt earnings subject to the lien provided for in RCW
6.27.350, or the sum of one hundred dollars, whichever is more, but in
no event to exceed the full amount claimed by the plaintiff or the
amount of the unpaid judgment against the principal defendant plus all
accruing interest and costs and attorney's fees as prescribed in RCW
6.27.090, and in addition the plaintiff shall be entitled to a
reasonable attorney's fee for the plaintiff's response to the
garnishee's motion to reduce said judgment against the garnishee under
this proviso and the court may allow additional attorney's fees for
other actions taken because of the garnishee's failure to answer.

Sec. 10 RCW 6.27.250 and 2000 c 72 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If it appears from the answer of the garnishee or if it is
otherwise made to appear that the garnishee was indebted to the
defendant in any amount, not exempt, when the writ of garnishment was
served, and if the required return or affidavit showing service on or
mailing to the defendant is on file, the court shall render judgment
for the plaintiff against such garnishee for the amount so admitted or
found to be due to the defendant from the garnishee, unless such amount
exceeds the amount of the plaintiff's claim or judgment against the
defendant with accruing interest and costs and attorney's fees as
prescribed in RCW 6.27.090, in which case it shall be for the amount of
such claim or judgment, with said interest, costs, and fees. In the
case of a superior court garnishment, the court shall order the
garnishee to pay to the plaintiff or to the plaintiff's attorney
through the registry of the court the amount of the judgment against
the garnishee, the clerk of the court shall note receipt of any such
payment, and the clerk of the court shall disburse the payment to the
plaintiff. In the case of a district court garnishment, the court
shall order the garnishee to pay the judgment amount directly to the
plaintiff or to the plaintiff's attorney. In either case, the court
shall inform the garnishee that failure to pay the amount may result in
execution of the judgment, including garnishment.
(b) If, prior to judgment, the garnishee tenders to the plaintiff
or to the plaintiff's attorney or to the court any amounts due, such
tender will support judgment against the garnishee in the amount so
tendered, subject to any exemption claimed within the time required in
RCW 6.27.160 after the amounts are tendered, and subject to any
controversion filed within the time required in RCW 6.27.210 after the
amounts are tendered. Any amounts tendered to the court by or on
behalf of the garnishee or the defendant prior to judgment shall be
disbursed to the party entitled to same upon entry of judgment or
order, and any amounts so tendered after entry of judgment or order
shall be disbursed upon receipt to the party entitled to same.
(2) If it shall appear from the answer of the garnishee and the
same is not controverted, or if it shall appear from the hearing or
trial on controversion or by stipulation of the parties that the
garnishee is indebted to the principal defendant in any sum, but that
such indebtedness is not matured and is not due and payable, and if the
required return or affidavit showing service on or mailing to the
defendant is on file, the court shall make an order requiring the
garnishee to pay such sum into court when the same becomes due, the
date when such payment is to be made to be specified in the order, and
in default thereof that judgment shall be entered against the garnishee
for the amount of such indebtedness so admitted or found due. In case
the garnishee pays the sum at the time specified in the order, the
payment shall operate as a discharge, otherwise judgment shall be
entered against the garnishee for the amount of such indebtedness,
which judgment shall have the same force and effect, and be enforced in
the same manner as other judgments entered against garnishees as
provided in this chapter: PROVIDED, That if judgment is rendered in
favor of the principal defendant, or if any judgment rendered against
the principal defendant is satisfied prior to the date of payment
specified in an order of payment entered under this subsection, the
garnishee shall not be required to make the payment, nor shall any
judgment in such case be entered against the garnishee.
(3) The court shall, upon request of the plaintiff at the time
judgment is rendered against the garnishee or within one year
thereafter, or within one year after service of the writ on the
garnishee if no judgment is taken against the garnishee, render
judgment against the defendant for recoverable garnishment costs and
attorney fees. However, if it appears from the answer of garnishee or
otherwise that, at the time the writ was issued, the garnishee held no
funds, personal property, or effects of the defendant and, in the case
of a garnishment on earnings, the defendant was not employed by the
garnishee, or, in the case of a writ directed to a financial
institution, the defendant maintained no account therein, then the
plaintiff may not be awarded judgment against the defendant for such
costs or attorney fees.

Sec. 11 RCW 6.27.265 and 2000 c 72 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The judgment on garnishee's answer or tendered funds, and for costs
against defendant, and the order to pay funds shall be substantially in
the following form:

IN THE . . . . COURT OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR THE
COUNTY OF . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . No. . . . . .

Plaintiff

vs. JUDGMENT AND ORDER
TO PAY
(Clerk's Action Required)

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Defendant

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Garnishee

Judgment Summary

Judgment Creditor . . . . . . . . . . . .

Garnishment Judgment Debtor . . . . . . . . . . . .

Garnishment Judgment Amount . . . . . . . . . . . .

Costs Judgment Debtor . . . . . . . . . . . .

Costs Judgment Amount . . . . . . . . . . . .

Judgments to bear interest at . . . . . . . . . . . . %

Attorney for Judgment Creditor . . . . . . . . . . . .

IT APPEARING THAT garnishee was indebted to defendant in the
nonexempt amount of $ . . . . . .; that at the time the writ of
garnishment was issued defendant was employed by or maintained a
financial institution account with garnishee, or garnishee had in its
possession or control funds, personal property, or effects of
defendant; and that plaintiff has incurred recoverable costs and
attorney fees of $. . . .; now, therefore, it is hereby

ORDERED, ADJUDGED, AND DECREED that plaintiff is awarded judgment
against garnishee in the amount of $. . . .; that plaintiff is awarded
judgment against defendant in the amount of $ . . . . . . for
recoverable costs; that, if this is a superior court order, garnishee
shall pay its judgment amount to plaintiff [or to plaintiff's attorney]
through the registry of the court, and the clerk of the court shall
note receipt thereof and forthwith disburse such payment to plaintiff
[or to plaintiff's attorney]; that, if this is a district court order,
garnishee shall pay its judgment amount to plaintiff directly [or
((through)) to plaintiff's attorney], and if any payment is received by
the clerk of the court, the clerk shall forthwith disburse such payment
to plaintiff [or to plaintiff's attorney]. Garnishee is advised that
the failure to pay its judgment amount may result in execution of the
judgment, including garnishment.

DONE IN OPEN COURT this . . . . . . day of . . . ., 20. .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Judge/Court Commissioner

Presented by:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff

Sec. 12 RCW 6.27.320 and 2000 c 72 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In any case where garnishee has answered that it is holding funds
or property belonging to defendant and plaintiff shall obtain
satisfaction of the judgment and payment of recoverable garnishment
costs and attorney fees from a source other than the garnishment, upon
written demand of the defendant or the garnishee, it shall be the duty
of plaintiff to obtain an order dismissing the garnishment and to serve
it upon the garnishee within twenty days after the demand or the
satisfaction of judgment and payment of costs and fees, whichever shall
be later. The attorney of record for the plaintiff may, as an
alternative to obtaining a court order dismissing the garnishment,
deliver to the garnishee and file with the court an authorization to
dismiss the garnishment in whole or part, signed by the attorney, in
substantially the form indicated in RCW 6.27.160(3). In the event of
the failure of plaintiff to obtain and serve such an order or release,
if garnishee continues to hold such funds or property, defendant shall
be entitled to move for dismissal of the garnishment and shall further
be entitled to a judgment against plaintiff of one hundred dollars plus
defendant's costs and damages. Dismissal may be on ex parte motion of
the plaintiff.

Sec. 13 RCW 6.27.340 and 1988 c 231 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Service of a writ for a continuing lien shall comply fully with
RCW 6.27.110.
(2) The caption of the writ shall be marked "CONTINUING LIEN ON
EARNINGS" and the following additional paragraph shall be included in
the writ form prescribed in RCW 6.27.100:

"THIS IS A WRIT FOR A CONTINUING LIEN. THE GARNISHEE SHALL
HOLD the nonexempt portion of the defendant's earnings due at
the time of service of this writ and shall also hold the
defendant's nonexempt earnings that accrue through the last
payroll period ending on or before SIXTY days after the date of
service of this writ. HOWEVER, IF THE GARNISHEE IS PRESENTLY
HOLDING THE NONEXEMPT PORTION OF THE DEFENDANT'S EARNINGS UNDER
A PREVIOUSLY SERVED WRIT FOR A CONTINUING LIEN, THE GARNISHEE
SHALL HOLD UNDER THIS WRIT only the defendant's nonexempt
earnings that accrue from the date the previously served writ
or writs terminate and through the last payroll period ending
on or before sixty days after the date of termination of the
previous writ or writs. IN EITHER CASE, THE GARNISHEE SHALL
STOP WITHHOLDING WHEN THE SUM WITHHELD EQUALS THE AMOUNT STATED
IN THIS WRIT OF GARNISHMENT."

(3) The answer forms served on an employer with the writ shall
include in the caption, "ANSWER TO WRIT OF GARNISHMENT FOR CONTINUING
LIEN ON EARNINGS," and the following paragraph shall be added ((as the
first paragraph)) to section I of the answer form prescribed in RCW
6.27.190:

"If you are withholding the defendant's nonexempt earnings
under a previously served writ for a continuing lien, answer
only ((this portion)) sections I and II of this form and mail
or deliver the forms as directed in the writ. Withhold from
the defendant's future nonexempt earnings as directed in the
writ, and a second set of answer forms will be forwarded to you
later.

ANSWER: I am presently holding the defendant's nonexempt
earnings under a previous writ served on . . . . . . that will
terminate not later than . . . . . . , ((19)) 20. . .

If you are NOT withholding the defendant's earnings under a
previously served writ for a continuing lien, answer ((the
following portion of)) this entire form and mail or deliver the
forms as directed in the writ. A second set of answer forms
will be forwarded to you later for subsequently withheld
earnings."

(4) In the event plaintiff fails to comply with this section,
employer may elect to treat the garnishment as one not creating a
continuing lien.

Sec. 14 RCW 6.27.350 and 1997 c 296 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where the garnishee's answer to a garnishment for a continuing
lien reflects that the defendant is employed by the garnishee, the
judgment or balance due thereon as reflected on the writ of garnishment
shall become a lien on earnings due at the time of the effective date
of the writ, as defined in this subsection, to the extent that they are
not exempt from garnishment, and such lien shall continue as to
subsequent nonexempt earnings until the total subject to the lien
equals the amount stated on the writ of garnishment or until the
expiration of the employer's payroll period ending on or before sixty
days after the effective date of the writ, whichever occurs first,
except that such lien on subsequent earnings shall terminate sooner if
the employment relationship is terminated or if the underlying judgment
is vacated, modified, or satisfied in full or if the writ is dismissed.
The "effective date" of a writ is the date of service of the writ if
there is no previously served writ; otherwise, it is the date of
termination of a previously served writ or writs.
(2) At the time of the expected termination of the lien, the
plaintiff shall mail to the garnishee three additional stamped
envelopes addressed as provided in RCW 6.27.110, and four additional
copies of the answer form prescribed in RCW 6.27.190((, (a))). The
plaintiff shall replace the text of section I of the answer form with
a statement in substantially the following form ((added as the first
paragraph)): "ANSWER ((THE SECOND PART)) SECTION II OF THIS FORM WITH
RESPECT TO THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF EARNINGS WITHHELD UNDER THIS
GARNISHMENT, INCLUDING THE AMOUNT, IF ANY, STATED IN YOUR FIRST ANSWER,
AND WITHIN TWENTY DAYS AFTER YOU RECEIVE THESE FORMS, MAIL OR DELIVER
THEM AS DIRECTED IN THE WRIT((" and (b) with the following lines
substituted for the first sentence of the form prescribed in RCW
6.27.190:))."

(3) Within twenty days of receipt of the second answer form the
garnishee shall file a second answer, in the form as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, stating the total amount held subject
to the garnishment.

Sec. 15 RCW 3.62.060 and 1992 c 62 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Clerks of the district courts shall collect the following fees for
their official services:
(1) In any civil action commenced before or transferred to a
district court, the plaintiff shall, at the time of such commencement
or transfer, pay to such court a filing fee of thirty-one dollars plus
any surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035. No party shall be compelled
to pay to the court any other fees or charges up to and including the
rendition of judgment in the action other than those listed.
(2) For issuing a writ of garnishment or other writ, or for filing
an attorney issued writ of garnishment, a fee of six dollars.
(3) For filing a supplemental proceeding a fee of twelve dollars.
(4) For demanding a jury in a civil case a fee of fifty dollars to
be paid by the person demanding a jury.
(5) For preparing a transcript of a judgment a fee of six dollars.
(6) For certifying any document on file or of record in the clerk's
office a fee of five dollars.
(7) For preparing the record of a case for appeal to superior court
a fee of forty dollars including any costs of tape duplication as
governed by the rules of appeal for courts of limited jurisdiction
(RALJ).
(8) For duplication of part or all of the electronic tape or tapes
of a proceeding ten dollars per tape.
The fees or charges imposed under this section shall be allowed as
court costs whenever a judgment for costs is awarded.

--- END ---