BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that growing traffic
congestion is having a severe impact on the quality of life and the
economy in Washington state. It is incumbent upon the legislature to
act quickly to address urgent transportation needs and to demonstrate
to the public that transportation funds are being used efficiently and
effectively to provide congestion relief and to enhance freight
mobility.
The legislature also recognizes that taxpayers desire a voice in
the imposition of taxes and fees. It is therefore the intent of the
legislature to provide both the immediate response to critical
transportation issues by providing phased-in fuel tax increases in the
2003 legislative session and sending additional fuel tax increases to
a public vote in 2004, to be effective in 2005 and 2006.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.36.025 and 1999 c 269 s 16 and 1999 c 94 s 29 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Until July 1, 2004, a motor vehicle fuel tax rate of ((twenty-three)) twenty-six cents per gallon ((shall apply)) applies to the
sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel. Beginning July 1,
2004, a motor vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-eight cents per gallon
applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.36.025 and 2003 c . . . s 2 (section 2 of this act)
are each amended to read as follows:
((Until July 1, 2004, a motor vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-six
cents per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor
vehicle fuel.)) (1) Beginning July 1, 2004, a motor vehicle fuel tax
rate of twenty-eight cents per gallon applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2005, a motor vehicle fuel tax rate of
thirty-one cents per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or use
of motor vehicle fuel.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2006, a motor vehicle fuel tax rate of
thirty-three cents per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or use
of motor vehicle fuel.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.68.090 and 1999 c 269 s 2 and 1999 c 94 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle
fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be
first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. Until July 1, 2004, the remaining net tax amount shall be
distributed monthly by the state treasurer in the following proportions
((set forth in (c) through (l) of this subsection)): For distribution
to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 11.5385 percent to be
expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW 46.68.130;
the remaining 88.4615 percent will be distributed as set forth in (c)
through (l) of this subsection. Beginning July 1, 2004, the remaining
net tax amount will be distributed monthly by the state treasurer in
the following proportions: For distribution to the motor vehicle fund
an amount equal to 17.8571 percent to be expended for highway purposes
of the state as defined in RCW 46.68.130; the remaining 82.1429 percent
will be distributed as set forth in (c) through (l) of this subsection.
(a) For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special
fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;
(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to
appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state
treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state
of Washington in the administration of the motor vehicle fuel tax and
the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed monthly;
(c) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as
defined in RCW 46.68.130;
(d) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby
created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to
be expended for special category C projects. Special category C
projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will
require bond financing to complete construction.
The following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used
in determining which special category C projects have the highest
priority:
(i) Accident experience;
(ii) Fatal accident experience;
(iii) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable
speeds without undue congestion; and
(iv) Continuity of development of the highway transportation
network.
Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor
vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under
this subsection (1)(d);
(e) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;
(f) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;
(g) For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;
(h) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended
in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;
(i) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW
46.68.110;
(j) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an
amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall be
distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of
transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to
the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed
monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;
(k) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account,
hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565
percent. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the
number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural,
safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road
administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies
to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management
system is used;
(l) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in
accordance with RCW 36.79.020.
(2) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so
as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway
construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and
whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1, 2, and 4 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The secretary of state shall submit section
3 of this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or
rejection, at the general election to be held in this state in November
2004, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state
Constitution and the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

--- END ---