BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Substantial volumes of hazardous wastes, including used oil,
are being accumulated and managed at facilities located throughout
Washington without adequate financial reserves to pay for the safe and
orderly removal of materials and cleanup of environmental contamination
when these facilities close. Hazardous waste management facilities
have been abandoned, shut down, or gone bankrupt in Washington, leaving
taxpayers, property owners, or former customers with millions of
dollars in cleanup costs and significant environmental impacts;
(b) Even at those hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal
facilities that are currently required to have financial assurance,
funds are often insufficient to pay for the costs incurred. Rules
addressing financial assurance are inadequate or out of date;
(c) Environmental impacts and economic liability from recycling and
used oil processing facilities are not adequately addressed under the
current rules of the department. Such facilities are not currently
required to have financial assurance and changes in facility
operations, ownership, or waste management processes may occur without
notification or authorization by the department; and
(d) Resource levels are inadequate for managing current demands on
the department's permitting and compliance programs at hazardous waste
facilities.
(2) The legislature declares that the management, regulation, and
oversight of wastes at hazardous waste management facilities, including
recyclers and used oil processors, is essential to prevent adverse
effects on the environment and the economy and to protect public health
and safety. Toward that end, the legislature determines that the
department, in consultation with representatives of the waste
management industry, business, local government, environmental groups,
and other interested parties, shall take the following actions:
(a) By July 1, 2004, adopt amended rules, chapter 173-303 WAC,
governing the financial assurance, pollution liability, and closure
plans at facilities, including recyclers and used oil processors, to
assure that adequate funds will be available to pay for safe and
orderly cleanup and/or closure at those facilities. Owners and
operators of recycling and used oil processing facilities shall,
pursuant to these amended rules, have financial assurance and pollution
liability insurance for the closure of their facilities by no later
than December 31, 2005;
(b) By July 1, 2004, adopt a rule to establish a system for
authorizing recycling and used oil processing operations that are not
currently subject to hazardous waste permits. In establishing this
authorization system, the department shall, to the maximum extent
practicable, minimize paperwork and administrative procedures for
facility owners and operators; and
(c) By September 30, 2003, submit recommendations to the
legislature for the 2004 legislative session, addressing a fee-based
system to provide adequate funding for the department's permitting,
compliance, and assistance programs for hazardous waste facilities,
including recyclers and used oil processors. Subsequent to adoption of
the funding mechanism by the legislature, the department shall adopt
rules to implement this funding mechanism.

--- END ---