BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.170 and 1994 c 264 s 91 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Applications for permits shall be made on forms prescribed by
the department and shall contain the name and address of the applicant,
a description of the applicant's operations, the quantity and type of
waste material sought to be disposed of, the proposed method of
disposal, and any other relevant information deemed necessary by the
department. Application for permits shall be made at least sixty days
prior to commencement of any proposed discharge or permit expiration
date, whichever is applicable.
(2) Upon receipt of a proper application relating to a new
operation, or an operation previously under permit for which an
increase in volume of wastes or change in character of effluent is
requested over that previously authorized, the department shall
((instruct the applicant to publish notices thereof by such means and
within such time as the department shall prescribe. The department
shall require that the notice so prescribed shall be published twice in
a newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the
disposal of waste material is proposed to be made and in such other
appropriate information media as the department may direct. Said))
provide public notice thereof. Upon receipt by the department of an
application, it shall immediately send notice thereof containing
pertinent information to potentially affected state agencies. The
department shall also provide public notice of and an opportunity for
public comment on proposed or draft permits or permit denials.
(3) The department shall provide public notice in a manner
reasonably calculated to give actual notice to the persons potentially
affected by the proposed discharge and the department's actions with
respect to the proposed discharge. Methods of providing notice may
include electronic mail, posting on the department's internet site,
publication in newspapers, press releases, mailings, and other
information media the department may determine is appropriate. The
department shall maintain a list of persons interested in departmental
actions on waste disposal permits and shall provide notice to all
persons on the list. Notice may be by electronic distribution or by
regular mail.
(4) Public notice shall include a statement that any person
desiring to present his or her views to the department with regard to
((said)) the application or proposed permit action may do so in writing
to the department, or any person interested in the department's action
on an application for a permit, may submit his or her views or notify
the department of his or her interest ((within thirty days of the last
date of publication of notice)). Such notification or submission of
views to the department shall entitle said persons to a copy of the
action taken on the application. ((Upon receipt by the department of
an application, it shall immediately send notice thereof containing
pertinent information to the director of fish and wildlife and to the
secretary of social and health services.)) The department shall
provide a minimum of thirty days for interested persons to comment on
proposed draft permits or permit denials.
(5) When an application complying with the provisions of this
chapter and the rules and regulations of the department has been filed
with the department, it shall be its duty to investigate the
application, and determine whether the use of public waters for waste
disposal as proposed will pollute the same in violation of the public
policy of the state.

--- END ---