BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft of solid waste or recyclable
materials if he or she takes or wrongfully obtains any solid waste or
recyclable materials placed in or immediately adjacent to a bin or a
container as part of a solid waste or recycling collection program
operated by or under contract with a city, town, county, special
purpose district, or other governmental entity without the consent of
the generator or collector of such solid waste or recyclable materials
or the owner or operator of the bin or container.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "recyclable materials" and
"solid waste" have the same meaning as in RCW 70.95.030 and in addition
specifically include any materials containing "financial information"
or "means of identification" as those terms are defined in RCW
9.35.005.
(3) Theft of solid waste or recyclable materials, not amounting to
theft in the first degree, theft in the second degree, or theft in the
third degree, is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---