BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may, upon request, provide license plates that have
been used and subsequently returned to the department to individuals
for nonvehicular use. The department may charge a fee of up to five
dollars per plate to cover costs of recovery, postage, and handling.
The department may waive the fee for plates used in educational
projects, and may, by rule, provide standards for the fee waiver and
restrictions on the number of plates provided to any one person.

--- END ---