BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.300 and 1985 c 443 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, including but not limited to a volunteer provider
of emergency or medical services, who without compensation or the
expectation of compensation renders emergency care at the scene of an
emergency or who participates in transporting, not for compensation,
therefrom an injured person or persons for emergency medical treatment
shall not be liable for civil damages resulting from any act or
omission in the rendering of such emergency care or in transporting
such persons, other than acts or omissions constituting gross
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. Any person rendering
emergency care during the course of regular employment and receiving
compensation or expecting to receive compensation for rendering such
care is excluded from the protection of this subsection.
(2) Any physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW in the
state of Washington who, without compensation or the expectation of
compensation, provides health care services at a community clinic that
is a public or private tax exempt corporation is not liable for civil
damages resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of such
care, other than acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or
willful or wanton misconduct.

--- END ---