BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall ensure that adoption of and amendments to their
comprehensive plans and/or development regulations provide sufficient
capacity of land suitable for development within their jurisdictions to
accommodate their allocated housing and employment growth, as adopted
in the applicable countywide planning policies and consistent with the
twenty-year population forecast from the office of financial
management.

--- END ---