BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Strong marital relationships result in
stronger children, families, and ultimately, stronger communities and
place less of a fiscal burden on the state. Relationship skills can be
learned, and once learned these skills can facilitate communication and
assist couples in avoiding conflict. In addition, effective
relationship skills are used in parenting, the workplace, schools,
neighborhoods, and other relationships. The state has a compelling
interest in encouraging its citizens in developing the relationship and
communication skills that are vital for a successful and fulfilling
marriage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Each school district board of directors may develop and adopt a
family preservation education program curricula. School districts are
encouraged to develop a family preservation education program curricula
and make a one credit course available to high school students. If the
office of the superintendent of public instruction develops a family
preservation education program model curricula but the board of
directors chooses not to adopt the model curricula, the board may
submit to the office of superintendent of public instruction a copy of
its proposed curricula for approval. A student is not required to
participate in the family preservation education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of superintendent of public instruction may develop a
family preservation education program model curricula that is available
to each of the school district board of directors. The model curricula
may be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site.
The model curricula may include, but is not limited to, instruction on
developing conflict management skills, communication skills, financial
responsibility, and parenting responsibility.

--- END ---