BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Authorized single-occupant vehicle" means a vehicle displaying a
decal, label, or other identifier issued under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall issue annually, at the time of vehicle
registration or renewal, optional permits in the form of a decal,
label, or other identifier that will entitle the operator of the
vehicle to use special lanes as specified in RCW 46.61.165 and
47.52.025, regardless of the number of occupants.
(2) The optional permit will be issued upon payment of a fee of
five hundred dollars, to be deposited in the motor vehicle account.
(3) The department shall design the decal, label, or other
identifier, and shall determine its placement on authorized single-occupant vehicles, in conjunction with the Washington state patrol.
The decal, label, or other identifier must be developed so that its
removal from a vehicle cannot be accomplished without defacing or
destroying the label in whole or in part.
(4) The authorized single-occupant vehicle permit may be purchased
at a time not coinciding with vehicle registration or renewal. In such
case, the new authorized single-occupant vehicle permit fee will be
one-twelfth of the fee listed in subsection (2) of this section
multiplied by the number of months remaining in the period for which
licensing fees have been paid, including the month in which the new
permit is effective.
(5) The department or the department's agent or subagent appointed
under chapter 46.01 RCW may issue the optional permit described in this
section and collect the fee specified in RCW 46.01.140(4)(f).

Sec. 3 RCW 46.01.140 and 2001 c 331 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county auditor, if appointed by the director of licensing,
shall carry out the provisions of this title relating to: (a) The
licensing of vehicles ((and)); (b) the issuance of vehicle license
number plates; and (c) the authorized single-occupant vehicle permit,
under the direction and supervision of the director and may with the
approval of the director appoint assistants as special deputies and
recommend subagents to: (i) Accept applications and collect fees for
vehicle licenses ((and)), transfers, and the authorized single occupant
vehicle permit; and ((to)) (ii) deliver vehicle license number plates.
(2) A county auditor appointed by the director may request that the
director appoint subagencies within the county.
(a) Upon authorization of the director, the auditor shall use an
open competitive process including, but not limited to, a written
business proposal and oral interview to determine the qualifications of
all interested applicants.
(b) A subagent may recommend a successor who is either the
subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency employee, as long
as the recommended successor participates in the open, competitive
process used to select an applicant. In making successor
recommendation and appointment determinations, the following provisions
apply:
(i) If a subagency is held by a partnership or corporate entity,
the nomination must be submitted on behalf of, and agreed to by, all
partners or corporate officers.
(ii) No subagent may receive any direct or indirect compensation or
remuneration from any party or entity in recognition of a successor
nomination. A subagent may not receive any financial benefit from the
transfer or termination of an appointment.
(iii) (a) and (b) of this subsection are intended to assist in the
efficient transfer of appointments in order to minimize public
inconvenience. They do not create a proprietary or property interest
in the appointment.
(c) The auditor shall submit all proposals to the director, and
shall recommend the appointment of one or more subagents who have
applied through the open competitive process. The auditor shall
include in his or her recommendation to the director, not only the name
of the successor who is a relative or employee, if applicable and if
otherwise qualified, but also the name of one other applicant who is
qualified and was chosen through the open competitive process. The
director has final appointment authority.
(3)(a) A county auditor who is appointed as an agent by the
department shall enter into a standard contract provided by the
director, developed with the advice of the title and registration
advisory committee.
(b) A subagent appointed under subsection (2) of this section shall
enter into a standard contract with the county auditor, developed with
the advice of the title and registration advisory committee. The
director shall provide the standard contract to county auditors.
(c) The contracts provided for in (a) and (b) of this subsection
must contain at a minimum provisions that:
(i) Describe the responsibilities, and where applicable, the
liability, of each party relating to the service expectations and
levels, equipment to be supplied by the department, and equipment
maintenance;
(ii) Require the specific type of insurance or bonds so that the
state is protected against any loss of collected motor vehicle tax
revenues or loss of equipment;
(iii) Specify the amount of training that will be provided by the
state, the county auditor, or subagents;
(iv) Describe allowable costs that may be charged to vehicle
licensing activities as provided for in (d) of this subsection;
(v) Describe the causes and procedures for termination of the
contract, which may include mediation and binding arbitration.
(d) The department shall develop procedures that will standardize
and prescribe allowable costs that may be assigned to vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities performed by county
auditors.
(e) The contracts may include any provision that the director deems
necessary to ensure acceptable service and the full collection of
vehicle and vessel tax revenues.
(f) The director may waive any provisions of the contract deemed
necessary in order to ensure that readily accessible service is
provided to the citizens of the state.
(4)(a) At any time any application is made to the director, the
county auditor, or other agent pursuant to any law dealing with
licenses, registration, or the right to operate any vehicle or vessel
upon the public highways or waters of this state, excluding applicants
already paying such fee under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, the applicant
shall pay to the director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of
three dollars for each application in addition to any other fees
required by law.
(b) Counties that do not cover the expenses of vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities may submit to the
department a request for cost-coverage moneys. The request must be
submitted on a form developed by the department. The department shall
develop procedures to verify whether a request is reasonable. Payment
shall be made on requests found to be allowable from the licensing
services account.
(c) Applicants for certificates of ownership, including applicants
paying fees under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, shall pay to the
director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of four dollars in
addition to any other fees required by law.
(d) The fees under (a) and (c) of this subsection, if paid to the
county auditor as agent of the director, or if paid to a subagent of
the county auditor, shall be paid to the county treasurer in the same
manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and credited to
the county current expense fund. If the fee is paid to another agent
of the director, the fee shall be used by the agent to defray his or
her expenses in handling the application.
(e) Applicants required to pay the three-dollar fee established
under (a) of this subsection, must pay an additional fifty cents, which
must be collected and remitted to the state treasurer for deposit into
the department of licensing services account of the motor vehicle fund.
Revenue deposited into this account must be used for agent and subagent
support, which is to include but not be limited to the replacement of
department-owned equipment in the possession of agents and subagents.
(f) The applicant shall pay to the director, county auditor, or
other agent a fee of five dollars for each authorized single-occupant
vehicle permit application in addition to any other fees required by
law.
(5) A subagent shall collect a service fee of (a) eight dollars and
fifty cents for changes in a certificate of ownership, with or without
registration renewal, or verification of record and preparation of an
affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the title application
or transfer and (b) three dollars and fifty cents for registration
renewal only, issuing a transit permit, or any other service under this
section.
(6) If the fee is collected by the state patrol as agent for the
director, the fee so collected shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the state patrol highway
account. If the fee is collected by the department of transportation
as agent for the director, the fee shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle fund. All
such fees collected by the director or branches of his office shall be
certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the credit of the
highway safety fund.
(7) Any county revenues that exceed the cost of providing vehicle
licensing and vessel registration and title activities in a county,
calculated in accordance with the procedures in subsection (3)(d) of
this section, shall be expended as determined by the county legislative
authority during the process established by law for adoption of county
budgets.
(8) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state department of transportation and the local
authorities are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway
under their respective jurisdictions, including any designated lane or
ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of the following vehicles
when the limitation will increase the efficient use of the highway or
will aid in the conservation of energy resources: (a) Public
transportation vehicles ((or)); (b) private motor vehicles carrying no
fewer than a specified number of passengers ((when such limitation will
increase the efficient utilization of the highway or will aid in the
conservation of energy resources)); or (c) authorized single-occupant
vehicles.
(2) Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of
a highway facility may be declared to be effective at all times or at
specified times of day or on specified days. Violation of a
restriction of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate authority
under this section is a traffic infraction.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.52.025 and 1974 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Highway authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated
cities and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this
chapter, shall also have, and may exercise, relative to limited access
facilities, any and all additional authority, now or hereafter vested
in them relative to highways or streets within their respective
jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such
limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or traffic.
Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or
portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive
or preferential use of the following vehicles when the limitation will
increase the efficient use of the highway facility or will aid in the
conservation of energy resources: (a) Public transportation
vehicles((,)); (b) privately owned buses((, or)); (c) private motor
vehicles carrying not less than a specified number of passengers ((when
such limitation will increase the efficient utilization of the highway
facility or will aid in the conservation of energy resources)); or (d)
authorized single-occupant vehicles as defined in section 1 of this
act.
(2) Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of
a highway facility may be declared to be effective at all time or at
specified times of day or on specified days.

Sec. 6 RCW 81.100.020 and 1990 c 43 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Transit agency" means a city that operates a transit system,
a public transportation benefit area, a county transportation
authority, or a metropolitan municipal corporation.
(2) The "high-occupancy vehicle system" includes high-occupancy
vehicle lanes, related high-occupancy vehicle facilities, and high-
occupancy vehicle programs.
(3) "High-occupancy vehicle lanes" mean lanes reserved for: (a)
Public transportation vehicles ((only or public transportation vehicles
and)), (b) authorized single-occupant vehicles as defined in section 1
of this act, or (c) private vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified
number of passengers under RCW 46.61.165 or 47.52.025.
(4) "Related facilities" means park and ride lots, park and pool
lots, ramps, bypasses, turnouts, signal preemption, and other
improvements designed to maximize use of the high-occupancy vehicle
system.
(5) "High-occupancy vehicle program" means advertising the high-
occupancy vehicle system, promoting carpool, vanpool, and transit use,
providing vanpool vehicles, and enforcement of driving restrictions
governing high-occupancy vehicle lanes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 81.100 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of transportation shall work with the federal
government to obtain waivers, if necessary, to implement this act.

--- END ---