BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the community and
technical colleges offer quality, cost-effective instructional programs
to the citizens of the state. The legislature also finds that an
experienced, educated faculty, up-to-date in respective disciplines and
effective teaching techniques is vital to the quality of instruction.
The legislature further finds that a system of compensation for
academic employees that recognizes experience, education, and
continuing professional development will foster quality teaching. It
is the intent of the legislature that state appropriations be adjusted
to an amount which, together with faculty turnover savings, provides
for a fair and equitable funding of faculty salary increments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Community and technical college boards of trustees shall award
faculty salary increments based on local agreements developed under
chapter 28B.52 RCW. Each biennium, the state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit in its biennial budget request an
amount of funds, which together with faculty turnover savings, is
sufficient to cover the projected costs of increments for the community
and technical college system. It is the intent of the legislature that
the annual cost of salary increments under this subsection, exclusive
of turnover savings, should be funded by legislative appropriation, not
to exceed one and one-half percent of the faculty salary base. Upon
receipt of a line item appropriation from the legislature, the state
board for community and technical colleges shall distribute the funds
to the college districts in a fair and equitable manner. Allocation
from the state board for community and technical colleges shall
recognize turnover savings.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
convene a task force comprised of representatives from the state board,
the presidents' organization, the trustees' organization, and the
faculties' organization as defined by RCW 28B.52.020(7), to advise the
state board on guidelines for the fair and equitable distribution of
increment funds.

--- END ---