BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.240 and 2002 c 8 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) To ensure that following the initial application for benefits,
an individual is actively engaged in searching for work, ((effective
July 1, 1999,)) the ((employment security)) department shall implement
a job search monitoring program. Except for those individuals with
employer attachment or union referral, individuals who qualify for
unemployment compensation under RCW 50.20.050(2)(d), and individuals in
commissioner-approved training, an individual who has received five or
more weeks of benefits under this title must provide evidence of
seeking work, as directed by the commissioner or the commissioner's
agents, for each week beyond five in which a claim is filed. The
evidence must demonstrate contacts with at least three employers per
week or documented in-person job search activity at the local
reemployment center. In developing the requirements for the job search
monitoring program, the commissioner or the commissioner's agents shall
utilize an existing advisory committee having equal representation of
employers and workers.
(2) During any extended benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010,
the department may: (a) Suspend the job search monitoring program
under subsection (1) of this section; and (b) shift funding and staff
from job search monitoring activities to eligibility determination and
benefit payment activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---