BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.120 and 2002 c 149 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the other provisions of this title, benefits shall
be payable to any eligible individual during the individual's benefit
year in a maximum amount equal to the lesser of thirty times the weekly
benefit amount (determined hereinafter) or one-third of the
individual's base year wages under this title: PROVIDED, That as to
any week ((beginning on and after March 31, 1981,)) which falls in an
extended benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010(1), as now or
hereafter amended, an individual's eligibility for maximum benefits in
excess of twenty-six times his or her weekly benefit amount will be
subject to the terms and conditions set forth in RCW 50.22.020, as now
or hereafter amended.
(2) An individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal
to one twenty-fifth of the average quarterly wages of the individual's
total wages during the two quarters of the individual's base year in
which such total wages were highest. The maximum and minimum amounts
payable weekly shall be determined as of each June 30th to apply to
benefit years beginning in the twelve-month period immediately
following such June 30th. Except as provided in RCW 50.20.125, the
maximum amount payable weekly shall be seventy percent of the "average
weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June 30th. The
minimum amount payable weekly shall be fifteen percent of the "average
weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June 30th. If any
weekly benefit, maximum benefit, or minimum benefit amount computed
herein is not a multiple of one dollar, it shall be reduced to the next
lower multiple of one dollar.
(3)(a) In addition to the amount payable weekly under subsection
(2) of this section, an individual shall be paid a dependent allowance
of twenty-five dollars weekly for: (i) Each child who is a dependent
of the individual for federal income tax exemptions; and (ii) each
child for whom the individual owes child support obligations and for
whom no other person is receiving dependent allowances under this
subsection.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Child" means a biological, adopted, or foster child, a
stepchild, a legal ward, or a child of a person standing in loco
parentis who is: (A) Under eighteen years of age; (B) eighteen years
of age or older and incapable of self-care because of a mental or
physical disability; or (C) under twenty-four years of age, enrolled as
a student, and regularly attending classes, or is between two
successive academic years or terms, at an institution of higher
education.
(ii) "Institution of higher education" means an educational
institution that: (A) Admits as regular students only individuals
having a certificate of graduation from a high school, or the
recognized equivalent of such a certificate; (B) is legally authorized
to provide a program of education beyond high school; (C) provides an
educational program for which it awards a bachelor's or higher degree,
or provides a program which is acceptable for full credit toward such
a degree, or offers a program of training to prepare students for
gainful employment in a recognized occupation; and (D) is a public or
other nonprofit institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to claims that have an
effective date after May 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---