BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.095 and 1999 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) One of the primary purposes of this title is to enable the
injured worker to become employable at gainful employment. However, it
is also a purpose of this section to reduce the injured worker's
suffering and economic loss by providing services that are intended to
assist the worker to become employable at monthly wages that are at
least eighty percent of preinjury wages. To this end, the department
or self-insurers shall utilize the services of individuals and
organizations, public or private, whose experience, training, and
interests in vocational rehabilitation and retraining qualify them to
lend expert assistance to the supervisor of industrial insurance in
such programs of vocational rehabilitation as may be reasonable to make
the worker employable consistent with his or her physical and mental
status. Where, after evaluation and recommendation by such individuals
or organizations and prior to final evaluation of the worker's
permanent disability and in the sole opinion of the supervisor or
supervisor's designee, whether or not medical treatment has been
concluded, vocational rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to
enable the injured worker to become employable at gainful employment or
to assist the injured worker to become employable at monthly wages that
are at least eighty percent of preinjury wages, the supervisor or
supervisor's designee may, in his or her sole discretion, pay or, if
the employer is a self-insurer, direct the self-insurer to pay the cost
as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) When in the sole discretion of the supervisor or the
supervisor's designee vocational rehabilitation is ((both necessary and
likely to make the worker employable at gainful employment, then))
authorized under subsection (1) of this section, services must be
provided that are intended to assist the worker to become employable at
monthly wages that are at least eighty percent of preinjury wages. In
providing these services, the following order of priorities shall be
used:
(a) Return to the previous job with the same employer;
(b) Modification of the previous job with the same employer
including transitional return to work;
(c) A new job with the same employer in keeping with any
limitations or restrictions;
(d) Modification of a new job with the same employer including
transitional return to work;
(e) Modification of the previous job with a new employer;
(f) A new job with a new employer or self-employment based upon
transferable skills;
(g) Modification of a new job with a new employer;
(h) A new job with a new employer or self-employment involving on-the-job training;
(i) Short-term retraining and job placement.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, costs for
vocational rehabilitation benefits allowed by the supervisor or
supervisor's designee under subsection (1) of this section may include
the cost of books, tuition, fees, supplies, equipment, transportation,
child or dependent care, and other necessary expenses for any such
worker in an amount not to exceed three thousand dollars in any fifty-two week period ((except as authorized by RCW 51.60.060)), and the cost
of continuing the temporary total disability compensation under RCW
51.32.090 while the worker is actively and successfully undergoing a
formal program of vocational rehabilitation.
(b) Beginning with vocational rehabilitation plans approved on or
after July 1, 1999, costs for vocational rehabilitation benefits
allowed by the supervisor or supervisor's designee under subsection (1)
of this section may include the cost of books, tuition, fees, supplies,
equipment, child or dependent care, and other necessary expenses for
any such worker in an amount not to exceed four thousand dollars in any
fifty-two week period ((except as authorized by RCW 51.60.060)), and
the cost of transportation and continuing the temporary total
disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090 while the worker is
actively and successfully undergoing a formal program of vocational
rehabilitation.
(c) The expenses allowed under (a) or (b) of this subsection may
include training fees for on-the-job training and the cost of
furnishing tools and other equipment necessary for self-employment or
reemployment. However, compensation or payment of retraining with job
placement expenses under (a) or (b) of this subsection may not be
authorized for a period of more than fifty-two weeks, except that such
period may, in the sole discretion of the supervisor after his or her
review, be extended for an additional fifty-two weeks or portion
thereof by written order of the supervisor.
(d) In cases where the worker is required to reside away from his
or her customary residence, the reasonable cost of board and lodging
shall also be paid.
(e) Costs paid under this subsection shall be chargeable to the
employer's cost experience or shall be paid by the self-insurer as the
case may be.
(4) In addition to the vocational rehabilitation expenditures
provided for under subsection (3) of this section, an additional five
thousand dollars may, upon authorization of the supervisor or the
supervisor's designee, be expended for: (a) Accommodations for an
injured worker that are medically necessary for the worker to
participate in an approved retraining plan; and (b) accommodations
necessary to perform the essential functions of an occupation in which
an injured worker is seeking employment, consistent with the retraining
plan or the recommendations of a vocational evaluation. The injured
worker's attending physician must verify the necessity of the
modifications or accommodations. The total expenditures authorized in
this subsection and the expenditures authorized under RCW 51.32.250
shall not exceed five thousand dollars.
(5) The department shall establish criteria to monitor the quality
and effectiveness of rehabilitation services provided by the
individuals and organizations used under subsection (1) of this
section. The state fund shall make referrals for vocational
rehabilitation services based on these performance criteria.
(6) The department shall engage in, where feasible and cost-effective, a cooperative program with the state employment security
department to provide job placement services under this section.
(7) The benefits in this section shall be provided for the injured
workers of self-insured employers. Self-insurers shall report both
benefits provided and benefits denied under this section in the manner
prescribed by the department by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
The director may, in his or her sole discretion and upon his or her own
initiative or at any time that a dispute arises under this section,
promptly make such inquiries as circumstances require and take such
other action as he or she considers will properly determine the matter
and protect the rights of the parties.
(8) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the benefits
provided for in this section are available to any otherwise eligible
worker regardless of the date of industrial injury. However, claims
shall not be reopened solely for vocational rehabilitation purposes.
(9) For the purposes of this section, "preinjury wages" means the
monthly wages, including benefits provided by the employer, that were
earned by the worker at the time of injury.

--- END ---