BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.340 and 2002 c 349 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that creating a shared game lottery
could result in less revenue being raised by the existing state lottery
ticket sales. The legislature further recognizes that the two funds
most impacted by this potential event are the student achievement fund
and the education construction account. Therefore, it is the intent of
the legislature to use some of the proceeds from the shared game
lottery to make up the difference that the potential state lottery
revenue loss would have on the student achievement fund and the
education construction account.
(2) The student achievement fund and the education construction
account are expected to collectively receive one hundred two million
dollars annually from state lottery games other than the shared game
lottery. For fiscal year 2003 and thereafter, if the amount of lottery
revenues earmarked for the student achievement fund and the education
construction account are less than one hundred two million dollars, the
commission must, after making the transfer required by subsection (3)
of this section, transfer sufficient moneys from revenues derived from
the shared game lottery into the student achievement fund and the
education construction account to bring the total revenue up to one
hundred two million dollars. The funds transferred from the shared
game lottery account under this subsection must be divided between the
student achievement fund and the education construction account in a
manner consistent with RCW 67.70.240(3).
(3) ((For fiscal year 2003,)) Beginning with fiscal year 2004, the
commission shall annually transfer from revenues derived from the
shared game lottery to the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account under RCW 69.50.520 ((five)) two hundred fifty thousand dollars
exclusively for the treatment of pathological gambling as prescribed by
RCW 67.70.350.
(4) The remaining net revenues, if any, in the shared game lottery
account after the transfers shall be deposited into the general fund.

--- END ---