BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to authorize the
performance of forensic competency examinations conducted by the
department of social and health services by a single examiner in a
local jail or detention or correctional facility or out of custody. A
forensic competency examination performed either in a jail or detention
or correctional facility or in an appropriate community setting by one
examiner is more cost-effective and can lead to a shorter total period
of detention. Public health, safety, and welfare are promoted when
defendants are detained in the jail or can be released to an
appropriate community setting rather than placed in a mental health
facility where vulnerable persons are being treated.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.77.060 and 2000 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever there is reason to doubt the competency of a
defendant, the court on its own motion or on the motion of any party
shall request the secretary to designate a qualified expert or
professional person to examine, in a local jail or detention or
correctional facility or in an appropriate community setting, and
report upon the mental condition of the defendant. The designated
expert or professional person shall be a developmental disabilities
professional if the court is provided evidence by any party that the
defendant may be developmentally disabled. The report of the results
of the examination, in a local jail or detention or correctional
facility or in an appropriate community setting, shall be submitted to
the court within fifteen days of the expert or professional person
receiving the order of the court, charging documents, and the relevant
discovery materials. If clinically necessary and requested by the
designated expert or professional person, the court may order the
defendant committed to a hospital or other suitably secure public or
private mental health facility for a period of time necessary to
complete the examination, but not to exceed fifteen days from the time
of admission to the facility.
(b) Whenever a defendant has pleaded not guilty by reason of
insanity((, or there is reason to doubt his or her competency))
pursuant to RCW 10.77.030, the court on its own motion or on the motion
of any party shall either appoint or request the secretary to designate
at least two qualified experts or professional persons, one of whom
shall be approved by the prosecuting attorney, to examine and report
upon the mental condition of the defendant. Upon agreement of the
parties, the court may designate one expert or professional person to
conduct the examination and report on the mental condition of the
defendant. At least one of the experts or professional persons
appointed shall be a developmental disabilities professional if the
court is ((advised)) provided evidence by any party that the defendant
may be developmentally disabled. For purposes of the examination, the
court may order the defendant committed to a hospital or other suitably
secure public or private mental health facility for a period of time
necessary to complete the examination, but not to exceed fifteen days
from the time of admission to the facility.
(((b))) (c) When a defendant is ordered to be examined or committed
for inpatient examination under this subsection (1), the court may
delay granting bail until the defendant has been ((evaluated)) examined
for competency or sanity and appears before the court. Following the
((evaluation)) examination, in determining bail the court shall
consider: (i) Recommendations of the expert or professional persons
regarding the defendant's competency, sanity, or diminished capacity;
(ii) whether the defendant has a recent history of one or more violent
acts; (iii) whether the defendant has previously been acquitted by
reason of insanity or found incompetent; (iv) whether it is reasonably
likely the defendant will fail to appear for a future court hearing;
and (v) whether the defendant is a threat to public safety.
(2) The court may direct that a qualified expert or professional
person retained by or appointed for the defendant be permitted to
witness the examination authorized by subsection (1) of this section,
and that the defendant shall have access to all information obtained by
the court appointed experts or professional persons. The defendant's
expert or professional person shall have the right to file his or her
own report following the guidelines of subsection (3) or (4) of this
section. If the defendant is indigent, the court shall upon the
request of the defendant assist him or her in obtaining an expert or
professional person.
(3) The report of the examination regarding competency must include
the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A diagnosis of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) An opinion as to competency; and
(d) An opinion as to whether the defendant should be evaluated by
a county designated mental health professional under chapter 71.05 RCW,
and an opinion as to whether the defendant is a substantial danger to
other persons, or presents a substantial likelihood of committing
criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security, unless kept under
further control by the court or other persons or institutions.
(4) The report of the examination regarding sanity shall include
the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A diagnosis of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) ((If the defendant suffers from a mental disease or defect, or
is developmentally disabled, an opinion as to competency;
(d) If the defendant has indicated his or her intention to rely on
the defense of insanity pursuant to RCW 10.77.030,)) An opinion as to
the defendant's sanity at the time of the act;
(((e))) (d) When directed by the court, an opinion as to the
capacity of the defendant to have a particular state of mind which is
an element of the offense charged;
(((f))) (e) An opinion as to whether the defendant should be
evaluated by a county designated mental health professional under
chapter 71.05 RCW, and an opinion as to whether the defendant is a
substantial danger to other persons, or presents a substantial
likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or
security, unless kept under further control by the court or other
persons or institutions.
(((4))) (5) The secretary may execute such agreements as
appropriate and necessary to implement this section.

--- END ---