BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.04.300 and 1998 c 79 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a recipient receives public assistance and/or food stamps or
food stamp benefits transferred electronically for which the recipient
is not eligible, or receives public assistance and/or food stamps or
food stamp benefits transferred electronically in an amount greater
than that for which the recipient is eligible, the portion of the
payment to which the recipient is not entitled shall be a debt due the
state recoverable under RCW 43.20B.030 and 43.20B.620 through
43.20B.645. ((It shall be the duty of)) The department may by rule
determine reporting requirements for recipients of public assistance
and/or food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically to
notify the department ((within twenty days)) of the receipt or
possession of ((all)) countable income or resources not previously
declared to the department. The rules shall be consistent with federal
law and regulations governing public assistance programs. The
department shall advise applicants for assistance that failure to
report as required, failure to reveal resources or income, and false
statements will result in recovery by the state of any overpayment and
may result in criminal prosecution.

--- END ---