BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.110 and 1997 c 325 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any worker entitled to receive any benefits or claiming such
under this title shall, if requested by the department or self-insurer,
submit himself or herself for medical examination((, at a time and from
time to time, at a place reasonably convenient for the worker and as
may be provided by the rules of the department. An injured worker,
whether an alien or other injured worker, who is not residing in the
United States at the time that a medical examination is requested may
be required to submit to an examination at any location in the United
States determined by the department or self-insurer)) as authorized in
RCW 51.36.070.
(2) If the worker refuses to submit to medical examination, or
obstructs the same, or, if any injured worker shall persist in
unsanitary or injurious practices which tend to imperil or retard his
or her recovery, or shall refuse to submit to such medical or surgical
treatment as is reasonably essential to his or her recovery or refuse
or obstruct evaluation or examination for the purpose of vocational
rehabilitation or does not cooperate in reasonable efforts at such
rehabilitation, the department or the self-insurer upon approval by the
department, with notice to the worker may suspend any further action on
any claim of such worker so long as such refusal, obstruction,
noncooperation, or practice continues and reduce, suspend, or deny any
compensation for such period: PROVIDED, That the department or the
self-insurer shall not suspend any further action on any claim of a
worker or reduce, suspend, or deny any compensation if a worker has
good cause for refusing to submit to or to obstruct any examination,
evaluation, treatment or practice requested by the department or
required under this section.
(3) If the worker necessarily incurs traveling expenses in
attending the examination pursuant to the request of the department,
such traveling expenses shall be repaid to him or her out of the
accident fund upon proper voucher and audit or shall be repaid by the
self-insurer, as the case may be.
(4)(a) If the medical examination required by this section causes
the worker to be absent from his or her work without pay:
(i) In the case of a worker insured by the department, the worker
shall be paid compensation out of the accident fund in an amount equal
to his or her usual wages for the time lost from work while attending
the medical examination; or
(ii) In the case of a worker of a self-insurer, the self-insurer
shall pay the worker an amount equal to his or her usual wages for the
time lost from work while attending the medical examination.
(b) This subsection (4) shall apply prospectively to all claims
regardless of the date of injury.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.36.070 and 2001 c 152 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a medical examination is conducted under this title:
(a) The examination must be conducted at a medical facility
suitable for the examination and reasonably convenient for the worker;
(b) The examination must be conducted with due regard and respect
for the privacy and dignity of the injured worker and for the safety
and convenient access of the worker; and
(c) The worker may be accompanied by a person who may observe the
examination but not interfere with or obstruct the examination. The
worker or person accompanying the worker may, at the worker's expense,
make an audio and video recording of the examination, if the recording
is made in an unobtrusive manner. This section does not limit the
department or self-insurer's obligation to provide necessary
interpreter services.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, whenever the
director or the self-insurer deems it necessary in order to resolve any
medical issue, the department or self-insurer may, at a time and from
time to time and as may be provided by department rules, order a worker
((shall)) to submit to examination by a ((physician or physicians
selected)) provider or providers approved by the director((, with the
rendition of a report to the person ordering the examination)) and
competent to examine the worker and evaluate the injury or disease from
which the worker suffers. An injured worker who is not residing in the
United States at the time that a medical examination is ordered may be
required to submit to an examination at a suitable medical facility in
the United States as determined by the department or self-insurer.
(3)(a) When ordering a medical examination, the department or self-insurer must first request in writing, with a copy of the request
submitted to the worker and the worker's representative, if any, that
the worker's attending physician or other treating provider conduct an
examination and make a report on the medical issue in question. The
attending physician or treating provider may, without prior
authorization from the department or self-insurer, make a consultation
referral to a provider licensed to practice in the same field or
specialty as the attending physician or treating provider, as relevant.
The consultant shall conduct the examination and make a report to the
provider requesting the examination.
(b) If the medical issue is not resolved by the requested
examination and report, the department or self-insurer may request the
attending physician or treating provider to make a consultation
referral to a provider approved by the director and licensed to
practice in the same field or specialty as the worker's attending
physician or treating provider, as relevant.
(c) If the worker's attending physician or treating provider is
unwilling or unable to conduct the examination or make a consultation
referral, as requested by the department or self-insurer, the
department or self-insurer may order a medical examination by a
provider or providers agreed upon by the worker and the department or
self-insurer.
(d) To resolve a material dispute regarding treatment or diagnosis
between the attending physician or treating provider and a consulting
provider, the department or self-insurer may order a medical
examination to be conducted by a provider that the injured worker
chooses from a list of at least five providers submitted by the
department or self-insurer to the worker.
(4)(a) A provider conducting a medical examination ordered under
this section must submit a report to the department or self-insurer as
the case may be and, on the same day that the report is submitted,
submit a copy of the report to the worker, the worker's representative,
if any, the worker's attending physician, and the worker's employer.
(b) If the department or self-insurer relies on the examination
report to deny, limit, or terminate benefits to a worker, the
department or self-insurer must give the workers' attending physician
no less than thirty days from the physician's receipt of the report to
provide a written response to the report.
(5) In resolving a medical issue under this title, the department
or self-insurer must:
(a) Base the decision only on medical opinion that is founded on
factual data supported by the evidence; and
(b) Give special consideration to the medical opinion of the
worker's attending physician or treating provider rather than to the
opinion of a provider who has examined, but not treated, the worker.
(6) The department or self-insurer shall provide the physician
performing an examination with all relevant medical records from the
worker's claim file.
(7) The director, in his or her discretion, may charge the cost of
((such)) a medical examination or examinations ordered under this title
to the self-insurer or to the medical aid fund as the case may be. The
cost of ((said)) the examination shall include payment to the worker of
reasonable expenses connected ((therewith)) with the examination as
provided in RCW 51.32.110.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "medical issue" includes all
questions within the expertise of the provider, including but not
limited to cause of the injury or disease, establishment of diagnoses,
the course of or need for treatment, the condition of the worker and
whether the condition is fixed and stable, limitations on return-to-work activities, review of job analyses, and assessment of permanent
disability.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.32.112 and 1993 c 515 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall ((develop standards for)) adopt rules
governing the conduct of ((special)) medical examinations ((to
determine permanent disabilities)) ordered under this title, including,
but not limited to:
(a) The qualifications of persons conducting the examinations. To
conduct an examination, a provider must, at a minimum, be licensed to
practice at the time of the examination:
(i) In the same field or specialty as the worker's attending
physician or treating provider, as relevant, with an active practice
involving direct patient care at least weekly in that field or
specialty. This requirement may be waived by mutual agreement between
the worker and the department or self-insurer; and
(ii) Medicine or surgery under chapter 18.71 RCW, osteopathic
medicine and surgery under chapter 18.57 RCW, podiatric medicine and
surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW, dentistry under chapter 18.30 RCW,
chiropractic under chapter 18.25 RCW, or psychology under chapter 18.83
RCW;
(b) The criteria for removing examiners from the list of approved
examiners, including but not limited to the department determining
after reasonable investigation that the provider:
(i) Committed professional or other misconduct, including a
violation of RCW 51.48.280, or demonstrated incompetency in connection
with providing medical examinations under this title;
(ii) Exceeded the limits of his or her professional competence in
conducting medical examinations or made materially false statements
regarding his or her qualifications in his or her application as an
examiner;
(iii) Failed to transmit copies of medical reports, or failed to
submit full and truthful medical reports of his or her findings, as
required by this title;
(iv) Knowingly made a false statement or representation as to a
material fact in any medical report made under this title or in
testifying or otherwise providing information for the purposes of this
title; or
(v) Refused to appear before, testify, submit to deposition, or
answer a material question of the department, or board of industrial
insurance appeals, or produce a material document concerning his or her
provision of services under this title;
(((b))) (c) The criteria for conducting the examinations, including
guidelines for the appropriate treatment of injured workers during the
examination; and
(((c))) (d) The content of examination reports, including a
requirement that examination reports contain a signed statement
certifying that the report is a full and truthful representation of the
examiner's professional opinion with respect to the injured worker's
condition.
(2) Within the appropriate scope of practice, chiropractors
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW may conduct special medical
examinations to determine permanent disabilities under RCW 51.32.055 in
consultation with physicians licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.
The department, in its discretion, may request that a special medical
examination be conducted by a single chiropractor if the department
determines that the sole issues involved in the examination are within
the scope of practice under chapter 18.25 RCW. However, nothing in
this section authorizes the use as evidence before the board of a
chiropractor's determination of the extent of a worker's permanent
disability if the determination is not requested by the department.
(3) The department must examine the credentials of providers
conducting medical examinations ordered under this title and must
monitor the quality and objectivity of the examinations and examination
reports obtained by the department and self-insured employers. The
department's rules must ensure that examinations ordered under this
title are performed only by qualified providers meeting department
standards.
(4) The department shall investigate the amount of examination fees
received by persons conducting ((special)) medical examinations ((to
determine permanent disabilities)) ordered under this title, including
total compensation received for examinations of department and self-insured claimants, and establish compensation guidelines and
compensation reporting criteria.
(((4))) (5) The department shall investigate the level of
compliance of self-insurers with the requirement of full reporting of
claims information to the department, particularly with respect to
medical examinations, and develop effective enforcement procedures or
recommendations for legislation if needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 51.32.112 is recodified as a new section
in chapter 51.36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 51.32.114 (Medical examination--Department to monitor quality and objectivity) and 1988 c 114 s 3 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act applies to all medical examinations
ordered under Title 51 RCW on or after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---