BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other powers, duties, and functions as
provided under this chapter, the aviation division of the department
shall plan and site new commercial aviation facilities in Washington
state. The responsibility of the division under this subsection is to
make airport siting recommendations and decisions that integrate both
state and regional commercial aviation needs. Accordingly, the
division is not limited to the options examined by the regional or
local authority and may also consider alternative sites outside the
region. In forming its recommendation the authority shall review
existing information and analyses regarding the siting issue. The
division may also hire staff for technical evaluation, analysis, and
research associated with the preparation of its siting recommendations.
The division may also consider relationships between proposed
facilities and other existing or planned transportation facilities of
statewide interest such as airports, rail services, ferry systems, or
highways. Once the division has made a decision, it must inform in
writing the legislative transportation committee, the transportation
committees of the legislature, the transportation commission, the
county or city affected, and the regional transportation planning
organization located in the region in which the commercial aviation
facility will be sited. A decision by the authority binds the state
and each of its political subdivisions, such as departments, agencies,
divisions, bureaus, commissions, boards, counties, cities, towns,
ports, and special districts regarding approval of a site and the
construction and operation of a commercial aviation facility.
(2) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.68 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 1 of this act supersedes other laws for establishing the
location of commercial aviation facilities. However, the requirements
of this chapter, and rules adopted under it, do not supersede the State
Environmental Policy Act, the State Clean Air Act, the State Clean
Water Act, the Shoreline Management Act, the laws relating to solid and
hazardous waste management, and all the related portions of the
Washington Administrative Code that implement these environmental laws.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.68.020 and 1993 c 208 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise:
(1) "Aeronautics" means the science and art of flight and including
but not limited to transportation by aircraft; the operation,
construction, repair, or maintenance of aircraft, aircraft power plants
and accessories, including the repair, packing, and maintenance of
parachutes; the design, establishment, construction, extension,
operation, improvement, repair, or maintenance of airports or air
navigation facilities; and instruction in flying or ground subjects
pertaining thereto.
(2) "Aircraft" means any contrivance now known, or hereafter
invented, used or designed for navigation of or flight in the air.
(3) "Airport" means any area of land or water which is used, or
intended for use, for the landing and take-off of aircraft, and any
appurtenant areas which are used, or intended for use, for airport
buildings or other airport facilities or right-of-way, together with
all airport buildings and facilities located thereon.
(4) "Division" means the aviation division of the state department
of transportation.
(5) "Commercial aviation needs" means facilities and services
necessary for the successful operation of a commercial aviation
operation.
(6) "Department" means the state department of transportation.
(((5))) (7) "Secretary" means the state secretary of
transportation.
(((6))) (8) "State" or "this state" means the state of Washington.
(((7))) (9) "Air navigation facility" means any facility, other
than one owned or operated by the United States, used in, available for
use in, or designed for use in aid of air navigation, including any
structures, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating
systems, or other instrumentalities or devices used or useful as an
aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience, to the safe taking-off, navigation, and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient
operation or maintenance of an airport, and any combination of any or
all of such facilities.
(((8))) (10) "Operation of aircraft" or "operate aircraft" means
the use, navigation, or piloting of aircraft in the airspace over this
state or upon any airport within this state.
(((9))) (11) "Airman or airwoman" means any individual who engages,
as the person in command, or as pilot, mechanic, or member of the crew
in the navigation of aircraft while under way, and any individual who
is directly in charge of the inspection, maintenance, overhauling, or
repair of aircraft engines, airframes, propellers, or appliances, and
any individual who serves in the capacity of aircraft dispatcher or
air-traffic control tower operator; but does not include any individual
employed outside the United States, or any individual employed by a
manufacturer of aircraft, aircraft engines, airframes, propellers, or
appliances to perform duties as inspector or mechanic in connection
therewith, or any individual performing inspection or mechanical duties
in connection with aircraft owned or operated by the person.
(((10))) (12) "Aeronautics instructor" means any individual who for
hire or reward engages in giving instruction or offering to give
instruction in flying or ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics, but
excludes any instructor in a public school, university, or institution
of higher learning duly accredited and approved for carrying on
collegiate work, who instructs in flying or ground subjects pertaining
to aeronautics, while in the performance of his or her duties at such
school, university, or institution.
(((11))) (13) "Air school" means any person who advertises,
represents, or holds out as giving or offering to give instruction in
flying or ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics whether for or
without hire or reward; but excludes any public school, university, or
institution of higher learning duly accredited and approved for
carrying on collegiate work.
(((12))) (14) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or body
politic; and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar
representative thereof.
(((13))) (15) "Municipal" means pertaining to a municipality, and
"municipality" means any county, city, town, authority, district, or
other political subdivision or public corporation of this state.
(((14))) (16) "Airport hazard" means any structure, object of
natural growth, or use of land, which obstructs the airspace required
for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport or is
otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking off.
(((15))) (17) "State airway" means a route in the navigable
airspace over and above the lands or waters of this state, designated
by the department as a route suitable for air navigation.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.200 and 2002 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The comprehensive plan of each county and city that is planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall include a process for identifying and siting
essential public facilities. Essential public facilities include those
facilities that are typically difficult to site, such as airports,
state education facilities and state or regional transportation
facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local correctional
facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient facilities
including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities, group
homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020. Commercial aviation facilities must be sited by the process
set forth under section 1 of this act.
(2) Each county and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process, or amend its
existing process, for identifying and siting essential public
facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary
to provide for the siting of secure community transition facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(3) Any city or county not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process for siting secure
community transition facilities and adopt or amend its development
regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of such facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(4) The office of financial management shall maintain a list of
those essential state public facilities that are required or likely to
be built within the next six years. The office of financial management
may at any time add facilities to the list.
(5) No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may
preclude the siting of essential public facilities.
(6) No person may bring a cause of action for civil damages based
on the good faith actions of any county or city to provide for the
siting of secure community transition facilities in accordance with
this section and with the requirements of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess. For purposes of this subsection, "person" includes, but is
not limited to, any individual, agency as defined in RCW 42.17.020,
corporation, partnership, association, and limited liability entity.
(7) Counties or cities siting facilities pursuant to subsection (2)
or (3) of this section shall comply with RCW 71.09.341.
(8) The failure of a county or city to act by the deadlines
established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section is not:
(a) A condition that would disqualify the county or city for
grants, loans, or pledges under RCW 43.155.070 or 70.146.070;
(b) A consideration for grants or loans provided under RCW
43.17.250(2); or
(c) A basis for any petition under RCW 36.70A.280 or for any
private cause of action.

--- END ---