BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In criminal and juvenile offense proceedings where independent
proof of the corpus delicti is absent, and the alleged victim of the
crime is incompetent to testify or is otherwise legally unavailable to
testify, a lawfully obtained and otherwise admissible confession,
admission, or other statement of the defendant shall be admissible into
evidence if there is substantial independent evidence that would tend
to establish the trustworthiness of the confession, admission, or other
statement of the defendant.
(2) In determining whether there is substantial independent
evidence that the confession, admission, or other statement of the
defendant is trustworthy, the court shall consider, but is not limited
to:
(a) Whether there is any evidence corroborating or contradicting
the facts set out in the statement;
(b) The character of the witness reporting the statement;
(c) The number of witnesses to the statement;
(d) Whether a record of the statement was made and the timing of
the making of the record in relation to the making of the statement;
and/or
(e) The relationship between the witness and the defendant.
(3) Where the court finds that the confession, admission, or other
statement of the defendant is sufficiently trustworthy to be admitted,
the court shall issue a written order setting forth the rationale for
admission.
(4) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent the
defendant from arguing to the jury or judge in a bench trial that the
statement is not trustworthy or that the evidence is otherwise
insufficient to convict.

--- END ---