BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the social and
health care delivery systems maintained by the department of social and
health services operate as distinct funding sources for services
delivered at the community level. This results in local government
establishing separate and distinct administrative organizations arrayed
around the source of funding provided by the state. The legislature
intends to support local initiatives that attempt to integrate social
and health services, streamline and reduce administrative costs, and
establish new organizational entities that provide faster, smarter, and
more efficient social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall consider
proposals from counties or groups of counties to design a new
administrative and service delivery infrastructure for supporting and
managing social and health services provided by the county or group of
counties. Each proposal shall be for a five-year pilot project. Each
proposal must include an integrated total population management system
utilizing a public service corporation or a nonprofit corporation as
the administrative service organization with which the county or group
of counties shall contract for the organization of services provided by
the county or group of counties. The services to be included in the
pilot project may include, but are not limited to, mental health,
substance abuse, and developmental disabilities, but the services are
limited to those services already provided by the county or group of
counties.
(2) The proposal must address regulatory oversight, risk
management, compliance monitoring, service authorization, and care
management. It shall also cover the following administrative
functions:
(a) Provider network development and management;
(b) Access to care;
(c) Appeals and grievance management;
(d) Adequate social service array;
(e) Customer service;
(f) Quality management;
(g) Information system management; and
(h) Fiscal management.
(3) Upon approval of a proposal considered under this section, the
department of social and health services shall consolidate all
contracts with the county or group of counties for services provided by
the county or group of counties.
(4) Nothing in this section shall permit decategorization of funds
created under this section. The authority of the agency designated by
the county or counties shall be limited to administrative and fiscal
management of funds.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the authority
of the family policy council or community networks under chapter 70.190
RCW. The department shall advise the family policy council upon
receipt of a proposal under subsection (1) of this section.
(5) The department of social and health services shall submit
proposed changes in statute and operating budget procedures to the
legislature by January 15, 2004, to implement the proposals considered
under this section.

--- END ---