BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature makes the following
findings:
(a) The 1987 legislature approved a new parenting act based on a
forty-page intent section titled "Replacing the Concept of Child
Custody - Commentary and Text," and this positive legislative action
was based on:
(i) A desire to update family law practices to be more reflective
of our current social practices and desires involving each parent with
their children of divorce;
(ii) A belief that use of statutory terms "child custody" and
"visitation" was outdated as children were not currently seen as
visitors to their second parents, and general practices too often
reflected a "win-lose" adversarial process, and in too many cases the
children were seemingly also divorced from the second parent;
(iii) Social science research had determined that in most cases,
but certainly not all, it was in the best interest of the children,
emotionally, psychologically, physically, and financially, to have an
active relationship with both parents, although legal system maintained
the old practices of limiting the children to "every other weekend"
with the second parent in nearly eighty percent of the cases;
(iv) There was a new belief that family law had to move away from
a notion of parents fighting to reestablish parental rights in a
divorce, a new reality needed to be instituted that placed a "duty" on
parents to remain involved in their children's lives, and parenting
plan documents were created to reflect a more accurate distribution of
parenting responsibilities based on actual parenting practices rather
than the previous "winner take all" approach that included
disproportionate parenting responsibilities and disregarded the
importance of parental involvement of the second parent; and
(v) Courthouse practices were previously based on limited knowledge
of the social research relating to children of divorce and it was
obvious that "every other weekend" was an easy court order to write
based on the previous reality that most primary working parents were
employed for five-day work weeks. It was necessary to create parenting
plan documents that required detailed specific residential schedules to
move away from almost automatic orders placing children with the second
parent on an every other weekend schedule;
(b) The Washington supreme court in 1999 researched permanent
parenting plan documents and found an unjustifiable number of decisions
where the second parent was still arbitrarily limited to every-other-weekend residential schedules with their children; and
(c) The various institutions with an interest in family law have
failed to develop better processes to provide for a better and more
effective, and less adversarial, distribution of parenting time between
mothers and fathers to share the upbringing of their children of
divorce.
(2) The legislature intends to give direction to our judicial
system to ensure better outcomes for children of divorce and assure the
continuing involvement of each parent.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.09.187 and 1989 c 375 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS. The court shall not order a
dispute resolution process, except court action, when it finds that any
limiting factor under RCW 26.09.191 applies, or when it finds that
either parent is unable to afford the cost of the proposed dispute
resolution process. If a dispute resolution process is not precluded
or limited, then in designating such a process the court shall consider
all relevant factors, including:
(a) Differences between the parents that would substantially
inhibit their effective participation in any designated process;
(b) The parents' wishes or agreements and, if the parents have
entered into agreements, whether the agreements were made knowingly and
voluntarily; and
(c) Differences in the parents' financial circumstances that may
affect their ability to participate fully in a given dispute resolution
process.
(2) ALLOCATION OF DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY.
(a) AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES. The court shall approve
agreements of the parties allocating decision-making authority, or
specifying rules in the areas listed in RCW 26.09.184(4)(a), when it
finds that:
(i) The agreement is consistent with any limitations on a parent's
decision-making authority mandated by RCW 26.09.191; and
(ii) The agreement is knowing and voluntary.
(b) SOLE DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. The court shall order sole
decision-making to one parent when it finds that:
(i) A limitation on the other parent's decision-making authority is
mandated by RCW 26.09.191;
(ii) Both parents are opposed to mutual decision making;
(iii) One parent is opposed to mutual decision making, and such
opposition is reasonable based on the criteria in (c) of this
subsection((;)).
(c) MUTUAL DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. Except as provided in (a)
and (b) of this subsection, the court shall consider the following
criteria in allocating decision-making authority:
(i) The existence of a limitation under RCW 26.09.191;
(ii) The history of participation of each parent in decision making
in each of the areas in RCW 26.09.184(4)(a);
(iii) Whether the parents have a demonstrated ability and desire to
cooperate with one another in decision making in each of the areas in
RCW 26.09.184(4)(a); and
(iv) The parents' geographic proximity to one another, to the
extent that it affects their ability to make timely mutual decisions.
(3) RESIDENTIAL PROVISIONS.
(a) The court shall make residential provisions for each child
which encourage each parent to maintain a loving, stable, and nurturing
relationship with the child, consistent with the child's developmental
level and the family's social and economic circumstances. The child's
residential schedule shall be consistent with RCW 26.09.191. There is
a presumption that the child's residential schedule shall include at
least one-third of a year in which the child resides with or is under
the actual, direct, day-to-day care and supervision of each of the
parents.
Where the limitations of RCW 26.09.191 are not dispositive of the
child's residential schedule, the court shall consider the following
factors:
(i) The relative strength, nature, and stability of the child's
relationship with each parent((, including));
(ii) Whether a parent has taken greater responsibility for
performing parenting functions relating to the daily needs of the
child;
(((ii))) (iii) The agreements of the parties, provided they were
entered into knowingly and voluntarily;
(((iii))) (iv) Each parent's past and potential for future
performance of parenting functions;
(((iv))) (v) The emotional needs and developmental level of the
child;
(((v))) (vi) The child's relationship with siblings and with other
significant adults, as well as the child's involvement with his or her
physical surroundings, school, or other significant activities;
(((vi))) (vii) The wishes of the parents and the wishes of a child
who is sufficiently mature to express reasoned and independent
preferences as to his or her residential schedule; and
(((vii))) (viii) Each parent's employment schedule, and shall make
accommodations consistent with those schedules.
Factor (i) shall be given the greatest weight.
(b) The court may order that a child frequently alternate his or
her residence between the households of the parents for brief and
substantially equal intervals of time only if the court finds the
following:
(i) No limitation exists under RCW 26.09.191;
(ii)(A) The parties have agreed to such provisions and the
agreement was knowingly and voluntarily entered into; or
(B) The parties have a satisfactory history of cooperation and
shared performance of parenting functions; the parties are available to
each other, especially in geographic proximity, to the extent necessary
to ensure their ability to share performance of the parenting
functions; and
(iii) The provisions are in the best interests of the child.

--- END ---