BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Until July 1, 2005, the sentence of death for anyone sentenced
under RCW 10.95.030(2) shall be stayed.
(2) A death penalty task force is hereby created for the purpose of
conducting a review of the existing statutes and court rules to
determine the following:
(a) The adequacy of the counsel and resources provided defendants
in capital offense cases;
(b) The uniformity of decision making by prosecuting attorneys in
terms of charging defendants with aggravated first degree murder and
the criteria in such decisions;
(c) The impact of race, ethnicity, gender, and economic status on
the likelihood of a defendant being charged with aggravated first
degree murder; and
(d) Whether there are revisions to existing statutes and court
rules which, if implemented, would decrease the likelihood of an
inappropriate imposition of the death penalty.
(3) The task force shall consist of eleven members. The membership
shall be appointed as follows:
(a) Two members appointed by the chief justice of the state supreme
court;
(b) Two members appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) Two members appointed by the speaker of the house;
(d) Two members appointed by the governor;
(e) Three members appointed by the president of the Washington
state bar association. Not more than one member shall be a current or
former prosecuting attorney. Not more than one member shall be an
attorney whose practice is primarily criminal defense and who has
experience in death penalty cases.
(4) The task force may conduct meetings, select officers, and
prescribe rules of procedure. The task force shall cooperate, act, and
function with legislative committees and executive agencies as
necessary to complete its business.
(5) Members of the task force shall serve without additional
compensation, but must be reimbursed for their travel expenses, in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 44.04.120, incurred while attending
meetings of the task force, engaged on other task force business
authorized by the task force, or going to and coming from task force
meetings.
(6) The task force shall make a report, together with any
recommendations, to the legislature, governor, and supreme court not
later than January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2004, from the general fund to the office of the
administrator for the courts for the purposes of providing staffing and
support to the death penalty task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2005.

--- END ---