BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.630 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 24 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) All machinery and equipment owned by a farmer that is personal
property is exempt from property taxes levied for any state purpose if
it is used exclusively in growing and producing agricultural products
during the calendar year for which the claim for exemption is made.
(2) The legislative authority of a county may exempt all machinery
and equipment owned by a farmer that is personal property and used
exclusively in growing and producing agricultural products during the
calendar year in which the claim for exemption is made from the county
property tax under RCW 84.52.043(1). If the county legislative
authority has exempted machinery and equipment under this subsection
(2), the county cannot disallow the exemption at a later time. The
property that may be exempted under this subsection (2) must be the
same property exempted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) "Farmer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.213.
(((3))) (4) A claim for the exemptions under subsections (1) and
(2) of this section shall be filed with the county assessor together
with the verified statement required under RCW 84.40.190, for exemption
from taxes payable the following year. The claim shall be made solely
upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

--- END ---