BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.06.020 and 1996 c 301 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a transaction for the sale of residential ((real)) property,
the seller shall, unless the buyer has expressly waived the right to
receive the disclosure statement, or unless the transfer is exempt
under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to the buyer a completed ((real property
transfer)) seller disclosure statement in the following format and that
contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER
Please complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If
the question clearly does not apply to the property write "NA". If the
answer is "yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets.
Please refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide
your explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each
page of this disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the
disclosure statement must occur not later than five business days,
unless otherwise agreed, after mutual acceptance of a written contract
to purchase between a buyer and a seller.

NOTICE TO THE BUYER
THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES ARE MADE BY ((THE SELLER(S), CONCERNING))
SELLER ABOUT THE CONDITION OF THE PROPERTY LOCATED AT . . . . . . . . . . . .
("THE PROPERTY"), OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

((DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON THE
BASIS OF)) SELLER MAKES THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES OF EXISTING MATERIAL
FACTS OR MATERIAL DEFECTS THAT ARE NOT APPARENT OR READILY
ASCERTAINABLE TO BUYER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE
PROPERTY AT THE TIME ((THIS DISCLOSURE FORM IS COMPLETED BY THE
SELLER.)) SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. UNLESS YOU AND
SELLER OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, YOU HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS((,
UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED, FROM THE SELLER'S DELIVERY OF THIS SELLER'S))
FROM THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT TO YOU TO RESCIND ((YOUR)) THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING ((YOUR
SEPARATE)) A SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO ((THE
SELLER, UNLESS YOU WAIVE THIS RIGHT)) SELLER. YOU MAY, HOWEVER, WAIVE
THE RIGHT TO RESCIND AT OR PRIOR TO ((ENTERING)) THE TIME YOU ENTER
INTO A SALE AGREEMENT.

THE FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY ((THE)) SELLER AND ARE NOT THE
REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY. THIS
INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF
ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN ((THE)) BUYER AND ((THE)) SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS
PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF ((A
QUALIFIED SPECIALIST TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY ON YOUR BEHALF, FOR
EXAMPLE)) QUALIFIED EXPERTS TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE,
WITHOUT LIMITATION, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS,
ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, OR PEST AND DRY ROT
INSPECTORS. THE PROSPECTIVE BUYER AND ((THE OWNER)) SELLER MAY WISH TO
OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR INSPECTIONS OF THE PROPERTY ((AND)) OR TO
PROVIDE ((FOR)) APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT BETWEEN THEM WITH
RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE, INSPECTION, DEFECTS OR WARRANTIES.

Seller . . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the property.

I. SELLER'S DISCLOSURES:

*If (("Yes" attach a copy or explain)) you answer "Yes" to a question with an asterisk
(*), please explain your answer and attach documents, if available and not otherwise
publicly recorded. If necessary, use an attached sheet.

1. TITLE

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Do you have legal authority to sell
the property? If no, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is title to the property subject to
any of the following?

(1) First right of refusal

(2) Option

(3) Lease or rental agreement

(4) Life estate?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any encroachments,
boundary agreements, or boundary
disputes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any rights of way,
easements, or access limitations that
may affect the ((owner's)) Buyer's use
of the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any written agreements
for joint maintenance of an easement or
right of way?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Is there any study, survey project,
or notice that would adversely affect the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Are there any pending or existing
assessments against the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there any zoning violations,
nonconforming uses, or any unusual
restrictions on the ((subject)) property
that would affect future construction or
remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Is there a boundary survey for the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Are there any covenants,
conditions, or restrictions which affect
the property?

2. WATER

A. Household Water

(1) The source of ((the)) water for
the property is:
[ ] Private or publicly owned water
system
[ ] Private well serving only the
subject property . . . . . .
*[ ] Other water system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *If shared, are there any written
agreements?

(([ ] Public [ ] Community
[ ] Private [ ] Shared

(2) Water source information:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *a. Are there any written
agreements for shared water
source?))

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*b.)) *(2) Is there an
easement (recorded or
unrecorded) for access to
and/or maintenance of the
water source?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*c.)) *(3) Are there any
known problems or repairs
needed?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*d. Does)) (4) During your
ownership, has the source
((provide)) provided an
adequate year round supply of
potable water? If no, please
explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*(3))) *(5) Are there any water
treatment systems for the property?
If yes, are they [ ]Leased [ ]Owned

B. Irrigation

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Are there any water rights for
the property, such as a water right,
permit, certificate, or claim?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*(2) If they exist, to your
knowledge,)) *(a) If yes, have the
water rights been used during the
last ((five-year period)) five years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*(3))) *(b) If so, is the certificate
available?

C. Outdoor Sprinkler System

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Is there an outdoor sprinkler
system for the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*(2))) (2) If yes, are there any
defects in the ((outdoor sprinkler))
system? . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) If yes, is the sprinkler system
connected to irrigation water?

3. SEWER/SEPTIC SYSTEM

A. The property is served by: [ ] Public
sewer main, [ ] Septic ((tank)) system
(including pipes, tanks, drainfields, and
all other component parts) [ ] Other
disposal system (((describe))) Please
describe:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. If the property is served by a public
or community sewer main, is the house
connected to the main? If no, please
explain.

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know C. Is the property ((currently subject to
a sewer capacity charge)) subject to any
additional sewer or septic system fees
or charges in addition to those covered
in your regularly billed sewer or septic
system statement?

D. If the property is connected to a
septic system:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(1) Was a permit issued for its
construction, and was it approved
by the city or county following its
construction?

(2) When was it last pumped:

. . . . . . . . . . . . ((, 19)). . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Are there any defects in the
operation of the septic system?

[ ] Don't know (4) When was it last inspected?

. . . . . . . . . . . . ((, 19)). . .

By Whom: . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Don't know (5) For how many bedrooms was
the septic system approved ((for))?

. . . . . . . . . . . . bedrooms

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*E. Do)) E. Are all plumbing
fixtures, including laundry drain, ((go))
connected to the septic/sewer system?
If no, please explain: . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. ((Are you aware of)) Have there
been any changes or repairs to the septic
system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know G. Is the septic ((tank)) system,
including the drainfield, located entirely
within the boundaries of the property?
If no, please explain.

. . . . . . . . . . . .

NOTICE: IF THIS RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT IS BEING COMPLETED FOR NEW CONSTRUCTION WHICH
HAS NEVER BEEN OCCUPIED, THE SELLER IS NOT REQUIRED TO
COMPLETE THE QUESTIONS LISTED IN ITEM 4. STRUCTURAL OR ITEM
5. SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

4. STRUCTURAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. During your ownership, has the
roof leaked?

(([ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know If yes, has it been repaired?))

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. During your ownership, has the
basement flooded or leaked?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. During your ownership, have there
been any conversions, additions, or
remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*1.)) *(1) If yes, were all
building permits obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*2.)) *(2) If yes, were all final
inspections obtained?

(([ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know C. Do you know the age of the house?
If yes, year of original construction:

. . . . . . . . . . . . ))

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. ((Do you know of)) During your
ownership, has there been any settling,
slippage, or sliding of ((either the house
or other structures/improvements
located on the property? If yes,
explain:)) the property or its
improvements?

(( . . . . . . . . . . . . ))

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. ((Do you know of)) Are there any
defects with the following: (If yes,
please check applicable items and
explain.)

□ Foundations
□ Decks
□ Exterior Walls

□ Chimneys □ Interior Walls □ Fire Alarm

□ Doors □ Windows □ Patio

□ Ceilings □ Slab Floors □ Driveways

□ Pools □ Hot Tub □ Sauna

□ Sidewalks □ Outbuildings □ Fireplaces

□ Garage Floors □ Walkways □ Siding

□ Other □ Wood Stoves

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. ((Was a pest or dry rot, structural or
"whole house" inspection done? When
and by whom was the inspection
completed? . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Since assuming ownership, has
your property had a problem with wood
destroying organisms and/or have there
been any problems with pest control,
infestations, or vermin?)) During your
ownership, has the property had any dry
rot or pest infestation?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know G. Is the attic insulated?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know H. Is the basement insulated?

5. SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

((If)) *A. If any of the following
systems or fixtures are included with
the transfer, ((do they have any existing
defects:)) are there any defects? If yes,
please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*A.)) Electrical system,
including wiring, switches, outlets,
and service

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*B.)) Plumbing system,
including pipes, faucets, fixtures,
and toilets

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*C.)) Hot water tank

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*D.)) Garbage disposal

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*E.)) Appliances

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*F.)) Sump pump

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*G.)) Heating and cooling
systems

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know ((*H.)) Security system
[ ] Owned [ ] Leased

((*I.)) Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

*B. If any of the following fixtures
or property is included with the
transfer, are they leased? (If yes,
please attach copy of lease.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Security system . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Tanks (type): . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Satellite dish . . . . . .
Other: . . . . . .

6. COMMON INTERESTS

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Is there a Home Owners'
Association? Name of Association
. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Are there regular periodic
assessments:

$. . . per [ ] Month [ ] Year
[ ] Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any pending special
assessments?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any shared "common
areas" or any joint maintenance
agreements (facilities such as walls,
fences, landscaping, pools, tennis
courts, walkways, or other areas co-owned in undivided interest with
others)?

7. GENERAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. ((Is there any settling, soil,
standing water, or)) During your
ownership, have there been any
drainage problems on the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Does the property contain fill
material?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Is there any material damage to the
property ((or any of the structure)) from
fire, wind, floods, beach movements,
earthquake, expansive soils, or
landslides?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Is the property in a designated flood
plain?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any substances,
materials, or products on the property
that may be ((an)) environmental
((hazard such as, but not limited to,))
limitations, such as asbestos,
formaldehyde, radon gas, lead-based
paint, fuel or chemical storage tanks,
((and)) or contaminated soil or water
((on the subject property))?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any tanks or underground
storage tanks (e.g., chemical, fuel, etc.)
on the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Has the property ever been used as
an illegal drug manufacturing site?

8. MANUFACTURED AND
MOBILE HOMES

If the property includes a manufactured
or mobile home,

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Did you make any alterations to
the home? If yes, please describe the
alterations: . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Did any previous owner make any
alterations to the home? If yes, please
describe the alterations: . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. If alterations were made, were
permits or variances for these
alterations obtained?

((8.)) 9. FULL DISCLOSURE BY
SELLERS

A. Other conditions or defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any other existing material
defects affecting ((this)) the property
((or its value that a prospective buyer
should know about)) that are not
apparent or readily ascertainable to
Buyer?

B. Verification:

The foregoing answers and attached
explanations (if any) are complete and
correct to the best of my/our knowledge
and I/we have received a copy hereof.
I/we authorize all of my/our real estate
licensees, if any, to deliver a copy of
this disclosure statement to other real
estate licensees and all prospective
buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .

II. BUYER'S ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A. ((As buyer(s), I/we acknowledge the)) Buyer hereby
acknowledges that: Buyer has a duty to pay diligent attention
to any material defects ((which)) that are known to ((me/us))
Buyer or can be known to ((me/us)) Buyer by utilizing diligent
attention and observation.

B. ((Each buyer acknowledges and understands that)) The
disclosures set forth in this statement and in any amendments
to this statement are made only by the Seller and not by any
real estate licensee or other party.

C. Buyer acknowledges that, pursuant to RCW 64.06.050(2), real
estate licensees are not liable for inaccurate information
provided by Seller, except to the extent that real estate
licensees know of such inaccurate information.

D. This information is for disclosure only and is not intended to
be a part of the written agreement between the Buyer and
Seller.

E. Buyer (which term includes all persons signing the "Buyer's
acceptance" portion of this disclosure statement below)
((hereby acknowledges receipt of)) has received a copy of this
Disclosure Statement (including attachments, if any) bearing
Seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS ((FORM)) DISCLOSURE STATEMENT ARE
PROVIDED BY ((THE)) SELLER BASED ON ((THE BASIS OF)) SELLER'S ACTUAL
KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME ((OF DISCLOSURE. YOU, THE
BUYER,)) SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT, UNLESS BUYER AND
SELLER OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, BUYER SHALL HAVE THREE BUSINESS
DAYS((, UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED, FROM THE SELLER'S DELIVERY OF THIS
SELLER'S)) FROM THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO RESCIND ((YOUR)) THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING
((YOUR SEPARATE SIGNED)) A SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF
RESCISSION TO ((THE)) SELLER ((UNLESS YOU WAIVE THIS RIGHT OF
RESCISSION)). BUYER MAY, HOWEVER, WAIVE THE RIGHT TO RESCIND AT OR
PRIOR TO THE TIME BUYER ENTERS INTO A PURCHASE AND SALE AGREEMENT.
BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS ((REAL PROPERTY
TRANSFER)) DISCLOSURE STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES
MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE OF THE SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE
LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
DATE . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . . . .

(2) If the disclosure statement is being completed for new
construction which has never been occupied, the disclosure statement is
not required to contain and the seller is not required to complete the
questions listed in item 4. Structural or item 5. Systems and
Fixtures.
(3) The ((real property transfer)) seller disclosure statement
shall be for disclosure only, and shall not be considered part of any
written agreement between the buyer and seller of residential ((real))
property. The ((real property transfer)) seller disclosure statement
shall be only a disclosure made by the seller, and not any real estate
licensee involved in the transaction, and shall not be construed as a
warranty of any kind by the seller or any real estate licensee involved
in the transaction.

--- END ---