BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.14.010 and 2002 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "City" means either (a) a city or town with a population of at
least thirty thousand or (b) the largest city or town, if there is no
city or town with a population of at least ((thirty)) fifteen thousand,
located in a county planning under the growth management act.
(2) "Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of
a city having jurisdiction over the property for which an exemption may
be applied for under this chapter.
(3) "Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.
(4) "Multiple-unit housing" means a building having four or more
dwelling units not designed or used as transient accommodations and not
including hotels and motels. Multifamily units may result from new
construction or rehabilitated or conversion of vacant, underutilized,
or substandard buildings to multifamily housing.
(5) "Owner" means the property owner of record.
(6) "Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit housing that
provides either rental or owner occupancy on a nontransient basis.
This includes owner-occupied or rental accommodation that is leased for
a period of at least one month. This excludes hotels and motels that
predominately offer rental accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.
(7) "Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to existing
structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that are made
to achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing building
codes or modification to existing occupied structures which increase
the number of multifamily housing units.
(8) "Residential targeted area" means an area within an urban
center that has been designated by the governing authority as a
residential targeted area in accordance with this chapter.
(9) "Substantial compliance" means compliance with local building
or housing code requirements that are typically required for
rehabilitation as opposed to new construction.
(10) "Urban center" means a compact identifiable district where
urban residents may obtain a variety of products and services. An
urban center must contain:
(a) Several existing or previous, or both, business establishments
that may include but are not limited to shops, offices, banks,
restaurants, governmental agencies;
(b) Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks,
lighting, transit, domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; and
(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing,
recreation, and cultural activities in association with either
commercial or office, or both, use.

--- END ---