BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature intends to:
(1) Provide direction to the department of ecology and to
municipalities regarding the development and implementation of phase
two of the federal clean water act's national pollutant discharge
elimination system permit program in Washington;
(2) Recognize the eastern Washington stakeholder process for
developing a storm water manual and direct the department of ecology to
work within that process when implementing the phase two program in
eastern Washington; and
(3) Establish a stakeholder process to assist the department of
ecology in identifying and addressing issues related to developing and
implementing the federal national pollutant discharge elimination
system permit programs in western Washington and to advise and assist
the department as it drafts these permits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 STANDARDS FOR MUNICIPAL SEPARATE STORM SEWER
SYSTEM PERMITS. (1) In accordance with federal and state law, permits
for municipal separate storm sewer systems shall require the
development, implementation, and enforcement of storm water management
programs designed to reduce the discharge of pollutants to the maximum
extent practicable to satisfy the requirements of the federal clean
water act. Permits issued to municipalities subject to federal
regulations implementing phase two of the national pollutant discharge
elimination system permit program shall include the following minimum
control measures:
(a) Public education and outreach on storm water impacts;
(b) Public involvement and participation;
(c) Illicit discharge detection and elimination;
(d) Construction site runoff control;
(e) Postconstruction storm water management in new development and
redevelopment; and
(f) Pollution prevention and good housekeeping for municipal
operations.
(2) For municipal separate storm sewer system permits, the
reduction of pollutants to the maximum extent practicable means the
technically sound and financially responsible, nonnumeric criteria
applicable to all municipal storm water discharges through the
implementation of best management practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 WESTERN WASHINGTON PERMIT DEVELOPMENT
ADVISORY GROUP. (1) The department shall establish a permit
development advisory group for western Washington to advise and assist
the department regarding permits for municipal separate storm sewer
systems. The permit development advisory group shall:
(a) Review and address the issues specified in section 5 of this
act and any other issues regarding municipal separate storm sewer
systems for which the department requests advice and assistance; and
(b) Advise and assist the department in drafting a permit or
permits for municipal separate storm sewer systems in western
Washington as required by federal regulations implementing phase two of
the national pollutant discharge elimination system permit program
under the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.).
(2) The permit development advisory group may include up to
eighteen members. The members of the permit development advisory group
selected by the department shall include, but are not limited to, a
representative or representatives of:
(a) Counties and cities that have obtained and are operating under
a municipal separate storm sewer system permit issued under phase one
of the federal national pollutant discharge elimination system permit
program;
(b) Counties and cities that will be required to obtain a municipal
separate storm sewer system permit issued under phase two of the
federal national pollutant discharge elimination system permit program;
(c) State agencies with expertise and interest in storm water
management issues, such as the Puget Sound action team and the
departments of transportation, natural resources, and fish and
wildlife;
(d) Ports;
(e) Realtors and developers;
(f) Business;
(g) Shellfish growers; and
(h) Environmental organizations.
(3) The department shall invite and encourage members of the
legislature with interest in storm water management to participate in
the permit development advisory group. Legislative members who do
participate shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
44.04.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 EASTERN WASHINGTON PERMIT DEVELOPMENT. The
department shall develop a municipal separate storm water system permit
or permits that address the issues and needs of municipalities
operating these systems in eastern Washington. The department shall
use the advisory group it has established in eastern Washington to
develop a storm water management manual to advise and assist the
department regarding permits for municipal separate storm sewer systems
to be issued in eastern Washington. The eastern Washington advisory
group shall:
(1) Review and address the issues specified in section 5 of this
act as they pertain to eastern Washington and any other issues
regarding municipal separate storm sewer systems for which the
department requests advice and assistance; and
(2) Assist and advise the department in drafting a permit or
permits for municipal separate storm sewer systems in eastern
Washington as required by federal regulations implementing phase two of
the national pollutant discharge elimination system permit program
under the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 PERMIT DEVELOPMENT ISSUES. (1) No later
than nine months after the effective date of this section, the permit
development advisory group for western Washington established in
section 3 of this act and the eastern Washington storm water management
group identified in section 4 of this act shall review and make
recommendations to the department regarding the development of permits
for municipal separate storm sewer systems. Issues considered by these
groups shall include the:
(a) Types of discharges being regulated under these permits;
(b) Areas being regulated by these permits under phases one and two
of the federal national pollutant discharge elimination system permit
program as they relate to municipal borders;
(c) Issuance of these permits on a watershed basis;
(d) Integration of permits and permit requirements for phase one
and phase two of the federal national pollutant discharge elimination
system permit program;
(e) Issuance of a separate permit or permits for phase two
municipalities not adjacent to a phase one municipality and not
interconnected with a separate storm sewer system of a municipality
permitted under phase one;
(f) Application of these permits to ground water discharges;
(g) Level of effort required of municipalities to satisfy permit
requirements regarding:
(i) Public education and outreach;
(ii) Public participation and public involvement;
(iii) Illicit discharge detection and elimination;
(iv) Construction site runoff control;
(v) Postconstruction runoff control;
(vi) Pollution prevention and good housekeeping;
(vii) Implementation of applicable total maximum daily loads; and
(viii) Program evaluation and reporting;
(h) Protection for shellfish areas;
(i) Use of land use planning and existing land use plans and
regulations as a best management practice for storm water management;
and
(j) Potential funding sources for implementation of permit
requirements.
(2) During the development of permits according to this chapter,
the permit development advisory group for western Washington
established in section 3 of this act and the eastern Washington
advisory group identified in section 4 of this act shall advise and
assist the department in developing a menu of best management practices
as required under the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et
seq.). These groups also shall review and provide advice and
assistance on the draft permits as they are developed. In addition,
these groups shall identify whether the elements of these permits are
required by federal law, by state law, or by both federal and state
law. These groups shall consider the costs and benefits associated
with each permit element not required under federal law and make
recommendations to the legislature regarding whether it is feasible,
necessary, and cost-effective to exceed federal clean water act
requirements for such elements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 REPORTS TO THE LEGISLATURE. (1) The
department shall submit a report regarding the recommendations of the
western Washington permit development advisory group established in
section 3 of this act and the eastern Washington advisory group
identified in section 4 of this act to the appropriate committees of
the legislature. In reporting on these groups' progress, the
department shall identify the recommendations made by these groups,
list the issues upon which the members of these groups were not able to
reach agreement, and reflect the comments of all members of these
groups. The department also shall identify any legislative
recommendations from these groups or from the department based on the
work of these groups.
(2) After the permits are developed according to the process
specified in sections 3 and 4 of this act, the department shall submit
a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
regarding these permits and the work of the advisory groups. The
department also shall identify any legislative recommendations from
these groups or from the department based on the work of these groups.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 3 through 6 of this act expire June
30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 90.48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---