BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
state department of transportation should focus on its core ferry
mission of moving automobiles on Washington state's marine highways.
The legislature finds that current statutes impose barriers to entities
other than the state operating passenger-only ferries. The legislature
intends to lift those barriers to allow entities other than the state
to provide passenger-only ferry service. The legislature finds that
the provision of this service and the improvement in the mobility of
the citizens of Washington state is legally adequate consideration for
the use of state facilities in conjunction with the provision of the
service, and the legislature finds that allowing the operators of
passenger-only ferries to use state facilities on the basis of legally
adequate consideration does not evince donative intent on the part of
the legislature.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.60.120 and 1993 c 427 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the department acquires or constructs, maintains, and
operates any ferry crossings upon or toll bridges over Puget Sound or
any of its tributary or connecting waters, there shall not be
constructed, operated, or maintained any other ferry crossing upon or
bridge over any such waters within ten miles of any such crossing or
bridge operated or maintained by the department excepting such bridges
or ferry crossings in existence, and being operated and maintained
under a lawfully issued franchise at the time of the location of the
ferry crossing or construction of the toll bridge by the department.
(2) The ten-mile distance in subsection (1) of this section means
ten statute miles measured by airline distance. The ten-mile
restriction shall be applied by comparing the two end points (termini)
of a state ferry crossing to those of a private ferry crossing.
(3) The Washington utilities and transportation commission may,
upon written petition of a commercial ferry operator certificated or
applying for certification under chapter 81.84 RCW, and upon notice and
hearing, grant a waiver from the ten-mile restriction. The waiver must
not be detrimental to the public interest. In making a decision to
waive the ten-mile restriction, the commission shall consider, but is
not limited to, the impact of the waiver on transportation congestion
mitigation, air quality improvement, and the overall impact on the
Washington state ferry system. The commission shall act upon a request
for a waiver within ninety days after the conclusion of the hearing.
A waiver is effective for a period of five years from the date of
issuance. At the end of five years the waiver becomes permanent unless
appealed within thirty days by the commission on its own motion, the
department, or an interested party.
(4) The department shall not maintain and operate any ferry
crossing or toll bridge over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or
connecting waters that would infringe upon any franchise lawfully
issued by the state and in existence and being exercised at the time of
the location of the ferry crossing or toll bridge by the department,
without first acquiring the rights granted to such franchise holder
under the franchise.
(5) This section does not apply to operators of passenger-only
ferry service.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.64.090 and 1983 c 15 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If any party assumes the operation and maintenance of any ferry
or ferry system by rent, lease, or charter from the department of
transportation, such party shall assume and be bound by all the
provisions herein and any agreement or contract for such operation of
any ferry or ferry system entered into by the department shall provide
that the wages to be paid, hours of employment, working conditions and
seniority rights of employees will be established by the marine
employees' commission in accordance with the terms and provisions of
this chapter and it shall further provide that all labor disputes shall
be adjudicated in accordance with chapter 47.64 RCW.
(2) The department of transportation shall make its terminal, dock,
and pier space available to operators of passenger-only ferries if the
space can be made available without limiting the operation of car
ferries operated by the department. The department may not charge any
lease, rent, or fee in excess of fair market value.

--- END ---