BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The United States food and drug
administration's food code incorporates the most recent food science
and technology. The code is regularly updated in consultation with the
states, the scientific community, and the food service industry. The
food and drug administration's food code provides consistency for food
service regulations, and it serves as a model for many states' food
service rules. It is the legislature's intent that the state board of
health use the United States food and drug administration's food code
as guidance when developing food service rules for this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The state board shall consider the most recent version of the
United States food and drug administration's food code for the purpose
of adopting rules for food service.

--- END ---