BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.050 and 2002 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7) and 82.04.290.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of coin-operated laundry facilities
when such facilities are situated in an apartment house, rooming house,
or mobile home park for the exclusive use of the tenants thereof, and
also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and
all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4) The term shall also include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property to consumers and the rental of equipment with an
operator.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of telephone service,
as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of canned software other
than a sale to a person who presents a resale certificate under RCW
82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user, but
shall not include custom software or the customization of canned
software.
(7) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(8) The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(9) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.
(10) Until July 1, ((2003)) 2007, the term shall not include the
sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered for
environmental remedial action as defined in RCW 82.04.2635(2).

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.190 and 2002 c 367 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal property
in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such property
as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving,
constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for
consumers or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale a new
article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale or (d) purchases for the purpose of
consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary
purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any
telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for resale in
the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases, acquires,
or uses any service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) or any amusement and
recreation service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other than for
resale in the regular course of business; and (d) any person who is an
end user of software;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of
way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in
or upon the right of way of such street, place, road, highway,
easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the
meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other
structure by such person;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer";
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and development;
and
(9) Until July 1, ((2003)) 2007, any person engaged in the business
of conducting environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2).

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.2635 and 2001 c 320 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
environmental remedial action, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the value of the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate 0.471 percent.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, "environmental remedial action"
means:
(a) Those services related to the identification, investigation, or
cleanup arising out of the release or threatened release of hazardous
substances that are conducted under contract with the department of
ecology or under an enforcement order, agreed order, or consent decree
executed by the department of ecology, or those services, when
evaluated as a whole, that are the substantial equivalent of a
department of ecology-conducted or supervised remedial action under the
model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW; or
(b) Those services related to the identification, investigation, or
cleanup of a facility that are conducted under contract with the United
States environmental protection agency or under an order or consent
decree executed by the United States environmental protection agency,
or that are consistent with the national contingency plan adopted under
the comprehensive environmental response compensation and liability
act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July 1, 1998, and those
services are conducted at facilities that are included on the national
priorities list adopted under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July
1, 1998, or at facilities subject to a removal action authorized under
42 U.S.C. Sec. 9604 as it exists on July 1, 1998.
(3) A site is eligible for environmental remedial action upon
submittal, via certified mail to the department of ecology and the
department of revenue, of the following:
(a) A certification from the owner, the department of ecology, or
the United States environmental protection agency, containing the
following information:
(i) The location of the site, shown on a map and identified by
parcel number or numbers and street address;
(ii) The name and address and daytime phone number of a contact
person;
(iii) A statement that the proposed environmental remedial actions
will be conducted by the department of ecology or its authorized
contractor under chapter 70.105D RCW or will be substantially
equivalent to a department of ecology-conducted or supervised remedial
action under the model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW, or will
be conducted by the United States environmental protection agency or
its authorized contractor or will be consistent with the national
contingency plan under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July 1,
1998; and
(iv) A description of the proposed environmental remedial actions
to be taken; and
(b)(i) A certification from a certified underground storage tank
service supervisor as authorized in chapter 90.76 RCW, from a
professional engineer licensed in the state of Washington, or from an
environmental professional who subscribes to a code of professional
responsibility administered by a recognized organization representing
such professions containing the following information:
(A) Confirmation that an environmental remedial action as defined
in this section is to be conducted at the site;
(B) The location of the site, shown on a map and identified by
parcel number or numbers and street address, and the approximate
location of the proposed environmental remedial action; and
(C) The name, address, telephone number, and uniform business
identifier of the person providing the certification; or
(ii) If applicable to the site, a copy of an enforcement order,
agreed order, or consent decree executed by the department of ecology
or the United States environmental protection agency.
(4) The department of revenue shall respond in writing to the owner
within thirty days confirming receipt of the certification, or
certifications, of eligibility. Under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m),
certification is subject to disclosure and copies may be obtained from
the department upon request. The request shall be in writing and shall
identify the site by county and parcel number or numbers.
(5) The owner shall provide a copy of the confirmation from the
department of revenue to each person who renders environmental remedial
action at the site. Each person who renders such action shall
separately state the charges for labor and services associated with the
environmental remedial action.
(6) Upon completion of the environmental remedial action, the owner
shall submit to the department of ecology a report documenting the
environmental remedial actions conducted at the site and documenting
compliance with the requirements of chapter 70.105D RCW.
(7) In addition to any other penalties, a person who files a
certificate with the department of ecology or the department of revenue
that contains falsehoods or misrepresentations are subject to penalties
authorized under chapter 18.43 or 90.76 RCW or RCW 9A.76.175. Also, a
person who improperly reports the person's tax class shall be assessed
a penalty of fifty percent of the tax due, in addition to other taxes
or penalties, together with interest. The department of revenue shall
waive the penalty imposed under this section if it finds that the
falsehoods or misrepresentations or improper reporting of the tax
classification was due to circumstances beyond the control of the
person.
(8) This section expires July 1, ((2003)) 2007.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.312 and 1998 c 316 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water
services supplied by a water-sewer district established under Title 57
RCW or by an irrigation district established under Title 87 RCW that:
(a) Has less than one thousand five hundred connections; and
(b) Charges residential water rates that exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the statewide average residential water rate published
on or before July 1st of each year by the department of health.
(2) This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water
services supplied by a water system that:
(a) Is operated or owned by a qualified satellite management agency
under RCW 70.116.134;
(b) Has less than two hundred connections; and
(c) Charges residential water rates that exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the statewide average residential water rate published
on or before July 1st of each year by the department of health.
(3) To receive an exemption under this section, the water system or
irrigation district shall supply to the department of revenue proof
that an amount equal to at least ninety percent of the value of the
exemption shall be expended to repair, equip, maintain, and upgrade the
water system.
(4) The department of health may use rate information provided in
surveys and reports produced by the association of Washington cities,
an association of elected officials, or other municipal association to
estimate a statewide average residential water rate.
(5) This section expires July 1, ((2004)) 2008.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.16.042 and 1998 c 316 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water
services supplied by a water-sewer district established under Title 57
RCW or by an irrigation district established under Title 87 RCW that:
(a) Has less than one thousand five hundred connections; and
(b) Charges residential water rates that exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the statewide average residential water rate published
on or before July 1st of each year by the department of health.
(2) This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water
services supplied by a water system that:
(a) Is operated or owned by a qualified satellite management agency
under RCW 70.116.134;
(b) Has less than two hundred connections; and
(c) Charges residential water rates that exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the statewide average residential water rate.
(3) To receive an exemption under this section, the water system or
irrigation district shall supply to the department of revenue proof
that an amount equal to at least ninety percent of the value of the
exemption shall be expended to repair, equip, maintain, and upgrade the
water system.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "statewide average
residential water rate" means the statewide average residential water
rate published under RCW 82.04.312.
(5) This section expires July 1, ((2004)) 2008.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2000 c 103 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to the greater of the amount of qualified
research and development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of
amounts received by a person other than a public educational or
research institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified
research and development, multiplied by the rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(3) in the case of a nonprofit corporation or nonprofit
association engaging within this state in research and development, and
the rate provided in RCW 82.04.290(2) for every other person.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, shall be taken against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year shall not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or the amount
of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year.
(5) Any person taking the credit, including any credit assigned to
a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose research and
development spending during the calendar year in which the credit is
claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount
during the same calendar year shall be liable for payment of the
additional taxes represented by the amount of credit taken together
with interest, but not penalties. Interest shall be due at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes retroactively to the date the
credit was taken until the taxes are paid. Any credit assigned to a
person under subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a
result of this section may be taken by the person who performed the
qualified research and development subject to the limitations set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) Any person claiming the credit, and any person assigning a
credit as provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall file an
affidavit form prescribed by the department which shall include the
amount of the credit claimed, an estimate of the anticipated qualified
research and development expenditures during the calendar year for
which the credit is claimed, an estimate of the taxable amount during
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, and such additional
information as the department may prescribe.
(7) A person claiming the credit shall agree to supply the
department with information necessary to measure the results of the tax
credit program for qualified research and development expenditures.
(8) The department shall use the information required under
subsection (7) of this section to perform three assessments on the tax
credit program authorized under this section. The assessments will
take place in 1997, 2000, and 2003. The department shall prepare
reports on each assessment and deliver their reports by September 1,
1997, September 1, 2000, and September 1, 2003. The assessments shall
measure the effect of the program on job creation, the number of jobs
created for Washington residents, company growth, the introduction of
new products, the diversification of the state's economy, growth in
research and development investment, the movement of firms or the
consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and such other
factors as the department selects.
(9) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(b) "Qualified research and development" shall have the same
meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(c) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(d) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns during the year in which the credit is
claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(10) This section expires ((December 31, 2004)) January 1, 2009.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.04.4456 and 2000 c 106 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of manufacturing
software or programming, as those terms are defined in this section.
(2) A person who partially or totally relocates a business from one
rural county to another rural county is eligible for any qualifying new
jobs created as a result of the relocation but is not eligible to
receive credit for the jobs moved from one county to the other.
(3)(a) To qualify for the credit, the qualifying activity of the
person must be conducted in a rural county and the qualified employment
position must be located in the rural county.
(b) If an activity is conducted both from a rural county and
outside of a rural county, the credit is available if at least ninety
percent of the qualifying activity is conducted within a rural county.
If the qualifying activity is a service taxable activity, the place
where the work is performed is the place at which the activity is
conducted.
(4)(a) The credit under this section shall equal one thousand
dollars for each qualified employment position created after July 1,
1999, in an eligible area. A credit is earned for the calendar year
the person is hired to fill the position. Additionally a credit is
earned for each year the position is maintained over the subsequent
consecutive years, up to four years. The county must meet the
definition of a rural county at the time the position is filled. If
the county does not have a rural county status the following year or
years, the position is still eligible for the remaining years if all
other conditions are met.
(b) Credit may not be taken for hiring of persons into positions
that exist before July 1, 1999. Credit is authorized for new employees
hired for new positions created on or after July 1, 1999. New
positions filled by existing employees are eligible for the credit
under this section only if the position vacated by the existing
employee is filled by a new hire. A business that is a sole
proprietorship without any employees is equivalent to one employee
position and this type of business is eligible to receive credit for
one position.
(c) If a position is filled before July 1st, this position is
eligible for the full yearly credit for that calendar year. If it is
filled after June 30th, this position is eligible for half of the
credit for that calendar year.
(d) A person that has engaged in qualifying activities in the rural
county before August 1, 1999, qualifies for the credit under this
section for positions created and filled after August 1, 1999.
(5) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. This information includes information relating to
description of qualifying activity conducted in the rural county and
outside the rural county by the person as well as detailed records on
positions and employees.
(6) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed shall be immediately due. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken,
and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.
(7) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. A person is not eligible to receive a
credit under this section if the person is receiving credit for the
same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW 82.04.44525 or is taking
the credit under RCW 82.04.4457. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(8) A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an
annual report to the department. The report shall be in a letter form
and shall include the following information: Number of positions for
which credit is being claimed, type of position for which credit is
being claimed, type of activity in which the person is engaged in the
county, how long the person has been located in the county, and
taxpayer name and registration number. The report must be filed by
January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed during the
previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in the loss of
eligibility under this section. However, the department, through its
research division, shall contact taxpayers who have not filed the
report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the taxpayer in
the filing of the report, so that the data and information necessary to
measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.
(9) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the successive credits are available to the successor for
remaining periods in the five years only if the eligibility conditions
of this section are met.
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" under RCW
82.04.120. Manufacturing includes the activities of both manufacturers
and processors for hire.
(b) "Programming" means the activities that involve the creation or
modification of software, as that term is defined in this chapter, and
that are taxable as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) or as a retail
sale under RCW 82.04.050.
(c) "Qualifying activity" means manufacturing of software or
programming.
(d) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
position doing programming of software or manufacturing of software.
This excludes administrative, professional, service, executive, and
other similar positions. If an employee is either voluntarily or
involuntarily separated from employment, the employment position is
considered filled on a full-time basis if the employer is either
training or actively recruiting a replacement employee. Full-time
means a position for at least thirty-five hours a week.
(e) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of less
than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the
period July 1st to June 30th.
(f) "Software" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.215.
(11) No credit may be taken or accrued under this section on or
after January 1, 2004.
(12) This section expires ((December 31, 2003)) January 1, 2008.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.04.4457 and 2000 c 106 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of providing
information technology help desk services to third parties.
(2) To qualify for the credit, the help desk services must be
conducted from a rural county.
(3) The amount of the tax credit for persons engaged in the
activity of providing information technology help desk services in
rural counties shall be equal to one hundred percent of the amount of
tax due under this chapter that is attributable to providing the
services from the rural county. In order to qualify for the credit
under this subsection, the county must meet the definition of rural
county at the time the person begins to conduct qualifying business in
the county.
(4) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. These records include information relating to
description of activity engaged in a rural county by the person.
(5) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used is immediately due. The department shall
assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for which the
person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be
assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and shall
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(6) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(7) A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an
annual report to the department. The report shall be in a letter form
and shall include the following information: Type of activity in which
the person is engaged in the county, number of employees in the rural
county, how long the person has been located in the county, and
taxpayer name and registration number. The report must be filed by
January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed during the
previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in the loss of
eligibility under this section. However, the department, through its
research division, shall contact taxpayers who have not filed the
report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the taxpayer in
the filing of the report, so that the data and information necessary to
measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.
(8) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the credit is available to the successor only if the
eligibility conditions of this section are met.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) "Information technology help desk services" means the following
services performed using electronic and telephonic communication:
(i) Software and hardware maintenance;
(ii) Software and hardware diagnostics and troubleshooting;
(iii) Software and hardware installation;
(iv) Software and hardware repair;
(v) Software and hardware information and training; and
(vi) Software and hardware upgrade.
(b) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of less
than one hundred persons per square mile, as determined by the office
of financial management and published each year by the department for
the period July 1st to June 30th.
(10) This section expires ((December 31, 2003)) January 1, 2008.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.60.040 and 1999 c 164 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral
certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project that is
located in an eligible area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.
(2) The department shall keep a running total of all deferrals
granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.
(3) This section expires July 1, ((2004)) 2008.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.60.050 and 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
RCW 82.60.030 and 82.60.040 shall expire July 1, ((2004)) 2008.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.63.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 5 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for
state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.14 RCW on each eligible investment project.
(2) No certificate may be issued for an investment project that has
already received a deferral under chapter 82.60 or 82.61 RCW or this
chapter, except that an investment project for qualified research and
development that has already received a deferral may also receive an
additional deferral certificate for adapting the investment project for
use in pilot scale manufacturing.
(3) This section shall expire July 1, ((2004)) 2008.

--- END ---