BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.367 and 2002 c 306 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the major industrial development allowed under
RCW 36.70A.365, a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that meets the
criteria in subsection (9) or (10) of this section may establish, in
consultation with cities consistent with provisions of RCW 36.70A.210,
a process for designating a bank of no more than two master planned
locations for major industrial activity outside urban growth areas.
(2) A master planned location for major industrial developments
outside an urban growth area may be included in the urban industrial
land bank for the county if criteria including, but not limited to, the
following are met:
(a) New infrastructure is provided for and/or applicable impact
fees are paid;
(b) Transit-oriented site planning and traffic demand management
programs are implemented;
(c) Buffers are provided between the major industrial development
and adjacent nonurban areas;
(d) Environmental protection including air and water quality has
been addressed and provided for;
(e) Development regulations are established to ensure that urban
growth will not occur in adjacent nonurban areas;
(f) Provision is made to mitigate adverse impacts on designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands;
(g) The plan for the major industrial development is consistent
with the county's development regulations established for protection of
critical areas;
(h) An inventory of developable land has been conducted as provided
in RCW 36.70A.365;
(i) An interlocal agreement related to infrastructure cost sharing
and revenue sharing between the county and interested cities are [is]
established;
(j) Provisions are established for determining the availability of
alternate sites within urban growth areas and the long-term annexation
feasibility of land sites outside of urban growth areas; and
(k) Development regulations require the industrial land bank site
to be used primarily for locating industrial and manufacturing
businesses and specify that the gross floor area of all commercial and
service buildings or facilities locating within the industrial land
bank shall not exceed ten percent of the total gross floor area of
buildings or facilities in the industrial land bank. The commercial
and service businesses operated within the ten percent gross floor area
limit shall be necessary to the primary industrial or manufacturing
businesses within the industrial land bank. The intent of this
provision for commercial or service use is to meet the needs of
employees, clients, customers, vendors, and others having business at
the industrial site and as an adjunct to the industry to attract and
retain a quality work force and to further other public objectives,
such as trip reduction. Such uses would not be promoted to attract
additional clientele from the surrounding area. The commercial and
service businesses should be established concurrently with or
subsequent to the industrial or manufacturing businesses.
(3) In selecting master planned locations for inclusion in the
urban industrial land bank, priority shall be given to locations that
are adjacent to, or in close proximity to, an urban growth area.
(4) Final approval of inclusion of a master planned location in the
urban industrial land bank shall be considered an adopted amendment to
the comprehensive plan adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070, except that
RCW 36.70A.130(2) does not apply so that inclusion or exclusion of
master planned locations may be considered at any time.
(5) Once a master planned location has been included in the urban
industrial land bank, manufacturing and industrial businesses that
qualify as major industrial development under RCW 36.70A.365 may be
located there.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to alter the
requirements for a county to comply with chapter 43.21C RCW.
(7)(a) The authority of a county meeting the criteria of subsection
(9) of this section to engage in the process of including or excluding
master planned locations from the urban industrial land bank shall
terminate on December 31, 2007. However, any location included in the
urban industrial land bank on or before December 31, 2007, shall be
available for major industrial development as long as the criteria of
subsection (2) of this section are met. A county that has established
or proposes to establish an industrial land bank pursuant to this
section shall review the need for an industrial land bank within the
county, including a review of the availability of land for industrial
and manufacturing uses within the urban growth area, during the review
and evaluation of comprehensive plans and development regulations
required by RCW 36.70A.130.
(b) The authority of a county meeting the criteria of subsection
(10) of this section to engage in the process of including or excluding
master planned locations from the urban industrial land bank terminates
on December 31, 2002. However, any location included in the urban
industrial land bank on December 31, 2002, shall be available for major
industrial development as long as the criteria of subsection (2) of
this section are met.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "major industrial
development" means a master planned location suitable for manufacturing
or industrial businesses that: (a) Requires a parcel of land so large
that no suitable parcels are available within an urban growth area; or
(b) is a natural resource-based industry requiring a location near
agricultural land, forest land, or mineral resource land upon which it
is dependent; or (c) requires a location with characteristics such as
proximity to transportation facilities or related industries such that
there is no suitable location in an urban growth area. The major
industrial development may not be for the purpose of retail commercial
development or multitenant office parks.
(9) This section and the termination date specified in subsection
(7)(a) of this section apply to a county that at the time the process
is established under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Has a population greater than two hundred fifty thousand and is
part of a metropolitan area that includes a city in another state with
a population greater than two hundred fifty thousand;
(b) Has a population greater than one hundred forty thousand and is
adjacent to another country;
(c) Has a population greater than forty thousand but less than
seventy-five thousand and has an average level of unemployment for the
preceding three years that exceeds the average state unemployment for
those years by twenty percent; and
(i) Is bordered by the Pacific Ocean;
(ii) Is located in the Interstate 5 or Interstate 90 corridor; or
(iii) Is bordered by Hood Canal;
(d) Is east of the Cascade divide; and
(i) Borders another state to the south; or
(ii) Is located wholly south of Interstate 90 and borders the
Columbia river to the east; or
(e) Has an average ((level of unemployment for the preceding three
years that exceeds the average state unemployment for those years by
twenty percent)) population density of less than one hundred persons
per square mile as determined by the office of financial management,
and is bordered by the Pacific Ocean and by Hood Canal.
(10) This section and the termination date specified in subsection
(7)(b) of this section apply to a county that at the time the process
is established under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Has a population greater than forty thousand but fewer than
eighty thousand;
(b) Has an average level of unemployment for the preceding three
years that exceeds the average state unemployment for those years by
twenty percent; and
(c) Is located in the Interstate 5 or Interstate 90 corridor.
(11) Any location included in an industrial land bank pursuant to
section 2, chapter 289, Laws of 1998, section 1, chapter 402, Laws of
1997, and section 2, chapter 167, Laws of 1996 shall remain available
for major industrial development according to this section as long as
the criteria of subsection (2) of this section continue to be
satisfied.

--- END ---