BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.33.410 and 1989 c 255 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in RCW 26.33.400 applies to any radio or television station
or any publisher, printer, or distributor of any newspaper, magazine,
billboard, or other advertising medium which accepts advertising in
good faith without knowledge of its violation of any provision of RCW
26.33.400. Publishers of annual and semiannual directories must
attempt to verify compliance with RCW 26.33.400.

--- END ---