BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.04.161 and 1993 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the area of a newly incorporated city or town is located in one
or more fire protection districts, the city or town is deemed to have
been annexed by the fire protection district or districts effective
immediately on the city's or town's official date of incorporation,
unless the city or town council adopts a resolution during the interim
transition period precluding the annexation of the newly incorporated
city or town by the fire protection district or districts. The newly
incorporated city or town shall remain annexed to the fire protection
district or districts for the remainder of the year of the city's or
town's official date of incorporation, or through the following year if
such extension is approved by resolution adopted by the city or town
council and by the board or boards of fire commissioners, and shall be
withdrawn from the fire protection district or districts at the end of
this period, unless a ballot proposition is adopted by the voters
((pursuant to RCW 52.04.071)) providing for annexation of the city or
town to ((a)) one fire protection district or providing for the fire
protection district or districts to annex only that area of the city or
town located within the district. Such election shall be held pursuant
to RCW 52.04.071 where possible, provided that in annexations to more
than one fire protection district, the qualified elector shall reside
within the boundaries of the appropriate fire protection district or in
that area of the city located within the district.
If the city or town is withdrawn from the fire protection district
or districts, the maximum rate of the first property tax levy that is
imposed by the city or town after the withdrawal is calculated as if
the city or town never had been annexed by the fire protection district
or districts.

--- END ---