BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The regulatory reform act of 1995 prohibits agency rules from
differing from existing federal standards unless a state statute
explicitly allows such a difference or substantial evidence shows that
different state rules are necessary;
(b) In spite of these provisions, natural resource agencies,
including the departments of ecology and fish and wildlife, continue to
develop and adopt state rules, guidelines, permit conditions, and
policies that substantially differ from those that have already been
adopted by federal agencies;
(c) Differing from existing federal requirements or policies
increases costs to state agencies and local governments, results in
burdensome and conflicting regulatory programs, and prevents Washington
state from being economically competitive in the national and global
economy;
(d) Natural resource agencies should give priority to assisting and
educating regulated entities and local governments in understanding and
complying with existing federal requirements or policies, rather than
creating different state standards; and
(e) The state must maintain the independence and flexibility to
differ from or exceed federal standards when necessary.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to ensure that state natural
resource agencies do not exceed existing federal requirements and
policies when implementing programs for which federal requirements or
policies exist, unless specifically directed by the legislature to do
so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
Regulatory activities undertaken by the department shall not exceed
the standards required by federal law, regulations, or guidelines that
are applicable to the same activity or subject matter, unless the
legislature specifically directs the department to exceed the federal
standard. Regulatory activities covered by this section are those
implementing a federal law or regulation either delegated to the state
or specifically required by state law to be implemented by the
department including: Issuing any permit, condition, order, guideline,
or policy or interpretative statement; adopting any rule; or entering
into any agreement or contract to implement such regulatory actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Regulatory activities undertaken by the department shall not exceed
the standards required by federal law, regulations, or guidelines that
are applicable to the same activity or subject matter, unless the
legislature specifically directs the department to exceed the federal
standard. Regulatory activities covered by this section are those
implementing a federal law or regulation either delegated to the state
or specifically required by state law to be implemented by the
department including: Issuing any permit, condition, order, guideline,
or policy or interpretative statement; adopting any rule; or entering
into any agreement or contract to implement such regulatory actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---