BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a need
to clarify its intent in enacting the requirement that best available
science be included in developing policies and development regulations
to protect critical areas. The legislature intends that best available
science be considered by all counties and cities in the procedures by
which they develop policies and regulations for each type of critical
area. The legislature also intends that counties and cities have
discretion in applying scientific information and determining what
constitutes best available science within their jurisdictions.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall ((include)) consider the best
available science in developing policies and development regulations to
protect the functions and values of critical areas. In addition,
counties and cities shall give special consideration to conservation or
protection measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous
fisheries. The requirements for counties and cities to consider best
available science and conservation or protection measures shall be
procedural requirements, not substantive requirements for the final
adopted plans or regulations.
(2) In developing policies and development regulations, counties
and cities: (a) May not consider approaches to protecting critical
areas based on science derived from a different physical context than
the one at issue, unless the approach is theoretically sound and
specifically applicable to the physical context at issue, as determined
by the county or city upon consultation with a qualified scientific
expert in the applicable field or fields of science; (b) are not
restricted to a precautionary or no-risk approach where there is an
absence of adequate science applicable to the physical context at
issue; and (c) should consider the cost-effectiveness of each
alternative approach to protecting critical areas.
(3) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas. In reaching its decision, a
board shall give deference to the local government findings and
conclusions in the record of developing the plans or regulations under
review if the procedure by which the plans or regulations were adopted
complies with this chapter.

--- END ---