BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that local governments
in the state of Washington face enormous challenges in the area of
criminal justice and public health. It is the legislature's intent to
allow general local governments to raise revenues in order to better
protect the health and safety of Washington state and its residents.
It is further the intent of the legislature to provide such local
governments relief from regulatory burdens that do not harm the public
health and safety of the citizens of the state as a means of minimizing
the need to generate new revenues authorized under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and,
if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which
the proposed sales and use tax will be used. Funds raised under this
tax shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes. The
rate of tax under this section shall not exceed three-tenths of one
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of
the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(3) The county legislative authority may exempt the retail sale or
use of new or used motor vehicles, and the lease of new or used motor
vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease, from tax
imposed under this section.
(4) One-third of all money received under this section shall be
used solely for criminal justice purposes. For the purposes of this
subsection, "criminal justice purposes" means additional police
protection, mitigation of congested court systems, or relief of
overcrowded jails or other local correctional facilities.
(5) Money received under this section shall be shared between the
county and the cities as follows: Sixty percent shall be retained by
the county and forty percent shall be distributed on a per capita basis
to cities in the county.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2002 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. A county or city shall take legislative action
to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive land use plan and
development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with
the requirements of this chapter according to the time periods
specified in subsection (4) of this section. A county or city not
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if
needed, revise its policies and development regulations regarding
critical areas and natural resource lands adopted according to this
chapter to ensure these policies and regulations comply with the
requirements of this chapter according to the time periods specified in
subsection (4) of this section. Legislative action means the adoption
of a resolution or ordinance following notice and a public hearing
indicating at a minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has
occurred and identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not
needed and the reasons therefore. The review and evaluation required
by this subsection may be combined with the review required by
subsection (3) of this section. The review and evaluation required by
this subsection shall include, but is not limited to, consideration of
critical area ordinances and, if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an
analysis of the population allocated to a city or county from the most
recent ten-year population forecast by the office of financial
management.
(b) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the time
periods specified in subsection (4) of this section. Amendments may be
considered more frequently than once per year under the following
circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan that does not modify the
comprehensive plan policies and designations applicable to the subarea;
(ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; and
(iii) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board
or with the court.
(3) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas. The county comprehensive plan designating
urban growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth
areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each city located
within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the
urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding
twenty-year period. The review required by this subsection may be
combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) The department shall establish a schedule for counties and
cities to take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter. The schedule
established by the department shall provide for the reviews and
evaluations to be completed as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, and every seven years
thereafter, for ((Clallam,)) Clark, ((Jefferson,)) King, Kitsap,
Pierce, Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within
those counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, and every seven years
thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit,
Clallam, Jefferson, and Skamania counties and the cities within those
counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, and every seven years
thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and
Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, and every seven years
thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield,
Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille,
Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities
within those counties.
(5)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (4) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(6) A county or city subject to the time periods in subsection
(4)(a) of this section that, pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the
county or city establishing a schedule for periodic review of its
comprehensive plan and development regulations, has conducted a review
and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development regulations
and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to that
review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first
review required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent
review and evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan
and development regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the
time periods established under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(7) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this
section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the
terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities in
compliance with the schedules in this section shall have the requisite
authority to receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees
from those accounts established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030. Only
those counties and cities in compliance with the schedules in this
section shall receive preference for grants or loans subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.17.250.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.55.050 and 1989 c 287 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The ballot of the proposition shall
state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly state any conditions
which are applicable under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy shall be used for the purpose of computing
the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter,
except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) A proposition placed before the voters under this section may:
(a) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made;
(b) Subject to statutory dollar limitations in RCW 84.52.043,
authorize annual increases in levies for any county, city, or town for
multiple consecutive years, up to six consecutive years, during which
period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be used as the
base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding year is
computed, but the ballot proposition must state the dollar rate
proposed only for the first year of the consecutive years and must
state the limit factor, or a specified index to be used for determining
a limit factor, such as the consumer price index, which need not be the
same for all years, by which the regular tax levy for the district may
be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive years. Elections
for this purpose must be held at a primary or general election. The
title of each ballot measure must state the specific purposes for which
the proposed levy increase shall be used, and funds raised under this
levy shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes;
(c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made,
but if the limited purpose includes making redemption payments on
bonds, the period for which the increased levies are made shall not
exceed nine years;
(((c))) (d) Set the levy at a rate less than the maximum rate
allowed for the district;
(e) Provide that the maximum allowable dollar amount of the final
annual levy of the period specified in the measure shall be used to
compute the limitations provided for in this chapter on levy increases
occurring after the expiration of the period; or
(((d))) (f) Include any combination of the conditions in this
subsection.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in an approved ballot measure
under this section, after the expiration of a limited period or the
satisfaction of a limited purpose, whichever comes first, subsequent
levies shall be computed as if:
(a) The limited proposition under subsection (3) of this section
had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the limited proposition.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70A.040 and 2000 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each county that has both a population of fifty thousand or
more and, until May 16, 1995, has had its population increase by more
than ten percent in the previous ten years or, on or after May 16,
1995, has had its population increase by more than seventeen percent in
the previous ten years, and the cities located within such county, and
any other county regardless of its population that has had its
population increase by more than twenty percent in the previous ten
years, and the cities located within such county, shall conform with
all of the requirements of this chapter. However, the county
legislative authority of such a county with a population of less than
fifty thousand population may adopt a resolution removing the county,
and the cities located within the county, from the requirements of
adopting comprehensive land use plans and development regulations under
this chapter if this resolution is adopted and filed with the
department by December 31, 1990, for counties initially meeting this
set of criteria, or within sixty days of the date the office of
financial management certifies that a county meets this set of criteria
under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section. For the purposes of this
subsection, a county not currently planning under this chapter is not
required to include in its population count those persons confined in
a correctional facility under the jurisdiction of the department of
corrections that is located in the county.
(b) Once a county meets either of these sets of criteria and the
county has not removed itself from the requirement to plan under this
section pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the requirement to
conform with all of the requirements of this chapter remains in effect,
even if the county no longer meets one of these sets of criteria.
(2) The county legislative authority of any county that does not
meet either of the sets of criteria established under subsection (1) of
this section may adopt a resolution indicating its intention to have
subsection (1) of this section apply to the county. Each city, located
in a county that chooses to plan under this subsection, shall conform
with all of the requirements of this chapter. Once such a resolution
has been adopted, the county and the cities located within the county
remain subject to all of the requirements of this chapter unless the
county removes itself from the requirement to plan under this section
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(3) A county that meets the requirements of this subsection, and a
city located within the county, may be relieved from the requirement to
plan under this section.
(a) A county may be relieved from the planning requirement of this
section only if the county: (i) Has a population of less than ten
thousand; (ii) has a privately owned taxable land base of less than
twenty percent; and (iii) includes no more than one incorporated city.
(b) To be relieved from the planning requirement of this section,
a county shall adopt a resolution that removes the county and the city
from the requirement to plan and shall file the resolution with the
department. Removal shall be deemed to occur on the date the
resolution is filed with the department.
(4) Any county or city that is initially required to conform with
all of the requirements of this chapter under subsection (1) of this
section and has not removed itself under subsection (3) of this section
shall take actions under this chapter as follows: (a) The county
legislative authority shall adopt a county-wide planning policy under
RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city located within the county
shall designate critical areas, agricultural lands, forest lands, and
mineral resource lands, and adopt development regulations conserving
these designated agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource
lands and protecting these designated critical areas, under RCW
36.70A.170 and 36.70A.060; (c) the county shall designate and take
other actions related to urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; (d)
if the county has a population of fifty thousand or more, the county
and each city located within the county shall adopt a comprehensive
plan under this chapter and development regulations that are consistent
with and implement the comprehensive plan on or before July 1, 1994,
and if the county has a population of less than fifty thousand, the
county and each city located within the county shall adopt a
comprehensive plan under this chapter and development regulations that
are consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan by January 1,
1995, but if the governor makes written findings that a county with a
population of less than fifty thousand or a city located within such a
county is not making reasonable progress toward adopting a
comprehensive plan and development regulations the governor may reduce
this deadline for such actions to be taken by no more than one hundred
eighty days. Any county or city subject to this subsection may obtain
an additional six months before it is required to have adopted its
development regulations by submitting a letter notifying the department
of community, trade, and economic development of its need prior to the
deadline for adopting both a comprehensive plan and development
regulations.
(((4))) (5) Any county or city that is required to conform with all
the requirements of this chapter, as a result of the county legislative
authority adopting its resolution of intention under subsection (2) of
this section and the county has not removed itself pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section, shall take actions under this chapter
as follows: (a) The county legislative authority shall adopt a county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city
that is located within the county shall adopt development regulations
conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands
it designated under RCW 36.70A.060 within one year of the date the
county legislative authority adopts its resolution of intention; (c)
the county shall designate and take other actions related to urban
growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city
that is located within the county shall adopt a comprehensive plan and
development regulations that are consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan not later than four years from the date the county
legislative authority adopts its resolution of intention, but a county
or city may obtain an additional six months before it is required to
have adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter
notifying the department of community, trade, and economic development
of its need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive
plan and development regulations.
(((5))) (6) If the office of financial management certifies that
the population of a county that previously had not been required to
plan under subsection (1) or (2) of this section has changed
sufficiently to meet either of the sets of criteria specified under
subsection (1) of this section, and where applicable, the county
legislative authority has not adopted a resolution removing the county
from these requirements as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
the county and each city within such county shall take actions under
this chapter as follows: (a) The county legislative authority shall
adopt a county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the
county and each city located within the county shall adopt development
regulations under RCW 36.70A.060 conserving agricultural lands, forest
lands, and mineral resource lands it designated within one year of the
certification by the office of financial management; (c) the county
shall designate and take other actions related to urban growth areas
under RCW 36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city located within
the county shall adopt a comprehensive land use plan and development
regulations that are consistent with and implement the comprehensive
plan within four years of the certification by the office of financial
management, but a county or city may obtain an additional six months
before it is required to have adopted its development regulations by
submitting a letter notifying the department of community, trade, and
economic development of its need prior to the deadline for adopting
both a comprehensive plan and development regulations.
(((6))) (7) A copy of each document that is required under this
section shall be submitted to the department at the time of its
adoption.
(((7))) (8) Cities and counties planning under this chapter must
amend the transportation element of the comprehensive plan to be in
compliance with this chapter and chapter 47.80 RCW no later than
December 31, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---