BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998 c 286 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, and each city within such county, shall adopt development
regulations on or before September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation
of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated under
RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection may not
prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption
and shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts development
regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure
that the use of lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral
resource lands shall not interfere with the continued use, in the
accustomed manner and in accordance with best management practices, of
these designated lands for the production of food, agricultural
products, or timber, or for the extraction of minerals. Counties and
cities shall require that all plats, short plats, development permits,
and building permits issued for development activities on, or within
five hundred feet of, lands designated as agricultural lands, forest
lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a notice that the subject
property is within or near designated agricultural lands, forest lands,
or mineral resource lands on which a variety of commercial activities
may occur that are not compatible with residential development for
certain periods of limited duration. The notice for mineral resource
lands shall also inform that an application might be made for mining-related activities, including mining, extraction, washing, crushing,
stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and recycling of minerals.
(2) A county or city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 may, upon written request by the property owner and
following the procedures required in this chapter, amend its
comprehensive plan and development regulations to allow agricultural
lands that have not been in use for commercial production within the
previous five years to be used for recreational activities, including
fields for sports played on grass, provided that: (a) The lands are
conserved for potential future agricultural use; (b) no permanent
structures are erected on or beneath the lands; and (c) the county or
city annually reviews this interim use and the potential productive
agricultural use of the lands.
(3) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(((3))) (4) Such counties and cities shall review these
designations and development regulations when adopting their
comprehensive plans under RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development
regulations under RCW 36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and
development regulations to insure consistency.
(((4))) (5) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban
growth areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land
or agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.177 and 1997 c 429 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A county or a city may use a variety of innovative zoning
techniques in areas designated as agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. The innovative zoning
techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural lands and
encourage the agricultural economy. A county or city should encourage
nonagricultural uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or
otherwise not suitable for agricultural purposes.
(2) Innovative zoning techniques a county or city may consider
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Agricultural zoning, which limits the density of development
and restricts or prohibits nonfarm uses of agricultural land;
(b) Cluster zoning, which allows new development on one portion of
the land, leaving the remainder in agricultural or open space uses;
(c) Large lot zoning, which establishes as a minimum lot size the
amount of land necessary to achieve a successful farming practice;
(d) Quarter/quarter zoning, which permits one residential dwelling
on a one-acre minimum lot for each one-sixteenth of a section of land;
and
(e) Sliding scale zoning, which allows the number of lots for
single-family residential purposes with a minimum lot size of one acre
to increase inversely as the size of the total acreage increases.
(3) A county or city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 may, upon written request by the property owner and
following the procedures required in this chapter, amend its
comprehensive plan and development regulations to allow agricultural
lands that have not been in use for commercial production within the
previous five years to be used for recreational activities, including
fields for sports played on grass, provided that: (a) The lands are
conserved for potential future agricultural use; (b) no permanent
structures are erected on or beneath the lands; and (c) the county or
city annually reviews this interim use and the potential productive
agricultural use of the lands.

--- END ---