BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.030 and 1996 c 51 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The community economic revitalization board is hereby created
to exercise the powers granted under this chapter.
(2) The board shall consist of ((the chairman of and one minority
member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives from
the committee of the house of representatives that deals with issues of
economic development, the chairman of and one minority member appointed
by the president of the senate from the committee of the senate that
deals with issues of economic development, and)) one member from each
of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives to be
appointed by the speaker of the house and one member from each of the
two major caucuses of the senate to be appointed by the president of
the senate. The members appointed by the speaker of the house and
president of the senate must be from the committees of the house and
senate that deal with issues of economic development. The board shall
also consist of the following members appointed by the governor: A
recognized private or public sector economist; one port district
official; one county official; one city official; one representative of
the public; one representative of small businesses each from: (a) The
area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area east of Puget Sound and west of
the Cascade range, (c) the area east of the Cascade range and west of
the Columbia river, and (d) the area east of the Columbia river; one
executive from large businesses each from the area west of the Cascades
and the area east of the Cascades. The appointive members shall
initially be appointed to terms as follows: Three members for one-year
terms, three members for two-year terms, and three members for three-year terms which shall include the chair. Thereafter each succeeding
term shall be for three years. The chair of the board shall be
selected by the governor. The members of the board shall elect one of
their members to serve as vice-chair. The director of community,
trade, and economic development, the director of revenue, the
commissioner of employment security, and the secretary of
transportation shall serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board.
(3) Management services, including fiscal and contract services,
shall be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing
this chapter and the allocation of private activity bonds.
(4) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of
appointive members of the board, the governor shall fill the same for
the unexpired term. Members of the board may be removed for
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges by
the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) A member appointed by the governor may not be absent from more
than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one
calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence limitation is
deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be replaced by the
governor.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.160.035 and 1993 c 320 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each member of the house of representatives who is appointed to the
community economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may
designate another member ((of)) from the ((trade, economic development,
and housing)) committee of the house of representatives that deals with
issues of economic development to take his or her place on the board
for meetings at which the member will be absent, as long as the
designated member belongs to the same caucus. The designee shall have
all powers to vote and participate in board deliberations as have the
other board members. Each member of the senate who is appointed to the
community economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may
designate another member ((of)) from the ((trade, technology, and
economic development)) senate committee ((of the senate)) that deals
with issues of economic development to take his or her place on the
board for meetings at which the member will be absent, as long as the
designated member belongs to the same caucus. The designee shall have
all powers to vote and participate in board deliberations as have the
other board members. Each agency head of an executive agency who is
appointed to serve as a nonvoting advisory member of the community
economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may designate an
agency employee to take his or her place on the board for meetings at
which the agency head will be absent. The designee will have all
powers to participate in board deliberations as have the other board
members but shall not have voting powers.

--- END ---