BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that since statehood,
the lifestyles, culture, and economies of eastern and western
Washington have been very distinct. A similar distinction is also true
of eastern and western Oregon. The similarities between eastern
Washington, eastern Oregon, and Idaho and western Washington and
western Oregon are dramatic. Urbanization and rapid growth in the
western portions of Washington and Oregon have progressively heightened
this divergence of cultural and economic values from that of the
eastern portions of the states. The legislature therefore declares
that a reconsideration of the state boundary lines of Washington,
Oregon, and Idaho in light of these divergences and similarities is in
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Spokane boundary review board is
directed to study the feasibility of boundary line changes and the
process to accomplish such changes. The Spokane boundary review board
shall report its findings and recommendations to the Washington state
legislature by January 15, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of twenty-seven thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2004, from the general fund to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of this
act.

--- END ---