BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.030 and 2002 c 99 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(2) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance, or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant, or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship
to (i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance, or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner, or (f) excluded from a bargaining unit under RCW
41.56.201(2)(a). For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(3) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ((ten)) twenty-five thousand or more; (b) correctional
employees who are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and
noncommissioned security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW
70.48.020(5), by a county with a population of seventy thousand or
more, and who are trained for and charged with the responsibility of
controlling and maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and
safeguarding inmates from other inmates; (c) general authority
Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a
port district in a county with a population of one million or more; (d)
security forces established under RCW 43.52.520; (e) fire fighters as
that term is defined in RCW 41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district
in a county with a population of one million or more whose duties
include crash fire rescue or other fire fighting duties; (g) employees
of fire departments of public employers who dispatch exclusively either
fire or emergency medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the
several classes of advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW
18.71.200, who are employed by a public employer.
(8) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(9) "Home care quality authority" means the authority under chapter
74.39A RCW.
(10) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is employed by the home care quality authority as provided
in RCW 74.39A.270.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.465 and 1995 c 273 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making its determination, the panel shall be mindful of the
legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430 and, as additional
standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision, it shall take
into consideration the following factors:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c)(i) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7) (a) through (d),
comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of like personnel of like employers of similar
size on the west coast of the United States. However, when an adequate
number of comparable employers exists within the state of Washington,
other west coast employers may not be considered;
(ii) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7) (e) through (h),
comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of like personnel of public fire departments
of similar size on the west coast of the United States. However, when
an adequate number of comparable employers exists within the state of
Washington, other west coast employers may not be considered;
(d) ((The average consumer prices for goods and services, commonly
known as the cost of living;
(e))) The percentage change in the implicit price deflator for
personal consumption expenditures for the United States as published by
the bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce
for the year preceding the year in which interest arbitration panel
proceedings are initiated;
(e) In making economic determinations, internal equity and local
labor market considerations shall be given substantial weight;
(f) The financial constraints of the governing body;
(g) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through (d) of
this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings; and
(((f))) (h) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under
(a) through (((e))) (g) of this subsection, that are normally or
traditionally taken into consideration in the determination of wages,
hours, and conditions of employment. For those employees listed in RCW
41.56.030(7)(a) who are employed by the governing body of a city or
town with a population of less than fifteen thousand, or a county with
a population of less than seventy thousand, consideration must also be
given to regional differences in the cost of living.
(2) Subsection (1)(c) of this section may not be construed to
authorize the panel to require the employer to pay, directly or
indirectly, the increased employee contributions resulting from chapter
502, Laws of 1993 or chapter 517, Laws of 1993 as required under
chapter 41.26 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.56.492 and 1993 c 473 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the classes of employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7),
the provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.452, 41.56.470,
41.56.480, and 41.56.490 shall also be applicable to the employees of
a public passenger transportation system of a metropolitan municipal
corporation, county transportation authority, public transportation
benefit area, or city public passenger transportation system, subject
to the following:
(1) Negotiations between the public employer and the bargaining
representative may commence at any time agreed to by the parties. If
no agreement has been reached ninety days after commencement of
negotiations, either party may demand that the issues in disagreement
be submitted to a mediator. The services of the mediator shall be
provided by the commission without cost to the parties, but nothing in
this section or RCW 41.56.440 shall be construed to prohibit the public
employer and the bargaining representative from agreeing to substitute
at their own expense some other mediator or mediation procedure; and
(2) If an agreement has not been reached following a reasonable
period of negotiations and mediation, and the mediator finds that the
parties remain at impasse, either party may demand that the issues in
disagreement be submitted to an arbitration panel for a binding and
final determination. In making its determination, the arbitration
panel shall be mindful of the legislative purpose enumerated in RCW
41.56.430 and as additional standards or guidelines to aid it in
reaching a ((decisions [decision])) decision, shall take into
consideration the following factors:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c) The financial constraints of the governing body;
(d) Compensation package comparisons, economic indices, fiscal
constraints, and similar factors determined by the arbitration panel to
be pertinent to the case; ((and
(d))) (e) The percentage change in the implicit price deflator for
personal consumption expenditures for the United States as published by
the bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce
for the year preceding the year in which interest arbitration panel
proceedings are initiated;
(f) In making economic determinations, internal equity and local
labor market considerations shall be given substantial weight; and
(g) Such other factors, not confined to the foregoing, which are
normally or traditionally taken into consideration in the determination
of wages, hours, and conditions of employment.

--- END ---