BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 87.03.138 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 48 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
Directors ((and)), officers, employees, or agents of irrigation
districts shall be immune from civil liability for any cause of action
or claim for damages for any mistakes and errors of judgment in the
good faith performance of acts within the scope of their official
duties involving the exercise ((of)) or failure to exercise judgment
and discretion which relate solely to their responsibilities for
electrical utilities, hydroelectric facilities, or irrigation works.
This grant of immunity shall not be construed as modifying the
liability of the irrigation district.

Sec. 2 RCW 87.03.277 and 2002 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Irrigation districts that have designated their own treasurers as
provided in RCW 87.03.440 may accept credit cards, charge cards, debit
cards, smart cards, stored value cards, federal wire, and automatic
clearinghouse system transactions, or other electronic communication,
for any payment of any kind including, but not limited to, assessments,
fines, interest, penalties, special assessments, fees, rates, tolls and
charges, or moneys due irrigation districts. A payer desiring to pay
by a credit card, charge card, debit card, smart card, stored value
card, federal wire, automatic clearinghouse system, or other electronic
communication shall bear the cost of processing the transaction in an
amount determined by the treasurer, unless the board of directors finds
that it is in the best interests of the district to not charge
transaction processing costs for all payment transactions made for a
specific category of ((nonassessment)) payments due the district,
including, but not limited to, assessments, fines, interest ((not
associated with assessments)), penalties ((not associated with
assessments)), special assessments, fees, rates, tolls, and charges.
The treasurer's cost determination shall be based upon costs incurred
by the treasurer and may not, in any event, exceed the additional
direct costs incurred by the district to accept the specific form of
payment used by the payer.

Sec. 3 RCW 87.03.443 and 1979 ex.s. c 263 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
There may be created for each irrigation district a fund to be
known as the upgrading and improvement fund. ((At least five percent))
The board of directors shall determine what portion of the annual
revenue of ((each)) the irrigation district ((may annually)) will be
placed into its upgrading and improvement fund, including all or any
part of the funds received by a district from the sale, delivery, and
distribution of electrical energy. Moneys from the upgrading and
improvement fund may only be used to modernize, improve, or upgrade the
irrigation facilities of the irrigation district or to respond to an
emergency affecting such facilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 87.06.030 and 1988 c 134 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The treasurer shall order a title search of the property for which
a certificate of delinquency has been prepared to determine or verify
the legal description of the property to be sold and parties in
interest. In districts with two hundred thousand acres or more, the
board of directors, upon receiving the certificates of delinquency may,
after reviewing the amount of delinquent assessment compared to the
costs of foreclosure, including but not limited to title search, court
filing fees, costs of service, and attorneys' fees, determine that it
is not in the best interest of the district to commence legal action to
foreclose the delinquent assessment liens.

Sec. 5 RCW 87.06.060 and 1988 c 134 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The proceedings to foreclose the liens against all properties
on a general certificate of delinquency or on more than one individual
certificate may be brought in one action.
(2) No assessment, costs, or interest may be considered illegal
because of any irregularity in the assessment roll or because the
assessment roll has not been made, completed, or returned within the
time required by law, or because the property has been charged or
listed in the assessment roll without name, or in any other name than
that of the owner, and no error or informality in the proceedings of
any of the officers connected with the assessment may invalidate or in
any other manner affect the assessment thereof. Any irregularities or
informality in the assessment roll or in any of the proceedings
connected with the assessment or any omission or defective act of any
officer or officers connected with the assessment may be, at the
discretion of the court corrected, supplied, and made to conform to the
law by the court. This ((section)) subsection does not apply if the
court finds that the failure to conform to the law unfairly ((affects
parties in)) prejudices a party with an interest in the property.
(3) A party with an interest in real property subject to
foreclosure within the district may file a written answer within the
time permitted by RCW 87.06.040(1)(d) asserting an objection or defense
to the entry of a foreclosure judgment against the property. However,
defenses or objections shall be limited to: (a) The form of pleading;
(b) manner of service; (c) invalidity of the assessments claimed
delinquent; (d) payment of the assessments claimed delinquent; or (e)
that the real property against which foreclosure is sought is not
subject to district assessment. No counterclaim shall be permitted.
The court shall liberally permit amendment or supplementation of the
district's challenged pleading or procedure to cure the claimed defect.
(4) The court shall determine timely objections or defenses to the
district's foreclosure in a summary proceeding based only on the
district's pleading and the interested party's answer and shall
promptly pronounce judgment granting or denying the foreclosure; or the
court may, in its discretion, to provide substantial justice to the
parties, continue the case to a later time to hear evidence on the
issues raised by the answer. Hearings under this section shall be
limited to affidavits or declarations, and shall be expedited.

Sec. 6 RCW 87.06.110 and 1988 c 134 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of directors of the irrigation district and the county
treasurer may through the interlocal cooperation agreement act, chapter
39.34 RCW, choose to have one of the treasurers proceed with a combined
foreclosure for all property taxes, irrigation assessments, and all
costs and interest owing to both entities. Any such agreement shall
include a specific statement as to which entity shall assume title if
no bids are received equal to or greater than the amount listed on the
minimum bid sheet. The agreement shall also clearly specify how any
unclaimed excess funds from the sale will be divided between the county
and the irrigation district.
With a combined foreclosure for all property taxes, all irrigation
district assessments, and all costs and interest owing to both
entities, the county treasurer may use the foreclosure procedure under
chapter 84.64 RCW or the irrigation district treasurer may use the
foreclosure procedure under this chapter. When acting as the treasurer
for the irrigation district, the county treasurer may use the
foreclosure procedure under chapter 84.64 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 60.80.005 and 1996 c 43 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), "charges"
include: (a) All lawful charges assessed by a utility operated under
chapter 35.21, 35.67, 36.36, 36.89, 36.94, ((56.16,)) or 57.08((, or
87.03)) RCW, but not evidenced by a recorded lien, recorded covenant,
recorded agreement, or special assessment roll filed with the city or
county treasurer or assessor, and not billed and collected with
property taxes; and (b) penalties and interest, and reasonable
attorneys' fees and other costs of foreclosure if foreclosure
proceedings have been commenced.
(2) "Closing agent" means an escrow agent as defined in RCW
((18.44.010(4))) 18.44.011(6) or a person exempt from licensing ((and
registration)) requirements under RCW ((18.44.020)) 18.44.021, handling
the escrow on the sale of the real property.
(3) "Real estate agent" means a real estate broker, real estate
salesperson, associate real estate broker, or person as defined in RCW
18.85.010 (1) through (4).
(4) "Business day" means a day the offices of the county or
counties in which the utility in question provides service are open for
business.

Sec. 8 RCW 60.80.010 and 1996 c 43 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise stated and acknowledged in writing by the
purchaser, the seller of a fee interest in real property is responsible
for satisfying, upon closing, any lien provided for by RCW 35.21.290,
35.67.200, 36.36.045, 36.89.090, or 36.94.150((, 56.16.100, 57.08.080,
or 87.03.445)).
(2) No closing agent may refuse a written request by the seller or
purchaser of a fee interest in real property to administer the
disbursement of closing funds necessary to satisfy unpaid charges as
charges are defined in RCW 60.80.005. Except as otherwise provided in
this subsection (2), a closing agent who refuses such a written request
is liable to the purchaser for unpaid charges for utility services
covered by the request. A closing agent is not liable if the closing
agent's refusal is based on the seller's inaccurate or incomplete
identification of utilities providing service to the property, or if a
utility fails to provide an estimated or actual final billing, or
written extension of the per diem rate, as required by RCW 60.80.020,
or if disbursement of closing funds necessary to satisfy the unpaid
charges would violate RCW ((18.44.070)) 18.44.400.
(3) A closing agent may charge a fee for performing the services
required of the closing agent by this chapter, which fee may be in
addition to other fees or settlement charges collected in the course of
ordinary settlement practices.

Sec. 9 RCW 60.80.020 and 1996 c 43 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the seller and purchaser waive, in writing, the services
of a closing agent in administering the disbursement of closing funds
necessary to satisfy unpaid charges as charges are defined in RCW
60.80.005, the seller shall, as a provision in a written agreement for
the purchase and sale of real estate, inform the closing agent for the
sale of the names and addresses of all utilities, including special
districts, providing service to the property under chapter 35.21,
35.67, 36.36, 36.89, 36.94, ((56.16,)) or 57.08((, or 87.03)) RCW. The
provision of the information in a written agreement for the purchase
and sale of real estate constitutes a written request to the closing
agent to administer disbursement of closing funds necessary to satisfy
unpaid charges.
Unless the seller and purchaser have waived the services of a
closing agent as provided in this subsection, the closing agent shall
submit a written request for a final billing to each utility identified
by the seller as providing service to the property under chapter 35.21,
35.67, 36.36, 36.89, 36.94, ((56.16,)) or 57.08((, or 87.03)) RCW.
Either the seller or purchaser may submit a written request for a final
billing to each utility identified by the seller as providing service
to the property under chapter 35.21, 35.67, 36.36, 36.89, 36.94,
((56.16,)) or 57.08((, or 87.03)) RCW.
The written request must identify the property by both legal
description and address. The closing agent, seller, or purchaser may
submit a written request to a utility by facsimile. In requesting
final billings for utility services, the closing agent may rely upon
information provided by the seller, and a closing agent or a real
estate agent who is not the seller is not liable for inaccurate or
incomplete information.
(2) After receiving a written request for a final billing for
utility services to real property to be sold, a utility operated under
chapter 35.21, 35.67, 36.36, 36.89, 36.94, ((56.16,)) or 57.08((, or
87.03)) RCW shall provide the requesting party with a written estimated
or actual final billing as provided in this section. If the utility is
unable to provide a written estimated or actual final billing or
written extension of the per diem rate, due to insufficient information
to identify the account, the utility shall notify the requesting party
in writing that the information is insufficient to identify the
account.
The utility shall provide the written estimated or actual final
billing, or statement that the information in the request is
insufficient to identify the account, to the requesting party within
seven business days of receipt of the written request if the request
was mailed to the utility, or within three business days if the request
was sent to the utility by facsimile or delivered to the utility by
messenger. A utility may provide a written estimated or actual final
billing to the requesting party by facsimile.
(a) The final billing must include all outstanding charges and, in
addition to the estimated or actual final amount owing as of the stated
closing date, must state the average per diem rate for the utility or
utilities involved, including taxes and other charges, which shall
apply for up to thirty days beyond the stated closing date if the
closing date is delayed.
(b) If closing is delayed beyond thirty days, a new estimated or
actual final billing must be requested in writing. In lieu of
furnishing a written revised final billing, the utility may extend, in
writing, the number of days for which the per diem charge applies. The
utility shall respond within seven business days of receipt of the
written request for a new estimated or actual final billing if the
request was mailed to the utility, or within three business days if the
request was sent to the utility by facsimile or delivered to the
utility by messenger.
(c) If a utility fails to provide a written estimated or actual
final billing, written extension of the per diem rate, or statement
that the information in the request is insufficient to identify the
account, within seven business days of receipt of a written request if
the request was mailed to the utility, or within three business days if
the request was sent to the utility by facsimile or delivered to the
utility by messenger, an unrecorded lien provided for by RCW 35.21.290,
35.67.200, 36.36.045, 36.89.090, or 36.94.150((, 56.16.100, 57.08.080,
or 87.03.445)) for charges incurred prior to the closing date is
extinguished, and the utility may not recover the charges from the
purchaser of the property.
(d) A closing agent shall inform the seller and purchaser of all
applicable estimated and actual final billings furnished by utilities.
In performing his or her duties under this chapter, a closing agent
may rely upon information provided by utilities and is not liable if
information provided by utilities is inaccurate or incomplete.
(3) If closing occurs no later than the last date for which per
diem charges may be applied, full payment of the estimated or actual
final billing plus per diem charges extinguishes a lien of the utility
provided for by RCW 35.21.290, 35.67.200, 36.36.045, 36.89.090, or
36.94.150((, 56.16.100, 57.08.080, or 87.03.445)) for charges incurred
prior to the closing date.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (4)(a), this
section does not limit the right of a utility to recover from the
purchaser of the property unpaid utility charges incurred prior to
closing, if the utility did not receive a written request for a final
billing or if the utility complied with subsection (2) of this section.
A utility may not recover from a purchaser unpaid utility charges
incurred prior to closing in excess of an estimated final billing.
(b) This section does not limit the right of a utility to recover
unpaid utility charges incurred prior to closing, including unpaid
utility charges in excess of an estimated final billing, from the
seller of the property, or from the person or persons who incurred the
charges.
(c) If an estimated final billing is in excess of the actual final
billing, unless otherwise directed in writing by the seller and
purchaser, a utility shall refund any overcharge to the seller of the
property by sending the refund in the seller's name to the last address
provided by the seller. A utility shall refund the overcharge within
fourteen business days of the date the utility receives payment for the
final billing, unless a county treasurer acts in an ex officio capacity
as the treasurer of a utility, in which case the utility shall refund
the overcharge within thirty business days of the date the utility
receives payment for the final billing.

--- END ---