BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All meetings of the governing body of a public agency shall be
open and public and all persons shall be permitted to attend any
meeting of the governing body of a public agency, except as otherwise
provided in this chapter.
(2) If the public is given the opportunity to testify or comment at
any meeting of a public agency, any elected official shall be provided
the same opportunity.

--- END ---