BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.28.080 and 1997 c 452 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Acquisition" includes, but is not limited to, siting,
acquisition, design, construction, refurbishing, expansion, repair, and
improvement, including paying or securing the payment of all or any
portion of general obligation bonds, leases, revenue bonds, or other
obligations issued or incurred for such purpose or purposes under this
chapter.
(2) "Municipality" means any county, city or town of the state of
Washington.
(3) "Operation" includes, but is not limited to, operation,
management, and marketing.
(4) "Person" means the federal government or any agency thereof,
the state or any agency, subdivision, taxing district or municipal
corporation thereof other than county, city or town, any private
corporation, partnership, association, or individual.
(5) "Tourism" means economic activity resulting from tourists,
which may include sales of overnight lodging, meals, tours, gifts, or
souvenirs.
(6) "Tourism promotion" means activities and expenditures designed
to increase tourism, including but not limited to advertising,
publicizing, or otherwise distributing information for the purpose of
attracting and welcoming tourists; developing strategies to expand
tourism; operating tourism promotion agencies; and funding marketing of
special events and festivals designed to attract tourists.
(7) "Tourism-related facility" means real or tangible personal
property with a usable life of three or more years, or constructed with
volunteer labor, and used to support tourism, performing arts, or to
accommodate tourist activities. Only facilities primarily intended to
attract tourists shall be eligible for funding under this chapter.
(8) "Tourist" means a person who travels from a place of residence
to a different town, city, county, state, or country, for purposes of
business, pleasure, recreation, education, arts, heritage, or culture.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.28.1817 and 1998 c 35 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any municipality that has imposed a tax under this chapter or
before proposing imposition of a new tax under this chapter, an
increase in the rate of a tax imposed under this chapter, repeal of an
exemption from a tax imposed under this chapter, or a change in the use
of revenue received under this chapter, a municipality ((with a
population of five thousand or more)) where more than five thousand
dollars were generated during the previous calendar year for the fund
established under RCW 67.28.1815 shall establish a lodging tax
((advisory)) committee under this section. A lodging tax ((advisory))
committee shall consist of ((at least five)) up to seven members,
appointed by the legislative body of the municipality, unless the
municipality has a charter providing for a different appointment
authority. The committee membership shall ((include)) consist of the
following: (a) ((At least two)) Up to three members who are
representatives of businesses required to collect tax under this
chapter; ((and)) (b) ((at least two)) up to three members who are
persons involved in activities authorized to be funded by revenue
received under this chapter; and (c) one member who is an elected
official of the municipality. The members of the committee shall
select their chair. Persons who are eligible for appointment under (a)
of this subsection are not eligible for appointment under (b) of this
subsection. ((Persons who are eligible for appointment under (b) of
this subsection are not eligible for appointment under (a) of this
subsection.)) Organizations representing businesses required to
collect tax under this chapter, organizations involved in activities
authorized to be funded by revenue received under this chapter, and
local agencies involved in tourism promotion may submit recommendations
to the municipality for membership on the committee. The number of
members who are representatives of businesses required to collect tax
under this chapter shall equal the number of members who are involved
in activities authorized to be funded by revenue received under this
chapter. ((One member shall be an elected official of the municipality
who shall serve as chair of the committee. An advisory)) A committee
for a county may include one nonvoting member who is an elected
official of a city or town in the county. ((An advisory)) A committee
for a city or town may include one nonvoting member who is an elected
official of the county in which the city or town is located. The
appointing authority shall review the membership of the advisory
committee annually and make changes as appropriate.
(2) Any municipality that proposes imposition of a tax under this
chapter, an increase in the rate of a tax imposed under this chapter,
repeal of an exemption from a tax imposed under this chapter, or a
change in the use of revenue received under this chapter ((shall)),
including a change in the proportional allocation of funds, may submit
the proposals to the lodging tax ((advisory)) committee for review
((and)), comment, and approval. ((The submission shall occur at least
forty-five days before final action on or passage of the proposal by
the municipality.)) The ((advisory)) committee shall submit comments
on the proposals, including recommendations for approval or rejection,
in a timely manner after soliciting public comment through generally
applicable public comment procedures. The comments shall include an
analysis of the extent to which the proposal will accommodate
activities for tourists or increase tourism, and the extent to which
the proposal will affect the long-term stability of the fund created
under RCW 67.28.1815. ((Failure of the advisory committee to submit
comments before final action on or passage of the proposal shall not
prevent the municipality from acting on the proposal. A municipality
is not required to submit an amended proposal to an advisory committee
under this section.)) A municipality may accept or reject proposals
approved by the lodging tax committee, but shall not add to the
approved proposal list, notwithstanding the municipality's ability to
submit a proposal to the committee for review, comment, and approval.
(3) The lodging tax committee shall recommend the use of at least
seventy-five percent of the funds generated every calendar year. Funds
pledged on or after July 1, 2003, and not used within the seven years
shall revert back to the fund. All expenditures including multiyear
allocations from the fund for a project or proposal shall be reviewed
by the lodging tax committee and submitted to the legislative authority
of the municipality for their approval, except if an allocation is to
secure financing or to retire debt for a tourist-related facility. The
lodging tax committee shall meet annually or as often as the lodging
tax committee deems appropriate.

--- END ---