BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.300 and 1995 c 399 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The lien for charges for service by a city waterworks, or
electric light or power plant may be enforced only by cutting off the
service until the delinquent and unpaid charges are paid, except that
((until June 30, 1991,)) utility service for residential space heating
may be terminated between November 15 and March 15 only as provided in
subsections (2) and (4) of this section. In the event of a disputed
account and tender by the owner of the premises of the amount the owner
claims to be due before the service is cut off, the right to refuse
service to any premises shall not accrue until suit has been entered by
the city and judgment entered in the case.
(2) Utility service for residential space heating shall not be
terminated between November 15 through March 15 if the customer:
(a) Notifies the utility of the inability to pay the bill,
including a security deposit. This notice should be provided within
five business days of receiving a payment overdue notice unless there
are extenuating circumstances. If the customer fails to notify the
utility within five business days and service is terminated, the
customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and fulfilling
the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;
(b) Provides self-certification of household income for the prior
twelve months to a grantee of the department of community, trade, and
economic development which administers federally funded energy
assistance programs. The grantee shall determine that the household
income does not exceed the maximum allowed for eligibility under the
state's plan for low-income energy assistance under 42 U.S.C. 8624 and
shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of household
income. The grantee may verify information in the self-certification;
(c) Has applied for home heating assistance from applicable
government and private sector organizations and certifies that any
assistance received will be applied to the current bill and future
utility bills;
(d) Has applied for low-income weatherization assistance to the
utility or other appropriate agency if such assistance is available for
the dwelling;
(e) Agrees to a payment plan and agrees to maintain the payment
plan. The plan will be designed both to pay the past due bill by the
following October 15 and to pay for continued utility service. If the
past due bill is not paid by the following October 15, the customer
shall not be eligible for protections under this chapter until the past
due bill is paid. The plan shall not require monthly payments in
excess of seven percent of the customer's monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and
thereafter during November 15 through March 15. A customer may agree
to pay a higher percentage during this period, but shall not be in
default unless payment during this period is less than seven percent of
monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date
application is made and thereafter. If assistance payments are
received by the customer subsequent to implementation of the plan, the
customer shall contact the utility to reformulate the plan; and
(f) Agrees to pay the moneys owed even if he or she moves.
(3) The utility shall:
(a) Include in any notice that an account is delinquent and that
service may be subject to termination, a description of the customer's
duties in this section;
(b) Assist the customer in fulfilling the requirements under this
section;
(c) Be authorized to transfer an account to a new residence when a
customer who has established a plan under this section moves from one
residence to another within the same utility service area;
(d) Be permitted to disconnect service if the customer fails to
honor the payment program. Utilities may continue to disconnect
service for those practices authorized by law other than for nonpayment
as provided for in this section. Customers who qualify for payment
plans under this section who default on their payment plans and are
disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections afforded
under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and by
paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms
of the applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on which
service is reconnected; and
(e) Advise the customer in writing at the time it disconnects
service that it will restore service if the customer contacts the
utility and fulfills the other requirements of this section.
(4) All municipal utilities shall offer residential customers the
option of a budget billing or equal payment plan. The budget billing
or equal payment plan shall be offered low-income customers eligible
under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance prepared in
accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without limiting availability to
certain months of the year, without regard to the length of time the
customer has occupied the premises, and without regard to whether the
customer is the tenant or owner of the premises occupied.
(5) An agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral
or written, shall not waive the protections afforded under this
chapter.

--- END ---