BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 31.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Each licensee providing an application for a residential mortgage
loan shall give a written notice to each applicant that provides at
least three sources of consumer information developed by governmental
or nonprofit organizations that would assist the applicant in
determining what loan terms would be suitable for the applicant. The
notice must be in twelve-point bold faced type or larger on a single
sheet of paper separate from all other documents. The notice must
include the mailing address and phone number for the department of
financial institutions and the internet address of the department's
consumer information web site that includes mortgage borrowers and
predatory lending information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 31.04 RCW
to read as follows:
A licensee shall provide, prior to the closing of a residential
mortgage loan, a notice to each borrower of the annual percentage rate
of the loan and whether or not the loan has a prepayment penalty. The
notice must be in twelve-point bold faced type or larger on a separate
sheet of paper that serves as the cover sheet for all documents to be
signed at closing and must be in substantially the following form:
"NOTICE TO BORROWER:
(1) The annual percentage rate of your loan is . . .%
(2) Prepayment penalty:
(a) Your loan has a prepayment penalty of . . ..
(b) Your loan does not have a prepayment penalty."

--- END ---