BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.112.020 and 1999 c 20 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Authority" means a regional transit authority authorized under
this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the board of a regional transit authority.
(3) "Service area" or "area" means the area included within the
boundaries of a regional transit authority.
(4) "System" means a regional transit system authorized under this
chapter and under the jurisdiction of a regional transit authority.
(5) "Facilities" means any lands, interest in land, air rights over
lands, and improvements thereto including vessel terminals, and any
equipment, vehicles, vessels, and other components necessary to support
the system.
(6) "Proof of payment" means evidence of fare prepayment authorized
by a regional transit authority for the use of trains, including but
not limited to commuter trains and light rail trains.
(7) "Subarea" means one of the five areas within an authority's
boundaries as identified in an authority's system plan adopted in May
1996.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.112.050 and 1998 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of formation, the area to be included within the
boundary of the authority shall be that area set forth in the system
plan adopted by the joint regional policy committee. Prior to
submitting the system and financing plan to the voters, the authority
may make adjustments to the boundaries as deemed appropriate but must
assure that, to the extent possible, the boundaries: (a) Include the
largest-population urban growth area designated by each county under
chapter 36.70A RCW; and (b) follow election precinct boundaries. If a
portion of any city is determined to be within the service area, the
entire city must be included within the boundaries of the authority.
(2) After voters within the authority boundaries have approved the
system and financing plan, elections to add areas contiguous to the
authority boundaries may be called by resolution of the regional
transit authority, after consultation with affected transit agencies
and with the concurrence of the legislative authority of the city or
town if the area is incorporated, or with the concurrence of the county
legislative authority if the area is unincorporated. Only those areas
that would benefit from the services provided by the authority may be
included and services or projects proposed for the area must be
consistent with the regional transportation plan. The election may
include a single ballot proposition providing for annexation to the
authority boundaries and imposition of the taxes at rates already
imposed within the authority boundaries.
(3) ((Upon receipt of a resolution requesting exclusion from the
boundaries of the authority from a city whose municipal boundaries
cross the boundaries of an authority and thereby result in only a
portion of the city being subject to local option taxes imposed by the
authority under chapters 81.104 and 81.112 RCW in order to implement a
high-capacity transit plan, and where the vote to approve the city's
incorporation occurred simultaneously with an election approving the
local option taxes, then upon a two-thirds majority vote of the
governing board of the authority, the governing board shall redraw the
boundaries of the authority to exclude that portion of the city that is
located within the authority's boundaries, and the excluded area is no
longer subject to local option taxes imposed by the authority. This
subsection expires December 31, 1998.)) For financing and project
purposes, any area annexed by an authority must be included in the most
appropriate subarea.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.112.070 and 1992 c 101 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the powers specifically granted by this chapter
an authority shall have all powers necessary to implement a high
capacity transportation system and to develop revenues for system
support. An authority may contract with the United States or any
agency thereof, any state or agency thereof, any public transportation
benefit area, any county, county transportation authority, city,
metropolitan municipal corporation, special district, or governmental
agency, within or without the state, and any private person, firm, or
corporation for: (((1))) (a) The purpose of receiving gifts or grants
or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and feasibility
studies; (((2))) (b) the design, construction, or operation of high
capacity transportation system facilities; or (((3))) (c) the provision
or receipt of services, facilities, or property rights to provide
revenues for the system. An authority shall have the power to contract
pursuant to RCW 39.33.050. In addition, an authority may contract with
any governmental agency or with any private person, firm, or
corporation for the use by either contracting party of all or any part
of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in lands, air rights
over lands and rights of way of all kinds which are owned, leased, or
held by the other party and for the purpose of planning, constructing,
or operating any facility or performing any service that the authority
may be authorized to operate or perform, on such terms as may be agreed
upon by the contracting parties. Before any contract for the lease or
operation of any authority facilities is let to any private person,
firm, or corporation, a general schedule of rental rates for equipment
with or without operators applicable to all private certificated
carriers shall be publicly posted, and for other facilities competitive
bids shall first be called upon such notice, bidder qualifications, and
bid conditions as the board shall determine. This shall allow use of
negotiated procurements.
(2) The board shall adopt policies that require the authority to
allocate the expenditure of tax revenues proportionately to the
subareas based on the amount of tax revenues each subarea generates.
The tax revenue allocated to a subarea may be used only to finance
costs incurred for projects within that subarea. The board shall adopt
policies that establish a fair and equitable method for determining pro
rata share of costs for projects that overlap subarea boundaries.

Sec. 4 RCW 81.112.130 and 1992 c 101 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding RCW 39.36.020(1), an authority may at any time
contract indebtedness or borrow money for authority purposes and may
issue general obligation bonds in an amount not exceeding, together
with any existing indebtedness of the authority not authorized by the
voters, one and one-half percent of the value of the taxable property
within the boundaries of the authority; and with the assent of three-fifths of the voters therein voting at an election called for that
purpose, may contract indebtedness or borrow money for authority
purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor, provided the
total indebtedness of the authority shall not exceed five percent of
the value of the taxable property therein. Such bonds shall be issued
and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.
(2)(a) As part of the bond financing plan for bonds issued after
the effective date of this act, an authority shall ensure that tax
revenues from a subarea are sufficient to meet the principal and
interest payments on bond proceeds that support projects within that
subarea, and indicate how the proceeds from the issuance of general
obligation bonds will be expended within the subareas.
(b) An authority shall conduct a public hearing at least thirty
days in advance of authorizing the issuance of general obligation bonds
or other certificates of indebtedness, during which time objections may
be raised. However, nothing in this subsection (2)(b) prohibits the
filing, at any time, of a cause of action concerning the issuance of
the bonds.
(c) An authority shall maintain separate accounts for the deposit
of bond proceeds that are to be used in the subareas and to receive
revenues for principal and interest payments on the bonds.
(d) The principal and interest on the bonds must be first payable
proportionately from the revenues of the subareas based upon the
respective pro rata share of expenditures made from the bond proceeds.
(3) The term "value of the taxable property" shall have the meaning
set forth in RCW 39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is remedial in nature and applies
to all regional transit authorities established before or after the
effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---