BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.101.005 and 1990 c 288 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that many individuals in the state of
Washington have attended college and received an associate of arts or
associate of science degree, or ((its)) the equivalent, but are
placebound.
The legislature intends to establish an educational opportunity
grant program for placebound students who have completed an associate
of arts or associate of science degree, or ((its)) the equivalent, in
an effort to increase their participation in and completion of upper-division programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.101.010 and 1990 c 288 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The educational opportunity grant program is hereby created ((as a
demonstration project)) to serve placebound financially needy students
by assisting them to obtain a baccalaureate degree at public and
private institutions of higher education ((which have the capacity to
accommodate such students within existing educational programs and
facilities)) approved for participation by the higher education
coordinating board.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.101.020 and 1990 c 288 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this chapter, "placebound" means unable to
((relocate to)) complete a college program because of family or
employment commitments, health concerns, monetary inability, or other
similar factors.
(2) To be eligible for an educational opportunity grant, applicants
must be placebound residents of the state of Washington as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d), who: (a) Are needy students as
defined in RCW 28B.10.802(3); and ((who)) (b) have completed the
associate of arts or associate of science degree or ((its)) the
equivalent. A placebound resident is one who may be influenced by the
receipt of an enhanced student financial aid award to ((attend an
institution that has existing unused capacity rather than attend a
branch campus established pursuant to chapter 28B.45 RCW)) complete a
baccalaureate degree at an eligible institution. An eligible
placebound applicant is further defined as a person ((whose residence
is located in an area served by a branch campus who, because of family
or employment commitments, health concerns, monetary need, or other
similar factors,)) who would be unable to complete ((an upper-division)) a baccalaureate course of study but for receipt of an
educational opportunity grant.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.101.040 and 2002 c 186 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Grants may be used by eligible participants to attend any public or
private college or university in the state of Washington that is
accredited by an accrediting association recognized by rule of the
higher education coordinating board for the program and that ((has an
existing unused capacity. Grants shall not be used to attend any
branch campus or educational program established under chapter 28B.45
RCW)) complies with eligibility criteria established by rule of the
higher education coordinating board. The participant shall not be
eligible for a grant if it will be used for any programs that include
religious worship, exercise, or instruction or to pursue a degree in
theology. ((Each participating student may receive up to two thousand
five hundred dollars per academic year, not to exceed)) Grant amounts
shall be established by the higher education coordinating board taking
into account such factors as cost of attendance, the student's
demonstrated financial need for the course of study((. Resident
students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(f) are not eligible for grants
under this chapter)), and the availability of other grant assistance.
Grants shall be at least two thousand five hundred dollars per academic
year.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.119.010 and 2002 c 204 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
promise scholarship program based on the following parameters:
(1) Scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW
((and)), students participating in home-based instruction as provided
in chapter 28A.200 RCW, and persons twenty-one years of age or younger
receiving a GED certificate, who meet both an academic and a financial
eligibility criteria.
(a) Academic eligibility criteria shall be defined as follows:
(i) Beginning with the graduating class of 2002, students
graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW must be in the top fifteen percent of their graduating
class, as identified by each respective high school at the completion
of the first term of the student's senior year; or
(ii) Students graduating from public high schools, approved private
high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, ((and)) students participating
in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW, and
persons twenty-one years of age or younger receiving a GED certificate,
must equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test I score of
twelve hundred on their first attempt or must equal or exceed a
composite American college test score of twenty-seven on their first
attempt.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state
median family income adjusted for family size, as determined by the
higher education coordinating board for each graduating class.
Students not meeting the eligibility requirements for the first year of
scholarship benefits may reapply for the second year of benefits, but
must still meet the income standard set by the board for the student's
graduating class.
(2) Promise scholarships are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the
board finds that promise scholarships supplant or reduce any grant,
scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the board
shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
scholarship to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.
(3) Within available funds, each qualifying student shall receive
two consecutive annual awards, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition rates charged by Washington's
community colleges. The higher education coordinating board shall
award scholarships to as many students as possible from among those
qualifying under this section.
(4) By October 15th of each year, the board shall determine the
award amount of the scholarships, after taking into consideration the
availability of funds.
(5) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of
Washington.
(6) The scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at
Oregon institutions of higher education that are part of the border
county higher education opportunity project in RCW 28B.80.806 when
those institutions offer programs not available at accredited
institutions of higher education in Washington state.
(7) The scholarships may be used for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and
materials.
(8) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(9) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
promise scholarship.
(10) The higher education coordinating board shall establish the
time frame within which the student must use the scholarship.

--- END ---