BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that to achieve the
goals of education reform and improve student learning and achievement,
the separate public education systems should strive to create a
seamless system of education from grades K-12 through higher education.
The legislature further finds that a seamless system is a system where
there is an easy transition from one system to another system. The
legislature further finds that a seamless system begins with close
collaboration and coordination between the state-level policy boards,
as well as the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
council of presidents, and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
Each year in September or December, an annual meeting shall focus
attention on the practical implementation of cross-sector education
policies. Participants in the annual meeting shall include the state
board of education, the higher education coordinating board, the state
board for community and technical colleges, the superintendent of
public instruction, the council of presidents, and legislators from the
higher education, education, and fiscal committees. A specific and
focused agenda for the annual meeting may include but is not limited to
issues of transition from K-12 to higher education; the role of college
placement or admissions tests and the Washington assessment of student
learning; new ways to challenge students in the eleventh and twelfth
grades; the role of college in the high school, and other dual credit
programs such as running start and advanced placement; preparation of
teachers in the college of education; and the role of guidance
counseling in both secondary and postsecondary education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
Each year in September or December, an annual meeting shall focus
attention on the practical implementation of cross-sector education
policies. Participants in the annual meeting shall include the state
board of education, the higher education coordinating board, the state
board for community and technical colleges, the superintendent of
public instruction, the council of presidents, and legislators from the
higher education, education, and fiscal committees. A specific and
focused agenda for the annual meeting may include but is not limited to
issues of transition from K-12 to higher education; the role of college
placement or admissions tests and the Washington assessment of student
learning; new ways to challenge students in the eleventh and twelfth
grades; the role of college in the high school, and other dual credit
programs such as running start and advanced placement; preparation of
teachers in the college of education; and the role of guidance
counseling in both secondary and postsecondary education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Each year in September or December, an annual meeting shall focus
attention on the practical implementation of cross-sector education
policies. Participants in the annual meeting shall include the state
board of education, the higher education coordinating board, the state
board for community and technical colleges, the superintendent of
public instruction, the council of presidents, and legislators from the
higher education, education, and fiscal committees. A specific and
focused agenda for the annual meeting may include but is not limited to
issues of transition from K-12 to higher education; the role of college
placement or admissions tests and the Washington assessment of student
learning; new ways to challenge students in the eleventh and twelfth
grades; the role of college in the high school, and other dual credit
programs such as running start and advanced placement; preparation of
teachers in the college of education; and the role of guidance
counseling in both secondary and postsecondary education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW
to read as follows:
Each year in September or December, an annual meeting shall focus
attention on the practical implementation of cross-sector education
policies. Participants in the annual meeting shall include the state
board of education, the higher education coordinating board, the state
board for community and technical colleges, the superintendent of
public instruction, the council of presidents, and legislators from the
higher education, education, and fiscal committees. A specific and
focused agenda for the annual meeting may include but is not limited to
issues of transition from K-12 to higher education; the role of college
placement or admissions tests and the Washington assessment of student
learning; new ways to challenge students in the eleventh and twelfth
grades; the role of college in the high school, and other dual credit
programs such as running start and advanced placement; preparation of
teachers in the college of education; and the role of guidance
counseling in both secondary and postsecondary education.

--- END ---