BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.703 and 1985 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((It shall be in the public purpose for)) All cities ((to)) and
towns may engage in economic development activities or programs. In
((addition, cities may)) order to meet its economic development goals
and objectives, any city or town or instrumentality thereof is
authorized, within its governmental or proprietary capacity as
determined by the legislative authority, to:
(1) Own and operate industrial and commercial parks, and
developments, and mixed use developments containing industrial and
commercial facilities, and in the exercise of such power shall have the
right to sell, lend, transfer, exchange, lease, or otherwise dispose of
related lands, buildings, and facilities to any state, province, or any
political subdivision or instrumentality thereof, or the federal
government or any Indian tribe, or to any other public or private
person or entity;
(2) Engage in programs to attract and retain businesses and
commercial enterprises, and develop and fund programs for job training,
retraining, and retention;
(3) Form nonprofit corporations and participate in the formation or
be members of joint ventures, partnerships, limited liability
companies, and all other forms of business enterprises consistent with
the provisions of Article VIII, section 7 of the Washington state
Constitution;
(4) Develop, construct, and operate infrastructure and public
facilities;
(5) Transfer or loan to the state, any city, county, special
purpose district, public development authority, or other political
subdivision or instrumentality thereof, or the federal government or
any Indian tribe, with or without consideration, any funds, real or
personal property, property interests, or services;
(6) Contract with for-profit and nonprofit corporations or other
entities in furtherance of this and other acts relating to economic
development; and
(7) Take such actions and engage in such activities as may be
otherwise permitted by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.21.680 and 1971 ex.s. c 177 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislative body of any city or town, is hereby authorized and
empowered in its discretion by resolution or ordinance passed by a
majority of the legislative body, to take whatever action it deems
necessary to enable the city or town to participate in the programs set
forth in the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-452; 78
Stat. 508), as amended. Such participation may be engaged in as a sole
city or town operation or in conjunction or cooperation with the state,
any other city or town, county, or municipal corporation, or any
private corporation qualified under said Economic Opportunity Act. In
addition, any city or town may participate in any state or federal
activity or program for economic development, job creation, and
community development.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.01.085 and 1985 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((It shall be in the public purpose for)) All counties ((to)) may
engage in economic development activities or programs. In ((addition,
counties may)) order to meet its economic goals and objectives, any
county or instrumentality thereof is authorized, within its
governmental or proprietary capacity as determined by legislative
authority, to:
(1) Own and operate industrial and commercial parks and
developments, and mixed use developments containing industrial and
commercial facilities, and in the exercise of such powers shall have
the right to sell, lend, transfer, exchange, lease, or otherwise
dispose of related lands, buildings, and facilities to any state,
province, or any political subdivision or instrumentality thereof, or
the federal government or any Indian tribe, or any other public or
private person or entity;
(2) Engage in programs to attract and retain businesses and
commercial enterprises, and develop and fund programs for job training,
retraining, and retention;
(3) Form nonprofit corporations and participate in the formation or
be members of joint ventures, partnerships, limited liability
companies, and all other forms of business enterprises consistent with
the provisions of Article VIII, section 7 of the Washington state
Constitution;
(4) Develop, construct, and operate infrastructure and public
facilities;
(5) Transfer or loan to the state, any city, county, special
purpose district, public development authority, or other political
subdivision or instrumentality thereof, or the federal government or
any Indian tribe, with or without consideration, any funds, real or
personal property, property interests, or services;
(6) Contract with for-profit and nonprofit corporations or other
entities in furtherance of this and other acts relating to economic
development; and
(7) Take such actions and engage in such activities as may be
otherwise permitted by law.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.32.410 and 1971 ex.s. c 177 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of county commissioners of any county is hereby
authorized and empowered in its discretion by resolution or ordinance
passed by a majority of the board, to take whatever action it deems
necessary to enable the county to participate in the programs set forth
in the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-452; 78 Stat.
508), as amended. Such participation may be engaged in as a sole
county operation or in conjunction or cooperation with the state, any
other county, city, or municipal corporation, or any private
corporation qualified under said Economic Opportunity Act. In
addition, any county may participate in any state or federal activity
or program for economic development, job creation, and community
development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The powers granted by this act are
supplemental to those previously authorized by law, and nothing in this
act shall be deemed to limit any other authority of cities, towns, and
counties. All prior actions consistent with the provisions of this act
are ratified, confirmed, and validated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---