BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2002 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. A county or city shall take legislative action
to review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive land use plan and
development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with
the requirements of this chapter according to the time periods
specified in subsection (4) of this section. A county or city not
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if
needed, revise its policies and development regulations regarding
critical areas and natural resource lands adopted according to this
chapter to ensure these policies and regulations comply with the
requirements of this chapter according to the time periods specified in
subsection (4) of this section. Legislative action means the adoption
of a resolution or ordinance following notice and a public hearing
indicating at a minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has
occurred and identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not
needed and the reasons therefore. The review and evaluation required
by this subsection may be combined with the review required by
subsection (3) of this section. The review and evaluation required by
this subsection shall include, but is not limited to, consideration of
critical area ordinances and, if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an
analysis of the population allocated to a city or county from the most
recent ten-year population forecast by the office of financial
management.
(b) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(c) A county that has a population density of fewer than fifty-five
persons per square mile, as determined by the office of financial
management, upon a declaration as specified in subsection (4)(d) of
this section is not subject to the requirements of this section to
review and revise its comprehensive plans and development regulations
and, upon a declaration as specified in subsection (4)(d) of this
section is not subject to the requirements of this section to review
and revise its critical area and natural resource land ordinances. Any
city located within a county where the county has a population density
of fewer than fifty-five persons per square mile, upon a declaration as
specified in subsection (4)(d) of this section is not subject to the
requirements of this section in the same manner as provided for
counties under this subsection (1)(c). However, any county or city
making such a declaration under this subsection that has a county
population density that grows to be equal to or more than fifty-five
persons per square mile must comply with all of the requirements of
this section and the time period specified in subsection (1)(c)(i) and
(ii).
(i) Two years from the date a county obtains a population density
of fifty-five or more persons per square mile, a county and the cities
therein must review and revise its comprehensive plans and development
regulations.
(ii) A county and the cities therein must review and revise their
policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and
natural resource lands adopted under this chapter within two years of
the county obtaining a population density of fifty-five or more persons
per square mile or fifteen years from the date of the most recent
adoption of a county's or city's critical area ordinance and natural
resource lands ordinance, whichever is earlier.
(d) The date a county obtains a population density of fifty-five or
more persons per square mile, for the purposes of (c) of this
subsection, is the date that county population projections are
published by the office of financial management annually.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the time
periods specified in subsection (4) of this section. Amendments may be
considered more frequently than once per year under the following
circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan that does not modify the
comprehensive plan policies and designations applicable to the subarea;
(ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; and
(iii) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board
or with the court.
(3) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas. The county comprehensive plan designating
urban growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth
areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each city located
within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the
urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding
twenty-year period. The review required by this subsection may be
combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) The department shall establish a schedule for counties and
cities to take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter. The schedule
established by the department shall provide for the reviews and
evaluations to be completed as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, and every seven years
thereafter, for ((Clallam,)) Clark, ((Jefferson,)) King, Kitsap,
Pierce, Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within
those counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, and every seven years
thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, ((Lewis, Mason,)) San Juan, and
Skagit((, and Skamania)) counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, and every seven years
thereafter, for Benton((, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas,)) and
Spokane((, and Yakima)) counties and the cities within those counties;
and
(d) For a county and the cities located within that county that
make a declaration not to be subject to the requirements of this
section, the time requirements of subsection (1)(c)(i) and (ii) of this
section apply. All counties and the cities therein that make a
declaration not to be subject to the requirements of this section must
provide written notice of that decision to the department of community,
trade, and economic development by no later than November 1, 2007. All
counties and the cities therein that do not provide such notice must
meet
all the requirements of this section on or before December 1,
2007, and every seven years thereafter((, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia,
Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan,
Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman
counties and the cities within those counties)).
(5)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (4) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(6) A county or city subject to the time periods in subsection
(4)(a) of this section that, pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the
county or city establishing a schedule for periodic review of its
comprehensive plan and development regulations, has conducted a review
and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development regulations
and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to that
review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first
review required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent
review and evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan
and development regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the
time periods established under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(7) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this
section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the
terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities in
compliance with the schedules in this section shall have the requisite
authority to receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees
from those accounts established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030. Only
those counties and cities in compliance with the schedules in this
section shall receive preference for grants or loans subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.17.250.

--- END ---