BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer may pay a new employee an initial wage rate equal
to the greater of seventy-five percent of the rate required under RCW
49.46.020 or the federal minimum wage rate for the first ninety days of
employment by the employee.
(2) An employer shall not terminate the employment of employees
after the ninety-day period for the primary purpose of obtaining the
reduced wage rate under subsection (1) of this section. If the
department determines that an employer has engaged in this practice,
the employer must remit the entire amount of wages for all employees
that would have been paid under this chapter without regard to
subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---