BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No political subdivision shall modify, in any respect, the
minimum wage requirements of this chapter through ordinance,
resolution, or other legislative action.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "political subdivision" means
a county, city, special purpose district, agency of the state, or any
other municipality or public body created under state law.

--- END ---