BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
An employer may pay a new employee, who is not an emancipated minor
under chapter 13.64 RCW, an initial wage rate equal to the greater of
seventy-five percent of the rate required under RCW 49.46.020 or the
federal minimum wage rate.

--- END ---