BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.371 and 1981 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Any device used or useful in the diagnosis or treatment of
disease or injury)) (1) A medical device which is not in violation of
the Medical Device Amendments of 1976, Public Law No. 94-295, 90 Stat.
539, as amended from time to time, and as interpreted by the Food and
Drug Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor, shall be deemed to be in compliance with all
requirements imposed by this chapter.
(2) The installation, maintenance, or repair of a medical device
deemed in compliance with this chapter is exempt from licensing
requirements under RCW 19.28.091, certification requirements under RCW
19.28.161, and inspection and permitting requirements under RCW
19.28.101. This exemption does not include work providing electrical
feeds into the power distribution unit or installation of conduits and
raceways. This exemption covers only those factory engineers or third-party service companies with equivalent training who are qualified to
perform such service.

--- END ---