BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.13.047 and 1985 c 45 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever state officers or measures are voted upon at a state
primary or general election held in an odd-numbered year under RCW
29.13.010, the state of Washington shall assume a prorated share of the
costs of that state primary or general election.
(2) Whenever state officers or measures are voted upon at a state
primary or general election held in an even-numbered year under RCW
29.13.010, the state of Washington shall assume a share of the costs of
the primary or election according to the following schedule:
(a) 2004, twenty-five percent;
(b) 2006, fifty percent;
(c) 2008, seventy-five percent; and
(d) 2010 and thereafter, one hundred percent.
(3) Whenever a primary or vacancy election is held to fill a
vacancy in the position of United States senator or United States
representative under chapter 29.68 RCW, the state of Washington shall
assume a prorated share of the costs of that primary or vacancy
election.
(((3))) (4) The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of
these expenses when prorating election costs under RCW 29.13.045 and
shall file such expense claims with the secretary of state.
(((4))) (5) The secretary of state shall include in his or her
biennial budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this section.
Reimbursements for election costs shall be from appropriations
specifically provided by law for that purpose.

--- END ---