BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the growth
management act encourages the annexation by cities and towns, as
providers of urban services, of the unincorporated portions of urban
growth areas. The legislature also finds that an impediment to
annexation is the lack of financial resources available to counties to
ensure that urban infrastructure is available in these areas. The
legislature also finds that the lack of infrastructure is a
disincentive to annexation. The legislature also finds that there is
a need to ensure that residents in these areas receive urban services
before, during, and after annexation. The legislature also finds that
interlocal agreements can provide for the delivery of these services
and that revenue sharing between the city and county will ensure
efficient and effective delivery of government services. It is the
purpose of this act to encourage counties and cities to develop
interlocal agreements prior to proposed annexations to ensure that the
affected parties are fully informed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.34 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to initiating an annexation, a city and town shall enter into
a general interlocal agreement with the county that governs annexations
by that city or town. The interlocal agreement may be supplemented to
address issues specific to an individual annexation. The general
interlocal annexation agreement must include the following:
(1) The agreement must include a statement of the goals of the
agreement. Goals may include, but are not limited to: Providing for
long and short-term transition of services; long and short-term
transition of staff; joint provision of services; community
involvement; revenue sharing; or debt distribution;
(2) The agreement must specify the subject areas and policies and
procedures the parties agree to undertake in annexations. The
potential subject areas covered by the agreements may include, but are
not limited to: Roads and traffic impact mitigation; surface and storm
water management; coordination and timing of comprehensive plan and
development regulation updates; parks, trails, recreation, and open
space; public utilities; outstanding bonds and special or improvement
district assessments; transfer of staff; transfer of records; transfer
of equipment; annexation procedures; and distribution of debt and
revenue sharing for annexation proposals, code enforcement, inspection
services, and financial and administrative services; and
(3) Only those counties and cities in compliance with this section
have the requisite authority to receive grants, loans, pledges, or
financial guarantees from those accounts established in RCW 43.155.050
and 70.146.030. Only those counties and cities in compliance with this
section may receive preference for grants or loans subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.17.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Once a city has initiated the development of a general
interlocal annexation agreement under section 2 of this act, the
agreement must be completed within ninety days, unless the parties
mutually agree to an extension of time.
(2) If the parties fail to reach a general interlocal annexation
agreement within the time period required under subsection (1) of this
section, either party may invoke mediated negotiation by notice to the
other party. Mediation must commence within thirty days. The city and
county shall select a mediator. Each party shall make available to the
mediator all relevant documents, including their respective proposals
for goals and policies and procedures, by subject area.
(3) An annexation interlocal agreement entered into prior to the
effective date of this section satisfies the requirements of this
section if both the city or town and county agree.

--- END ---