BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that this act
improve the scientific basis for making decisions in site selection for
wetlands mitigation projects.
The legislature further intends that this act maximize the cost-effectiveness of public and private investment in compensatory wetland
mitigation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that wetlands are
important aquatic resources that provide many valuable functions such
as flood control, ground water recharge, water filtration, water
purification, and erosion control. These functions make them important
to protect property and property values, promote quality neighborhoods,
and to protect and enhance wildlife and the wetlands' associated
ecosystems.
When impacts to wetlands are permitted, the creation, restoration,
or enhancement of other wetlands are generally required. The
legislature further finds that recent studies of the effectiveness of
compensatory wetland mitigation projects show that over seventy percent
are failing. The principal reasons stem from failure during the
permitting process to adequately investigate the practical
relationships between the proposed project and the local water
resources that will be associated with it. There has also been a
finding that, frequently, the original wetland functioned better than
the mitigated wetland, such that a net loss of wetland area and
functions frequently occurs in spite of the mitigation project.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.82.070 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
Watershed planning under this chapter shall address water quantity
in the management area by undertaking an assessment of water supply and
use in the management area and developing strategies for future use.
(1) The assessment shall include:
(a) An estimate of the surface and ground water present in the
management area;
(b) An estimate of the surface and ground water available in the
management area, taking into account seasonal and other variations;
(c) An estimate of the water in the management area represented by
claims in the water rights claims registry, water use permits,
certificated rights, existing minimum instream flow rules, federally
reserved rights, and any other rights to water;
(d) An estimate of the surface and ground water actually being used
in the management area;
(e) An estimate of the water needed in the future for use in the
management area;
(f) An identification of the location of areas where aquifers are
known to recharge surface bodies of water ((and)), the location of
areas known to provide for the recharge of aquifers from the surface,
and the relationship between these aquifers and nearby surface and
ground water; and
(g) An estimate of the surface and ground water available for
further appropriation, taking into account the minimum instream flows
adopted by rule or to be adopted by rule under this chapter for streams
in the management area including the data necessary to evaluate
necessary flows for fish.
(2) Strategies for increasing water supplies in the management
area, which may include, but are not limited to, increasing water
supplies through water conservation, water reuse, the use of reclaimed
water, voluntary water transfers, aquifer recharge and recovery,
additional water allocations, or additional water storage and water
storage enhancements. The objective of these strategies is to supply
water in sufficient quantities to satisfy the minimum instream flows
for fish and to provide water for future out-of-stream uses for water
identified in subsection (1)(e) and (g) of this section and to ensure
that adequate water supplies are available for agriculture, energy
production, and population and economic growth under the requirements
of the state's growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW. These
strategies, in and of themselves, shall not be construed to confer new
water rights. The watershed plan must address the strategies required
under this subsection.
(3) The assessment may include the identification of potential site
locations for water storage projects. The potential site locations may
be for either large or small projects and cover the full range of
possible alternatives. The possible alternatives include off-channel
storage, underground storage, the enlargement or enhancement of
existing storage, and on-channel storage.
(4) The assessment may also include an identification of the
location of areas where wetlands exist, areas that provide the
potential for wetlands restoration, and areas with potential for use in
wetlands mitigation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.74 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of ecology shall review wetlands compensatory
mitigation projects and evaluate the adequacy of hydrological
information presented by a project proponent to determine the
likelihood of success of the project.
(2) The department may require a hydrological assessment of the
site.
(3) The hydrological assessment must be sufficiently detailed to
demonstrate that the mitigation site will attain a hydrologic regime to
meet the goals presented in the proponent's compensatory mitigation
project.
(4) The hydrological assessment should identify the relationship
between the proponent's compensatory wetlands mitigation project and
the site's existing ground water and surface water.
(5) If a proposed wetlands compensation project targets specific
functions, the hydrological assessment must demonstrate that the site
will achieve a hydrologic regime needed to develop and support these
functions.

--- END ---