BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.267 and 2000 c 115 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a person issued an intermediate license is convicted of or found
to have committed a traffic offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or
violated restrictions placed on an intermediate license under RCW
46.20.075:
(1) On the first such conviction or finding the department shall
revoke the person's intermediate driver's license and mail the parent
or guardian of the person a ((letter warning the person of the
provisions of this section)) notification of the revocation. A person
may reapply for an intermediate license after a period of three months.
During the three-month period, a person may reapply for an instruction
permit;
(2) On the second such conviction or finding, the department shall
suspend the person's intermediate driver's license for a period of six
months or until the person reaches eighteen years of age, whichever
occurs first, and mail the parent or guardian of the person a
notification of the suspension;
(3) On the third such conviction or finding, the department shall
suspend the person's intermediate driver's license until the person
reaches eighteen years of age, and mail the parent or guardian of the
person a notification of the suspension.
For the purposes of this section, a single ticket for one or more
traffic offenses constitutes a single traffic offense.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.055 and 2002 c 352 s 10 and 2002 c 195 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee of fifteen dollars, and meets the following
requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction or
offered by a ((driving [driver])) driver training school licensed and
inspected by the department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW, that
includes practice driving. A person whose intermediate driver's
license has been revoked under RCW 46.20.267(1) need not reenroll in a
traffic safety program to obtain an instruction permit.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280(1).
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit; and
(b) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.075 and 2000 c 115 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An intermediate license authorizes the holder to drive a motor
vehicle under the conditions specified in this section. An applicant
for an intermediate license must be at least sixteen years of age and:
(a) Have possessed a valid instruction permit for a period of not
less than six months, or three months in the case of suspension of an
intermediate driver's license under RCW 46.20.267(1);
(b) Have passed a driver licensing examination administered by the
department;
(c) Have passed a course of driver's education in accordance with
the standards established in RCW 46.20.100;
(d) Present certification by his or her parent, guardian, or
employer to the department stating (i) that the applicant has had at
least fifty hours of driving experience, ten of which were at night,
during which the driver was supervised by a person at least twenty-one
years of age who has had a valid driver's license for at least three
years, and (ii) that the applicant has not been issued a notice of
traffic infraction or cited for a traffic violation that is pending at
the time of the application for the intermediate license;
(e) Not have been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic
violation within the last six months before the application for the
intermediate license, or three months in the case of suspension of an
intermediate driver's license under RCW 46.20.267(1); and
(f) Not have been adjudicated for an offense involving the use of
alcohol or drugs during the period the applicant held an instruction
permit.
(2) For the first six months after the issuance of an intermediate
license or until the holder reaches eighteen years of age, whichever
occurs first, the holder of the license may not operate a motor vehicle
that is carrying any passengers under the age of twenty who are not
members of the holder's immediate family as defined in RCW 42.17.020.
For the remaining period of the intermediate license, the holder may
not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying more than three passengers
who are under the age of twenty who are not members of the holder's
immediate family.
(3) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a motor
vehicle between the hours of 1 a.m. and 5 a.m. except when the holder
is accompanied by a parent, guardian, or a licensed driver who is at
least twenty-five years of age.
(4) It is a traffic infraction for the holder of an intermediate
license to operate a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions
imposed under this section.
(5) Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(6) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if necessary
for agricultural purposes.
(7) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if, for the
twelve-month period following the issuance of the intermediate license,
he or she:
(a) Has not been involved in an automobile accident; and
(b) Has not been convicted or found to have committed a traffic
offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or violated restrictions placed
on an intermediate licensee under this section.

--- END ---