BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that environmental
review and permitting, especially as applied to complex or
controversial projects, can be characterized by multiple overlapping
agency authorities, as a result of multiple governing statutes,
generally adopted in isolation from one another, whose purposes and
requirements are not integrated and cause correspondingly uncoordinated
implementation by administrative agencies. As a result, numerous and
differing project descriptions, inconsistent administrative records,
unproductive and redundant requirements, delays, and disproportionate
costs caused by all of these may impede the making of sound and
expeditious decisions by agencies and appropriate project changes by
permit applicants, contrary to the intent and purpose of environmental
review and permitting and the interests of permit applicants and the
public.
A single project may be governed by local, state, federal, and
tribal laws. A single project may be subject to all of the following
requirements and others not listed here: (1) Federal section 404
permit, section 7 consultation, essential fish habitat consultation,
section 401 water quality certification, section 402 waste discharge
permit, section 402 general permit, section 4(f) parks and recreational
lands use approval, superfund clean-up requirements, air quality
conformity, underground storage tank removal, and coastal zone
management program consistency certification; (2) state storm water
pollution control plan approval, hydraulic project approval, aquatic
lands use approval, historic and archaeological approval,
archaeological excavation and removal permit, state model toxics
control act clean-up requirements, asbestos removal, and air quality
operating permit; (3) local shoreline substantial development permit,
conditional use permit or variance, shoreline design review, critical
areas ordinance review, historic district approval, street use permit,
demolition permit, grading permit, noise variance, storm water and
drainage control approval, and utility approval.
The legislature finds that the public, as well as permit
applicants, agencies, and affected parties, will benefit from an
environmental review and permitting system that integrates and makes
easily accessible the requirements and documentation for agency
decision making, facilitating timely and effective participation in the
process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature intends to proceed in steps
to develop and adopt an integrated permit system, working through the
office of permit assistance, in cooperation with the department of
transportation, the transportation permit efficiency and accountability
committee, and local, state, federal, and tribal regulatory agencies.
When implemented, the integrated permit system would integrate project
design, environmental review, permitting, and mitigation elements into
a single process. Major components of the integrated permit system are
a unified project decision support document and a unified project
administrative procedure. A unified project decision support document
is intended to be a single document proactively developed to support
and satisfy all needs for information, analysis, and evaluation;
document and justify incremental project decisions; inform the public
and interested parties; and support integration of project design,
environmental review, permitting, and mitigation elements. A unified
project administrative procedure is intended to harmonize, reduce, or
eliminate duplicative or conflicting requirements for environmental
analysis, agency decision making, public review and comment, and
administrative and judicial review. A unified project decision support
document can probably be implemented by intergovernmental agreement
under existing law. A unified project administrative procedure will
probably require changes to existing law.
The legislature intends by this act to authorize, through a pilot
project, development of a guidance document for implementation of a
unified project decision support document and development of
recommendations for an integrated permit system and for changes to
existing law needed for implementation of a unified project
administrative procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By December 1, 2005, the office of
permit assistance shall develop a guidance document for creating a
unified project decision support document for state and federal
agencies and local governments that will be sufficient to support all
regulatory decision making.
The office shall, in consultation with the department of
transportation and the transportation permit efficiency and
accountability committee, test and, as necessary, revise and add to the
"unified permit binder" currently being developed by the department of
transportation to provide a standardized outline, checklists, and
templates for preparation of a single master support document for all
regulatory decision making concerning a project. The office shall
address regulatory decision-making processes under existing substantive
authorities and administrative procedures, applicable existing
statutory requirements for environmental review and permitting,
information necessary for decision making, and existing requirements
for public and agency involvement and its documentation. The resulting
document shall be designed to be a complete, concise, and logically
organized guidance document for creating a unified project decision
support document for state and federal agencies and local governments.
(2) By December 1, 2005, the office shall develop recommendations
for an integrated permit system to integrate project design,
environmental review, permitting, and mitigation; develop
recommendations for legislative changes to statutory authorizations and
administrative procedures needed to establish the system; and develop
detailed recommendations for full-scale testing of the system through
one or more pilot projects.
The elements of the integrated permit system shall include use of
a unified project decision support document available on the internet
for purposes of public review and comment and for decision making by
agencies and local governments with jurisdiction over the project; a
unified project administrative procedure for regulatory decision making
that eliminates duplicative, conflicting, or unproductive requirements
for environmental analysis, public review and comment, and
administrative and judicial review; and such other elements as the
office may recommend including, but not limited to, regulation
decision-making timelines and dispute resolution protocols.
(3) The office shall fulfill the requirements of subsections (1)
and (2) of this section using a pilot project of economic development
significance, after obtaining agreement to participate in the pilot
project from the project proponent and the state agencies and local
governments with jurisdiction. As needed, the office may also seek
agreement to participate from federal and tribal agencies with
jurisdiction.
(4) The office shall submit a report to the standing legislative
committees with jurisdiction by December 1, 2003, and December 1, 2004,
regarding progress on subsections (1) and (2) of this section and by
December 1, 2005, upon completion of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.

--- END ---