BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Recognizing there are individuals who
believe they are undertaxed and that advocate a greater tax burden for
Washingtonians, it is hereby the declared policy of this state to
provide such individuals with the opportunity to contribute more of
their income to state government and to this end there is hereby
created in the state treasury the "tax-me-more account." Any person
who believes they are undertaxed may contribute any amount of money
they so choose to the account. The account shall consist of money
received from contributions, donations, gifts, bequests, grants, or
other sources granted or given for this account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax-me-more account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from citizens' voluntary contributions, donations, gifts,
bequests, grants, or other sources granted or given for this account
must be deposited in the account. Money in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used
for any general fund or transportation purposes.

--- END ---