BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.155 and 2001 c 41 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
Before issuing an original license or identification card or
renewing a license or identification card under this chapter, the
licensing agent shall determine if the applicant wants to register to
vote or transfer his or her voter registration by asking the following
questions:

First: "Do you want to register to vote or transfer your voter
registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register or transfer a registration,
the agent shall ((state)) ask the following:

(("I would like to remind you that you must be)) Second: "Are you
a United States citizen and at least eighteen years of age ((in order
to vote.))?"

If the applicant responds in the affirmative the agent shall then
provide the applicant with a voter registration form and instructions
and shall record that the applicant has requested to register to vote
or transfer a voter registration.

--- END ---