BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known as the Transportation
Efficiency Act of 2003.

PART I
REFORMING TRANSPORTATION GOVERNANCEABOLISHING THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION AND GUBERNATORIAL APPOINTMENT
OF THE SECRETARY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 101 RCW 47.01.021 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
As used in this title unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Department" means the department of transportation created in
RCW 47.01.031;
(2) "Commission" means the ((transportation commission created in
RCW 47.01.051)) secretary of transportation;
(3) "Committee" means the legislative transportation committee
created in chapter 44.40 RCW;
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of transportation as provided
for in RCW 47.01.041.

Sec. 102 RCW 47.01.041 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 53 s 28 are each
amended to read as follows:
The executive head of the department of transportation shall be the
secretary of transportation, who shall be appointed by the
((transportation commission)) governor and confirmed by the senate, and
shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with
the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. ((The secretary shall be an ex
officio member of the commission without a vote. The secretary shall
be the chief executive officer of the commission and be responsible to
it, and shall be guided by policies established by it.)) The secretary
shall serve ((until removed by the commission, but only for incapacity,
incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance in office, or failure to
carry out the commission's policies. Before a motion for dismissal
shall be acted on by the commission, the secretary shall be granted a
hearing on formal written charges before the full commission. An
action by the commission to remove the secretary shall be final)) at
the pleasure of the governor.

Sec. 103 RCW 43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary of
health, and (15) the director of financial institutions.
Such officers, except the ((secretary of transportation and the))
director of fish and wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with
the consent of the senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the
governor. ((The secretary of transportation shall be appointed by the
transportation commission as prescribed by RCW 47.01.041.)) The
director of fish and wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and
wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

TRANSFERRING POWERS OF THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION TO THE
LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Sec. 104 RCW 43.160.010 and 1999 c 164 s 101 and 1999 c 94 s 5
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that it is the public policy of the state
of Washington to direct financial resources toward the fostering of
economic development through the stimulation of investment and job
opportunities and the retention of sustainable existing employment for
the general welfare of the inhabitants of the state. Reducing
unemployment and reducing the time citizens remain jobless is important
for the economic welfare of the state. A valuable means of fostering
economic development is the construction of public facilities which
contribute to the stability and growth of the state's economic base.
Strengthening the economic base through issuance of industrial
development bonds, whether single or umbrella, further serves to reduce
unemployment. Consolidating issues of industrial development bonds
when feasible to reduce costs additionally advances the state's purpose
to improve economic vitality. Expenditures made for these purposes as
authorized in this chapter are declared to be in the public interest,
and constitute a proper use of public funds. A community economic
revitalization board is needed which shall aid the development of
economic opportunities. The general objectives of the board should
include:
(a) Strengthening the economies of areas of the state which have
experienced or are expected to experience chronically high unemployment
rates or below average growth in their economies;
(b) Encouraging the diversification of the economies of the state
and regions within the state in order to provide greater seasonal and
cyclical stability of income and employment;
(c) Encouraging wider access to financial resources for both large
and small industrial development projects;
(d) Encouraging new economic development or expansions to maximize
employment;
(e) Encouraging the retention of viable existing firms and
employment; and
(f) Providing incentives for expansion of employment opportunities
for groups of state residents that have been less successful relative
to other groups in efforts to gain permanent employment.
(2) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by, in certain instances, providing
funds to improve state highways, county roads, or city streets for
industries considering locating or expanding in this state.
(a) The legislature finds it desirable to provide a process whereby
the need for diverse public works improvements necessitated by planned
economic development can be addressed in a timely fashion and with
coordination among all responsible governmental entities.
(b) Transportation improvements on state highways that have been
approved by the community economic revitalization board must be
approved by the legislative transportation ((commission)) committee in
accordance with the procedures established by RCW 43.160.074 and
47.01.280 to receive funding.
(3) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by, in certain instances, providing
funds to assist development of telecommunications infrastructure that
supports business development, retention, and expansion in rural
natural resources impact areas and rural counties of the state.
(4) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by providing funds to improve
markets for those recyclable materials representing a large fraction of
the waste stream. The legislature finds that public facilities which
result in private construction of processing or remanufacturing
facilities for recyclable materials are eligible for consideration from
the board.
(5) The legislature finds that sharing economic growth statewide is
important to the welfare of the state. Rural counties and rural
natural resources impact areas do not share in the economic vitality of
the Puget Sound region. The ability of these communities to pursue
business and job retention, expansion, and development opportunities
depends on their capacity to ready necessary economic development
project plans, sites, permits, and infrastructure for private
investments. Project-specific planning, predevelopment, and
infrastructure are critical ingredients for economic development.
Rural counties and rural natural resources impact areas generally lack
these necessary tools and resources to diversify and revitalize their
economies. It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to increase
the amount of funding available through the community economic
revitalization board for rural counties and rural natural resources
impact areas, and to authorize flexibility for available resources in
these areas to help fund planning, predevelopment, and construction
costs of infrastructure and facilities and sites that foster economic
vitality and diversification.

Sec. 105 RCW 43.160.074 and 1985 c 433 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An application to the board from a political subdivision may
also include a request for improvements to an existing state highway or
highways. The application is subject to all of the applicable criteria
relative to qualifying types of development set forth in this chapter,
as well as procedures and criteria established by the board.
(2) Before board consideration of an application from a political
subdivision that includes a request for improvements to an existing
state highway or highways, the application shall be forwarded by the
board to the legislative transportation ((commission)) committee.
(3) The board may not make its final determination on any
application made under subsection (1) of this section before receiving
approval, as submitted or amended or disapproval from the legislative
transportation ((commission)) committee as specified in RCW 47.01.280.
Notwithstanding its disposition of the remainder of any such
application, the board may not approve a request for improvements to an
existing state highway or highways without the approval as submitted or
amended of the legislative transportation ((commission)) committee as
specified in RCW 47.01.280.
(4) The board shall notify the legislative transportation
((commission)) committee of its decision regarding any application made
under this section.

Sec. 106 RCW 36.57A.070 and 1985 c 6 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The comprehensive transit plan adopted by the authority shall be
reviewed by the ((state)) legislative transportation ((commission))
committee to determine:
(1) The completeness of service to be offered and the economic
viability of the transit system proposed in such comprehensive transit
plan;
(2) Whether such plan integrates the proposed transportation system
with existing transportation modes and systems that serve the benefit
area;
(3) Whether such plan coordinates that area's system and service
with nearby public transportation systems;
(4) Whether such plan is eligible for matching state or federal
funds;
After reviewing the comprehensive transit plan, the ((state))
legislative transportation ((commission shall have)) committee has
sixty days in which to approve such plan and to certify to the state
treasurer that such public transportation benefit area shall be
eligible to receive the motor vehicle excise tax proceeds authorized
pursuant to RCW 35.58.273, as now or hereafter amended in the manner
prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW, as now or hereafter amended. To be
approved a plan shall provide for coordinated transportation planning,
the integration of such proposed transportation program with other
transportation systems operating in areas adjacent to, or in the
vicinity of the proposed public transportation benefit area, and be
consistent with the public transportation coordination criteria adopted
pursuant to the urban mass transportation act of 1964 as amended as of
July 1, 1975. In the event such comprehensive plan is disapproved and
ruled ineligible to receive motor vehicle tax proceeds, the ((state))
legislative transportation ((commission)) committee shall provide
written notice to the authority within thirty days as to the reasons
for such plan's disapproval and such ineligibility. The authority may
resubmit such plan upon reconsideration and correction of such
deficiencies in the plan cited in such notice of disapproval.

Sec. 107 RCW 36.79.010 and 1997 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Rural arterial program" means improvement projects on those
county roads in rural areas classified as rural arterials and
collectors in accordance with the federal functional classification
system and the construction of replacement bridges funded by the
federal bridge replacement program on access roads in rural areas.
(2) "Rural area" means every area of the state outside of areas
designated as urban areas by the ((state)) legislative transportation
((commission)) committee with the approval of the secretary of the
United States Department of Transportation in accordance with federal
law.
(3) "Board" means the county road administration board created by
RCW 36.78.030.

Sec. 108 RCW 36.79.120 and 1988 c 26 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Counties receiving funds from the rural arterial trust account for
construction of arterials and the construction of replacement bridges
funded by the federal bridge replacement program on access roads in
rural areas shall provide such matching funds as established by rules
recommended by the board, subject to review, revision, and final
approval by the ((state)) legislative transportation ((commission))
committee. Matching requirements shall be established after
appropriate studies by the board, taking into account financial
resources available to counties to meet arterial needs.

Sec. 109 RCW 36.79.130 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
Not later than November 1st of each even-numbered year the board
shall prepare and present to the ((state)) legislative transportation
((commission)) committee a recommended budget for expenditures from the
rural arterial trust account during the ensuing biennium. The budget
shall contain an estimate of the revenues to be credited to the rural
arterial trust account.
The ((state)) legislative transportation ((commission)) committee
shall review the budget as recommended, revise the budget as it deems
proper, and include the budget as revised as a separate section of the
transportation budget which it shall submit to the governor pursuant to
chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 110 RCW 36.120.020 and 2002 c 56 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional transportation
investment district.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(3) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the legislative transportation ((commission))
committee, its successor entity, or the legislature.
(4) "Lead agency" means a public agency that by law can plan,
design, and build a transportation project and has been so designated
by the district.
(5) "Regional transportation investment district" or "district"
means a municipal corporation whose boundaries are coextensive with two
or more contiguous counties and that has been created by county
legislative authorities and a vote of the people under this chapter to
implement a regional transportation investment plan.
(6) "Regional transportation investment district planning
committee" or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created
under RCW 36.120.030 to create and propose to county legislative
authorities a regional transportation investment plan to develop,
finance, and construct transportation projects.
(7) "Regional transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a
plan to develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or
projects.
(8) "Transportation project" means:
(a) A capital improvement or improvements to a highway that has
been designated, in whole or in part, as a highway of statewide
significance, including an extension, that:
(i) Adds a lane or new lanes to an existing state or federal
highway; or
(ii) Repairs or replaces a lane or lanes damaged by an event
declared an emergency by the governor before January 1, 2002.
(b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
highway of statewide significance, including an extension, and may
include the following associated multimodal capital improvements:
(i) Approaches to highways of statewide significance;
(ii) High-occupancy vehicle lanes;
(iii) Flyover ramps;
(iv) Park and ride lots;
(v) Bus pullouts;
(vi) Vans for vanpools;
(vii) Buses; and
(viii) Signalization, ramp metering, and other transportation
system management improvements.
(c) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
city street, county road, or existing highway or the creation of a new
highway that intersects with a highway of statewide significance, if
all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The project is included in a plan that makes highway
improvement projects that add capacity to a highway or highways of
statewide significance;
(ii) The secretary of transportation determines that the project
would better relieve traffic congestion than investing that same money
in adding capacity to a highway of statewide significance;
(iii) Matching money equal to one-third of the total cost of the
project is provided by local entities, including but not limited to a
metropolitan planning organization, county, city, port, or private
entity in which a county participating in a plan is located. Local
entities may use federal grants to meet this matching requirement;
(iv) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed ten percent of the revenues generated by the
district;
(v) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed one billion dollars; and
(vi) The specific projects are included within the plan and
submitted as part of the plan to a vote of the people.
(d) Operations, preservation, and maintenance are excluded from
this definition and may not be included in a regional transportation
investment plan.
(9) "Weighted vote" means a vote that reflects the population each
board or planning committee member represents relative to the
population represented by the total membership of the board or planning
committee. Population will be determined using the federal 2000 census
or subsequent federal census data.

Sec. 111 RCW 47.64.011 and 1983 c 15 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
definitions in this section shall apply.
(1) "Arbitration" means the procedure whereby the parties involved
in an impasse submit their differences to a third party for a final and
binding decision or as provided in this chapter.
(2) "Arbitrator" means either a single arbitrator or a panel of
three arbitrators as provided in RCW 47.64.240.
(3) "Collective bargaining representative" means the persons
designated by the secretary of transportation and employee
organizations to be the exclusive representatives during collective
bargaining negotiations.
(4) "Department of transportation" means the department as defined
in RCW 47.01.021.
(5) "Ferry employee" means any employee of the marine
transportation division of the department of transportation who is a
member of a collective bargaining unit represented by a ferry employee
organization and does not include an exempt employee pursuant to RCW
41.06.079.
(6) "Ferry employee organization" means any labor organization
recognized to represent a collective bargaining unit of ferry
employees.
(7) "Ferry system management" means those management personnel of
the marine transportation division of the department of transportation
who have been vested with the day-to-day management responsibilities of
the Washington state ferry system by the legislative transportation
((commission)) committee and who are not members of a collective
bargaining unit represented by a ferry employee organization.
(8) "Lockout" means the refusal of ferry system management to
furnish work to ferry employees in an effort to get ferry employee
organizations to make concessions during collective bargaining,
grievance, or other labor relation negotiations. Curtailment of
employment of ferry employees due to lack of work resulting from a
strike or work stoppage, as defined in subsection (11) of this section,
shall not be considered a lockout.
(9) "Marine employees' commission" means the commission created in
RCW 47.64.280.
(10) "Office of financial management" means the office as created
in RCW 43.41.050.
(11) "Strike or work stoppage" means a ferry employee's refusal, in
concerted action with others, to report to duty, or his or her willful
absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage or slowdown of
work, or his or her abstinence in whole or in part from the full,
faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment, for the
purpose of inducing, influencing, or coercing a change in conditions,
compensation, rights, privileges, or obligations of his, her, or any
other ferry employee's employment. A refusal, in good faith, to work
under conditions which pose an endangerment to the health and safety of
ferry employees or the public, as determined by the master of the
vessel, shall not be considered a strike for the purposes of this
chapter.
(12) "Legislative transportation ((commission)) committee" means
the ((commission)) committee as defined in chapter 44.40 RCW
((47.01.021)).

Sec. 112 RCW 47.64.170 and 1983 c 15 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any ferry employee organization certified as the bargaining
representative shall be the exclusive representative of all ferry
employees in the bargaining unit and shall represent all such employees
fairly.
(2) A ferry employee organization or organizations and the
secretary of transportation may each designate any individual as its
representative to engage in collective bargaining negotiations.
(3) Negotiating sessions, including strategy meetings of ferry
system management or employee organizations, mediation, and the
deliberative process of arbitrators are exempt from the provisions of
chapter 42.30 RCW. Hearings conducted by arbitrators may be open to
the public by mutual consent of the parties. Any meeting of the
legislative transportation ((commission)) committee, during which a
collective bargaining agreement is subject to ratification, shall be
open to the public.
(4) Terms of any collective bargaining agreement may be enforced by
civil action in Thurston county superior court upon the initiative of
either party.
(5) Ferry system employees or any employee organization shall not
negotiate or attempt to negotiate directly with a member of the
legislative transportation ((commission)) committee if the
((commission)) committee has appointed or authorized a bargaining
representative for the purpose of bargaining with the ferry employees
or their representative, unless the member of the ((commission))
committee is the designated bargaining representative of the ferry
system.
(6) The negotiation of a proposed collective bargaining agreement
by representatives of ferry system management and a ferry employee
organization shall commence in each odd-numbered year immediately
following adoption by the legislature and approval by the governor of
the biennial budget.
(7) Until a new collective bargaining agreement is negotiated, or
until an award is made by the arbitrator, the terms and conditions of
the previous collective bargaining agreement shall remain in force.
The wage and benefit provisions of any collective bargaining agreement,
or arbitrator's award in lieu thereof, that is concluded after July 1st
of an odd-numbered year shall be retroactive to July 1st. It is the
intent of this section that the collective bargaining agreement or
arbitrator's award shall commence on July 1st of each odd-numbered year
and shall terminate on June 30th of the next odd-numbered year to
coincide with the ensuing biennial budget year, as defined by RCW
43.88.020(7), to the extent practical.
(8) Any ferry union contract terminating before July 1, 1983,
shall, with the agreement of the parties, remain in effect until a
contract can be concluded under RCW 47.64.006, 47.64.011, and 47.64.120
through 47.64.280. The contract may be retroactive to the expiration
date of the prior contract, and the cost to the department of three
months retroactive compensation and benefits for this 1983 contract
negotiation only shall not be included in calculating the limitation
imposed by RCW 47.64.180. If the parties cannot agree to contract
extension, any increase agreed to for the three-month period shall be
included in calculating the limit imposed by RCW 47.64.180.
(9) Any ferry union contract which would terminate after July 1,
1983, may, by agreement of the parties, be terminated as of July 1,
1983, and a new contract concluded pursuant to RCW 47.64.006,
47.64.011, and 47.64.120 through 47.64.280. Any contract terminating
after July 1, 1983, is subject to this chapter only upon its expiration
and shall not be renewed for a period beyond July 1, 1985.

Sec. 113 RCW 47.80.060 and 1992 c 101 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to qualify for state planning funds available to regional
transportation planning organizations, the regional transportation
planning organizations containing any county with a population in
excess of one million shall provide voting membership on its executive
board to the ((state)) legislative transportation ((commission))
committee, the state department of transportation, and the three
largest public port districts within the region as determined by gross
operating revenues. It shall further assure that at least fifty
percent of the county and city local elected officials who serve on the
executive board also serve on transit agency boards or on a regional
transit authority.

Sec. 114 RCW 46.44.042 and 1996 c 116 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the maximum gross weights specified in RCW 46.44.041, it
is unlawful to operate any vehicle upon the public highways with a
gross weight, including load, upon any tire concentrated upon the
surface of the highway in excess of six hundred pounds per inch width
of such tire. An axle manufactured after July 31, 1993, carrying more
than ten thousand pounds gross weight must be equipped with four or
more tires. Effective January 1, 1997, an axle carrying more than ten
thousand pounds gross weight must have four or more tires, regardless
of date of manufacture. Instead of the four or more tires per axle
requirements of this section, an axle may be equipped with two tires
limited to five hundred pounds per inch width of tire. This section
does not apply to vehicles operating under oversize or overweight
permits, or both, issued under RCW 46.44.090, while carrying a
nonreducible load.
The following equipment may operate at six hundred pounds per inch
width of tire: (1) A nonliftable steering axle or axles on the power
unit; (2) a tiller axle on fire fighting apparatus; (3) a rear booster
trailing axle equipped with two tires on a ready-mix concrete transit
truck; and (4) a straddle trailer manufactured before January 1, 1996,
equipped with single-tire axles or a single axle using a walking beam
supported by two in-line single tires and used exclusively for the
transport of fruit bins between field, storage, and processing. A
straddle trailer manufactured after January 1, 1996, meeting this use
criteria may carry five hundred fifteen pounds per inch width of tire
on sixteen and one-half inch wide tires.
For the purpose of this section, the width of tire in case of solid
rubber or hollow center cushion tires, so long as the use thereof may
be permitted by the law, shall be measured between the flanges of the
rim. For the purpose of this section, the width of tires in case of
pneumatic tires shall be the maximum overall normal inflated width as
stipulated by the manufacturer when inflated to the pressure specified
and without load thereon.
The department of transportation, under rules adopted by the
legislative transportation ((commission)) committee with respect to
state highways, and a local authority, with respect to a public highway
under its jurisdiction, may extend the weight table in RCW 46.44.041 to
one hundred fifteen thousand pounds. However, the extension must be in
compliance with federal law, and vehicles operating under the extension
must be in full compliance with the 1997 axle and tire requirements
under this section.

Sec. 115 RCW 46.44.080 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 29 are each amended
to read as follows:
Local authorities with respect to public highways under their
jurisdiction may prohibit the operation thereon of motor trucks or
other vehicles or may impose limits as to the weight thereof, or any
other restrictions as may be deemed necessary, whenever any such public
highway by reason of rain, snow, climatic or other conditions, will be
seriously damaged or destroyed unless the operation of vehicles thereon
be prohibited or restricted or the permissible weights thereof reduced:
PROVIDED, That whenever a highway has been closed generally to vehicles
or specified classes of vehicles, local authorities shall by general
rule or by special permit authorize the operation thereon of school
buses, emergency vehicles, and motor trucks transporting perishable
commodities or commodities necessary for the health and welfare of
local residents under such weight and speed restrictions as the local
authorities deem necessary to protect the highway from undue damage:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the governing authorities of incorporated cities
and towns shall not prohibit the use of any city street designated by
the legislative transportation ((commission)) committee as forming a
part of the route of any primary state highway through any such
incorporated city or town by vehicles or any class of vehicles or
impose any restrictions or reductions in permissible weights unless
such restriction, limitation, or prohibition, or reduction in
permissible weights be first approved in writing by the department of
transportation.
The local authorities imposing any such restrictions or
limitations, or prohibiting any use or reducing the permissible weights
shall do so by proper ordinance or resolution and shall erect or cause
to be erected and maintained signs designating the provisions of the
ordinance or resolution in each end of the portion of any public
highway affected thereby, and no such ordinance or resolution shall be
effective unless and until such signs are erected and maintained.
The department shall have the same authority as hereinabove granted
to local authorities to prohibit or restrict the operation of vehicles
upon state highways. The department shall give public notice of
closure or restriction. The department may issue special permits for
the operation of school buses and motor trucks transporting perishable
commodities or commodities necessary for the health and welfare of
local residents under specified weight and speed restrictions as may be
necessary to protect any state highway from undue damage.

Sec. 116 RCW 46.44.096 and 1996 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In determining fees according to RCW 46.44.0941, mileage on state
primary and secondary highways shall be determined from the planning
survey records of the department of transportation, and the gross
weight of the vehicle or vehicles, including load, shall be declared by
the applicant. Overweight on which fees shall be paid will be gross
loadings in excess of loadings authorized by law or axle loadings in
excess of loadings authorized by law, whichever is the greater. Loads
which are overweight and oversize shall be charged the fee for the
overweight permit without additional fees being assessed for the
oversize features.
Special permits issued under RCW 46.44.047, 46.44.0941, or
46.44.095, may be obtained from offices of the department of
transportation, ports of entry, or other agents appointed by the
department.
The department may appoint agents for the purposes of selling
special motor vehicle permits, temporary additional tonnage permits,
and log tolerance permits. Agents so appointed may retain three
dollars and fifty cents for each permit sold to defray expenses
incurred in handling and selling the permits. If the fee is collected
by the department of transportation, the department shall certify the
fee so collected to the state treasurer for deposit to the credit of
the motor vehicle fund.
The department may select a third party contractor, by means of
competitive bid, to perform the department's permit issuance function,
as provided under RCW 46.44.090. Factors the department shall
consider, but is not limited to, in the selection of a third party
contractor are economic benefit to both the department and the motor
carrier industry, and enhancement of the overall level of permit
service. For purposes of this section, "third party contractor" means
a business entity that is authorized by the department to issue special
permits. The legislative transportation ((commission)) committee may
adopt rules specifying the criteria that a business entity must meet in
order to qualify as a third party contractor under this section.
Fees established in RCW 46.44.0941 shall be paid to the political
body issuing the permit if the entire movement is to be confined to
roads, streets, or highways for which that political body is
responsible. When a movement involves a combination of state highways,
county roads, and/or city streets the fee shall be paid to the state
department of transportation. When a movement is confined within the
city limits of a city or town upon city streets, including routes of
state highways on city streets, all fees shall be paid to the city or
town involved. A permit will not be required from city or town
authorities for a move involving a combination of city or town streets
and state highways when the move through a city or town is being
confined to the route of the state highway. When a move involves a
combination of county roads and city streets the fee shall be paid to
the county authorities, but the fee shall not be collected nor the
county permit issued until valid permits are presented showing that the
city or town authorities approve of the move in question. When the
movement involves only county roads the fees collected shall be paid to
the county involved. Fees established shall be paid to the political
body issuing the permit if the entire use of the vehicle during the
period covered by the permit shall be confined to the roads, streets,
or highways for which that political body is responsible.

Sec. 117 RCW 46.44.090 and 2001 c 262 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of transportation, pursuant to rules adopted by the
legislative transportation ((commission)) committee with respect to
state highways, and local authorities, with respect to public highways
under their jurisdiction, may, upon application in writing and good
cause being shown therefor, issue a special permit in writing, or
electronically, authorizing the applicant to operate or move a vehicle
or combination of vehicles of a size, weight of vehicle, or load
exceeding the maximum set forth in RCW 46.44.010, 46.44.020, 46.44.030,
46.44.034, and 46.44.041 upon any public highway under the jurisdiction
of the authority granting such permit and for the maintenance of which
such authority is responsible.

Sec. 118 RCW 46.44.092 and 1989 c 398 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Special permits may not be issued for movements on any state
highway outside the limits of any city or town in excess of the
following widths:
On two-lane highways, fourteen feet;
On multiple-lane highways where a physical barrier serving as a
median divider separates opposing traffic lanes, twenty feet;
On multiple-lane highways without a physical barrier serving as a
median divider, thirty-two feet.
These limits apply except under the following conditions:
(1) In the case of buildings, the limitations referred to in this
section for movement on any two lane state highway other than the
national system of interstate and defense highways may be exceeded
under the following conditions: (a) Controlled vehicular traffic shall
be maintained in one direction at all times; (b) the maximum distance
of movement shall not exceed five miles; additional contiguous permits
shall not be issued to exceed the five-mile limit: PROVIDED, That when
the department of transportation, pursuant to general rules adopted by
the legislative transportation ((commission)) committee, determines a
hardship would result, this limitation may be exceeded upon approval of
the department of transportation; (c) prior to issuing a permit a
qualified transportation department employee shall make a visual
inspection of the building and route involved determining that the
conditions listed herein shall be complied with and that structures or
overhead obstructions may be cleared or moved in order to maintain a
constant and uninterrupted movement of the building; (d) special escort
or other precautions may be imposed to assure movement is made under
the safest possible conditions, and the Washington state patrol shall
be advised when and where the movement is to be made;
(2) Permits may be issued for widths of vehicles in excess of the
preceding limitations on highways or sections of highways which have
been designed and constructed for width in excess of such limitations;
(3) Permits may be issued for vehicles with a total outside width,
including the load, of nine feet or less when the vehicle is equipped
with a mechanism designed to cover the load pursuant to RCW 46.61.655;
(4) These limitations may be rescinded when certification is made
by military officials, or by officials of public or private power
facilities, or when in the opinion of the department of transportation
the movement or action is a necessary movement or action: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in the judgment of the department of transportation the
structures and highway surfaces on the routes involved are capable of
sustaining widths in excess of such limitation;
(5) These limitations shall not apply to movement during daylight
hours on any two lane state highway where the gross weight, including
load, does not exceed eighty thousand pounds and the overall width of
load does not exceed sixteen feet: PROVIDED, That the minimum and
maximum speed of such movements, prescribed routes of such movements,
the times of such movements, limitation upon frequency of trips (which
limitation shall be not less than one per week), and conditions to
assure safety of traffic may be prescribed by the department of
transportation or local authority issuing such special permit.
The applicant for any special permit shall specifically describe
the vehicle or vehicles and load to be operated or moved and the
particular state highways for which permit to operate is requested and
whether such permit is requested for a single trip or for continuous
operation.

Sec. 119 RCW 46.61.450 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 39 are each amended
to read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a vehicle or any
combination of vehicles over any bridge or other elevated structure or
through any tunnel or underpass constituting a part of any public
highway at a rate of speed or with a gross weight or of a size which is
greater at any time than the maximum speed or maximum weight or size
which can be maintained or carried with safety over any such bridge or
structure or through any such tunnel or underpass when such bridge,
structure, tunnel, or underpass is sign posted as hereinafter provided.
The secretary of transportation, if it be a bridge, structure, tunnel,
or underpass upon a state highway, or the governing body or authorities
of any county, city, or town, if it be upon roads or streets under
their jurisdiction, may restrict the speed which may be maintained or
the gross weight or size which may be operated upon or over any such
bridge or elevated structure or through any such tunnel or underpass
with safety thereto. The secretary or the governing body or
authorities of any county, city, or town having jurisdiction shall
determine and declare the maximum speed or maximum gross weight or size
which such bridge, elevated structure, tunnel, or underpass can
withstand or accommodate and shall cause suitable signs stating such
maximum speed or maximum gross weight, or size, or either, to be
erected and maintained on the right hand side of such highway, road, or
street and at a distance of not less than one hundred feet from each
end of such bridge, structure, tunnel, or underpass and on the approach
thereto: PROVIDED, That in the event that any such bridge, elevated
structure, tunnel, or underpass is upon a city street designated by the
legislative transportation ((commission)) committee as forming a part
of the route of any state highway through any such incorporated city or
town the determination of any maximum speed or maximum gross weight or
size which such bridge, elevated structure, tunnel, or underpass can
withstand or accommodate shall not be enforceable at any speed, weight,
or size less than the maximum allowed by law, unless with the approval
in writing of the secretary. Upon the trial of any person charged with
a violation of this section, proof of either violation of maximum speed
or maximum weight, or size, or either, and the distance and location of
such signs as are required, shall constitute conclusive evidence of the
maximum speed or maximum weight, or size, or either, which can be
maintained or carried with safety over such bridge or elevated
structure or through such tunnel or underpass.

Sec. 120 RCW 47.01.012 and 2002 c 5 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals for
the operation, performance of, and investment in, the state's
transportation system. The policy goals shall consist of, but not be
limited to, the following benchmark categories, adopted by the state's
Blue Ribbon Commission on Transportation on November 30, 2000. In
addition to improving safety, public investments in transportation
shall support achievement of these and other priority goals:
No interstate highways, state routes, and local arterials shall be
in poor condition; no bridges shall be structurally deficient, and
safety retrofits shall be performed on those state bridges at the
highest seismic risk levels; traffic congestion on urban state highways
shall be significantly reduced and be no worse than the national mean;
delay per driver shall be significantly reduced and no worse than the
national mean; per capita vehicle miles traveled shall be maintained at
2000 levels; the nonauto share of commuter trips shall be increased in
urban areas; administrative costs as a percentage of transportation
spending shall achieve the most efficient quartile nationally; and the
state's public transit agencies shall achieve the median cost per
vehicle revenue hour of peer transit agencies, adjusting for the
regional cost-of-living.
These policy goals shall be the basis for establishment of detailed
and measurable performance benchmarks.
It is the intent of the legislature that the legislative
transportation ((commission)) committee establish performance measures
to ensure transportation system performance at local, regional, and
state government levels, and the legislative transportation
((commission)) committee should work with appropriate government
entities to accomplish this.

Sec. 121 RCW 35.58.2795 and 1994 c 158 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
By April 1st of each year, the legislative authority of each
municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and each regional transit
authority shall prepare a six-year transit development plan for that
calendar year and the ensuing five years. The program shall be
consistent with the comprehensive plans adopted by counties, cities,
and towns, pursuant to chapter 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW, the
inherent authority of a first class city or charter county derived from
its charter, or chapter 36.70A RCW. The program shall contain
information as to how the municipality intends to meet state and local
long-range priorities for public transportation, capital improvements,
significant operating changes planned for the system, and how the
municipality intends to fund program needs. The six-year plan for each
municipality and regional transit authority shall specifically set
forth those projects of regional significance for inclusion in the
transportation improvement program within that region. Each
municipality and regional transit authority shall file the six-year
program with the state department of transportation, the transportation
improvement board, and cities, counties, and regional planning councils
within which the municipality is located.
In developing its program, the municipality and the regional
transit authority shall consider those policy recommendations affecting
public transportation contained in the state transportation policy plan
approved by the ((state)) legislative transportation ((commission))
committee and, where appropriate, adopted by the legislature. The
municipality shall conduct one or more public hearings while developing
its program and for each annual update.

Sec. 122 RCW 47.56.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 67 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department of transportation may, with the approval of the
((transportation commission)) committee, provide for the establishment,
construction, and operation of toll tunnels, toll roads, and other
facilities necessary for their construction and connection with public
highways of the state. It may cause surveys to be made to determine
the propriety of their establishment, construction, and operation, and
may acquire rights of way and other facilities necessary to carry out
the provisions hereof; and may issue, sell, and redeem bonds, and
deposit and expend them; secure and remit financial and other
assistance in the construction thereof; carry insurance thereon; and
handle any other matters pertaining thereto, all of which shall be
conducted in the same manner and under the same procedure as provided
for the establishing, constructing, operating, and maintaining of toll
bridges by the department, insofar as reasonably consistent and
applicable. No toll facility, toll bridge, toll road, or toll tunnel,
shall be combined with any other toll facility for the purpose of
financing unless such facilities form a continuous project, to the end
that each such facility or project be self-liquidating and self-sustaining.

Sec. 123 RCW 47.01.071 and 1981 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative transportation ((commission shall have)) committee
has the following functions, powers, and duties:
(1) To propose policies to be adopted by the legislature designed
to assure the development and maintenance of a comprehensive and
balanced statewide transportation system which will meet the needs of
the people of this state for safe and efficient transportation
services. Wherever appropriate the policies shall provide for the use
of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to implement the
social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and objectives of
the people of the state, and especially to conserve nonrenewable
natural resources including land and energy. To this end the
((commission)) committee shall:
(a) Develop transportation policies which are based on the
policies, goals, and objectives expressed and inherent in existing
state laws;
(b) Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the
local and area-wide governmental bodies of the state and define the
role of the state, regional, and local governments in determining
transportation policies, in transportation planning, and in
implementing the state transportation plan;
(c) Propose a transportation policy for the state, and after notice
and public hearings, submit the proposal to ((the legislative
transportation committee and)) the senate and house transportation
committees by January 1, 1978, for consideration in the next
legislative session;
(d) Establish a procedure for review and revision of the state
transportation policy and for submission of proposed changes to the
legislature;
(e) To integrate the statewide transportation plan with the needs
of the elderly and handicapped, and to coordinate federal and state
programs directed at assisting local governments to answer such needs;
(2) To establish the policy of the department to be followed by the
secretary on each of the following items:
(a) To provide for the effective coordination of state
transportation planning with national transportation policy, state and
local land use policies, and local and regional transportation plans
and programs;
(b) To provide for public involvement in transportation designed to
elicit the public's views both with respect to adequate transportation
services and appropriate means of minimizing adverse social, economic,
environmental, and energy impact of transportation programs;
(c) To provide for the administration of grants in aid and other
financial assistance to counties and municipal corporations for
transportation purposes;
(d) To provide for the management, sale, and lease of property or
property rights owned by the department which are not required for
transportation purposes;
(3) To direct the secretary to prepare and submit to the
((commission)) committee a comprehensive and balanced statewide
transportation plan which shall be based on the transportation policy
adopted by the legislature and applicable state and federal laws.
After public notice and hearings, the ((commission)) committee shall
adopt the plan and submit it to ((the legislative transportation
committee and to)) the house and senate standing committees on
transportation before January 1, 1980, for consideration in the 1980
regular legislative session. The plan shall be reviewed and revised
prior to each regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year thereafter. A preliminary plan shall be submitted to
such committees by January 1, 1979.
The plan shall take into account federal law and regulations
relating to the planning, construction, and operation of transportation
facilities;
(4) To propose to the governor and the legislature prior to the
convening of each regular session held in an odd-numbered year a
recommended budget for the operations of the ((commission as required
by RCW 47.01.061)) committee;
(5) ((To approve and propose to the governor and to the legislature
prior to the convening of each regular session during an odd-numbered
year a recommended budget for the operation of the department and for
carrying out the program of the department for the ensuing biennium.
The proposed budget shall separately state the appropriations to be
made from the motor vehicle fund for highway purposes in accordance
with constitutional limitations and appropriations and expenditures to
be made from the general fund, or accounts thereof, and other available
sources for other operations and programs of the department;
(6) To review and authorize all departmental requests for
legislation;
(7) To approve the issuance and sale of all bonds authorized by the
legislature for capital construction of state highways, toll
facilities, Columbia Basin county roads (for which reimbursement to the
motor vehicle fund has been provided), urban arterial projects, and
aviation facilities;
(8) To adopt such rules, regulations, and policy directives as may
be necessary to carry out reasonably and properly those functions
expressly vested in the commission by statute;
(9))) To delegate any of its powers to the secretary of
transportation whenever it deems it desirable for the efficient
administration of the department and consistent with the purposes of
this title;
(((10))) (6) To exercise such other specific powers and duties as
may be vested in the ((transportation commission)) committee by this or
any other provision of law.

Sec. 124 RCW 47.01.250 and 1998 c 245 s 92 are each amended to
read as follows:
The chief of the Washington state patrol, the director of the
traffic safety commission, the executive director of the county road
administration board, and the director of licensing are designated as
official consultants to the legislative transportation ((commission))
committee so that the goals and activities of their respective agencies
which relate to transportation are fully coordinated with other related
responsibilities of the department of transportation. In this
capacity, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the director of the
traffic safety commission, the executive director of the county road
administration board, and the director of licensing shall consult with
the legislative transportation ((commission)) committee and the
secretary of transportation on the implications and impacts on the
transportation related functions and duties of their respective
agencies of any proposed comprehensive transportation plan, program, or
policy.
In order to develop fully integrated, balanced, and coordinated
transportation plans, programs, and budgets the chief of the Washington
state patrol, the director of the traffic safety commission, the
executive director of the county road administration board, and the
director of licensing shall consult with the secretary of
transportation on the matter of relative priorities during the
development of their respective agencies' plans, programs, and budgets
as they pertain to transportation activities.

Sec. 125 RCW 47.01.280 and 1999 c 94 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon receiving an application for improvements to an existing
state highway or highways pursuant to RCW 43.160.074 from the community
economic revitalization board, the legislative transportation
((commission)) committee shall, in a timely manner, determine whether
or not the proposed state highway improvements:
(a) Meet the safety and design criteria of the department of
transportation;
(b) Will impair the operational integrity of the existing highway
system;
(c) Will affect any other improvements planned by the department;
and
(d) Will be consistent with its policies developed pursuant to RCW
47.01.071.
(2) Upon completion of its determination of the factors contained
in subsection (1) of this section and any other factors it deems
pertinent, the legislative transportation ((commission)) committee
shall forward its approval, as submitted or amended or disapproval of
the proposed improvements to the board, along with any recommendation
it may wish to make concerning the desirability and feasibility of the
proposed development. If the legislative transportation ((commission))
committee disapproves any proposed improvements, it shall specify its
reasons for disapproval.
(3) Upon notification from the board of an application's approval
pursuant to RCW 43.160.074, the legislative transportation
((commission)) committee shall ((direct the department of
transportation to)) carry out the improvements in coordination with the
applicant.
(4) The legislative transportation ((commission)) committee shall
notify the ((legislative)) house and senate standing committees on
transportation ((committee)) of all state highway improvements to be
carried out pursuant to RCW 43.160.074 and this section.

Sec. 126 RCW 47.05.021 and 2002 c 56 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative transportation ((commission is hereby directed
to)) committee shall conduct periodic analyses of the entire state
highway system, report thereon to the chairs of the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives, including one
copy to the staff of each of the committees, biennially and based
thereon, ((to)) subdivide, classify, and subclassify according to their
function and importance all designated state highways and those added
from time to time and periodically review and revise the
classifications into the following three functional classes:
(a) The "principal arterial system" shall consist of a connected
network of rural arterial routes with appropriate extensions into and
through urban areas, including all routes designated as part of the
interstate system, which serve corridor movements having travel
characteristics indicative of substantial statewide and interstate
travel;
(b) The "minor arterial system" shall, in conjunction with the
principal arterial system, form a rural network of arterial routes
linking cities and other activity centers which generate long distance
travel, and, with appropriate extensions into and through urban areas,
form an integrated network providing interstate and interregional
service; and
(c) The "collector system" shall consist of routes which primarily
serve the more important intercounty, intracounty, and intraurban
travel corridors, collect traffic from the system of local access roads
and convey it to the arterial system, and on which, regardless of
traffic volume, the predominant travel distances are shorter than on
arterial routes.
(2) In making the functional classification the legislative
transportation ((commission)) committee shall adopt and give
consideration to criteria consistent with this section and federal
regulations relating to the functional classification of highways,
including but not limited to the following:
(a) Urban population centers within and without the state
stratified and ranked according to size;
(b) Important traffic generating economic activities, including but
not limited to recreation, agriculture, government, business, and
industry;
(c) Feasibility of the route, including availability of alternate
routes within and without the state;
(d) Directness of travel and distance between points of economic
importance;
(e) Length of trips;
(f) Character and volume of traffic;
(g) Preferential consideration for multiple service which shall
include public transportation;
(h) Reasonable spacing depending upon population density; and
(i) System continuity.
(3) The ((transportation commission or the)) legislature shall
designate state highways of statewide significance under RCW 47.06.140.
((If the commission designates a state highway of statewide
significance, it shall submit a list of such facilities for adoption by
the legislature.)) This statewide system shall include at a minimum
interstate highways and other statewide principal arterials that are
needed to connect major communities across the state and support the
state's economy.
(4) The legislative transportation ((commission)) committee shall
designate a freight and goods transportation system. This statewide
system shall include state highways, county roads, and city streets.
The ((commission)) committee, in cooperation with cities and counties,
shall review and make recommendations to the legislature regarding
policies governing weight restrictions and road closures which affect
the transportation of freight and goods.

Sec. 127 RCW 47.05.030 and 2002 c 5 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislative transportation ((commission)) committee shall adopt
a comprehensive six-year investment program specifying program
objectives and performance measures for the preservation and
improvement programs defined in this section. In the specification of
investment program objectives and performance measures, the legislative
transportation ((commission, in consultation with the Washington state
department of transportation,)) committee shall define and adopt
standards for effective programming and prioritization practices
including a needs analysis process. The analysis process must ensure
the identification of problems and deficiencies, the evaluation of
alternative solutions and trade-offs, and estimations of the costs and
benefits of prospective projects. The investment program must be
revised biennially, effective on July 1st of odd-numbered years. The
investment program must be based upon the needs identified in the
state-owned highway component of the statewide transportation plan as
defined in RCW 47.01.071(3).
(1) The preservation program consists of those investments
necessary to preserve the existing state highway system and to restore
existing safety features, giving consideration to lowest life cycle
costing. The preservation program must require use of the most cost-effective pavement surfaces, considering:
(a) Life-cycle cost analysis;
(b) Traffic volume;
(c) Subgrade soil conditions;
(d) Environmental and weather conditions;
(e) Materials available; and
(f) Construction factors.
The comprehensive six-year investment program for preservation must
identify projects for two years and an investment plan for the
remaining four years.
(2) The improvement program consists of investments needed to
address identified deficiencies on the state highway system to increase
mobility, address congestion, and improve safety, support for the
economy, and protection of the environment. The six-year investment
program for improvements must identify projects for two years and major
deficiencies proposed to be addressed in the six-year period giving
consideration to relative benefits and life cycle costing. The
legislative transportation ((commission)) committee shall give higher
priority for correcting identified deficiencies on those facilities
classified as facilities of statewide significance as defined in RCW
47.06.140. Project prioritization must be based primarily upon cost-benefit analysis, where appropriate.
The legislative transportation ((commission)) committee shall
approve and present the comprehensive six-year investment program to
the legislature in support of the biennial budget request under RCW
44.40.070 and 44.40.080.

Sec. 128 RCW 47.05.035 and 2002 c 5 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((and the commission)) shall use the
transportation demand modeling tools developed under subsection (2) of
this section to evaluate investments based on the best mode or
improvement, or mix of modes and improvements, to meet current and
future long-term demand within a corridor or system for the lowest
cost. The end result of these demand modeling tools is to provide a
cost-benefit analysis by which the department ((and the commission))
can determine the relative mobility improvement and congestion relief
each mode or improvement under consideration will provide and the
relative investment each mode or improvement under consideration will
need to achieve that relief. The department must forward the results
of its analysis to the legislative transportation committee for
approval.
(2) The department will participate in the refinement, enhancement,
and application of existing transportation demand modeling tools to be
used to evaluate investments. This participation and use of
transportation demand modeling tools will be phased in.
(3) In developing program objectives and performance measures, the
legislative transportation ((commission)) committee shall evaluate
investment trade-offs between the preservation and improvement
programs. In making these investment trade-offs, the ((commission))
committee shall evaluate, using cost-benefit techniques, roadway and
bridge maintenance activities as compared to roadway and bridge
preservation program activities and adjust those programs accordingly.
(4) The ((commission)) legislative transportation committee shall
allocate the estimated revenue between preservation and improvement
programs giving primary consideration to the following factors:
(a) The relative needs in each of the programs and the system
performance levels that can be achieved by meeting these needs;
(b) The need to provide adequate funding for preservation to
protect the state's investment in its existing highway system;
(c) The continuity of future transportation development with those
improvements previously programmed; and
(d) The availability of dedicated funds for a specific type of
work.

Sec. 129 RCW 47.05.051 and 2002 c 189 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The comprehensive six-year investment program shall be based
upon the needs identified in the state-owned highway component of the
statewide multimodal transportation plan as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3)
and priority selection systems that incorporate the following criteria:
(a) Priority programming for the preservation program shall take
into account the following, not necessarily in order of importance:
(i) Extending the service life of the existing highway system,
including using the most cost-effective pavement surfaces, considering:
(A) Life-cycle cost analysis;
(B) Traffic volume;
(C) Subgrade soil conditions;
(D) Environmental and weather conditions;
(E) Materials available; and
(F) Construction factors;
(ii) Ensuring the structural ability to carry loads imposed upon
highways and bridges; and
(iii) Minimizing life cycle costs. The legislative transportation
((commission)) committee in carrying out the provisions of this section
may delegate to the department of transportation the authority to
select preservation projects to be included in the six-year program.
(b) Priority programming for the improvement program must be based
primarily upon the following, not necessarily in order of importance:
(i) Traffic congestion, delay, and accidents;
(ii) Location within a heavily traveled transportation corridor;
(iii) Except for projects in cities having a population of less
than five thousand persons, synchronization with other potential
transportation projects, including transit and multimodal projects,
within the heavily traveled corridor; and
(iv) Use of benefit/cost analysis wherever feasible to determine
the value of the proposed project.
(c) Priority programming for the improvement program may also take
into account:
(i) Support for the state's economy, including job creation and job
preservation;
(ii) The cost-effective movement of people and goods;
(iii) Accident and accident risk reduction;
(iv) Protection of the state's natural environment;
(v) Continuity and systematic development of the highway
transportation network;
(vi) Consistency with local comprehensive plans developed under
chapter 36.70A RCW including the following if they have been included
in the comprehensive plan:
(A) Support for development in and revitalization of existing
downtowns;
(B) Extent that development implements local comprehensive plans
for rural and urban residential and nonresidential densities;
(C) Extent of compact, transit-oriented development for rural and
urban residential and nonresidential densities;
(D) Opportunities for multimodal transportation; and
(E) Extent to which the project accommodates planned growth and
economic development;
(vii) Consistency with regional transportation plans developed
under chapter 47.80 RCW;
(viii) Public views concerning proposed improvements;
(ix) The conservation of energy resources;
(x) Feasibility of financing the full proposed improvement;
(xi) Commitments established in previous legislative sessions;
(xii) Relative costs and benefits of candidate programs.
(d) Major projects addressing capacity deficiencies which
prioritize allowing for preliminary engineering shall be reprioritized
during the succeeding biennium, based upon updated project data.
Reprioritized projects may be delayed or canceled by the legislative
transportation ((commission)) committee if higher priority projects are
awaiting funding.
(e) Major project approvals which significantly increase a
project's scope or cost from original prioritization estimates shall
include a review of the project's estimated revised priority rank and
the level of funding provided. Projects may be delayed or canceled by
the legislative transportation ((commission)) committee if higher
priority projects are awaiting funding.
(2) The ((commission)) legislative transportation committee may
depart from the priority programming established under subsection (1)
of this section: (a) To the extent that otherwise funds cannot be
utilized feasibly within the program; (b) as may be required by a court
judgment, legally binding agreement, or state and federal laws and
regulations; (c) as may be required to coordinate with federal, local,
or other state agency construction projects; (d) to take advantage of
some substantial financial benefit that may be available; (e) for
continuity of route development; or (f) because of changed financial or
physical conditions of an unforeseen or emergent nature. The
((commission or secretary of)) legislative transportation committee
shall maintain in its files information sufficient to show the extent
to which the ((commission)) committee has departed from the established
priority.
(3) The ((commission)) committee shall identify those projects that
yield freight mobility benefits or that alleviate the impacts of
freight mobility upon affected communities.

Sec. 130 RCW 47.06.030 and 1997 c 369 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((commission)) legislative transportation committee shall
develop a state transportation policy plan that (1) establishes a
vision and goals for the development of the statewide transportation
system consistent with the state's growth management goals, (2)
identifies significant statewide transportation policy issues, and (3)
recommends statewide transportation policies and strategies to the
legislature to fulfill the requirements of RCW 47.01.071(1). The state
transportation policy plan shall be the product of an ongoing process
that involves representatives of significant transportation interests
and the general public from across the state. The plan shall address
how the department of transportation will meet the transportation needs
and expedite the completion of industrial projects of statewide
significance.

Sec. 131 RCW 47.06.050 and 2002 c 5 s 413 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state-owned facilities component of the statewide
transportation plan shall consist of:
(1) The state highway system plan, which identifies program and
financing needs and recommends specific and financially realistic
improvements to preserve the structural integrity of the state highway
system, ensure acceptable operating conditions, and provide for
enhanced access to scenic, recreational, and cultural resources. The
state highway system plan shall contain the following elements:
(a) A system preservation element, which shall establish structural
preservation objectives for the state highway system including bridges,
identify current and future structural deficiencies based upon analysis
of current conditions and projected future deterioration, and recommend
program funding levels and specific actions necessary to preserve the
structural integrity of the state highway system consistent with
adopted objectives. Lowest life cycle cost methodologies must be used
in developing a pavement management system. This element shall serve
as the basis for the preservation component of the six-year highway
program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;
(b) A highway maintenance element, establishing service levels for
highway maintenance on state-owned highways that meet benchmarks
established by the legislative transportation ((commission)) committee.
The highway maintenance element must include an estimate of costs for
achieving those service levels over twenty years. This element will
serve as the basis for the maintenance component of the six-year
highway program and the two-year biennial budget request to the
legislature;
(c) A capacity and operational improvement element, which shall
establish operational objectives, including safety considerations, for
moving people and goods on the state highway system, identify current
and future capacity, operational, and safety deficiencies, and
recommend program funding levels and specific improvements and
strategies necessary to achieve the operational objectives. In
developing capacity and operational improvement plans the department
shall first assess strategies to enhance the operational efficiency of
the existing system before recommending system expansion. Strategies
to enhance the operational efficiencies include but are not limited to
access management, transportation system management, demand management,
and high-occupancy vehicle facilities. The capacity and operational
improvement element must conform to the state implementation plan for
air quality and be consistent with regional transportation plans
adopted under chapter 47.80 RCW, and shall serve as the basis for the
capacity and operational improvement portions of the six-year highway
program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;
(d) A scenic and recreational highways element, which shall
identify and recommend designation of scenic and recreational highways,
provide for enhanced access to scenic, recreational, and cultural
resources associated with designated routes, and recommend a variety of
management strategies to protect, preserve, and enhance these
resources. The department, affected counties, cities, and towns,
regional transportation planning organizations, and other state or
federal agencies shall jointly develop this element;
(e) A paths and trails element, which shall identify the needs of
nonmotorized transportation modes on the state transportation systems
and provide the basis for the investment of state transportation funds
in paths and trails, including funding provided under chapter 47.30
RCW.
(2) The state ferry system plan, which shall guide capital and
operating investments in the state ferry system. The plan shall
establish service objectives for state ferry routes, forecast travel
demand for the various markets served in the system, develop strategies
for ferry system investment that consider regional and statewide
vehicle and passenger needs, support local land use plans, and assure
that ferry services are fully integrated with other transportation
services. The plan must provide for maintenance of capital assets.
The plan must also provide for preservation of capital assets based on
lowest life cycle cost methodologies. The plan shall assess the role
of private ferries operating under the authority of the utilities and
transportation commission and shall coordinate ferry system capital and
operational plans with these private operations. The ferry system plan
must be consistent with the regional transportation plans for areas
served by the state ferry system, and shall be developed in conjunction
with the ferry advisory committees.

Sec. 132 RCW 47.12.242 and 1991 c 291 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The term "advance right of way acquisition" means the acquisition
of property and property rights, generally not more than ten years in
advance of programmed highway construction projects, together with the
engineering costs necessary for such advance right of way acquisition.
Any property or property rights purchased must be in designated highway
transportation corridors and be for projects approved by the
((commission)) committee as part of the state's six-year plan or
included in the state's route development planning effort.

Sec. 133 RCW 47.12.330 and 1998 c 181 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of environmental mitigation of transportation
projects, the department may acquire or develop, or both acquire and
develop, environmental mitigation sites in advance of the construction
of programmed projects. The term "advanced environmental mitigation"
means mitigation of adverse impacts upon the environment from
transportation projects before their design and construction. Advanced
environmental mitigation consists of the acquisition of property; the
acquisition of property, water, or air rights; the development of
property for the purposes of improved environmental management;
engineering costs necessary for such purchase and development; and the
use of advanced environmental mitigation sites to fulfill project
environmental permit requirements. Advanced environmental mitigation
must be conducted in a manner that is consistent with the definition of
mitigation found in the council of environmental quality regulations
(40 C.F.R. Sec. 1508.20) and the governor's executive order on wetlands
(EO 90-04). Advanced environmental mitigation is for projects approved
by the ((transportation commission)) committee as part of the state's
six-year plan or included in the state highway system plan. Advanced
environmental mitigation must give consideration to activities related
to fish passage, fish habitat, wetlands, and flood management.
Advanced environmental mitigation may also be conducted in partnership
with federal, state, or local government agencies, tribal governments,
interest groups, or private parties. Partnership arrangements may
include joint acquisition and development of mitigation sites,
purchasing and selling mitigation bank credits among participants, and
transfer of mitigation site title from one party to another. Specific
conditions of partnership arrangements will be developed in written
agreements for each applicable environmental mitigation site.

Sec. 134 RCW 47.24.010 and 1998 c 245 s 97 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((transportation commission)) committee shall determine what
streets, together with bridges thereon and wharves necessary for use
for ferriage of motor vehicle traffic in connection with such streets,
if any, in any incorporated cities and towns shall form a part of the
route of state highways and between the first and fifteenth days of
July of any year the department of transportation shall identify by
brief description, the streets, together with the bridges thereon and
wharves, if any, in such city or town which are designated as forming
a part of the route of any state highway; and all such streets,
including curbs and gutters and street intersections and such bridges
and wharves, shall thereafter be a part of the state highway system and
as such shall be constructed and maintained by the department of
transportation from any state funds available therefor: PROVIDED, That
the responsibility for the construction and maintenance of any such
street together with its appurtenances may be returned to a city or a
town upon certification by the department of transportation to the
clerk of any city or town that such street, or portion thereof, is no
longer required as a part of the state highway system: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That any such certification that a street, or portion thereof,
is no longer required as a part of the state highway system shall be
made between the first and fifteenth of July following the
determination by the department that such street or portion thereof is
no longer required as a part of the state highway system, but this
shall not prevent the department and any city or town from entering
into an agreement that a city or town will accept responsibility for
such a street or portion thereof at some time other than between the
first and fifteenth of July of any year.

Sec. 135 RCW 47.26.170 and 1994 c 179 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each county having within its boundaries an urban area and cities
and towns shall prepare and submit to the transportation improvement
board arterial inventory data required to determine the long-range
arterial construction needs. The counties, cities, and towns shall
revise the arterial inventory data every four years to show the current
arterial construction needs through the advanced planning period, and
as revised shall submit them to the transportation improvement board
during the first week of January every four years beginning in 1996.
The inventory data shall be prepared pursuant to guidelines established
by the transportation improvement board. As information is updated, it
shall be made available to the ((commission and the)) legislative
transportation committee.

Sec. 136 RCW 47.26.440 and 1994 c 179 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not later than November 1st of each even-numbered year the
transportation improvement board shall prepare and present to the
((commission)) committee for comment and recommendation an adopted
budget for expenditures from funds administered by the board during the
ensuing biennium. The budget shall contain an estimate of the revenues
to be credited to the several accounts and the amount, if any, of bond
proceeds which the board determines should be made available through
the sale of bonds in the ensuing biennium.

Sec. 137 RCW 47.28.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 59 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever the general route of any state highway shall be designated
and laid out as running to or by way of certain designated points,
without specifying the particular route to be followed to or by way of
such points, the ((transportation commission)) committee shall
determine the particular route to be followed by said state highway to
or by way of said designated points, and shall be at liberty to select
and adopt as a part of such state highway, the whole or any part of any
existing public highway previously designated as a county road, primary
road, or secondary road or now or hereafter classified as a county
road. The ((commission)) committee need not select and adopt the
entire routes for such state highways at one time, but may select and
adopt parts of such routes from time to time as it deems advisable.
Where a state highway is designated as passing by way of a certain
point, this shall not require the ((commission)) committee to cause
such state highway to pass through or touch such point but such
designation is directional only and may be complied with by location in
the general vicinity. The department of transportation is empowered to
construct as a part of any state highway as designated and in addition
to any portion meeting the limits of any incorporated city or town a
bypass section either through or around any such incorporated city or
town.

Sec. 138 RCW 47.28.170 and 1990 c 265 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever the department finds that as a consequence of
accident, natural disaster, or other emergency, an existing state
highway is in jeopardy or is rendered impassible in one or both
directions and the department further finds that prompt reconstruction,
repair, or other work is needed to preserve or restore the highway for
public travel, the department may obtain at least three written bids
for the work without publishing a call for bids, and the secretary of
transportation may award a contract forthwith to the lowest responsible
bidder.
The department shall notify any association or organization of
contractors filing a request to regularly receive notification.
Notification to an association or organization of contractors shall
include: (a) The location of the work to be done; (b) the general
anticipated nature of the work to be done; and (c) the date determined
by the department as reasonable in view of the nature of the work and
emergent nature of the problem after which the department will not
receive bids.
(2) Whenever the department finds it necessary to protect a highway
facility from imminent damage or to perform emergency work to reopen a
highway facility, the department may contract for such work on a
negotiated basis not to exceed force account rates for a period not to
exceed thirty working days.
(3) The secretary shall review any contract exceeding two hundred
thousand dollars awarded under subsection (1) or (2) of this section
with the ((transportation commission)) committee at its next regularly
scheduled meeting.
(4) Any person, firm, or corporation awarded a contract for work
must be prequalified pursuant to RCW 47.28.070 and may be required to
furnish a bid deposit or performance bond.

Sec. 139 RCW 47.38.060 and 1996 c 172 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislative transportation ((commission)) committee may
designate interstate safety rest areas, as appropriate, as locations
for memorial signs to prisoners of war and those missing in action.
The ((commission)) committee shall adopt policies for the placement of
memorial signs on interstate safety rest areas and may disapprove any
memorial sign that it determines to be inappropriate or inconsistent
with the policies. The policies shall include, but are not limited to,
guidelines for the size and location of and inscriptions on memorial
signs. The secretary shall adopt rules for administering this program.
Nonprofit associations may have their name identified on a memorial
sign if the association bears the cost of supplying and maintaining the
memorial sign.

Sec. 140 RCW 47.56.120 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 70 are each amended
to read as follows:
((In the event that)) If the legislative transportation
((commission should)) committee determines that any toll bridge should
be constructed, all cost thereof including right of way, survey, and
engineering shall be paid out of any funds available for payment of the
cost of such toll bridge under this chapter.

Sec. 141 RCW 47.56.250 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 71 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever a proposed toll bridge, toll road, toll tunnel, or any
other toll facility of any sort is to be constructed, any city, county,
or other political subdivision located in relation to such facility so
as to benefit directly or indirectly thereby, may, either jointly or
separately, at the request of the legislative transportation
((commission)) committee advance or contribute money, or bonds, rights
of way, labor, materials, and other property toward the expense of
building the toll facility, and for preliminary surveys and the
preparation of plans and estimates of cost therefor and other
preliminary expenses. Any such city, county, or other political
subdivision may, either jointly or separately, at the request of the
((transportation commission)) committee advance or contribute money or
bonds for the purpose of guaranteeing the payment of interest or
principal on the bonds issued by the ((commission)) committee to
finance the toll facility. Appropriations for such purposes may be
made from any funds available, including county road funds received
from or credited by the state, or funds obtained by excess tax levies
made pursuant to law or the issuance of general obligation bonds for
this purpose. General obligation bonds issued by a city, county, or
political subdivision may with the consent of the ((commission))
committee be placed with the department of transportation to be sold by
the department to provide funds for such purpose. Money, or bonds, or
property so advanced or contributed may be immediately transferred or
delivered to the department to be used for the purpose for which
contribution was made. The ((commission)) committee may enter into an
agreement with a city, county, or other political subdivision to repay
any money, or bonds or the value of a right of way, labor, materials,
or other property so advanced or contributed. The ((commission))
department may make such repayment to a city, county, or other
political subdivision and reimburse the state for any expenditures made
by it in connection with the toll facility out of tolls and other
revenues for the use of the toll facility.

Sec. 142 RCW 47.52.133 and 1987 c 200 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 47.52.134, the ((transportation
commission)) committee and the highway authorities of the counties and
incorporated cities and towns, with regard to facilities under their
respective jurisdictions, prior to the establishment of any limited
access facility, shall hold a public hearing within the county, city,
or town wherein the limited access facility is to be established to
determine the desirability of the plan proposed by such authority.
Notice of such hearing shall be given to the owners of property
abutting the section of any existing highway, road, or street being
established as a limited access facility, as indicated in the tax rolls
of the county, and in the case of a state limited access facility, to
the county and/or city or town. Such notice shall be by United States
mail in writing, setting forth a time for the hearing, which time shall
be not less than fifteen days after mailing of such notice. Notice of
such hearing also shall be given by publication not less than fifteen
days prior to such hearing in one or more newspapers of general
circulation within the county, city, or town. Such notice by
publication shall be deemed sufficient as to any owner or reputed owner
or any unknown owner or owner who cannot be located. Such notice shall
indicate a suitable location where plans for such proposal may be
inspected.

Sec. 143 RCW 47.52.145 and 1981 c 95 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever after the final adoption of a plan for a limited access
highway by the ((transportation commission)) committee, an additional
design public hearing with respect to the facility or any portion
thereof is conducted pursuant to federal law resulting in a revision of
the design of the limited access plan, the ((commission)) committee may
modify the previously adopted limited access plan to conform to the
revised design without further public hearings providing the following
conditions are met:
(1) As compared with the previously adopted limited access plan,
the revised plan will not require additional or different right of way
with respect to that section of highway for which the design has been
revised, in excess of five percent by area; and
(2) If the previously adopted limited access plan was modified by
a board of review convened at the request of a county, city, or town,
the legislative authority of the county, city, or town shall approve
any revisions of the plan which conflict with modifications ordered by
the board of review.

Sec. 144 RCW 47.52.210 and 1981 c 95 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the ((transportation commission)) committee adopts a
plan for a limited access highway to be constructed within the
corporate limits of a city or town which incorporates existing city or
town streets, title to such streets shall remain in the city or town,
and the provisions of RCW 47.24.020 as now or hereafter amended shall
continue to apply to such streets until such time that the highway is
operated as either a partially or fully controlled access highway.
Title to and full control over that portion of the city or town street
incorporated into the limited access highway shall be vested in the
state upon a declaration by the secretary of transportation that such
highway is operational as a limited access facility, but in no event
prior to the acquisition of right of way for such highway including
access rights, and not later than the final completion of construction
of such highway.
(2) Upon the completion of construction of a state limited access
highway within a city or town, the department of transportation may
relinquish to the city or town streets constructed or improved as a
functional part of the limited access highway, slope easements,
landscaping areas, and other related improvements to be maintained and
operated by the city or town in accordance with the limited access
plan. Title to such property relinquished to a city or town shall be
conveyed by a deed executed by the secretary of transportation and duly
acknowledged. Relinquishment of such property to the city or town may
be expressly conditioned upon the maintenance of access control
acquired by the state and the continued operation of such property as
a functional part of the limited access highway.

Sec. 145 RCW 47.56.080 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 68 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever in the judgment of the legislative transportation
((commission)) committee it is considered in the best interest of the
public highways of the state that any new toll bridge or bridges be
constructed upon any public highway and across any stream, body of
water, gulch, navigable water, swamp, or other topographical formation
and operated by the state the ((commission)) department shall adopt a
resolution declaring that public interest and necessity require the
construction of such toll bridge or bridges and authorizing the
issuance of revenue bonds for the purpose of obtaining funds in an
amount not in excess of that estimated to be required for such
construction. The issuance of bonds as provided in this chapter for
the construction of more than one toll bridge may at the discretion of
the ((commission)) department be included in the same authority and
issue of bonds.

TRANSFERRING POWERS OF THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION TO
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 A new section is added to chapter 47.01
RCW to read as follows:
The secretary of transportation has the following powers and
duties:
(1) Propose to the governor and to the legislature before the
convening of each regular session during an odd-numbered year a
recommended budget for the operation of the department and for carrying
out the program of the department for the ensuing biennium. The
proposed budget must separately state the appropriations to be made
from the motor vehicle fund for highway purposes in accordance with
constitutional limitations and appropriations and expenditures to be
made from the general fund, or accounts thereof, and other available
sources for other operations and programs of the department;
(2) Review and authorize all departmental requests for legislation;
(3) Approve the issuance and sale of all bonds authorized by the
legislature for capital construction of state highways, toll
facilities, Columbia Basin county roads (for which reimbursement to the
motor vehicle fund has been provided), urban arterial projects, and
aviation facilities;
(4) Propose to the legislative transportation committee for
adoption such rules and policy directives as may be necessary to carry
out reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in the
secretary by statute.

Sec. 147 RCW 47.02.120 and 1990 c 293 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of providing funds for the acquisition of
headquarters facilities for district 1 of the department of
transportation and costs incidental thereto, together with all
improvements and equipment required to make the facilities suitable for
the department's use, there shall be issued and sold upon the request
of the ((Washington transportation commission)) department a total of
fifteen million dollars of general obligation bonds of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 148 RCW 47.02.140 and 1990 c 293 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the request of the secretary of transportation ((commission)),
the state finance committee shall supervise and provide for the
issuance, sale, and retirement of the bonds authorized by RCW 47.02.120
through 47.02.190 in accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds
authorized by RCW 47.02.120 through 47.02.190 shall be sold in such
manner, at such time or times, in such amounts, and at such price as
the state finance committee shall determine. Except for the purpose of
repaying the loan from the motor vehicle fund, no such bonds may be
offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net
proceeds of the sale of the bonds.
The state finance committee shall consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of
more favorable interest rates, lower total interest costs, and
increased marketability and for the purpose of retiring the bonds
during the life of the project for which they were issued.

Sec. 149 RCW 47.10.843 and 1998 c 321 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to provide funds necessary for the location, design, right
of way, and construction of state and local highway improvements, there
shall be issued and sold upon the request of the ((Washington state
transportation commission)) department a maximum of one billion nine
hundred million dollars of general obligation bonds of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 150 RCW 47.10.844 and 1998 c 321 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the request of the ((transportation commission)) department,
the state finance committee shall supervise and provide for the
issuance, sale, and retirement of the bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843
through 47.10.848 in accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843 through 47.10.848 shall be sold in such
manner, at such time or times, in such amounts, and at such price as
the state finance committee shall determine. No such bonds may be
offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net
proceeds of the sale of the bonds.
The state finance committee shall consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of
more favorable interest rates, lower total interest costs, and
increased marketability and for the purpose of retiring the bonds
during the life of the project for which they were issued.

Sec. 151 RCW 47.12.200 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 55 are each amended
to read as follows:
The ((transportation commission)) department may enter into
agreements with the state finance committee for financing the
acquisition, by purchase or condemnation, of real property together
with engineering costs that the ((transportation commission))
department deems will be necessary for the improvement of the state
highway system. Such agreements may provide for the acquisition of an
individual parcel or for the acquisition of any number of parcels
within the limits of a contemplated highway project.

Sec. 152 RCW 47.12.220 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 56 are each amended
to read as follows:
Each such agreement shall include, but shall not be limited to the
following:
(1) A provision stating the term of the agreement which shall not
extend more than seven years from the effective date of the agreement;
(2) A designation of the specific fund or funds to be used to carry
out such agreement;
(3) A provision that the department of transportation may redeem
warrants purchased by the state finance committee at any time prior to
the letting of a highway improvement contract utilizing the property;
and further, during the effective period of each such agreement the
department of transportation shall redeem such warrants whenever such
a highway improvement contract is let, or upon the expiration of such
agreement, whichever date is earlier;
(4) A provision stating the rate of interest such warrants shall
bear commencing at the time of purchase by the state finance committee;
(5) Any additional provisions agreed upon by the ((transportation
commission)) department and the state finance committee which are
necessary to carry out the purposes of such agreement as indicated by
RCW 47.12.180 through 47.12.240((, as now or hereafter amended)).

Sec. 153 RCW 47.17.132 and 1997 c 308 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 35 is established
as follows:
Beginning at the Washington-Oregon boundary line thence northerly
to a junction with state route number 14 in the vicinity of White
Salmon; however, until such time as a bridge across the Columbia River
is constructed at a location adopted by the ((transportation
commission)) department no existing route may be maintained or improved
by the ((transportation commission)) department as a temporary route
for state route number 35.

Sec. 154 RCW 47.46.090 and 2002 c 114 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A citizen advisory committee must be created for any project
developed under this chapter that imposes toll charges for use of a
transportation facility. The governor shall appoint nine members to
the committee, all of whom must be permanent residents of the affected
project area, as that term is used in RCW 47.46.030.
(2) The citizen advisory committee shall serve in an advisory
capacity to the ((commission)) department on all matters related to the
imposition of tolls. Members of the committee shall serve without
compensation.
(3) No toll charge may be imposed or modified unless the citizen
advisory committee has been given at least twenty days to review and
comment on any proposed toll charge schedule. In setting toll rates,
the ((commission)) department shall give consideration to any
recommendations of the citizen advisory committee.

Sec. 155 RCW 47.46.120 and 2002 c 114 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the legislature authorizes the
department of transportation ((commission)) to increase bridge tolls in
excess of the fiscal growth factor.

Sec. 156 RCW 47.56.032 and 1984 c 7 s 247 are each amended to
read as follows:
All powers vested in the toll bridge authority as of September 21,
1977, relating to the acquiring, operating, extending, designing,
constructing, repairing, and maintenance of the Washington state
ferries or any part thereof and the collecting of tolls and charges for
use of its facilities, shall be performed by the department. The
((commission)) department shall determine all fares, tolls, and other
charges for its facilities and shall directly perform all duties and
exercise all powers relating to financing, refinancing, and fiscal
management of the system's bonded indebtedness in the manner provided
by law.

Sec. 157 RCW 47.56.030 and 2002 c 114 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as permitted under chapter 47.46 RCW:
(a) The department of transportation shall have full charge of the
construction of all toll bridges and other toll facilities including
the Washington state ferries, and the operation and maintenance
thereof.
(b) The ((transportation commission)) department shall determine
and establish the tolls and charges thereon, and shall perform all
duties and exercise all powers relating to the financing, refinancing,
and fiscal management of all toll bridges and other toll facilities
including the Washington state ferries, and bonded indebtedness in the
manner provided by law.
(c) The department shall have full charge of design of all toll
facilities.
(d) Except as provided in this section, the department shall
proceed with the construction of such toll bridges and other facilities
and the approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state highway
construction immediately upon there being made available funds for such
work and shall prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as
practicable. The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for
any amount without bid under (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection:
(i) Emergency contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or
ferry terminal facilities or removal of such facilities whenever
continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities constitutes a
real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes prudent
use of such ferries or facilities; and
(ii) Single source contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is
clearly and legitimately only one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific class or classes of vessels. The contracts
may be entered into for a single vessel dry docking or for multiple
vessel dry dockings for a period not to exceed two years.
(2) The department shall proceed with the procurement of materials,
supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support, maintenance,
and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or other facility operated by
Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter 43.19 RCW except
as follows:
(a) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, when the
secretary of the department of transportation determines in writing
that the use of invitation for bid is either not practicable or not
advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to make competitive
evaluations, including technical or performance evaluations among
acceptable proposals to complete the contract award, a contract may be
entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals method, and a
formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal request for
proposals solicitation shall include a functional description of the
needs and requirements of the state and the significant factors.
(b) When purchases are made through a formal request for proposals
solicitation the contract shall be awarded to the responsible proposer
whose competitive sealed proposal is determined in writing to be the
most advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and
other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. No
significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that are not
specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life
cycle cost if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or
delivery; delivery schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare
parts; availability of parts and service offered; and the following:
(i) The ability, capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the
contract or provide the service required;
(ii) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience,
and efficiency of the proposer;
(iii) Whether the proposer can perform the contract within the time
specified;
(iv) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;
(v) The previous and existing compliance by the proposer with laws
relating to the contract or services;
(vi) Objective, measurable criteria defined in the request for
proposal. These criteria may include but are not limited to items such
as discounts, delivery costs, maintenance services costs, installation
costs, and transportation costs; and
(vii) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on
the decision to award the contract.
(c) When purchases are made through a request for proposal process,
proposals received shall be evaluated based on the evaluation factors
set forth in the request for proposal. When issuing a request for
proposal for the procurement of propulsion equipment or systems that
include an engine, the request for proposal must specify the use of a
life cycle cost analysis that includes an evaluation of fuel
efficiency. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle
cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance
as the initial price element specified in the request of proposal
documents. The department may reject any and all proposals received.
If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made to the
proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department,
considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the
request for proposal.
(d) If the department is procuring large equipment or systems
(e.g., electrical, propulsion) needed for the support, maintenance, and
use of a ferry operated by Washington state ferries, the department
shall proceed with a formal request for proposal solicitation under
this subsection (2) without a determination of necessity by the
secretary.

Sec. 158 RCW 47.56.076 and 2002 c 56 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, and only for the purposes authorized
in RCW 36.120.050(1)(f), a regional transportation investment district
may impose vehicle tolls on state routes where improvements financed in
whole or in part by a regional transportation investment district add
additional lanes to, or reconstruct lanes on, a highway of statewide
significance. The department shall administer the collection of
vehicle tolls on designated facilities unless otherwise specified in
law, and ((the state transportation commission, or its successor,))
shall be the tolling authority.

Sec. 159 RCW 47.56.110 and 1984 c 7 s 255 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before the department proceeds with any action to secure a right of
way or with construction of any toll bridge under the provisions of
this chapter, the ((commission)) department shall first pass a
resolution that public interest and necessity require the acquisition
of right of way for and the construction of the toll bridge. The
resolution is conclusive evidence (1) of the public necessity of such
construction; (2) that the property is necessary therefor; and (3) that
the proposed construction is planned or located in a manner which will
be most compatible with the greatest public good and the least private
injury. When it becomes necessary for the department to condemn any
real estate to be used in connection with any such bridge, the attorney
general of the state shall represent the department. In eminent domain
proceedings to acquire property for any of the purposes of this
chapter, any toll bridge, real property, personal property, franchises,
rights, easements, or other property or privileges appurtenant thereto
appropriated or dedicated to a public use or purpose by any person,
firm, private, public, or municipal corporation, county, city, town,
district, or any political subdivision of the state, may be condemned
and taken, and the acquisition and use as provided in this chapter for
the same public use or purpose to which the property has been so
appropriated or dedicated, or for any other public use or purpose, is
a superior and permanent right and necessity, and a more necessary use
and purpose than the public use or purpose to which the property has
already been appropriated or dedicated. It is not necessary in any
eminent domain proceedings under this chapter to plead or prove any
acts or proceedings preliminary or prior to the adoption of the
resolution hereinbefore referred to describing the property sought to
be taken and directing such proceedings.

Sec. 160 RCW 47.60.013 and 1981 c 341 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The governor is authorized to take such actions as may be necessary
to insure the continued operation of the Puget Sound ferry and toll
bridge system under any emergency circumstances which threaten the
continued operation of the system. In the event of such an emergency,
the governor may assume all the powers granted by law to the
((transportation commission and)) department of transportation with
respect to the ferry system. In addition, notwithstanding the
provisions of chapters 47.60 and 47.64 RCW, the governor may contract
with any qualified persons for the operation of the Washington state
ferry system, or any part thereof, or for ferry service to be provided
by privately owned vessels. Administrative costs to the office of the
governor incurred in the exercise of this authority shall be reimbursed
by the department.

Sec. 161 RCW 47.60.150 and 1999 c 94 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the provisions of RCW 47.60.326, the schedule of charges
for the services and facilities of the system shall be fixed and
revised from time to time by the ((commission)) department so that the
tolls and other revenues deposited in the Puget Sound ferry operations
account for maintenance and operation, and all moneys in the Puget
Sound capital construction account available for debt service will
yield annual revenue and income sufficient, after allowance for all
operating, maintenance, and repair expenses to pay the interest and
principal and sinking fund charges for all outstanding revenue bonds,
and to create and maintain a fund for ordinary renewals and
replacements: PROVIDED, That if provision is made by any resolution
for the issuance of revenue bonds for the creation and maintenance of
a special fund for rehabilitating, rebuilding, enlarging, or improving
all or any part of the ferry system then such schedule of tolls and
rates of charges shall be fixed and revised so that the revenue and
income will also be sufficient to comply with such provision.
All income and revenues as collected shall be paid to the state
treasurer for the account of the department and deposited into the
Puget Sound ferry operations account. Nothing in this section requires
tolls on the Hood Canal bridge except as may be required by any bond
covenants.

Sec. 162 RCW 47.60.326 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order to maintain an adequate, fair, and economically sound
schedule of charges for the transportation of passengers, vehicles, and
commodities on the Washington state ferries, the department of
transportation each year shall conduct a full review of such charges.
(2) Prior to February 1st of each odd-numbered year the department
shall ((transmit to the transportation commission)) make public a
report of its review together with its recommendations for the revision
of a schedule of charges for the ensuing biennium. The ((commission))
department on or before July 1st of that year shall adopt as a rule, in
the manner provided by the Washington Administrative Procedure Act, a
schedule of charges for the Washington state ferries for the ensuing
biennium commencing July 1st. The schedule may initially be adopted as
an emergency rule if necessary to take effect on, or as near as
possible to, July 1st.
(3) The department in making its review ((and)), formulating
recommendations, and ((the commission in)) adopting a schedule of
charges may consider any of the following factors:
(a) The amount of subsidy available to the ferry system for
maintenance and operation;
(b) The time and distance of ferry runs;
(c) The maintenance and operation costs for ferry runs with a
proper adjustment for higher costs of operating outmoded or less
efficient equipment;
(d) The efficient distribution of traffic between cross-sound
routes;
(e) The desirability of reasonable commutation rates for persons
using the ferry system to commute daily to work;
(f) The effect of proposed fares in increasing walk-on and
vehicular passenger use;
(g) The effect of proposed fares in promoting all types of ferry
use during nonpeak periods;
(h) Such other factors as prudent managers of a major ferry system
would consider.
(4) If at any time during the biennium it appears that projected
revenues from the Puget Sound ferry operations account and any other
operating subsidy available to the Washington state ferries will be
less than the projected total cost of maintenance and operation of the
Washington state ferries for the biennium, the department shall
forthwith undertake a review of its schedule of charges to ascertain
whether or not the schedule of charges should be revised. The
department shall, upon completion of its review report, ((submit)) make
public its recommendation ((to the transportation commission which)),
and may in its sound discretion revise the schedule of charges as
required to meet necessary maintenance and operation expenditures of
the ferry system for the biennium or may defer action until the regular
annual review and revision of ferry charges as provided in subsection
(2) of this section.
(5) The provisions of RCW 47.60.330 relating to public
participation shall apply to the process of revising ferry tolls under
this section.
(6) Under RCW 43.135.055, the ((transportation commission))
department may increase ferry tolls included in the schedule of charges
adopted under this section by a percentage that exceeds the fiscal
growth factor.

Sec. 163 RCW 47.60.330 and 1983 c 15 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before a substantial expansion or curtailment in the level of
service provided to ferry users, or a revision in the schedule of ferry
tolls or charges, the department of transportation shall consult with
affected ferry users. The consultation shall be: (a) By public
hearing in affected local communities; (b) by review with the affected
ferry advisory committees pursuant to RCW 47.60.310; (c) by conducting
a survey of affected ferry users; or (d) by any combination of (a)
through (c).
(2) There is created a ferry system productivity council consisting
of a representative of each ferry advisory committee empaneled under
RCW 47.60.310, elected by the members thereof, and two representatives
of employees of the ferry system appointed by mutual agreement of all
of the unions representing ferry employees, which shall meet from time
to time with ferry system management to discuss means of improving
ferry system productivity.
(3) Before increasing ferry tolls the department of transportation
shall consider all possible cost reductions with full public
participation as provided in subsection (1) of this section and,
consistent with public policy, shall consider adapting service levels
equitably on a route-by-route basis to reflect trends in and forecasts
of traffic usage. Forecasts of traffic levels shall be developed by
the bond covenant traffic engineering firm appointed under the
provisions of RCW 47.60.450. Provisions of this section shall not
alter obligations under RCW 47.60.450. Before including any toll
increase in a budget proposal ((by the commission)), the department of
transportation shall consult with affected ferry users in the manner
prescribed in (1)(b) of this section plus the procedure of either
(1)(a) or (c) of this section.

Sec. 164 RCW 47.60.445 and 1990 c 42 s 409 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 47.56.240 and 47.56.245 the
((transportation commission)) department shall not collect tolls on the
Hood Canal bridge for any purpose except where necessary to comply with
bond covenants.
The cost of maintenance, upkeep, and repair may be paid from funds
appropriated for the construction and maintenance of the primary state
highways of the state of Washington.

Sec. 165 RCW 47.60.800 and 1992 c 158 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to provide funds necessary for vessel and terminal
acquisition, construction, and major and minor improvements, including
long lead time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries,
there shall be issued and sold upon the request of the ((Washington
state)) department of transportation ((commission)) and legislative
appropriation a total of two hundred ten million dollars of general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington.

Sec. 166 RCW 36.120.050 and 2002 c 56 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may, as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
recommend the imposition of some or all of the following revenue
sources, which a regional transportation investment district may impose
upon approval of the voters as provided in this chapter:
(a) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of
up to 0.5 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event in the regional transportation
investment district;
(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
district. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined
under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;
(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060 and
chapter 81.104 RCW;
(e) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030; and
(f) Vehicle tolls on new or reconstructed facilities. Unless
otherwise specified by law, the department shall administer the
collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities, and the ((state))
department of transportation ((commission)), or its successor, shall be
the tolling authority.
(2) Taxes, fees, and tolls may not be imposed without an
affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of
the district voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW
36.120.070. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to
implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate
entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees
authorized in this section.
(3) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes,
at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not
intended to be altered by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 167 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 47.01.051 (Commission created -- Appointment of members--Terms -- Qualifications -- Removal) and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 5; and
(2) RCW 47.01.061 (Commission -- Procedures and internal operations)
and 1987 c 364 s 2, 1984 c 287 s 94, 1983 1st ex.s. c 53 s 29, 1981 c
59 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 168 Sections 101 through 167 of this act take
effect January 1, 2004.

PERFORMANCE AUDITS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 169 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature finds
that in order to recapture the public trust and demonstrate to the
public that the department of transportation is operating as
efficiently and effectively as possible, the department must be subject
to regular performance audits supervised by the legislature. The
legislature further finds that the department can recapture public
trust by submitting performance data to the legislature along with its
project list.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 170 A new section is added to chapter 44.40
RCW to read as follows:
PERFORMANCE AUDITS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION. (1) Every
four years the legislative transportation committee shall undertake
independent, objective, and comprehensive performance audits of the
department of transportation, to be performed in accordance with
government auditing standards.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, "government auditing
standards" means the Generally Accepted Government Auditing Standards
(GAGAS) as published by the Comptroller General of the United States
General Accounting Office (GAO).
(3) The performance audit report must include:
(a) Identification of potential cost savings in the department of
transportation, its programs, and its services;
(b) Identification of funding to the department of transportation,
to programs, and to services that can be eliminated or reduced;
(c) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated,
reduced, or transferred to the private sector;
(d) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and
recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating
functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(e) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information technology
systems used within the department;
(f) Analysis of the roles and functions of the department, its
programs, and its services and their compliance with statutory
authority and recommendations for eliminating or changing those roles
and functions and ensuring compliance with statutory authority;
(g) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the department
carry out reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in
the department by statute;
(h) Verification of the reliability and validity of department
performance data, self-assessments, and performance measurement systems
as required under RCW 43.88.090; and
(i) Identification and recognition of best practices.
(4) The legislative transportation committee may require the
department to provide all information required for completion of any
audit, and the department shall fully and completely cooperate with the
legislative transportation committee for the purposes of this section.
Costs of complying with the requirements will be paid by the
department.
(5) The legislative transportation committee shall contract with
the state auditor for conducting performance audits and shall provide
oversight of the audits. Employees within the legislative
transportation committee's office, if available and qualified, may
assist in the audits. The legislative transportation committee shall
create and maintain a list of qualified private sector professional and
technical experts who may be selected to conduct performance audits
either by lot or on a rotating basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 171 A new section is added to chapter 44.40
RCW to read as follows:
DEFINITION. For the purpose of this chapter, a "performance audit"
is an objective and systematic examination of evidence for the purpose
of providing an independent assessment of the performance of the
department of transportation, or of a program or service provided by
the department, in order to provide information for improving public
accountability and facilitating decision making by those who have the
responsibility to initiate or oversee corrective action. Performance
audits include economy and efficiency audits and program audits.
(1) Economy and efficiency audits include determining whether the
department is acquiring, protecting, and using its resources, such as
personnel, property, and space, economically and efficiently; the
causes of uneconomical or inefficient practices; and whether the
department has complied with laws and rules on matters of economy and
efficiency.
(2) Program audits include determining the extent to which the
desired results or benefits established by the legislature or other
authorizing body are being achieved by the department; the
effectiveness of agencies, programs, and services; and whether the
department complied with laws and rules applicable to the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 172 A new section is added to chapter 47.01
RCW to read as follows:
SUBMISSION OF PERFORMANCE DATA TO THE LEGISLATURE. The department
shall submit to the transportation commission or its statutory
successor, the governor, and the legislature, cost and performance data
to accompany the proposed project list developed under RCW 47.05.051.
For capacity projects the data must specify the estimated congestion
relief in both time and money (opportunity costs). For safety
projects, the department shall submit estimates for both the number of
lives saved and the reduced negative economic effects of high-accident
areas.

PART II
ACHIEVING TRANSPORTATION WORK FORCE EFFICIENCIES
CONTRACTING OUT
Sec. 201 RCW 41.06.380 and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter ((shall)) prohibits any
department, as defined in RCW 41.06.020, from purchasing services by
contract with individuals or business entities if such services were
regularly purchased by valid contract by such department prior to April
23, 1979((: PROVIDED, That no such)).
(2) No contract referred to in subsection (1) of this section may
be executed or renewed if it would have the effect of terminating
classified employees or classified employee positions existing at the
time of the execution or renewal of the contract except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) This chapter does not prohibit the department of transportation
until January 1, 2004, from purchasing services for highway
maintenance, engineering, or administrative support, including services
that have customarily and historically been provided by employees in
the classified service under this chapter, by contracting with
individuals, nonprofit organizations, businesses, groups of former
employees, unions, or other entities. After January 1, 2004, this
chapter does not prohibit the department of transportation from
purchasing any services, including services that have customarily and
historically been provided by employees in the classified service under
this chapter, by contracting with individuals, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, unions, or other entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 Provisions of a collective bargaining
agreement adopted under chapter 41.06 RCW that are in effect on the
effective date of this section and that conflict with RCW 41.06.380, as
amended by section 201 of this act, will continue in effect until
contract expiration, unless a superseding agreement resolving the
conflict is executed by the parties before expiration. After
expiration, any new agreement executed between the parties must be
consistent with RCW 41.06.380.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 By January 1, 2004, the secretary of
transportation shall report to the transportation committees of the
house and senate on the current use of contracting out by the
department and on further opportunities for contracting out within the
department. In recommending programs that might be performed by the
private sector, the secretary shall emphasize programs that could be
undertaken at a lower cost by the private sector than by state
employees, and programs in which the use of the private sector could
augment the department's work force in order to increase the
department's capacity to complete projects as quickly as possible. The
secretary may issue the report electronically by publishing it on the
department's web site and by transmitting the report electronically to
all members of the house and senate transportation committees.

PREVAILING WAGE
Sec. 204 RCW 39.12.010 and 1989 c 12 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) The "prevailing rate of wage"((, for the intents and purposes
of this chapter, shall be)) is the rate of hourly wage, usual benefits,
and overtime paid in the locality((, as hereinafter defined, to the
majority of)) to workers, laborers, or mechanics, in the same trade or
occupation on nonpublic construction projects. ((In the event that
there is not a majority in the same trade or occupation paid at the
same rate, then the average rate of hourly wage and overtime paid to
such laborers, workers, or mechanics in the same trade or occupation
shall be the prevailing rate.)) If the wage paid by any contractor or
subcontractor to laborers, workers, or mechanics on any public work is
based on some period of time other than an hour, the hourly wage for
the purposes of this chapter shall be mathematically determined by the
number of hours worked in such period of time.
(2) The "locality" ((for the purposes of this chapter shall be the
largest city in)) is the county wherein the physical work is being
performed.
(3) The "usual benefits" ((for the purposes of this chapter shall))
include the amount of:
(a) The rate of contribution irrevocably made by a contractor or
subcontractor to a trustee or to a third person pursuant to a fund,
plan, or program; and
(b) The rate of costs to the contractor or subcontractor which may
be reasonably anticipated in providing benefits to workers, laborers,
and mechanics pursuant to an enforceable commitment to carry out a
financially responsible plan or program which was communicated in
writing to the workers, laborers, and mechanics affected, for medical
or hospital care, pensions on retirement or death, compensation for
injuries or illness resulting from occupational activity, or insurance
to provide any of the foregoing, for unemployment benefits, life
insurance, disability and sickness insurance, or accident insurance,
for vacation and holiday pay, for defraying costs of apprenticeship or
other similar programs, or for other bona fide fringe benefits, but
only where the contractor or subcontractor is not required by other
federal, state, or local law to provide any of such benefits.
(4) An "interested party" ((for the purposes of this chapter
shall)) includes a contractor, subcontractor, an employee of a
contractor or subcontractor, an organization whose members' wages,
benefits, and conditions of employment are affected by this chapter,
and the director of labor and industries or the director's designee.

Sec. 205 RCW 39.12.015 and 1965 ex.s. c 133 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
All determinations of the prevailing rate of wage shall be made by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries
using a stratified random sampling methodology.

Sec. 206 RCW 39.12.020 and 1989 c 12 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or
mechanics((,)) employed by contractors or subcontractors directly upon
the project site of work upon all public works estimated to cost more
than two hundred fifty thousand dollars and under all public building
service maintenance contracts of the state or any county, municipality
or political subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less than
the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or
occupation in the locality within the state where such labor is
performed, if the results of a benefit-cost analysis show that the
costs do not exceed the benefits of paying the prevailing wage required
in this section. ((For a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars,))
(2) A contractor required to pay the prevailing rate of wage shall
post in a location readily visible to workers at the job site:
PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission
line, street, or alley improvement projects for which no field office
is needed or established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of
wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing,
concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a
copy of the wage statement to any employee on request:
(((1))) (a) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries under RCW 39.12.040; and
(((2))) (b) The address and telephone number of the industrial
statistician of the department of labor and industries where a
complaint or inquiry concerning prevailing wages may be made.
(3) This chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Workers or other persons regularly employed on monthly or per
diem salary by the state, or any county, municipality, or political
subdivision created by its laws;
(b) A public works project as defined by chapter 39.04 RCW and that
is subject to both the prevailing rate of wage of this chapter and the
federal prevailing wage rate under 40 U.S.C. Sec. 276a.
(4) This chapter does not apply to counties or cities with a
population of less than seventy-five thousand persons.

PRIVATIZE REST AREAS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to chapter 47.38
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department must adopt by rule a comprehensive program that
allows private entities to operate currently existing and any new
state-owned safety rest areas. The department shall seek federal
waivers as necessary to undertake this program.
(2) The program to allow private entities to operate state-owned
safety rest areas must meet the following criteria:
(a) In addition to commercial services offered, privately operated
safety rest areas must also offer equivalent services, at no charge,
currently provided by state-operated safety rest areas;
(b) The department must lease the rights to operate safety rest
areas for a commercially reasonable period of time, but no longer than
twenty years;
(c) The department may lease the right to operate either individual
safety rest areas, or groups of safety rest areas, or both, to a
private entity;
(d) Before entering into a lease with an entity, the department
shall contact food or beverage retailers, restaurants, grocery and
convenience stores, lodging, and service station businesses within one
mile from the highway exits immediately before and after the rest stop
location, in each direction of traffic, and allow these businesses an
opportunity to bid or otherwise negotiate with the department to
operate the facility. If no business responds with a reasonable bid or
offer within sixty days, the department shall open the bid or
negotiation process to all interested entities;
(e) The department must take all necessary action to ensure the
most favorable lease rates for the state, whether by bid or other
reasonable manner, and to require the lessee to enter into any other
contract or agreement to protect the state and its citizens from
commercial harm or other type of harm; and
(f) A lease must allow a nonprofit organization that had previously
conducted fund-raising activities or vending machine sales on the
premises to continue the activities. Alternatively, at the election of
the nonprofit organizations, one percent of gross sales will be divided
between all nonprofit organizations that had conducted fund-raising
activities on the premises within the twenty-four months before the
effective date of the lease. Payments must be calculated and paid
every six months on a pro rata basis, whereby each nonprofit
organization is entitled to a share of the sales equal to the
percentage of time that organization actually spent working on the
premises relative to any other nonprofit organization that also
conducted fund-raising activities on the premises for the twenty-four
months before the effective date of the lease.

PRIVATIZE PASSENGER-ONLY FERRIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 The legislature finds that the Washington
state department of transportation should focus on its core ferry
mission of moving automobiles on Washington state's marine highways.
The legislature finds that current statutes impose barriers to entities
other than the state operating passenger-only ferries. The legislature
intends to lift those barriers to allow entities other than the state
to provide passenger-only ferry service. The legislature finds that
the provision of this service and the improvement in the mobility of
the citizens of Washington state is legally adequate consideration for
the use of state facilities in conjunction with the provision of the
service, and the legislature finds that allowing the operators of
passenger-only ferries to use state facilities on the basis of legally
adequate consideration does not evince donative intent on the part of
the legislature.

Sec. 209 RCW 47.60.120 and 1993 c 427 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department acquires or constructs, maintains, and
operates any ferry crossings upon or toll bridges over Puget Sound or
any of its tributary or connecting waters, there shall not be
constructed, operated, or maintained any other ferry crossing upon or
bridge over any such waters within ten miles of any such crossing or
bridge operated or maintained by the department excepting such bridges
or ferry crossings in existence, and being operated and maintained
under a lawfully issued franchise at the time of the location of the
ferry crossing or construction of the toll bridge by the department.
(2) The ten-mile distance in subsection (1) of this section means
ten statute miles measured by airline distance. The ten-mile
restriction shall be applied by comparing the two end points (termini)
of a state ferry crossing to those of a private ferry crossing.
(3) The Washington utilities and transportation commission may,
upon written petition of a commercial ferry operator certificated or
applying for certification under chapter 81.84 RCW, and upon notice and
hearing, grant a waiver from the ten-mile restriction. The waiver must
not be detrimental to the public interest. In making a decision to
waive the ten-mile restriction, the commission shall consider, but is
not limited to, the impact of the waiver on transportation congestion
mitigation, air quality improvement, and the overall impact on the
Washington state ferry system. The commission shall act upon a request
for a waiver within ninety days after the conclusion of the hearing.
A waiver is effective for a period of five years from the date of
issuance. At the end of five years the waiver becomes permanent unless
appealed within thirty days by the commission on its own motion, the
department, or an interested party.
(4) The department shall not maintain and operate any ferry
crossing or toll bridge over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or
connecting waters that would infringe upon any franchise lawfully
issued by the state and in existence and being exercised at the time of
the location of the ferry crossing or toll bridge by the department,
without first acquiring the rights granted to such franchise holder
under the franchise.
(5) This section does not apply to operators of passenger-only
ferry service.

Sec. 210 RCW 47.64.090 and 1983 c 15 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If any party assumes the operation and maintenance of any ferry
or ferry system by rent, lease, or charter from the department of
transportation, such party shall assume and be bound by all the
provisions herein and any agreement or contract for such operation of
any ferry or ferry system entered into by the department shall provide
that the wages to be paid, hours of employment, working conditions and
seniority rights of employees will be established by the marine
employees' commission in accordance with the terms and provisions of
this chapter and it shall further provide that all labor disputes shall
be adjudicated in accordance with chapter 47.64 RCW.
(2) The department of transportation shall make its terminal, dock,
and pier space available to operators of passenger-only ferries if the
space can be made available without limiting the operation of car
ferries operated by the department. The department may not charge any
lease, rent, or fee in excess of amounts necessary to be deemed legally
adequate for the use of the department's facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 A new section is added to chapter 47.60
RCW to read as follows:
When augmenting the existing ferry fleet, the department of
transportation ferry capital program shall explore cost-effective
options to include the leasing of ferries from private-sector
organizations.

PART III
ALTERNATIVE DELIVERY PROCEDURES FOR TRANSPORTATION SERVICESPUBLIC ART
Sec. 301 RCW 43.17.200 and 1983 c 204 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
All state agencies including all state departments except the
department of transportation, boards, councils, commissions, and quasi
public corporations shall allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any
moneys appropriated for the original construction of any public
building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to
be expended by the Washington state arts commission for the acquisition
of works of art. The works of art may be placed on public lands,
integral to or attached to a public building or structure, detached
within or outside a public building or structure, part of a portable
exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or
exhibited in other public facilities. In addition to the cost of the
works of art the one-half of one percent of the appropriation as
provided herein shall be used to provide for the administration of the
visual arts program by the Washington state arts commission and all
costs for installation of the works of art. For the purpose of this
section building shall not include highway construction sheds,
warehouses or other buildings of a temporary nature.

TRAILS AND PATHS
Sec. 302 RCW 47.30.050 and 1999 c 269 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) The amount expended by a city, town, or county as authorized
by RCW 47.30.030 shall never in any one fiscal year be less than 0.42
percent of the total amount of funds received from the motor vehicle
fund according to RCW 46.68.090. However, this section does not apply
to a city or town in any year in which the 0.42 percent equals five
hundred dollars or less, or to a county in any year in which the 0.42
percent equals three thousand dollars or less. Also, a city, town, or
county in lieu of expending the funds each year may credit the funds to
a financial reserve or special fund, to be held for not more than ten
years, and to be expended for the purposes required or permitted by RCW
47.30.030.
(2) In each fiscal year)) Only when receiving a specific
legislative appropriation, the department of transportation ((shall))
may expend((, as a minimum, for the purposes mentioned in RCW 47.30.030
a sum equal to three-tenths of one percent of all funds, both)) state
and federal((, expended for the construction of state highways in such
year, or in order to more efficiently)) funds to program trail or path
improvements ((the department may defer any part of such minimum trail
or path expenditures for a fiscal year for a period not to exceed four
years after the end of such fiscal year. Any fiscal year in which the
department expends for trail or path purposes more than the minimum sum
required by this subsection, the amount of such excess expenditure
shall constitute a credit which may be carried forward and applied to
the minimum trail and path expenditure requirements for any of the
ensuing four fiscal years.
(3) The department of transportation, a city, or a county in
computing the amount expended for trails or paths under their
respective jurisdictions may include the cost of improvements
consistent with a comprehensive plan or master plan for bicycle trails
or paths adopted by a state or local governmental authority either
prior to such construction or prior to January 1, 1980)).

FREIGHT AND AMTRAK
NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 47.76.200 (Legislative findings) and 1995 c 380 s 1, 1993
c 224 s 1, & 1983 c 303 s 4;
(2) RCW 47.76.210 (State freight rail program) and 1995 c 380 s 2
& 1990 c 43 s 2;
(3) RCW 47.76.220 (State rail plan -- Contents) and 1995 c 380 s 3,
1993 c 224 s 2, 1985 c 432 s 1, & 1983 c 303 s 5;
(4) RCW 47.76.230 (Freight rail planning) and 1995 c 380 s 4 & 1990
c 43 s 3;
(5) RCW 47.76.240 (Rail preservation program) and 1995 c 380 s 5,
1993 c 224 s 3, & 1990 c 43 s 4;
(6) RCW 47.76.250 (Essential rail assistance account -- Purposes) and
1996 c 73 s 2, 1995 c 380 s 6, 1993 c 224 s 4, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 22,
1991 c 363 s 125, & 1990 c 43 s 11;
(7) RCW 47.76.270 (Essential rail banking account merged into
essential rail assistance account) and 1995 c 380 s 7, 1993 c 224 s 6,
1991 sp.s. c 13 s 120, 1991 c 363 s 127, & 1990 c 43 s 7;
(8) RCW 47.76.280 (Sale or lease for use as rail service -- Time
limit) and 1995 c 380 s 8, 1993 c 224 s 7, 1991 sp.s. c 15 s 61, 1991
c 363 s 126, & 1985 c 432 s 3;
(9) RCW 47.76.290 (Sale or lease for other use -- Authorized buyers,
notice, terms, deed, deposit of moneys) and 1993 c 224 s 8, 1991 sp.s.
c 15 s 62, & 1985 c 432 s 4;
(10) RCW 47.76.300 (Sale for other use -- Governmental entity) and
1993 c 224 s 9, 1991 sp.s. c 15 s 63, & 1985 c 432 s 5;
(11) RCW 47.76.310 (Rent or lease of lands) and 1993 c 224 s 10,
1991 sp.s. c 15 s 64, & 1985 c 432 s 6;
(12) RCW 47.76.320 (Sale at public auction) and 1993 c 224 s 11,
1991 sp.s. c 15 s 65, & 1985 c 432 s 7;
(13) RCW 47.76.330 (Eminent domain exemptions) and 1993 c 224 s 12,
1991 sp.s. c 15 s 66, & 1985 c 432 s 8;
(14) RCW 47.76.340 (Evaluating program performance) and 1993 c 224
s 13 & 1990 c 43 s 8;
(15) RCW 47.76.350 (Monitoring federal rail policies) and 1990 c 43
s 10;
(16) RCW 47.82.010 (Service improvement program) and 1990 c 43 s
36;
(17) RCW 47.82.020 (Depot upgrading) and 1990 c 43 s 37;
(18) RCW 47.82.030 (Service extension) and 1990 c 43 s 38; and
(19) RCW 47.82.040 (Coordination with other rail systems and common
carriers) and 1990 c 43 s 39.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 The department of transportation shall
sell at fair market value any equipment, rolling stock, rights of way,
or other real or personal property owned by the department and relating
to rail freight or passenger programs. The proceeds must be deposited
in the motor vehicle account.

CONGESTION RELIEF
NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to chapter 47.04
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall identify all transportation projects and
activities that are primarily intended to reduce traffic congestion or
add capacity. Once identified, the department must prioritize the
projects using the following criteria:
(1) The department must review the capacity of those highways known
to have congestion problems, and determine at what percentage of
capacity the highway is operating. Those highways that are closest to
capacity or most over capacity must receive the highest priority; and
(2) Each of the department's geographic administrative regions must
complete its highway construction projects in the order of their
prioritized ranking. The highest priority projects in each region must
be completed before starting on lower priority projects.

HIGH-OCCUPANCY VEHICLE LANES
Sec. 306 RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state department of transportation and the local authorities
are authorized to reserve ((all or any portion)) one lane of any
general purpose highway containing at least four lanes in each
direction, under their respective jurisdictions, including any
designated lane or ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of
public transportation vehicles or private motor vehicles carrying no
fewer than a specified number of passengers when such limitation will
increase the efficient utilization of the highway or will aid in the
conservation of energy resources. Regulations authorizing such
exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to
be effective ((at all times or)) at specified times of day or on
specified days. Violation of a restriction of highway usage prescribed
by the appropriate authority under this section is a traffic
infraction.

Sec. 307 RCW 47.52.025 and 1974 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Highway authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated cities
and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this chapter,
shall also have, and may exercise, relative to limited access
facilities, any and all additional authority, now or hereafter vested
in them relative to highways or streets within their respective
jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such
limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or traffic.
Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility
containing at least four lanes in each direction, or portions thereof,
including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive or preferential
use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned buses, or
private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified number of
passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient utilization
of the highway facility or will aid in the conservation of energy
resources. Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use
of a highway facility may be declared to be effective at all time or at
specified times of day or on specified days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 A new section is added to chapter 47.52
RCW to read as follows:
Upon completion of the Vancouver high-occupancy vehicle lanes pilot
project that began on October 28, 2001, and concluded October 28, 2002,
the department of transportation may only proceed with future high-occupancy vehicle lane projects in counties with a population of three
hundred thousand or more that border the state of Oregon, when vehicle
spaces at park and ride lots within the county are three times the
capacity in existence on January 1, 2004, or if the Interstate 5 bridge
over the Columbia River is retrofitted to include four permanent
southbound general purpose lanes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 81.100.010 (Purpose) and 2002 c 56 s 409 & 1990 c 43 s 12;
(2) RCW 81.100.020 (Definitions) and 1990 c 43 s 13;
(3) RCW 81.100.030 (Employer tax) and 2002 c 56 s 410, 1991 c 363
s 153, & 1990 c 43 s 14;
(4) RCW 81.100.040 (Adoption of goals) and 1990 c 43 s 15;
(5) RCW 81.100.050 (Survey of tax use) and 1990 c 43 s 16;
(6) RCW 81.100.060 (Excise tax) and 2002 c 56 s 411, 1998 c 321 s
34, 1992 c 194 s 12, 1991 c 363 s 154, & 1990 c 43 s 17;
(7) RCW 81.100.070 (High occupancy vehicle account) and 1991 sp.s.
c 13 ss 105, 119 & 1990 c 43 s 18;
(8) RCW 81.100.080 (Use of funds) and 1990 c 43 s 19;
(9) RCW 81.100.090 (Interlocal agreements) and 1990 c 43 s 20; and
(10) RCW 81.100.100 (Urban public transportation system) and 1990
c 43 s 21.

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION REVENUE REFORMSCAPRON
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 RCW 46.68.080 (Refund of vehicle license
fees and fuel tax to island counties) and 1961 c 12 s 46.68.080 are
each repealed.

SALES TAX ON CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of
the legislature that every penny of constitutionally restricted gas tax
revenue is expended solely for the purposes outlined in the 18th
Amendment to the state Constitution. Therefore, the sales tax paid on
projects constructed by the Washington state department of
transportation must be expended solely for necessary operating,
engineering, construction, maintenance, repair, betterment, and other
highway purposes as determined by the department and the legislature.
The legislature further intends that the state treasurer shall deposit
all sales and use taxes collected on all department of transportation
projects, including safety and environmental retrofit and maintenance
projects, to the credit of the motor vehicle account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Effective for taxes collected in fiscal year 2006, the tax
imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, less any
credits allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on any department of
transportation project will be transferred from the general fund to the
motor vehicle account once each year as described by subsection (3) of
this section.
(2) This transaction is exempt from the requirements in RCW
43.135.035(4).
(3) Government entities conducting construction projects within the
improvement program in RCW 47.05.030, except for those projects related
to safety and environmental retrofit, shall report to the department by
August 1st of each year the amount of state sales or use tax
attributable to the projects identified in this section from the
previous fiscal year for purposes of transfer to the motor vehicle
account. The department shall notify the state treasurer of the amount
of the transfer by September 30th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Part headings and section captions used in
this act are not part of the law.

--- END ---