BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.62.010 and 2001 c 320 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means an area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.
(4)(a) "Eligible business project" means manufacturing or research
and development activities which are conducted by an applicant in an
eligible area at a specific facility, provided the applicant's average
full-time qualified employment positions at the specific facility will:
(i) Be at least fifteen percent greater in the year for which the
credit is being sought than the applicant's average full-time qualified
employment positions at the same facility in the immediately preceding
year; or (ii)(A) increase by at least thirty full-time employment
positions in the year for which the credit is being sought over the
prior year's average full-time employment positions at the same
facility in the immediately preceding year, if the eligible business
project is located in an eligible area having a population of less than
fifty thousand; or (B) increase by at least fifty full-time employment
positions in the year for which the credit is being sought over the
prior year's average full-time employment positions at the same
facility in the immediately preceding year, if the eligible business
project is located in an eligible area having a population of fifty
thousand or more.
(b) "Eligible business project" does not include any portion of a
business project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in
RCW 82.16.010(5) or that portion of a business project creating
qualified full-time employment positions outside an eligible area.
(5) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the
activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories.
(6) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(7) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible business project during the entire
tax year.
(8) "Tax year" means the calendar year in which taxes are due.
(9) "Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this
chapter.
(10) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this
subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

--- END ---