BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47.060 and 2001 c 196 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in
any participating managed health care system under the Washington basic
health plan shall be entitled to receive covered basic health care
services in return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule of
services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health care and
shall include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees
who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the
medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator
shall not contract for such services except to the extent that such
services are necessary over not more than a one-month period in order
to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the
managed care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a
separate schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen
years of age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for
their dependent children. In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (9) of this section and to the share of the cost of the plan
due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees pursuant
to subsection (10) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(c) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator.
(d) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing
coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on January
1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in enrollee
cost-sharing requirements.
(3) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
due a managed health care system from subsidized and nonsubsidized
enrollees. The structure shall discourage inappropriate enrollee
utilization of health care services, and may utilize copayments,
deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but shall not be so
costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate
utilization of necessary health care services.
(4) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as
to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the
administrator finds the danger no longer exists.
(5) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as
defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who
qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the
administrator.
(6) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery
of services and availability of the plan to residents of the state,
subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(7) To solicit and accept applications from managed health care
systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic
health care providers under the plan for either subsidized enrollees,
or nonsubsidized enrollees, or both. The administrator shall endeavor
to assure that covered basic health care services are available to any
enrollee of the plan from among a selection of two or more
participating managed health care systems. In adopting any rules or
procedures applicable to managed health care systems and in its
dealings with such systems, the administrator shall consider and make
suitable allowance for the need for health care services and the
differences in local availability of health care resources, along with
other resources, within and among the several areas of the state.
Contracts with participating managed health care systems shall ensure
that basic health plan enrollees who become eligible for medical
assistance may, at their option, continue to receive services from
their existing providers within the managed health care system if such
providers have entered into provider agreements with the department of
social and health services.
(8) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized
and nonsubsidized enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan
operating account, keep records of enrollee status, and authorize
periodic payments to managed health care systems on the basis of the
number of enrollees participating in the respective managed health care
systems.
(9) To accept applications from individuals residing in areas
served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, to establish appropriate
minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as may be necessary, and to
determine, upon application and on a reasonable schedule defined by the
authority, or at the request of any enrollee, eligibility due to
current gross family income for sliding scale premiums. Funds received
by a family as part of participation in the adoption support program
authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall
not be counted toward a family's current gross family income for the
purposes of this chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or
income changes accurately, the administrator shall have the authority
either to bill the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to
impose civil penalties of up to two hundred percent of the amount of
subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly reporting income. The
administrator shall adopt rules to define the appropriate application
of these sanctions and the processes to implement the sanctions
provided in this subsection, within available resources. No subsidy
may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW
70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care
services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their
enrollment for no apparent good cause, the administrator may establish
appropriate rules or requirements that are applicable to such
individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in the plan.
(10) To ((accept applications from business owners on behalf of
themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes)) require the
employers of all enrollees with wage or salary income to pay an amount
equal to the amount of the premium paid by their employees to
participate in the plan. The amount billed under this subsection may
not, alone or in combination with the premium paid by the enrollee,
exceed the amount paid to the managed health care system for that
enrollee's coverage. For enrollees with more than one employer, the
amount owed will be divided among the enrollee's employers in an
equitable manner as established by the administrator by rule. If a
business is delinquent in making the payments required by this
subsection, the administrator has the authority to impose late payment
fees, and civil penalties of up to three hundred percent of the amount
of the delinquent payments. The amount billed the employer must be
distinct from the enrollee's premium payment, and may be billed for
past months. No enrollee may be removed from the plan as a result of
an employer's delinquency in making the required payments. All funds
collected from employers under this subsection must be deposited in the
basic health plan trust account, to be used by the administrator for
subsidized basic health plan enrollment. All state funds that would
otherwise have been used in lieu of an employer contribution remain
appropriated to the health care authority for the purposes of
subsidized enrollment in the basic health plan. The administrator may
adopt rules to achieve the purposes of this subsection.
(11) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health
care services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of
covered basic health care services will be the same or actuarially
equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems.
In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the
respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(12) To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by
participating managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee
access to good quality basic health care, to require periodic data
reports concerning the utilization of health care services rendered to
enrollees in order to provide adequate information for evaluation, and
to inspect the books and records of participating managed health care
systems to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter. In
requiring reports from participating managed health care systems,
including data on services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall
endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems and
to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance
commissioner and the department of health, to minimize duplication of
effort.
(13) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent
with state and federal statutes that will discourage the reduction of
such coverage in the state.
(14) To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and
to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and consistent with
this chapter.
(15) To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for
rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of color.
(16) In consultation with appropriate state and local government
agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for persons
confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(17) To administer the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the Washington
state health insurance pool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---