BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.64.020 and 1990 c 227 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of filing the complaint or any time thereafter, the
plaintiff may apply to the judge or court commissioner to issue an
order directing the defendant to appear and show cause why an order
putting the plaintiff in immediate possession of the personal property
should not be issued.
(2) In support of the application, the plaintiff, or someone on the
plaintiff's behalf, shall make an affidavit, or a declaration as
permitted under RCW 9A.72.085, showing:
(a) That the plaintiff is the owner of the property or is lawfully
entitled to the possession of the property by virtue of a special
property interest, including a security interest, specifically
describing the property and interest;
(b) That the property is wrongfully detained by defendant;
(c) That the property has not been taken for a tax, assessment, or
fine pursuant to a statute and has not been seized under an execution
or attachment against the property of the plaintiff, or if so seized,
that it is by law exempt from such seizure; and
(d) The approximate value of the property.
(3) The order to show cause shall state the date, time, and place
of the hearing((, which shall be set no earlier than ten and no later
than twenty-five days after the date of the order)) and contain a
notice to the defendant that failure to promptly turn over possession
of the property to the plaintiff or the sheriff, if an order awarding
possession is issued under RCW 7.64.035(1), may subject the defendant
to being held in contempt of court.
(4) A certified copy of the order to show cause, with a copy of the
plaintiff's affidavit or declaration attached, shall be served upon the
defendant no later than five days before the hearing date.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.64.035 and 1990 c 227 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the hearing on the order to show cause, the judge or court
commissioner may issue an order awarding possession of the property to
the plaintiff and directing the sheriff to put the plaintiff in
possession of the property:
(a)(i) If the plaintiff establishes the right to obtain possession
of the property pending final disposition, or (ii) if the defendant,
after being served with the order to show cause, fails to appear at the
hearing; and
(b) If the plaintiff executes to the defendant and files in the
court a bond in such sum as the court may order, with sufficient
surety to be approved by the clerk, conditioned that the plaintiff will
prosecute the action without delay and that if the order is wrongfully
sued out, the plaintiff will pay all costs that may be adjudged to the
defendant and all damages, court costs, reasonable attorneys' fees, and
costs of recovery that the defendant may incur by reason of the order
having been issued. However, the court may waive the bond if the
plaintiff has properly served the defendant in accordance with RCW
7.64.020(4) and the defendant either fails to attend the hearing on the
order to show cause or appears at the hearing on the order to show
cause but does not object to entry of the order awarding possession.
If the court waives the bond, the court shall, however, establish the
amount of bond that would have been required and such amount shall be
considered the amount filed by the plaintiff for purposes of
determining the value of the redelivery bond pursuant to RCW
7.64.050(3).
(2) An order awarding possession shall: (a) State that a show
cause hearing was held; (b) describe the property and its location; (c)
direct the sheriff to take possession of the property and put the
plaintiff in possession as provided in this chapter; (d) contain a
notice to the defendant that failure to turn over possession of the
property to the sheriff may subject the defendant to being held in
contempt of court upon application to the court by the plaintiff
without further notice; (e) if deemed necessary, direct the sheriff to
break and enter a building or enclosure to obtain possession of the
property if it is concealed in the building or enclosure; and (((e)))
(f) be signed by the judge or commissioner.
(3) If at the time of the hearing more than twenty days have
elapsed since service of the summons and complaint and the defendant
does not raise an issue of fact prior to or at the hearing that
requires a trial on the issue of possession or damages, the judge or
court commissioner may also, in addition to entering an order awarding
possession, enter a final judgment awarding plaintiff possession of the
property or its value if possession cannot be obtained, damages, court
costs, reasonable attorneys' fees, and costs of recovery.
(4) When any of the property is property located in a county other
than the county in which the action was commenced, the sheriff directed
to take possession of the property by the order awarding possession, or
the sheriff of the county where the property is found, may execute the
order awarding possession and take possession of the property in any
county of the state where the property is found. For the purpose of
following the property, duplicate orders awarding possession may be
issued, if necessary, and served as the original.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.64.045 and 1990 c 227 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
After issuance of the order awarding possession, the plaintiff
shall deliver a copy of the bond, unless waived by the court under RCW
7.64.035(1)(b), and a certified copy of the order awarding possession
to the sheriff of the county where the property is located and shall
provide the sheriff with all available information as to the location
and identity of the defendant and the property claimed. If the
property is returned to the plaintiff by the defendant or if the
plaintiff otherwise obtains possession of the property, the plaintiff
shall notify the sheriff of this fact as soon as possible.

--- END ---