BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the increasing
use by supermarkets of club cards to authorize price discounts for
consumers may threaten individual privacy. The legislature further
finds that the process used to issue club cards does not ensure the
reliability or accuracy of personally identifiable information and,
therefore, the use of such information should be restricted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.86 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Supermarket club card" means any card, plate, coupon book, or
other device issued for the purpose of being used upon presentation to
authorize discounts on retail products offered by the club card issuer.
(b) "Personally identifiable cardholder information" means:
(i) Information that identifies a cardholder including name,
address, telephone number, email address, and social security number;
and
(ii) Information that identifies a cardholder as having purchased
any specific product or service or any category of product or service.
(2) Unless otherwise required by law, no personally identifiable
cardholder information may be used in any legal proceeding, or in any
employment action without the express consent of the cardholder.
Consent must be obtained when the issuer of the supermarket club card
releases cardholder information for a proceeding or action, and the
cardholder must be informed that without consent the information may
not be released. The cardholder must also be given the opportunity to
review all records containing personally identifiable cardholder
information before granting or withholding consent.
(3) An issuer of supermarket club cards must provide a card to a
consumer on request without requiring the consumer to provide any
personal information, including name, address, telephone number, email
address, and social security number.

--- END ---