BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.165.160 and 2002 c 86 s 245 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action for the following
conduct, acts, or conditions:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter;
(2) Making a material misstatement or omission in the application
for or renewal of a firearms certificate, including falsifying
requested identification information;
(3) Not meeting the qualifications set forth in RCW 18.165.030,
18.165.040, or 18.165.050;
(4) Failing to return immediately on demand a firearm issued by an
employer;
(5) Carrying a firearm in the performance of his or her duties if
not the holder of a valid armed private investigator license, or
carrying a firearm not meeting the provisions of this chapter while in
the performance of his or her duties;
(6) Failing to return immediately on demand company identification,
badges, or other items issued to the private investigator by an
employer;
(7) Making any statement that would reasonably cause another person
to believe that the private investigator is a sworn peace officer;
(8) Obtaining, or attempting to obtain, information by false
pretenses, including misrepresenting the identity or purpose of the
private investigator, his or her employee, or the identity or purpose
of the client;
(9) Divulging confidential information obtained in the course of
any investigation to which he or she was assigned;
(((9))) (10) Acceptance of employment that is adverse to a client
or former client and relates to a matter about which a licensee has
obtained confidential information by reason of or in the course of the
licensee's employment by the client;
(((10))) (11) Assigning or transferring any license issued pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in RCW
18.165.050;
(((11))) (12) Assisting a client to locate, trace, or contact a
person when the investigator knows that the client is prohibited by any
court order from harassing or contacting the person whom the
investigator is being asked to locate, trace, or contact, as it
pertains to domestic violence, stalking, or minor children;
(((12))) (13) Failure to maintain bond or insurance;
(((13))) (14) Failure to have a qualifying principal in place; or
(((14))) (15) Being certified as not in compliance with a support
order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.

--- END ---