BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that telephone
customers have a strong privacy interest in their calling information,
including who they call, who has called them, and how often they call
specific telephone numbers. The legislature further finds that such
information should not be disclosed by a telecommunications company
without the express permission of the customer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Except as required by law or with the express approval of the
customer, a telecommunications company that receives or obtains
customer proprietary network information by virtue of its provision of
a telecommunications service shall only use, disclose, or permit access
to individually identifiable customer proprietary network information
in its provision of: (1) The telecommunications service from which
such information is derived; or (2) services necessary to, or used in,
the provision of such telecommunications service, including the
publishing of directories.

--- END ---