BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.006 and 2002 c 249 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter.
(1) "Administrator" means a person designated by an electrical
contractor to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance
with the rules adopted under this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.311.
(3) "Chapter" or "subchapter" means the subchapter, if no chapter
number is referenced.
(4) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's designee.
(6) "Electrical construction trade" includes but is not limited to
installing or maintaining electrical wires and equipment that are used
for light, heat, or power and installing and maintaining remote
control, signaling, power limited, or communication circuits or
systems.
(7) "Electrical contractor" means a person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity that offers to undertake, undertakes,
submits a bid for, or does the work of installing or maintaining wires
or equipment that convey electrical current.
(8) "Equipment" means any equipment or apparatus that directly
uses, conducts, insulates, or is operated by electricity but does not
mean: Plug-in appliances; or plug-in equipment as determined by the
department by rule.
(9) "Industrial control panel" means a factory-wired or user-wired
assembly of industrial control equipment such as motor controllers,
switches, relays, power supplies, computers, cathode ray tubes,
transducers, and auxiliary devices. The panel may include disconnect
means and motor branch circuit protective devices.
(10) "Journeyman electrician" means a person who has been issued a
journeyman electrician certificate of competency by the department.
(11) "Master electrician" means either a master journeyman
electrician or master specialty electrician.
(12) "Master journeyman electrician" means a person who has been
issued a master journeyman electrician certificate of competency by the
department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to
supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules
adopted under this chapter.
(13) "Master specialty electrician" means a person who has been
issued a specialty electrician certificate of competency by the
department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to
supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules
adopted under this chapter.
(14)(a) "Repair, maintenance, or replacement of appliances" means
servicing, maintaining, repairing, or replacing household
commercial/industrial appliances, and other small utilization equipment
that is:
(i) Self-contained and built to standardized sizes or types;
(ii) Not to exceed two hundred fifty volts, sixty amperes, single
phase; and
(iii) Approved by a testing agency approved by the department.
(b) The work of repair, maintenance, or replacement of appliances
includes:
(i) The in-place like-in-kind replacement of the appliance or
equipment that may involve disconnecting and reconnecting of low
voltage control and line voltage supply whips not over six feet in
length if the same unmodified electrical circuit is used to supply the
equipment being replaced. However, this work may, in accordance with
the national electrical code, include installation of a standard plug-in receptacle on the end of the existing supply cable to the appliance
being replaced if the replacement appliance is supplied by the
manufacturer with a plug-in connection rather than a direct-wire
connection, and without any other modifications to the branch circuit;
and
(ii) The like-in-kind replacement of electrical components within
the appliance or equipment.
(c) The work of repair, maintenance, or replacement of appliances
does not include:
(i) The installation, repair, or modification of branch circuit
conductors, services, feeders, panelboards, disconnect switches, or
raceway/conductor systems interconnecting multiple appliances,
equipment, or other electrical components; or
(ii) Any work governed under articles 500 through 505, 510, 511, or
513 through 516 of the national electric code.
(15) "Repair, maintenance, or replacement of industrial and
commercial equipment" includes:
(a) The service, repair, or replacement of industrial and
commercial equipment that includes but is not limited to electrically
powered motors up to ten horsepower, controls, switches, sensors,
alarms, electrically powered hydraulic or pneumatic control devices and
actuators that are used to operate machinery, equipment, pumps,
compressors, appliances, process equipment, and other devices not used
for occupant space heating by industrial, commercial, hospital,
educational, public, and private commercial buildings, and other end
users. Examples include but are not limited to manufacturing,
industrial and commercial machinery and equipment, and associated
devices, including but not limited to air compressors, pumps, blowers,
process equipment, materials handling equipment, refrigeration, and
heating other than for occupant space heating or cooling;
(b) Disconnecting and reconnecting low voltage and line voltage
supply whips not over six feet in length to industrial and commercial
equipment provided there are no modifications to the characteristics of
the branch circuit;
(c) The replacement of industrial and commercial equipment provided
that replacement equipment is like-in-kind and does not exceed the
electrical supply requirements of the equipment it is replacing; and
(d) The service, repair, or replacement of components and
conductors within the confines of self-contained industrial and
commercial equipment or equipment that is contained on a single skid or
frame, but not the installation, repair, or modification of wiring that
interconnects the equipment to remote components, branch circuit
conductors, services, feeders, panelboards, disconnect switches, or
raceway/conductor systems interconnecting multiple equipment or other
electrical components.
(16) "Specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a
specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.28.091 and 2001 c 211 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No license under the provision of this chapter shall be
required from any utility or any person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity employed by a utility because of work in
connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines,
wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of a
utility and used for transmission or distribution of electricity from
the source of supply to the point of contact at the premises and/or
property to be supplied and service connections and meters and other
apparatus or appliances used in the measurement of the consumption of
electricity by the customer.
(2) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any utility because of work in connection with the
installation, repair, or maintenance of the following:
(a) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment used in the lighting of
streets, alleys, ways, or public areas or squares;
(b) Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by a commercial,
industrial, or public institution customer that are an integral part of
a transmission or distribution system, either overhead or underground,
providing service to such customer and located outside the building or
structure: PROVIDED, That a utility does not initiate the sale of
services to perform such work;
(c) Lines and wires, together with ancillary apparatus, and
equipment, owned by a customer that is an independent power producer
who has entered into an agreement for the sale of electricity to a
utility and that are used in transmitting electricity from an
electrical generating unit located on premises used by such customer to
the point of interconnection with the utility's system.
(3) Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
licensed under RCW 19.28.041 may enter into a contract with a utility
for the performance of work under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of the work of installing and repairing ignition or
lighting systems for motor vehicles.
(5) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or
maintenance of wires and equipment, and installations thereof, exempted
in RCW 19.28.010.
(6) The department may by rule exempt from licensing requirements
under this chapter work performed on premanufactured electric power
generation equipment assemblies and control gear involving the testing,
repair, modification, maintenance, or installation of components
internal to the power generation equipment, the control gear, or the
transfer switch.
(7) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of work in connection with the repair, maintenance, or
replacement of appliances.
(8) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of work in connection with the repair, maintenance, or
replacement of industrial and commercial equipment if the person or
entity has received a letter from a manufacturer of that category of
equipment recognizing the person's or entity's qualifications to
repair, maintain, or replace that type of equipment and the individual
working on the equipment either: (a) Has a written verification issued
by the employer that the individual has at least two thousand hours of
experience repairing, maintaining, or replacing equipment; or (b) is
directly supervised by an individual with such a verification.
(9) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of work in connection with the installation, repair,
maintenance, or replacement of boilers.
(10) No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be
required from any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity because of incidental electrical work conducted by plumbers as
provided in section 7 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.28.101 and 1996 c 241 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall cause an inspector to inspect all wiring,
appliances, devices, and equipment to which this chapter applies.
Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed as providing any
authority for any subdivision of government to adopt by ordinance any
provisions contained or provided for in this chapter except those
pertaining to cities and towns pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3).
(2) Upon request, electrical inspections will be made by the
department within forty-eight hours, excluding holidays, Saturdays, and
Sundays. If, upon written request, the electrical inspector fails to
make an electrical inspection within twenty-four hours, the serving
utility may immediately connect electrical power to the installation if
the necessary electrical work permit is displayed: PROVIDED, That if
the request is for an electrical inspection that relates to a mobile
home installation, the applicant shall provide proof of a current
building permit issued by the local government agency authorized to
issue such permits as a prerequisite for inspection approval or
connection of electrical power to the mobile home.
(3) Whenever the installation of any wiring, device, appliance, or
equipment is not in accordance with this chapter, or is in such a
condition as to be dangerous to life or property, the person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity owning, using, or operating
it shall be notified by the department and shall within fifteen days,
or such further reasonable time as may upon request be granted, make
such
repairs and changes as are required to remove the danger to life
or property and to make it conform to this chapter. The director,
through the inspector, is hereby empowered to disconnect or order the
discontinuance of electrical service to conductors or equipment that
are found to be in a dangerous or unsafe condition and not in
accordance with this chapter. Upon making a disconnection the
inspector shall attach a notice stating that the conductors have been
found dangerous to life or property and are not in accordance with this
chapter. It is unlawful for any person to reconnect such defective
conductors or equipment without the approval of the department, and
until the conductors and equipment have been placed in a safe and
secure condition, and in a condition that complies with this chapter.
(4) The director, through the electrical inspector, has the right
during reasonable hours to enter into and upon any building or premises
in the discharge of his or her official duties for the purpose of
making any inspection or test of the installation of new construction
or altered electrical wiring, electrical devices, equipment, or
material contained in or on the buildings or premises. No electrical
wiring or equipment subject to this chapter may be concealed until it
has been approved by the inspector making the inspection. At the time
of the inspection, electrical wiring or equipment subject to this
chapter must be sufficiently accessible to permit the inspector to
employ any testing methods that will verify conformance with the
national electrical code and any other requirements of this chapter.
(5) Persons, firms, partnerships, corporations, or other entities
making electrical installations shall obtain inspection and approval
from an authorized representative of the department as required by this
chapter before requesting the electric utility to connect to the
installations. Electric utilities may connect to the installations if
approval is clearly indicated by certification of the electrical work
permit required to be affixed to each installation or by equivalent
means, except that increased or relocated services may be reconnected
immediately at the discretion of the utility before approval if an
electrical work permit is displayed. The permits shall be furnished
upon payment of the fee to the department.
(6) The director, subject to the recommendations and approval of
the board, shall set by rule a schedule of license and electrical work
permit fees that will cover the costs of administration and enforcement
of this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. No fee may be charged
for plug-in mobile homes, recreational vehicles, or portable
appliances.
(7) Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the inspection of any
wiring, appliance, device, or equipment, or installations thereof, by
any utility or by any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity employed by a utility in connection with the installation,
repair, or maintenance of lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned
by or under the control of the utility. All work covered by the
national electric code not exempted by the 1981 edition of the national
electric code 90-2(B)(5) shall be inspected by the department.
(8) No permit or inspection is required for the repair,
maintenance, or replacement of appliances.
(9) No permit or inspection is required for the repair,
maintenance, or replacement of industrial and commercial equipment.
(10) No permit or inspection is required for the installation,
repair, maintenance, or replacement of boilers.
(11) No permit or inspection is required for the installation,
alteration, or maintenance of all electrical systems for travel
trailers, or the like-in-kind replacement of a circuit breaker, fuse,
residential luminaire, lamp, snap switch, dimmer, receptacle outlet,
thermostat, heating element, luminaire ballast with an exact same
ballast, contactor, relay, timer, starter, circuit board, or similar
control component, or ten horsepower or smaller motor.
(12) No permit or inspection is required for incidental electrical
work conducted by plumbers as provided in section 7 of this act.
(13) The department may create a "small job electrical work" system
in which inspections are not required for all electrical projects and
may be conducted on a random basis or at the request of individuals.
The permit fee for the small job electrical work system may be less
than the actual costs of conducting an inspection. The department must
give reasonable notice of inspections, and may only inspect if the
inspection is approved by the person whose premises are being
inspected. Prior to conducting an inspection, the department must
notify the person whose premises are being inspected that he or she has
the right to refuse the inspection.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.28.141 and
2001 c 211 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of RCW 19.28.101 shall not apply:
(1) Within the corporate limits of any incorporated city or town
which has heretofore adopted and enforced or subsequently adopts and
enforces an ordinance requiring an equal, higher or better standard of
construction and of materials, devices, appliances and equipment than
is required by this chapter.
(2) Within the service area of an electricity supply agency owned
and operated by a city or town which is supplying electricity and
enforcing a standard of construction and materials outside its
corporate limits at the time this act takes effect: PROVIDED, That
such city, town or agency shall henceforth enforce by inspection within
its service area outside its corporate limits the same standards of
construction and of materials, devices, appliances and equipment as is
enforced by the department of labor and industries under the authority
of this chapter except that no inspection or electrical work permit is
required for: (a) The installation, alteration, or maintenance of all
electrical systems for travel trailers; or (b) the like-in-kind
replacement of a circuit breaker, fuse, residential luminaire, lamp,
snap switch, dimmer, receptacle outlet, thermostat, heating element,
luminaire ballast with an exact same ballast, contactor, relay, timer,
starter, circuit board, or similar control component, or ten horsepower
or smaller motor or electrical work done under section 7 of this act:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That inspection fees charged henceforth in connection
with such enforcement shall not exceed those established in RCW
19.28.101 and the cities must also participate in the small-job
electrical permit procedures provided by the department in RCW
19.28.101.
(3) Within the rights of way of state highways, provided the state
department of transportation maintains and enforces an equal, higher or
better standard of construction and of materials, devices, appliances
and equipment than is required by RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and
19.28.311 through 19.28.361.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.28.261 and 2001 c 211 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to
require that a person obtain a license or a certified electrician in
order to do electrical work at his or her residence or farm or place of
business or on other property owned by him or her unless the electrical
work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale,
or lease. However, if the construction is of a new residential
building with up to four units intended for rent, sale, or lease, the
owner may receive an exemption from the requirement to obtain a license
or use a certified electrician if he or she provides a signed affidavit
to the department stating that he or she will be performing the work
and will occupy one of the units as his or her principal residence.
The owner shall apply to the department for this exemption and may only
receive an exemption once every twenty-four months. It is intended
that the owner receiving this exemption shall occupy the unit as his or
her principal residence for twenty-four months after completion of the
units. Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be intended to
derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any valid electrical
code enacted by a city or town pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3), except
that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to
demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other
license or pay any fee in order to engage in the electrical
construction trade. RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to
common carriers subject to Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor
to their officers and employees. Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through
19.28.271 shall be deemed to apply to the installation or maintenance
of telephone, telegraph, radio, or television wires and equipment; nor
to any electrical utility or its employees in the installation, repair,
and maintenance of electrical wiring, circuits, and equipment by or for
the utility, or comprising a part of its plants, lines or systems. The
licensing provisions of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply
to:
(1) Persons making electrical installations on their own property
or to regularly employed employees working on the premises of their
employer, unless the electrical work is on the construction of a new
building intended for rent, sale, or lease;
(2) Employees of an employer while the employer is performing
utility type work of the nature described in RCW 19.28.091 so long as
such employees have registered in the state of Washington with or
graduated from a state-approved outside lineman apprenticeship course
that is recognized by the department and that qualifies a person to
perform such work; ((or))
(3) Any work exempted under RCW 19.28.091(6);
(4) The repair, maintenance, or replacement of appliances;
(5) The repair, maintenance, or replacement of industrial and
commercial equipment;
(6) The installation, repair, maintenance, or replacement of
boilers; or
(7) Incidental electrical work conducted by plumbers as provided in
section 7 of this act.
Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to
restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive assistance
from a friend, neighbor, relative or other person when none of the
individuals doing the electrical installation hold themselves out as
engaged in the trade or business of electrical installations. Nothing
precludes any person who is exempt from the licensing requirements of
this chapter under this section from obtaining a journeyman or
specialty certificate of competency if they otherwise meet the
requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.28.371 and 1981 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Any)) (1) A medical device ((used or useful in the diagnosis or
treatment of disease or injury)) which is not in violation of the
Medical Device Amendments of 1976, Public Law No. 94-295, 90 Stat. 539,
as amended from time to time, and as interpreted by the Food and Drug
Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor, shall be deemed to be in compliance with all
requirements imposed by this chapter.
(2) The installation, maintenance, or repair of a medical device
deemed in compliance with this chapter is exempt from licensing
requirements under RCW 19.28.091, certification requirements under RCW
19.28.161, and inspection and permitting requirements under RCW
19.28.101. This exemption does not include work providing electrical
feeds into the power distribution unit or installation of conduits and
raceways. This exemption covers only those factory engineers or third-
party service companies with equivalent training who are qualified to
perform the service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.106 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Nothing in chapter 19.28 RCW may be construed to require a
person to obtain a license required by RCW 19.28.041, be a certified
electrician required by RCW 19.28.161, obtain an electrical permit, or
have their work inspected as required by RCW 19.28.101 if:
(a) A person is a plumber currently certified under this chapter
and is registered or doing the work for a contractor registered under
chapter 18.27 RCW;
(b) A person does electrical work that is incidental to doing
plumbing, which includes disconnecting and reconnecting electrical
supplies in the performance of their plumbing work and like-for-like
replacements of plumbing fixtures and components of plumbing fixtures
that require electrical supply. For the purposes of this section, a
plumbing fixture is any fixture that is connected to a potable water
supply;
(c) A person does not install, repair, or modify branch circuit
conductors, services, feeders, panelboards, disconnect switches, or
raceway/conductor systems to or interconnecting multiple electrical
devices. The person may disconnect and reconnect low voltage control
and line voltage supply whips not over six inches in length, provided
there are no modifications to the characteristics of the branch
circuit; and
(d) The person encounters electrical hazards while doing work under
this section, and the person notifies the owner.
(2) It is a violation of this chapter for a person to make an
electrical connection if a hazard exists.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.106.070 and 1997 c 326 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all
applicants who have passed the examination and have paid the fee for
the certificate. The certificate shall bear the date of issuance, and
shall expire on the birthdate of the holder immediately following the
date of issuance. The certificate shall be renewable every other year,
upon application, on or before the birthdate of the holder. ((A
renewal fee shall be assessed for each certificate.)) The department
shall renew a certificate of competency if the applicant: (a) Pays the
renewal fee assessed by the department; and (b) during the past two
years has completed sixteen hours of continuing education approved by
the department with the advice of the advisory board, including four
hours related to electrical safety. If a person fails to renew the
certificate by the renewal date, he or she must pay a doubled fee. If
the person does not renew the certificate within ninety days of the
renewal date, he or she must retake the examination and pay the
examination fee.
The journeyman plumber and specialty plumber certificates of
competency, the medical gas piping installer endorsement, and the
temporary permit provided for in this chapter grant the holder the
right to engage in the work of plumbing as a journeyman plumber,
specialty plumber, or medical gas piping installer, in accordance with
their provisions throughout the state and within any of its political
subdivisions on any job or any employment without additional proof of
competency or any other license or permit or fee to engage in the work.
This section does not preclude employees from adhering to a union
security clause in any employment where such a requirement exists.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the plumbing construction trade or
who is learning the plumbing construction trade may work in the
plumbing construction trade if supervised by a certified journeyman
plumber or a certified specialty plumber in that plumber's specialty.
All apprentices and individuals learning the plumbing construction
trade shall obtain a plumbing training certificate from the department.
The certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the plumbing
construction trade while under the direct supervision of a journeyman
plumber or a specialty plumber working in his or her specialty. The
holder of the plumbing training certificate shall renew the certificate
annually. At the time of renewal, the holder shall provide the
department with an accurate list of the holder's employers in the
plumbing construction industry for the previous year and the number of
hours worked for each employer. An annual fee shall be charged for the
issuance or renewal of the certificate. The department shall set the
fee by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of
administering and enforcing the trainee certification and supervision
requirements of this chapter. Apprentices and individuals learning the
plumbing construction trade shall have their plumbing training
certificates in their possession at all times that they are performing
plumbing work. They shall show their certificates to an authorized
representative of the department at the representative's request.
(3) Any person who has been issued a plumbing training certificate
under this chapter may work if that person is under supervision.
Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same job site and
under the control of either a journeyman plumber or an appropriate
specialty plumber who has an applicable certificate of competency
issued under this chapter. Either a journeyman plumber or an
appropriate specialty plumber shall be on the same job site as the
noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each
working day unless otherwise provided in this chapter. The ratio of
noncertified individuals to certified journeymen or specialty plumbers
working on a job site shall be: (a) From July 28, 1985, through June
30, 1988, not more than three noncertified plumbers working on any one
job site for every certified journeyman or specialty plumber; (b)
effective July 1, 1988, not more than two noncertified plumbers working
on any one job site for every certified specialty plumber or journeyman
plumber working as a specialty plumber; and (c) effective July 1, 1988,
not more than one noncertified plumber working on any one job site for
every certified journeyman plumber working as a journeyman plumber.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in a technical school program in the plumbing
construction trade in a school approved by the work force training and
education coordinating board, may work without direct on-site
supervision during the last six months of meeting the practical
experience requirements of this chapter.
(4) An individual who has a current training certificate and who
has successfully completed or is currently enrolled in a medical gas
piping installer training course approved by the department may work on
medical gas piping systems if the individual is under the direct
supervision of a certified medical gas piping installer who holds a
medical gas piping installer endorsement one hundred percent of a
working day on a one-to-one ratio.
(5) The training to become a certified plumber must include not
less than sixteen hours of classroom training established by the
director with the advice of the board and the department. The
classroom training must include, but not be limited to, electrical
wiring safety, grounding, bonding, and other related items plumbers
need to know to work under section 7 of this act.
(6) All persons who are certified plumbers before January 1, 2003,
are deemed to have received the classroom training required in
subsection (5) of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.106.150 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 175 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require that a person
obtain a license or a certified plumber in order to do plumbing work at
his or her residence or farm or place of business or on other property
owned by him or her. Any person performing plumbing work on a farm may
do so without having a current certificate of competency or apprentice
permit: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing in this chapter shall be
intended to derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any
valid plumbing code enacted by a political subdivision of the state,
except that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of
competency to demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain
any other license or pay any fee in order to engage in the trade of
plumbing: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this chapter shall not apply to
common carriers subject to Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor
to their officers and employees: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in
this chapter shall be construed to apply to any farm, business,
industrial plant, or corporation doing plumbing work on premises it
owns or operates: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to restrict the right of any householder to assist
or receive assistance from a friend, neighbor, relative or other person
when none of the individuals doing such plumbing hold themselves out as
engaged in the trade or business of plumbing.
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to require a person that
has been issued a certificate as a journeyman electrician or
residential specialty electrician under chapter 19.28 RCW and employed
by an electrical contractor licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW to obtain
a license or be a certified plumber as otherwise required by this
chapter to do plumbing work that is incidental to doing the electrical
work within their authorized scope of work to do like-for-like
replacements of plumbing fixtures and components of plumbing fixtures
that require an electrical supply to operate. For the purposes of this
section, a plumbing fixture is any fixture that is connected to a
potable water supply, provided that the electrician does not install,
repair, or modify the potable water supply system other than to
disconnect and reconnect the plumbing connections to the fixture.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 70.79 RCW
to read as follows:
After January 1, 2004, no person may work on, service, maintain, or
modify electrical controls on a boiler for which an inspection is
required by this chapter unless that person has been issued an
electrical boiler certificate from the chief boiler inspector or the
chief boiler inspector's designee.
(1) The chief boiler inspector shall issue an electrical boiler
certificate to any person who successfully passes an examination for
the certificate.
(2) The chief boiler inspector and the board of boiler rules shall
prepare an examination for the certificate with the advice of the chief
electrical inspector.
(3) The chief boiler inspector shall charge a fee, established by
rule, to cover the cost of administering the examination, issuing the
certificates, and administering this program, and those fees must be
deposited into the pressure systems safety fund.
(4) A person who can demonstrate to the chief boiler inspector that
he or she has no less than twenty-four months of experience working on
boilers with electrical controls prior to January 1, 2003, must be
issued a certificate without having to pass an examination.

--- END ---