BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.0921 and 1990 c 210 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a misdemeanor for any person:
(((1))) (a) To display or cause or permit to be displayed or have
in his or her possession any fictitious or fraudulently altered
driver's license or identicard;
(((2))) (b) To lend his or her driver's license or identicard to
any other person or knowingly permit the use thereof by another;
(((3))) (c) To display or represent as one's own any driver's
license or identicard not issued to him or her;
(((4))) (d) Willfully to fail or refuse to surrender to the
department upon its lawful demand any driver's license or identicard
which has been suspended, revoked or canceled;
(((5))) (e) To use a false or fictitious name in any application
for a driver's license or identicard or to knowingly make a false
statement or to knowingly conceal a material fact or otherwise commit
a fraud in any such application;
(((6))) (f) To permit any unlawful use of a driver's license or
identicard issued to him or her.
(2) It is a class C felony for any person to manufacture, sell, or
deliver a forged, stolen, fictitious, counterfeit, fraudulently
altered, or unlawfully issued driver's license or identicard, or to
manufacture, sell, or deliver a blank driver's license or identicard
except under the direction of the department.
(3) In a proceeding under subsection (2) of this section that is
related to an identity theft under RCW 9.35.020, the crime will be
considered to have been committed in any locality where the person
whose means of identification or financial information was appropriated
resides, or in which any part of the offense took place, regardless of
whether the defendant was ever actually in that locality.

--- END ---