BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that access to
prescription drugs is vital to the health of many Washington residents.
However, increased cost and use of such drugs is straining the
resources of many individuals, and public and private entities. The
legislature therefore creates this pharmacy access program with the
intention of implementing strategies to reduce the cost of prescription
drugs to the state and assuring state residents of continued access to
necessary, appropriate, and affordable medications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall award prescription drug information and
education grants to local government or nonprofit organizations for the
design and implementation of programs intended to inform and train
persons age sixty-five and older in the safe and appropriate use of
prescription and nonprescription medications.
(2) The grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis, using the
following criteria:
(a) The demonstrated ability of the applicant organization to
effectively administer such a program, including appropriate outreach
and follow-up;
(b) The financial and in-kind resources that the applicant
organization will bring to the program in addition to those funded by
the grant;
(c) The extent to which the proposed program design reflects a
comprehensive understanding of issues related to the safe and
appropriate use of prescription drugs by seniors, and how to
effectively communicate with the target audience;
(d) The extent to which the proposed program reflects a
collaborative effort between the applicant organization and other
health care providers and programs in the location to be served,
including doctors, pharmacists, and long-term care providers;
(e) The extent to which the proposed program will serve as a model
that can be replicated by other organizations around the state; and
(f) Any other criteria deemed appropriate by the department to
ensure the quality and cost-effectiveness of the programs funded.
(3) In awarding the grants, the department shall make every effort
to ensure that the programs are geographically dispersed around the
state. No single program shall be awarded more than ten thousand
dollars annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and advertise a pharmacy
connection program through which health care providers and members of
the public can obtain information about manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance programs. The department shall ensure
that the program has staff available who can assist persons in
procuring free or discounted medications from manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance programs by:
(a) Determining whether an assistance program is offered for the
needed drug or drugs;
(b) Evaluating the likelihood of a person obtaining drugs from an
assistance program under the guidelines formulated;
(c) Assisting persons with the application and enrollment in an
assistance program;
(d) Coordinating and assisting physicians and others authorized to
prescribe medications with communications, including applications, made
on behalf of a person to a participating manufacturer for the purpose
of obtaining approval of the person in an assistance program; and
(e) Working with participating manufacturers to simplify the system
whereby eligible persons access drug assistance programs, including
development of a single application form and uniform enrollment
process.
(2) Implementation of the program shall initially target senior
citizens and shall include a toll-free telephone number, available
during regular business hours, that may be used to obtain information.
(3) The department may apply for and accept grants or gifts and may
enter into contracts with other state agencies or private organizations
to assist with the implementation of this program including, but not
limited to, contracts, gifts, or grants from pharmaceutical
manufacturers to assist with the direct costs of the program.
(4) The department shall notify pharmaceutical companies doing
business in Washington of the pharmacy connection program. Any
pharmaceutical company that does business in this state and that offers
a pharmaceutical assistance program shall notify the department of the
existence of the program, the drugs covered by the program, and all
information necessary to apply for assistance under the program.
(5) For purposes of this section, "manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance program" means a program offered by a
pharmaceutical company through which the company provides a drug or
drugs to eligible persons at no charge or at a reduced cost. The term
does not include the provision of a drug as part of a clinical trial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall submit and, upon approval, implement a section
1115 research and demonstration waiver request to the federal centers
for medicare and medicaid services to establish a medicaid senior
prescription drug assistance program. The program shall:
(1) Cover persons age sixty-five years old or older with household
incomes up to one hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level
who otherwise lack prescription drug insurance coverage;
(2) Provide a pharmacy benefit as comprehensive as that provided in
the current Washington medicaid state plan; and
(3) Include reasonable enrollee premiums and cost sharing.
The department shall limit enrollment as necessary to prevent an
over expenditure of the program's appropriation.

--- END ---