BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.106 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any antifreeze product containing by weight ten percent or more
ethylene glycol and manufactured in this state on or after July 1,
2004, or sold in this state on or after July 1, 2005, must also contain
an aversive agent, approved by the director, in a concentration
sufficient to render that antifreeze product unpalatable to humans and
animals. However, this section does not apply to the following:
(a) The sale of a motor vehicle that contains an antifreeze
product;
(b) Used antifreeze products;
(c) Recycled antifreeze products installed by an auto repair firm;
or
(d) Wholesale containers of antifreeze containing fifty-five
gallons or more of an antifreeze product.
(2) If the director finds or has probable cause to believe that any
antifreeze product being sold in this state fails to comply with
subsection (1) of this section, the director is authorized to order
that product's removal from retail shelf space.

--- END ---