BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS. The legislature finds that the
welfare of the people of the state of Washington is positively impacted
through the encouragement and expansion of family wage employment in
the state's manufacturing industries. The legislature further finds
that targeting tax incentives to focus on key industry clusters is an
important business climate strategy. The Washington competitiveness
council has recognized the semiconductor industry, which includes the
design and manufacture of semiconductor materials, as one of the
state's existing key industry clusters. Businesses in this cluster in
the state of Washington are facing increasing pressure to expand
elsewhere. The sales and use tax exemptions for manufacturing
machinery and equipment enacted by the 1995 legislature improved
Washington's ability to compete with other states for manufacturing
investment. However, additional incentives for the semiconductor
cluster need to be put in place in recognition of the unique forces and
global issues involved in business decisions that key businesses in
this cluster face.
Therefore, the legislature intends to enact comprehensive tax
incentives for the semiconductor cluster that address activities of the
lead product industry and its suppliers and customers. Tax incentives
for the semiconductor cluster are important in both retention and
expansion of existing business and attraction of new businesses, all of
which will strengthen this cluster. The legislature also recognizes
that the semiconductor industry involves major investment that results
in significant construction projects, which will create jobs and bring
many indirect benefits to the state during the construction phase.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.260 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits and vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and
vegetables canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the
seller and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record; and
(d) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the assemblies multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to
such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(11) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(12) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(13) Until July 1, 2017, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing semiconductor materials, as to
such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in
the case of manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product
manufactured, or, in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the
gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
For the purposes of this subsection "semiconductor materials" means
silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers,
integrated circuits, and microchips.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.240 and 1998 c 312 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person ((except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260 (1),
(2), (4), (5), or (6))) engaging within this state in business as a
manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under another
section of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the products,
including byproducts, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.484
percent.
The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including
byproducts, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact
that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.280 and 1998 c 343 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines;
(2) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United
States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular
traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and
including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the
facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or
railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the
responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road,
highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired
or improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except
persons taxable as processors for hire under another section of this
chapter; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse,
but not including the rental of cold storage lockers; (5) representing
and performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an
independent resident managing general agent licensed under the
provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (6) radio and television broadcasting,
excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a
standard deduction based on the national average thereof as annually
reported by the Federal Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof
by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding
that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience
computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the
100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7)
engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of
consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount
of tax on such business shall be equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
SALES TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION. (1) The tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing of new buildings used for the
manufacturing of semiconductor materials, to sales of tangible personal
property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of
such buildings during the course of the constructing, or to labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, during the course of
constructing, building fixtures not otherwise eligible for the
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565(2)(b). The exemption is available only
when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a
form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain
a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) To be eligible under this section the manufacturer or processor
for hire must meet the following requirements for an eight-year period,
such period beginning the day the new building commences commercial
production, or a portion of tax otherwise due shall be immediately due
and payable pursuant to subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The manufacturer or processor for hire must maintain at least
seventy-five percent of full employment at the new building for which
the exemption under this section is claimed.
(b) Before commencing commercial production at a new facility the
manufacturer or processor for hire must meet with the department to
review projected employment levels in the new buildings. The
department, using information provided by the taxpayer, shall make a
determination of the number of positions that would be filled at full
employment. This number shall be used throughout the eight-year period
to determine whether any tax is to be repaid.
(c) In those situations where a production building in existence on
the effective date of this section will be phased out of operation
during which time employment at the new building at the same site is
increased, the manufacturer or processor for hire shall maintain
seventy-five percent of full employment at the manufacturing site
overall.
(d) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person
is subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A person
taking the exemption under this section must report as required under
section 11 of this act.
(3) If the employment requirement is not met for any one calendar
year, one-eighth of the exempt sales and use taxes shall be due and
payable by April 1st of the following year. The department shall
assess interest to the date the tax was imposed, but not penalties, on
the taxes for which the person is not eligible.
(4) The exemption applies to new buildings, or parts of buildings,
that are used exclusively in the manufacturing of semiconductor
materials, including the storage of raw materials and finished product.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Commencement of commercial production" is deemed to have
occurred when the equipment and process qualifications in the new
building are completed and production for sale has begun; and
(b) "Full employment" is the number of positions required for full
capacity production at the new building, for positions such as line
workers, engineers, and technicians.
(c) "Semiconductor materials" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.260(13).
(6) No exemption may be taken after July 1, 2017, however all of
the eligibility criteria and limitations are applicable to any
exemptions claimed before that date.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS AND INSTALLATION
SERVICES. (1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect
to the use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as
an ingredient or component of new buildings used for the manufacturing
of semiconductor materials during the course of constructing such
buildings or to labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
during the course of constructing, building fixtures not otherwise
eligible for the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565(2)(b).
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
section 5 of this act apply to this section.
(3) No exemption may be taken after July 1, 2017, however all of
the eligibility criteria and limitations are applicable to any
exemptions claimed before that date.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
SALES TAX EXEMPTION FOR GASES AND CHEMICALS. (1) The tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of gases and chemicals used by
a manufacturer or processor for hire in the manufacturing of
semiconductor materials. This exemption is limited to gases and
chemicals used in the manufacturing process to grow the product,
deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the product, to etch
or remove material from the product, to anneal the product, to immerse
the product, to clean the product, and other such uses whereby the
gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the product during
the manufacturing process, or uses of gases and chemicals to clean the
chambers and other like equipment in which such processing takes place.
For the purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.260(13).
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must report
under section 11 of this act. No application is necessary for the tax
exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter
82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR GASES AND CHEMICALS. (1) The provisions of
this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of gases and
chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire in the
manufacturing of semiconductor materials. This exemption is limited to
gases and chemicals used in the manufacturing process to grow the
product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the
product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the manufacturing process, or uses of gases and
chemicals to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such
processing takes place. For purposes of this section, "semiconductor
materials" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.260(13).
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must report
under section 11 of this act. No application is necessary for the tax
exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter
82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX JOB CREDIT. (1) Subject to the limits
and provisions of this section, a credit is authorized against the tax
otherwise due under RCW 82.04.260(13) for persons engaged in the
business of manufacturing semiconductor materials. For the purposes of
this section "semiconductor materials" has the same meaning as provided
in RCW 82.04.260(13).
(2)(a) The credit under this section shall equal three thousand
dollars for each employment position used in manufacturing production
that takes place in a new building exempt from sales and use tax under
sections 5 and 6 of this act. A credit is earned for the calendar year
a person fills a position. Additionally a credit is earned for each
year the position is maintained over the subsequent consecutive years,
up to eight years. Those positions that are not filled for the entire
year are eligible for fifty percent of the credit if filled less than
six months, and the entire credit if filled more than six months.
(b) To qualify for the credit, the manufacturing activity of the
person must be conducted at a new building that qualifies for the
exemption from sales and use tax under sections 5 and 6 of this act.
(c) In those situations where a production building in existence on
the effective date of this section will be phased out of operation,
during which time employment at the new building at the same site is
increased, the person is eligible for credit for employment at the
existing building and new building, with the limitation that the
combined eligible employment not exceed full employment at the new
building. "Full employment" has the same meaning as in section 5 of
this act. The credit may not be earned until the commencement of
commercial production, as that term is used in section 5 of this act.
(3) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person is
subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In no case
may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried over to be
credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(4) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed shall be immediately due. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be retroactive to the date the tax credit was taken, and shall
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(5) A person taking the credit under this section must report under
section 11 of this act.
(6) Credits may be taken after July 1, 2017, for those buildings at
which commercial production began before July 1, 2017, subject to all
of the eligibility criteria and limitations of this section.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION FOR MANUFACTURING MACHINERY AND EQUIPMENT.
(1) Machinery and equipment exempt under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565
used in manufacturing semiconductor materials at a building exempt from
sales and use tax and in compliance with the employment requirement
under sections 5 and 6 of this act are tax exempt from taxation.
"Semiconductor materials" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.260(13).
(2) A person seeking this exemption must make application to the
county assessor, on forms prescribed by the department.
(3) A person receiving an exemption under this section must report
in the manner prescribed in section 11 of this act.
(4) This section is effective for taxes levied for collection in
2006 and thereafter.
(5) This section expires December 31, 2017, for taxes levied for
collection in 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
ACCOUNTABILITY. (1) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.260(13) or who
claims an exemption or credit under sections 5 through 10 of this act,
shall make an annual report to the department detailing employment and
wages at the manufacturing site. The report is due by March 31st
following any year in which a tax exemption or credit under sections 5
through 10 of this act is taken. This information is not subject to
the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to
the public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection the department shall declare the amount of taxes exempted or
credited for that year to be immediately due and payable. Excise taxes
payable under this subsection are subject to interest, as provided
under this chapter.
(3) By November 1, 2016, the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate, in consultation with the department,
shall report to the legislature on the effectiveness of chapter . . .,
Laws of 2003 (this act) in regard to keeping Washington competitive.
The report shall measure the effect of chapter . . ., Laws of 2003
(this act) on job retention, net jobs created for Washington residents,
company growth, diversification of the state's economy, cluster
dynamics, and other factors as the committees select. The report shall
include a discussion of principles to apply in evaluating whether the
legislature should reenact any or all of the tax preferences in chapter
. . ., Laws of 2003 (this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are
not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect July 1, 2005.

--- END ---