BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that veterans and
active duty military service personnel have placed themselves in harms
way so that we may live free. It is the intent of the legislature to
honor veterans and active duty military service personnel who have
served their country honorably in times of both war and peace for the
public service they have provided to their country.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Branch of service license plates" means license plates that
separately display the symbol of the following branches of service:
Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines, Washington National Guard, and Coast
Guard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In cooperation with the Washington state patrol and the
department of veterans affairs, the department of licensing shall
create and design, and the department issue, six branch of service
special license plates, each displaying the symbol of the Army, Navy,
Air Force, Marines, Washington National Guard, or Coast Guard that may
be used in lieu of regular or personalized license plates, excluding
vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions
established by the department. The special plates will commemorate the
brave men and women who protect the freedom of our nation on a daily
basis.
(2) The special branch of service license plate may be purchased
by:
(a) Veterans who served on active duty for at least one hundred
eighty days and were discharged under honorable conditions; and
(b) Military personnel who have honorably served their country for
at least one hundred eighty days while on active duty; and
(c) National Guard or Reserves or those honorably discharged from
service.
(3) Veterans or active duty military personnel requesting a branch
of service license plate must:
(a) Pay the appropriate fee prescribed in RCW 46.16.313; and
(b) Show proof of eligibility through:
(i) Providing a DD-214 or discharge papers if a veteran;
(ii) Providing a copy of orders if an individual serving on
military active duty;
(iii) Providing a military ID card either active or retired; or
(iv) Attesting in a certified affidavit of their eligibility as
required under this section.
(4) A surviving spouse of an individual who qualified under
subsection (2) of this section may continue the privilege of displaying
the branch of service license plate on a vehicle registered in the name
of the spouse until the surviving spouse remarries, is no longer a
registered owner of the vehicle displaying the plates, or fails to pay
for the renewal of the branch of service license plates.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In any case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any
vehicle, the right to the certificates properly transferable therewith,
except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, and to the vehicle license plates
passes to the purchaser or transferee. It is unlawful for the holder
of such certificates, except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle
license plates to fail, neglect, or refuse to endorse the certificates
and deliver the vehicle license plates to the purchaser or transferee.
If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed by the state or any
county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision
entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the vehicle is
licensed with personalized plates, amateur radio operator plates,
Congressional Medal of Honor plates, disabled person plates, disabled
veteran plates, prisoner of war plates, or other special license plates
issued under RCW 46.16.301 as it existed before amendment by section 5,
chapter 291, Laws of 1997, the vehicle license plates therefor shall be
retained and may be displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of
the vehicle so sold or transferred.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee for each type of special
license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as
existing before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, ((in
an amount calculated)) to offset the cost of production of the special
license plates and the administration of this program. ((Until
December 31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed thirty-five dollars, but
effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1,
1998, the department may adjust the fee to no more than forty
dollars.)) This fee is in addition to all other fees required to
register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been
requested. All such additional special license plate fees collected by
the department shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
the motor vehicle fund.
(2) ((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998,)) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder
of a collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(((4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (3) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(((5))) (4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(((6) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on
January 1, 1999,)) (5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall
be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2004, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
branch of service license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses. The remaining proceeds will be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying report.
The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle
account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the branch of service license
plates. Upon the department's determination, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the branch of service license plate account
established under section 7 of this act.
(7) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a branch of
service license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two
dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration
and collection expenses. The remaining proceeds will be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying report.
The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle
account until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the branch of service license
plates. Upon the department's determination, the treasurer shall
credit the proceeds to the branch of service license plate account
established under section 7 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates under section 3 of this act or RCW 46.16.301 as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, sells,
trades, or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the vehicle
upon which the special license plate or plates have been displayed, he
or she shall immediately report the transfer of such plate or plates to
an acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such plates pursuant to
departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such plates to the
department immediately if such surrender is required by departmental
rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or plates to
another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars shall be
charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such transfer fees
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to surrender the
plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The branch of service license plate account is established in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts, except as provided in
RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7), from the branch of service license plates
must be deposited into the account. The director of the department of
veterans affairs may authorize expenditures from the account. The
funds in the account are to be used solely to support veterans'
services outreach to veterans and a future eastern Washington veterans'
cemetery. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, and no appropriation is required for expenditures.

--- END ---