BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.050 and 2001 c 193 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of an application for license, if the applicant and
the boarding home facilities meet the requirements established under
this chapter, the department shall issue a license. If there is a
failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the standards
and rules adopted pursuant thereto, the department may in its
discretion issue to an applicant for a license, or for the renewal of
a license, a provisional license which will permit the operation of the
boarding home for a period to be determined by the department, but not
to exceed twelve months, which provisional license shall not be subject
to renewal. At the time of the application for or renewal of a license
or provisional license the licensee shall pay a license fee as
established by the department under RCW 43.20B.110. All licenses
issued under the provisions of this chapter shall expire on a date to
be set by the department, but no license issued pursuant to this
chapter shall exceed twelve months in duration. However, when the
annual license renewal date of a previously licensed boarding home is
set by the department on a date less than twelve months prior to the
expiration date of a license in effect at the time of reissuance, the
license fee shall be prorated on a monthly basis and a credit be
allowed at the first renewal of a license for any period of one month
or more covered by the previous license. All applications for renewal
of a license shall be made not later than thirty days prior to the date
of expiration of the license. Each license shall be issued only for
the premises and persons named in the application, and no license shall
be transferable or assignable. Licenses shall be posted in a
conspicuous place on the licensed premises.
A licensee who receives notification of the department's initiation
of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a boarding home
license may, in lieu of appealing the department's action, surrender or
relinquish the license. The department shall not issue a new license
to or contract with the licensee, for the purposes of providing care to
vulnerable adults or children, for a period of twenty years following
the surrendering or relinquishment of the former license. The
licensing record shall indicate that the licensee relinquished or
surrendered the license, without admitting the violations, after
receiving notice of the department's initiation of a denial,
suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license.
The department shall establish, by rule, the circumstances
requiring a change in licensee, which include, but are not limited to,
a change in ownership or control of the boarding home or licensee, a
change in the licensee's form of legal organization, such as from sole
proprietorship to partnership or corporation, and a dissolution or
merger of the licensed entity with another legal organization. The new
licensee is subject to the provisions of this chapter, the rules
adopted under this chapter, and other applicable law. In order to
ensure that the safety of residents is not compromised by a change in
licensee, the new licensee is responsible for correction of all
violations that may exist at the time of the new license, including
compliance with any plan of correction in effect immediately prior to
the change in licensee. If any person affiliated with the new licensee
was affiliated with a prior licensee at the same boarding home, then
the prior licensee's compliance and enforcement record becomes part of
the new licensee's record at the boarding home. A person is considered
affiliated with a licensee if the person is an applicant for the
boarding home license, or is listed on the license application as a
partner, officer, director, managerial employee, or majority owner of
the applying entity.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.20.110 and 2000 c 47 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall make or cause to be made at least a yearly
inspection and investigation of all boarding homes. Every inspection
shall focus primarily on actual or potential resident outcomes, and may
include an inspection of every part of the premises and an examination
of all records (other than financial records, which may be examined
when the department has reasonable cause to believe financial
obligations related to resident care or services will not be met, or to
investigate an allegation of financial exploitation of a resident),
methods of administration, the general and special dietary, and the
stores and methods of supply. Following such an inspection or
inspections, written notice of any violation of this law or the rules
adopted hereunder shall be given to the applicant or licensee and the
department. The department may prescribe by rule that any licensee or
applicant desiring to make specified types of alterations or additions
to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before
commencing such alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans
and specifications ((therefor)) to the agencies responsible for plan
reviews for preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with
respect to compliance with the rules and standards herein authorized.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.128.060 and 2001 c 193 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An application for license shall be made to the department upon
forms provided by it and shall contain such information as the
department reasonably requires.
(2) Subject to the provisions of this section, the department shall
issue a license to an adult family home if the department finds that
the applicant and the home are in compliance with this chapter and the
rules adopted under this chapter, unless (a) the applicant or a person
affiliated with the applicant has prior violations of this chapter
relating to the adult family home subject to the application or any
other adult family home, or of any other law regulating residential
care facilities within the past five years that resulted in revocation,
suspension, or nonrenewal of a license or contract with the department;
or (b) the applicant or a person affiliated with the applicant has a
history of significant noncompliance with federal, state, or local
laws, rules, or regulations relating to the provision of care or
services to vulnerable adults or to children. A person is considered
affiliated with an applicant if the person is listed on the license
application as a partner, officer, director, resident manager, or
majority owner of the applying entity.
(3) The license fee shall be submitted with the application.
(4) The department shall serve upon the applicant a copy of the
decision granting or denying an application for a license. An
applicant shall have the right to contest denial of his or her
application for a license as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by
requesting a hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after receipt
of the notice of denial.
(5) The department shall not issue a license to a provider if the
department finds that the provider or any partner, officer, director,
managerial employee, or majority owner ((of five percent or more)) if
the provider has a history of significant noncompliance with federal or
state regulations, rules, or laws in providing care or services to
vulnerable adults or to children.
(6) The department shall license an adult family home for the
maximum level of care that the adult family home may provide. The
department shall define, in rule, license levels based upon the
education, training, and caregiving experience of the licensed provider
or staff.
(7) The department shall establish, by rule, standards used to
license nonresident providers and multiple facility operators.
(8) The department shall establish, by rule, for multiple facility
operators educational standards substantially equivalent to recognized
national certification standards for residential care administrators.
(9) The license fee shall be set at fifty dollars per year for each
home. A fifty dollar processing fee shall also be charged each home
when the home is initially licensed.
(10) A provider who receives notification of the department's
initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of an
adult family home license may, in lieu of appealing the department's
action, surrender or relinquish the license. The department shall not
issue a new license to or contract with the provider, for the purposes
of providing care to vulnerable adults or children, for a period of
twenty years following the surrendering or relinquishment of the former
license. The licensing record shall indicate that the provider
relinquished or surrendered the license, without admitting the
violations, after receiving notice of the department's initiation of a
denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license.
(11) The department shall establish, by rule, the circumstances
requiring a change in the licensed provider, which include, but are not
limited to, a change in ownership or control of the adult family home
or provider, a change in the provider's form of legal organization,
such as from sole proprietorship to partnership or corporation, and a
dissolution or merger of the licensed entity with another legal
organization. The new provider is subject to the provisions of this
chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, and other applicable
law. In order to ensure that the safety of residents is not
compromised by a change in provider, the new provider is responsible
for correction of all violations that may exist at the time of the new
license, including compliance with any plan of correction in effect
immediately prior to the change in provider. If any person affiliated
with the new provider was affiliated with a prior provider at the same
adult family home, then the prior provider's compliance and enforcement
record becomes part of the new provider's record at the adult family
home.

--- END ---