BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the volume of
commercial electronic mail is growing, and the consumer protection
division of the attorney general's office reports an increasing number
of consumer complaints about commercial electronic mail. Interactive
computer service providers indicate that their systems sometimes cannot
handle the volume of commercial electronic mail being sent and that
filtering systems fail to screen out unsolicited commercial electronic
mail messages when senders use a third party's internet domain name
without the third party's permission, or otherwise misrepresent the
message's point of origin. The legislature seeks to provide some
immediate relief to interactive computer service providers by
prohibiting the sending of commercial electronic mail messages that use
a third party's internet domain name without the third party's
permission, misrepresent the message's point of origin, or contain
untrue or misleading information in the subject line.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.190.010 and 1999 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assist the transmission" means actions taken by a person to
provide substantial assistance or support which enables any person to
formulate, compose, send, originate, initiate, or transmit a commercial
electronic mail message when the person providing the assistance knows
or consciously avoids knowing that the initiator of the commercial
electronic mail message is engaged, or intends to engage, in any
practice that violates the consumer protection act.
(2) "Commercial electronic mail message" means an electronic mail
message sent for the purpose of promoting real property, goods, or
services for sale or lease. It does not mean an electronic mail
message to which an interactive computer service provider has attached
an advertisement in exchange for free use of an electronic mail
account, when the sender has agreed to such an arrangement.
(3) "Electronic mail" means an electronic message or computer file
containing an image of a message that is transmitted between two or
more computers or electronic terminals and includes messages that are
transmitted within or between computer networks.
(4) "Electronic mail address" means a destination, commonly
expressed as a string of characters, to which electronic mail may be
sent or delivered.
(((4))) (5) "Established business relationship" means a prior or
existing relationship formed by a voluntary communication between a
person and the recipient with or without an exchange of consideration,
on the basis of an inquiry, application, purchase, or use by the
recipient regarding products or services offered by such person.
(6) "Initiate the transmission" refers to the action by the
original sender of an electronic mail message, not to the action by any
intervening interactive computer service that may handle or retransmit
the message, unless such intervening interactive computer service
assists in the transmission of an electronic mail message when it
knows, or consciously avoids knowing, that the person initiating the
transmission is engaged, or intends to engage, in any act or practice
that violates the consumer protection act.
(((5))) (7) "Interactive computer service" means any information
service, system, or access software provider that provides or enables
computer access by multiple users to a computer server, including
specifically a service or system that provides access to the internet
and such systems operated or services offered by libraries or
educational institutions.
(((6))) (8) "Internet domain name" refers to a globally unique,
hierarchical reference to an internet host or service, assigned through
centralized internet naming authorities, comprising a series of
character strings separated by periods, with the right-most string
specifying the top of the hierarchy.
(((7))) (9) "Person" means a person, corporation, partnership, or
association.
(10) "Unsolicited commercial electronic mail message" means an
electronic mail message sent without the consent of the recipient, by
a person with whom the recipient does not have an established business
relationship. Unsolicited commercial electronic messages do not
include electronic mail where the sender is a person using electronic
mail to communicate:
(a) Exclusively with members; or
(b) With its employees or contractors, or both.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.190.040 and 1998 c 149 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Damages to the recipient of a commercial electronic mail
message ((sent in)) resulting from a violation of this chapter ((are
five hundred)) shall be the greater of ten dollars for each unsolicited
commercial electronic mail message received, or actual damages,
((whichever is greater)) but are not to exceed twenty-five thousand
dollars for each day that the recipient received such messages.
(2) Damages to an interactive computer service resulting from a
violation of this chapter ((are one thousand)) shall be the greater of
ten dollars for each unsolicited commercial electronic mail message
received, or actual damages, ((whichever is greater)) but not to exceed
twenty-five thousand dollars for each day that the interactive computer
service received such messages.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
No person may initiate the transmission, conspire with another to
initiate the transmission, or assist the transmission of an unsolicited
commercial electronic mail message from a computer located in
Washington state or to an electronic mail address that the sender
knows, or has reason to know, is held by a Washington state resident
that fails to include "ADV:" as the first four characters in the
subject line or which fails to provide a mechanism allowing recipients
to easily and at no cost inform senders that they are Washington state
residents and remove themselves from the sender's electronic mail
address lists so that they are not included in future mailings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
No interactive computer service may be held liable for:
(1) Serving as an intermediary between the sender and recipient in
the transmission of a commercial electronic mail message sent in
violation of this chapter; or
(2) Providing transmission over the interactive computer service's
computer network or facilities of an unsolicited commercial electronic
mail message sent in violation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
At the request of any party to an action brought pursuant to this
chapter, the court may, in its discretion, conduct all legal
proceedings in such a way as to protect the secrecy and security of the
computer, computer network, computer data, computer program, and
computer software involved to prevent possible recurrence of the same
or a similar act by another person and to protect any trade secrets of
any party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---