BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Energy production and consumption account for the vast majority
of human-caused greenhouse gas emissions;
(b) As a significant consumer of energy resources and a committed
steward of public health and environmental quality, Washington state
government is well-positioned to be a leader in promoting and using
clean energy;
(c) State government actions to promote and use clean energy are
consistent with the state's environmental commitments, including
addressing the increasingly imminent dangers to Washington's qualities
of life that are threatened by global climate changes and improving
local and regional air quality;
(d) State government actions to promote and use clean energy are
also consistent with the state's high priority policy objectives to
maintain competitive energy costs and a reliable and secure supply of
energy resources; and
(e) State government actions to promote and use clean energy are
also consistent with the state's goals to support economic development
opportunities, by reducing traffic congestion and stimulating new and
emerging energy technologies within the clean energy industry of the
state's high-technology sector.
(2) The legislature intends state government to adopt a strategy to
meet its energy needs with no net increase in greenhouse gas emissions.
The legislature further intends the state to take immediate, short-term
steps to limit the emissions attributable to its electricity
consumption while developing a long-term, cost-effective strategy to
reach the goal of no net increase in greenhouse gas emissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21F RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 43.21F.015,
43.21F.045, and sections 7 and 8 of this act, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Energy conservation measures" has the same meaning as defined
in RCW 43.19.670(3) (a) through (j) and (l).
(2) "Greenhouse gases" includes carbon dioxide (CO2), methane and
natural gas (CH4), and nitrous oxide (N2O).
(3) "Net increase in greenhouse gas emissions" means a quantity of
emissions in excess of the level of emissions attributable to the
annual consumption of energy by state government in the year 2000.
(4) "Qualified alternative energy resources" has the same meaning
as defined in RCW 19.29A.090.
(5) "State" and "state government" mean the executive branch
agencies of the state of Washington that are managed by governor-appointed executives and state institutions of higher education.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.19.1905 and 2002 c 299 s 5 and 2002 c 285 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The director of general administration shall establish overall
state policy for compliance by all state agencies, including
educational institutions, regarding the following purchasing and
material control functions:
(1) Development of a state commodity coding system, including
common stock numbers for items maintained in stores for reissue;
(2) Determination where consolidations, closures, or additions of
stores operated by state agencies and educational institutions should
be initiated;
(3) Institution of standard criteria for determination of when and
where an item in the state supply system should be stocked;
(4) Establishment of stock levels to be maintained in state stores,
and formulation of standards for replenishment of stock;
(5) Formulation of an overall distribution and redistribution
system for stock items which establishes sources of supply support for
all agencies, including interagency supply support;
(6) Determination of what function data processing equipment,
including remote terminals, shall perform in statewide purchasing and
material control for improvement of service and promotion of economy;
(7) Standardization of records and forms used statewide for supply
system activities involving purchasing, receiving, inspecting, storing,
requisitioning, and issuing functions, including a standard
notification form for state agencies to report cost-effective direct
purchases, which shall at least identify the price of the goods as
available through the division of purchasing, the price of the goods as
available from the alternative source, the total savings, and the
signature of the notifying agency's director or the director's
designee;
(8) Screening of supplies, material, and equipment excess to the
requirements of one agency for overall state need before sale as
surplus;
(9) Establishment of warehouse operation and storage standards to
achieve uniform, effective, and economical stores operations;
(10) Establishment of time limit standards for the issuing of
material in store and for processing requisitions requiring purchase;
(11) Formulation of criteria for determining when centralized
rather than decentralized purchasing shall be used to obtain maximum
benefit of volume buying of identical or similar items, including
procurement from federal supply sources;
(12) Development of criteria for use of leased, rather than state
owned, warehouse space based on relative cost and accessibility;
(13) Institution of standard criteria for purchase and placement of
state furnished materials, carpeting, furniture, fixtures, and nonfixed
equipment, in newly constructed or renovated state buildings;
(14) Determination of how transportation costs incurred by the
state for materials, supplies, services, and equipment can be reduced
by improved freight and traffic coordination and control;
(15) Establishment of a formal certification program for state
employees who are authorized to perform purchasing functions as agents
for the state under the provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW;
(16) Development of performance measures for the reduction of total
overall expense for material, supplies, equipment, and services used
each biennium by the state;
(17) Establishment of a standard system for all state organizations
to record and report dollar savings and cost avoidance which are
attributable to the establishment and implementation of improved
purchasing and material control procedures;
(18) Development of procedures for mutual and voluntary cooperation
between state agencies, including educational institutions, and
political subdivisions for exchange of purchasing and material control
services;
(19) Resolution of all other purchasing and material matters which
require the establishment of overall statewide policy for effective and
economical supply management;
(20) Development of guidelines and criteria for the purchase of
vehicles, high gas mileage vehicles, low emission vehicles, alternate
vehicle fuels and systems, equipment, and materials that reduce overall
energy-related costs and energy use by the state, including
investigations into all opportunities to aggregate the purchasing of
clean technologies by state and local governments, and including the
requirement that new passenger vehicles purchased by the state meet or
exceed the minimum standards for passenger automobile fuel economy
established by the United States secretary of transportation pursuant
to the energy policy and conservation act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2002);
(21) Development of guidelines and criteria for the purchase of
qualified alternative energy resources as defined in RCW 19.29A.090,
including investigations into opportunities to aggregate purchases for
facilities that are owned or leased by state agencies and educational
institutions and that are located within a serving utility's service
area. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as prohibiting any
state agency or educational institution from purchasing aggregated
billing services;
(22) Development of goals for state use of recycled or
environmentally preferable products through specifications for products
and services, processes for requests for proposals and requests for
qualifications, contractor selection, and contract negotiations.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.19.570 and 2002 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall direct and be responsible for the
acquisition, operation, maintenance, storage, repair, and replacement
of state motor vehicles under its control. The department shall
utilize state facilities available for the maintenance, repair, and
storage of such motor vehicles, and may provide directly or by contract
for the maintenance, repair, and servicing of all motor vehicles, and
other property related thereto and under its control.
(2) The department may arrange, by agreement with agencies, for the
utilization by one of the storage, repair, or maintenance facilities of
another, with such provision for charges and credits as may be agreed
upon. The department may acquire and maintain storage, repair, and
maintenance facilities for the motor vehicles under its control from
such funds as may be appropriated by the legislature.
(3)(a) The legislature finds that a clean environment is important
and that global warming effects may be offset by decreasing the
emissions of harmful compounds from motor vehicles. The legislature
further finds that the state is in a position to set an example of
large scale use of high gas mileage vehicles, lower emission vehicles,
alternative vehicle fuels in motor vehicles, and other clean
technologies.
(b) The department shall consider the use of state vehicles to
conduct field tests on alternative fuels in areas where air pollution
constraints may be eased by these optional fuels. These fuels should
include but are not limited to gas-powered and electric-powered
vehicles.
(c) ((For)) The department and other state agencies shall, before
completing planned purchases of high gas mileage vehicles, lower
emission vehicles, and vehicles using alternative fuels, ((the
department and other state agencies shall)) explore opportunities to
purchase these vehicles together with the federal government, agencies
of other states, other Washington state agencies, local governments, or
private organizations for less cost. All state agencies must
investigate and determine whether or not they can make clean
technologies more cost-effective by combining their purchasing power
before completing a planned vehicle purchase.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.21F.015 and 1994 c 207 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the policy of the state of Washington that:
(1) The development and use of a diverse array of energy resources
with emphasis on renewable energy resources shall be encouraged;
(2) The supply of energy shall be sufficient to insure the health
and economic welfare of its citizens;
(3) The development and use of energy resources shall be consistent
with the statutory environmental policies of the state;
(4) Energy conservation and elimination of wasteful and uneconomic
uses of energy and materials shall be encouraged, and this conservation
should include, but is not limited to, resource recovery and materials
recycling;
(5) In energy emergency shortage situations, energy requirements to
maintain the public health, safety, and welfare shall be given priority
in the allocation of energy resources, and citizens and industry shall
be assisted in adjusting to the limited availability of energy in order
to minimize adverse impacts on their physical, social, and economic
well being;
(6) State government adopt a policy to meet its energy needs with
no net increase in greenhouse gas emissions;
(7) State government shall provide a source of impartial and
objective information in order that this energy policy may be enhanced;
and
(((7))) (8) The state energy strategy shall provide primary
guidance for implementation of the state's energy policy.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.21F.045 and 1996 c 186 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall supervise and administer energy-related
activities as specified in RCW 43.330.904 and shall advise the governor
and the legislature with respect to energy matters affecting the state.
(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the
department, the department shall have the following powers and duties:
(a) Prepare and update contingency plans for implementation in the
event of energy shortages or emergencies. The plans shall conform to
chapter 43.21G RCW and shall include procedures for determining when
these shortages or emergencies exist, the state officers and agencies
to participate in the determination, and actions to be taken by various
agencies and officers of state government in order to reduce hardship
and maintain the general welfare during these emergencies. The
department shall coordinate the activities undertaken pursuant to this
subsection with other persons. The components of plans that require
legislation for their implementation shall be presented to the
legislature in the form of proposed legislation at the earliest
practicable date. The department shall report to the governor and the
legislature on probable, imminent, and existing energy shortages, and
shall administer energy allocation and curtailment programs in
accordance with chapter 43.21G RCW.
(b) Establish and maintain a central repository in state government
for collection of existing data on energy resources, including:
(i) Supply, demand, costs, utilization technology, projections, and
forecasts;
(ii) Comparative costs of alternative energy sources, uses, and
applications; and
(iii) Inventory data on energy research projects in the state
conducted under public and/or private auspices, and the results
thereof.
(c) Coordinate federal energy programs appropriate for state-level
implementation, carry out such energy programs as are assigned to it by
the governor or the legislature, and monitor federally funded local
energy programs as required by federal or state regulations.
(d) Develop energy policy recommendations for consideration by the
governor and the legislature, including but not limited to strategies
and options to allow state government to meet its energy needs with no
net increase in greenhouse gas emissions.
(e) Provide assistance, space, and other support as may be
necessary for the activities of the state's two representatives to the
Pacific northwest electric power and conservation planning council. To
the extent consistent with federal law, the director shall request that
Washington's council members request the administrator of the
Bonneville power administration to reimburse the state for the expenses
associated with the support as provided in the Pacific Northwest
Electric Power Planning and Conservation Act (P.L. 96-501).
(f) Cooperate with state agencies, other governmental units, and
private interests in the prioritization and implementation of the state
energy strategy elements and on other energy matters.
(g) Serve as the official state agency responsible for coordinating
implementation of the state energy strategy.
(h) No later than December 1, 1982, and by December 1st of each
even-numbered year thereafter, prepare and transmit to the governor and
the appropriate committees of the legislature a report on the
implementation of the state energy strategy and other important energy
issues, as appropriate.
(i) Provide support for increasing cost-effective energy
conservation, including assisting in the removal of impediments to
timely implementation.
(j) Provide support for the development of cost-effective energy
resources including assisting in the removal of impediments to timely
construction.
(k) Adopt rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to carry out
the powers and duties enumerated in this chapter.
(l) Provide administrative assistance, space, and other support as
may be necessary for the activities of the energy facility site
evaluation council, as provided for in RCW 80.50.030.
(m) Appoint staff as may be needed to administer energy policy
functions and manage energy facility site evaluation council
activities. These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter
41.06 RCW.
(3) To the extent the powers and duties set out under this section
relate to energy education, applied research, and technology transfer
programs they are transferred to Washington State University.
(4) To the extent the powers and duties set out under this section
relate to energy efficiency in public buildings they are transferred to
the department of general administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of general administration shall make all
reasonable efforts to ensure that a portion of state government's
electricity consumption be from qualified alternative energy resources,
and energy conservation and efficiency measures implemented on or after
January 1, 2002, or a combination thereof, according to the following
schedule:
(a) At least two percent by July 1, 2004;
(b) At least four percent by July 1, 2005;
(c) At least six percent by July 1, 2007;
(d) At least eight percent by July 1, 2009; and
(e) At least ten percent by July 1, 2011, and every year
thereafter. Reasonable efforts include reviewing energy audits
performed pursuant to this chapter and providing technical expertise
and administrative assistance within available resources. For the
purposes of this subsection, acquisition or use of qualified
alternative energy resources is not limited to those resources offered
by electric utilities under the provisions of RCW 19.29A.090 but shall
be subject to the approval of the office of financial management where
the cost of such acquisitions would exceed the cost of existing
electrical service by more than five percent.
(2) The department of general administration must pursue, in
collaboration with the department of ecology, existing opportunities to
sell, trade, or receive other fair value for any emissions reductions
credits attributable to state government's shift to consumption of
electricity from qualified energy resources. Nothing in this section
shall be construed to require the department of general administration
to create a state emissions allowance set-aside program.
(3) The costs incurred by the department of general administration
under this section shall be paid from the general administration
services account and shall be subject to appropriation. Charges to
state agencies shall be calculated pursuant to RCW 43.19.500.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.21F RCW
to read as follows:
In preparing the biennial energy report required under RCW
43.21F.045(2)(h) to be transmitted to the governor and the legislature
by December 1, 2004, the department must include the following
information:
(1) A measurement of the current and likely future greenhouse gas
emissions resulting from state government's current and projected
energy consumption;
(2) Identification of specific strategies and options to reduce or
offset the emissions by sufficient quantity and quality in order to
compensate for the greenhouse gas emissions attributable to the state
government's energy consumption. Strategies and options may include,
but need not necessarily be limited to, the following:
(a) Reducing the state's consumption of electricity through
aggressive pursuit of cost-effective energy conservation and efficiency
opportunities;
(b) Increasing the proportion of electricity the state generates
for its own use or purchases through an electric utility from qualified
alternative energy resources;
(c) Addressing transportation-related energy challenges such as
improving the fuel efficiency of the state's vehicle fleet, using
alternative fuels in the state's vehicle fleet, changing the ways state
employees and contractors travel, and developing transportation
substitutes for state employees and contractors; and
(d) Options for mitigation or offsets that directly avoid,
displace, or permanently sequester greenhouse gas emissions as close in
time as possible to the occurrence of the actual emissions;
(3) An analysis of the feasibility of extending the no net increase
in greenhouse gas emissions standard to state agencies other than those
defined in section 2(5) of this act, including but not limited to
public educational institutions;
(4) A status report on the planning and progress related to
implementing section 7 of this act;
(5) The percentage of clean-fuel vehicles purchased in 2001 through
a state contract pursuant to RCW 43.19.637; and
(6) The results of efforts by the department of general
administration and other state agencies to aggregate purchasing of
higher gas mileage and lower emission vehicles and qualified
alternative energy resources.

--- END ---