BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the counties,
cities, and special purpose units of local government have major
responsibilities regarding the management, protection, and cleanup of
surface waters draining to Puget Sound, and other land use planning,
infrastructure, and public health and safety responsibilities that form
the foundation for the comprehensive and coordinated strategy set forth
in the 2000 Puget Sound water quality management plan. The Puget
Sound water quality action team is presently composed of ten state
agency representatives and only two local government representatives,
and does not adequately reflect the major responsibilities for water
quality carried out by local governments. Therefore it is the purpose
of this act to strengthen the local government membership on the Puget
Sound water quality action team, and to expand the assistance that the
team provides to local governments carrying out elements of the Puget
Sound plan.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.71.005 and 1998 c 246 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Puget Sound and related inland marine waterways of Washington
state represent a unique and unparalleled resource. A rich and varied
range of marine organisms, comprising an interdependent, sensitive
communal ecosystem reside in these sheltered waters. Residents of this
region enjoy a way of life centered around the waters of Puget Sound,
featuring accessible recreational opportunities, world-class port
facilities and water transportation systems, harvest of marine food
resources, shoreline-oriented life styles, water-dependent industries,
tourism, irreplaceable aesthetics, and other activities, all of which
to some degree depend upon a clean and healthy marine resource;
(b) The Puget Sound water quality authority has done an excellent
job in developing a comprehensive plan to identify actions to restore
and protect the biological health and diversity of Puget Sound;
(c) The large number of state and local governmental entities that
((now)) have management, infrastructure, and regulatory programs
affecting the water quality of Puget Sound have diverse interests and
limited jurisdictions that ((cannot adequately)) require coordination
to address the cumulative, wide-ranging impacts that contribute to the
degradation of Puget Sound; and
(d) Coordination of ((the regulatory)) these programs, at the state
and local level, is best accomplished through the development of
interagency mechanisms, including representatives of local governments
within the Puget Sound basin, that allow these entities to transcend
their diverse interests and limited jurisdictions.
(2) It is therefore the policy of the state of Washington to
coordinate the activities of state and local agencies by establishing
a biennial work plan that clearly delineates state and local actions
necessary to protect and restore the biological health and diversity of
Puget Sound. It is further the policy of the state to implement the
Puget Sound water quality management plan to the maximum extent
possible. To further the policy of the state, a recovery plan or plans
developed under the federal endangered species act or under state or
local authority for a portion or all of the Puget Sound shall be
considered for inclusion into the Puget Sound water quality management
plan.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.71.010 and 1996 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Action team" means the Puget Sound water quality action team.
(2) "Chair" means the chair of the action team.
(3) "Council" means the Puget Sound council created in RCW
90.71.030.
(4) "Puget Sound management plan" means the ((1994)) 2000 Puget
Sound water quality management plan ((as it exists June 30, 1996,
and)), as subsequently amended by the action team.
(5) "Support staff" means the staff to the action team.
(6) "Work plan" means the work plan ((and budget)) developed by the
action team.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.71.020 and 1998 c 246 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Puget Sound action team is created. The action team shall
consist of: The directors of the departments of ecology; agriculture;
natural resources; fish and wildlife; and community, trade, and
economic development; ((the secretaries of the departments of health
and transportation; the director of the parks and recreation
commission; the director of the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation; the administrative officer of the conservation commission
designated in RCW 89.08.050; one person)) three people representing
cities, appointed by the governor; one person representing special
purpose governments; three people representing counties, appointed by
the governor; ((one person)) two people representing federally
recognized tribes, appointed by the governor; and the chair of the
action team. In making the appointments for city, county, and special
purpose government representatives, the governor is encouraged to
select individuals with experience in local government and expertise in
the areas of water quality, public health, transportation, parks, and
recreation, as they relate to conditions and activities affecting the
water quality of Puget Sound. The action team shall also ((include))
invite the following ex officio nonvoting members: The regional
director of the United States environmental protection agency; the
regional administrator of the national marine fisheries service; and
the regional supervisor of the United States fish and wildlife service.
The members representing cities and counties shall each be reimbursed
for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(2) The action team shall:
(a) Prepare a Puget Sound work plan ((and budget for inclusion in
the governor's biennial budget));
(b) Coordinate monitoring and research programs(( as provided in
RCW 90.71.060));
(c) Consult with local governments in implementing the Puget Sound
water quality management plan and biennial work plans, and prioritize
attention by the team and its staff upon assisting local governments in
obtaining state and federal funding for carrying out local government
programs and in effectively coordinating local government programs with
those of neighboring local governments and state and federal programs;
(d) Work ((under the direction of)) in cooperation with the action
team chair ((as provided in RCW 90.71.040));
(((d))) (e) Coordinate permitting requirements as necessary to
expedite permit issuance for any local watershed plan or habitat plan
developed pursuant to rules adopted under this chapter under chapter
90.82 or 77.85 RCW, or other comprehensive watershed plan developed to
address water quality or habitat protection or restoration;
(((e))) (f) Identify and resolve any policy or rule conflicts that
may exist between one or more agencies represented on the action team;
(((f))) (g) Periodically amend the Puget Sound management plan;
(((g))) (h) Enter into, amend, and terminate contracts with
individuals, corporations, or research institutions for the purposes of
this chapter;
(((h))) (i) Receive such gifts, grants, and endowments, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the action team.
The action team may expend the same or any income therefrom according
to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments;
(((i))) (j) Promote extensive public participation, and otherwise
seek to broadly disseminate information concerning Puget Sound;
(((j))) (k) Receive and expend funding from other public agencies;
(((k))) (l) To reduce costs and improve efficiency, periodically
review ((by December 1, 1996,)) all requirements for reports and
documentation from state agencies and local governments specified in
the plan for the purpose of eliminating and consolidating reporting
requirements; and
(((l) Beginning in December 1998, and every two years thereafter,))
(m) Submit a biennial report to the appropriate policy ((and fiscal))
committees of the legislature that describes and evaluates the
successes and shortcomings of the current work plan relative to the
priority problems identified for each geographic area of Puget Sound.
(3) ((By July 1, 1996, the action team shall begin developing its
initial work plan, which shall include the coordination of necessary
support staff.
(4))) The action team shall incorporate, to the maximum extent
possible, the recommendations of the council regarding amendments to
the Puget Sound management plan and the work plan.
(((5))) (4) All proceedings of the action team are subject to the
open public meetings act under chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.71.040 and 1996 c 138 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By June 1, 1996,)) The governor shall appoint a person in the
governor's office to chair the action team. The chair shall serve at
the pleasure of the governor.
(2) The chair shall be responsible for:
(a) Organizing the development of the council recommendations;
(b) Organizing the development of the work plan required under RCW
90.71.050;
(c) Presenting a work plan ((and budget recommendations)) to the
governor and the legislature;
(d) Overseeing the implementation of the elements of the work plan
that receive funding ((through appropriations)) by the legislature; and
(e) Serving as chair of the council.
(3) The chair of the action team shall be a full-time employee
responsible for the administration of all functions of the action team
and the council, including hiring and terminating support staff, budget
preparation, contracting, coordinating with the governor, the
legislature, and other state and local entities, and the delegation of
responsibilities as deemed appropriate. The salary of the chair shall
be fixed by the governor, subject to RCW 43.03.040.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.71.050 and 1998 c 246 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each biennium, the action team shall prepare a Puget Sound
work plan ((and budget for inclusion in the governor's biennial
budget)). The work plan shall ((prescribe)) describe the necessary
federal, state, and local actions to maintain and enhance Puget Sound
water quality, including but not limited to, enhancement of
recreational opportunities, and restoration of a balanced population of
indigenous shellfish, fish, and wildlife. The work plan ((and budget))
shall include specific actions and projects pertaining to salmon
recovery plans.
(b) In developing a work plan, the action team shall meet the
following objectives:
(i) Use the plan elements of the Puget Sound management plan to
prioritize local and state actions necessary to restore and protect the
biological health and diversity of Puget Sound;
(ii) Consider the problems and priorities identified in local
plans; and
(iii) Coordinate the work plan activities with other relevant
activities, including but not limited to, agencies' activities that
have not been funded through the plan, local plans, and governmental
and nongovernmental watershed restoration activities.
(((c) In developing a budget, the action team shall identify:
(i) The total funds to implement local projects originating from
the planning process developed for nonpoint pollution; and
(ii) The total funds to implement any other projects designed
primarily to restore salmon habitat.))
(2) In addition to the requirements identified under RCW
90.71.020(2)(a), the work plan ((and budget)) shall:
(a) ((Identify and prioritize the local and state actions necessary
to address the water quality problems in the following locations:
(i) Area 1: Island and San Juan counties;
(ii) Area 2: Skagit and Whatcom counties;
(iii) Area 3: Clallam and Jefferson counties;
(iv) Area 4: Snohomish, King, and Pierce counties; and
(v) Area 5: Kitsap, Mason, and Thurston counties;
(b) Provide sufficient)) Identify funding ((to characterize)) needs
for local watersheds, provide technical assistance, ((and)) implement
state responsibilities identified in the work plan((. The number and
qualifications of staff assigned to each region shall be determined by
the types of problems identified pursuant to (a) of this subsection)),
and recommend actions to local governments;
(((c) Provide sufficient)) (b) Identify funding ((to implement))
needs for implementation and ((coordinate)) coordination of the Puget
Sound ambient monitoring plan pursuant to RCW 90.71.060;
(((d) Provide funds to assist)) (c) Identify funding needs for
local jurisdictions to implement elements of the work plan assigned to
local governments and to develop and implement local plans; and
(((e) Provide sufficient funding to provide support staff for the
action team; and
(f))) (d) Describe any proposed amendments to the Puget Sound
management plan.
(3) The work plan shall be submitted to the governor by September
15th of each even-numbered year and to the appropriate policy ((and
fiscal)) committees of the legislature by December 20th of each even-numbered year.
(((4) The work plan shall be implemented consistent with the
legislative provisos of the biennial appropriation acts.))

Sec. 7 RCW 90.71.060 and 1996 c 138 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to other powers and duties specified in this chapter,
the action team shall ensure implementation and coordination of the
Puget Sound ambient monitoring program established in the Puget Sound
management plan. The program shall include, at a minimum:
(1) A research program, including but not limited to methods to
provide current research information to managers and scientists, and to
establish priorities based on the needs of the action team;
(2) A monitoring program, including baselines, protocols,
guidelines, and quantifiable performance measures. In consultation
with state agencies, local and tribal governments, and other public and
private interests, the action team shall develop and track quantifiable
performance measures that can be used by the governor and the
legislature to assess the effectiveness over time of programs and
actions initiated under the plan to improve and protect Puget Sound
water quality and biological resources. ((The performance measures
shall be developed by June 30, 1997.)) The performance measures shall
include, but not be limited to a methodology to track the progress of:
Fish and wildlife habitat; sites with sediment contamination; wetlands;
shellfish beds; and other key indicators of Puget Sound health. State
agencies shall, and local governments are encouraged to, assist the
action team in the development and tracking of these performance
measures. The performance measures may be limited to a selected
geographic area.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.71.070 and 1996 c 138 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Local governments are ((required)) encouraged to implement
local elements of the biennial work plan ((subject to the availability
of appropriated funds or other funding sources)) and management plan.
(2) The ((council)) action team shall review the progress of work
plan implementation((. Where prescribed actions have not been
accomplished in accordance with the work plan, the)) and work
cooperatively with responsible ((agency shall submit to the council
written explanations for the shortfalls, together with proposed
remedies)) local governments and state agencies to address delays or
shortfalls in plan implementation.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.71.090 and 1992 c 63 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Puget Sound ((water quality authority)) action team shall
have the following powers and duties in carrying out its
responsibilities for the senior environmental corps created under RCW
43.63A.247:
Appoint a representative to the coordinating council;
Develop project proposals;
Administer project activities within the agency;
Develop appropriate procedures for the use of volunteers;
Provide project orientation, technical training, safety training,
equipment, and supplies to carry out project activities;
Maintain project records and provide project reports;
Apply for and accept grants or contributions for corps approved
projects; and
With the approval of the council, enter into memoranda of
understanding and cooperative agreements with federal, state, and local
agencies to carry out corps approved projects.
(2) The authority shall not use corps volunteers to displace
currently employed workers.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.63A.247 and 1994 c 264 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
The senior environmental corps is created within the department of
community, trade, and economic development. The departments of
agriculture, community, trade, and economic development, employment
security, ecology, fish and wildlife, health, and natural resources,
the parks and recreation commission, and the Puget Sound ((water
quality authority)) action team shall participate in the administration
and implementation of the corps and shall appoint representatives to
the council.

Sec. 11 RCW 90.71.100 and 2001 c 273 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The action team shall establish a shellfish - on-site sewage
grant program in Puget Sound and for Pacific and Grays Harbor counties.
The action team shall provide funds to local health jurisdictions to be
used as grants to individuals for improving their on-site sewage
systems. The grants may be provided only in areas that have the
potential to adversely affect water quality in commercial and
recreational shellfish growing areas. A recipient of a grant shall
enter into an agreement with the appropriate local health jurisdiction
to maintain the improved on-site sewage system according to
specifications required by the local health jurisdiction. The action
team shall work closely with local health jurisdictions and shall
endeavor to attain geographic equity between Willapa Bay and the Puget
Sound when making funds available under this program. For the purposes
of this subsection, "geographic equity" means issuing on-site sewage
grants at a level that matches the funds generated from the oyster
reserve lands in that area.
(2) In the Puget Sound, the action team shall give first priority
to areas that are:
(a) Identified as "areas of special concern" under WAC 246-272-01001; or
(b) Included within a shellfish protection district under chapter
90.72 RCW.
(3) In Grays Harbor and Pacific counties, the action team shall
give first priority to preventing the deterioration of water quality in
areas where commercial or recreational shellfish are grown.
(4) The action team and each participating local health
jurisdiction shall enter into a memorandum of understanding that will
establish an applicant income eligibility requirement for individual
grant applicants from within the jurisdiction and other mutually
agreeable terms and conditions of the grant program.
(5) The action team may recover the costs to administer this
program not to exceed ten percent of the shellfish - on-site sewage
grant program.
(((6) For the 2001-2003 biennium, the action team may use up to
fifty percent of the shellfish - on-site sewage grant program funds for
grants to local health jurisdictions to establish areas of special
concern under WAC 246-272-01001, or for operation and maintenance
programs therein, where commercial and recreational uses are present.))

Sec. 12 RCW 28B.30.632 and 1990 c 289 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The sea grant and cooperative extension shall jointly
administer a program to provide field agents to work with local
governments, property owners, and the general public to increase the
propagation of shellfish, and to address Puget Sound water quality
problems within Kitsap, Mason, and Jefferson counties that may limit
shellfish propagation potential. The sea grant and cooperative
extension shall each make available the services of no less than two
agents within these counties for the purposes of this section.
(2) The responsibilities of the field agents shall include but not
be limited to the following:
(a) Provide technical assistance to property owners, marine
industry owners and operators, and others, regarding methods and
practices to address nonpoint and point sources of pollution of Puget
Sound;
(b) Provide technical assistance to address water quality problems
limiting opportunities for enhancing the recreational harvest of
shellfish;
(c) Provide technical assistance in the management and increased
production of shellfish to facility operators or to those interested in
establishing an operation;
(d) Assist local governments to develop and implement education and
public involvement activities related to Puget Sound water quality;
(e) Assist in coordinating local water quality programs with
region-wide and statewide programs;
(f) Provide information and assistance to local watershed
committees.
(3) The sea grant and cooperative extension shall mutually
coordinate their field agent activities to avoid duplicative efforts
and to ensure that the full range of responsibilities under RCW
28B.30.632 ((through 28B.30.636)) and 28B.30.634 are carried out. They
shall consult with the Puget Sound ((water quality authority)) action
team and ensure consistency with the authority's water quality
management plan.
(4) Recognizing the special expertise of both agencies, the sea
grant and cooperative extension shall cooperate to divide their
activities as follows:
(a) Sea grant shall have primary responsibility to address water
quality issues related to activities within Puget Sound, and to provide
assistance regarding the management and improvement of shellfish
production; and
(b) Cooperative extension shall have primary responsibility to
address upland and freshwater activities affecting Puget Sound water
quality and associated watersheds.

Sec. 13 RCW 70.118.090 and 1994 c 281 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may not use funds appropriated to implement an
element of the Puget Sound ((water quality authority)) action team work
plan to conduct any activity required under chapter 281, Laws of 1994.

Sec. 14 RCW 79.90.550 and 1987 c 259 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the department of natural resources
provides, manages, and monitors aquatic land disposal sites on state-owned aquatic lands for materials dredged from rivers, harbors, and
shipping lanes. These disposal sites are approved through a
cooperative planning process by the departments of natural resources
and ecology, the United States corps of engineers, and the United
States environmental protection agency in cooperation with the Puget
Sound ((water quality authority)) action team. These disposal sites
are essential to the commerce and well being of the citizens of the
state of Washington. Management and environmental monitoring of these
sites are necessary to protect environmental quality and to assure
appropriate use of state-owned aquatic lands. The creation of an
aquatic land dredged material disposal site account is a reasonable
means to enable and facilitate proper management and environmental
monitoring of these disposal sites.

Sec. 15 RCW 90.48.260 and 1988 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ecology is hereby designated as the State Water
Pollution Control Agency for all purposes of the federal clean water
act as it exists on February 4, 1987, and is hereby authorized to
participate fully in the programs of the act as well as to take all
action necessary to secure to the state the benefits and to meet the
requirements of that act. With regard to the national estuary program
established by section 320 of that act, the department shall exercise
its responsibility jointly with the Puget Sound ((water quality
authority)) action team. The powers granted herein include, among
others, and notwithstanding any other provisions of chapter 90.48 RCW
or otherwise, the following:
(1) Complete authority to establish and administer a comprehensive
state point source waste discharge or pollution discharge elimination
permit program which will enable the department to qualify for full
participation in any national waste discharge or pollution discharge
elimination permit system and will allow the department to be the sole
agency issuing permits required by such national system operating in
the state of Washington subject to the provisions of RCW 90.48.262(2).
Program elements authorized herein may include, but are not limited
to: (a) Effluent treatment and limitation requirements together with
timing requirements related thereto; (b) applicable receiving water
quality standards requirements; (c) requirements of standards of
performance for new sources; (d) pretreatment requirements; (e)
termination and modification of permits for cause; (f) requirements for
public notices and opportunities for public hearings; (g) appropriate
relationships with the secretary of the army in the administration of
his responsibilities which relate to anchorage and navigation, with the
administrator of the environmental protection agency in the performance
of his duties, and with other governmental officials under the federal
clean water act; (h) requirements for inspection, monitoring, entry,
and reporting; (i) enforcement of the program through penalties,
emergency powers, and criminal sanctions; (j) a continuing planning
process; and (k) user charges.
(2) The power to establish and administer state programs in a
manner which will insure the procurement of moneys, whether in the form
of grants, loans, or otherwise; to assist in the construction,
operation, and maintenance of various water pollution control
facilities and works; and the administering of various state water
pollution control management, regulatory, and enforcement programs.
(3) The power to develop and implement appropriate programs
pertaining to continuing planning processes, area-wide waste treatment
management plans, and basin planning.
The governor shall have authority to perform those actions required
of him or her by the federal clean water act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 RCW 90.71.902 (Implementation and
requirements of plan not affected by repeal -- 1990 c 115) and 1990 c 115
s 13 are each repealed.

--- END ---