BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.05.140 and 1999 c 331 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition, the
court shall order that the petitioner shall not operate a motor vehicle
upon the public highways without a valid operator's license and proof
of liability insurance. The amount of liability insurance shall be
established by the court at not less than that established by RCW
46.29.490. As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition
on all alcohol-related cases, the court shall also order the
installation of an ignition interlock or other device under RCW
46.20.720 for a ((petitioner who has previously been convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local
ordinance or a petitioner who has been charged with such an offense and
had an alcohol concentration of at least .15, or by reason of the
person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there
is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration))
period of not less than two years. The court may consider suspending
this requirement on the petitioner's showing of installation and one
year of regular use of the device. In the event the petitioner has had
a prior interlock restriction under RCW 46.20.720, the court shall
condition granting any deferred prosecution petition on installation of
an interlock device for a minimum time period of five years. The court
may consider suspension of this requirement on petitioner's showing of
installation and three years of regular use of the device.
For any other petitioner, the court may order the installation of
an interlock device under RCW 46.20.720(1) as a condition of granting
a deferred prosecution petition. As a condition of granting a deferred
prosecution petition, the court may order the petitioner to make
restitution and to pay costs as defined in RCW 10.01.160. The court
may terminate the deferred prosecution program upon violation of this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.720 and 2001 c 247 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court may order that after a period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of driving privileges, if any, and for up to as
long as the court has jurisdiction, any person originally charged with
or convicted of any offense involving the use, consumption, or
possession of alcohol ((while operating a motor vehicle)) may drive
only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or
other biological or technical device.
(2) If a person is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance and it is: (a) The person's
first conviction ((or a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW))
and his or her alcohol concentration was ((at least)) 0.15 or higher,
or ((by reason of the person's refusal)) the person refused to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 ((there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration)); or (b) the person's
second or subsequent conviction; or (c) the ((person's first conviction
and the person has a previous deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05
RCW or it is)) person enters a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05
RCW ((and the person has a previous conviction)), the court shall order
installation of a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or
technical device and that, after any applicable period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of driving privileges, the person may drive only
a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other
biological or technical device. The requirement to drive only a motor
vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other
biological or technical device may not be suspended except as provided
under RCW 10.05.140. The court may waive the requirement for the use
of such a device if the court makes a specific finding in writing that
such devices are not reasonably available in the local area. Nothing
in this section may be interpreted as entitling a person to more than
one deferred prosecution.
(3) The court shall establish a specific calibration setting at
which the ignition interlock or other biological or technical device
will prevent the motor vehicle from being started and the period of
time that the person shall be subject to the restriction. In the case
of a person under subsection (2) of this section, the period of time of
the restriction will be as follows:
(a) For a person (i) who is subject to RCW 46.61.5055 (1)(b), (2),
or (3), ((or who is subject to a deferred prosecution program under
chapter 10.05 RCW,)) and (ii) who has not previously been restricted
under this section, a period of not less than one year;
(b) For a person who has previously been restricted under (a) of
this subsection, a period of not less than five years;
(c) For a person who has previously been restricted under (b) of
this subsection, a period of not less than ten years;
(d) For a person who enters a deferred prosecution under chapter
10.05 RCW, for the periods of time indicated in RCW 10.05.140.
For purposes of this section, "convicted" means being found guilty
of an offense or being placed on a deferred prosecution program under
chapter 10.05 RCW.

--- END ---