BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Objects that are not original vehicle equipment and are
installed in the passenger compartment of a vehicle must be securely
fastened in place.
(2) When there are one or more passengers in the backseat of a
vehicle, an object weighing more than one pound may not be placed on
the back shelf behind the passenger seats unless the object is securely
fastened in place.
(3) Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.

--- END ---