BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.16.030 and 1996 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided elsewhere in this section, in every county
there shall be elected from among the qualified voters of the county a
county assessor, a county auditor, a county clerk, a county coroner,
three county commissioners, a county prosecuting attorney, a county
sheriff, and a county treasurer((, except that)).
(2) In each county with a population of less than forty thousand no
coroner shall be elected and the prosecuting attorney shall be ex
officio coroner. Whenever the population of a county increases to
forty thousand or more, the prosecuting attorney shall continue as ex
officio coroner until a coroner is elected, at the next general
election at which the office of prosecuting attorney normally would be
elected, and assumes office as provided in RCW 29.04.170. In any
county where the population has once attained forty thousand people and
a current coroner is in office and a subsequent census indicates less
than forty thousand people, the county legislative authority may
maintain the office of coroner by resolution or ordinance. If the
county legislative authority has not passed a resolution or enacted an
ordinance to maintain the office of coroner, the elected coroner shall
remain in office for the remainder of the term for which he or she was
elected, but no coroner shall be elected at the next election at which
that office would otherwise be filled and the prosecuting attorney
shall be the ex officio coroner. In a county with a population of two
hundred fifty thousand or more, the county legislative authority may
replace the office of coroner with a medical examiner system and
appoint a medical examiner as specified in RCW 36.24.190.
(3) A noncharter county may have five county commissioners as
provided in RCW 36.32.010 and 36.32.055 through 36.32.0558.
(4) A charter county that operates under the authority of its
charter shall elect, pursuant to the general elections laws of the
state, that person responsible for supervising all primaries and
elections, general or special, within the county under Title 29 RCW.

--- END ---