BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state of
Washington is endowed with a richness of federally granted state trust
lands given to our state at its creation. This legacy provides a
perpetual source of revenue set aside in trust to support education and
public facilities. These state trust lands, as well as state forest
lands, may also provide for other public benefits. These may include
economic, environmental, or social benefits, including public
recreation, that arise coincidentally with ownership of a large public
land base. Further, the legislature has established that it is the
policy of the state to secure for present and future generations the
benefits of a system of natural areas and conservation areas providing
for a variety of public purposes including scientific research,
ecological protection, outstanding scenery, and low impact public
recreation.
The legislature further finds that use and enjoyment of these lands
for recreation and conservation purposes is extensive and growing; that
the quality of recreational experience, safety of the public, upkeep of
the trails and facilities, and protection of the lands from ecological
impacts may be in jeopardy; and that funding to support these
recreation and natural area purposes has been declining in both real
and per user terms.
The legislature further finds that the land endowment concept is as
relevant today as it was at statehood; that substantial revenue can be
perpetually earned from sustainable management of the resources on
these lands; and that the creation of a new trust modeled on a durable
concept and managed for the public to produce revenue is a viable and
logical approach to funding support for recreation and natural areas.
Therefore, it is the intent of this act to establish the legacy
trust for recreation and conservation, for the sole purpose of
generating a stable, long-term revenue source to support recreational
access and use on state-owned lands, and maintenance of designated
natural areas and conservation areas, and where consistent with this
purpose, to help retain working commercial forest land in the legacy
trust as a vital component of Washington state's landscape.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Conservation areas" has the same meaning as "natural resources
conservation area" as defined in RCW 79.71.030.
(2) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(3) "Legacy trust" means the legacy trust for recreation and
conservation created in section 3 of this act.
(4) "Natural areas" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
79.70.020.
(5) "State-owned lands" include all lands belonging to or held in
trust by the state that are managed by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legacy trust for recreation and
conservation is created as a trust. The legacy trust is composed of
lands, and improvements thereon, suitable for sustainable commercial
forest management, commercial agriculture, or other commercial or
industrial purposes. The legacy trust must be managed in trust to
provide financial support for the management of public recreational
access and use on state-owned lands, as well as management and
protection of areas created under chapters 79.70 and 79.71 RCW and
managed by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department is authorized to acquire,
by purchase, gift, donation, grant, transfer, or other means, except
eminent domain, fee interest or partial interest in lands or other real
property suitable for management as part of the legacy trust, or lands
or other real property whose acquisition can benefit the legacy trust.
(2) The department is authorized to receive funds for purposes of
establishing the legacy trust from grants, gifts, bequests, or loans,
whether public or private, as well as from legislative appropriation.
All of the funds must be placed in the legacy and park land trust
revolving fund created in RCW 43.30.115.
(3) All acquisitions of real property for the legacy trust must be
approved by the board of natural resources. In counties with a
population of less than two hundred thousand the department shall
review opportunities for acquisition of land or other real property
that is in public ownership. Only if no publicly owned land or real
property is available in such county that is suitable for inclusion in
the legacy trust may the board of natural resources approve the
purchase of private land, and in no case may the purchase of private
land result in a net loss of land in private ownership in such a
county, considering department transactions in that county over the
prior five years. Prior to approving acquisitions involving urban
property, the board shall seek advice from the land bank technical
advisory committee established in RCW 79.66.070.
(4) In addition to land acquisition, the department may enter into
agreements with the department of fish and wildlife and the state parks
and recreation commission to assume management responsibility of
certain undeveloped lands owned by those agencies, for the purposes of
the legacy trust. The agreements must specify the percentage of
revenue from management of department of fish and wildlife or state
parks and recreation commission lands that will be provided to the
landowner. The remaining revenues must be allocated according to
sections 13 and 14 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.30.115 and 2000 c 148 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legacy and park land trust revolving fund is to be utilized by
the department of natural resources for the exclusive purpose of
acquiring real property, including all reasonable costs associated with
these acquisitions, in order to assemble the land base for the legacy
trust for recreation and conservation created in section 3 of this act,
or as a replacement for the property transferred to the state parks and
recreation commission, as directed by the legislature in order to
maintain the land base of the affected trusts or under RCW 76.12.125.
Proceeds received under section 4 of this act, or from transfers of
real property to the state parks and recreation commission, or other
proceeds identified from transfers of real property as directed by the
legislature shall be deposited in this fund. Disbursement from the
legacy and park land trust revolving fund to acquire ((replacement))
real property shall be on the authorization of the department of
natural resources. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and
revenue control, the legacy and park land trust revolving fund is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the
fund.

Sec. 6 RCW 79.66.070 and 1984 c 222 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a land bank technical advisory committee,
consisting of three members. Membership shall consist of: One member
qualified by experience and training in matters pertaining to land use
planning and real estate appointed by the commissioner of public lands,
one member qualified by experience and training in public trust matters
appointed by the superintendent of public instruction, and one member
qualified by experience and training in financial matters appointed by
the state treasurer.
(2) The technical advisory committee shall provide professional
advice and counsel to the board of natural resources regarding land
bank sales, purchases, ((and)) exchanges involving urban property, and
regarding acquisitions involving urban property for the legacy trust
for recreation and conservation created in section 3 of this act.
(3) Members of the technical advisory committee shall be appointed
for five-year terms and shall serve until a successor is appointed. In
the case of a vacancy the vacancy shall be filled by the appointing
authority. The initial term of the appointee of the commissioner shall
expire in three years. The initial term of the appointee of the
superintendent shall expire in four years. The initial term of the
appointee of the treasurer shall expire in five years. All terms
expire December 31st.
(4) Members of the technical advisory committee shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The state attorney general, as
representative of the public and particularly those individuals who may
be benefited from the legacy trust, has the exclusive authority to
enforce the rights of the public to secure the proper administration of
the legacy trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department shall manage the legacy
trust in the same manner as state lands, as the term "state lands" is
defined in RCW 79.01.004. The valuable materials thereon may be sold
or the land may be leased in the same manner and for the same purposes
as is authorized for state lands, if the department finds such sale or
lease to be in the best interests of the legacy trust and approves the
terms and conditions thereof.
(2) The department may exchange or directly transfer real property
held in the legacy trust in the same manner and for the same purposes
as state lands under chapter 79.01 RCW or RCW 79.08.180 (1) through
(6). Legacy trust lands, once acquired, may be sold for any lawful
purpose and in any parcel size with the approval of the board of
natural resources. Sales must be either at public auction or by sealed
bid, and no land may be sold for less than its appraised value. Any
funds received as part of such an exchange, transfer, or sale, after
deduction for reasonable costs associated with these transactions, must
be placed in the legacy and park land trust revolving fund created in
RCW 43.30.115 and used to acquire replacement real property for the
legacy trust.
(3) Nothing in this section prevents the department from acquiring
real property subject to encumbrances, if the board of natural
resources finds that this is in the best interests of the legacy trust.
Nothing in this section prevents the department from placing or
accepting restrictions on the deeds of lands acquired for the legacy
trust, when consistent with the purpose of the legacy trust, so as to
perpetuate sustainable commercial forest management on lands
susceptible to conversion to nonforestry uses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Notwithstanding RCW 84.36.010 or other
statutes to the contrary, the department shall pay from the legacy
recreation and conservation trust account, created in section 14 of
this act, by April 30th of each year, on legacy trust lands acquired
from private landowners in each county, an amount in lieu of real
property taxes equal to that amount paid on similar parcels of land
taxable under Title 84 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.29A.040 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 61 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
The legislative body of any county or city is hereby authorized to
levy and collect a leasehold excise tax on the act or privilege of
occupying or using publicly owned real or personal property through a
leasehold interest in publicly owned property within the territorial
limits of such county or city. The tax levied by a county under
authority of this section shall not exceed six percent and the tax
levied by a city shall not exceed four percent of taxable rent:
PROVIDED, That any county ordinance levying such tax shall contain a
provision allowing a credit against the county tax for the full amount
of any city tax imposed upon the same taxable event. Further, no tax
may be levied under this section on property acquired as part of the
legacy trust for recreation and conservation under chapter 79.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 4, 7 through 9, 13 through 17, and 20 of this act)
for which payments in lieu of property taxes are made.
The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of such county or city.

Sec. 11 RCW 84.33.140 and 2001 c 305 s 2, 2001 c 249 s 3, and
2001 c 185 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When land has been designated as forest land under RCW
84.33.130, a notation of the designation shall be made each year upon
the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval
together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for
the land shall, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the
assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.
(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for
taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor
shall list each parcel of designated forest land at a value with
respect to the grade and class provided in this subsection and adjusted
as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor shall
compute the assessed value of the land using the same assessment ratio
applied generally in computing the assessed value of other property in
the county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land shall be
as follows:

LAND
GRADE OPERABILITY
CLASS VALUES
PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department shall adjust by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forest land values contained in
subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this subsection, and
shall certify the adjusted values to the assessor who will use these
values in preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002. For the
adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001, for use in the
2002 assessment year, the department shall:
(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(c) Adjust the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of
this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change
in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the
resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002,
and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in
subsection (3) of this section shall be followed using harvester excise
tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this adjustment shall
be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the five-year periods
for calculating average harvested timber values shall be successively
one year more recent.
(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forest land shall continue
to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of designation by
the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad
valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forest land
designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or
devisee of a deceased owner, shall not, by itself, result in removal of
designation. The signed notice of continuance shall be attached to the
real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the department.
If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating
taxes calculated under subsection (11) of this section shall become due
and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor
shall not accept an instrument of conveyance of designated forest land
for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of
continuance or the compensating tax has been paid, as evidenced by the
real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The
seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new assessed valuation
calculated under subsection (11) of this section to the county board of
equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of equalization to
hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:
(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber. However, land shall not be removed from
designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient
identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from
the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action to acquire a property interest in the
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The
governmental agency, organization, or recipient shall annually provide
the assessor of the county in which the land is located reasonable
evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated land as
long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request by the
assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than once in
a calendar year;
(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest
debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules; or
(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time
specified in the application for designation of such land.
(6) Land shall not be removed from designation if there is a
governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the
harvesting of timber from the owner's designated forest land. If only
a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental restrictions of
this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis to remove the
remainder of the forest land from designation under this chapter. For
the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions" includes:
(a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other action
adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(7) The assessor shall have the option of requiring an owner of
forest land to file a timber management plan with the assessor upon the
occurrence of one of the following:
(a) An application for designation as forest land is submitted; or
(b) Designated forest land is sold or transferred and a notice of
continuance, described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed.
(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the
circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this section,
the removal shall apply only to the land affected. If land is removed
from designation because of subsection (5)(d) of this section, the
removal shall apply only to the actual area of land that is no longer
primarily devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, without
regard to any other land that may have been included in the application
and approved for designation, as long as the remaining designated
forest land meets the definition of forest land contained in RCW
84.33.035.
(9) Within thirty days after the removal of designation as forest
land, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth the
reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal
the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice
of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together
with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land
removed from designation shall, at the expense of the applicant, be
filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded and a
notation of removal from designation shall immediately be made upon the
assessment and tax rolls. The assessor shall revalue the land to be
removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of
the year of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before
and after the removal of designation shall be listed. Taxes based on
the value of the land as forest land shall be assessed and payable up
until the date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of
the land shall be assessed and payable from the date of removal from
designation.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this
section, a compensating tax shall be imposed on land removed from
designation as forest land. The compensating tax shall be due and
payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the
amount of this tax. As soon as possible after the land is removed from
designation, the assessor shall compute the amount of compensating tax
and mail a notice to the owner of the amount of compensating tax owed
and the date on which payment of this tax is due. The amount of
compensating tax shall be equal to the difference between the amount of
tax last levied on the land as designated forest land and an amount
equal to the new assessed value of the land multiplied by the dollar
rate of the last levy extended against the land, multiplied by a
number, in no event greater than nine, equal to the number of years for
which the land was designated as forest land, plus compensating taxes
on the land at forest land values up until the date of removal and the
prorated taxes on the land at true and fair value from the date of
removal to the end of the current tax year.
(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon,
shall become a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land
is removed from designation as forest land and shall have priority to
and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance,
mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with
which the land may become charged or liable. The lien may be
foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in
the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent
real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax
unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the
date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the same
rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forest
land located within the state of Washington;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to
harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under
RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity
or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW
64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural
heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70
RCW. At such time as the land is not used for the purposes enumerated,
the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this section shall
be imposed upon the current owner;
(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the department of natural
resources for the legacy trust for recreation and conservation under
chapter 79.-- RCW (sections 1 through 4, 7 through 9, 13 through 17,
and 20 of this act);
(e) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation
commission for park and recreation purposes;
(((e))) (f) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington
or by the county or city within which the land is located that
disallows the present use of the land;
(((f))) (g) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian
easements under RCW 76.13.120;
(((g))) (h) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040;
(((h))) (i) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the
death of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if
the land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land,
designated as forest land under this chapter, or classified under
chapter 84.34 RCW continuously since 1993;
(((i))) (j) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the
owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has
been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as
forest land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34 RCW
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place within two
years after July 22, 2001, and the death of the owner occurred after
January 1, 1991; or
(((j))) (k) The date of death shown on a death certificate is the
date used for the purpose of this subsection (13).
(14) In a county with a population of more than one million
inhabitants, the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation as forest
land under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to
a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or
enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore,
limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or
enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as
the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax shall be imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 12 RCW 84.34.108 and 2001 c 305 s 3, 2001 c 249 s 14, and
2001 c 185 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, a
notation of the classification shall be made each year upon the
assessment and tax rolls and the land shall be valued pursuant to RCW
84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of the
classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of
the classification;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that
resulted from a default in loan payments made to or secured by a
governmental agency that intends to or is required by law or regulation
to resell the property for the same use as before, making all or a
portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of classification
continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or devisee of
a deceased owner shall not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared
by the department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the
new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all
additional taxes calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section
shall become due and payable by the seller or transferor at time of
sale. The auditor shall not accept an instrument of conveyance of
classified land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed
the notice of continuance or the additional tax has been paid, as
evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the
treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new
assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this section to
the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of
equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of the
land no longer meets the criteria for classification under this
chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to this chapter
continue to apply after classification has been granted.
The granting authority, upon request of an assessor, shall provide
reasonable assistance to the assessor in making a determination whether
the land continues to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or
(3). The assistance shall be provided within thirty days of receipt of
the request.
(2) Land may not be removed from classification because of:
(a) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120; or
(b) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040.
(3) Within thirty days after such removal of all or a portion of
the land from current use classification, the assessor shall notify the
owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for the removal. The
seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the removal to the county board
of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(4) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall
revalue the affected land with reference to its true and fair value on
January 1st of the year of removal from classification. Both the
assessed valuation before and after the removal of classification shall
be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that part of the
year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest,
and penalty shall be imposed which shall be due and payable to the
treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of the
additional tax. As soon as possible, the assessor shall compute the
amount of additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty and the
treasurer shall mail notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the
date on which payment is due. The amount of the additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty shall be determined as follows:
(a) The amount of additional tax shall be equal to the difference
between the property tax paid as "open space land", "farm and
agricultural land", or "timber land" and the amount of property tax
otherwise due and payable for the seven years last past had the land
not been so classified;
(b) The amount of applicable interest shall be equal to the
interest upon the amounts of the additional tax paid at the same
statutory rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the dates on
which the additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the
land had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter;
(c) The amount of the penalty shall be as provided in RCW
84.34.080. The penalty shall not be imposed if the removal satisfies
the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.
(5) Additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty, shall become
a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land is removed
from classification under this chapter and shall have priority to and
shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage,
judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to or with which the land
may become charged or liable. This lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property
taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050 now or as hereafter amended. Any
additional tax unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become
delinquent. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be
charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem
property taxes.
(6) The additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty specified
in subsection (4) of this section shall not be imposed if the removal
of classification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section resulted
solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land
located within the state of Washington;
(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent
domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an entity having the power of
eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power, said
entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other official
action;
(c) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner
changing the use of the property;
(d) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located which disallows the
present use of the land;
(e) Transfer of land to a church when the land would qualify for
exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;
(f) Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies
or organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the
purposes enumerated in those sections. At such time as these property
interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and
64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (4) of this
section shall be imposed;
(g) Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under
RCW 84.34.020(2)(e);
(h) Removal of land from classification after enactment of a
statutory exemption that qualifies the land for exemption and receipt
of notice from the owner to remove the land from classification;
(i) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(j) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040;
(k) The sale or transfer of a fee interest to the department of
natural resources for the legacy trust for recreation and conservation
under chapter 79.-- RCW (sections 1 through 4, 7 through 9, 13 through
17, and 20 of this act);
(l) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this
chapter continuously since 1993;
(((l))) (m) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the
owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has
been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as
forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this chapter
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place within two
years after July 22, 2001, and the death of the owner occurred after
January 1, 1991; or
(((m))) (n) The date of death shown on a death certificate is the
date used for the purpose of this subsection (6).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The legacy trust land management account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from up to thirty percent
of the revenue derived from management of real property held in the
legacy trust, as determined by the board of natural resources, must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for the purposes of carrying on the management activities of the
department on legacy trust lands, and for reimbursement, along with
interest, of expenditures that have been made or may be made from the
resource management cost account or the forest development account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The legacy recreation and conservation
trust account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
moneys received for the management of real property held in the legacy
trust, less the money deposited in the legacy trust land management
account created in section 13 of this act, must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the support and
management of recreation, natural areas, and conservation areas on
state-owned lands under chapters 79.68, 79.70, and 79.71 RCW,
consistent with the plans developed under section 15 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Prior to a legislative session in which the
department first requests an appropriation from the legacy recreation
and conservation trust account created in section 14 of this act, the
department shall develop a six-year expenditure strategy to guide
requested appropriations from the account. The expenditure strategy
must be developed so as to achieve the purpose of this chapter. The
expenditure strategy must identify and prioritize expenditures
including, but not limited to: (1) Operation and maintenance and
capital upgrade, repair, replacement, restoration, and new construction
of facilities, trails, and access for dispersed recreation activities;
(2) maintenance and stewardship of natural areas and conservation areas
including, but not limited to, environmental restoration, weed control,
facilities upgrade, repair, replacement, and new construction; and (3)
public education, volunteer support, and law enforcement. Expenditures
from the legacy recreation and conservation trust account may not be
used to offset expenditures necessary to cover the costs of road system
management attributable solely to the generation of revenue from
state-owned lands. However, expenditures may be made for road
improvements necessary for public safety or for continuation of public
access to state lands for recreational purposes. The department shall
update the expenditure strategy at least every two years. The
department may establish ad hoc review committees to assist in the
development of the expenditure strategy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 No later than September 1st of any
even-numbered year, the department shall submit to the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and senate and to the office
of financial management the current six-year expenditure strategy
prepared under section 15 of this act in support of its biennial
appropriation request from the legacy recreation and conservation trust
account created in section 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Funds in the legacy recreation and
conservation trust account, created in section 14 of this act, that are
in excess of amounts needed in any biennium to carry out the activities
identified in the six-year expenditure strategy developed under section
15 of this act, may be appropriated by the legislature for purposes
similar to and consistent with the purpose of the legacy trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 4, 7 through 9, 13
through 17, and 20 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 79
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 RCW 84.33.120 (Forest land valuation--Assessor to list forest land at grade and class values -- Computation of
assessed value -- Adjustment of values -- Certification -- Use -- Notice of
continuance -- Appeals -- Removal of classification -- Compensating tax) and
2001 c 305 s 1, 2001 c 185 s 3, 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 702, 1999 c 233 s 20,
1997 c 299 s 1, 1995 c 330 s 1, 1992 c 69 s 1, 1986 c 238 s 1, 1984 c
204 s 23, 1981 c 148 s 7, 1980 c 134 s 2, 1974 ex.s. c 187 s 5, 1972
ex.s. c 148 s 5, & 1971 ex.s. c 294 s 12 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---