BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.01.132 and 2001 c 250 s 4 and 2001 c 187 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When valuable materials on state lands are sold separate from
the land, they may be sold as a lump sum sale or as a scale sale. Lump
sum sales under five thousand dollars appraised value shall be paid for
in cash on the day of sale. The initial deposit shall be maintained
until all contract obligations of the purchaser are satisfied.
However, all or a portion of the initial deposit may be applied as the
final payment for the valuable materials in the event the department of
natural resources determines that adequate security exists for the
performance or fulfillment of any remaining obligations of the
purchaser under the sale contract.
(2) The initial deposits required in RCW 79.01.204 may not exceed
twenty-five percent of the actual or projected purchase price, but in
the case of lump sum sales appraised at over five thousand dollars the
initial deposit may not be less than five thousand dollars, and shall
be made on the day of the sale. For those sales appraised below the
amount specified in RCW 79.01.200, the department of natural resources
may require full cash payment on the day of sale.
(3) The purchaser shall notify the department of natural resources
before any operation takes place on the sale site. Upon notification,
the department of natural resources shall determine and require advance
payment for the cutting, removal, or processing of the valuable
materials, or may allow purchasers to guarantee payment by submitting
as adequate security bank letters of credit, payment bonds, assignments
of savings accounts, assignments of certificates of deposit, or other
methods acceptable to the department as adequate security. The amount
of such advance payments and/or security shall be determined by the
department and at all times equal or exceed the value of timber cut and
other valuable materials processed or removed until paid for.
(4) In all cases where valuable materials are sold separate from
the land, the same shall revert to the state if not removed from the
land within the period specified in the sale contract. The specified
period shall not exceed five years from the date of the purchase
thereof: PROVIDED, That the specified periods in the sale contract for
stone, sand, fill material, or building stone shall not exceed thirty
years.
(5) In all cases where, in the judgment of the department of
natural resources, the purchaser is acting in good faith and
endeavoring to remove such materials, the department of natural
resources may extend the time for the removal thereof for any period
not exceeding forty years from the date of purchase for the stone,
sand, fill material, or building stone or for a total of ten years
beyond the normal termination date specified in the original sale
contract for all other material. Extension of a contract is contingent
upon payment to the state of a sum to be fixed by the department of
natural resources, based on the estimated loss of income per acre to
the state resulting from the granting of the extension. In no event
may the extension payment be less than fifty dollars per extension,
plus interest on the unpaid portion of the contract. The interest rate
shall be fixed, from time to time, by rule adopted by the board of
natural resources and shall not be less than six percent per annum.
The applicable rate of interest as fixed at the date of sale, the
maximum extension payment, and the method for calculating the unpaid
portion of the contract upon which such interest shall be paid by the
purchaser shall be set forth in the contract. The department of
natural resources shall pay into the state treasury all sums received
for such extension and the same shall be credited to the fund to which
was credited the original purchase price of the material so sold.
(6) A direct sale of valuable materials may be sold to the
applicant for cash at full appraised value without notice or
advertising. The board of natural resources shall, by resolution,
establish the value amount of a direct sale ((not to exceed twenty
thousand dollars in appraised sale value,)) and establish procedures to
assure that competitive market prices and accountability will be
guaranteed.
(7) The department may, in addition to any other securities,
require a performance security to guarantee compliance with all
contract requirements. The security is limited to those types listed
in subsection (3) of this section. The value of the performance
security will, at all times, equal or exceed the value of work
performed or to be performed by the purchaser.
(8) Any time that the department of natural resources sells timber
by contract that includes a performance bond, the department shall
require the purchaser to present proof of any and all property taxes
paid prior to the release of the performance bond. Within thirty days
of payment of taxes due by the timber purchaser, the county treasurer
shall provide certified evidence of property taxes paid, clearly
disclosing the sale contract number.
(9) The provisions of this section apply unless otherwise provided
by statute. The board of natural resources shall establish procedures
to protect against cedar theft and to ensure adequate notice is given
for persons interested in purchasing cedar.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.01.184 and 2001 c 250 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
When the department of natural resources shall have decided to sell
any state lands or valuable materials thereon, or with the consent of
the board of regents of the University of Washington, or by legislative
directive, shall have decided to sell any lot, block, tract, or tracts
of university lands, or the valuable materials thereon, it shall be the
duty of the department to fix the date, place, and time of sale, and no
sale shall be had on any day which is a legal holiday.
The department shall give notice of the sale by advertisement
published not less than two times during a four week period prior to
the time of sale in at least one newspaper of general circulation in
the county in which the whole, or any part of any lot, block, or tract
of land to be sold((, or the material upon which is to be sold)) is
situated, and by posting a copy of the notice in a conspicuous place in
the department's Olympia office, the region headquarters administering
such sale, and in the office of the county auditor of such county. The
notice shall specify the place, date, and time of sale, the appraised
value thereof, and describe with particularity each parcel of land to
be sold((, or from which valuable materials are to be sold)). In the
case of valuable materials sales, the advertisement may be by newspaper
or as provided in RCW 79.01.188, provided that the estimated volume
will be identified and the terms of sale will be available in the
region headquarters and the department's Olympia office.
The advertisement is for informational purposes only, and under no
circumstances does the information in the notice of sale constitute a
warranty that the purchaser will receive the stated values, volumes, or
acreage. All purchasers are expected to make their own measurements,
evaluations, and appraisals.
A direct sale of valuable materials may be sold to the applicant
for cash at full appraised value without notice or advertising. The
board of natural resources shall, by resolution, establish the value
amount of a direct sale ((not to exceed twenty thousand dollars in
appraised sale value,)) and establish procedures to ensure that
competitive market prices and accountability will be guaranteed.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.01.200 and 1989 c 148 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
All sales of land shall be at public auction, and all sales of
valuable materials shall be at public auction or by sealed bid to the
highest bidder, on the terms prescribed by law and as specified in the
notice provided, and no land or materials shall be sold for less than
its appraised value: PROVIDED, That on public lands granted to the
state for educational purposes sealed bids may be accepted for sales of
timber or stone only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when valuable material
has been appraised at an amount not exceeding ((one)) two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, the department of natural resources, when authorized
by the board of natural resources, may arrange for the sale at public
auction of said valuable material and for its removal under such terms
and conditions as the department may prescribe, after the department
shall have caused to be published not less than ten days prior to sale
a notice of such sale in a newspaper of general circulation located
nearest to property to be sold. In addition, the commissioner of
public lands may seek additional means of publishing the information,
such as on the internet, to increase the number of prospective buyers.
This section does not apply to direct sales authorized in RCW
79.01.184.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.01.188 and 2001 c 250 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner of public lands shall cause to be printed a
list of all public lands, or valuable materials thereon, and the
appraised value thereof, that are to be sold. This list should be
published in a pamphlet form to be issued at least four weeks prior to
the date of any sale of the lands or valuable materials thereon. The
list should be organized by county and by alphabetical order, and
provide sale information to prospective buyers. The commissioner of
public lands shall retain for free distribution in his or her office
and the region offices sufficient copies of the pamphlet, to be kept in
a conspicuous place, and, when requested so to do, shall mail copies of
the pamphlet as issued to any requesting applicant. The commissioner
of public lands may seek additional means of publishing the information
in the pamphlet, such as on the internet, to increase the number of
prospective buyers.
(2) The sale of valuable materials appraised at an amount not
exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars, as described in RCW
79.01.200 and as authorized by the board of natural resources, are
exempt from the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---