BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.075 and 2002 c 142 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The administrator shall provide benefit plans designed by the
board through a contract or contracts with insuring entities, through
self-funding, self-insurance, or other methods of providing insurance
coverage authorized by RCW 41.05.140.
(2) The administrator shall establish a contract bidding process
that:
(a) Encourages competition among insuring entities;
(b) Maintains an equitable relationship between premiums charged
for similar benefits and between risk pools including premiums charged
for retired state and school district employees under the separate risk
pools established by RCW 41.05.022 and 41.05.080 such that insuring
entities may not avoid risk when establishing the premium rates for
retirees eligible for medicare;
(c) Is timely to the state budgetary process; and
(d) Sets conditions for awarding contracts to any insuring entity.
(3) The administrator shall establish a requirement for review of
utilization and financial data from participating insuring entities on
a quarterly basis.
(4) The administrator shall centralize the enrollment files for all
employee and retired or disabled school employee health plans offered
under chapter 41.05 RCW and develop enrollment demographics on a plan-specific basis.
(5) All claims data shall be the property of the state. The
administrator may require of any insuring entity that submits a bid to
contract for coverage all information deemed necessary including
subscriber or member demographic and claims data necessary for risk
assessment and adjustment calculations in order to fulfill the
administrator's duties as set forth in this chapter.
(6) All contracts with insuring entities for the provision of
health care benefits shall provide that the beneficiaries of such
benefit plans may use on an equal participation basis the services of
practitioners licensed pursuant to chapters 18.22, 18.25, 18.32, 18.53,
18.57, 18.71, 18.74, 18.83, and 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered
nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners. However, nothing
in this subsection may preclude the administrator from establishing
appropriate utilization controls approved pursuant to RCW 41.05.065(2)
(a), (b), and (d).
(7) To minimize data collection administrative costs, requests for
any data from insuring entities may not include data elements produced
or maintained by the administrator or another state agency. Specific
requirements for insuring entities shall be developed in rule by the
administrator and allow insuring entities sufficient time to comply
with new requirements prior to conducting an audit. The timing of on-site audits of insuring entities shall be coordinated among state
agencies and with national managed care accreditation organization
reviews.
(8) An insuring entity's compliance with standards adopted by
national managed care accreditation organizations, such as the national
committee on quality assurance, American accreditation healthcare
commission, or other accreditation entity acceptable to the
administrator, through accreditation or through utilizing the services
of an accredited entity, shall be considered as fully meeting the
requirements of the administrator for the subject areas covered under
the accreditation program that are also required by the administrator.
The administrator shall not subject the insuring entity to additional
requirements or separate compliance auditing.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.43.505 and 2000 c 5 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Health carriers and insurers shall adopt policies and
procedures that conform administrative, business, and operational
practices to protect an enrollee's right to privacy or right to
confidential health care services granted under state or federal laws.
(2) ((The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section
after considering relevant standards adopted by national managed care
accreditation organizations and the national association of insurance
commissioners, and after considering the effect of those standards on
the ability of carriers to undertake enrollee care management and
disease management programs.)) A health carrier's compliance with
federal requirements on privacy and security under Public Law 104-191
shall be considered as meeting the requirements of this section and the
carrier shall not be subject to additional requirements by the
commissioner or separate compliance auditing on the part of the
commissioner.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.43.510 and 2000 c 5 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) A carrier that offers a health plan may not offer to sell a
health plan to an enrollee or to any group representative, agent,
employer, or enrollee representative without first offering to provide,
and providing upon request, the following information before purchase
or selection:
(a) A listing of covered benefits, including prescription drug
benefits, if any, a copy of the current formulary, if any is used,
definitions of terms such as generic versus brand name, and policies
regarding coverage of drugs, such as how they become approved or taken
off the formulary, and how consumers may be involved in decisions about
benefits;
(b) A listing of exclusions, reductions, and limitations to covered
benefits, and any definition of medical necessity or other coverage
criteria upon which they may be based;
(c) A statement of the carrier's policies for protecting the
confidentiality of health information;
(d) A statement of the cost of premiums and any enrollee cost-sharing requirements;
(e) A summary explanation of the carrier's grievance process;
(f) A statement regarding the availability of a point-of-service
option, if any, and how the option operates; and
(g) A convenient means of obtaining lists of participating primary
care and specialty care providers, including disclosure of network
arrangements that restrict access to providers within any plan network.
The offer to provide the information referenced in this subsection (1)
must be clearly and prominently displayed on any information provided
to any prospective enrollee or to any prospective group representative,
agent, employer, or enrollee representative.
(2) Upon the request of any person, including a current enrollee,
prospective enrollee, or the insurance commissioner, a carrier must
provide written information regarding any health care plan it offers,
that includes the following written information:
(a) Any documents, instruments, or other information referred to in
the medical coverage agreement;
(b) A full description of the procedures to be followed by an
enrollee for consulting a provider other than the primary care provider
and whether the enrollee's primary care provider, the carrier's medical
director, or another entity must authorize the referral;
(c) Procedures, if any, that an enrollee must first follow for
obtaining prior authorization for health care services;
(d) A written description of any reimbursement or payment
arrangements, including, but not limited to, capitation provisions,
fee-for-service provisions, and health care delivery efficiency
provisions, between a carrier and a provider or network;
(e) Descriptions and justifications for provider compensation
programs, including any incentives or penalties that are intended to
encourage providers to withhold services or minimize or avoid referrals
to specialists;
(f) An annual accounting of all payments made by the carrier which
have been counted against any payment limitations, visit limitations,
or other overall limitations on a person's coverage under a plan;
(g) A copy of the carrier's grievance process for claim or service
denial and for dissatisfaction with care; and
(h) Accreditation status with one or more national managed care
accreditation organizations, and whether the carrier tracks its health
care effectiveness performance using the health employer data
information set (HEDIS), whether it publicly reports its HEDIS data,
and how interested persons can access its HEDIS data.
(3) Each carrier shall provide to all enrollees and prospective
enrollees a list of available disclosure items.
(4) Nothing in this section requires a carrier or a health care
provider to divulge proprietary information to an enrollee, including
the specific contractual terms and conditions between a carrier and a
provider.
(5) No carrier may advertise or market any health plan to the
public as a plan that covers services that help prevent illness or
promote the health of enrollees unless it:
(a) Provides all clinical preventive health services provided by
the basic health plan, authorized by chapter 70.47 RCW;
(b) Monitors and reports annually to enrollees on standardized
measures of health care and satisfaction of all enrollees in the health
plan. The state department of health shall recommend appropriate
standardized measures for this purpose, after consideration of national
standardized measurement systems adopted by national managed care
accreditation organizations and state agencies that purchase managed
health care services; and
(c) Makes available upon request to enrollees its integrated plan
to identify and manage the most prevalent diseases within its enrolled
population, including cancer, heart disease, and stroke.
(6) No carrier may preclude or discourage its providers from
informing an enrollee of the care he or she requires, including various
treatment options, and whether in the providers' view such care is
consistent with the plan's health coverage criteria, or otherwise
covered by the enrollee's medical coverage agreement with the carrier.
No carrier may prohibit, discourage, or penalize a provider otherwise
practicing in compliance with the law from advocating on behalf of an
enrollee with a carrier. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize a provider to bind a carrier to pay for any service.
(7) No carrier may preclude or discourage enrollees or those paying
for their coverage from discussing the comparative merits of different
carriers with their providers. This prohibition specifically includes
prohibiting or limiting providers participating in those discussions
even if critical of a carrier.
(8) Each carrier must communicate enrollee information required in
chapter 5, Laws of 2000 by means that ensure that a substantial portion
of the enrollee population can make use of the information.
(9) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section. In
developing rules to implement this section, the commissioner shall
consider relevant standards adopted by national managed care
accreditation organizations and state agencies that purchase managed
health care services. A health carrier's compliance with standards
adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations, through
accreditation or through utilizing the services of an accredited
entity, such as the national committee on quality assurance, American
accreditation healthcare commission, or other accreditation entity
acceptable to the commissioner, or state agencies that purchase health
care services shall be considered as fully meeting the requirements of
subsections (1) through (3) of this section and the carrier shall not
be subject to additional requirements by the commissioner or separate
compliance auditing on the part of the commissioner.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.43.515 and 2000 c 5 s 7 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Each enrollee in a health plan must have adequate choice among
health care providers.
(2) Each carrier must allow an enrollee to choose a primary care
provider who is accepting new enrollees from a list of participating
providers. Enrollees also must be permitted to change primary care
providers at any time with the change becoming effective no later than
the beginning of the month following the enrollee's request for the
change.
(3) Each carrier must have a process whereby an enrollee with a
complex or serious medical or psychiatric condition may receive a
standing referral to a participating specialist for an extended period
of time.
(4) Each carrier must provide for appropriate and timely referral
of enrollees to a choice of specialists within the plan if specialty
care is warranted. If the type of medical specialist needed for a
specific condition is not represented on the specialty panel, enrollees
must have access to nonparticipating specialty health care providers.
(5) Each carrier shall provide enrollees with direct access to the
participating chiropractor of the enrollee's choice for covered
chiropractic health care without the necessity of prior referral.
Nothing in this subsection shall prevent carriers from restricting
enrollees to seeing only providers who have signed participating
provider agreements or from utilizing other managed care and cost
containment techniques and processes. For purposes of this subsection,
"covered chiropractic health care" means covered benefits and
limitations related to chiropractic health services as stated in the
plan's medical coverage agreement, with the exception of any provisions
related to prior referral for services.
(6) Each carrier must provide, upon the request of an enrollee,
access by the enrollee to a second opinion regarding any medical
diagnosis or treatment plan from a qualified participating provider of
the enrollee's choice.
(7) Each carrier must cover services of a primary care provider
whose contract with the plan or whose contract with a subcontractor is
being terminated by the plan or subcontractor without cause under the
terms of that contract for at least sixty days following notice of
termination to the enrollees or, in group coverage arrangements
involving periods of open enrollment, only until the end of the next
open enrollment period. The provider's relationship with the carrier
or subcontractor must be continued on the same terms and conditions as
those of the contract the plan or subcontractor is terminating, except
for any provision requiring that the carrier assign new enrollees to
the terminated provider.
(8) ((Every carrier shall meet the standards set forth in this
section and any rules adopted by the commissioner to implement this
section. In developing rules to implement this section, the
commissioner shall consider relevant standards adopted by national
managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies that
purchase managed health care services.)) A health carrier's compliance
with standards adopted by national managed care accreditation
organizations such as the national committee on quality assurance,
American accreditation healthcare commission, or other accreditation
entity acceptable to the commissioner, through accreditation or through
utilizing the services of an accredited entity, and state agencies that
purchase health care services shall be considered as fully meeting the
requirements of this section and the carrier shall not be subject to
additional requirements by the commissioner or separate compliance
auditing on the part of the commissioner.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.43.520 and 2000 c 5 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Carriers that offer a health plan shall maintain a documented
utilization review program description and written utilization review
criteria based on reasonable medical evidence. The program must
include a method for reviewing and updating criteria. Carriers shall
make clinical protocols, medical management standards, and other review
criteria available upon request to participating providers.
(2) ((The commissioner shall adopt, in rule, standards for this
section after considering relevant standards adopted by national
managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies that
purchase managed health care services.)) A health carrier's compliance
with standards adopted by national managed care accreditation
organizations, through accreditation or through utilizing the services
of an accredited entity such as the national committee on quality
assurance, American accreditation healthcare commission, or other
accreditation entity acceptable to the commissioner, or state agencies
that purchase health care services shall be considered as fully meeting
the requirements of this section and the carrier shall not be subject
to additional requirements by the commissioner or separate compliance
auditing on the part of the commissioner.
(3) A carrier shall not be required to use medical evidence or
standards in its utilization review of religious nonmedical treatment
or religious nonmedical nursing care.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.43.530 and 2000 c 5 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each carrier that offers a health plan must have a fully
operational, comprehensive grievance process that complies with the
requirements of this section and any rules adopted by the commissioner
to implement this section. For the purposes of this section, the
commissioner shall consider grievance process standards adopted by
national managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies
that purchase managed health care services.
(2) Each carrier must process as a complaint an enrollee's
expression of dissatisfaction about customer service or the quality or
availability of a health service. Each carrier must implement
procedures for registering and responding to oral and written
complaints in a timely and thorough manner.
(3) Each carrier must provide written notice to an enrollee or the
enrollee's designated representative, and the enrollee's provider, of
its decision to deny, modify, reduce, or terminate payment, coverage,
authorization, or provision of health care services or benefits,
including the admission to or continued stay in a health care facility.
(4) Each carrier must process as an appeal an enrollee's written or
oral request that the carrier reconsider: (a) Its resolution of a
complaint made by an enrollee; or (b) its decision to deny, modify,
reduce, or terminate payment, coverage, authorization, or provision of
health care services or benefits, including the admission to, or
continued stay in, a health care facility. A carrier must not require
that an enrollee file a complaint prior to seeking appeal of a decision
under (b) of this subsection.
(5) To process an appeal, each carrier must:
(a) Provide written notice to the enrollee when the appeal is
received;
(b) Assist the enrollee with the appeal process;
(c) Make its decision regarding the appeal within thirty days of
the date the appeal is received. An appeal must be expedited if the
enrollee's provider or the carrier's medical director reasonably
determines that following the appeal process response timelines could
seriously jeopardize the enrollee's life, health, or ability to regain
maximum function. The decision regarding an expedited appeal must be
made within seventy-two hours of the date the appeal is received;
(d) Cooperate with a representative authorized in writing by the
enrollee;
(e) Consider information submitted by the enrollee;
(f) Investigate and resolve the appeal; and
(g) Provide written notice of its resolution of the appeal to the
enrollee and, with the permission of the enrollee, to the enrollee's
providers. The written notice must explain the carrier's decision and
the supporting coverage or clinical reasons and the enrollee's right to
request independent review of the carrier's decision under RCW
48.43.535.
(6) Written notice required by subsection (3) of this section must
explain:
(a) The carrier's decision and the supporting coverage or clinical
reasons; and
(b) The carrier's appeal process, including information, as
appropriate, about how to exercise the enrollee's rights to obtain a
second opinion, and how to continue receiving services as provided in
this section.
(7) When an enrollee requests that the carrier reconsider its
decision to modify, reduce, or terminate an otherwise covered health
service that an enrollee is receiving through the health plan and the
carrier's decision is based upon a finding that the health service, or
level of health service, is no longer medically necessary or
appropriate, the carrier must continue to provide that health service
until the appeal is resolved. If the resolution of the appeal or any
review sought by the enrollee under RCW 48.43.535 affirms the carrier's
decision, the enrollee may be responsible for the cost of this
continued health service.
(8) Each carrier must provide a clear explanation of the grievance
process upon request, upon enrollment to new enrollees, and annually to
enrollees and subcontractors.
(9) Each carrier must ensure that the grievance process is
accessible to enrollees who are limited English speakers, who have
literacy problems, or who have physical or mental disabilities that
impede their ability to file a grievance.
(10) Each carrier must: Track each appeal until final resolution;
maintain, and make accessible to the commissioner for a period of three
years, a log of all appeals; and identify and evaluate trends in
appeals.
(11) A health carrier's compliance with standards adopted by
national managed care accreditation organizations, through
accreditation or through utilizing the services of an accredited entity
such as the national committee on quality assurance, American
accreditation healthcare commission, or other accreditation entity
acceptable to the commissioner, or state agencies that purchase health
care services shall be considered as fully meeting the requirements of
this section and the carrier shall not be subject to additional
requirements by the commissioner or separate compliance auditing on the
part of the commissioner.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.02.900 and 2000 c 5 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) This chapter does not restrict a health care provider, a third-party payor, or an insurer regulated under Title 48 RCW from complying
with obligations imposed by federal or state health care payment
programs or federal or state law.
(2) This chapter does not modify the terms and conditions of
disclosure under Title 51 RCW and chapters 13.50, 26.09, 70.24, 70.39,
70.96A, 71.05, and 71.34 RCW and rules adopted under these provisions.
(3) An insurer or health carrier regulated under Title 48 RCW that
is compliant with federal requirements on privacy and security under
Public Law 104-191 shall be considered as fully compliant with the
requirements of this chapter that conflict or expand upon those federal
privacy and security requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To minimize data collection administrative costs, requests for
any data from managed health care systems may not include data elements
already produced or maintained by the administrator or another state
agency. Specific requirements for auditing managed health care systems
shall be developed in rule by the administrator and allow managed
health care systems sufficient time to comply with new requirements
prior to conducting an audit. The timing of on-site audits of managed
health care systems shall be coordinated among state agencies and with
national managed care accreditation organization reviews.
(2) A managed health care system's compliance with standards
adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations, through
accreditation or through utilizing the services of an accredited entity
such as the national committee on quality assurance, American
accreditation healthcare commission, or other accreditation entity
acceptable to the administrator, shall be considered as fully meeting
the requirements of the administrator for the subject areas covered
under the accreditation program that are also required by the
administrator. The managed health care system shall not be subject to
additional requirements by the administrator or separate compliance
auditing on the part of the administrator.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.09.522 and 1997 c 59 s 15 and 1997 c 34 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "managed health care system"
means any health care organization, including health care providers,
insurers, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, health insuring organizations, or any combination
thereof, that provides directly or by contract health care services
covered under RCW 74.09.520 and rendered by licensed providers, on a
prepaid capitated basis and that meets the requirements of section
1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or
federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI
of the federal social security act.
(2) The department of social and health services shall enter into
agreements with managed health care systems to provide health care
services to recipients of temporary assistance for needy families under
the following conditions:
(a) Agreements shall be made for at least thirty thousand
recipients state-wide;
(b) Agreements in at least one county shall include enrollment of
all recipients of temporary assistance for needy families;
(c) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal
demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the
federal social security act, recipients shall have a choice of systems
in which to enroll and shall have the right to terminate their
enrollment in a system: PROVIDED, That the department may limit
recipient termination of enrollment without cause to the first month of
a period of enrollment, which period shall not exceed twelve months:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department shall not restrict a
recipient's right to terminate enrollment in a system for good cause as
established by the department by rule;
(d) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act, participating
managed health care systems shall not enroll a disproportionate number
of medical assistance recipients within the total numbers of persons
served by the managed health care systems, except as authorized by the
department under federal demonstration waivers granted under section
1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;
(e) In negotiating with managed health care systems the department
shall adopt a uniform procedure to negotiate and enter into contractual
arrangements, including standards regarding the quality of services to
be provided; and financial integrity of the responding system;
(f) The department shall seek waivers from federal requirements as
necessary to implement this chapter;
(g) The department shall, wherever possible, enter into prepaid
capitation contracts that include inpatient care. However, if this is
not possible or feasible, the department may enter into prepaid
capitation contracts that do not include inpatient care;
(h) The department shall define those circumstances under which a
managed health care system is responsible for out-of-plan services and
assure that recipients shall not be charged for such services; and
(i) Nothing in this section prevents the department from entering
into similar agreements for other groups of people eligible to receive
services under this chapter.
(3) The department shall ensure that publicly supported community
health centers and providers in rural areas, who show serious intent
and apparent capability to participate as managed health care systems
are seriously considered as contractors. The department shall
coordinate its managed care activities with activities under chapter
70.47 RCW.
(4) The department shall work jointly with the state of Oregon and
other states in this geographical region in order to develop
recommendations to be presented to the appropriate federal agencies and
the United States congress for improving health care of the poor, while
controlling related costs.
(5) The legislature finds that competition in the managed health
care marketplace is enhanced, in the long term, by the existence of a
large number of managed health care system options for medicaid
clients. In a managed care delivery system, whose goal is to focus on
prevention, primary care, and improved enrollee health status,
continuity in care relationships is of substantial importance, and
disruption to clients and health care providers should be minimized.
To help ensure these goals are met, the following principles shall
guide the department in its healthy options managed health care
purchasing efforts:
(a) All managed health care systems should have an opportunity to
contract with the department to the extent that minimum contracting
requirements defined by the department are met, at payment rates that
enable the department to operate as far below appropriated spending
levels as possible, consistent with the principles established in this
section.
(b) Managed health care systems should compete for the award of
contracts and assignment of medicaid beneficiaries who do not
voluntarily select a contracting system, based upon:
(i) Demonstrated commitment to or experience in serving low-income
populations;
(ii) Quality of services provided to enrollees;
(iii) Accessibility, including appropriate utilization, of services
offered to enrollees;
(iv) Demonstrated capability to perform contracted services,
including ability to supply an adequate provider network;
(v) Payment rates; and
(vi) The ability to meet other specifically defined contract
requirements established by the department, including consideration of
past and current performance and participation in other state or
federal health programs as a contractor.
(c) Consideration should be given to using multiple year
contracting periods.
(d) Quality, accessibility, and demonstrated commitment to serving
low-income populations shall be given significant weight in the
contracting, evaluation, and assignment process.
(e) All contractors that are regulated health carriers must meet
state minimum net worth requirements as defined in applicable state
laws. The department shall adopt rules establishing the minimum net
worth requirements for contractors that are not regulated health
carriers. This subsection does not limit the authority of the
department to take action under a contract upon finding that a
contractor's financial status seriously jeopardizes the contractor's
ability to meet its contract obligations.
(f) Procedures for resolution of disputes between the department
and contract bidders or the department and contracting carriers related
to the award of, or failure to award, a managed care contract must be
clearly set out in the procurement document. In designing such
procedures, the department shall give strong consideration to the
negotiation and dispute resolution processes used by the Washington
state health care authority in its managed health care contracting
activities.
(6) The department may apply the principles set forth in subsection
(5) of this section to its managed health care purchasing efforts on
behalf of clients receiving supplemental security income benefits to
the extent appropriate.
(7) To minimize data collection administrative costs, requests for
any data from managed health care systems may not include data elements
already produced or maintained by the department or another state
agency. Specific requirements for auditing managed health care systems
shall be developed in rule by the department and allow managed health
care systems sufficient time to comply with new requirements prior to
conducting an audit. The timing of on-site audits of managed health
care systems shall be coordinated among state agencies and with
national managed care accreditation organization reviews.
(8) A managed health care system's compliance with standards
adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations, through
accreditation or through utilizing the services of an accredited
entity, such as the national committee on quality assurance, American
accreditation healthcare commission, or other accreditation entity
acceptable to the department, shall be considered as fully meeting the
requirements of the department for the subject areas covered under the
accreditation program that are also required by the department. The
managed health care system shall not be subject to additional
requirements by the department or separate compliance auditing on the
part of the department. If federal law limits the ability of the
department to fully implement the requirement under this subsection or
subsection (7) of this section, the department shall implement the
requirement to the maximum extent allowed under federal law. The
department shall actively seek amendment to its state plan if necessary
to comply with this subsection or subsection (7) of this section.

--- END ---