BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A well-trained construction trades work
force is critical to the ability of the state of Washington and its
political subdivisions to construct public works. Studies of the
state's work force highlight population trends that, without a
concerted effort to offset them, will lead to an inadequate supply of
skilled workers in the construction industry. State and local
governments regularly construct public works. The efficient and
economical construction of public works projects will be harmed if
there is not an ample supply of trained construction workers.
Apprenticeship training programs are particularly effective in
providing training and experience to individuals seeking to enter or
advance in the work force. By providing for apprenticeship utilization
on public works projects, state and local government can provide
training and experience that will help assure that a trained work force
will be available in sufficient numbers in the future for the
construction of public works.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 1 through 3 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Apprentice" means an apprentice enrolled in a state-approved
apprenticeship training program.
(2) "Apprentice utilization requirement" means the requirement that
the appropriate percentage of labor hours within each separate craft or
trade be performed by apprentices of that craft or trade.
(3) "Labor hours" means the total hours of workers receiving an
hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the public works
project. "Labor hours" includes hours performed by workers employed by
the contractor and all subcontractors working on the project. "Labor
hours" does not include hours worked by foremen, superintendents,
owners, and workers who are not subject to prevailing wage
requirements.
(4) "Public works" includes those projects encompassed by RCW
39.04.010 and 39.04.260.
(5) "State-approved apprenticeship training program" means an
apprenticeship training program approved by the Washington state
apprenticeship council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) From July 1, 2003, through December 31,
2003, for all public works estimated to cost two million dollars or
more, all specifications shall require that no less than ten percent of
the labor hours within each trade be performed by apprentices of that
trade.
(2) From January 1, 2004, through December 31, 2004, for all public
works estimated to cost two million dollars or more, all specifications
shall require that no less than twelve percent of the labor hours
within each trade be performed by apprentices of that trade.
(3) From January 1, 2005, and thereafter, for all public works
estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications shall
require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours within
each trade be performed by apprentices of that trade.
(4) Work shall not be divided among contractors or subcontractors
in order to evade the requirements of this section. Where two or more
contractors or subcontractors perform work within a trade, all such
contractors or subcontractors shall comply with the requirements of
this section.
(5) All contractors and subcontractors subject to this section
shall provide payroll reports on at least a monthly basis to the
awarding agency or political subdivision awarding the work, certifying
the names of all workers performing labor hours, their trade, hours
worked, and designation as journey level worker or apprentice.
(6) The awarding agency or political subdivision may adjust the
requirements of this section for a specific project for the following
reasons:
(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in
specific geographic areas;
(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor
hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of
apprentice participation; or
(c) Other criteria the awarding agency director deems appropriate,
which is subject to prior review and approval by the apprenticeship
program manager of the department of labor and industries.
(7) The failure by a contractor to comply with the apprentice
utilization requirement shall be deemed a breach of contract for which
the state or the municipality is entitled to all remedies allowed by
law and under the contract. Failure to comply with the apprentice
utilization requirement may be considered evidence bearing on a
contractor's qualification for award of future contracts.
(8) This section does not apply to agencies and political
subdivisions that adopt requirements for apprenticeship utilization on
public works projects that equal or exceed those set forth in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 39.04 RCW.

--- END ---