BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.010 and 1981 c 293 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the process by which land is divided is
a matter of state concern and should be administered in a uniform
manner by cities, towns, and counties throughout the state. The
purpose of this chapter is to regulate the subdivision of land and to
promote the public health, safety and general welfare in accordance
with standards established by the state to prevent the overcrowding of
land; to lessen congestion in the streets and highways; to promote
effective use of land; to promote safe and convenient travel by the
public on streets and highways; to provide for adequate light and air;
to facilitate adequate provision for water, sewerage, parks and
recreation areas, sites for schools and schoolgrounds and other public
requirements; to provide for proper ingress and egress; to provide for
the expeditious review and approval of proposed subdivisions which
conform to zoning standards and local plans and policies; to adequately
provide for the housing and commercial needs of the citizens of the
state; and to require uniform monumenting of land subdivisions and
conveyancing by accurate legal description. In order to ensure a
statewide system of land division, the legislature intends to occupy
the field and preempt local ordinances that conflict with, or fail to
effectuate, the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 58.17 RCW
to read as follows:
After a preliminary plat of a subdivision has been approved under
this chapter, the approval may not be revoked during the period prior
to submission and approval or disapproval of the final plat, unless the
revocation is found by the legislative body of the county, city, or
town, by ordinance or resolution, to be necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety.

--- END ---