BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall study how housing in Washington is subsidized,
including but not limited to housing development and the use of low-income rent vouchers, and how other states, demographically similar to
Washington, subsidize housing. This report must include information
regarding the use of federal, state, and local moneys to subsidize
housing. This report is due no later than January 15, 2004, and must
include recommendations the state may use to implement innovative
programs that involve private and public entities.

--- END ---