BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.157.010 and 1997 c 369 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter and RCW 28A.525.166, 28B.80.330,
28C.18.080, 43.21A.350, 47.06.030, and 90.58.100 and (([an])) an
industrial project of statewide significance is a border crossing
project that involves both private and public investments carried out
in conjunction with adjacent states or provinces or a private
industrial development with private capital investment in manufacturing
or research and development. To qualify as an industrial project of
statewide significance((,)): (a) The project must be completed after
January 1, 1997((,)); (b) the applicant must submit an application for
designation as an industrial project of statewide significance to the
department of community, trade, and economic development; and (c) the
project must have:
(((a))) (i) In counties with a population of less than or equal to
twenty thousand, a capital investment of twenty million dollars;
(((b))) (ii) In counties with a population of greater than twenty
thousand but no more than fifty thousand, a capital investment of fifty
million dollars;
(((c))) (iii) In counties with a population of greater than fifty
thousand but no more than one hundred thousand, a capital investment of
one hundred million dollars;
(((d))) (iv) In counties with a population of greater than one
hundred thousand but no more than two hundred thousand, a capital
investment of two hundred million dollars;
(((e))) (v) In counties with a population of greater than two
hundred thousand but no more than four hundred thousand, a capital
investment of four hundred million dollars;
(((f))) (vi) In counties with a population of greater than four
hundred thousand but no more than one million, a capital investment of
six hundred million dollars;
(((g))) (vii) In counties with a population of greater than one
million, a capital investment of one billion dollars; ((or
(h))) (viii) In counties with fewer than one hundred persons per
square mile as determined annually by the office of financial
management and published by the department of revenue effective for the
period July 1st through June 30th, projected full-time employment
positions after completion of construction of fifty or greater;
(ix) In counties with one hundred or more persons per square mile
as determined annually by the office of financial management and
published by the department of revenue effective for the period July
1st through June 30th, projected full-time employment positions after
completion of construction of one hundred or greater; or
(x) Been designated by the director of community, trade, and
economic development as an industrial project of statewide significance
either: (((i))) (A) Because the county in which the project is to be
located is a distressed county and the economic circumstances of the
county merit the additional assistance such designation will bring; or
(((ii))) (B) because the impact on a region due to the size and
complexity of the project merits such designation.
(2) The term manufacturing shall have the meaning assigned it in
RCW 82.61.010.
(3) The term research and development shall have the meaning
assigned it in RCW 82.61.010.
(4) The term applicant means a person applying to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for designation of a
development project as an industrial project of statewide significance.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.157.020 and 1997 c 369 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Counties and cities ((planning under the planning enabling act,
chapter 36.70 RCW, or the requirements of the growth management act,
chapter 36.70A RCW, shall include a process, to be followed at their
discretion for any specific project,)) with projects designated as
industrial projects of statewide significance within their
jurisdictions shall enter into an agreement with the office of permit
assistance and the project managers of industrial projects of statewide
significance for expediting the completion of industrial projects of
statewide significance. The agreement shall require:
(1) Expedited permit processing for the design and construction of
the project;
(2) Expedited environmental review processing;
(3) Expedited processing of requests for street, right of way, or
easement vacations necessary for the construction of the project; and
(4) Such other items as are deemed necessary by the office of
permit assistance for the design and construction of the project.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.157.030 and 1997 c 369 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall:
(a) Develop an application for designation of development projects
as industrial projects of statewide significance. The application must
be accompanied by a letter of approval from the legislative authority
of any jurisdiction that will have the proposed industrial project of
statewide significance within its boundaries. No designation of a
project as an industrial project of statewide significance shall be
made without such letter of approval. The letter of approval must
state that the jurisdiction joins in the request for the designation of
the project as one of statewide significance and has or will hire the
professional staff that will be required to expedite the processes
necessary to the completion of an industrial project of statewide
significance. The application shall contain information regarding the
location of the project, the applicant's average employment in the
state for the prior year, estimated new employment related to the
project, estimated wages of employees related to the project, estimated
time schedules for completion and operation, and other information
required by the department; and
(b) Certify that the project meets or will meet the requirements of
RCW 43.157.010 regarding designation as an industrial project of
statewide significance.
(2) The office of permit assistance shall assign ((an ombudsman))
a project facilitator or coordinator to each industrial project of
statewide significance((. The ombudsman shall be responsible for
assembling)) to: (a) Assist in the scoping and coordinating functions
provided for in chapter 43.42 RCW; (b) assemble a team of state and
local government and private officials to help meet the planning,
permitting, and development needs of each project((. The ombudsman
shall strive to include in the teams)), which team shall include those
responsible for planning, permitting and licensing, infrastructure
development, work force development services including higher
education, transportation services, and the provision of utilities((.
The ombudsman shall encourage)); and (c) work with each team member to
expedite their actions in furtherance of the project.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.42.050 and 2002 c 153 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the request of a project applicant, the office shall assist the
project applicant in determining what regulatory requirements,
processes, and permits apply to the project, as provided in this
section.
(1) The office shall assign a project facilitator who shall discuss
applicable regulatory requirements, permits, and processes with the
project applicant and explain the available options for obtaining
required permits.
(2) If the project applicant and the project facilitator agree that
the project would benefit from a project scoping, or if the project is
an industrial project of statewide significance, as defined in RCW
43.157.010, the project facilitator shall conduct a project scoping by
the project applicant and the relevant state and local permit agencies.
The project facilitator shall invite the participation of the relevant
federal permit agencies and tribal governments.
(a) The purpose of the project scoping is to identify the issues
and information needs of the project applicant and the participating
permit agencies regarding the project, share perspectives, and jointly
develop a strategy for the processing of required permits by each
participating permit agency.
(b) The scoping shall address:
(i) The permits that are required for the project;
(ii) The permit application forms and other application
requirements of the participating permit agencies;
(iii) The specific information needs and issues of concern of each
participant and their significance;
(iv) Any statutory or regulatory conflicts that might arise from
the differing authorities and roles of the permit agencies;
(v) Any natural resources, including federal or state listed
species, that might be adversely affected by the project and might
cause an alteration of the project or require mitigation; and
(vi) The anticipated time required for permit decisions by each
participating permit agency, including the time required to determine
if the permit application is complete, to conduct environmental review,
and to review and process the application. In determining the time
required, full consideration must be given to achieving the greatest
possible efficiencies through any concurrent studies and any
consolidated applications, hearings, and comment periods.
(c) The outcome of the project scoping shall be documented in
writing, furnished to the project applicant, and be made available to
the public.
(d) The project scoping shall be completed within sixty days of the
project applicant's request for a project scoping.
(e) Upon completion of the project scoping, the participating
permit agencies shall proceed under their respective authority. The
agencies are encouraged to remain in communication for purposes of
coordination until their final permit decisions are made.
(3) This section does not create an independent cause of action,
affect any existing cause of action, or establish time limits for
purposes of RCW 64.40.020.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.42.060 and 2002 c 153 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office may coordinate the processing by participating
permit agencies of permits required for a project, at the request of
the project applicant through a cost reimbursement agreement as
provided in subsection (3) of this section or with the agreement of the
project applicant as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(2) The office shall assign a project coordinator to perform any or
all of the following functions, as specified by the terms of a cost
reimbursement agreement under subsection (3) of this section or an
agreement under subsection (4) of this section:
(a) Serve as the main point of contact for the project applicant;
(b) Conduct a project scoping as provided in RCW 43.42.050(2);
(c) Verify that the project applicant has all the information
needed to complete applications;
(d) Coordinate the permit processes of the permit agencies;
(e) Manage the applicable administrative procedures;
(f) Work to assure that timely permit decisions are made by the
permit agencies and maintain contact with the project applicant and the
permit agencies to ensure adherence to schedules;
(g) Assist in resolving any conflict or inconsistency among permit
requirements and conditions; and
(h) Coordinate with relevant federal permit agencies and tribal
governments to the extent possible.
(3) At the request of a project applicant and as provided in RCW
43.42.070, the project coordinator shall coordinate negotiations among
the project applicant, the office, and participating permit agencies to
enter into a cost reimbursement agreement and shall coordinate
implementation of the agreement, which shall govern coordination of
permit processing by the participating permit agencies.
(4) ((The office may determine)) For industrial projects of
statewide significance or if the office determines that it is in the
public interest to coordinate the processing of permits for certain
projects that are complex in scope, require multiple permits, involve
multiple jurisdictions, or involve a significant number of affected
parties((. Upon such a determination, the office may)), the office
shall, upon the applicant's request, enter into an agreement with the
project applicant and the participating permit agencies to coordinate
the processing of permits for the project. The office may limit the
number of such agreements according to the resources available to the
office and the permit agencies at the time.

--- END ---