BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.14.070 and 1992 c 143 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon receipt of the petition and after a showing of reasonable
proof to the court that harassment has occurred, the court shall order
a hearing which shall be held not later than fourteen days from the
date of the order. Except as provided in RCW 10.14.085, personal
service shall be made upon the respondent not less than five court days
before the hearing. If timely personal service cannot be made, the
court shall set a new hearing date and shall either require additional
attempts at obtaining personal service or permit service by publication
as provided by RCW 10.14.085. If the court permits service by
publication, the court shall set the hearing date not later than
twenty-four days from the date of the order. The court may issue an ex
parte order for protection pending the hearing as provided in RCW
10.14.080 and 10.14.085.

--- END ---