BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
public interest that prior to the fluoridation of a group A water
system as defined in RCW 70.119.020, the customers of the water system
or the elected local water system governing body or operator directly
responsible to the department of health for utility operations should
make the final decision on the addition of fluoride to the water
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The addition of fluoridation compounds to water provided by a group
A water system as defined in RCW 70.119.020 not adding fluoridation
compounds as of the effective date of this act shall be permitted only
upon an affirmative vote of:
(1) The water system's customers; or
(2) The water system's elected local governing body or operator
directly responsible to the department for utility operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---