BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.29.025 and 2000 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
The contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions
under RCW 50.24.010 shall be determined under this section.
(1) A fund balance ratio shall be determined by dividing the
balance in the unemployment compensation fund as of the September 30th
immediately preceding the rate year by the total remuneration paid by
all employers subject to contributions during the second calendar year
preceding the rate year and reported to the department by the following
March 31st. The division shall be carried to the fourth decimal place
with the remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund balance
ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.
(2) The interval of the fund balance ratio, expressed as a
percentage, shall determine which tax schedule in subsection (5) of
this section shall be in effect for assigning tax rates for the rate
year. The intervals for determining the effective tax schedule shall
be:

Interval of the
Fund Balance Ratio
Expressed as a Percentage
Effective
Tax Schedule

2.90 and above AA

2.10 to 2.89 A

1.70 to 2.09 B

1.40 to 1.69 C

1.00 to 1.39 D

0.70 to 0.99 E

Less than 0.70 F

(3) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (a) Identification number; (b) benefit ratio; (c)
taxable payrolls for the four calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date and reported to the department by the cut-off
date; (d) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls consisting of the
employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all other
employers preceding him or her in the array; and (e) the percentage
equivalent of the cumulative total of taxable payrolls.
(4) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of twenty
rate classes according to the percentage intervals of cumulative
taxable payrolls set forth in subsection (5) of this section:
PROVIDED, That if an employer's taxable payroll falls within two or
more rate classes, the employer and any other employer with the same
benefit ratio shall be assigned to the lowest rate class which includes
any portion of the employer's taxable payroll.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the contribution rate for
each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the following
tables for the rate class to which he or she has been assigned, as
determined under subsection (4) of this section, within the tax
schedule which is to be in effect during the rate year:

Percent of
Cumulative
Taxable Payrolls
Schedules of Contributions Rates
for Effective Tax Schedule

From
To
Rate
Class
AA
A
B
C
D
E
F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 ((3.69))
3.42 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.07 4.27 4.57 4.97 5.07 5.17 5.37

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40

(6) The contribution rate for each employer not qualified to be in
the array shall be as follows:
(a) Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be
assigned a contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class
20 for the applicable rate year, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30 of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to a
contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 20 for the
applicable rate year; and
(b) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the
contribution rate shall be a rate equal to the average industry rate as
determined by the commissioner; however, the rate may not be less than
one percent. Assignment of employers by the commissioner to industrial
classification, for purposes of this section, shall be in accordance
with established classification practices found in the "Standard
Industrial Classification Manual" issued by the federal office of
management and budget to the third digit provided in the standard
industrial classification code, or in the North American industry
classification system code.

--- END ---