BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many businesses
in the state are frustrated by the complexity of the regulatory system.
The Washington Administrative Code containing agency rules now fills
twelve volumes, and appears to be growing each year. While the vast
majority of businesses make a good faith attempt to comply with
applicable laws and rules, many find it extremely difficult to keep up
with agencies' issuance of new rules and requirements. Therefore,
state agencies are directed to make a good faith attempt to notify
businesses affected by rule changes that may subject noncomplying
businesses to penalties.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.220 and 1994 c 249 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to other rule-making requirements imposed by law:
(a) Each agency may adopt rules governing the formal and informal
procedures prescribed or authorized by this chapter and rules of
practice before the agency, together with forms and instructions. If
an agency has not adopted procedural rules under this section, the
model rules adopted by the chief administrative law judge under RCW
34.05.250 govern procedures before the agency.
(b) To assist interested persons dealing with it, each agency shall
adopt as a rule a description of its organization, stating the general
course and method of its operations and the methods whereby the public
may obtain information and make submissions or requests. No person may
be required to comply with agency procedure not adopted as a rule as
herein required.
(2) To the extent not prohibited by federal law or regulation, nor
prohibited for reasons of confidentiality by state law, each agency
shall keep on file for public inspection all final orders, decisions,
and opinions in adjudicative proceedings, interpretive statements,
policy statements, and any digest or index to those orders, decisions,
opinions, or statements prepared by or for the agency.
(3) No agency order, decision, or opinion is valid or effective
against any person, nor may it be invoked by the agency for any
purpose, unless it is available for public inspection. This subsection
is not applicable in favor of any person who has actual knowledge of
the order, decision, or opinion. The agency has the burden of proving
that knowledge, but may meet that burden by proving that the person has
been properly served with a copy of the order.
(4) Each agency that is authorized by law to exercise discretion in
deciding individual cases is encouraged to formalize the general
principles that may evolve from these decisions by adopting the
principles as rules that the agency will follow until they are amended
or repealed.
(5) To the extent practicable, any rule proposed or adopted by an
agency should be clearly and simply stated, so that it can be
understood by those required to comply.
(6) The departments of employment security, labor and industries,
ecology, and revenue shall develop and use a notification process to
communicate information to the public regarding the postadoption notice
required by section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new
section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Either before or within two hundred days after the effective date
of an adopted rule that imposes additional requirements on businesses
the violation of which subjects the business to a penalty, assessment,
or administrative sanction, an agency identified in RCW 34.05.220(6)
shall notify businesses affected by the rule of the requirements of the
rule and how to obtain technical assistance to comply. Notification
must be provided by e-mail, if possible, to every person identified to
receive the postadoption notice under RCW 34.05.220(6).
The notification must announce the rule change, briefly summarize
the rule change, refer to appeal procedures under RCW 34.05.330, and
include a contact for more information. Failure to notify a specific
business under this section does not invalidate a rule or waive the
requirement to comply with the rule. The requirements of this section
do not apply to emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350.

Sec. 4 RCW 34.05.312 and 1993 c 202 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each agency shall designate a rules coordinator, who shall have
knowledge of the subjects of rules being proposed or prepared within
the agency for proposal, maintain the records of any such action, and
respond to public inquiries about possible ((or)), proposed, or adopted
rules and the identity of agency personnel working, reviewing, or
commenting on them. The office and mailing address of the rules
coordinator shall be published in the state register at the time of
designation and in the first issue of each calendar year thereafter for
the duration of the designation. The rules coordinator may be an
employee of another agency.

--- END ---