BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Until January 1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of his
or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a
rate of not less than four dollars and ninety cents per hour.
(2) Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and
seventy cents per hour.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than six dollars and
fifty cents per hour.
(4)(a) Except as provided under (c) of this subsection, beginning
on January 1, 2001, and each following January 1st as set forth under
(b) of this subsection, every employer shall pay to each of his or her
employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of
not less than the amount established under (b) of this subsection.
(b) On September 30, 2000, and on each following September 30th,
the department of labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted
minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by increasing
the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The
adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent
using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to
each September 1st as calculated by the United States department of
labor. Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this
subsection (4)(b) takes effect on the following January 1st.
(c) On September 30, 2003, and on each following September 30th,
the department of labor and industries shall establish an adjusted
minimum tipped wage rate that is equal to fifty percent of the adjusted
minimum wage rate calculated under (b) of this subsection, but no less
than seven dollars and one cent per hour. Each adjusted minimum tipped
wage rate established under this subsection (4)(c) takes effect on the
following January 1st. Employers certified under section 2 of this act
shall pay to each of his or her directly tipped employees wages at a
rate of not less than the amount established under this subsection
(4)(c).
(5) The director shall by regulation establish the minimum wage for
employees under the age of eighteen years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of labor and industries shall establish a process
for certifying employers of directly tipped employees as eligible to
pay the adjusted minimum tipped wage rate established under RCW
49.46.020(4)(c). To apply for certification, employers shall submit a
fifty dollar annual fee and report the total tips of directly tipped
employees reported to the internal revenue service for the previous
year and the total hours worked by directly tipped employees during the
previous year. If the total tips of directly tipped employees divided
by the total hours worked by directly tipped employees is more than the
current adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under RCW
49.46.020(4)(b), the department shall certify the employer as eligible
to pay the adjusted minimum tipped wage rate.
As used in this section, "directly tipped employee" means an
employee who customarily and regularly receives gratuities directly
from the customer in recognition of a service performed and who is
employed by an employer with a standard industry code of 58, 70, or 79
or a North American industry code of 713, 721, or 722.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---