BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.130 and 2002 c 56 s 113 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The district may borrow money, but may not issue any debt of its
own for more than two years' duration. A district may issue notes or
other evidences of indebtedness with a maturity of not more than two
years. A district may, when authorized by the plan, enter into
agreements with the state or lead agencies to pledge taxes or other
revenues of the district for the purpose of paying in part or whole
principal and interest on bonds issued by the lead agency. The
contracts pledging revenues and taxes are binding for the term of the
agreement, but not to exceed twenty-five years, and no tax pledged by
an agreement may be eliminated or modified if it would impair the
pledge of the agreement.))
(1)(a) Notwithstanding RCW 39.36.020(1), the district may at any
time contract indebtedness or borrow money for district purposes and
may issue general obligation bonds or other evidences of indebtedness,
secured by the pledge of one or more of the taxes, tolls, charges, or
fees authorized to be imposed by the district, in an amount not
exceeding, together with any existing indebtedness of the district not
authorized by the voters, one and one-half percent of the value of the
taxable property within the boundaries of the district.
(b) With the assent of three-fifths of the voters voting at an
election, a district may contract indebtedness or borrow money for
district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds or other
evidences of indebtedness as long as the total indebtedness of the
district does not exceed five percent of the value of the taxable
property within the district, including indebtedness authorized under
(a) of this subsection. The bonds shall be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.
(2) The district may at any time issue revenue bonds or other
evidences of indebtedness, secured by the pledge of one or more of the
revenues authorized to be collected by the district, to provide funds
to carry out its authorized functions without submitting the matter to
the voters of the district. These obligations shall be issued and sold
in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.
(3) The district may enter into agreements with the lead agencies
or the state of Washington, when authorized by the plan, to pledge
taxes or other revenues of the district for the purpose of paying in
part or whole principal and interest on bonds issued by the lead agency
or the state of Washington. The agreements pledging revenues and taxes
shall be binding for their terms, but not to exceed thirty years, and
no tax pledged by an agreement may be eliminated or modified if it
would impair the pledge made in any agreement.
(4) Once construction of projects in the plan has been completed,
revenues collected by the district may only be used for the following
purposes: (a) Payment of principal and interest on outstanding
indebtedness of the district; (b) to make payments required under a
pledging agreement; and (c) to make payments for maintenance and
operations of toll facilities as may be required by toll bond
covenants.

--- END ---