BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that young people
need to:
(a) Fully appreciate the nature of liberty and the ideas that laid
the foundation for the rights, privileges, and quality of life we enjoy
today as United States citizens;
(b) Clearly understand the duties inherent in responsible
citizenship including the obligation to become meaningfully informed
and to participate actively in the electoral process; and
(c) Read, discuss, and understand the Declaration of Independence,
the Constitution of the United States, and the Constitution of the
state of Washington as representative of the basic values upon which
this nation and state were founded.
(2) The legislature further finds that:
(a) The Bill of Rights secures our freedom to speak, print, read,
assemble, pray, petition the government, and keep and bear arms;
protects us from unreasonable arrests, searches, excessive bail, double
jeopardy, coerced confessions, and cruel and unusual punishment; and
secures our rights to due process, jury trials, and counsel, and to
present defense witnesses;
(b) The Bill of Rights is integral to the American way of life.
America's civic holidays, President's Day, Independence Day, Labor Day,
Veterans' Day, and Memorial Day all remind us of the special
contributions and sacrifices made by our forefathers and leaders to
preserve, protect, and extend our freedoms; and
(c) The rights and freedoms guaranteed by the Bill of Rights
deserve perennial celebrations, and the sacrifices made to protect the
Bill of Rights deserve eternal remembrance.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.170 and 1985 c 341 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The thorough study and demonstrated knowledge and understanding
of the Declaration of Independence, the Constitution of the United
States ((and)) including the Bill of Rights, the Constitution of the
state of Washington, and other foundational historical documents of
importance to United States citizens that embody the fundamental
principles of our freedoms and liberties shall be a condition
prerequisite to graduation from the public and private high schools of
this state. The state board of education acting upon the advice of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide by rule ((or
regulation)) for the implementation of this section.
(2) Every school district shall ensure that each year on or around
December 15th students in kindergarten through grade twelve shall
receive at least one school day of instruction in the Declaration of
Independence and the United States Constitution including the Bill of
Rights. On the Bill of Rights Day, December 15th, or the first school
day following Bill of Rights Day, the Bill of Rights shall be read
aloud, in its entirety, in all public schools in the state of
Washington.
(3) Students shall be encouraged to memorize the preamble of the
United States Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
The word "study" in RCW 28A.230.170 includes:
(1) Illustrating, by teacher instruction, how the Declaration of
Independence provided the outline for both the United States
Constitution and the Washington state Constitution;
(2) Relating sections of the Washington state Constitution to
statements made in the Declaration of Independence and the United
States Constitution;
(3) Teaching the heritage and meaning of this statement from the
Declaration of Independence: "We hold these truths to be self-evident,
that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their creator
with certain unalienable rights, that among these are Life, Liberty,
and the pursuit of Happiness. That to secure these rights, governments
are instituted among men, deriving their just powers from the consent
of the governed."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) December 15th is established as the "Bill of Rights Day" to
provide an opportunity for students and school employees to reflect
upon the meaning, importance, and uniqueness of this document.
(2) Local school boards are responsible for providing books that
explain the meaning and substance of the Declaration of Independence,
and the constitutions of the United States and the state of Washington.
(3) Every school district shall display the Declaration of
Independence, the United States Constitution, and the Washington state
Constitution.

--- END ---