BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many workers do
not have access to an employment-based retirement plan. Workers who
are unable to build up pensions and savings risk living on low incomes
in their old age and are more likely to become dependent on state
services. The Washington voluntary accounts program will provide a
simple and inexpensive way for workers to save for retirement and
employers to offer an employee benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Program" means the Washington voluntary accounts program
created under section 3 of this act.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of retirement
systems.
(3) "Participating employee" means any workers in this state that
choose to participate in the program.
(4) "Participating employer" means any private employer, with a
place of business in this state, and with employees that have chosen to
participate in the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington voluntary accounts program is
created. The director may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
chapter. Sections 4 and 5 of this act may not be implemented until any
approvals from federal agencies that may be necessary, including the
favorable tax treatment of the plan, have been granted, and appropriate
funds for start-up costs of the program have been identified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Private employers shall cooperate with
the department in providing employees with the opportunity to
participate in the Washington voluntary accounts program, including
payroll deductions to those employees who elect to contribute to
individual retirement accounts. Each participating employer is
authorized to contract with a participating employee to defer a portion
of that employee's income, in accordance with the internal revenue
service code or other relevant federal regulations.
(2) Participating employees shall self-direct the investment of the
deferred portion of their income through the selection of investment
options as set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The director may provide those individual retirement account
plans determined to be in the interests of participating employees. In
addition to the types of investments described in this section, the
state investment board, with respect to the program, shall invest the
deferred portion of participating employees' income, without limitation
as to amount, in accordance with RCW 43.84.150, 43.33A.140, and
41.50.780, and pursuant to investment policy established by the state
investment board for the program. The state investment board shall
provide a set of options for participants to choose from for investment
of the deferred portion of their income.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The director may also provide plans,
including 401(k) and savings incentive match plan for employees
individual retirement account plans, the employers may elect to
participate in for the benefit of their employees. However, this
section and section 4 of this act do not require private employers to
provide these plans for their employees. Those employers that elect to
participate in the plans are responsible for complying with any
applicable federal regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The Washington voluntary accounts
program principal account is created in the state treasury.
(2) The amount of compensation deferred by participating employees
under agreements entered into under sections 3 and 4 of this act shall
be paid into the Washington voluntary accounts program principal
account and shall be sufficient to cover costs of administration and
staffing in addition to such other amounts as determined by the
director. The account shall be used to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.
(3) All moneys in the Washington voluntary accounts program
principal account and the Washington voluntary accounts program
administrative account, all property and rights purchased therewith,
and all income attributable thereto, shall be held in trust by the
state investment board, as set forth under RCW 43.33A.030, for the
exclusive benefit of the Washington voluntary accounts program
participants and their beneficiaries. Neither the employee
participant, nor the employee participant's beneficiary or
beneficiaries, nor any other designee, has any right to commute, sell,
assign, transfer, or otherwise convey the right to receive any payments
under the program. These payments and rights are nonassignable and
nontransferable. Unpaid accumulated deferrals are not subject to
attachment, garnishment, or execution and are not transferable by
operation of law in event of bankruptcy or insolvency, except to the
extent otherwise required by law.
(4) The state investment board has the full power to invest moneys
in the Washington voluntary accounts program principal account and the
Washington voluntary accounts program administrative account in
accordance with RCW 43.84.150, 43.33A.140, and 41.50.770, and
cumulative investment directions received under this chapter. All
investment and operating costs of the state investment board associated
with the investment of the program assets shall be paid under RCW
43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses, one
hundred percent of all earnings from these investments shall accrue
directly to the Washington voluntary accounts program principal
account.
(5)(a) No state board, commission, or agency, or any officer,
employee, or member is liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from
participant investments selected under this chapter.
(b) The state investment board, or any officer, employee, or member
is not liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from reasonable
efforts to implement investment directions under this chapter.
(6) The Washington voluntary accounts program administrative
account is created in the state treasury. All expenses of the
department pertaining to the Washington voluntary accounts program
including staffing and administrative expenses shall be paid out of the
Washington voluntary accounts program administrative account. Any
excess balances credited to this account over administrative expenses
disbursed from this account shall be transferred to the Washington
voluntary accounts program principal account at such time and in such
amounts as may be determined by the director with the approval of the
director of financial management. Any deficiency in the Washington
voluntary accounts program administrative account caused by an excess
of administrative expenses disbursed from this account shall be
transferred to this account from the Washington voluntary accounts
program principal account.
(7)(a)(i) The director shall keep or cause to be kept full and
adequate accounts and records of the assets of each individual
participant, obligations, transactions, and affairs of the program.
The department shall account for and report on the investment of
program assets or may enter into an agreement with the state investment
board for accounting and reporting.
(ii) The director's duties related to individual participant
accounts include conducting the activities of trade instruction,
settlement activities, and direction of cash movement and related wire
transfers with the custodian bank and outside investment firms.
(iii) The director has sole responsibility for contracting with any
recordkeepers for individual participant accounts and shall manage the
performance of recordkeepers under those contracts.
(b)(i) The director's duties under (a)(ii) of this subsection do
not limit the authority of the state investment board to conduct its
responsibilities for asset management and balancing of program funds.
(ii) The state investment board has sole responsibility for
contracting with outside investment firms to provide investment
management for program funds and shall manage the performance of
investment managers under those contracts.
(c) The state treasurer shall designate and define the terms of
engagement for the custodial banks.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.84.092 and 2002 c 242 s 2, 2002 c 114 s 24, and
2002 c 56 s 402 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
regional transportation investment district account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the Washington voluntary accounts program
administrative account, the Washington voluntary accounts program
principal account, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment
fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

--- END ---