BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that streamlining
state and local permit processes is essential to improving the business
climate of the state. The legislature further finds that such
streamlining needs to be accomplished while maintaining essential
environmental protections. It is the intent of the legislature that
state agencies set performance targets for issuing permits, that permit
consolidation allowed for transportation projects be expanded to other
programs requiring state permits, and that local governments be
provided with incentives for streamlining local permit processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to the following state permitting agencies
and to the following permits and approvals:
(a) Department of ecology:
(i) Air quality operating permits;
(ii) Air quality notices of construction;
(iii) Air quality prevention of significant deterioration permits;
(iv) Individual state wastewater discharge permits;
(v) Individual national wastewater discharge permits;
(vi) General wastewater discharge permits;
(vii) Water quality certifications under section 401 of the federal
water pollution control amendments;
(viii) Coastal zone management act consistency determinations;
(ix) Water withdrawal permits issued under chapters 90.03 and 90.44
RCW;
(x) Approvals of changes or transfers to water withdrawal permits
under chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW; and
(xi) Shoreline management act substantial development permits,
conditional use permits, and variances;
(b) Department of natural resources:
(i) Forest practices permits;
(ii) Mining reclamation permits; and
(iii) Silvicultural burning permits;
(c) Department of fish and wildlife hydraulic project approvals.
(2) State permitting agencies shall establish permit processing
performance objectives for the permits and approvals specified in this
section. The objectives shall address timelines for processing
applications and for providing responses to preapplication requests for
information or assistance. For each permit or approval the agency
shall consider adopting a goal of issuing a final decision on ninety
percent of applications filed in a calendar year within ninety days of
receipt by the agency of a complete application. The performance
objectives may be established considering the following and other
factors:
(a) Statutory timelines applicable to the permit or approval;
(b) Budgetary resources available;
(c) Applicable public notice, comment, and hearing requirements;
(d) Applicable federal requirements regarding permits or approvals
administered by the state under a federally delegated program;
(e) Coordinating permit processing with the review of other permit
applications for the same project or undertaking; and
(f) Requests made by permit applicants regarding extensions to
provide additional information or for other reasons.
(3) State permitting agencies by September 30, 2003, shall adopt a
schedule for establishing performance objectives for each permit or
approval specified in subsection (1) of this section by June 30, 2005.
The schedule shall place a priority for earlier adoption of performance
objectives for those permits having the greatest number of applications
and those typically requiring the greatest length of time to process a
final decision.
(4) State permitting agencies shall track the progress in meeting
the performance objectives established under subsection (2) of this
section. Beginning on or before December 31, 2004, each state
permitting agency shall prepare an annual summary of its performance in
processing applications for which performance objectives have been
established, for the preceding fiscal year. The summary shall be
posted on its web site and provided to the appropriate standing
committees of the senate and house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The departments of ecology, natural resources, and fish and
wildlife shall conduct a review of methods to improve the performance
of permit processing activities for those permits or approvals
specified in section 2(1) of this act. The methods may include but are
not limited to:
(1) Allowing the applicant to conduct studies, provide an initial
draft permit, or undertake other elements of processing the
application;
(2) Allowing funding to be provided by the applicant in addition to
applicable application fees, and in addition to the cost-reimbursement
authority under chapter 251, Laws of 2000;
(3) Delegation of elements of permit processing to a lead agency
for review of a project or undertaking or to another agency with
expertise or jurisdiction over the same project; and
(4) Providing detailed guidance to applicants on permit procedures,
required information, and the expectations and responsibilities of the
applicant and the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The environmental permit efficiency and accountability
committee is created. The committee shall consist of the following
voting members:
(a) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each of
the two largest caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(b) Two members of the senate, one from each of the two largest
caucuses, appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) A member representing the governor and the permit assistance
center in the office of the governor;
(d) One member designated by the fish and wildlife commission;
(e) One member designated by the director of ecology;
(f) One member designated by the association of Washington cities
to represent cities; and
(g) One member designated by the Washington state association of
counties, to represent counties.
(2) The voting members of the committee shall select additional
representatives of the following interests to participate as nonvoting
members of the committee:
(a) Large businesses;
(b) Small businesses;
(c) Environmental and citizen organizations that participate in
environmental permit proceedings;
(d) Contractors and engineers involved in the development of
projects requiring state and local environmental and land use permits;
and
(e) A representative of federal agencies with federal environmental
permit responsibilities.
(3) The governor shall designate his or her representative by
September 30, 2003, and such representative shall convene the initial
meeting of the committee by December 1, 2003. At such initial meeting
the voting members of the committee shall select a chair and shall
select the nonvoting members. The committee may consider any
nominations from individuals or associations representing the interests
described in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The committee may create technical subcommittees as needed.
(5) Nonvoting members will not be compensated but will receive
reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(6) The permit assistance center in the office of the governor
shall provide administrative and clerical assistance to the committee.
(7) The committee shall build upon the work of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee created by RCW
47.06C.030 in developing streamlined and one-stop permitting processes
that may be applicable to projects by businesses and others. The
committees shall coordinate their work to maximize opportunities to
transfer permit processing improvements developed under RCW 47.06C.040
to projects in addition to state transportation projects. The
committee shall develop and prioritize a list of permit streamlining
opportunities, specifically identifying substantive and procedural
duplications and recommendations for solving these duplications. The
committee shall evaluate current laws and rules and develop
recommendations for legislative, administrative, and budgetary measures
to achieve more timely and efficient processing of state and local
environmental and land use permits applicable to the siting and
operation of land use activities including industrial, commercial,
residential, infrastructure, and other development. The committee
shall provide a report that includes its analysis and recommendations
to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house
of representatives by December 31, 2004.
(8) This section expires June 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.70B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By June 30, 2004, each city and county is encouraged to adopt
procedures to establish the objective of making a final decision on a
project permit application within one hundred twenty days after the
local government has received a complete application. In determining
the number of days that have elapsed after the local government has
notified the applicant that the application is complete, the local
government may exclude:
(a) Any period during which the applicant is responding to a
request by the local government to correct plans, perform required
studies, or provide additional required information;
(b) Any period during which an environmental impact statement is
being prepared following a determination of significance under chapter
43.21C RCW;
(c) Any period for administrative appeals of project permits, if an
open record appeal hearing or a closed record appeal, or both, are
allowed. The local government by ordinance or resolution is encouraged
to establish a time period to consider and decide such appeals,
including extensions that all parties may agree upon; and
(d) Any extension of time mutually agreed upon by the applicant and
the local government.
(2) Each local government may determine that the time limits
established by subsection (1) of this section do not apply if a project
permit application:
(a) Requires an amendment to the local government comprehensive
land use plan or a development regulation;
(b) Requires approval of a new fully contained community as
provided in RCW 36.70A.350, a master planned resort as provided in RCW
36.70A.360, or the siting of an essential public facility as provided
in RCW 36.70A.200; or
(c) Is substantially revised by the applicant, in which case the
time period may start from the date at which the revised project
application is determined to be complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 64.40 RCW
to read as follows:
A local government is not liable for damages under this chapter due
to the local government's failure to make a final decision within the
time limits established by the local government under section 5 of this
act.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.160.200 and 1999 c 164 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The economic development account is created within the public
facilities construction loan revolving fund under RCW 43.160.080.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of RCW
43.160.010(5) and this section. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) Applications under this section for assistance from the
economic development account are subject to all of the applicable
criteria set forth under this chapter, as well as procedures and
criteria established by the board, except as otherwise provided.
(3) Eligible applicants under this section are limited to political
subdivisions of the state in rural natural resources impact areas and
rural counties.
(4) Applicants must demonstrate that their request is part of an
economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning
requirements. Applicants must demonstrate that tourism projects have
been approved by the local government. Industrial projects must be
approved by the local government and the associate development
organization.
(5) Publicly owned projects may be financed under this section upon
proof by the applicant that the public project is a necessary component
of, or constitutes in whole, a tourism project.
(6) Applications must demonstrate local match and participation.
Such match may include: Land donation, other public or private funds
or both, or other means of local commitment to the project.
(7) Board financing for project-specific environmental, capital
facilities, land use, permitting, feasibility(([,])), and marketing
studies and plans; project engineering, design, and site planning and
analysis; and project debt and revenue impact analysis shall not exceed
fifty thousand dollars per study. Board funds for these purposes may
be provided as a grant and require a match.
(8) Board financing for tourism projects shall not exceed two
hundred fifty thousand dollars. Other public facility construction
projects under this section shall not exceed one million dollars.
Loans with flexible terms and conditions to meet the needs of the
applicants shall be provided. Grants may also be authorized, but only
when, and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given
the limited resources of the political subdivision.
(9) The board shall develop guidelines for allowable local match
and planning and predevelopment activities.
(10) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to
be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the
economic development project assisted under this section.
(11) Applications under this section need not demonstrate evidence
that specific private development or expansion is ready to occur or
will occur if funds are provided.
(12) The board shall establish guidelines for providing financial
assistance under this section to ensure that the requirements of this
chapter are complied with. The guidelines shall include:
(a) A process to equitably compare and evaluate applications from
competing communities that includes a preference for applicants that
meet the permitting timelines established in section 5 of this act in
at least ninety percent of permit applications.
(b) Criteria to ensure that approved projects will have a high
probability of success and are likely to provide long-term economic
benefits to the community. The criteria shall include: (i) A minimum
amount of local participation, determined by the board per application,
to verify community support for the project; (ii) an analysis that
establishes the project is feasible using standard economic principles;
and (iii) an explanation from the applicant regarding how the project
is consistent with the communities' economic strategy and goals.
(c) A method of evaluating the impact of the financial assistance
on the economy of the community and whether the financial assistance
achieved its purpose.

--- END ---