BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.62.060 and 1992 c 62 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
Clerks of the district courts shall collect the following fees for
their official services:
(1) In any civil action commenced before or transferred to a
district court, the plaintiff shall, at the time of such commencement
or transfer, pay to such court a filing fee of thirty-one dollars plus
any surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035. No party shall be compelled
to pay to the court any other fees or charges up to and including the
rendition of judgment in the action other than those listed.
(2) For issuing a writ of garnishment or other writ a fee of six
dollars.
(3) For filing a supplemental proceeding a fee of twelve dollars.
(4) For demanding a jury in a civil case a fee of fifty dollars to
be paid by the person demanding a jury.
(5) For preparing a transcript of a judgment a fee of six dollars.
(6) For certifying any document on file or of record in the clerk's
office a fee of five dollars.
(7) For preparing the record of a case for appeal to superior court
a fee of forty dollars including any costs of tape duplication as
governed by the rules of appeal for courts of limited jurisdiction
(RALJ).
(8) For duplication of part or all of the electronic tape or tapes
of a proceeding ten dollars per tape.
(9) For revising or correcting a filing for which the filing fee
under subsection (1) of this section was imposed an additional fee of
fifteen dollars.
The fees or charges imposed under this section shall be allowed as
court costs whenever a judgment for costs is awarded.

Sec. 2 RCW 12.40.020 and 1990 c 172 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A small claims action shall be commenced by the plaintiff filing a
claim, in the form prescribed by RCW 12.40.050, in the small claims
department. A filing fee of ten dollars plus any surcharge authorized
by RCW 7.75.035 shall be paid when the claim is filed. An additional
fifteen dollar fee shall be paid if the filing is later revised or
corrected.

--- END ---