BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that Washington join as a
member state in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement referred to
in chapter 82.58 RCW. The agreement provides for a simpler and more
uniform sales and use tax structure among states that have sales and
use taxes. The intent of the legislature is to bring Washington's
sales and use tax system into compliance with the agreement so that
Washington may join as a member state and have a voice in the
development and administration of the system, and to substantially
reduce the burden of tax compliance on sellers.
(2) This act does not include changes to Washington law that may be
required in the future and that are not fully developed under the
agreement. These include, but are not limited to, changes relating to
online registration, reporting, and remitting of payments by businesses
for sales and use tax purposes, monetary allowances for sellers and
their agents, sourcing, and amnesty for businesses registering under
the agreement.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that the provisions of
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW be interpreted and applied consistently
with the agreement.
(4) The department of revenue shall report to the fiscal committees
of the legislature on January 1, 2004, and each January 1st thereafter,
on the development of the agreement and shall recommend changes to the
sales and use tax structure and propose legislation as may be necessary
to keep Washington in compliance with the agreement.

PART I--DEFINITIONS
Sec. 101 RCW 82.08.010 and 1985 c 38 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means
the total amount of consideration, ((whether money, credits, rights, or
other property except trade-in property of like kind, expressed in the
terms of money paid or delivered by a buyer to a seller without any
deduction on account of the cost of tangible property sold, the cost of
materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes
other than taxes imposed under this chapter if the seller advertises
the price as including the tax or that the seller is paying the tax, or
any other expenses whatsoever paid or accrued and without any deduction
on account of losses; but shall not include the amount of cash discount
actually taken by a buyer; and shall be subject to modification to the
extent modification is provided for in RCW 82.08.080.
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department of revenue may
prescribe)) except trade-in property of like kind, including cash,
credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal property or
services defined as a "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold,
leased, or rented, valued in money, whether received in money or
otherwise. No deduction from the total amount of consideration is
allowed for the following: (a) The seller's cost of the property sold;
(b) the cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest,
losses, all costs of transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on
the seller, and any other expense of the seller; (c) charges by the
seller for any services necessary to complete the sale, other than
delivery and installation charges; (d) delivery charges; (e)
installation charges; and (f) the value of exempt tangible personal
property given to the purchaser where taxable and exempt tangible
personal property have been bundled together and sold by the seller as
a single product or piece of merchandise.
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
"Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property or services, if the amount is
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed directly on the
consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser;
(2) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean the state and its departments
and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and
institutions;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at retail,"
"retail sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging
in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state"
and "within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter;
(6) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and
under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal
property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that
is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal
property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten
computer software.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.12.010 and 2002 c 367 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in
RCW 82.08.010.
(2)(a) "Value of the article used" shall ((mean the consideration,
whether money, credit, rights, or other property except trade-in
property of like kind, expressed in terms of money, paid or given or
contracted to be paid or given by the purchaser to the seller)) be the
purchase price for the article of tangible personal property, the use
of which is taxable under this chapter. ((The term includes the amount
of any freight, delivery, or other like transportation charge paid or
given by the purchaser to the seller with respect to the purchase of
such article.)) The term also includes, in addition to the
((consideration paid or given or contracted to be paid or given))
purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to
the importation of the article used. In case the article used is
acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured
by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of
the article used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department ((of revenue))
may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used shall be in an amount representing
a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined
as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places
of use of similar products of like quality and character under such
rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the
construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become
or are to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or
for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of such
articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used shall be an
amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles,
unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW
upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used shall be determined according to the value of the
ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used shall be determined by: (i) The
retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered
for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used shall be determined
by the ((retail selling)) purchase price((, as defined in RCW
82.08.010,)) of such article if, but for the use of the direct pay
permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax;
(((2))) (3) "Value of the service used" means the ((consideration,
whether money, credit, rights, or other property, expressed in terms of
money, paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by the purchaser
to the seller)) purchase price for the service, the use of which is
taxable under this chapter. If the service is received by gift or
under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true
value thereof, the value of the service used shall be determined as
nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of
use of similar services of like quality and character under rules the
department ((of revenue)) may prescribe;
(((3))) (4) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" shall have
their ordinary meaning, and shall mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or
control over the article of tangible personal property (as a consumer),
and include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage,
distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or
consumption within this state; and
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes
dominion or control over the article of tangible personal property upon
which the service was performed (as a consumer), and include
installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any
other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of the
article within this state;
(((4))) (5) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included
within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as
defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;
(((5))) (6) "Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW
82.08.010 and every person engaged in the business of selling tangible
personal property at retail and every person required to collect from
purchasers the tax imposed under this chapter;
(((6))) (7) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters
82.04 and 82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and
effect with respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this
chapter. "Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in
chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, shall also mean any
person who distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or
displayed, any article of tangible personal property, except
newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the sale of
products or services. With respect to property distributed to persons
within this state by a consumer as defined in this subsection (((6)))
(7), the use of the property shall be deemed to be by such consumer.

Sec. 103 RCW 82.04.040 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.040 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) "Sale" means any transfer of the ownership of, title to, or
possession of property for a valuable consideration and includes any
activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" under RCW
82.04.050. It includes ((renting or leasing)) lease or rental,
conditional sale contracts, ((leases with option to purchase,)) and any
contract under which possession of the property is given to the
purchaser but title is retained by the vendor as security for the
payment of the purchase price. It also includes the furnishing of
food, drink, or meals for compensation whether consumed upon the
premises or not.
(2) "Casual or isolated sale" means a sale made by a person who is
not engaged in the business of selling the type of property involved.
(3)(a) "Lease or rental" means any transfer of possession or
control of tangible personal property for a fixed or indeterminate term
for consideration. A lease or rental may include future options to
purchase or extend. "Lease or rental" includes transactions under
agreements covering motor vehicles and trailers where the amount of
consideration may be increased or decreased by reference to the amount
realized upon sale or disposition of the property as defined in 26
U.S.C. Sec. 7701(h)(1), as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.
The definition in this subsection (3) shall be used for sales and use
tax purposes regardless if a transaction is characterized as a lease or
rental under generally accepted accounting principles, the United
States internal revenue code, Washington state's commercial code, or
other provisions of federal, state, or local law.
(b) "Lease or rental" does not include:
(i) A transfer of possession or control of property under a
security agreement or deferred payment plan that requires the transfer
of title upon completion of the required payments;
(ii) A transfer of possession or control of party under an
agreement that requires the transfer of title upon completion of
required payments, and payment of an option price does not exceed the
greater of one hundred dollars or one percent of the total required
payments; or
(iii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A condition of this
exclusion is that the operator is necessary for the equipment to
perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (3)(b)(iii),
an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible
personal property.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.04.050 and 2002 c 178 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7) and 82.04.290.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of coin-operated laundry facilities
when such facilities are situated in an apartment house, rooming house,
or mobile home park for the exclusive use of the tenants thereof, and
also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and
all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term shall also include:
(i) The renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers ((and the rental of equipment with an operator)); and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the equipment to perform as
designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an operator
must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal
property.
(b) The term shall not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of telephone service,
as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of ((canned)) prewritten
computer software other than a sale to a person who presents a resale
certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but shall not include custom software or the
customization of ((canned)) prewritten computer software.
(7) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(8) The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(9) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.
(10) Until July 1, 2003, the term shall not include the sale of or
charge made for labor and services rendered for environmental remedial
action as defined in RCW 82.04.2635(2).

PART II--ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS
Sec. 201 RCW 82.14.050 and 2002 c 56 s 406 are each amended to
read as follows:
The counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW
82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57
RCW, and regional transportation investment districts shall contract,
prior to the effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a
sales and use tax, the administration and collection to the state
department of revenue, which shall deduct a percentage amount, as
provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected
for administration and collection expenses incurred by the department.
The remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that
is collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the
state department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account
hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local sales and
use tax account may be spent only for distribution to counties, cities,
transportation authorities, public facilities districts, and regional
transportation investment districts imposing a sales and use tax. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32
RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as
they are applicable to state sales and use taxes, be applicable to
taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter. Counties, cities,
transportation authorities, public facilities districts, and regional
transportation investment districts may not conduct independent sales
or use tax audits of sellers registered under the streamlined sales tax
agreement. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local sales and use tax account shall be
credited to the local sales and use tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities
districts, and regional transportation investment districts monthly.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.14.070 and 2000 c 104 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the intent of this chapter that any local sales and use tax
adopted pursuant to this chapter be ((as consistent and uniform as
possible with)) identical to the state sales and use tax, unless
otherwise prohibited by federal law, and with other local sales and use
taxes adopted pursuant to this chapter. It is further the intent of
this chapter that the local sales and use tax shall be imposed upon an
individual taxable event simultaneously with the imposition of the
state sales or use tax upon the same taxable event. The rule making
powers of the state department of revenue contained in RCW 82.08.060
and 82.32.300 shall be applicable to this chapter. The department
shall, as soon as practicable, and with the assistance of the
appropriate associations of county prosecutors and city attorneys,
draft a model resolution and ordinance.

Sec. 203 RCW 82.08.050 and 2001 c 188 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax hereby imposed shall be paid by the buyer to the seller,
and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full amount of the tax
payable in respect to each taxable sale in accordance with the schedule
of collections adopted by the department pursuant to the provisions of
RCW 82.08.060. The tax required by this chapter, to be collected by
the seller, shall be deemed to be held in trust by the seller until
paid to the department, and any seller who appropriates or converts the
tax collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the
payment of the tax to the extent that the money required to be
collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed in
this chapter shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein imposed or,
having collected the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the
manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result
of his or her own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond his
or her control, he or she shall, nevertheless, be personally liable to
the state for the amount of the tax, unless the seller has taken from
the buyer ((in good faith a properly executed)) a resale certificate
under RCW 82.04.470 ((or)), a copy of a direct pay permit issued under
RCW 82.32.087, information required under the streamlined sales and use
tax agreement, or information required under rules adopted by the
department. Sellers shall not be relieved from personal liability for
the amount of the tax unless they maintain proper records of exempt
transactions and provide them to the department when requested.
The amount of tax, until paid by the buyer to the seller or to the
department, shall constitute a debt from the buyer to the seller and
any seller who fails or refuses to collect the tax as required with
intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some
advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any buyer who
refuses to pay any tax due under this chapter shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor. The tax required by this chapter to be collected by the
seller shall be stated separately from the selling price in any sales
invoice or other instrument of sale. On all retail sales through
vending machines, the tax need not be stated separately from the
selling price or collected separately from the buyer. For purposes of
determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller and from the
seller to the department it shall be conclusively presumed that the
selling price quoted in any price list, sales document, contract or
other agreement between the parties does not include the tax imposed by
this chapter, but if the seller advertises the price as including the
tax or that the seller is paying the tax, the advertised price shall
not be considered the selling price.
Where a buyer has failed to pay to the seller the tax imposed by
this chapter and the seller has not paid the amount of the tax to the
department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly
against the buyer for collection of the tax, in which case a penalty of
ten percent may be added to the amount of the tax for failure of the
buyer to pay the same to the seller, regardless of when the tax may be
collected by the department; and all of the provisions of chapter 82.32
RCW, including those relative to interest and penalties, shall apply in
addition; and, for the sole purpose of applying the various provisions
of chapter 82.32 RCW, the twenty-fifth day of the month following the
tax period in which the purchase was made shall be considered as the
due date of the tax.

Sec. 204 RCW 82.04.470 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 701 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Unless a seller has taken from the buyer a resale certificate,
the burden of proving that a sale of tangible personal property, or of
services, was not a sale at retail shall be upon the person who made
it.
(2) If a seller does not receive a resale certificate at the time
of the sale, have a resale certificate on file at the time of the sale,
or obtain a resale certificate from the buyer within a reasonable time
after the sale, the seller shall remain liable for the tax as provided
in RCW 82.08.050, unless the seller can demonstrate facts and
circumstances according to rules adopted by the department of revenue
that show the sale was properly made without payment of sales tax.
(3) Resale certificates shall be valid for a period of four years
from the date the certificate is provided to the seller.
(4) The department may provide by rule for suggested forms for
resale certificates or equivalent documents containing the information
that will be accepted as resale certificates. The department shall
provide by rule the categories of items or services that must be
specified on resale certificates and the business classifications that
may use a blanket resale certificate.
(5) As used in this section, "resale certificate" means
documentation provided by a buyer to a seller stating that the purchase
is for resale in the regular course of business, or that the buyer is
exempt from retail sales tax, and containing the following information:
(a) The name and address of the buyer;
(b) The uniform business identifier or revenue registration number
of the buyer, if the buyer is required to (([be])) be registered;
(c) The type of business engaged in;
(d) The categories of items or services to be purchased for resale
or that are exempt, unless the buyer is in a business classification
that may present a blanket resale certificate as provided by the
department by rule;
(e) The date on which the certificate was provided;
(f) A statement that the items or services purchased either: (i)
Are purchased for resale in the regular course of business; or (ii) are
exempt from tax pursuant to statute;
(g) A statement that the buyer acknowledges that the buyer is
solely responsible for purchasing within the categories specified on
the certificate and that misuse of the resale or exemption privilege
claimed on the certificate subjects the buyer to a penalty of fifty
percent of the tax due, in addition to the tax, interest, and any other
penalties imposed by law;
(h) The name of the individual authorized to sign the certificate,
printed in a legible fashion;
(i) The signature of the authorized individual; and
(j) The name of the seller.
(6) Subsection (5)(h), (i), and (j) of this section does not apply
if the certificate is provided in a format other than paper. If the
certificate is provided in a format other than paper, the name of the
individual providing the certificate must be included in the
certificate.

Sec. 205 RCW 82.08.064 and 2000 c 104 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sales and use tax rate change under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW shall be imposed (((1))) (a) no sooner than seventy-five days
after its enactment into law and (((2))) (b) only on the first day of
January, April, July, or October.
(2)(a) A sales and use tax rate increase under this chapter or
chapter 82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to the first billing
period starting on or after the effective date of the increase.
(b) A sales and use tax rate decrease under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to bills rendered on or after the
effective date of the decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (2), "services" means
retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services
such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as
tattooing.

Sec. 206 RCW 82.14.055 and 2001 c 320 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this
section, a local sales and use tax change shall take effect (a) no
sooner than seventy-five days after the department receives notice of
the change and (b) only on the first day of January, April, July, or
October.
(2) In the case of a local sales and use tax that is a credit
against the state sales tax or use tax, a local sales and use tax
change shall take effect (a) no sooner than thirty days after the
department receives notice of the change and (b) only on the first day
of a month.
(3)(a) A local sales and use tax rate increase imposed on services
applies to the first billing period starting on or after the effective
date of the increase.
(b) A local sales and use tax rate decrease imposed on services
applies to bills rendered on or after the effective date of the
decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means
retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services
such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as
tattooing.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "local sales and use tax
change" means enactment or revision of local sales and use taxes under
this chapter or any other statute, including changes resulting from
referendum or annexation.

Sec. 207 RCW 82.32.430 and 2001 c 320 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who collects and remits sales or use tax to the
department and who calculates the tax using geographic information
system technology developed and provided by the department shall be
held harmless and is not liable for the difference in amount due nor
subject to penalties or interest in regards to rate calculation errors
resulting from the proper use of such technology.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
department shall notify sellers who collect and remit sales or use tax
to the department of changes in boundaries and rates to taxes imposed
by chapter 82.14 RCW no later than sixty days before the effective date
of the change.
(3) The department shall notify sellers who collect and remit sales
or use tax to the department and make sales from printed catalogs of
changes, as to such sales, of boundaries and rates to taxes imposed by
chapter 82.14 RCW no later than one hundred twenty days before the
effective date of the change.
(4) Sellers who have not received timely notice of rate and
boundary changes under subsections (2) and (3) of this section due to
actions or omissions of the department are not liable for the
difference in the amount due until they have received the appropriate
period of notice. Purchasers are liable for any uncollected amounts of
tax.

Sec. 208 RCW 82.08.02566 and 1997 c 302 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
tangible personal property incorporated into a prototype for aircraft
parts, auxiliary equipment, or modifications; or to sales of tangible
personal property that at one time is incorporated into the prototype
but is later destroyed in the testing or development of the prototype.
(2) This exemption does not apply to sales to any person whose
total taxable amount during the immediately preceding calendar year
exceeds twenty million dollars. For purposes of this section, "total
taxable amount" means gross income of the business and value of
products manufactured, less any amounts for which a credit is allowed
under RCW 82.04.440.
(3) State and local taxes for which an exemption is received under
this section and RCW 82.12.02566 shall not exceed one hundred thousand
dollars for any person during any calendar year.
(4) Sellers shall collect tax on sales subject to this exemption.
The buyer shall apply for a refund directly from the department.

Sec. 209 RCW 82.12.02566 and 1997 c 302 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to
the use of tangible personal property incorporated into a prototype for
aircraft parts, auxiliary equipment, or modifications; or in respect to
the use of tangible personal property that at one time is incorporated
into the prototype but is later destroyed in the testing or development
of the prototype.
(2) This exemption does not apply in respect to the use of tangible
personal property by any person whose total taxable amount during the
immediately preceding calendar year exceeds twenty million dollars.
For purposes of this section, "total taxable amount" means gross income
of the business and value of products manufactured, less any amounts
for which a credit is allowed under RCW 82.04.440.
(3) State and local taxes for which an exemption is received under
this section and RCW 82.08.02566 shall not exceed one hundred thousand
dollars for any person during any calendar year.
(4) Sellers obligated to collect use tax shall collect tax on sales
subject to this exemption. The buyer shall apply for a refund directly
from the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
Sellers shall compute the tax due under this chapter and chapters
82.12 and 82.14 RCW by carrying the computation to the third decimal
place and rounding to a whole cent using a method that rounds up to the
next cent whenever the third decimal place is greater than four.
Sellers may elect to compute the tax due on a transaction on an item or
an invoice basis. This rounding rule shall be applied to the
aggregated state and local taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
A purchaser's cause of action against the seller for over-collected
sales or use tax does not accrue until the purchaser has provided
written notice to the seller and the seller has sixty days to respond.
The notice to the seller must contain the information necessary to
determine the validity of the request.

Sec. 212 RCW 82.08.037 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 35 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A seller is entitled to a credit or refund for sales taxes
previously paid on debts which are ((deductible as worthless for
federal income tax purposes)) bad debts under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 166, as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, except for:
(a) Amounts due on property that remains in the possession of the
seller until the full purchase price is paid;
(b) Expenses incurred in attempting to collect debt; and
(c) Repossessed property.
(2) If a credit or refund of sales tax is taken for a bad debt and
the debt is subsequently collected in whole or in part, the tax on the
amount collected must be paid and reported on the return filed for the
period in which the collection is made.
(3) Payments on a bad debt are applied first proportionally to the
taxable price of the property or service and the sales tax thereon, and
secondly to interest, service charges, and any other charges.
(4) If the seller uses a certified service provider to administer
its sales tax responsibilities, the certified service provider may
claim, on behalf of the seller, the credit or refund allowed by this
section. The certified service provider must credit or refund the full
amount to the seller.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
The department may not attribute nexus with Washington to any
seller solely by virtue of the seller registering under the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement.

Sec. 214 RCW 82.12.020 and 2002 c 367 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every
person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within
this state as a consumer: (a) Any article of tangible personal
property purchased at retail, or acquired by lease, gift, repossession,
or bailment, or extracted or produced or manufactured by the person so
using the same, or otherwise furnished to a person engaged in any
business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); or (b) any ((canned))
prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but
excluding ((canned)) prewritten computer software that is either
provided free of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing
information, or both.
(2) This tax shall apply to the use of every service defined as a
retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a) and the use of every
article of tangible personal property, including property acquired at
a casual or isolated sale, and including byproducts used by the
manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter provided, irrespective of
whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are
available for purchase within this state.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 82.12.0252, payment by one purchaser
or user of tangible personal property or service of the tax imposed by
chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not have the effect of exempting any
other purchaser or user of the same property or service from the taxes
imposed by such chapters.
(4) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used or value of the service used by the taxpayer
multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW
82.08.020, except in the case of a seller required to collect use tax
from the purchaser, the tax shall be collected in an amount equal to
the purchase price multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

Sec. 215 RCW 82.12.040 and 2001 c 188 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person who maintains in this state a place of business or
a stock of goods, or engages in business activities within this state,
shall obtain from the department a certificate of registration, and
shall, at the time of making sales of tangible personal property or
sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a)
or (3)(a), or making transfers of either possession or title, or both,
of tangible personal property for use in this state, collect from the
purchasers or transferees the tax imposed under this chapter. The tax
to be collected under this section shall be in an amount equal to the
purchase price multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail sales
tax under RCW 82.08.020. For the purposes of this chapter, the phrase
"maintains in this state a place of business" shall include the
solicitation of sales and/or taking of orders by sales agents or
traveling representatives. For the purposes of this chapter, "engages
in business activity within this state" includes every activity which
is sufficient under the Constitution of the United States for this
state to require collection of tax under this chapter. The department
shall in rules specify activities which constitute engaging in business
activity within this state, and shall keep the rules current with
future court interpretations of the Constitution of the United States.
(2) Every person who engages in this state in the business of
acting as an independent selling agent for persons who do not hold a
valid certificate of registration, and who receives compensation by
reason of sales of tangible personal property, or sales of any service
defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), of his or
her principals ((made)) for use in this state, shall, at the time such
sales are made, collect from the purchasers the tax imposed on the
purchase price under this chapter, and for that purpose shall be deemed
a retailer as defined in this chapter.
(3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter shall be
deemed to be held in trust by the retailer until paid to the department
and any retailer who appropriates or converts the tax collected to
((his)) the retailer's own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax provided herein to the extent that the money required to be
collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. In case any seller fails to collect
the tax herein imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay the
same to the department in the manner prescribed, whether such failure
is the result of ((his)) the seller's own acts or the result of acts or
conditions beyond ((his)) the seller's control, ((he)) the seller shall
nevertheless, be personally liable to the state for the amount of such
tax, unless the seller has taken from the buyer in good faith a copy of
a direct pay permit issued under RCW 82.32.087.
(4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to a purchaser, or
transferee, either directly or indirectly, and by whatever means, all
or any part of the tax levied by this chapter shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.

Sec. 216 RCW 82.12.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 54 are each
amended to read as follows:
In the case of installment sales and leases of personal property,
the department, by ((regulation)) rule, may provide for the collection
of taxes upon the installments of the purchase price, or amount of
rental, as of the time the same fall due.
((In the case of property acquired by bailment, the department, by
regulation, may provide for payment of the tax due in installments
based on the reasonable rental for the property as determined under RCW
82.12.010(1).))

PART III--FOOD
Sec. 301 RCW 82.08.0293 and 1988 c 103 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
food ((products for human consumption.
"Food products" include cereals and cereal products, oleomargarine,
meat and meat products including livestock sold for personal
consumption, fish and fish products, eggs and egg products, vegetables
and vegetable products, fruit and fruit products, spices and salt,
sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee substitutes, tea, cocoa and
cocoa products.
"Food products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted
milks, and any other similar type beverages which are composed at least
in part of milk or a milk product and which require the use of milk or
a milk product in their preparation.
"Food products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and
other beverages except bottled water, spirituous, malt or vinous
liquors or carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen.
"Food products" do not include medicines and preparations in
liquid, powdered, granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form
sold as dietary supplements or adjuncts)) and food ingredients. "Food
and food ingredients" means substances, whether in liquid,
concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold
for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or
nutritional value. "Food and food ingredients" does not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(2) The exemption of "food ((products)) and food ingredients"
provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply((: (a)
When the food products are ordinarily sold for immediate consumption on
or near a location at which parking facilities are provided primarily
for the use of patrons in consuming the products purchased at the
location, even though such products are sold on a "takeout" or "to go"
order and are actually packaged or wrapped and taken from the premises
of the retailer, or (b) when the food products are sold for consumption
within a place, the entrance to which is subject to an admission
charge, except for national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a
food product, when sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be
handled on the vendor's premises by a person with a food and beverage
service worker's permit under RCW 69.06.010, including but not be
limited to sandwiches prepared or chicken cooked on the premises, deli
trays, home-delivered pizzas or meals, and salad bars but excluding:
(i) Raw meat prepared by persons who slaughter animals, including
fish and fowl, or dress or wrap slaughtered raw meat such as fish
mongers, butchers, or meat wrappers;
(ii) Meat and cheese sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity
determined by the buyer, sold by vendors such as meat markets,
delicatessens, and grocery stores;
(iii) Bakeries which only sell baked goods;
(iv) Combination bakery businesses, as prescribed by rule of the
department, to the extent that sales of baked goods are separately
accounted for and the baked goods claimed for exemption are not sold as
part of meals or with beverages in unsealed containers; or
(v) Bulk food products sold from bins or barrels, including but not
limited to flour, fruits, vegetables, sugar, salt, candy, chips, and
cocoa)) to prepared food, soft drinks, or dietary supplements.
(a) "Prepared food" means:
(i) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(ii) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item; or
(iii) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food.
"Prepared food" in (a)(ii) of this subsection, does not include
food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller and raw
eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods
requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the federal food
and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The Food Code,
published by the food and drug administration, as amended or renumbered
as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness; or bakery
items, including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants,
pastries, donuts, danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars,
cookies, or tortillas.
(b) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural
or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that
contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(c) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients: A
vitamin; a mineral; an herb or other botanical; an amino acid; a
dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or a concentrate, metabolite,
constituent, extract, or combination of any ingredient described in
this subsection; and is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule,
powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for
ingestion in such form, is not represented as conventional food and is
not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(ii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food ((products)) and food ingredients" provided in this
section shall apply to food ((products)) and food ingredients which are
furnished, prepared, or served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or
low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under
chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail sale
of food ((products)) and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under
RCW 82.08.020 if the food ((products)) and food ingredients are sold
through a vending machine, and in this case the selling price for
purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.
This subsection does not apply to hot prepared food ((products))
and food ingredients, other than food ((products)) and food ingredients
which are heated after they have been dispensed from the vending
machine.
For tax collected under this subsection, the requirements that the
tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be stated as
a separate item are waived.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of dietary
supplements for human use dispensed or to be dispensed to patients,
pursuant to a prescription. "Dietary supplement" has the same meaning
as in RCW 82.08.0293.

Sec. 303 RCW 82.12.0293 and 1988 c 103 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of food ((products)) and food ingredients for human
consumption. "Food and food ingredients" has the same meaning as in
RCW 82.08.0293.
(("Food products" include cereals and cereal products,
oleomargarine, meat and meat products including livestock sold for
personal consumption, fish and fish products, eggs and egg products,
vegetables and vegetable products, fruit and fruit products, spices and
salt, sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee substitutes, tea,
cocoa and cocoa products.
"Food products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted
milks, and any other similar type beverages which are composed at least
in part of milk or a milk product and which require the use of milk or
a milk product in their preparation.
"Food products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and
other beverages except bottled water, spirituous, malt or vinous
liquors or carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen.
"Food products" do not include medicines and preparations in
liquid, powdered, granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form
sold as dietary supplements or adjuncts.))
(2) The exemption of "food ((products)) and food ingredients"
provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply((: (a)
When the food products are ordinarily sold for immediate consumption on
or near a location at which parking facilities are provided primarily
for the use of patrons in consuming the products purchased at the
location, even though such products are sold on a "takeout" or "to go"
order and are actually packaged or wrapped and taken from the premises
of the retailer, or (b) when the food products are sold for consumption
within a place, the entrance to which is subject to an admission
charge, except for national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a
food product, when sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be
handled on the vendor's premises by a person with a food and beverage
service worker's permit under RCW 69.06.010, including but not be
limited to sandwiches prepared or chicken cooked on the premises, deli
trays, home-delivered pizzas or meals, and salad bars but excluding:
(i) Raw meat prepared by persons who slaughter animals, including
fish and fowl, or dress or wrap slaughtered raw meat such as fish
mongers, butchers, or meat wrappers;
(ii) Meat and cheese sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity
determined by the buyer, sold by vendors such as meat markets,
delicatessens, and grocery stores;
(iii) Bakeries which only sell baked goods;
(iv) Combination bakery businesses, as prescribed by rule of the
department, to the extent that sales of baked goods are separately
accounted for and the baked goods claimed for exemption are not sold as
part of meals or with beverages in unsealed containers; or
(v) Bulk food products sold from bins or barrels, including but not
limited to flour, fruits, vegetables, sugar, salt, candy, chips, and
cocoa)) to prepared food, soft drinks, or dietary supplements.
"Prepared food," "soft drinks," and "dietary supplements" have the same
meanings as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food ((products)) and food ingredients" provided in this
section shall apply to food ((products)) and food ingredients which are
furnished, prepared, or served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or
low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under
chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the use of
dietary supplements dispensed or to be dispensed to patients, pursuant
to a prescription, if the dietary supplements are for human use.
"Dietary supplement" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

Sec. 305 RCW 66.28.190 and 1997 c 321 s 52 are each amended to
read as follows:
RCW 66.28.010 notwithstanding, persons licensed under RCW 66.24.200
as wine distributors and persons licensed under RCW 66.24.250 as beer
distributors may sell at wholesale nonliquor food ((products)) and food
ingredients on thirty-day credit terms to persons licensed as retailers
under this title, but complete and separate accounting records shall be
maintained on all sales of nonliquor food ((products)) and food
ingredients to ensure that such persons are in compliance with RCW
66.28.010.
For the purpose of this section, "nonliquor food ((products)) and
food ingredients" includes all food ((products)) and food ingredients
for human consumption as defined in RCW 82.08.0293 as it exists on July
1, ((1987, except that for the purposes of this section bottled water
and carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen, shall be considered
food products)) 2004.

PART IV--MEDICAL PROVISIONS
Sec. 401 RCW 82.04.272 and 1998 c 343 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
warehousing and reselling ((prescription)) drugs for human use pursuant
to a prescription; as to such persons, the amount of the tax shall be
equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Prescription" and "drug" ((has)) have the same meaning as
((that term is given)) in RCW 82.08.0281; and
(b) "Warehousing and reselling ((prescription)) drugs for human use
pursuant to a prescription" means the buying of ((prescription)) drugs
for human use pursuant to a prescription from a manufacturer or another
wholesaler, and reselling of the drugs to persons selling at retail or
to hospitals, clinics, health care providers, or other providers of
health care services, by a wholesaler or retailer who is registered
with the federal drug enforcement administration and licensed by the
state board of pharmacy.

Sec. 402 RCW 82.04.4289 and 1998 c 325 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts derived as compensation for
services rendered to patients or from sales of ((prescription)) drugs
((as defined in RCW 82.08.0281)) for human use pursuant to a
prescription furnished as an integral part of services rendered to
patients by a kidney dialysis facility operated as a nonprofit
corporation, a nonprofit hospice agency licensed under chapter 70.127
RCW, and nursing homes and homes for unwed mothers operated as
religious or charitable organizations, but only if no part of the net
earnings received by such an institution inures directly or indirectly,
to any person other than the institution entitled to deduction
hereunder. "Prescription" and "drug" have the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.0281.

Sec. 403 RCW 82.08.0281 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 308 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
((prescription)) drugs((, including sales to the state or a political
subdivision or municipal corporation thereof of drugs to be dispensed
to patients by prescription without charge. The term "prescription
drugs" shall include any medicine, drug, prescription lens, or other
substance other than food for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease or other ailment in humans, or for
use for family planning purposes, including the prevention of
conception, supplied:
(1) By a family planning clinic that is under contract with the
department of health to provide family planning services; or
(2) Under the written prescription to a pharmacist by a
practitioner authorized by law of this state or laws of another
jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; or
(3) Upon an oral prescription of such practitioner which is reduced
promptly to writing and filed by a duly licensed pharmacist; or
(4) By refilling any such written or oral prescription if such
refilling is authorized by the prescriber either in the original
prescription or by oral order which is reduced promptly to writing and
filed by the pharmacist; or
(5) By physicians or optometrists by way of written directions and
specifications for the preparation, grinding, and fabrication of lenses
intended to aid or correct visual defects or anomalies of humans)) for
human use dispensed or to be dispensed to patients, pursuant to a
prescription.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
drugs or devices used for family planning purposes, including the
prevention of conception, for human use dispensed or to be dispensed to
patients, pursuant to a prescription.
(3) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
drugs and devices used for family planning purposes, including the
prevention of conception, for human use supplied by a family planning
clinic that is under contract with the department of health to provide
family planning services.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Prescription" means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any
form of oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a
duly licensed practitioner authorized by the laws of this state.
(b) "Drug" means a compound, substance, or preparation, and any
component of a compound, substance, or preparation, other than food and
food ingredients, dietary supplements, or alcoholic beverages:
(i) Recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia,
official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official
national formulary, or any supplement to any of them; or
(ii) Intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease; or
(iii) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body.
(c) "Over-the-counter drug" means a drug that contains a label that
identifies the product as a drug required by 21 C.F.R. Sec. 201.66, as
amended or renumbered on January 1, 2003. The label includes:
(i) A "drug facts" panel; or
(ii) A statement of the "active ingredient(s)" with a list of those
ingredients contained in the compound, substance, or preparation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
disposable devices used or to be used to deliver drugs for human use,
pursuant to a prescription. "Disposable devices used to deliver drugs"
means single use items such as syringes, tubing, or catheters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of over-the-counter drugs for human use dispensed or to be dispensed to
patients, pursuant to a prescription. "Over-the-counter drug" has the
same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0281.

Sec. 406 RCW 82.12.0275 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 309 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of ((prescription)) drugs((, including the use by the state or
a political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof of drugs to be
dispensed to patients by prescription without charge. The term
"prescription drugs" shall include any medicine, drug, prescription
lens, or other substance other than food for use in the diagnosis,
cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or other ailment
in humans, or for use for family planning purposes, including the
prevention of conception, supplied:
(1) By a family planning clinic that is under contract with the
department of health to provide family planning services; or
(2) Under the written prescription to a pharmacist by a
practitioner authorized by law of this state or laws of another
jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; or
(3) Upon an oral prescription of such practitioner which is reduced
promptly to writing and filed by a duly licensed pharmacist; or
(4) By refilling any such written or oral prescription if such
refilling is authorized by the prescriber either in the original
prescription or by oral order which is reduced promptly to writing and
filed by the pharmacist; or
(5) By physicians or optometrists by way of written directions and
specifications for the preparation, grinding, and fabrication of lenses
intended to aid or correct visual defects or anomalies of humans))
dispensed or to be dispensed to patients, pursuant to a prescription,
if the drugs are for human use.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of drugs or devices used for family planning purposes,
including the prevention of conception, for human use dispensed or to
be dispensed to patients, pursuant to a prescription.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of drugs or devices used for family planning purposes,
including the prevention of conception, for human use supplied by a
family planning clinic that is under contract with the department of
health to provide family planning services.
(4) As used in this section, "prescription" and "drug" have the
same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0281.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the use of
disposable devices used to deliver drugs for human use, pursuant to a
prescription. Disposable devices means the same as provided in section
404 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the use of over-the-counter drugs dispensed or to be dispensed to patients, pursuant to
a prescription, if the over-the-counter drugs are for human use.
"Over-the-counter drug" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0281.

Sec. 409 RCW 82.08.0283 and 2001 c 75 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
((insulin;)) prosthetic devices ((and the components thereof; dental
appliances, devices, restorations, and substitutes, and the components
thereof, including but not limited to full and partial dentures,
crowns, inlays, fillings, braces, and retainers; orthotic devices))
prescribed for an individual by a person licensed under chapter((s))
18.22, 18.25, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW; ((hearing instruments dispensed or
fitted by a person licensed or certified under chapter 18.35 RCW, and
the components thereof;)) medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical
origin ((prescribed,)) administered, dispensed, or used in the
treatment of an individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.36A
RCW; ((ostomic items;)) and medically prescribed oxygen, including, but
not limited to, oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems,
liquid oxygen systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed
for an individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW
for use in the medical treatment of that individual. In addition, the
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the repairing, cleaning, altering,
or improving of any of the items exempted under this section.
(2) The exemption in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply
to sales of durable medical equipment or mobility enhancing equipment.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Prosthetic device" means a replacement, corrective, or
supportive device, including repair and replacement parts for a
prosthetic device, worn on or in the body to:
(i) Artificially replace a missing portion of the body;
(ii) Prevent or correct a physical deformity or malfunction; or
(iii) Support a weak or deformed portion of the body.
(b) "Durable medical equipment" means equipment, including repair
and replacement for durable medical equipment, but does not include
mobility enhancing equipment, that:
(i) Can withstand repeated use;
(ii) Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;
(iii) Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness
or injury; and
(iv) Does not work in or on the body.
(c) "Mobility enhancing equipment" means equipment, including
repair and replacement parts for mobility enhancing equipment, but does
not include medical equipment, that:
(i) Is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the
ability to move from one place to another and that is appropriate for
use either at home or a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is not generally used by persons with normal mobility; and
(iii) Does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor
vehicle normally provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of kidney
dialysis devices, including repair and replacement parts, for human use
pursuant to a prescription.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 411 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the use of kidney
dialysis devices, including repair and replacement parts, for human use
pursuant to a prescription.

Sec. 412 RCW 82.12.0277 and 2001 c 75 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of ((insulin;)) prosthetic devices ((and the components
thereof; dental appliances, devices, restorations, and substitutes, and
the components thereof, including but not limited to full and partial
dentures, crowns, inlays, fillings, braces, and retainers; orthotic
devices)) prescribed for an individual by a person licensed under
chapter((s)) 18.22, 18.25, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW; ((hearing instruments
dispensed or fitted by a person licensed or certified under chapter
18.35 RCW, and the components thereof;)) medicines of mineral, animal,
and botanical origin ((prescribed,)) administered, dispensed, or used
in the treatment of an individual by a person licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW; ((ostomic items;)) and medically prescribed oxygen,
including, but not limited to, oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen
enricher systems, liquid oxygen systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen
systems prescribed for an individual by a person licensed under chapter
18.57 or 18.71 RCW for use in the medical treatment of that individual.
(2) The exemption provided by subsection (1) of this section shall
not apply to the use of durable medical equipment or mobility enhancing
equipment.
(3) "Prosthetic device," "durable medical equipment," and "mobility
enhancing equipment" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0283.

PART V--SOURCING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except for the defined telecommunications services listed in
this section, the sale of telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065
sold on a call-by-call basis shall be sourced to (a) each level of
taxing jurisdiction where the call originates and terminates in that
jurisdiction or (b) each level of taxing jurisdiction where the call
either originates or terminates and in which the service address is
also located.
(2) Except for the defined telecommunications services listed in
this section, a sale of telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065
sold on a basis other than a call-by-call basis, is sourced to the
customer's place of primary use.
(3) The sales of telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065 that
are listed in this section shall be sourced to each level of taxing
jurisdiction as follows:
(a) A sale of mobile telecommunications services, other than
air-ground radiotelephone service and prepaid calling service, is
sourced to the customer's place of primary use as required by RCW
82.08.066.
(b) A sale of postpaid calling service is sourced to the
origination point of the telecommunications signal as first identified
by either (i) the seller's telecommunications system, or (ii)
information received by the seller from its home service provider,
where the system used to transport such signals is not that of the
seller.
(c) A sale of prepaid calling service is sourced as follows:
(i) When a prepaid calling service is received by the purchaser at
a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to that business
location;
(ii) When a prepaid calling service is not received by the
purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to
the location where receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee,
designated as such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location
indicated by instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known
to the seller;
(iii) When (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection do not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser that is available from the business records of the seller
that are maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business
when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;
(iv) When (c)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection do not apply,
the sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;
(v) When (c)(i), (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection do not
apply, including the circumstance where the seller is without
sufficient information to apply those provisions, then the location
shall be determined by the address from which tangible personal
property was shipped, from which the digital good or the computer
software delivered electronically was first available for transmission
by the seller, or from which the service defined as a retail sale under
RCW 82.04.050 was provided, disregarding for these purposes any
location that merely provided the digital transfer of the product sold;
(vi) In the case of a sale of mobile telecommunications service
that is a prepaid telecommunications service, (c)(iv) of this
subsection shall include as an option the location associated with the
mobile telephone number.
(d) A sale of a private communication service is sourced as
follows:
(i) Service for a separate charge related to a customer channel
termination point is sourced to each level of jurisdiction in which
such customer channel termination point is located.
(ii) Service where all customer termination points are located
entirely within one jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction is sourced
in such jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points
are located.
(iii) Service for segments of a channel between two customer
channel termination points located in different jurisdictions and which
segment of channel are separately charged is sourced fifty percent in
each level of jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination
points are located.
(iv) Service for segments of a channel located in more than one
jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction and which segments are not
separately billed is sourced in each jurisdiction based on the
percentage determined by dividing the number of customer channel
termination points in the jurisdiction by the total number of customer
channel termination points.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
chapter.
(a) "Air-ground radiotelephone service" means air-ground radio
service, as defined in 47 C.F.R. Sec. 22.99, as amended or renumbered
as of January 1, 2003, in which common carriers are authorized to offer
and provide radio telecommunications service for hire to subscribers in
aircraft.
(b) "Call-by-call basis" means any method of charging for
telecommunications services where the price is measured by individual
calls.
(c) "Communications channel" means a physical or virtual path of
communications over which signals are transmitted between or among
customer channel termination points.
(d) "Customer" means the person or entity that contracts with the
seller of telecommunications services. If the end user of
telecommunications services is not the contracting party, the end user
of the telecommunications service is the customer of the
telecommunications service. "Customer" does not include a reseller of
telecommunications service or for mobile telecommunications service of
a serving carrier under an agreement to serve the customer outside the
home service provider's licensed service area.
(e) "Customer channel termination point" means the location where
the customer either inputs or receives the communications.
(f) "End user" means the person who uses the telecommunications
service. In the case of an entity, the term end user means the
individual who uses the service on behalf of the entity.
(g) "Home service provider" means the same as that term is defined
in RCW 82.04.065.
(h) "Mobile telecommunications service" means the same as that term
is defined in RCW 82.04.065.
(i) "Place of primary use" means the street address representative
of where the customer's use of the telecommunications service primarily
occurs, which must be the residential street address or the primary
business street address of the customer. In the case of mobile
telecommunications services, "place of primary use" must be within the
licensed service area of the home service provider.
(j) "Postpaid calling service" means the telecommunications service
obtained by making a payment on a call-by-call basis either through the
use of a credit card or payment mechanism such as a bank card, travel
card, credit card, or debit card, or by charge made to which a
telephone number that is not associated with the origination or
termination of the telecommunications service. A postpaid calling
service includes a telecommunications service that would be a prepaid
calling service except it is not exclusively a telecommunications
service.
(k) "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access exclusively
telecommunications services, which must be paid for in advance and
which enables the origination of calls using and access number and/or
authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed, and that
is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines
with use in a known amount.
(l) "Private communication service" means a telecommunications
service that entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of a
communications channel or group of channels between or among
termination points, regardless of the manner in which such channel or
channels are connected, and includes switching capacity, extension
lines, stations, and any other associated services that are provided in
connection with the use of such channel or channels.
(m) "Service address" means:
(i) The location of the telecommunications equipment to which a
customer's call is charged and from which the call originates or
terminates, regardless of where the call is billed or paid;
(ii) If the location in (m)(i) of this subsection is not known, the
origination point of the signal of the telecommunications services
first identified by either the seller's telecommunications system or in
information received by the seller from its home service provider,
where the system used to transport such signals is not that of the
seller;
(iii) If the location in (m)(i) and (ii) of this subsection are not
known, the location of the customer's place of primary use.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.14.020 and 2002 c 367 s 6 and 2002 c 67 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the place of primary use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5)(a) A retail sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of
tangible personal property under subsection (1) of this section or a
rental of tangible personal property under subsection (3) of this
section or a sale of mobile telecommunications services, shall be
deemed to have occurred at the situs of the telephone or other
instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;
(b) A retail sale consisting of the providing ((to a consumer of
mobile telecommunications services is deemed to have occurred at the
customer's place of primary use, regardless of where the mobile
telecommunications services originate, terminate, or pass through,
consistent with the mobile telecommunications sourcing act, P.L. 106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126)) of telecommunications services
shall be sourced in accordance with section 501 of this act;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7) "City" means a city or town;
(8) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04,
82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(9) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use, upon
which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW, as
they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(10) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the treasurer
or legal depository of a county or city.

Sec. 503 RCW 82.14.020 and 2002 c 367 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the primary place of use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5) A retail sale consisting of the providing ((to a consumer of
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of
tangible personal property under subsection (1) of this section or a
rental of tangible personal property under subsection (3) of this
section, shall be deemed to have occurred at the situs of the telephone
or other instrument through which the telephone service is rendered))
of telecommunications services shall be sourced in accordance with
section 501 of this act;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7) "City" means a city or town;
(8) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04,
82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(9) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use, upon
which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW, as
they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(10) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the treasurer
or legal depository of a county or city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 The department of revenue shall conduct a
study of the fiscal impact on local jurisdictions of the sourcing
provisions proposed in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
The department shall use, and regularly consult, a committee composed
of city and county officials to assist with the study. Committee
responsibilities include identification of elements of the study
including mitigation options for jurisdictions negatively impacted by
the sourcing provision. The department shall report the results of the
study, which at minimum shall include the identification of the fiscal
impacts on local governments of the sourcing provisions, by December 1,
2003, to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature.

PART VI--SOFTWARE AND RELATED ITEMS
Sec. 601 RCW 82.04.215 and 1998 c 332 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) (("Canned software" means software that is created for sale to
more than one person)) "Computer" means an electronic device that
accepts information in digital or similar form and manipulates it for
a result based on a sequence of instructions.
(2) "Computer software" means a set of coded instructions designed
to cause a computer or automatic data processing equipment to perform
a task. All software is classified as either prewritten or custom.
Consistent with this definition "computer software" includes only those
sets of coded instructions intended for use by an end user and
specifically excludes retained rights in software and master copies of
software.
(3) "Custom software" means software created for a single person.
(((3))) (4) "Customization of ((canned)) prewritten computer
software" means any alteration, modification, or development of
applications using or incorporating ((canned)) prewritten computer
software for a specific person. "Customization of ((canned))
prewritten computer software" includes individualized configuration of
software to work with other software and computer hardware but does not
include routine installation. Customization of ((canned)) prewritten
computer software does not change the underlying character or
taxability of the original ((canned)) prewritten computer software.
(((4))) (5) "Master copies" of software means copies of software
from which a software developer, author, inventor, publisher, licensor,
sublicensor, or distributor makes copies for sale or license.
(((5))) (6) "Prewritten computer software" means computer software,
including prewritten upgrades, that is not designed and developed by
the author or other creator to the specifications of a specific
purchaser. The combining of two or more prewritten computer software
programs or prewritten portions thereof does not cause the combination
to be other than prewritten computer software. Prewritten computer
software includes software designed and developed by the author or
other creator to the specifications of a specific purchaser when it is
sold to a person other than such purchaser. Where a person modifies or
enhances computer software of which such persons is not the author or
creator, the person shall be deemed to be the author or creator only of
the person's modifications or enhancements. Prewritten computer
software or a prewritten portion thereof that is modified or enhanced
to any degree, where such modification or enhancement is designed and
developed to the specifications of a specific purchaser, remains
prewritten computer software; however where there is a reasonable,
separately stated charge or an invoice or other statement of the price
given to the purchaser for the modification or enhancement, the
modification or enhancement shall not constitute prewritten computer
software.
(7) "Retained rights" means any and all rights, including
intellectual property rights such as those rights arising from
copyrights, patents, and trade secret laws, that are owned or are held
under contract or license by a software developer, author, inventor,
publisher, licensor, sublicensor, or distributor.
(((6) "Software" means any information, program, or routine, or any
set of one or more programs, routines, or collections of information
used, or intended for use, to convey information that causes one or
more computers or pieces of computer-related peripheral equipment, or
any combination thereof, to perform a task or set of tasks. "Software"
includes only those copies of such information, programs, or routines
intended for use by an end user and specifically excludes retained
rights in software and master copies of software. "Software" includes
the associated documentation that describes the code and its use,
operation, and maintenance and typically is delivered with the code to
the consumer. All software is classified as either canned or custom.))

Sec. 602 RCW 82.04.29001 and 1998 c 332 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The creation and distribution of custom software is a service
taxable under RCW 82.04.290(2). Duplication of the software for the
same person, or by the same person for its own use, does not change the
character of the software.
(2) The customization of ((canned)) prewritten computer software is
a service taxable under RCW 82.04.290(2).

Sec. 603 RCW 82.12.0284 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 55 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of computers, computer components, computer accessories, or
computer software irrevocably donated to any public or private
nonprofit school or college, as defined under chapter 84.36 RCW, in
this state. For purposes of this section, "computer" ((means a data
processor that can perform substantial computation, including numerous
arithmetic or logic operations, without intervention by a human
operator during the run)) has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.

Sec. 604 RCW 82.04.120 and 1999 sp.s. c 9 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
"To manufacture" embraces all activities of a commercial or
industrial nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or
machinery, to materials so that as a result thereof a new, different or
useful substance or article of tangible personal property is produced
for sale or commercial or industrial use, and shall include: (1) The
production or fabrication of special made or custom made articles; (2)
the production or fabrication of dental appliances, devices,
restorations, substitutes, or other dental laboratory products by a
dental laboratory or dental technician; (3) cutting, delimbing, and
measuring of felled, cut, or taken trees; and (4) crushing and/or
blending of rock, sand, stone, gravel, or ore.
"To manufacture" shall not include: Conditioning of seed for use
in planting; cubing hay or alfalfa; activities which consist of
cutting, grading, or ice glazing seafood which has been cooked, frozen,
or canned outside this state; the growing, harvesting, or producing of
agricultural products; ((or)) packing of agricultural products,
including sorting, washing, rinsing, grading, waxing, treating with
fungicide, packaging, chilling, or placing in controlled atmospheric
storage; or the production of computer software if the computer
software is delivered from the seller to the purchaser by means other
than tangible storage media, including the delivery by use of a
tangible storage media where the tangible storage media is not
physically transferred to the purchaser.

PART VII--STEAM, ELECTRICITY, AND ELECTRICAL ENERGY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A new section is added to chapter 82.02
RCW to read as follows:
When the terms "ingredient," "component part," "incorporated into,"
"goods," "products," "byproducts," "materials," "consumables," and
other similar terms denoting tangible items that may be used, sold, or
consumed are used in this title, the terms do not include steam,
electricity, or electrical energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
Consistent with section 701 of this act, when the terms "tangible
personal property," "ingredient," "component part," "incorporated
into," "goods," "products," "byproducts," "materials," "consumables,"
and other similar terms denoting tangible items that may be used, sold,
or consumed are used in this chapter, the terms do not include steam,
electricity, or electrical energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of steam,
electricity, or electrical energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of steam, electricity, or electrical energy.

PART VIII--RATE PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 A new section is added to chapter 82.02
RCW to read as follows:
(1) There shall be one statewide rate for sales and use taxes
imposed at the state level. This subsection does not apply to the
taxes imposed by RCW 82.12.022 or 82.18.020, or to taxes imposed on the
sale, rental, lease, or use of motor vehicles, aircraft, watercraft,
modular homes, manufactured homes, or mobile homes.
(2) There shall be one jurisdiction-wide rate for local sales and
use taxes imposed at levels below the state level. This subsection
does not apply to the taxes imposed by chapter 67.28 RCW, RCW 67.40.090
or 82.14.360, or to taxes imposed on the sale, rental, lease, or use of
motor vehicles, aircraft, watercraft, modular homes, manufactured
homes, or mobile homes.

PART IX--MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

Sec. 902 2002 c 67 s 18 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) If a court of competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on
the merits that is based on federal or state law, is no longer subject
to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements
of P.L. 106-252(([, 4 U.S.C.])), 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126, or
chapter 67, Laws of 2002, then chapter 67, Laws of 2002 is null and
void in its entirety.
(2) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 502, chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 (section 502 of this act) is
null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 Sections 101 through 104, 201 through 216,
301 through 305, 401 through 412, 501, 502, 601 through 604, 701
through 704, 801, 901, and 902 of this act take effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---