BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that: The state's
highly productive and efficient agriculture sector is composed
predominately of family owned and managed farms and an industrious and
efficient workforce; the supreme court has directed the department of
labor and industries to initiate rule making regarding routine
monitoring of agriculture workers who are exposed to certain
pesticides. It is the intent of this act to guarantee that the safety
and health of workers is protected, and this can best be accomplished
through pilot project rule making to determine whether mandatory
medical monitoring is beneficial to workers and feasible considering
all of the technical requirements of such a regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 17.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of agriculture and the department of labor and
industries shall initiate a pilot rule project, in accordance with RCW
34.05.313, to determine whether mandatory medical monitoring for class
one and class two organophosphate and carbamate pesticides is necessary
to insure worker safety. The pilot project shall be completed by
December 31, 2005.
(2) In accordance with RCW 34.05.350, the department of labor and
industries may adopt emergency rules necessary to protect the health
and safety of farmworkers.
(3) Funding for this pilot project will be obtained from the
industrial insurance medical aid and accident funds as defined in
chapter 51.44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---