BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to ensure that construction projects involving the use
of fill material do not pose a threat to water quality, the department
may require that the suitability of potential fill material be
evaluated using a valid and reliable leaching test, including but not
limited to method 1312 from environmental protection agency publication
SW-846 (synthetic precipitation leaching procedure), in any water
quality certification issued under section 401 of the federal clean
water act and in any administrative order issued under this chapter,
where such certification or administrative order authorizes the
placement of fill material, some or all of which will be placed in
waters of the state. Any such requirement imposed by the department in
a water quality certification or administrative order issued prior to
the effective date of this section is ratified and approved by the
legislature as a valid and reliable method for determining
concentrations of chemical constituents that can be present in fill
material without posing an unacceptable risk of violating water quality
standards, and is in effect as imposed by the department for all work
not completed by June 1, 2003.
(2) In enacting this section the legislature does not intend to
limit in any way the department's authority under this chapter.

--- END ---