BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to implementing any medicaid case mix payment method for
licensed boarding homes, on a statewide basis, the department shall
develop and implement a pilot program. The pilot program shall begin
on September 1, 2003, and shall conclude September 1, 2004. The pilot
program shall include a representative number of boarding homes, on a
voluntary basis, that provide contracted assisted living services,
enhanced adult residential care services, and adult residential
services throughout the state.
(2) The pilot program will test the validity of the comprehensive
assessment tool; identify the providers' actual costs of providing care
and services related to each care payment level; and test the adequacy
of case mix payment rates for each of the care payment levels.
(3) During the pilot program, the department shall adjust payment
rates for the levels of care as may be needed to sufficiently fund the
costs of providing care and services to medicaid residents.
(4) By December 12, 2004, the department shall report the results
of the case mix payment system pilot program to the chairs of the
health care committees of both houses of the legislature. The
department shall include in the report its findings regarding the
validity of the comprehensive assessment tool for categorizing
residents into meaningful care and payment groups; its findings
regarding the actual costs of providing care and services in each of
the care payment levels; and its findings regarding the rates of
payment, by level, that are necessary and reasonably related to the
costs of providing care and services to medicaid residents.
(5) This section expires December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---