BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.19.060 and 1997 c 428 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall review a filing as soon as reasonably
possible after made, to determine whether it meets the requirements of
this chapter.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 48.19.070 and 48.19.043:
(a) No such filing shall become effective within thirty days after
the date of filing with the commissioner, which period may be extended
by the commissioner for an additional period not to exceed fifteen days
if he or she gives notice within such waiting period to the insurer or
rating organization which made the filing that he or she needs such
additional time for the consideration of the filing. The commissioner
may, upon application and for cause shown, waive such waiting period or
part thereof as to a filing that he or she has not disapproved.
(b) A filing shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this
chapter unless disapproved by the commissioner within the waiting
period or any extension thereof.
(3) A filing made under this chapter that provides for an overall
statewide rate increase of less than ten percent annually in the
aggregate for coverages affected by the filing is not excessive in a
competitive market, and may be made effective the date it is filed. A
market is competitive where two or more authorized insurers are
actively writing new and renewal business on a statewide basis on the
line of insurance stated in the filing. The filing may be disapproved
by the commissioner on a prospective basis under RCW 48.19.120 only on
a showing that the filing is inadequate or unfairly discriminatory.

--- END ---