BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.23.430 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 9 s 23 are each amended
to read as follows:
In the case of contracts issued on or after the operative date of
this section as defined in RCW 48.23.520, no contract of annuity,
except as stated in RCW 48.23.420, may be delivered or issued for
delivery in this state unless it contains in substance the following
provisions, or corresponding provisions which in the opinion of the
commissioner are at least as favorable to the contract holder, upon
cessation of payment of considerations under the contract:
(1) That upon cessation of payment of considerations under a
contract, or upon the written request of the contract owner, the
company ((will)) shall grant a paid-up annuity benefit on a plan
stipulated in the contract of such value as is specified in RCW
48.23.450, 48.23.460, 48.23.470, 48.23.480, and 48.23.500;
(2) If a contract provides for a lump sum settlement at maturity,
or at any other time, that upon surrender of the contract at or before
the commencement of any annuity payments, the company ((will)) shall
pay in lieu of any paid-up annuity benefit a cash surrender benefit of
such amount as is specified in RCW 48.23.450, 48.23.460, 48.23.480, and
48.23.500. The company ((shall)) may reserve the right to defer the
payment of such cash surrender benefit for a period ((of)) not to
exceed six months after demand therefor with surrender of the contract
after making written request and receiving written approval of the
commissioner. The request shall address the necessity and equitability
to all policyholders of the deferral;
(3) A statement of the mortality table, if any, and interest rates
used in calculating any minimum paid-up annuity, cash surrender, or
death benefits that are guaranteed under the contract, together with
sufficient information to determine the amounts of such benefits; and
(4) A statement that any paid-up annuity, cash surrender, or death
benefits that may be available under the contract are not less than the
minimum benefits required by any statute of the state in which the
contract is delivered and an explanation of the manner in which such
benefits are altered by the existence of any additional amounts
credited by the company to the contract, any indebtedness to the
company on the contract, or any prior withdrawals from or partial
surrenders of the contract.
Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, any deferred
annuity contract may provide that if no considerations have been
received under a contract for a period of two full years and the
portion of the paid-up annuity benefit at maturity on the plan
stipulated in the contract arising from considerations paid before such
period would be less than twenty dollars monthly, the company may at
its option terminate the contract by payment in cash of the then
present value of the portion of the paid-up annuity benefit, calculated
on the basis of the mortality table, if any, and interest rate
specified in the contract for determining the paid-up annuity benefit,
and by such payment is relieved of any further obligation under such
contract.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.23.440 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 9 s 24 are each amended
to read as follows:
The minimum values as specified in RCW 48.23.450, 48.23.460,
48.23.470, 48.23.480, and 48.23.500 of any paid-up annuity, cash
surrender, or death benefits available under an annuity contract shall
be based upon minimum nonforfeiture amounts as defined in this section.
(1) ((With respect to contracts providing for flexible
considerations,)) The minimum nonforfeiture amount at any time at or
prior to the commencement of any annuity payments is equal to an
accumulation up to such time at ((a)) rates of interest ((of three
percent per annum of percentages)) as indicated in subsection (2) of
this section of the net considerations, as defined in this subsection,
paid prior to such time, decreased by the sum of the following:
(a) Any prior withdrawals from or partial surrenders of the
contract accumulated at ((a)) rates of interest ((of three percent per
annum)) as indicated in subsection (2) of this section; ((and))
(b) An annual contract charge of fifty dollars, accumulated at
rates of interest as indicated in subsection (2) of this section;
(c) Any premium tax paid by the insurer for the contract,
accumulated at rates of interest as indicated in subsection (2) of this
section; and
(d) The amount of any indebtedness to the company on the contract,
including interest due and accrued((, and increased by any existing
additional amounts credited by the company to the contract)).
The net considerations for a given contract year used to define the
minimum nonforfeiture amount shall be an amount ((not less than zero
and shall be)) equal to ((the corresponding)) eighty-seven and one-half
percent of the gross considerations credited to the contract during
that contract year ((less an annual contract charge of thirty dollars
and less a collection charge of one dollar and twenty-five cents per
consideration credited to the contract during that contract year. The
percentages of net considerations shall be sixty-five percent of the
net consideration for the first contract year and eighty-seven and one-half percent of the net considerations for the second and later
contract years. Notwithstanding the provisions of the preceding
sentence, the percentage shall be sixty-five percent of the portion of
the total net consideration for any renewal contract year which exceeds
by not more than two times the sum of those portions of the net
considerations in all prior contract years for which the percentage was
sixty-five percent.
(2) With respect to contracts providing for fixed scheduled
considerations, minimum nonforfeiture amounts shall be calculated on
the assumption that considerations are paid annually in advance and
shall be defined as for contracts with flexible considerations which
are paid annually with two exceptions:
(a) The portion of the net consideration for the first contract
year to be accumulated shall be the sum of sixty-five percent of the
net consideration for the first contract year plus twenty-two and one-half percent of the excess of the net consideration for the first
contract year over the lesser of the net considerations for the second
and third contract years; and
(b) The annual contract charge shall be the lesser of (i) thirty
dollars or (ii) ten percent of the gross annual consideration.
(3) With respect to contracts providing for a single consideration,
minimum nonforfeiture amounts shall be defined as for contracts with
flexible considerations except that the percentage of net consideration
used to determine the minimum nonforfeiture amount shall be equal to
ninety percent and the net consideration shall be the gross
consideration less a contract charge of seventy-five dollars)).
(2) The interest rate used in determining minimum nonforfeiture
amounts shall be an annual rate of interest determined as the lesser of
three percent per annum and the following, which shall be specified in
the contract if the interest rate will be reset:
(a) The five-year constant maturity treasury rate reported by the
federal reserve as of a date certain, or averaged over a period,
rounded to the nearest one-twentieth of one percent, specified in the
contract no longer than fifteen months prior to the contract issue date
or redetermination date under (d) of this subsection;
(b) Reduced by one hundred twenty-five basis points;
(c) Where the resulting interest rate is not less than one percent;
and
(d) The interest rate shall apply to an initial period and may be
redetermined for additional periods. The redetermination date, basis,
and period, if any, shall be stated in the contract. The basis is the
date or average over a specified period that produces the value of the
five-year constant maturity treasury rate to be used at each
redetermination date.
(3) During the period or term that a contract provides substantive
participation in an equity indexed benefit, it may increase the
reduction described in subsection (2)(b) of this section by up to an
additional one hundred basis points to reflect the value of the equity
index benefit. The present value at the contract issue date, and at
each redetermination date thereafter, of the additional reduction may
not exceed the market value of the benefit. The commissioner may
require a demonstration that the present value of the additional
reduction does not exceed the market value of the benefit. If a
demonstration is not acceptable to the commissioner, the commissioner
may disallow or limit the additional reduction.
(4) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement subsection (3) of
this section and to provide for further adjustments to the calculation
of minimum nonforfeiture amounts for contracts that provide substantive
participation in an equity index benefit and for other policies that
the commissioner determines justify an adjustment.
(5) Before January 1, 2006, an insurer may issue an annuity policy
under this section as in effect on December 31, 2003; or issue an
annuity policy under this section as in effect on July 1, 2004. On or
after January 1, 2006, an insurer must issue an annuity policy under
this section as in effect on or after July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---