BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.16.110 and 1963 c 4 s 36.16.110 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((board of)) county ((commissioners)) legislative authority in
each county shall, at its next regular or special meeting after being
appraised of any vacancy in any county, township, precinct, or road
district office of the county, fill the vacancy by the appointment of
some person qualified to hold such office, and the officers thus
appointed shall hold office until the next general election, and until
their successors are elected and qualified.
If a vacancy occurs in a partisan county office after the general
election in a year that the position appears on the ballot and before
the start of the next term, the term of the successor may commence once
he or she has qualified as defined in RCW 29.01.135 and shall continue
through the term for which he or she was elected.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.32.0558 and 1990 c 252 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Vacancies on a board of county commissioners consisting of five
members shall be filled as provided in RCW 36.32.070, except that:
(1) Whenever there are three or more vacancies, the governor shall
appoint one or more commissioners until there are a total of three
commissioners;
(2) Whenever there are two vacancies, the three commissioners shall
fill one of the vacancies; ((and))
(3) Whenever there is one vacancy, the four commissioners shall
fill the single vacancy; and
(4) Whenever there is a vacancy after the general election in a
year that the position appears on the ballot and before the start of
the next term, the term of the successor may commence once he or she
has qualified as defined in RCW 29.01.135 and shall continue through
the term for which he or she was elected.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.32.070 and 1990 c 252 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever there is a vacancy in the board of county commissioners,
except as provided in RCW 36.32.0558, it shall be filled as follows:
(1) If there are three vacancies, the governor of the state shall
appoint two of the officers. The two commissioners thus appointed
shall then meet and select the third commissioner. If the two
appointed commissioners fail to agree upon selection of the third after
the expiration of five days from the day they were appointed, the
governor shall appoint the remaining commissioner.
(2) Whenever there are two vacancies in the office of county
commissioner, the governor shall appoint one commissioner, and the two
commissioners then in office shall appoint the third commissioner. If
they fail to agree upon a selection after the expiration of five days
from the day of the governor's appointment, the governor shall appoint
the third commissioner.
(3) Whenever there is one vacancy in the office of county
commissioner, the two remaining commissioners shall fill the vacancy.
If the two commissioners fail to agree upon a selection after the
expiration of five days from the day the vacancy occurred, the governor
shall appoint the third commissioner.
(4) Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of county
commissioner after the general election in a year that the position
appears on the ballot and before the start of the next term, the term
of the successor may commence once he or she has qualified as defined
in RCW 29.01.135 and shall continue through the term for which he or
she was elected.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.12.040 and 2002 c 108 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a vacancy occurs in any partisan elective office in the
executive or legislative branches of state government or in any
partisan county elective office before the sixth Tuesday prior to the
primary for the next general election following the occurrence of the
vacancy, a successor shall be elected to that office at that general
election. Except during the last year of the term of office, if such
a vacancy occurs on or after the sixth Tuesday prior to the primary for
that general election, the election of the successor shall occur at the
next succeeding general election. The elected successor shall hold
office for the remainder of the unexpired term. This section shall not
apply to any vacancy occurring in a charter county which has charter
provisions inconsistent with this section.
(2) If a vacancy occurs in any legislative office or in any
partisan county office after the general election in a year that the
position appears on the ballot and before the start of the next term,
the term of the successor may commence once he or she has qualified as
defined in RCW 29.01.135 and shall continue through the term for which
he or she was elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2004, if
the proposed amendment to Article II, section 15 of the state
Constitution (HJR --) is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 2003. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

--- END ---