BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.027 and 2002 c 292 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A Washington state motor vehicle driver's license issued to any
service member if valid and in force and effect while such person is
serving in the armed forces, shall remain in full force and effect so
long as such service continues unless the same is sooner suspended,
canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law and for not to exceed
ninety days following the date on which the holder of such driver's
license is honorably separated from service in the armed forces of the
United States. A Washington state driver's license issued to the
spouse or dependent child of such service member likewise remains in
full force and effect if the person is residing with the service
member.
For purposes of this section, "service member" means every person
serving in the armed forces ((whose branch of service as of the date of
application for the driver's license is included in the definition of
veteran pursuant to RCW 41.04.007 or the person will meet the
definition of veteran at the time of discharge)), including those
serving in the armed forces reserves, National Guard, or Coast Guard
regardless of whether or not they have been called into federal service
by a presidential select reserve call up.

--- END ---