BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.044 and 1997 c 48 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board shall annually develop
information on the approximate amount of state support that students
receive. For students at state-supported colleges and universities,
the information shall include the approximate level of support received
by students in each tuition category. That information may include
consideration of the following: Expenditures included in the
educational cost formula, revenue forgiven from waived tuition and
fees, state-funded financial aid awarded to students at public
institutions, and all or a portion of appropriated amounts not
reflected in the educational cost formula for institutional programs
and services that may affect or enhance the educational experience of
students at a particular institution. For students attending a private
college, university, or proprietary school, the information shall
include the amount of state-funded financial aid awarded to students
attending the institution.
(2) Beginning July 30, 1993, the board shall annually provide
information appropriate to each institution's student body to each
state-supported four-year institution of higher education and to the
state board for community and technical colleges for distribution to
community colleges and technical colleges.
(3) Beginning July 30, 1993, the board shall annually provide
information on the level of financial aid received by students at that
institution to each private university, college, or proprietary school,
that enrolls students receiving state-funded financial aid.
(4)(a) Beginning with the 1997 fall academic term, each institution
of higher education described in subsection (2) or (3) of this section
shall provide to students at the institution information on the
approximate amount that the state is contributing to the support of
their education.
(b) Information provided to students at each state-supported
college and university shall include the approximate amount of state
support received by students in each tuition category at that
institution. The amount of state support shall be based on the
information provided by the higher education coordinating board under
subsections (1) through (3) of this section.
(5)(a) Beginning with the 2003 fall academic term, information
provided to students under subsection (4)(b) of this section shall
appear in a conspicuous location on all tuition and billing packets.
Information provided under subsection (4)(a) of this section shall be
provided on tuition and billing packets for resident undergraduate and
resident graduate students.
(b) Tuition and billing packets shall also contain a statement
informing students that they may request an itemized statement of fees
charged to all students.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the information
required in subsections (4) and (5) of this section shall be provided
to students at the beginning of each academic term through one or more
of the following: Registration materials, class schedules, tuition and
fee billing packets, student newspapers, or via e-mail or kiosk.

--- END ---