BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.128.070 and 1998 c 272 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A license shall remain valid unless voluntarily surrendered,
suspended, or revoked in accordance with this chapter.
(2)(a) Homes applying for a license shall be inspected at the time
of licensure.
(b) Homes licensed by the department shall be inspected at least
every eighteen months, subject to available funds. However, an adult
family home may be allowed to continue without inspection for two years
if the adult family home had no inspection citations for the past three
consecutive inspections.
(c) The department may make an unannounced inspection of a licensed
home at any time to assure that the home and provider are in compliance
with this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.
(3) If the department finds that the home is not in compliance with
this chapter, it shall require the home to correct any violations as
provided in this chapter.

--- END ---