BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that residents of the
state face preventable exposures to mold in their homes, apartments,
and schools. Exposure to mold, and the toxins they produce, have been
found to have adverse health effects, including loss of memory and
impairment of the ability to think coherently and function in a job,
and may cause fatigue, nausea, and headaches.
As steps can be taken by landlords and tenants to minimize exposure
to indoor mold, and as the reduction of exposure to mold in buildings
could reduce the rising number of mold-related claims submitted to
insurance companies and increase the availability of coverage, the
legislature supports providing tenants and landlords with information
designed to minimize the public's exposure to mold.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.060 and 2002 c 259 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The landlord will at all times during the tenancy keep the premises
fit for human habitation, and shall in particular:
(1) Maintain the premises to substantially comply with any
applicable code, statute, ordinance, or regulation governing their
maintenance or operation, which the legislative body enacting the
applicable code, statute, ordinance or regulation could enforce as to
the premises rented if such condition substantially endangers or
impairs the health or safety of the tenant;
(2) Maintain the roofs, floors, walls, chimneys, fireplaces,
foundations, and all other structural components in reasonably good
repair so as to be usable and capable of resisting any and all normal
forces and loads to which they may be subjected;
(3) Keep any shared or common areas reasonably clean, sanitary, and
safe from defects increasing the hazards of fire or accident;
(4) Provide a reasonable program for the control of infestation by
insects, rodents, and other pests at the initiation of the tenancy and,
except in the case of a single family residence, control infestation
during tenancy except where such infestation is caused by the tenant;
(5) Except where the condition is attributable to normal wear and
tear, make repairs and arrangements necessary to put and keep the
premises in as good condition as it by law or rental agreement should
have been, at the commencement of the tenancy;
(6) Provide reasonably adequate locks and furnish keys to the
tenant;
(7) Maintain all electrical, plumbing, heating, and other
facilities and appliances supplied by him in reasonably good working
order;
(8) Maintain the dwelling unit in reasonably weathertight
condition;
(9) Except in the case of a single family residence, provide and
maintain appropriate receptacles in common areas for the removal of
ashes, rubbish, and garbage, incidental to the occupancy and arrange
for the reasonable and regular removal of such waste;
(10) Except where the building is not equipped for the purpose,
provide facilities adequate to supply heat and water and hot water as
reasonably required by the tenant;
(11)(a) Provide a written notice to all tenants disclosing fire
safety and protection information. The landlord or his or her
authorized agent must provide a written notice to the tenant that the
dwelling unit is equipped with a smoke detection device as required in
RCW 48.48.140. The notice shall inform the tenant of the tenant's
responsibility to maintain the smoke detection device in proper
operating condition and of penalties for failure to comply with the
provisions of RCW 48.48.140(3). The notice must be signed by the
landlord or the landlord's authorized agent and tenant with copies
provided to both parties. Further, except with respect to a single-family residence, the written notice must also disclose the following:
(i) Whether the smoke detection device is hard-wired or battery
operated;
(ii) Whether the building has a fire sprinkler system;
(iii) Whether the building has a fire alarm system;
(iv) Whether the building has a smoking policy, and what that
policy is;
(v) Whether the building has an emergency notification plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants;
(vi) Whether the building has an emergency relocation plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants; and
(vii) Whether the building has an emergency evacuation plan for the
occupants and, if so, provide a copy to the occupants.
(b) The information required under this subsection may be provided
to a tenant in a multifamily residential building either as a written
notice or as a checklist that discloses whether the building has fire
safety and protection devices and systems. The checklist shall include
a diagram showing the emergency evacuation routes for the occupants.
(c) The written notice or checklist must be provided to new tenants
at the time the lease or rental agreement is signed, and must be
provided to current tenants as soon as possible, but not later than
January 1, 2004; ((and))
(12) Provide tenants with information or pamphlets provided by the
department of health about the health hazards associated with exposure
to indoor mold. The information must detail how tenants can control
mold growth in their dwelling units to minimize the health risks
associated with indoor mold. The information must be provided to new
tenants at the time the lease or rental agreement is signed, and must
be provided to current tenants no later than January 1, 2004;
(13) The landlord and his or her agents and employees are immune
from civil liability for failure to comply with subsection (12) of this
section except where the landlord and his or her agents and employees
knowingly and intentionally do not comply with subsection (12) of this
section; and
(14) Designate to the tenant the name and address of the person who
is the landlord by a statement on the rental agreement or by a notice
conspicuously posted on the premises. The tenant shall be notified
immediately of any changes by certified mail or by an updated posting.
If the person designated in this section does not reside in the state
where the premises are located, there shall also be designated a person
who resides in the county who is authorized to act as an agent for the
purposes of service of notices and process, and if no designation is
made of a person to act as agent, then the person to whom rental
payments are to be made shall be considered such agent;
No duty shall devolve upon the landlord to repair a defective
condition under this section, nor shall any defense or remedy be
available to the tenant under this chapter, where the defective
condition complained of was caused by the conduct of such tenant, his
family, invitee, or other person acting under his control, or where a
tenant unreasonably fails to allow the landlord access to the property
for purposes of repair. When the duty imposed by subsection (1) of
this section is incompatible with and greater than the duty imposed by
any other provisions of this section, the landlord's duty shall be
determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---