BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
The high school assessment system required under RCW 28A.655.060
that leads to a certificate of mastery shall include multiple measures
of assessment to determine whether students have met the standards for
a certificate of mastery. The superintendent of public instruction
shall develop valid and reliable multiple measures, which may include
but not be limited to, the Washington assessment of student learning,
a portfolio of evidence, high school grade point average, and academic
and vocational evaluations. The superintendent of public instruction
shall adopt these measures by rule not later than July 1, 2004.

--- END ---