BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington's
innovation and trade-driven economy has provided tremendous
opportunities for citizens of the state, but that there is no guarantee
that globally competitive firms will continue to grow and locate in the
state. The legislature also finds that developing an effective
economic development strategy for the state and operating effective
economic development programs, including workforce training, technology
transfer, and export assistance, are vital to the state's efforts to
encourage employment growth, increase state revenues, and generate
economic well-being. In addition, the legislature finds that there is
a need for responsive and consistent involvement of the private sector
in the state's economic development efforts. It is the intent of the
legislature to create an economic development commission that will
develop and update the state's economic development strategy and
performance measures and provide advice to and oversight of the
department of community, trade, and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The economic development commission is
established. The commission shall consist of seven members appointed
by the governor and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor for
three-year terms, except that through June 30, 2004, members currently
serving on the economic development commission created by executive
order may continue to serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
members of the commission shall be broadly representative of the
geographic regions of the state and at least two members shall be from
eastern Washington. In making appointments, the governor shall consult
with organizations that have an interest in economic development,
including, but not limited to, economic development councils, chambers
of commerce, port associations, industry associations, labor
organizations, minority business associations, and the chairs of the
legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development.
The commission chair shall be selected from among the appointed members
by majority vote of the members.
(2) The commission may establish committees as it desires and may
invite nonmembers of the commission to serve as committee members, but
the nonmembers shall not receive the reimbursement provided for by
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Members of the economic development commission shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(4) The economic development commission shall receive the necessary
staff support from the staff resources of the governor, the department
of community, trade, and economic development, and other state agencies
as appropriate, and within existing resources and operations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The economic development commission shall:
(1) Review and periodically update the state's economic development
strategy, including implementation steps and performance measures;
(2) Perform an annual evaluation of the strategy and the
effectiveness of the state's laws, policies, and programs which promote
economic development and make recommendations to the governor and the
legislature;
(3) Provide policy direction to the department of community, trade,
and economic development regarding: (a) Strategies that promote
business retention, expansion, and creation within the state; (b)
marketing strategies that promote products and services of the state;
(c) strategies that promote the business climate of the state and
stimulate increased national and international investment in the state;
(d) strategies to enhance relationships and cooperation on economic
development efforts between local governments, economic development
councils, federal agencies, state agencies, and the legislature; (e)
strategies to integrate economic development programs, including
workforce training, technology transfer, and export assistance; and (f)
strategies to make the funds available for economic development
purposes more flexible to meet emergent needs and maximize
opportunities;
(4) Assist the department of community, trade, and economic
development with the procurement and deployment of private funds for
business development, retention, expansion, and recruitment as well as
other economic development efforts; and
(5) Review and provide feedback on legislative proposals and
administrative initiatives and plans concerning economic development
issues.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.330.040 and 1993 c 280 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall supervise and administer the activities of
the department consistent with the policy direction provided by the
economic development commission created in section 2 of this act and
shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to community
and economic development matters affecting the state.
(2) In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director,
the director shall have the following powers and duties:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the
purposes of this chapter;
(b) Act for the state in the initiation of or participation in any
multigovernmental program relative to the purpose of this chapter;
(c) Accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of
federal or other funds;
(d) Appoint such deputy directors, assistant directors, and up to
seven special assistants as may be needed to administer the department.
These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;
(e) Prepare and submit budgets for the department for executive and
legislative action;
(f) Submit recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed
necessary to further the purposes of this chapter;
(g) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform
all other functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of
this chapter;
(h) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems
necessary for efficient administration, but the director shall be
responsible for the official acts of the officers and employees of the
department; and
(i) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.
(3) When federal or other funds are received by the department,
they shall be promptly transferred to the state treasurer and
thereafter expended only upon the approval of the director.
(4) The director may request information and assistance from all
other agencies, departments, and officials of the state, and may
reimburse such agencies, departments, or officials if such a request
imposes any additional expenses upon any such agency, department, or
official.
(5) The director shall, in carrying out the responsibilities of
office, consult with governmental officials, private groups, and
individuals and with officials of other states. All state agencies and
their officials and the officials of any political subdivision of the
state shall cooperate with and give such assistance to the department,
including the submission of requested information, to allow the
department to carry out its purposes under this chapter.
(6) The director may establish additional advisory or coordinating
groups with the legislature, within state government, with state and
other governmental units, with the private sector and nonprofit
entities or in specialized subject areas as may be necessary to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
(7) The internal affairs of the department shall be under the
control of the director in order that the director may manage the
department in a flexible and intelligent manner as dictated by changing
contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically limited by law, the
director shall have complete charge and supervisory powers over the
department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law,
and the director may employ such personnel as may be necessary in
accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---