BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.14.380 and 1981 c 332 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a portion of a fire protection district including at least sixty
percent of the assessed valuation of the real property of the district
is annexed to or incorporated into a code city, ownership of all of the
assets of the district shall be vested in the code city, upon payment
in cash, properties or contracts for fire protection services to the
district within one year, of a percentage of the value of said assets
equal to the percentage of the value of the real property in the entire
district remaining outside the incorporated or annexed area.
The fire protection district may elect, by a vote of a majority of
the persons residing outside the annexed area who vote on the
proposition, to require the annexing code city to assume responsibility
for the provision of fire protection, and for the operation and
maintenance of the district's property, facilities, and equipment
throughout the district and to pay the code city a reasonable fee for
such fire protection, operation, and maintenance.
If all of a fire protection district is included in an area that
incorporates as a city or town or is annexed to a city or town or fire
protection district, all of the assets and liabilities of the fire
protection district shall be transferred to the newly incorporated city
or town on the date on which the fire protection district ceases to
provide fire protection services pursuant to RCW 52.04.161 or to the
city or town or fire protection district upon the annexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 35.02.200 (Annexation/incorporation of fire protection
district -- Ownership of assets of fire protection district -- When less
than sixty percent) and 1997 c 245 s 2;
(2) RCW 35.02.202 (Annexation/incorporation of fire protection
district -- Delay of transfer) and 1991 c 360 s 7;
(3) RCW 35.02.205 (Annexation/incorporation of fire protection
district -- Distribution of assets of district when less than five
percent of district annexed -- Distribution agreement -- Arbitration) and
1993 c 262 s 4 & 1989 c 267 s 3; and
(4) RCW 35A.14.400 (Ownership of assets of fire protection
district -- When less than sixty percent of assessed valuation is annexed
or incorporated in code city) and 1989 c 267 s 2 & 1967 ex.s. c 119 s
35A.14.400.

--- END ---