BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.36.021 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 355 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of assault in the second degree if he or
she, under circumstances not amounting to assault in the first degree:
(a) Intentionally assaults another and thereby recklessly inflicts
substantial bodily harm; or
(b) Intentionally and unlawfully causes substantial bodily harm to
an unborn quick child by intentionally and unlawfully inflicting any
injury upon the mother of such child; or
(c) Assaults another with a deadly weapon; or
(d) With intent to inflict bodily harm, administers to or causes to
be taken by another, poison or any other destructive or noxious
substance; or
(e) With intent to commit a felony, assaults another; or
(f) Knowingly inflicts bodily harm which by design causes such pain
or agony as to be the equivalent of that produced by torture; or
(g) Assaults a law enforcement officer who was performing his or
her official duties at the time of the assault and caused bodily harm
to the officer while:
(i) Attempting to exert physical control over the officer; or
(ii) Attempting to gain access to the officer's weapon.
(2) Assault in the second degree is a class B felony, except that
assault in the second degree with a finding of sexual motivation under
RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135 is a class A felony.

--- END ---