BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Association" means the joint underwriting association
established under this chapter.
(2) "Gynecologist and obstetrician insurance" or "insurance" means
insurance coverage against the legal liability of the insured and
against loss damage or expense incident to a claim arising out of the
death or injury of a person as a result of negligence or malpractice in
rendering professional service by a licensee.
(3) "Licensee" means a person or facility licensed to provide
gynecological or obstetrical services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The insurance commissioner shall approve by
December 31, 2003, a reasonable plan for the establishment of a
nonprofit, joint underwriting association for gynecologist and
obstetrician insurance subject to the conditions and limitations
contained in this chapter. This plan must include a market assistance
plan to be used prior to activating a joint underwriting association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The association is comprised of all insurers
possessing a certificate of authority to write and engaged in writing
medical malpractice insurance within this state and general casualty
companies. Every insurer must be a member of the association and must
remain a member as a condition of its authority to continue to transact
business in this state. Only licensees may participate in the joint
underwriting authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A licensee may apply to the association to
purchase insurance and the association must offer a policy with
liability limits of one million dollars per claim and three million
dollars per annual aggregate, or any other minimum level of mandated
coverage as determined by the department of licensing. The insurance
commissioner shall require the use of a rating plan for malpractice
insurance that permits rates to be modified according to practice
volume. Any rating plan for malpractice insurance used under this
section must be based on sound actuarial principles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The insurance commissioner may select an
insurer to administer a plan established under this chapter. The
insurer must be admitted to transact the business of insurance of the
state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The insurance commissioner may not approve
a policy written on a claims made basis by an insurer doing business in
this state unless the insurer guarantees to the commissioner the
continued availability of suitable liability protection for licensees
subsequent to the discontinuance of professional practice by a licensee
or the sooner termination of the insurance policy by the insurer for so
long as there is a reasonable probability of a claim for injury for
which the licensee might be liable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A risk management program for insureds of
the association must be established as a part of the plan. This
program must include but not be limited to: Investigation and analysis
of frequency, severity, and causes of adverse or untoward outcomes;
development of measures to control these injuries; systematic reporting
of incidents; investigation and analysis of patient complaints; and
education of association members to improve quality of care and risk
reduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The insurance commissioner may adopt all
rules necessary to ensure the efficient, equitable operation of the
association, including but not limited to, rules requiring or limiting
certain policy provisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---