BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the agricultural
lands of the Skagit valley provide a vibrant local economy, valuable
habitat for waterfowl, and agricultural products enjoyed throughout the
world. The legislature also finds that the Skagit estuary is an
important habitat for Puget Sound salmon, and that agriculture and
salmon protection are not mutually exclusive. The current efforts by
the Washington department of fish and wildlife to address fish passage
in the Skagit watershed through conditions on individual permits do not
take into account broader impacts to the Skagit community, and do not
allow for a watershed-wide approach to salmon recovery.
Therefore, the legislature intends to require the development of a
strategy to protect and recover salmon in the Skagit watershed, while
preserving agricultural lands and a viable agriculture industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of fish and wildlife, in
coordination with Skagit county, shall develop a strategy to address
the management, operation, and maintenance of tide gates in the Skagit
watershed. The strategy must be submitted to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2004. The strategy must
consist of the following elements:
(a) An inventory of existing tide gates in the Skagit watershed.
The inventory must include location, age, type, and maintenance history
of the tide gate, and other factors as determined by the department;
(b) An assessment of the role of tide gates in the Skagit
watershed. The department of fish and wildlife shall assess the role
of tidal sloughs in salmon life stages, the characteristics of properly
functioning sloughs, the effect of tide gates on tidal sloughs, the
economic impacts of tide gate removal, and alternatives to tide gate
removal; and
(c) A long-term proposal for tide gate management to meet the two
goals of salmon recovery and preservation of agricultural lands. The
department of fish and wildlife and Skagit county shall convene a work
group of interested parties, including local landowners, tribes, local
governments, federal fishery agencies, and representatives of the local
lead entity under RCW 77.85.050, to develop the proposal, based on the
inventory and assessment under (a) and (b) of this subsection. The
proposal should include methods to increase fish passage and enhance
habitat on public lands, voluntary methods to increase fish passage on
private lands, a priority list of fish passage projects, operation and
maintenance standards for tide gates where fish passage will not be
required, and recommendations for funding of high priority projects.
(2)(a) The department of fish and wildlife may not require fish
passage as a condition of hydraulic project approval for maintenance or
replacement of agricultural drainage systems under RCW 77.55.100 until
July 1, 2005, after the strategy developed under section 1 of this act
is reviewed by the legislature.
(b) Any condition requiring fish passage in an existing hydraulic
project approval issued under chapter 77.55 RCW is stayed until July 1,
2005.

--- END ---