BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
The board of commissioners of a water-sewer district with fewer
than two hundred fifty customers on the effective date of this act may
by resolution declare that it is in the best interests of the district
for a code city, with a population greater than one hundred thousand on
the effective date of this act, to assume jurisdiction of the district.
None of the territory of the water-sewer district need be included
within the territory of the city. If the city legislative body agrees
in principle to assume jurisdiction of the district, it shall by
resolution declare its intent to assume the district. The district and
the city shall enter into a contract regarding the time and manner of
assumption and any other matters desired by the district and the city,
including but not limited to the matters set forth in RCW 35.13A.070.
The contract may provide for dissolution of the district pursuant to
the jointly authorized petition process in RCW 35.13A.080. The
contract and assumption shall be approved by resolution of the board of
commissioners and ordinance of the city council. If the water-sewer
district has no indebtedness or monetary obligations on the date of
assumption, the city shall use any surplus funds only for water
services delivered to and water facilities constructed in the former
territory of the district, unless provided otherwise in the contract.

--- END ---