BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state, under chapter 41.56 RCW, has
established guidelines and factors to be considered in determining
interest arbitration decisions setting compensation and benefit
spending levels for certain public employees. These guidelines and
factors include consideration of the consumer price index to help
determine compensation levels. Subsequent to the enactment of chapter
41.56 RCW, the people of the state, through voter approval, have
adopted state referenda and initiatives establishing the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption as the standard and basis for
determining inflationary increases in governmental spending and revenue
authority.
The legislature finds that the use of the consumer price index in
chapter 41.56 RCW is in conflict and incompatible with recent voter-approved legislation adopting the implicit price deflator as the basis
for determining increases in spending and revenue authority. The
legislature intends to eliminate this conflict by amending chapter
41.56 RCW to adopt the implicit price deflator as a basis for
determining increases in compensation levels.
The legislature also finds it in the interest and welfare of the
public for the arbitration panel to consider the financial ability of
the respective unit of government.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.465 and 1995 c 273 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making its determination, the panel shall be mindful of the
legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430 and, as additional
standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision, it shall take
into consideration the following factors:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c)(((i))) The interest and welfare of the public as determined by
the governing body of the public employer and the financial ability,
excluding reserves, of the public employer to meet the costs of the
parties' proposals, without requiring the reduction of programs or
staff and giving due consideration and weight to the other services
provided by, and the other priorities of the public employer as
determined by its governing body;
(d) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7) (a) through (((d)))
(h), comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of like personnel of like employers of similar
size on the west coast of the United States. However, when an adequate
number of comparable employers exists within the state of Washington,
other west coast employers may not be considered;
(((ii) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7)(e) through (h),
comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of like personnel of public fire departments
of similar size on the west coast of the United States. However, when
an adequate number of comparable employers exists within the state of
Washington, other west coast employers may not be considered;
(d) The average consumer prices for goods and services, commonly
known as the cost of living;))
(e) The percentage change in the implicit price deflator for
personal consumption expenditures for the United States as published by
the bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce
for the year preceding the year in which interest arbitration panel
proceedings are initiated;
(f) In making economic determinations, internal equity and local
labor market considerations shall be given substantial weight;
(g) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through (d) of
this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings; and
(((f))) (h) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under
(a) through (((e))) (g) of this subsection, that are normally or
traditionally taken into consideration in the determination of wages,
hours, and conditions of employment. For those employees listed in RCW
41.56.030(7)(a) who are employed by the governing body of a city or
town with a population of less than fifteen thousand, or a county with
a population of less than seventy thousand, consideration must also be
given to regional differences in the cost of living.
(2) Subsection (1)(((c))) (d) of this section may not be construed
to authorize the panel to require the employer to pay, directly or
indirectly, the increased employee contributions resulting from chapter
502, Laws of 1993 or chapter 517, Laws of 1993 as required under
chapter 41.26 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.56.492 and 1993 c 473 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the classes of employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7),
the provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.452, 41.56.470,
41.56.480, and 41.56.490 shall also be applicable to the employees of
a public passenger transportation system of a metropolitan municipal
corporation, county transportation authority, public transportation
benefit area, or city public passenger transportation system, subject
to the following:
(1) Negotiations between the public employer and the bargaining
representative may commence at any time agreed to by the parties. If
no agreement has been reached ninety days after commencement of
negotiations, either party may demand that the issues in disagreement
be submitted to a mediator. The services of the mediator shall be
provided by the commission without cost to the parties, but nothing in
this section or RCW 41.56.440 shall be construed to prohibit the public
employer and the bargaining representative from agreeing to substitute
at their own expense some other mediator or mediation procedure; and
(2) If an agreement has not been reached following a reasonable
period of negotiations and mediation, and the mediator finds that the
parties remain at impasse, either party may demand that the issues in
disagreement be submitted to an arbitration panel for a binding and
final determination. In making its determination, the arbitration
panel shall be mindful of the legislative purpose enumerated in RCW
41.56.430 and as additional standards or guidelines to aid it in
reaching a ((decisions [decision])) decision, shall take into
consideration the following factors:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c) The interest and welfare of the public as determined by the
governing body of the public employer and the financial ability,
excluding reserves, of the public employer to meet the costs of the
parties' proposals, without requiring the reduction of programs or
staff and giving due consideration and weight to the other services
provided by, and the other priorities of the public employer as
determined by its governing body;
(d) Compensation package comparisons, economic indices, fiscal
constraints, and similar factors determined by the arbitration panel to
be pertinent to the case; ((and
(d))) (e) The percentage change in the implicit price deflator for
personal consumption expenditures for the United States as published by
the bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce
for the year preceding the year in which interest arbitration panel
proceedings are initiated;
(f) In making economic determinations, internal equity and local
labor market considerations shall be given substantial weight; and
(g) Such other factors, not confined to the foregoing, which are
normally or traditionally taken into consideration in the determination
of wages, hours, and conditions of employment.

--- END ---