BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
recognize that there persists a large group of children who spend a
significant part of their life in foster care - traumatized by an
unrelieved separation, connected by blood ties that can be broken but
never forgotten, torn between loyalties to birth family and foster
family, alienated from memories both good and bad, disinherited from
genetic endowment, ethnicity, and lineage and trying to face the future
without a foundation from their past. Societal change warrants
flexibility and openness to an expanded continuum of care arrangements.
Interventions must focus on the best interests of the child. It is
vital that full regard be given for active partnership of birth parents
to the degree they are capable, within the foster care team. It is in
the best interest of the child to do so. The ultimate purpose of any
intervention into the life of a child is to improve it. Creating and
sanctioning a connection between a child's birth parents and foster
family will result in better relationships among birth families,
children, foster families, and social workers. It will provide greater
foster placement stability and decreased disruptions as well as greater
satisfaction for foster parents and social workers. It is the intent
of the legislature to stress that all those individuals connected to
the child in placement must have an abiding appreciation of the
seriousness of a child's separation from the past whether it be of
short, long, or permanent duration. Every child has a history and
every foster child comes into placement with that history. It is the
intent of the legislature to recognize and honor that history.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.260 and 2002 c 52 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In an attempt to minimize the inherent intrusion in the lives
of families involved in the foster care system and to maintain parental
authority where appropriate, the department, absent good cause, shall
follow the wishes of the natural parent regarding the placement of the
child. Preferences such as family constellation, sibling
relationships, ethnicity, and religion shall be considered when
matching children to foster homes. Parental authority is appropriate
in areas that are not connected with the abuse or neglect that resulted
in the dependency and shall be integrated through the foster care team.
(2) When a child is placed in out-of-home care foster parents are
encouraged to:
(a) Provide consultation to the foster care team based upon their
experience with the child placed in their care;
(b) Mentor the birth parents by helping them understand their
child's needs and correlating appropriate parenting responses;
(c) Participate in educational activities, and enter into
community-building activities with birth families and other foster
families;
(d) Transport children to family time visits with birth families
and assist children and their families in maximizing the purposefulness
of family time.
(3) For purposes of this section, "foster care team" means the
foster parent currently providing care, the currently assigned social
worker, and the parent or parents; and "birth family" means the persons
described in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a).

--- END ---