BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to recognize the significant
financial commitment made by providers to construct new or remodeled
housing for the state's elderly who receive medicaid contracted
assisted living services in boarding homes. Therefore, boarding home
providers who had submitted new construction plans, or plans to remodel
an existing boarding home to the department of health, construction
review, before June 30, 2002, shall, on the effective date of this act,
receive a capital rate add-on as long as:
(1) The boarding home provider was receiving a capital rate add-on
payment before June 30, 2002; and
(2) The boarding home was built or remodeled to provide the
following:
(a) Private apartment-like units;
(b) A kitchen area equipped with a refrigerator, a microwave oven
or stovetop, and a counter or table for food preparation. In a new
facility, a kitchen area must also be equipped with a sink and counter
area, and storage space for utensils and supplies;
(c) A lockable entry door;
(d) A separate private bathroom, including a sink, toilet, and
shower or bathtub. In a new facility, a minimum of fifty percent of
the bathrooms shall be wheelchair accessible and have a roll-in shower;
(e) In a remodeled facility, an individual unit shall have a
minimum of one hundred eighty square feet including counters, closets,
and built-ins, excluding the bathroom. In a new facility, an
individual unit shall have a minimum of two hundred twenty square feet
including counters, closets, and built-ins, excluding the bathroom;
(f) A living area shall be wired for telephone service and, where
geographically possible, wired for television service;
(g) In a new facility, the contractor shall provide a private
accessible mailbox; and
(h) A home-like smoke-free common area or areas with sufficient
space for socialization designed to meet resident needs.
The capital rate add-on payment made under this section shall be at
least equal to the rate amount received before implementation of the
capital rate add-on reduction in funding resulting from chapter 371,
Laws of 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---