BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is imperative
that public health officials and their staff have the necessary
authority and discretion to take actions as are necessary to protect
the health and welfare of their particular communities that reflect the
priorities of their communities. Public health challenges vary from
community to community, and that local health departments need the
flexibility to respond to our communities' diverse needs.
Further, while the state department of health has mosquito
abatement authority under RCW 70.22.050, certain counties of the state,
contain mosquito abatement districts, and local public health
departments also have mosquito abatement authority. Since mosquitoes
pose a serious public health hazard with regard to contagious disease,
the legislature determines that Washington's citizens would be greatly
benefited by having the department of health institute a work group to
determine how best to protect local communities from mosquito-borne
disease.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 In order to assist local health departments
in dealing with mosquito abatement, the department of health shall
consult with mosquito abatement district representatives, the
Washington state association of counties, representatives of local
public health districts, and other interested entities. The department
shall analyze and present findings on the best means to address
mosquito abatement. The issues to be addressed include, but are not
limited to, the responsibility for abatement of nuisance breeding
places for mosquitoes, as defined in RCW 17.28.170.
The department of health shall submit its findings in a report,
along with recommendations, on or before December 1, 2003, to the
appropriate committees of the legislature.

--- END ---