BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.100 and 2002 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application. The application of a person under the age of
eighteen years for a driver's license or a motorcycle endorsement must
be signed by a parent or guardian with custody of the minor. If the
person under the age of eighteen has no father, mother, or guardian,
then the application must be signed by the minor's employer.
(2) Traffic safety education requirement. For a person under the
age of eighteen years to obtain a driver's license he or she must meet
the traffic safety education requirements of this subsection.
(a) To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a driver's
license the applicant must satisfactorily complete a traffic safety
education course as defined in RCW ((28A.220.020 for a course offered
by a school district, or as defined by the department of licensing))
46.82.280 for a course offered by a driver training school licensed
under chapter 46.82 RCW. ((The course offered by a school district or
an approved private school must meet the standards established by the
office of the state superintendent of public instruction.)) The course
offered by a driver training school must meet the standards established
by the department of licensing ((with the advice of)) through the
((driver instructors')) training school advisory committee, pursuant to
RCW 46.82.300. The traffic safety education course may be provided by:
(i) A ((recognized secondary)) public or private school with a
traffic safety education course meeting the requirements of chapter
46.82 RCW; or
(ii) A commercial driver training school licensed under chapter
46.82 RCW that is annually approved by the department of licensing.
(b) To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a
motorcycle endorsement, the applicant must successfully complete a
motorcycle safety education course that meets the standards established
by the department of licensing.
(c) The department may waive the traffic safety education
requirement for a driver's license if the applicant demonstrates to the
department's satisfaction that:
(i) He or she was unable to take or complete a traffic safety
education course;
(ii) A need exists for the applicant to operate a motor vehicle;
and
(iii) He or she has the ability to operate a motor vehicle in such
a manner as not to jeopardize the safety of persons or property.
The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection (2)(c)(( in
concert with the supervisor of the traffic safety education section of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction)).
(d) The department may waive the traffic safety education
requirement if the applicant was licensed to drive a motor vehicle or
motorcycle outside this state and provides proof that he or she has had
education equivalent to that required under this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.055 and 2002 c 352 s 10 and 2002 c 195 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee of fifteen dollars, and meets the following
requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education ((program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction
or)) course offered by a ((driving [driver])) driver training school
((licensed and inspected)) approved by the department of licensing
under chapter 46.82 RCW, that includes practice driving.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in((:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280(1))) a traffic safety education
course offered by a driver training school approved by the department
of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW.
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit; and
(b) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.070 and 2002 c 352 s 11 and 2002 c 195 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Agricultural driving permit authorized. The director may issue
a juvenile agricultural driving permit to a person under the age of
eighteen years if:
(a) The application is signed by the applicant and the applicant's
father, mother, or legal guardian;
(b) The applicant has passed the driving examination required by
RCW 46.20.120;
(c) The department has investigated the applicant's need for the
permit and determined that the need justifies issuance;
(d) The department has determined the applicant is capable of
operating a motor vehicle without endangering himself or herself or
other persons and property; and
(e) The applicant has paid a fee of fifteen dollars.
The permit must contain a photograph of the person.
(2) Effect of agricultural driving permit. (a) The permit
authorizes the holder to:
(i) Drive a motor vehicle on the public highways of this state in
connection with farm work. The holder may drive only within a
restricted farming locality described on the permit; and
(ii) Participate in the classroom portion of a traffic safety
education course ((authorized under RCW 28A.220.030 or the classroom
portion of a traffic safety education course)) offered by a driver
training school ((licensed and inspected)) approved by the department
of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW offered in the community where the
holder resides.
(b) The director may transfer the permit from one farming locality
to another. A transfer is not a renewal of the permit.
(3) Term and renewal of agricultural driving permit. An
agricultural driving permit expires one year from the date of issue.
(a) A person under the age of eighteen who holds a permit may renew
the permit by paying a fee of fifteen dollars.
(b) An agricultural driving permit is invalidated when a permittee
attains age eighteen. In order to drive a motor vehicle on a highway
he or she must obtain a motor vehicle driver's license under this
chapter.
(4) Suspension, revocation, or cancellation. The director has sole
discretion to suspend, revoke, or cancel a juvenile agricultural
driving permit if:
(a) The permittee has been found to have committed an offense that
requires mandatory suspension or revocation of a driver's license; or
(b) The director is satisfied that the permittee has violated the
permit's restrictions.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.82.280 and 1986 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Driver training school" means a commercial driver training
school ((engaged in the business of giving instruction, for a fee, in
the operation of automobiles)), a public school, or a private school
providing traffic safety education courses.
(2) "Commercial driver training school" means a private driver
training school engaged in the business of giving traffic safety
education for a fee.
(3) "Public school" means a public high school that teaches
children in grades ten through twelve at a minimum.
(4) "Private school" means a school approved under chapter 28A.195
RCW.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing of
the state of Washington.
(((3))) (6) "Advisory committee" means the ((driving instructors'))
driver training school advisory committee as created in this chapter.
(((4))) (7) "Fraudulent practices" means any conduct or
representation on the part of a licensee under this chapter tending to
induce anyone to believe, or to give the impression, that a license to
operate a motor vehicle or any other license granted by the director
may be obtained by any means other than those prescribed by law, or
furnishing or obtaining the same by illegal or improper means, or
requesting, accepting, or collecting money for such purposes.
(((5))) (8) "Instructor" means any person employed by a driver
training school to instruct ((persons in the operation of automobiles))
a traffic safety education course.
(((6))) (9) "Place of business" means a designated location at
which the business of a commercial driver training school is transacted
and its records are kept.
(((7))) (10) "Person" means any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, or association.
(11) "Traffic safety education course" means a course of
instruction in traffic safety education that includes classroom
instruction and on-street driving instruction. Each phase shall meet
basic course requirements that shall be established by the department
of licensing and each part of the course shall be taught by an
instructor certified under RCW 46.82.320.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.82 RCW
to read as follows:
Any public or private school may contract with a commercial driver
training school for the instruction of a traffic safety education
course.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.82.300 and 2002 c 195 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall be assisted in the duties and
responsibilities of this chapter by the driver ((instructors'))
training school advisory committee, consisting of five members.
Members of the advisory committee shall be appointed by the director
for two-year terms and shall consist of a representative of the driver
training schools, a representative of the driving instructors (who
shall not be from the same school as the school member), a
representative of the superintendent of public instruction, a
representative of the department of licensing, and a representative
from the Washington state traffic safety commission. Members shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. A member who is receiving a salary from the state shall not
receive compensation other than travel expenses incurred in such
service.
(2) The advisory committee shall meet at least semiannually and
shall have additional meetings as may be called by the director. The
director or the director's representative shall attend all meetings of
the advisory committee and shall serve as chairman.
(3) Duties of the advisory committee shall be to:
(a) Advise and confer with the director or the director's
representative on matters pertaining to the establishment of rules
necessary to carry out this chapter;
(b) Review violations of this chapter and to recommend to the
director appropriate enforcement or disciplinary action as provided in
this chapter;
(c) Review and update when necessary a curriculum consisting of a
list of items of knowledge and the processes of driving a motor vehicle
specifying the minimum requirements adjudged necessary in teaching a
proper and adequate course of driver education;
(d) Review and update instructor certification standards to be
consistent with RCW 46.82.330 and take into consideration those
standards required to be met by ((traffic safety education)) teachers
under ((RCW 28A.220.020(3))) chapter 28A.410 RCW when the instructors
are teaching children under the age of eighteen; and
(e) Prepare the examination for a driver instructor's certificate
and review examination results at least once each calendar year for the
purpose of updating and revising examination standards.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.82.310 and 2002 c 352 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall engage in the business of conducting a
commercial driver training school without a license issued by the
director for that purpose. An application for a commercial driver
training school license shall be filed with the director, containing
such information as prescribed by the director, accompanied by an
application fee of three hundred dollars, which shall in no event be
refunded. If an application is approved by the director, the applicant
upon payment of an additional fee of two hundred dollars shall be
granted a license valid for a period of one year from the date of
issuance.
(2) The annual fee for renewal of a commercial driver training
school license shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The director shall
issue a license certificate to each licensee which shall be
conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the licensee. If
a renewal application has not been received by the director within
sixty days from the date a notice of license expiration was mailed to
the licensee, the license will be void requiring a new application as
provided for in this chapter, including payment of all fees.
(3) The person to whom a commercial driver training school license
has been issued must notify the director in writing within thirty days
after any change is made in the officers, directors, or location of the
place of business of the school.
(4) Commercial driver training school licenses shall not be
transferable. In the event of any transfer of ownership in the
business, an application for a new license, including payment of all
fees, must be made. The director shall permit continuance of the
business for a period not to exceed sixty days from the date of
transfer pending approval of the new application for a school license.
(5) The director shall not issue or renew a commercial driver
training school license certificate until the licensee has filed with
the director evidence of liability insurance coverage with an insurance
company authorized to do business in this state in the amount of not
less than three hundred thousand dollars because of bodily injury or
death to two or more persons in any one accident, not less than one
hundred thousand dollars because of bodily injury or death to one
person in one accident, and not less than fifty thousand dollars
because of property damage to others in one accident, and the coverage
shall include uninsured motorists coverage. The insurance coverage
shall be maintained in full force and effect and the director shall be
notified at least ten days prior to cancellation or expiration of any
such policy of insurance.
(6) The increased insurance requirements of subsection (5) of this
section must be in effect by no later than one year after September 1,
1979.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.82.320 and 2002 c 352 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person, including the owner, operator, partner, officer, or
stockholder of a driver training school shall give instruction ((in the
operation of an automobile for a fee)) for a traffic safety education
course without a license issued by the director for that purpose. An
application for an instructor's license shall be filed with the
director, containing such information as prescribed by the director,
accompanied by an application fee of seventy-five dollars, which shall
in no event be refunded. If the application is approved by the
director and the applicant satisfactorily meets the examination
requirements as prescribed in RCW 46.82.330, the applicant shall be
granted a license valid for a period of one year from the date of
issuance. An instructor shall take a requalification examination every
five years.
(2) The annual fee for renewal of an instructor's license shall be
twenty-five dollars. The director shall issue a license certificate to
each licensee which shall be conspicuously displayed in the place of
business of the employing driver training school. Unless revoked,
canceled, or denied by the director, the license shall remain the
property of the licensee in the event of termination of employment or
employment by another driver training school. If a renewal application
has not been received by the director within sixty days from the date
a notice of license expiration was mailed to the licensee, the license
will be voided requiring a new application as provided for in this
chapter, including examination and payment of all fees.
(3) Persons who qualify under the rules ((jointly)) adopted by the
((superintendent of public instruction and the)) director of licensing
to teach only the laboratory phase, shall be subject to a ten dollar
examination fee.
(4) Each licensee shall be provided with a wallet-size
identification card by the director at the time the license is issued
which shall be carried on the instructor's person at all times while
engaged in instructing.
(5) The person to whom an instructor's license has been issued
shall notify the director in writing within thirty days of any change
of employment or termination of employment, providing the name and
address of the new driver training school by whom the instructor will
be employed.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.82.350 and 1979 ex.s. c 51 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director may suspend, revoke, deny, or refuse to renew an
instructor's license or a commercial driver training school license for
any of the following causes:
(a) Upon determination that the licensee has made a false statement
or concealed any material fact in connection with the application or
license renewal;
(b) Upon conviction of the applicant, licensee, or any person
directly or indirectly interested in the driver training school's
business of a felony, or any crime involving violence, dishonesty,
deceit, indecency, degeneracy, or moral turpitude;
(c) Upon determination that the applicant, licensee, or any person
directly or indirectly interested in the driver training school's
business previously held a driver training school license which was
revoked, suspended, or refused renewal by the director;
(d) Upon determination that the applicant or licensee does not have
a place of business as required by this chapter;
(e) Upon determination that the applicant or licensee has failed to
require all persons with financial interest in the driver training
school to be signatories to the application;
(f) Upon determination that the applicant or licensee has been
found guilty of fraud or fraudulent practices in relation to the
business conducted under the license, or guilty of inducing another to
resort to fraud in relation to securing for himself, herself, or
another a license to drive a motor vehicle; or
(g) Upon determination that the applicant or licensee fails to
satisfy the other conditions stated in this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.82.360 and 1989 c 337 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The license of any driver training school or instructor may be
suspended, revoked, denied, or refused renewal for failure to comply
with the business practices specified in this section.
(1) No place of business shall be established nor any business of
a commercial driver training school conducted or solicited within one
thousand feet of an office or building owned or leased by the
department of licensing in which examinations for drivers' licenses are
conducted. The distance of one thousand feet shall be measured along
the public streets by the nearest route from the place of business to
such building.
(2) Any automobile used by a driver training school or an
instructor for instruction purposes must be equipped with:
(a) Dual controls for foot brake and clutch, or foot brake only in
a vehicle equipped with an automatic transmission;
(b) An instructor's rear view mirror; and
(c) A sign displayed on the back or top, or both, of the vehicle
not less than twenty inches in horizontal width or less than ten inches
in vertical height and having the words "student driver" or
"instruction car," or both, in legible, printed, English letters at
least two and one-half inches in height near the top and the name of
the school in similarly legible letters not less than one inch in
height placed somewhere below the aforementioned words, and the street
number and name and the telephone number in similarly legible letters
at least one inch in height placed next below the name of the school.
The lettering and background colors shall be of contrasting shades so
as to be clearly readable at one hundred feet in clear daylight. The
sign shall be displayed at all times when instruction is being given.
(3) Instruction may not be given by an instructor to a student in
an automobile unless the student possesses a current and valid
instruction permit issued pursuant to RCW 46.20.055 or a current and
valid driver's license.
(4) No commercial driver training school or instructor shall
advertise or otherwise indicate that the issuance of a driver's license
is guaranteed or assured as a result of the course of instruction
offered.
(5) No commercial driver training school or instructor shall
utilize any types of advertising without using the full, legal name of
the school and identifying itself as a commercial driver training
school. Items and services advertised must be available in a manner as
might be expected by the average person reading the advertisement.
(6) A commercial driver training school shall have an established
place of business owned, rented, or leased by the school and regularly
occupied and used exclusively for the business of giving driver
instruction. The established place of business of a commercial driver
training school that applies for an initial license after July 23,
1989, shall be located in a district that is zoned for business or
commercial purposes. The established place of business, branch office,
or classroom or advertised address of any such commercial driver
training school shall not consist of or include a house trailer,
residence, tent, temporary stand, temporary address, bus, telephone
answering service if such service is the sole means of contacting the
driver training school, a room or rooms in a hotel or rooming house or
apartment house, or premises occupied by a single or multiple-unit
dwelling house. To classify as a branch office or classroom the
facility must be within a thirty-five mile radius of the established
place of business. Nothing in this subsection may be construed as
limiting the authority of local governments to grant conditional use
permits or variances from zoning ordinances.
(7) No commercial driver training school or instructor shall
conduct any type of instruction or training on a course used by the
department of licensing for testing applicants for a Washington
driver's license.
(8) Each driver training school shall maintain records on all of
its students, including the student's name and address, the starting
and ending dates of instruction, the student's instruction permit or
driver's license number, the type of training given, and the total
number of hours of instruction. Records of past students shall be
maintained for five years following the completion of the instruction.
(9) Each driver training school shall, at its ((established place
of business)) location, display, in a place where it can be seen by all
clients, a copy of the required minimum curriculum compiled by the
((driver)) advisory committee. Copies of the required minimum
curriculum are to be provided to driver training schools and
instructors by the director.
(10) Driver training schools and instructors shall submit to
periodic inspections of their business practices, facilities, records,
and insurance by authorized representatives of the director of the
department of licensing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 28A.220
RCW to read as follows:
Public and private schools may offer a traffic safety education
course under the provisions of chapter 46.82 RCW to meet the traffic
safety education requirement in RCW 46.20.100 for persons under the age
of eighteen.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.220.010 (Legislative declaration) and 1977 c 76 s 1;
(2) RCW 28A.220.020 (Definitions) and 1990 c 33 s 218, 1979 c 158
s 195, 1977 c 76 s 2, 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 1, & 1963 c 39 s 2;
(3) RCW 28A.220.030 (Administration of program -- Powers and duties
of school officials) and 2000 c 115 s 9, 1979 c 158 s 196, 1977 c 76 s
3, 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 2, & 1963 c 39 s 3;
(4) RCW 28A.220.050 (Information on proper use of left-hand lane)
and 1986 c 93 s 4;
(5) RCW 28A.220.060 (Information on effects of alcohol and drug
use) and 1991 c 217 s 2;
(6) RCW 28A.220.070 (Rules) and 2000 c 115 s 11; and
(7) RCW 28A.220.900 (Purpose) and 1991 c 217 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 218
s 7, & 1963 c 39 s 1.

--- END ---