BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When establishing the traffic safety education course standards
applicable to approved driver training schools under this chapter, the
department shall permit schools to offer a qualified traffic safety
education course available on-line or through other electronic media,
if the course meets the minimum curriculum standards as determined by
the department with the advice of the advisory committee. An on-line
course, approved under this section, may only satisfy the classroom
instruction phase of a traffic safety education course.
(2) When establishing the standards under this section, the
department must apply the requirements consistently to both on-line
courses and those courses offered through direct contact time in a
classroom setting with an instructor.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.82.320 and 2002 c 352 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person, including the owner, operator, partner, officer, or
stockholder of a driver training school shall give instruction in the
operation of an automobile for a fee without a license issued by the
director for that purpose. An application for an instructor's license
shall be filed with the director, containing such information as
prescribed by the director, accompanied by an application fee of
seventy-five dollars, which shall in no event be refunded. If the
application is approved by the director and the applicant
satisfactorily meets the examination requirements as prescribed in RCW
46.82.330, the applicant shall be granted a license valid for a period
of one year from the date of issuance. An instructor shall take a
requalification examination every five years.
(2) The annual fee for renewal of an instructor's license shall be
twenty-five dollars. The director shall issue a license certificate to
each licensee which shall be conspicuously displayed in the place of
business of the employing driver training school. Unless revoked,
canceled, or denied by the director, the license shall remain the
property of the licensee in the event of termination of employment or
employment by another driver training school. If a renewal application
has not been received by the director within sixty days from the date
a notice of license expiration was mailed to the licensee, the license
will be voided requiring a new application as provided for in this
chapter, including examination and payment of all fees.
(3) Persons who ((qualify under the rules jointly adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction and the director of licensing to))
teach only the laboratory phase((,)) shall be subject to a ten dollar
examination fee.
(4) Each licensee shall be provided with a wallet-size
identification card by the director at the time the license is issued
which shall be carried on the instructor's person at all times while
engaged in instructing.
(5) The person to whom an instructor's license has been issued
shall notify the director in writing within thirty days of any change
of employment or termination of employment, providing the name and
address of the new driver training school by whom the instructor will
be employed.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.220.020 and 1990 c 33 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following words and phrases whenever used in chapter 28A.220
RCW shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Superintendent" or "state superintendent" shall mean the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) "Traffic safety education course" shall mean an accredited
course of instruction in traffic safety education which shall consist
of two phases, classroom instruction, and laboratory experience.
"Laboratory experience" shall include on-street, driving range, or
simulator experience or some combination thereof. Each phase shall
meet basic course requirements which shall be established by the
superintendent of public instruction and each part of said course shall
be taught by a qualified teacher of traffic safety education. Any
portions of the course may be taught after regular school hours or on
Saturdays as well as on regular school days or as a summer school
course, at the option of the local school districts.
(3) "Qualified teacher of traffic safety education" shall mean an
instructor certificated under the provisions of chapter 28A.410 RCW and
certificated by the superintendent of public instruction to teach
either the classroom phase or the laboratory phase of the traffic
safety education course, or both, under regulations promulgated by the
superintendent: PROVIDED, That the laboratory experience phase of the
traffic safety education course may be taught by instructors
certificated under rules promulgated by the superintendent of public
instruction, exclusive of any requirement that the instructor be
certificated under the provisions of chapter 28A.410 RCW.
((Professional instructors certificated under the provisions of chapter
46.82 RCW, and participating in this program, shall be subject to
reasonable qualification requirements jointly adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction and the director of licensing.))
(4) "Realistic level of effort" means the classroom and laboratory
student learning experiences considered acceptable to the
superintendent of public instruction that must be satisfactorily
accomplished by the student in order to successfully complete the
traffic safety education course.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.220.030 and 2000 c 115 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction is authorized to
establish a section of traffic safety education, and through such
section shall: Define a "realistic level of effort" required to
provide an effective traffic safety education course, establish a level
of driving competency required of each student to successfully complete
the course, and ensure that an effective statewide program is
implemented and sustained, administer, supervise, and develop the
traffic safety education program and shall assist local school
districts in the conduct of their traffic safety education programs.
The superintendent shall adopt necessary rules and regulations
governing the operation and scope of the traffic safety education
program; and each school district shall submit a report to the
superintendent on the condition of its traffic safety education
program: PROVIDED, That the superintendent shall monitor the quality
of the program and carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(2) The board of directors of any school district maintaining a
secondary school which includes any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive,
may establish and maintain a traffic safety education course. If a
school district elects to offer a traffic safety education course and
has within its boundaries a private accredited secondary school which
includes any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive, at least one class in
traffic safety education shall be given at times other than regular
school hours if there is sufficient demand therefor.
(3) The board of directors of a school district, or combination of
school districts, may contract with any drivers' school licensed under
the provisions of chapter 46.82 RCW to teach either the classroom phase
or the laboratory phase of the traffic safety education course((.
Instructors provided by any such contracting drivers' school must be
properly qualified teachers of traffic safety education under the joint
qualification requirements adopted by the superintendent of public
instruction and the director of licensing)), or both.
(4) The superintendent shall establish a required minimum number of
hours of continuing traffic safety education for traffic safety
education instructors. The superintendent may phase in the requirement
over not more than five years.

--- END ---