BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.16.070 and 1984 c 208 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter shall not apply to persons licensed under other laws
of this state who are performing services within their authorized scope
of practice and shall not be construed to require a license for
students enrolled in a school or engaged in a registered industry
apprenticeship program.

--- END ---