BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "kin" means persons related
by blood or marriage, including marriages that have been dissolved.
(2) The department shall plan, design, and implement strategies to
prioritize the placement of children with willing and able kin when
out-of-home placement is required.
These strategies must include at least the following:
(a) Development of standardized, statewide procedures to be used
when searching for kin of children prior to out-of-home placement. The
procedures must include a requirement that documentation be maintained
in the child's case record that identifies kin, and documentation that
identifies the assessment criteria and procedures that were followed
during all kin searches. The procedures must be used when a child is
placed in out-of-home care under authority of chapter 13.34 RCW, when
a petition is filed under RCW 13.32A.140, or when a child is placed
under a voluntary placement agreement. To assist with implementation
of the procedures, the department shall request that the juvenile court
require parents to disclose to the department all contact information
for available and appropriate kin within two weeks of an entered order.
For placements under signed voluntary agreements, the department shall
encourage the parents to disclose to the department all contact
information for available and appropriate kin within two weeks of the
date the parent signs the voluntary placement agreement.
(b) Development of procedures for conducting active outreach
efforts to identify and locate kin during all searches. The procedures
must include at least the following elements:
(i) Reasonable efforts to interview known kin, friends, teachers,
and other identified community members who may have knowledge of the
child's kin, within sixty days of the child entering out-of-home care;
(ii) Increased use of those procedures determined by research to be
the most effective methods of promoting reunification efforts,
permanency planning, and placement decisions;
(iii) Contacts with kin identified through outreach efforts and
interviews under this subsection as part of permanency planning
activities and change of placement discussions;
(iv) Establishment of a process for ongoing contact with kin who
express interest in being considered as a placement resource for the
child; and
(v) A requirement that when the decision is made to not place the
child with any kin, the department provides documentation as part of
the child's individual service and safety plan that clearly identifies
the rationale for the decision and corrective action or actions the kin
must take to be considered as a viable placement option.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an
entitlement to services or to create judicial authority to order the
provision of services to any person or family if the services are
unavailable or unsuitable or the child or family is not eligible for
such services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of social and health
services shall collaborate with one or more nonprofit community-based
agencies to develop a grant proposal for submission to potential
funding sources, including governmental entities and private
foundations, to establish a minimum of two pilot projects to assist
kinship caregivers with understanding and navigating the system of
services for children in out-of-home care. The proposal must seek to
establish at least one project in eastern Washington and one project in
western Washington, each project to be managed by a participating
community-based agency.
(2) The kinship care navigators funded through the proposal shall
be responsible for at least the following:
(a) Understanding the various state agency systems serving kinship
caregivers;
(b) Working in partnership with local community service providers;
(c) Tracking trends, concerns, and other factors related to kinship
caregivers; and
(d) Assisting in establishing stable, respectful relationships
between kinship caregivers and department staff.
(3) Implementation of the kinship care navigator pilot projects is
contingent upon receipt of nonstate or private funding for that
purpose.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "kinship" has the same
meaning as "kin" given in section 1(1) of this act.
(5) This section expires January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department of social and health
services shall report to the legislature and the governor on the
implementation of the kinship care navigator pilot projects with
recommendations on statewide implementation of the pilot projects one
year following implementation of the pilot projects. The report shall:
Include data that demonstrates whether the pilot project reduced actual
barriers to access to services; identify statutory and administrative
barriers for kin who give care; and recommend ways to reduce or
eliminate the barriers without adverse consequences to children placed
with kin.
(2) This section expires January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within existing resources, the department shall establish an
oversight committee to monitor, guide, and report on kinship care
recommendations and implementation activities. The committee shall:
(a) Draft a kinship care definition that is restricted to persons
related by blood or marriage, including marriages that have been
dissolved, or for a minor defined as an "Indian child" under the
federal Indian child welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), the
definition of "extended family member" under the federal Indian child
welfare act, and a set of principles. If the committee concludes that
one or more program or service would be more efficiently and
effectively delivered under a different definition of kin, it shall
state what definition is needed, and identify the program or service in
the report. It shall also provide evidence of how the program or
service will be more efficiently and effectively delivered under the
different definition. The department shall not adopt rules or policies
changing the definition of kin without authorizing legislation;
(b) Monitor the implementation of recommendations contained in the
2002 kinship care report;
(c) Partner with nonprofit organizations and private sector
businesses to guide a public education awareness campaign; and
(d) Assist with developing future recommendations on kinship care
issues.
(2) The oversight committee must consist of a minimum of thirty
percent kinship caregivers, who shall represent a diversity of kinship
families. Statewide representation with geographic, ethnic, and gender
diversity is required. Other members shall include representatives of
the department, representatives of relevant state agencies,
representatives of the private nonprofit and business sectors, child
advocates, representatives of Washington state Indian tribes as defined
under the federal Indian welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), and
representatives of the legal or judicial field. Birth parents, foster
parents, and others who have an interest in these issues may also be
included.
(3) To the extent funding is available, the department may
reimburse nondepartmental members of the oversight committee for costs
incurred in participating in the meetings of the oversight committee.
(4) The kinship care oversight committee shall report to the
legislature and the governor on the status of kinship care issues by
December 1, 2004.
(5) This section expires January 1, 2005.

--- END ---