BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.100 and 2002 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
School districts may employ public school principals and/or vice
principals to supervise the operation and management of the school to
which they are assigned. Such persons shall hold valid administrative
certificates ((and shall hold or have held either valid teacher
certificates or valid educational staff associate certificates.
Persons who hold or have held valid educational staff associate
certificates must also have demonstrated successful school-based
experience in an instructional role with students)). Persons who held
teaching positions whose certificates were revoked, suspended, or
surrendered may not be employed as public school principals or vice
principals. In addition to such other duties as shall be prescribed by
law and by the job description adopted by the board of directors, each
principal shall:
(1) Assume administrative authority, responsibility and
instructional leadership, under the supervision of the school district
superintendent, and in accordance with the policies of the school
district board of directors, for the planning, management, supervision
and evaluation of the educational program of the attendance area for
which he or she is responsible.
(2) Submit recommendations to the school district superintendent
regarding appointment, assignment, promotion, transfer and dismissal of
all personnel assigned to the attendance area for which he or she is
responsible.
(3) Submit recommendations to the school district superintendent
regarding the fiscal needs to maintain and improve the instructional
program of the attendance area for which he or she is responsible.
(4) Assume administrative authority and responsibility for the
supervision, counseling and discipline of pupils in the attendance area
for which he or she is responsible.

--- END ---