BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except for community and technical colleges, each degree-granting public or private postsecondary residential campus that
provides on-campus or group housing shall provide information on
meningococcal disease to each enrolled matriculated first-time student.
Community and technical colleges must provide the information only to
those students who are offered on-campus or group housing. The
information about meningococcal disease shall include:
(a) Symptoms, risks, especially as the risks relate to
circumstances of group living arrangements, and treatment; and
(b) Information on the vaccination that may prevent the student
from contracting the disease, that students in the high-risk group
consider receiving the vaccine, and where the vaccination can be
received.
(2) This section shall not be construed to require the department
of health or the postsecondary educational institution to provide the
vaccination to students.
(3) The department of health shall be consulted regarding the
preparation of the information materials provided to the first-time
students.
(4) This section does not create a private right of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---