BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds a need to provide
additional work-related opportunities for nursing students. Nursing
students enrolled in bachelor of science programs or associate degree
programs, working within the limits of their education, gain valuable
judgment and knowledge through expanded work opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) "Nursing technician" means a nursing
student employed in a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW or a
nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, who:
(a) Is currently enrolled in good standing in a nursing program
approved by the commission and has not graduated;
(b) Is a graduate of a nursing program approved by the commission
who graduated within the past thirty days.
(2) No person may practice or represent oneself as a nursing
technician by use of any title or description of services without being
registered under this chapter, unless otherwise exempted by this
chapter.
(3) The commission may adopt rules to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Nursing technicians are authorized to
perform specific nursing functions within the limits of their
education, up to their skill and knowledge, but they may not:
(a) Administer chemotherapy, blood or blood products, intravenous
medications, or scheduled drugs, or carry out procedures on central
lines;
(b) Assume ongoing responsibility for assessments, planning,
implementation, or evaluation of the care of patients;
(c) Function independently, act as a supervisor, or delegate tasks
to licensed practical nurses, nursing assistants, or unlicensed
personnel; or
(d) Perform or attempt to perform nursing techniques or procedures
for which the nursing technician lacks the appropriate knowledge,
experience, and education.
(2) Nursing technicians may function only under the direct
supervision of a registered nurse who agrees to act as supervisor and
is immediately available to the nursing technician. The supervising
registered nurse must have an unrestricted license with at least two
years of clinical practice in the setting where the nursing technician
works.
(3) Nursing technicians may only perform specific nursing functions
based upon and limited to their education and when they have
demonstrated the ability and been verified to safely perform these
functions by the nursing program in which the nurse technician is
enrolled. The nursing program providing verification is immune from
liability for any nursing function performed or not performed by the
nursing technician.
(4) Nursing technicians are responsible and accountable for their
specific nursing functions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Applications for registration must be
submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may
require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to
the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for
registration provided for in chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant shall
pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee
must accompany the application.
(2) An applicant for registration as a nursing technician shall
submit:
(a) A signed statement from the applicant's nursing program
verifying enrollment in, or graduation from, the nursing program; and
(b) A signed statement from the applicant's employer certifying
that the employer understands the role of the nursing technician and
agrees to meet the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.
(3) The secretary shall issue a registration to an applicant who
has met the requirements for registration or deny a registration to an
applicant who does not meet the requirements, except that proceedings
concerning the denial of registration based on unprofessional conduct
or impairment are governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter
18.130 RCW.
(4) The employer:
(a) Shall not require the nursing technician to work beyond his or
her education and training;
(b) Shall verify that the nursing technician continues to qualify
as a nursing technician as described in section 2 of this act;
(c) Shall advise the department and nursing program of any
practice-related action taken against the nursing technician; and
(d) Shall maintain documentation of the specific nursing functions
the nursing technician is authorized to perform.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department shall investigate complaints
of violations of sections 3 and 4 of this act by an employer. Failure
of an employer to comply with sections 3 and 4 of this act is
punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars per
infraction. The department shall maintain records of all employers
that have violated sections 3 and 4 of this act. The secretary shall
adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The secretary shall establish by rule the
procedural requirements and fees for renewal of the registration.
Failure to renew invalidates the registration and all privileges
granted by the registration. For renewal of registration, a nursing
technician must attest that he or she continues to qualify as a nursing
technician as described in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.130.040 and 2002 c 223 s 6 and 2002 c 216 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter
18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
and
(xxii) Recreational therapists.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses
based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and
the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to
denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the
applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW 18.130.160
by the disciplining authority.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 18.79 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---