BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29.79 RCW
to read as follows:
Each initiative measure to be submitted to the people that is
certified to the ballot must be reviewed by the state supreme court for
the purpose of assessing the constitutionality of the measure. The
court shall issue a summary statement, not to exceed one hundred words,
of its assessment. This statement may not be considered to be in
support of or in opposition to the measure.
The assessment of constitutionality must be available online from
the supreme court's web site and included in the state voters'
pamphlet.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.81.250 and 2002 c 139 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall determine the format and layout of the
voters' pamphlet. The secretary of state shall print the pamphlet in
clear, readable type on a size, quality, and weight of paper that in
the judgment of the secretary of state best serves the voters. The
pamphlet must contain a table of contents. Federal and state offices
must appear in the pamphlet in the same sequence as they appear on the
ballot. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order specified
by RCW 29.79.300.
The voters' pamphlet must provide the following information for
each statewide issue on the ballot:
(1) The legal identification of the measure by serial designation
or number;
(2) The official ballot title of the measure;
(3) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the law
as it presently exists;
(4) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the
effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;
(5) The fiscal impact statement prepared under RCW 29.79.075;
(6) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in
the senate and house of representatives, if the measure has been passed
by the legislature;
(7) For each initiative measure to be submitted to the people, the
assessment of constitutionality prepared under section 1 of this act;
(8) An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure
together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;
(((8))) (9) An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the
measure together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing
argument;
(((9))) (10) Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed
by the names of the committee members who submitted them, and may be
followed by a telephone number that citizens may call to obtain
information on the ballot measure;
(((10))) (11) The full text of each measure.

--- END ---