BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) There is a severe shortage of health care personnel in
Washington state.
(2) The shortage contributes to increased costs in health care and
threatens the ability of the industry to provide adequate and
accessible health care services.
(3) The shortage poses a serious threat to the financial stability
of the health care industry, and consequently the state.
(4) The shortage of health care personnel is structural rather than
cyclical due to demographic changes that will increase demand for
health care services. An increasing proportion of the population will
reach retirement age, and an increasing proportion of health care
personnel will also reach retirement age.
(5) Health skills panels comprising local health employers, local
education and training providers, and local labor representatives are
an effective way to identify needs and address health workers shortages
at the local level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The board shall work with local work force
development councils to address health care personnel shortages. The
board shall provide support for the expansion of activities of existing
health skills panels and work with areas that do not have health skills
panels to establish such entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Local health skills panels shall facilitate
the implementation of the following strategies, if appropriate to the
specific needs of their area:
(1) Coordinate clinical training to expand capacity for clinical
training;
(2) Develop faculty/staff-sharing arrangements between education
and training providers, and between education and training providers
and health care facilities;
(3) Pool resources, share equipment and space, and develop distance
learning where possible;
(4) Leverage resources to increase educational capacity;
(5) Develop apprenticeships in health occupations;
(6) Work with local school districts and high schools to develop
health sciences and work-based learning opportunities, strengthen math
and science skills, and create awareness of opportunities in health
careers in middle school;
(7) Develop articulation agreements between educational
institutions to enable students to gain credit for prior training or
skills learned on-the-job;
(8) Ensure that local area employment and training staff have the
skills and knowledge of local opportunities in high demand health care
occupations to direct clients to training and employment in high demand
careers;
(9) Develop customized training opportunities for entry-level
health care workers to enable them to move up career ladders and fill
high demand positions;
(10) Develop financial aid opportunities and other forms of support
for students to begin and complete health care education and training;
and
(11) Consider any other strategies that are specific to the needs
of the area in order to increase the supply of health care workers that
are in shortage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 28C.18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire June
30, 2007.

--- END ---