BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.130 and 1999 c 388 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Expanding activity in educational research, educational
restructuring, and educational improvement initiatives has produced and
continues to produce much valuable information. The legislature finds
that such information should be shared with the citizens and
educational community of the state as widely as possible. To
facilitate access to information and materials on educational
improvement and research, the superintendent of public instruction, to
the extent funds are appropriated, shall establish the center for the
improvement of student learning. The primary purpose of the center is
to provide assistance and advice to parents, school board members,
educators, and the public regarding strategies for assisting students
in learning the essential academic learning requirements pursuant to
RCW ((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.060. The center shall work in conjunction
with the ((academic achievement and accountability commission)) office
of the superintendent of public instruction, educational service
districts, institutions of higher education, and education, parent,
community, and business organizations.
(2) The center, in conjunction with other staff in the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, shall:
(a) ((Serve as a clearinghouse for the completed work and
activities of the academic achievement and accountability commission;
(b))) Serve as a clearinghouse for information regarding successful
educational improvement and parental involvement programs in schools
and districts, and information about efforts within institutions of
higher education in the state to support educational improvement
initiatives in Washington schools and districts;
(((c))) (b) Provide best practices research and advice that can be
used to help schools develop and implement: Programs and practices to
improve instruction of the essential academic learning requirements
under section 701 of this act; systems to analyze student assessment
data, with an emphasis on systems that will combine the use of state
and local data to monitor the academic progress of each and every
student in the school district; comprehensive, school-wide improvement
plans; school-based shared decision-making models; programs to promote
lifelong learning and community involvement in education; school-to-work transition programs; programs to meet the needs of highly capable
students; programs and practices to meet the diverse needs of students
based on gender, racial, ethnic, economic, and special needs status;
research, information, and technology systems; and other programs and
practices that will assist educators in helping students learn the
essential academic learning requirements;
(((d))) (c) Develop and distribute, in conjunction with the
((academic achievement and accountability commission)) office of the
superintendent of public instruction, parental involvement materials,
including instructional guides developed to inform parents of the
essential academic learning requirements. The instructional guides
also shall contain actions parents may take to assist their children in
meeting the requirements, and should focus on reaching parents who have
not previously been involved with their children's education;
(((e))) (d) Identify obstacles to greater parent and community
involvement in school shared decision-making processes and recommend
strategies for helping parents and community members to participate
effectively in school shared decision-making processes, including
understanding and respecting the roles of school building
administrators and staff;
(((f))) (e) Develop and maintain an internet web site to increase
the availability of information, research, and other materials;
(((g))) (f) Take other actions to increase public awareness of the
importance of parental and community involvement in education;
(((h))) (g) Work with appropriate organizations to inform teachers,
district and school administrators, and school directors about the
waivers available and the broadened school board powers under RCW
28A.320.015;
(((i))) (h) Provide training and consultation services, including
conducting regional summer institutes;
(((j))) (i) Address methods for improving the success rates of
certain ethnic and racial student groups; and
(((k))) (j) Perform other functions consistent with the purpose of
the center as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction((, after consultation
with the academic achievement and accountability commission,)) shall
select and employ a director for the center.
(4) The superintendent may enter into contracts with individuals or
organizations including but not limited to: School districts;
educational service districts; educational organizations; teachers;
higher education faculty; institutions of higher education; state
agencies; business or community-based organizations; and other
individuals and organizations to accomplish the duties and
responsibilities of the center. In carrying out the duties and
responsibilities of the center, the superintendent, whenever possible,
shall use practitioners to assist agency staff as well as assist
educators and others in schools and districts.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.305.285 and 1997 c 222 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
By May 1, 1994, or as soon as possible thereafter, the higher
education coordinating board and the state board of education shall
convene a task force creating a forum for ongoing discussion of
curriculum issues that transect higher education and the common
schools. In selecting members of the task force, the boards shall
consult the office of the superintendent of public instruction, ((the
commission on student learning,)) the state board for community and
technical colleges, the work force training and education coordinating
board, the Washington council on high school-college relations,
representatives of the four-year institutions, representatives of the
school directors, the school and district administrators, teachers,
higher education faculty, students, counselors, vocational directors,
parents, and other interested organizations. The process shall be
designed to provide advice and counsel to the appropriate boards on
topics that may include but are not limited to: (1) The changing
nature of educational instruction and crediting, and awarding
appropriate credit for knowledge and competencies learned in a variety
of ways in both institutions of higher education and high schools; (2)
options for students to enroll in programs and institutions that will
best meet the students' needs and educational goals; and (3)
articulation agreements between institutions of higher education and
high schools.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.505.210 and 2001 c 3 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
School districts shall have the authority to decide the best use of
student achievement funds to assist students in meeting and exceeding
the new, higher academic standards in each district consistent with the
provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2001.
(1) Student achievement funds shall be allocated for the following
uses:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators,
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school;
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection.
(2) Annually on or before May 1st, the school district board of
directors shall meet at the time and place designated for the purpose
of a public hearing on the proposed use of these funds to improve
student achievement for the coming year. Any person may appear or by
written submission have the opportunity to comment on the proposed plan
for the use of these funds. No later than August 31st, as a part of
the process under RCW 28A.505.060, each school district shall adopt a
plan for the use of these funds for the upcoming school year.
Annually, each school district shall provide to the citizens of their
district a public accounting of the funds made available to the
district during the previous school year under chapter 3, Laws of 2001,
how the funds were used, and the progress the district has made in
increasing student achievement, as measured by required state
assessments and other assessments deemed appropriate by the district.
Copies of this report shall be provided to the superintendent of public
instruction ((and to the academic achievement and accountability
commission)).

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.650.015 and 1995 c 335 s 507 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, to the extent funds
are appropriated, shall develop and implement a Washington state K-12
education technology plan. The technology plan shall be updated on at
least a biennial basis, shall be developed to coordinate and expand the
use of education technology in the common schools of the state. The
plan shall be consistent with applicable provisions of chapter 43.105
RCW. The plan, at a minimum, shall address:
(a) The provision of technical assistance to schools and school
districts for the planning, implementation, and training of staff in
the use of technology in curricular and administrative functions;
(b) The continued development of a network to connect school
districts, institutions of higher learning, and other sources of on-line information; and
(c) Methods to equitably increase the use of education technology
by students and school personnel throughout the state.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint an
educational technology advisory committee to assist in the development
and implementation of the technology plan in subsection (1) of this
section. The committee shall include, but is not limited to, persons
representing: The state board of education, ((the commission on
student learning,)) the department of information services, educational
service districts, school directors, school administrators, school
principals, teachers, classified staff, higher education faculty,
parents, students, business, labor, scientists and mathematicians, the
higher education coordinating board, the work force training and
education coordinating board, and the state library.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.030 and 2002 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The powers and duties of the ((academic achievement and
accountability commission)) office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall include, but are not limited to the following:
(1) For purposes of statewide accountability, the ((commission))
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics by subject and grade level as the
((commission)) office of the superintendent of public instruction deems
appropriate to improve student learning, once assessments in these
subjects are required statewide. The goals shall be consistent with
student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and shall
not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the federal
elementary and secondary education act of 1965, as amended. The goals
may be established for all students, economically disadvantaged
students, limited English proficient students, students with
disabilities, and students from disproportionately academically
underachieving racial and ethnic backgrounds. The ((commission))
office of the superintendent of public instruction may establish school
and school district goals addressing high school graduation rates and
dropout reduction goals for students in grades seven through twelve.
((The goals shall be in addition to any goals adopted in RCW
28A.655.050. The commission may also revise any goal adopted in RCW
28A.655.050.)) The ((commission)) office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each
goal is implemented, the ((commission)) office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall present the goal to the education committees
of the house of representatives and the senate for the committees'
review and comment in a time frame that will permit the legislature to
take statutory action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by
the legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the Washington assessment of student learning and determine
student scores that identify levels of student performance below and
beyond the standard. The ((commission)) office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall set such performance standards and levels
((in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and))
after consideration of any recommendations that may be developed by any
advisory committees that may be established for this purpose;
(c) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify successful
schools and school districts and recommend ((to the superintendent of
public instruction)) schools and districts to be recognized for two
types of accomplishments, student achievement and improvements in
student achievement. Recognition for improvements in student
achievement shall include consideration of one or more of the following
accomplishments:
(i) An increase in the percent of students meeting standards. The
level of achievement required for recognition may be based on the
achievement goals established by the ((legislature under RCW
28A.655.050 and the commission)) office of the superintendent of public
instruction under (a) of this subsection;
(ii) Positive progress on an improvement index that measures
improvement in all levels of the assessment; and
(iii) Improvements despite challenges such as high levels of
mobility, poverty, English as a second language learners, and large
numbers of students in special populations as measured by either the
percent of students meeting the standard, or the improvement index.
When determining the baseline year or years for recognizing
individual schools, the ((commission)) office of the superintendent of
public instruction may use the assessment results from the initial
years the assessments were administered, if doing so with individual
schools would be appropriate;
(d) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify schools and
school districts in need of assistance and those in which significant
numbers of students persistently fail to meet state standards. In its
deliberations, the ((commission)) office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall consider the use of all statewide mandated
criterion-referenced and norm-referenced standardized tests;
(e) Identify schools and school districts in which state
intervention measures will be needed and a range of appropriate
intervention strategies, beginning no earlier than June 30, 2001, and
after the legislature has authorized a set of intervention strategies.
Beginning no earlier than June 30, 2001, and after the legislature has
authorized a set of intervention strategies, ((at the request of the
commission,)) the superintendent shall intervene in the school or
school district and take corrective actions. This chapter does not
provide additional authority for ((the commission or)) the
superintendent of public instruction to intervene in a school or school
district;
(f) Identify performance incentive systems that have improved or
have the potential to improve student achievement;
(g) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation ((to the superintendent
of public instruction)) of any improvements needed to the system;
(h) Annually report by December 1st to the legislature, the
governor, ((the superintendent of public instruction,)) and the state
board of education on the progress, findings, and recommendations of
the ((commission)) office of the superintendent of public instruction.
The report may include recommendations of actions to help improve
student achievement;
(i) By December 1, 2000, and by December 1st annually thereafter,
report to the education committees of the house of representatives and
the senate on the progress that has been made in achieving ((the
reading goal under RCW 28A.655.050 and any additional)) goals adopted
by the ((commission)) office of the superintendent of public
instruction;
(j) Coordinate its activities with the state board of education
((and the office of the superintendent of public instruction));
(k) Seek advice from the public and all interested educational
organizations in the conduct of its work; and
(l) Establish advisory committees, which may include persons who
are not members of the ((commission)) office of the superintendent of
public instruction;
(2) Holding meetings and public hearings, which may include
regional meetings and hearings;
(3) Hiring necessary staff and determining the staff's duties and
compensation. ((However, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide staff support to the commission until the
commission has hired its own staff, and shall provide most of the
technical assistance and logistical support needed by the commission
thereafter. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall be the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may
direct the office of)) The superintendent of public instruction ((to))
may enter into subcontracts, within the ((commission's)) office's
resources, with school districts, teachers, higher education faculty,
state agencies, business organizations, and other individuals and
organizations to assist the ((commission)) office of the superintendent
of public instruction in its deliberations; and
(4) Receiving per diem and travel allowances as permitted under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.070 and 1999 c 388 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall identify the
knowledge and skills all public school students need to know and be
able to do based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210,
develop student assessments, and implement ((the)) its accountability
recommendations and requests regarding assistance((,)) and rewards((,
and recognition of the academic achievement and accountability
commission)).
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall periodically
revise the essential academic learning requirements, as needed, based
on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two
shall be considered primary. To the maximum extent possible, the
superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill
areas in the other goals in the essential academic learning
requirements.
(3) ((In consultation with the academic achievement and
accountability commission,)) The superintendent of public instruction
shall maintain and continue to develop and revise a statewide academic
assessment system for use in the elementary, middle, and high school
years designed to determine if each student has mastered the essential
academic learning requirements identified in subsection (1) of this
section. The academic assessment system shall include a variety of
assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(4) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(5) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(6) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(7) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(8) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique
needs of special education students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(9) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique
needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments under
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The academic achievement and accountability commission is
hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby
transferred to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
All references to the executive director or the academic achievement
and accountability commission in the Revised Code of Washington shall
be construed to mean the superintendent of public instruction or the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the academic
achievement and accountability commission shall be delivered to the
custody of the office of the superintendent of public instruction. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other
tangible property employed by the academic achievement and
accountability commission shall be made available to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. All funds, credits, or other
assets held by the academic achievement and accountability commission
shall be assigned to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(b) Any appropriations made to the academic achievement and
accountability commission shall, on the effective date of this section,
be transferred and credited to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the academic
achievement and accountability commission shall be continued and acted
upon by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall
be performed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the academic achievement and accountability commission shall not affect
the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 28A.655.020 (Academic achievement and
accountability commission) and 1999 c 388 s 101 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---