BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is in the interest of the public health and safety of patients to
improve the regulatory environment for hospitals and affiliated health
care services and facilities by requiring state agencies that survey
hospitals and their affiliated health care services and facilities to
coordinate the scheduling of surveys and audits, to provide advance
notice of surveys and audits to hospitals, and to share information
obtained during surveys and audits. Hospitals and their affiliated
health care services and facilities are surveyed and audited by a
myriad of federal, state, and local agencies, some being subject to
more than a dozen different surveys or audits by state agencies, as
well as being surveyed to be accredited by the joint commission on the
accreditation of health care organizations. The legislature finds that
hospitals, particularly those in rural communities, that provide a
continuum of health care services including nursing homes, assisted
living facilities, or ambulance services, all of which are subject to
licensing surveys, will be better able to respond to surveys and
audits, and implement suggested changes to improve the quality of
patient care, if hospitals are not subject to simultaneous or back-to-back surveys or audits. Surveys and audits will be more cost-effective
for hospitals and affiliated services and facilities if hospitals are
not required to respond to multiple requests for the same information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Agency" means a department of state government created under
RCW 43.17.010 and the office of the state auditor.
(2) "Audit" means an examination of records or financial accounts
to evaluate accuracy and monitor compliance with statutory or
regulatory requirements.
(3) "Hospital" means a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(4) "Hospital services or facilities" means licensed or certified
health care services or facilities operated or controlled by a hospital
or an entity that operates a hospital, including ambulance services,
assisted living facilities, boarding homes, chemical dependency or
psychiatric facilities, home health services, hospice, nursing homes,
pharmacies, and rural health clinics.
(5) "Survey" means an inspection, examination, or site visit
conducted by an agency to evaluate and monitor the compliance of a
hospital or hospital services or facilities with statutory or
regulatory requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, an agency that conducts surveys or audits of hospitals or
hospital services or facilities shall:
(a) Coordinate the scheduling of all surveys and audits with
programs of that agency and with other agencies and take into
consideration surveys and audits scheduled by the joint commission on
the accreditation of health care organizations and other nationally
recognized accreditation organizations; and
(b) Share information and documents provided by hospitals and
hospital services and facilities pertaining to surveys and audits.
(2) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to
investigations and site visits not conducted as part of a regularly
scheduled survey or audit that are: (a) In response to a complaint
received by an agency; or (b) requested by a hospital.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) If an agency does not comply with the
process designed under section 5 of this act, a hospital or hospital
service or facility may refuse to allow the agency to conduct the
survey or audit at the time selected by the agency and the agency must
reschedule the audit or survey in accordance with the requirements of
this chapter.
(2) An agency may not retaliate against a hospital or hospital
service or facility that refuses to allow the agency to conduct a
survey or audit because the agency has not complied with the process
designed under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department of health, with the
participation of stakeholders and all other agencies that conduct
surveys or audits of hospitals or hospital services or facilities,
shall design a process to accomplish the requirements of section 3 of
this act. For the purposes of this section, "stakeholders" means
hospitals, hospital services and facilities controlled or operated by
hospitals or entities that control or operate a hospital, and the
Washington state hospital association.
(2) The following agencies are required to actively and effectively
participate in the design of the survey coordination process: State
board of pharmacy; state auditor; chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection; and the departments of health,
social and health services, ecology, labor and industries, and revenue.
(3) The process must establish:
(a) A procedure for scheduling audits and surveys;
(b) Standards for the frequency of audits and surveys;
(c) A mechanism for resolving scheduling disputes that may arise
between agencies;
(d) A mechanism for resolving scheduling conflicts with hospital
staff availability or planned hospital events;
(e) A mechanism for addressing disputes that includes full
assurance that advancing a dispute will not result in retaliation or
punitive action against a hospital or hospital services or facilities;
(f) Written notice requirements for scheduling audits and surveys
unless notice is prohibited by state or federal law;
(g) Requirements for and necessary limitations to sharing
information and documents provided by hospitals and hospital services
or facilities; and
(h) Other provisions the agencies and stakeholders agree are
necessary to implement the intent of this chapter.
(4) The elements of the process that do not require legislative
changes take effect January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department of health shall prepare and
present a report to the legislature no later than October 1, 2003,
describing the process designed under section 5 of this act and
identifying any legislative changes necessary to implement the process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
The board of pharmacy shall coordinate and schedule surveys,
audits, and inspections of hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW
and health care services or facilities operated or controlled by
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW in accordance with chapter
43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The auditor shall coordinate and schedule surveys, audits, and
inspections of hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and health
care services or facilities operated or controlled by hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall coordinate and
schedule surveys, audits, and inspections of hospitals licensed under
chapter 70.41 RCW and health care services or facilities operated or
controlled by hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW in accordance
with chapter 43-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A
RCW to read as follows:
The department of ecology shall coordinate and schedule surveys,
audits, and inspections of hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW
and health care services or facilities operated or controlled by
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW in accordance with chapter
43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of labor and industries shall coordinate and
schedule surveys, audits, and inspections of hospitals licensed under
chapter 70.41 RCW and health care services or facilities operated or
controlled by hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW in accordance
with chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of health shall coordinate and schedule surveys,
audits, and inspections of hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW
and health care services or facilities operated or controlled by
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW in accordance with chapter
43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 70.175
RCW to read as follows:
The department of health shall coordinate and schedule any surveys,
audits, or inspections of rural health care facilities in accordance
with chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A
RCW to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall coordinate and
schedule surveys, audits, and inspections of assisted living services,
adult residential care services, or enhanced adult residential care
services operated or controlled by a hospital licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of
this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 82.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of revenue shall coordinate and schedule surveys,
audits, and inspections of hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW
and health care services or facilities operated or controlled by
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW in accordance with chapter
43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

Sec. 16 RCW 18.20.110 and 2000 c 47 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall make or cause to be made at least a yearly
inspection and investigation of all boarding homes. Inspections and
investigations of boarding homes operated or controlled by hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be coordinated and scheduled in
accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).
Every inspection shall focus primarily on actual or potential resident
outcomes, and may include an inspection of every part of the premises
and an examination of all records (other than financial records),
methods of administration, the general and special dietary, and the
stores and methods of supply. Following such an inspection or
inspections, written notice of any violation of this law or the rules
adopted hereunder shall be given to the applicant or licensee and the
department. The department may prescribe by rule that any licensee or
applicant desiring to make specified types of alterations or additions
to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before
commencing such alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans
and specifications therefor to the agencies responsible for plan
reviews for preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with
respect to compliance with the rules and standards herein authorized.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.51.091 and 1987 c 476 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall make or cause to be made at least one
inspection of each nursing home prior to license renewal and shall
inspect community-based services as part of the licensing renewal
survey. The inspection shall be made without providing advance notice
of it. Inspections of nursing homes operated or controlled by
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be coordinated and
scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of
this act). Every inspection may include an inspection of every part of
the premises and an examination of all records, methods of
administration, the general and special dietary and the stores and
methods of supply. Those nursing homes that provide community-based
care shall establish and maintain separate and distinct accounting and
other essential records for the purpose of appropriately allocating
costs of the providing of such care: PROVIDED, That such costs shall
not be considered allowable costs for reimbursement purposes under
chapter 74.46 RCW. Following such inspection or inspections, written
notice of any violation of this law or ((the)) rules ((and regulations
promulgated hereunder,)) shall be given the applicant or licensee and
the department. The notice shall describe the reasons for the
facility's noncompliance. The department may prescribe by
((regulations)) rule that any licensee or applicant desiring to make
specified types of alterations or additions to its facilities or to
construct new facilities shall, before commencing such alteration,
addition or new construction, submit its plans and specifications
therefor to the department for preliminary inspection and approval or
recommendations with respect to compliance with the ((regulations))
rules and standards ((herein)) authorized.

Sec. 18 RCW 43.09.260 and 1995 c 301 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The examination of the financial affairs of all local governments
shall be made at such reasonable, periodic intervals as the state
auditor shall determine. However, an examination of the financial
affairs of all local governments shall be made at least once in every
three years, and an examination of individual local government health
and welfare benefit plans and local government self-insurance programs
shall be made at least once every two years. The term local
governments for purposes of this chapter includes but is not limited to
all counties, cities, and other political subdivisions, municipal
corporations, and quasi-municipal corporations, however denominated.
The state auditor shall establish a schedule to govern the auditing
of local governments which shall include: A designation of the various
classifications of local governments; a designation of the frequency
for auditing each type of local government; and a description of events
which cause a more frequent audit to be conducted.
Examinations of hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and
health care services and facilities operated or controlled by hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be coordinated and scheduled in
accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).
On every such examination, inquiry shall be made as to the
financial condition and resources of the local government; whether the
Constitution and laws of the state, the ordinances and orders of the
local government, and the requirements of the state auditor have been
properly complied with; and into the methods and accuracy of the
accounts and reports.
A report of such examination shall be made and filed in the office
of state auditor, and one copy shall be transmitted to the local
government. A copy of any report containing findings of noncompliance
with state law shall be transmitted to the attorney general. If any
such report discloses malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in
office on the part of any public officer or employee, within thirty
days from the receipt of his or her copy of the report, the attorney
general shall institute, in the proper county, such legal action as is
proper in the premises by civil process and prosecute the same to final
determination to carry into effect the findings of the examination.
It shall be unlawful for any local government or the responsible
head thereof, to make a settlement or compromise of any claim arising
out of such malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance, or any action
commenced therefor, or for any court to enter upon any compromise or
settlement of such action, without the written approval and consent of
the attorney general and the state auditor.

Sec. 19 RCW 51.36.110 and 1994 c 154 s 312 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of the department of labor and industries or the
director's authorized representative shall have the authority to:
(1) Conduct audits and investigations of providers of medical,
chiropractic, dental, vocational, and other health services furnished
to industrially injured workers pursuant to Title 51 RCW. In the
conduct of such audits or investigations, the director or the
director's authorized representatives may examine all records, or
portions thereof, including patient records, for which services were
rendered by a health services provider and reimbursed by the
department, notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute which
may make or purport to make such records privileged or confidential((:
PROVIDED, That no)). However, original patient records ((shall)) may
not be removed from the premises of the health services provider, and
that the disclosure of any records or information obtained under
authority of this section by the department of labor and industries is
prohibited and constitutes a violation of RCW 42.52.050, unless such
disclosure is directly connected to the official duties of the
department((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). The disclosure of patient
information as required under this section shall not subject any
physician or other health services provider to any liability for breach
of any confidential relationships between the provider and the
patient((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). The director or the
director's authorized representative shall destroy all copies of
patient medical records in their possession upon completion of the
audit, investigation, or proceedings. Audits and investigations of
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and health care services or
facilities operated or controlled by hospitals licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW must be coordinated and scheduled in accordance with chapter
43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act);
(2) Approve or deny applications to participate as a provider of
services furnished to industrially injured workers pursuant to Title 51
RCW; and
(3) Terminate or suspend eligibility to participate as a provider
of services furnished to industrially injured workers pursuant to Title
51 RCW.

Sec. 20 RCW 69.41.270 and 1989 c 352 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A pharmaceutical manufacturer, wholesaler, pharmacy, or
practitioner who purchases, dispenses, or distributes legend drugs
shall maintain invoices or such other records as are necessary to
account for the receipt and disposition of the legend drugs.
The records maintained pursuant to this section shall be available
for inspection by the board and its authorized representatives and
shall be maintained for two years. Inspections of pharmacies operated
or controlled by hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be
coordinated and scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 5 of this act).

Sec. 21 RCW 70.41.080 and 1995 c 369 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
Standards for fire protection and the enforcement thereof, with
respect to all hospitals to be licensed ((hereunder)) under this
chapter shall be the responsibility of the chief of the Washington
state patrol, through the director of fire protection, who shall adopt,
after approval by the department, such recognized standards as may be
applicable to hospitals for the protection of life against the cause
and spread of fire and fire hazards. The department upon receipt of an
application for a license, shall submit to the director of fire
protection in writing, a request for an inspection, giving the
applicant's name and the location of the premises to be licensed. Upon
receipt of such a request, the chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, or his or her deputy, shall
make an inspection of the hospital to be licensed, and if it is found
that the premises do not comply with the required safety standards and
fire regulations as adopted pursuant to this chapter, he or she shall
promptly make a written report to the hospital and to the department
listing the corrective actions required and the time allowed for
accomplishing such corrections. The applicant or licensee shall notify
the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, upon completion of any corrections required by him or her,
and the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of
fire protection, or his or her deputy, shall make a reinspection of
such premises. Whenever the hospital to be licensed meets with the
approval of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection, he or she shall submit to the department
a written report approving the hospital with respect to fire
protection, and such report is required before a full license can be
issued. The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director
of fire protection, shall make or cause to be made inspections of such
hospitals at least once a year. Inspections must be coordinated and
scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of
this act).
In cities which have in force a comprehensive building code, the
provisions of which are determined by the chief of the Washington state
patrol, through the director of fire protection, to be equal to the
minimum standards of the code for hospitals adopted by the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, the
chief of the fire department, provided the latter is a paid chief of a
paid fire department, shall make the inspection with the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or
his or her deputy and they shall jointly approve the premises before a
full license can be issued.

Sec. 22 RCW 70.41.120 and 1995 c 282 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall make or cause to be made at least yearly an
inspection of all hospitals. Every inspection of a hospital may
include an inspection of every part of the premises. The department
may make an examination of all phases of the hospital operation
necessary to determine compliance with the law and the standards((,))
and rules ((and regulations adopted thereunder)) adopted under the law.
Any licensee or applicant desiring to make alterations or additions to
its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before commencing
such alteration, addition, or new construction, comply with the
((regulations prescribed)) rules adopted by the department.
No hospital licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
shall be required to be inspected or licensed under other state laws or
rules ((and regulations promulgated thereunder)), or local ordinances,
relative to hotels, restaurants, lodging houses, boarding houses,
places of refreshment, nursing homes, maternity homes, or psychiatric
hospitals.
To avoid unnecessary duplication in inspections, the department
shall coordinate with the department of social and health services when
inspecting facilities over which both agencies have jurisdiction, the
facilities including but not necessarily being limited to hospitals
with both acute care and skilled nursing or psychiatric nursing
functions. Surveys, inspections, and audits of hospitals must be
coordinated and scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 5 of this act).

Sec. 23 RCW 70.42.170 and 1989 c 386 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may at any time conduct an on-site review of a
licensee or applicant in order to determine compliance with this
chapter. However, an on-site review of test sites operated or
controlled by hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be
coordinated and scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 5 of this act). When the department has reason to
believe a waivered site is conducting tests requiring a license, the
department may conduct an on-site review of the waivered site in order
to determine compliance. The department may also examine and audit
records necessary to determine compliance with this chapter. The right
to conduct an on-site review and audit and examination of records shall
extend to any premises and records of persons whom the department has
reason to believe are opening, owning, conducting, maintaining,
managing, or otherwise operating a test site without a license.
Following an on-site review, the department shall give written
notice of any violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter. The notice shall describe the reasons for noncompliance and
inform the licensee or applicant or test site operator that it shall
comply within a specified reasonable time. If the licensee or
applicant or test site operator fails to comply, the department may
take disciplinary action under RCW 70.42.120 through 70.42.150, or
further action as authorized by this chapter.

Sec. 24 RCW 70.62.250 and 1971 ex.s. c 239 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department is hereby granted and shall have and exercise, in
addition to the powers herein granted, all the powers necessary and
appropriate to carry out and execute the purposes of this chapter,
including but not limited to the power:
(1) To develop ((such)) rules ((and regulations)) for proposed
adoption by the board as may be necessary to implement the purposes of
this chapter;
(2) To enter and inspect at any reasonable time any transient
accommodation and to make such investigations as are reasonably
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and any rules
((and regulations promulgated thereunder: PROVIDED, That no)) adopted
under this chapter. However, a room or suite ((shall)) may not be
entered for inspection unless ((said)) the room or suite is not
occupied by any patron or guest of the transient accommodation at the
time of entry. Inspections of transient accommodations operated or
controlled by hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be
coordinated and scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 5 of this act);
(3) To perform such other duties and employ such personnel as may
be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter; and
(4) To administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and
the rules ((and regulations promulgated thereunder)) adopted by the
board.

Sec. 25 RCW 70.96A.090 and 1995 c 312 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules establishing standards for
approved treatment programs, the process for the review and inspection
program applying to the department for certification as an approved
treatment program, and fixing the fees to be charged by the department
for the required inspections. The standards may concern the health
standards to be met and standards of services and treatment to be
afforded patients.
(2) The department may suspend, revoke, limit, restrict, or modify
an approval, or refuse to grant approval, for failure to meet the
provisions of this chapter, or the standards adopted under this
chapter. RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial,
revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an
adjudicative proceeding.
(3) No treatment program may advertise or represent itself as an
approved treatment program if approval has not been granted, or has
been denied, suspended, revoked, or canceled.
(4) Certification as an approved treatment program is effective for
one calendar year from the date of issuance of the certificate. The
certification shall specify the types of services provided by the
approved treatment program that meet the standards adopted under this
chapter. Renewal of certification shall be made in accordance with
this section for initial approval and in accordance with the standards
set forth in rules adopted by the secretary.
(5) Approved treatment programs shall not provide alcoholism or
other drug addiction treatment services for which the approved
treatment program has not been certified. Approved treatment programs
may provide services for which approval has been sought and is pending,
if approval for the services has not been previously revoked or denied.
(6) The department periodically shall inspect approved public and
private treatment programs at reasonable times and in a reasonable
manner. Inspections of treatment programs operated or controlled by
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be coordinated and
scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of
this act).
(7) The department shall maintain and periodically publish a
current list of approved treatment programs.
(8) Each approved treatment program shall file with the department
on request, data, statistics, schedules, and information the department
reasonably requires. An approved treatment program that without good
cause fails to furnish any data, statistics, schedules, or information
as requested, or files fraudulent returns thereof, may be removed from
the list of approved treatment programs, and its certification revoked
or suspended.
(9) The department shall use the data provided in subsection (8) of
this section to evaluate each program that admits children to inpatient
treatment upon application of their parents. The evaluation shall be
done at least once every twelve months. In addition, the department
shall randomly select and review the information on individual children
who are admitted on application of the child's parent for the purpose
of determining whether the child was appropriately placed into
treatment based on an objective evaluation of the child's condition and
the outcome of the child's treatment.
(10) Upon petition of the department and after a hearing held upon
reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a
warrant to an officer or employee of the department authorizing him or
her to enter and inspect at reasonable times, and examine the books and
accounts of, any approved public or private treatment program refusing
to consent to inspection or examination by the department or which the
department has reasonable cause to believe is operating in violation of
this chapter.

Sec. 26 RCW 70.98.080 and 1984 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The agency shall provide by rule ((or regulation)) for general
or specific licensing of byproduct, source, special nuclear materials,
or devices or equipment utilizing such materials, or other radioactive
material occurring naturally or produced artificially. Such rule ((or
regulation)) shall provide for amendment, suspension, or revocation of
licenses. Such rule ((or regulation)) shall provide that:
(a) Each application for a specific license shall be in writing and
shall state such information as the agency, by rule ((or regulation)),
may determine to be necessary to decide the technical, insurance, and
financial qualifications, or any other qualification of the applicant
as the agency may deem reasonable and necessary to protect the
occupational and public health and safety. The agency may at any time
after the filing of the application, and before the expiration of the
license, require further written statements and shall make such
inspections as the agency deems necessary in order to determine whether
the license should be granted or denied or whether the license should
be modified, suspended, or revoked. In no event shall the agency grant
a specific license to any applicant who has never possessed a specific
license issued by a recognized state or federal authority until the
agency has conducted an inspection which insures that the applicant can
meet the rules((, regulations)) and standards adopted pursuant to this
chapter. Inspection of hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and
health care services or facilities operated or controlled by hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be coordinated and scheduled in
accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).
All applications and statements shall be signed by the applicant or
licensee. The agency may require any applications or statements to be
made under oath or affirmation;
(b) Each license shall be in such form and contain such terms and
conditions as the agency may by rule ((or regulation)) prescribe;
(c) No license issued under the authority of this chapter and no
right to possess or utilize sources of ionizing radiation granted by
any license shall be assigned or in any manner disposed of; and
(d) The terms and conditions of all licenses shall be subject to
amendment, revision, or modification by rules((, regulations)) or
orders issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Before the agency issues a license to an applicant under this
section, it shall give notice of such application to the chief
executive officer of the incorporated city or town, if the application
is for a license within an incorporated city or town, or to the county
legislative authority, if the application is for a license outside the
boundaries of incorporated cities or towns. The incorporated city or
town, through the official or employee selected by it, or the county
legislative authority or the official or employee selected by it, shall
have the right to file with the agency within twenty days after date of
transmittal of such notice, written objections against the applicant or
against the activity for which the license is sought, and shall include
with such objections a statement of all facts upon which such
objections are based, and in case written objections are filed, may
request and the agency may in its discretion hold a formal hearing
under chapter 34.05 RCW. Upon the granting of a license under this
section the agency shall send a duplicate of the license or written
notification to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or
town in which the license is granted, or to the county legislative
authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries of
incorporated cities or towns.
This subsection shall not apply to activities conducted within the
boundaries of the Hanford reservation.
(3) The agency may require registration of all sources of ionizing
radiation.
(4) The agency may exempt certain sources of ionizing radiation or
kinds of uses or users from the registration or licensing requirements
set forth in this section when the agency makes a finding after
approval of the technical advisory board that the exemption of such
sources of ionizing radiation or kinds of uses or users will not
constitute a significant risk to the health and safety of the public.
(5) In ((promulgating rules and regulations pursuant to)) adopting
rules under this chapter the agency shall, insofar as practical, strive
to avoid requiring dual licensing, and shall provide for such
recognition of other state or federal licenses as the agency shall deem
desirable, subject to such registration requirements as the agency may
prescribe.

Sec. 27 RCW 70.98.090 and 1985 c 372 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The agency or its duly authorized representative shall have the
power to enter at all reasonable times upon any private or public
property for the purpose of determining whether or not there is
compliance with or violation of the provisions of this chapter and
rules ((and regulations issued thereunder)) adopted under this chapter.
Inspection of hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and health
care services or facilities operated or controlled by hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be coordinated and scheduled in
accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

Sec. 28 RCW 70.127.180 and 2000 c 175 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may at any time conduct a survey of all records
and operations of a licensee in order to determine compliance with this
chapter. The department may conduct in-home visits to observe
patient/client care and services. The right to conduct a survey shall
extend to any premises and records of persons whom the department has
reason to believe are providing home health, hospice, or home care
services without a license. Surveys of licensees operated or
controlled by hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be
coordinated and scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 5 of this act).
(2) Following a survey, the department shall give written notice of
any violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter.
The notice shall describe the reasons for noncompliance.
(3) The licensee may be subject to formal enforcement action under
RCW 70.127.170 if the department determines: (a) The licensee has
previously been subject to a formal enforcement action for the same or
similar type of violation of the same statute or rule, or has been
given previous notice of the same or similar type of violation of the
same statute or rule; (b) the licensee failed to achieve compliance
with a statute, rule, or order by the date established in a previously
issued notice or order; (c) the violation resulted in actual serious
physical or emotional harm or immediate threat to the health, safety,
welfare, or rights of one or more individuals; or (d) the violation has
a potential for serious physical or emotional harm or immediate threat
to the health, safety, welfare, or rights of one or more individuals.

Sec. 29 RCW 70.168.070 and 1990 c 269 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any hospital or health care facility that desires to be authorized
to provide a designated trauma care service shall request designation
from the department. Designation involves a contractual relationship
between the state and a hospital or health care facility whereby each
agrees to maintain a level of commitment and resources sufficient to
meet responsibilities and standards required by the statewide emergency
medical services and trauma care system plan. By January 1992, the
department shall determine by rule the manner and form of such
requests. Upon receiving a request, the department shall review the
request to determine whether the hospital or health care facility is in
compliance with standards for the trauma care service or services for
which designation is desired. If requests are received from more than
one hospital or health care facility within the same emergency medical
planning and trauma care planning and service region, the department
shall select the most qualified applicant or applicants to be selected
through a competitive process. Any applicant not designated may
request a hearing to review the decision.
Designations are valid for a period of three years and are
renewable upon receipt of a request for renewal prior to expiration
from the hospital or health care facility. When an authorization for
designation is due for renewal other hospitals and health care
facilities in the area may also apply and compete for designation.
Regional emergency medical and trauma care councils shall be notified
promptly of designated hospitals and health care facilities in their
region so they may incorporate them into the regional plan as required
by this chapter. The department may revoke or suspend the designation
should it determine that the hospital or health care facility is
substantially out of compliance with the standards and has refused or
been unable to comply after a reasonable period of time has elapsed.
The department shall promptly notify the regional emergency medical and
trauma care planning and service region of suspensions or revocations.
Any facility whose designation has been revoked or suspended may
request a hearing to review the action by the department as provided
for in chapter 34.05 RCW.
As a part of the process to designate and renew the designation of
hospitals authorized to provide level I, II, or III trauma care
services or level I, II, and III pediatric trauma care services, the
department shall contract for on-site reviews of such hospitals to
determine compliance with required standards. The department may
contract for on-site reviews of hospitals and health care facilities
authorized to provide level IV or V trauma care services or level I, I-pediatric, II, or III trauma-related rehabilitative services to
determine compliance with required standards. Members of on-site
review teams and staff included in site visits are exempt from RCW
42.17.250 through 42.17.450. They may not divulge and cannot be
subpoenaed to divulge information obtained or reports written pursuant
to this section in any civil action, except, after in camera review,
pursuant to a court order which provides for the protection of
sensitive information of interested parties including the department:
(1) In actions arising out of the department's designation of a
hospital or health care facility pursuant to this section; (2) in
actions arising out of the department's revocation or suspension of
designation status of a hospital or health care facility under this
section; or (3) in actions arising out of the restriction or revocation
of the clinical or staff privileges of a health care provider as
defined in RCW ((70.70.020)) 7.70.020 (1) and (2), subject to any
further restrictions on disclosure in RCW 4.24.250 that may apply.
Information that identifies individual patients shall not be publicly
disclosed without the patient's consent. When a facility requests
designation for more than one service, the department may coordinate
the joint consideration of such requests.
On-site reviews, inspections or surveys of hospitals licensed under
chapter 70.41 RCW or health care facilities operated or controlled by
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be coordinated and
scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of
this act).
The department may establish fees to help defray the costs of this
section, though such fees shall not be assessed to health care
facilities authorized to provide level IV and V trauma care services.
This section shall not restrict the authority of a hospital or a
health care provider licensed under Title 18 RCW to provide services
which it has been authorized to provide by state law.

Sec. 30 RCW 70.168.080 and 1990 c 269 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any provider desiring to provide a verified prehospital trauma
care service shall indicate on the licensing application how they meet
the standards required for verification as a provider of this service.
The department shall notify the regional emergency medical services and
trauma care councils of the providers of verified trauma care services
in their regions. The department may conduct on-site reviews of
prehospital providers to assess compliance with the applicable
standards. On-site reviews, inspections, or surveys of prehospital
providers operated or controlled by hospitals licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW must be coordinated and scheduled in accordance with chapter
43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).
(2) Should the department determine that a prehospital provider is
substantially out of compliance with the standards, the department
shall notify the regional emergency medical services and trauma care
council. If the failure of a prehospital provider to comply with the
applicable standards results in the region being out of compliance with
its regional plan, the council shall take such steps necessary to
assure the region is brought into compliance within a reasonable period
of time. The council may seek assistance and funding from the
department and others to provide training or grants necessary to bring
a prehospital provider into compliance. The council may appeal to the
department for modification of the regional plan if it is unable to
assure continued compliance with the regional plan. The department may
authorize modification of the plan if such modifications meet the
requirements of this chapter. The department may suspend or revoke the
authorization of a prehospital provider to provide a verified
prehospital service if the provider has refused or been unable to
comply after a reasonable period of time has elapsed. The council
shall be notified promptly of any revocations or suspensions. Any
prehospital provider whose verification has been suspended or revoked
may request a hearing to review the action by the department as
provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) The department may grant a variance from provisions of this
section if the department determines: (a) That no detriment to public
health and safety will result from the variance, and (b) compliance
with provisions of this section will cause a reduction or loss of
existing prehospital services. Variances may be granted for a period
not to exceed one year. A variance may be renewed by the department.
If a renewal is granted, a plan of compliance shall be prepared
specifying steps necessary to bring a provider or region into
compliance and expected date of compliance.
(4) This section shall not restrict the authority of a provider
licensed under Title 18 RCW to provide services which it has been
authorized to provide by state law.

Sec. 31 RCW 71.12.480 and 2000 c 93 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of health shall not grant any such license until it
has made an examination of all phases of the operation of the
establishment necessary to determine compliance with rules adopted
under this chapter including the premises proposed to be licensed and
is satisfied that the premises are substantially as described, and are
otherwise fit and suitable for the purposes for which they are designed
to be used, and that such license should be granted. Examinations of
establishments operated or controlled by hospitals licensed under
chapter 70.41 RCW must be coordinated and scheduled in accordance with
chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act).

Sec. 32 RCW 71.12.485 and 1995 c 369 s 61 are each amended to
read as follows:
Standards for fire protection and the enforcement thereof, with
respect to all establishments to be licensed hereunder, shall be the
responsibility of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection, who shall adopt such recognized standards
as may be applicable to such establishments for the protection of life
against the cause and spread of fire and fire hazards. The department
of health, upon receipt of an application for a license, or renewal of
a license, shall submit to the chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, in writing, a request for an
inspection, giving the applicant's name and the location of the
premises to be licensed. Upon receipt of such a request, the chief of
the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection,
or his or her deputy shall make an inspection of the establishment to
be licensed, and if it is found that the premises do not comply with
the required safety standards and fire ((regulations as promulgated))
rules adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection, he or she shall promptly make a written
report to the establishment and the department of health as to the
manner and time allowed in which the premises must qualify for a
license and set forth the conditions to be remedied with respect to
fire regulations. The department of health, applicant or licensee
shall notify the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection, upon completion of any requirements made
by him or her, and the director of fire protection or his or her deputy
shall make a reinspection of such premises. Whenever the establishment
to be licensed meets with the approval of the chief of the Washington
state patrol, through the director of fire protection, he or she shall
submit to the department of health a written report approving same with
respect to fire protection before a full license can be issued. The
chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, shall make or cause to be made inspections of such
establishments at least annually. The department of health shall not
license or continue the license of any establishment unless and until
it shall be approved by the chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, as ((herein)) provided in this
section.
In cities which have in force a comprehensive building code, the
provisions of which are determined by the chief of the Washington state
patrol, through the director of fire protection, to be equal to the
minimum standards of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through
the director of fire protection, for such establishments, the chief of
the fire department, provided the latter is a paid chief of a paid fire
department, shall make the inspection with the chief of the Washington
state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or his or her
deputy, and they shall jointly approve the premises before a full
license can be issued. Inspections of establishments operated or
controlled by hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be
coordinated and scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 5 of this act).

Sec. 33 RCW 71.12.500 and 2000 c 93 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of health may at any time examine and ascertain how
far a licensed establishment is conducted in compliance with this
chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, and the requirements of
the license therefor. However, examinations of licensed establishments
operated or controlled by hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW
must be coordinated and scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 5 of this act). If the interests of the patients
of the establishment so demand, the department may, for just and
reasonable cause, suspend, modify, or revoke any such license. RCW
43.70.115 governs notice of a license denial, revocation, suspension,
or modification and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding.

Sec. 34 RCW 74.09.200 and 1979 ex.s. c 152 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The legislature finds and declares it to be in the public interest
and for the protection of the health and welfare of the residents of
the state of Washington that a proper regulatory and inspection program
be instituted in connection with the providing of medical, dental, and
other health services to recipients of public assistance and medically
indigent persons. In order to effectively accomplish such purpose and
to assure that the recipient of such services receives such services as
are paid for by the state of Washington, the acceptance by the
recipient of such services, and by practitioners of reimbursement for
performing such services, shall authorize the secretary of ((the
department of)) social and health services or ((his)) a designee, to
inspect and audit all records in connection with the providing of such
services. Inspections, audits, and surveys of hospitals licensed under
chapter 70.41 RCW and health care services or facilities operated or
controlled by hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must be
coordinated and scheduled in accordance with chapter 43.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 5 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 Section 5 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 Sections 1 through 4 and 7 through 34 of
this act take effect January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---