BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.005 and 2002 c 292 s 1 and 2002 c 27 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in RCW 41.04.005, 41.16.220, 41.20.050, and 41.40.170,
((and 28B.15.380)) "veteran" includes every person, who at the time he
or she seeks the benefits of RCW 41.04.005, 41.16.220, 41.20.050, or
41.40.170((, or 28B.15.380)) has received an honorable discharge or
received a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record and
who meets at least one of the following criteria:
(a) The person has served between World War I and World War II or
during any period of war, as defined in subsection (2) of this section,
as either:
(i) A member in any branch of the armed forces of the United
States;
(ii) A member of the women's air forces service pilots;
(iii) A U.S. documented merchant mariner with service aboard an
oceangoing vessel operated by the war shipping administration, the
office of defense transportation, or their agents, from December 7,
1941, through December 31, 1946; or
(iv) A civil service crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army
transport service or U.S. naval transportation service vessel in
oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946; or
(b) The person has received the armed forces expeditionary medal,
or marine corps and navy expeditionary medal, for opposed action on
foreign soil, for service:
(i) In any branch of the armed forces of the United States; or
(ii) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots.
(2) A "period of war" includes:
(a) World War I;
(b) World War II;
(c) The Korean conflict;
(d) The Vietnam era(([, which])), which means:
(i) The period beginning on February 28, 1961, and ending on May 7,
1975, in the case of a veteran who served in the Republic of Vietnam
during that period;
(ii) The period beginning August 5, 1964, and ending on May 7,
1975;
(e) The Persian Gulf War, which was the period beginning August 2,
1990, and ending on the date prescribed by presidential proclamation or
law;
(f) The period beginning on the date of any future declaration of
war by the congress and ending on the date prescribed by presidential
proclamation or concurrent resolution of the congress; and
(g) The following armed conflicts, if the participant was awarded
the respective campaign badge or medal: The crisis in Lebanon; the
invasion of Grenada; Panama, Operation Just Cause; Somalia, Operation
Restore Hope; Haiti, Operation Uphold Democracy; and Bosnia, Operation
Joint Endeavor.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.04.007 and 2002 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Veteran" includes every person, who at the time he or she seeks
the benefits of RCW 72.36.030, 28B.15.380, 41.04.010, 73.04.090,
73.04.110, 73.08.010, 73.08.060, 73.08.070, or 73.08.080 has received
an honorable discharge or received a discharge for medical reasons with
an honorable record, where applicable, and who has served in at least
one of the following capacities:
(1) As a member in any branch of the armed forces of the United
States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, and has
fulfilled his or her initial military service obligation;
(2) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots;
(3) As a member of the armed forces reserves, national guard, or
coast guard, and has been called into federal service by a presidential
select reserve call up for at least one hundred eighty cumulative days;
(4) As a civil service crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army
transport service or U.S. naval transportation service vessel in
oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946; or
(5) As a member of the Philippine armed forces/scouts during the
period of armed conflict from December 7, 1941, through August 15,
1945.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.380 and 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College may exempt the following students from the payment of all
or a portion of tuition fees and services and activities fees:
(1) All veterans as defined in RCW ((41.04.005)) 41.04.007:
PROVIDED, That such persons are no longer entitled to federal
vocational or educational benefits conferred by virtue of their
military service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That if any such veterans have
not resided in this state for one year prior to registration, the board
may exempt the student from paying up to fifty percent of the
nonresident tuition fees differential. Such exemptions may be provided
only to those persons otherwise covered who were enrolled in
universities on or before October 1, 1977.
(2) Children of any law enforcement officer or fire fighter who
lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty
while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full time or
volunteer fire department in this state: PROVIDED, That such persons
may receive the exemption only if they begin their course of study at
a state-supported college or university within ten years of their
graduation from high school.

--- END ---