BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that candidates for
judicial offices do not forfeit their rights to freedom of speech when
they file for election and that public confidence and trust in the
judicial process would be promoted if judicial candidates were
permitted to discuss and comment on issues of interest. The
legislature finds that judicial candidates can discuss and comment on
issues of interest without committing or appearing to commit the
candidate with respect to cases, controversies, or issues likely to
come before the court, and that they must be allowed to do so. The
legislature further finds that the people have a right to know the
opinions and potential biases of candidates for judicial office.
Therefore, the legislature intends to provide that candidates for
judicial office may participate in public discussion of issues without
violation of the appearance of fairness doctrine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Before declaring as a candidate or while campaigning for a justice
of the supreme court under chapter 2.04 RCW, judge for the court of
appeals under chapter 2.06 RCW, judge for the superior court under
chapter 2.08 RCW, judge for the district court under chapter 3.34 RCW,
or municipal judge under chapter 3.50 RCW, no public discussion or
expression of an opinion, other than a statement committing or
appearing to commit the candidate with respect to cases likely to come
before the court, by a person subsequently elected to a judicial
position is a violation of the appearance of fairness doctrine. This
section applies equally to new judicial candidates and incumbent
candidates.

--- END ---