BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The real and personal property owned or used by a nonprofit
organization is exempt from taxation if the property is used for
solicitation or collection of gifts, donations, or grants for the
support of individual artists and the organization meets all of the
following conditions:
(1) The organization is organized and conducted for nonsectarian
purposes.
(2) The organization is qualified for exemption under section
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code.
(3) The organization is governed by a volunteer board of directors
of at least eight members.
(4) If the property is leased, the benefit of the exemption inures
to the user.
(5) The gifts, donations, and grants are used by the organization
for grants, fellowships, information services, and educational
resources in support of individual artists engaged in the production or
performance of musical, dance, artistic, dramatic, or literary works.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.810 and 2001 c 126 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Upon cessation of a use under which an exemption has been
granted pursuant to RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041,
84.36.042, 84.36.043, 84.36.046, 84.36.050, 84.36.060, 84.36.550,
section 2 of this act, 84.36.560, and 84.36.570, except as provided in
(b) of this subsection, the county treasurer shall collect all taxes
which would have been paid had the property not been exempt during the
three years preceding, or the life of such exemption, if such be less,
together with the interest at the same rate and computed in the same
way as that upon delinquent property taxes. If the property has been
granted an exemption for more than ten consecutive years, taxes and
interest shall not be assessed under this section.
(b) Upon cessation of use by an institution of higher education of
property exempt under RCW 84.36.050(2) the county treasurer shall
collect all taxes which would have been paid had the property not been
exempt during the seven years preceding, or the life of the exemption,
whichever is less.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies only when ownership of
the property is transferred or when fifty-one percent or more of the
area of the property loses its exempt status. The additional tax under
subsection (1) of this section shall not be imposed if the cessation of
use resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation for a use which also qualifies and is granted exemption
under this chapter;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the property is located which disallows
the present use of such property;
(d) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the
organization, association, or corporation changing the use of such
property;
(e) Relocation of the activity and use of another location or site
except for undeveloped properties of camp facilities exempted under RCW
84.36.030;
(f) Cancellation of a lease on leased property that had been exempt
under this chapter ((or RCW 84.36.560)); or
(g) A change in the exempt portion of a home for the aging under
RCW 84.36.041(3), as long as some portion of the home remains exempt.
(3) Subsections (2)(e) and (f) of this section do not apply to
property leased to a state institution of higher education and exempt
under RCW 84.36.050(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2004 and thereafter.

--- END ---