BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of a mailer, and the postage directly incurred with delivering such
a mailer, if the mailer is both printed outside the state and mailed
directly from outside the state to a mass audience.
For the purposes of this section, a "mailer" consists solely of
unbound sheets of paper in a mailing envelope, the primary purpose of
which mailer is to promote the sale of products or services for more
than one business and the businesses are unrelated to the person
creating and printing the mailer. The exemption in this section does
not extend to promotional material included with billing statements or
statements of account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2003.

--- END ---