BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.16.340 and 1991 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All claims or causes of action based on intentional conduct
brought by any person for recovery of damages for injury suffered as a
result of childhood sexual abuse shall be commenced ((within the later
of the following periods:
(a) Within three years of the act alleged to have caused the injury
or condition;
(b) Within three years of the time the victim discovered or
reasonably should have discovered that the injury or condition was
caused by said act; or
(c) Within three years of the time the victim discovered that the
act caused the injury for which the claim is brought:
PROVIDED, That the time limit for commencement of an action under
this section is tolled for a child until)) at any time before the child
reaches the age of ((eighteen)) thirty years.
(2) ((The victim need not establish which act in a series of
continuing sexual abuse or exploitation incidents caused the injury
complained of, but may compute the date of discovery from the date of
discovery of the last act by the same perpetrator which is part of a
common scheme or plan of sexual abuse or exploitation.
(3) The knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall not be
imputed to a person under the age of eighteen years.
(4))) For purposes of this section, "child" means a person under
the age of eighteen years.
(((5))) (3) As used in this section, "childhood sexual abuse" means
any act committed by the defendant against a complainant who was less
than eighteen years of age at the time of the act and which act would
have been a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW or RCW 9.68A.040 or prior
laws of similar effect at the time the act was committed.

--- END ---