BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.335.060 and 1989 c 86 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each school district's board of directors shall deposit moneys
derived from the lease, rental, or occasional use of surplus school
property as follows:
(1) Moneys derived from real property shall be deposited into the
district's debt service fund and/or capital projects fund, except for:
(a) Moneys required to be expended for general maintenance,
utility, insurance costs, and any other costs associated with the lease
or rental of such property, which moneys shall be deposited in the
district's general fund; or
(b) At the option of the board of directors, after evaluating the
sufficiency of the school district's capital projects fund for purposes
of meeting demands for new construction and improvements, moneys
derived from the lease or rental of real property may be deposited into
the district's general fund to be used exclusively for nonrecurring
costs related to operating school facilities, including but not limited
to expenses for maintenance;
(2) Moneys derived from pupil transportation vehicles shall be
deposited in the district's transportation vehicle fund;
(3) Moneys derived from other personal property shall be deposited
in the district's general fund.

--- END ---