BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.067 and 2002 c 46 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the projects authorized in RCW 39.10.061, public
bodies may also use the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedure for the construction of school district capital
demonstration projects, subject to the following conditions:
(1) The project must receive approval from the school district
project review board established under RCW 39.10.115.
(2) The school district project review board may not authorize more
than ((ten)) twenty demonstration projects valued over five million
dollars, of which ((at least)) only two demonstration projects must be
valued between five and ten million dollars.

--- END ---