BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.24.070 and 1992 c 54 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
In each county pursuant to this chapter, the county treasurer shall
deposit in the county or regional law library fund a sum equal to
((twelve)) seventeen dollars for every new probate or civil filing fee,
including appeals, collected by the clerk of the superior court and
six dollars for every fee collected for the commencement of a civil
action in district court for the support of the law library in that
county or the regional law library to which the county belongs:
PROVIDED, That upon a showing of need the ((twelve)) seventeen dollar
contribution may be increased up to ((fifteen)) twenty dollars or in
counties with multiple library sites up to thirty dollars upon the
request of the law library board of trustees and with the approval of
the county legislative body or bodies.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.18.012 and 2001 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division
with the state for deposit in the public safety and education account
and the civil equal justice account, where applicable, under RCW
36.18.025.
(2) The party filing a transcript or abstract of judgment or
verdict from a United States court held in this state, or from the
superior court of another county or from a district court in the county
of issuance, shall pay at the time of filing a fee of fifteen dollars.
(3) The clerk shall collect a fee of twenty dollars for: Filing a
paper not related to or a part of a proceeding, civil or criminal, or
a probate matter, required or permitted to be filed in the clerk's
office for which no other charge is provided by law.
(4) If the defendant serves or files an answer to an unlawful
detainer complaint under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, the plaintiff
shall pay before proceeding with the unlawful detainer action eighty
dollars and a civil equal justice surcharge of forty dollars.
(5) For a restrictive covenant for filing a petition to strike
discriminatory provisions in real estate under RCW 49.60.227 a fee of
twenty dollars must be charged.
(6) A fee of twenty dollars must be charged for filing a will only,
when no probate of the will is contemplated.
(7) A fee of two dollars must be charged for filing a petition,
written agreement, or written memorandum in a nonjudicial probate
dispute under RCW 11.96A.220.
(8) A fee of thirty-five dollars must be charged for filing a
petition regarding a common law lien under RCW 60.70.060.
(9) For certification of delinquent taxes by a county treasurer
under RCW 84.64.190, a fee of five dollars must be charged.
(10) For the filing of a tax warrant for unpaid taxes or
overpayment of benefits by any agency of the state of Washington, a fee
of five dollars on or after July 22, 2001, and for the filing of such
a tax warrant or overpayment of benefits on or after July 1, 2003, a
fee of twenty dollars, of which forty-six percent of the first five
dollars is directed to the public safety and education account
established under RCW 43.08.250.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.18.020 and 2000 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division
with the state public safety and education account under RCW 36.18.025
and with the county or regional law library fund under RCW 27.24.070.
(2) Clerks of superior courts shall collect the following fees for
their official services:
(a) The party filing the first or initial paper in any civil
action, including, but not limited to an action for restitution,
adoption, or change of name, shall pay, at the time the paper is filed,
a fee of one hundred ten dollars and a civil equal justice surcharge of
ninety dollars except, in an unlawful detainer action under chapter
59.18 or 59.20 RCW for which the plaintiff shall pay a case initiating
filing fee of thirty dollars and a civil equal justice surcharge of
fifty dollars, or in proceedings filed under RCW 28A.225.030 alleging
a violation of the compulsory attendance laws where the petitioner
shall not pay a filing fee. The thirty dollar filing fee and fifty
dollar civil equal justice surcharge under this subsection for an
unlawful detainer action shall not include an order to show cause or
any other order or judgment except a default order or default judgment
in an unlawful detainer action.
(b) Any party, except a defendant in a criminal case, filing the
first or initial paper on an appeal from a court of limited
jurisdiction or any party on any civil appeal, shall pay, when the
paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten dollars and a civil equal
justice surcharge of ninety dollars.
(c) For filing of a petition for judicial review as required under
RCW 34.05.514 a filing fee of one hundred ten dollars and a civil equal
justice surcharge of ninety dollars.
(d) For filing of a petition for unlawful harassment under RCW
10.14.040 a filing fee of forty-one dollars.
(e) For filing the notice of debt due for the compensation of a
crime victim under RCW 7.68.120(2)(a) a fee of one hundred ten dollars
and a civil equal justice surcharge of ninety dollars.
(f) In probate proceedings, the party instituting such proceedings,
shall pay at the time of filing the first paper therein, a fee of one
hundred ten dollars and a civil equal justice surcharge of ninety
dollars.
(g) For filing any petition to contest a will admitted to probate
or a petition to admit a will which has been rejected, or a petition
objecting to a written agreement or memorandum as provided in RCW
11.96A.220, there shall be paid a fee of one hundred ten dollars and a
civil equal justice surcharge of ninety dollars.
(h) Upon conviction or plea of guilty, upon failure to prosecute an
appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction as provided by law, or upon
affirmance of a conviction by a court of limited jurisdiction, a
defendant in a criminal case shall be liable for a fee of one hundred
ten dollars and a civil equal justice surcharge of ninety dollars.
(i) With the exception of demands for jury hereafter made and
garnishments hereafter issued, civil actions and probate proceedings
filed prior to midnight, July 1, 1972, shall be completed and governed
by the fee schedule in effect as of January 1, 1972: PROVIDED, That no
fee shall be assessed if an order of dismissal on the clerk's record be
filed as provided by rule of the supreme court.
(3) No fee shall be collected when a petition for relinquishment of
parental rights is filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.080 or for forms and
instructional brochures provided under RCW 26.50.030.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.18.025 and 2001 c 146 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Forty-six percent of the money received from filing fees paid
pursuant to RCW 36.18.020, except those collected for the filing of
warrants for unpaid taxes or overpayments by state agencies as outlined
in RCW 36.18.012(10), shall be transmitted by the county treasurer each
month to the state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and
education account established under RCW 43.08.250. Forty-six percent
of the civil equal justice surcharge paid pursuant to RCW 36.18.012(4)
and 36.18.020 shall be paid to the civil equal justice account
established in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The state civil equal justice account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for civil representation
of indigent persons as authorized under RCW 43.08.260 and 43.08.270.

--- END ---