BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that
passenger-only ferry service is a key element to the state's
transportation system and that it is in the interest of the state to
ensure provision of such services. The legislature further finds that
diminished state transportation resources require that regional and
local authorities be authorized to develop, operate, and fund needed
services.
It is the intent of the legislature that the state provide for a
transition from state-provided to local service and that the department
of transportation provide resources to assist in this effort.
It is the intent of the legislature to encourage interlocal
agreements to ensure passenger-only ferry service is maintained on
routes that the Washington state ferry system eliminates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.57A RCW
to read as follows:
PTBA AUTHORIZATION FOR PASSENGER-ONLY FERRIES. A public
transportation benefit area having a boundary located on Puget Sound
may implement a passenger ferry service. For the purposes of this
chapter and sections 7, 8, and 10 of this act, Puget Sound is
considered as extending north as far as the Canadian border and west as
far as Port Angeles. The benefit area must develop a passenger ferry
investment plan including elements to operate or contract for the
operation of passenger ferry services, purchase, lease, or rental of
ferry vessels and dock facilities for the provision of transit service,
and identify other activities necessary to implement the plan. The
plan must set forth terminal locations to be served, projected costs of
providing services, and revenues to be generated from tolls, locally
collected tax revenues, and other revenue sources. The benefit area
may use any of its powers to carry out this purpose, unless otherwise
prohibited by law. In addition, the public transportation benefit area
may enter into contracts and agreements to operate passenger-only ferry
service and public-private partnerships and design-build, general
contractor/construction management, or other alternative procurement
process substantially consistent with chapter 39.10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.57A RCW
to read as follows:
TAXES, FEES, AND TOLLS. (1) A public transportation benefit area
may, as part of a passenger ferry investment plan, recommend some or
all of the following revenue sources as provided in this chapter:
(a) A motor vehicle excise tax, as provided in section 7 of this
act;
(b) A sales and use tax, as provided in section 8 of this act;
(c) Tolls for passengers and packages and, where applicable,
parking; and
(d) Charges or licensing fees for advertising, leasing space for
services to ferry passengers, and other revenue-generating activities.
(2) Taxes may not be imposed without an affirmative vote of the
majority of the voters within the boundaries of the area voting on a
single ballot proposition to both approve a passenger ferry investment
plan and to approve taxes to implement the plan. Revenues from these
taxes and fees may be used only to implement the plan. A district may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate
entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or
charges authorized in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.52 RCW
to read as follows:
CONVEYANCE OF FERRY VESSELS. The department of transportation may
enter into contracts with public transportation benefit areas meeting
the requirements of section 2 of this act and ferry districts created
under section 10 of this act to convey passenger ferry vessels and
other properties associated with passenger-only ferry service that
serve to provide passenger ferry service, as full or part consideration
for the benefit area or ferry district assuming all future maintenance
and operation obligations and costs required to maintain and operate
the vessel and facilities. The conveyances must provide that the
vessels or properties revert to the department if the vessels are not
used for providing passenger ferry service.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.60.120 and 1993 c 427 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
TEN-MILE RULE EXEMPTION. (1) If the department acquires or
constructs, maintains, and operates any ferry crossings upon or toll
bridges over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or connecting waters,
there shall not be constructed, operated, or maintained any other ferry
crossing upon or bridge over any such waters within ten miles of any
such crossing or bridge operated or maintained by the department
excepting such bridges or ferry crossings in existence, and being
operated and maintained under a lawfully issued franchise at the time
of the location of the ferry crossing or construction of the toll
bridge by the department.
(2) The ten-mile distance in subsection (1) of this section means
ten statute miles measured by airline distance. The ten-mile
restriction shall be applied by comparing the two end points (termini)
of a state ferry crossing to those of a private ferry crossing.
(3) The Washington utilities and transportation commission may,
upon written petition of a commercial ferry operator certificated or
applying for certification under chapter 81.84 RCW, and upon notice and
hearing, grant a waiver from the ten-mile restriction. The waiver must
not be detrimental to the public interest. In making a decision to
waive the ten-mile restriction, the commission shall consider, but is
not limited to, the impact of the waiver on transportation congestion
mitigation, air quality improvement, and the overall impact on the
Washington state ferry system. The commission shall act upon a request
for a waiver within ninety days after the conclusion of the hearing.
A waiver is effective for a period of five years from the date of
issuance. At the end of five years the waiver becomes permanent unless
appealed within thirty days by the commission on its own motion, the
department, or an interested party.
(4) The department shall not maintain and operate any ferry
crossing or toll bridge over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or
connecting waters that would infringe upon any franchise lawfully
issued by the state and in existence and being exercised at the time of
the location of the ferry crossing or toll bridge by the department,
without first acquiring the rights granted to such franchise holder
under the franchise.
(5) This section does not apply to the operation of passenger-only
ferry service operated by public transportation benefit areas meeting
the requirements of section 2 of this act or by ferry districts created
under section 10 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.64.090 and 1983 c 15 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
USE OF STATE FERRY FACILITIES. (1) Except as provided in section
4 of this act and subsection (2) of this section, if any party assumes
the operation and maintenance of any ferry or ferry system by rent,
lease, or charter from the department of transportation, such party
shall assume and be bound by all the provisions herein and any
agreement or contract for such operation of any ferry or ferry system
entered into by the department shall provide that the wages to be paid,
hours of employment, working conditions, and seniority rights of
employees will be established by the marine employees' commission in
accordance with the terms and provisions of this chapter and it shall
further provide that all labor disputes shall be adjudicated in
accordance with chapter 47.64 RCW.
(2) If a public transportation benefit area meeting the
requirements of section 2 of this act or a ferry district created under
section 10 of this act has voter approval to operate passenger-only
ferry service, it may enter into an agreement with Washington State
Ferries to rent, lease, or purchase passenger-only vessels, related
equipment, or terminal space for purposes of loading and unloading the
passenger-only ferry. A benefit area or ferry district or
subcontractor of that benefit area or ferry district that qualifies
under this subsection is not subject to the restrictions of subsection
(1) of this section, but is subject to the terms of those agreements
and contracts that it or its subcontractor negotiates with its labor
groups. These labor contracts will be conducted in accordance with the
provisions of the public employment relations commission, as provided
for in chapter 41.58 RCW, or the National Labor Relations Act, as
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCISE TAX AUTHORIZED. (1) Public transportation
benefit areas authorized to implement passenger ferry service under
section 2 of this act whose boundaries (a) are on the Puget Sound, but
(b) do not include an area where a regional transit authority has been
formed, may submit an authorizing proposition to the voters and, if
approved, may levy and collect an excise tax, at a rate approved by the
voters, but not exceeding eighty one-hundredths of one percent on the
value, under chapter 82.44 RCW, of every motor vehicle owned by a
resident of the taxing district, solely for the purpose of providing
passenger ferry service. The tax may be collected only at the time of
vehicle license renewal under chapter 46.16 RCW. The tax will be
imposed on vehicles previously registered in another state or nation
when they are initially registered in this state. In a county imposing
a motor vehicle excise tax surcharge under RCW 81.100.060, the maximum
tax rate under this section must be reduced to a rate equal to eighty
one-hundredths of one percent on the value less the equivalent motor
vehicle excise tax rate of the surcharge imposed under RCW 81.100.060.
This rate does not apply to vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 with
an unladen weight more than six thousand pounds, or to vehicles
licensed under RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.
(2) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
tax. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds must be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer for
monthly distribution to the public transportation benefit area.
(3) The public transportation benefit area imposing this tax shall
delay the effective date at least six months from the date the fee is
approved by the qualified voters of the authority area to allow the
department of licensing to implement administration and collection of
the tax.
(4) Before an authority may impose a tax authorized under this
section, the authorization for imposition of the tax must be approved
by a majority of the qualified electors of the authority area voting on
that issue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
SALES AND USE TAX AUTHORIZATION. Public transportation benefit
areas providing passenger ferry service as provided in section 2 of
this act whose boundaries (1) are on the Puget Sound, but (2) do not
include an area where a regional transit authority has been formed, may
submit an authorizing proposition to the voters and, if approved by a
majority of persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter, solely for the purpose of
providing passenger ferry service.
The tax authorized by this section is in addition to the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and must be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of a taxable event within the taxing district. The
maximum rate of the tax must be approved by the voters and may not
exceed one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax. The maximum rate
of the tax that may be imposed may not exceed nine-tenths of one
percent in a county that imposes a tax under RCW 82.14.340. The
exemptions in RCW 82.08.820 and 82.12.820 are for the state portion of
the sales and use tax and do not extend to the tax authorized in this
section.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.14.050 and 2002 c 56 s 406 are each amended to read
as follows:
ADMINISTRATION AND COLLECTION -- LOCAL SALES AND USE TAX ACCOUNT.
The counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW
82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57
RCW, public transportation benefit areas under section 8 of this act,
and regional transportation investment districts shall contract, prior
to the effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and
use tax, the administration and collection to the state department of
revenue, which shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is
collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the state
department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local sales and use tax
account may be spent only for distribution to counties, cities,
transportation authorities, public facilities districts, public
transportation benefit areas, and regional transportation investment
districts imposing a sales and use tax. All administrative provisions
in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or
may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as they are applicable to
state sales and use taxes, be applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to
this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local sales and use tax account shall be
credited to the local sales and use tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities
districts, public transportation benefit areas, and regional
transportation investment districts monthly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 36.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The establishment of a ferry district to provide passenger
ferry service is authorized for areas bordering the Puget Sound.
Written application for the formation of such a district signed by at
least twenty-five percent of the registered voters who reside in the
proposed district, must be filed with the county legislative authority.
The authority shall immediately transmit the application to the proper
registrar of voters for the proposed district who shall check the
names, residence, and registration of the signers with the records of
the office and shall, as soon as possible, certify to the county
legislative authority the number of qualified signers. If the
requisite number of signers is so certified, the authority shall place
the proposition, "Shall a ferry district be established in the
following area to operate ferries between the following termini:
(describing the proposed district and ferry routes)?" upon the ballot
for a vote of the people of the proposed district at the next election,
general or special. If sixty percent of the voters on the proposition
vote in favor of the proposition, the authority shall, by resolution,
declare the district established. If the requisite number of qualified
persons have not signed the application, further signatures may be
added and certified until the requisite number have signed and the
procedure set forth in this subsection then followed.
(2) When established, a ferry district is a municipality as defined
by the statutes of the state and is entitled to all the powers
conferred by law and exercised by municipal corporations in this state.
A ferry district may levy a property tax in an amount not to exceed one
dollar and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
against the assessed valuation of the property lying within the
district.
(3) A ferry district has the right of eminent domain according to
the laws of the state.
(4) A ferry district may operate any vessel over its authorized
routes upon any of the waters of the state that touch any of the area
of the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---