BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.010 and 1990 c 33 s 376 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In all districts the board of directors shall elect a
superintendent who shall have such qualification as the local school
board alone shall determine. The superintendent shall have supervision
over the several departments of the schools thereof and carry out such
other powers and duties as prescribed by law. Notwithstanding the
provisions of RCW 28A.400.300(1), the board may contract with such
superintendent for a term not to exceed three years when deemed in the
best interest of the district. The right to renew a contract of
employment with any school superintendent shall rest solely with the
discretion of the school board employing such school superintendent.
Regarding such renewal of contracts of school superintendents the
provisions of RCW 28A.405.210, 28A.405.240, and 28A.645.010 shall be
inapplicable.
(2) In addition to any other contract terms and conditions agreed
upon between the parties, a contract for the employment of a
superintendent shall include the following language: "This contract
may be terminated if, by a unanimous affirmative vote of all members of
the school district board of directors, the board finds that the
superintendent has engaged in intentional conduct that creates the
appearance of impropriety and the inability, or apparent inability, to
perform his or her duties in a fair and impartial manner."
(3) If a school district board of directors determines by an
affirmative unanimous vote that the superintendent has engaged in
intentional conduct described in subsection (2) of this section, the
board is prohibited from negotiating a severance agreement with the
superintendent.
(4) The total dollar amount of any termination or severance
agreement in contract or otherwise shall be limited to no more than
one-half the remaining salary otherwise payable under the contract.
All termination or severance agreements in contract or otherwise shall
be considered a public record and subject to public disclosure under
chapter 42.17 RCW.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "appearance of impropriety"
means engaging in actions that would create the appearance of bias to
a reasonable person and that do not promote public confidence in the
integrity and impartiality of the office.

--- END ---