BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The intent of the adoption of the
International Building Code by the legislature is to remain consistent
with state laws regulating construction, including electrical,
plumbing, and energy codes established in chapters 19.27, 19.27A, and
19.28 RCW. The International Building Code references the
International Residential Code for provisions related to the
construction of single and multiple-family dwellings. No portion of
the International Residential Code shall supersede or take precedent
over provisions in chapter 19.28 RCW, regulating the electrical code;
nor provisions in RCW 19.27.031(4), regulating the plumbing code; nor
provisions in chapter 19.27A RCW, regulating the energy code.
(2) It is in the state's interest and consistent with the state
building code act to have in effect provisions regulating the
construction of single and multiple-family residences. It is the
legislative intent that the state building code council adopt the
International Residential Code through rule making granted in RCW
19.27.074, consistent with state law regulating construction for
electrical, plumbing, and energy codes, and other state and federal
laws regulating single and multiple-family construction.
(3) In accordance with RCW 19.27.020, the state building code
council shall promote fire and life safety in buildings consistent with
accepted standards. In adopting the codes for the state of Washington,
the state building code council shall consider provisions related to
fire fighter and worker safety published by nationally recognized
organizations. The state building code council shall review all
nationally recognized codes and develop amendments as set forth in RCW
19.27.074, to incorporate accepted minimum safety requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.031 and 1995 c 343 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in
effect in all counties and cities the state building code which shall
consist of the following codes which are hereby adopted by reference:
(1) ((Uniform)) (a) The International Building Code ((and Uniform
Building Code Standards)), published by the International ((Conference
of Building Officials)) Code Council Inc.;
(b) The International Residential Code, published by the
International Code Council, Inc.;
(2) ((Uniform)) The International Mechanical Code, ((including
Chapter 13, Fuel Gas Piping, Appendix B,)) published by the
International ((Conference of Building Officials)) Code Council Inc.,
except that the standards for liquified petroleum gas installations
shall be NFPA 58 (Storage and Handling of Liquified Petroleum Gases)
and ANSI Z223.1/NFPA 54 (National Fuel Gas Code);
(3) The ((Uniform)) International Fire Code ((and Uniform Fire Code
Standards)), published by the International ((Fire Code Institute))
Code Council Inc.: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording in this
code, participants in religious ceremonies shall not be precluded from
carrying hand-held candles;
(4) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code
and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International
Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That
((chapters 11 and 12)) any provisions of such code affecting sewers or
fuel gas piping are not adopted; and
(5) The rules ((and regulations)) adopted by the council
establishing standards for making buildings and facilities accessible
to and usable by the physically ((handicapped)) disabled or elderly
persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160.
In case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1),
(2), (3), and (4) of this section, the first named code shall govern
over those following.
The codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the
council as provided in RCW 19.27.074. The council shall solicit input
from first responders to ensure that worker safety issues are addressed
during the code adoption process.
The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request
of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated
codes.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.27.080 and 1990 c 33 s 555 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter affects the provisions of chapters 19.27A,
19.28, 43.22, 70.77, 70.79, 70.87, 48.48, 18.20, 18.46, 18.51, 28A.305,
70.41, 70.62, 70.75, 70.108, 71.12, 74.15, 70.94, 76.04, 90.76 RCW, or
RCW 28A.195.010, or grants rights to duplicate the authorities provided
under chapters 70.94 or 76.04 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.27.110 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 37 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each county government shall administer and enforce the ((uniform))
International Fire Code in the unincorporated areas of the county:
PROVIDED, That any political subdivision or municipal corporation
providing fire protection pursuant to RCW 14.08.120 shall, at its sole
option, be responsible for administration and enforcement of the
((uniform)) International Fire Code on its facility. Any fire
protection district or political subdivision may, pursuant to chapter
39.34 RCW, the interlocal cooperation act, assume all or a portion of
the administering responsibility and coordinate and cooperate with the
county government in the enforcement of the ((uniform)) International
Fire Code.
It is not the intent of RCW 19.27.110 and 19.27.111 to preclude or
limit the authority of any city, town, county, fire protection
district, state agency, or political subdivision from engaging in those
fire prevention activities with which they are charged.
It is not the intent of the legislature by adopting the state
building code or RCW 19.27.110 and 19.27.111 to grant counties any more
power to suppress or extinguish fires than counties currently possess
under the Constitution or other statutes.
Each county is authorized to impose fees sufficient to pay the cost
of inspections, administration, and enforcement pursuant to RCW
19.27.110 and 19.27.111.

--- END ---