BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that adult family
homes are a vital and integral component of the long-term care system
in Washington state. The legislature further recognizes that
regulations for the provision of care and the requirements of licensees
for building code and fire safety adherence should be uniform
throughout Washington state. The legislature further recognizes that
elderly and disabled residents in adult family homes have uniform
access to neighborhoods throughout the state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.79.260 and 2000 c 95 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A registered nurse under his or her license may perform for
compensation nursing care, as that term is usually understood, of the
ill, injured, or infirm.
(2) A registered nurse may, at or under the general direction of a
licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and
surgeon, naturopathic physician, podiatric physician and surgeon,
physician assistant, osteopathic physician assistant, or advanced
registered nurse practitioner acting within the scope of his or her
license, administer medications, treatments, tests, and inoculations,
whether or not the severing or penetrating of tissues is involved and
whether or not a degree of independent judgment and skill is required.
Such direction must be for acts which are within the scope of
registered nursing practice.
(3) A registered nurse may delegate tasks of nursing care to other
individuals where the registered nurse determines that it is in the
best interest of the patient.
(a) The delegating nurse shall:
(i) Determine the competency of the individual to perform the
tasks;
(ii) Evaluate the appropriateness of the delegation;
(iii) Supervise the actions of the person performing the delegated
task; and
(iv) Delegate only those tasks that are within the registered
nurse's scope of practice.
(b) A registered nurse may not delegate acts requiring substantial
skill, the administration of medications, or piercing or severing of
tissues except to registered or certified nursing assistants who
provide care to individuals in community-based care settings as
authorized under (d) of this subsection. Acts that require nursing
judgment shall not be delegated.
(c) No person may coerce a nurse into compromising patient safety
by requiring the nurse to delegate if the nurse determines that it is
inappropriate to do so. Nurses shall not be subject to any employer
reprisal or disciplinary action by the nursing care quality assurance
commission for refusing to delegate tasks or refusing to provide the
required training for delegation if the nurse determines delegation may
compromise patient safety.
(d) For delegation in community-based care settings, a registered
nurse may delegate nursing care tasks only to registered or certified
nursing assistants. Simple care tasks such as blood pressure
monitoring, personal care service, the use of common over-the-counter
medications, the application of topical ointments, medications, and ear
and eye drops, or other tasks as defined by the nursing care quality
assurance commission are exempted from this requirement. "Community-based care settings" includes: Community residential programs for the
developmentally disabled, certified by the department of social and
health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family homes licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW; and boarding homes licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include acute care or
skilled nursing facilities.
(i) Delegation of nursing care tasks in community-based care
settings is only allowed for individuals who have a stable and
predictable condition. "Stable and predictable condition" means a
situation in which the individual's clinical and behavioral status is
known and does not require the frequent presence and evaluation of a
registered nurse.
(ii) The determination of the appropriateness of delegation of a
nursing task is at the discretion of the registered nurse. However,
the administration of medications by injection, sterile procedures, and
central line maintenance may never be delegated.
(iii) The registered nurse shall verify that the nursing assistant
has completed the required core nurse delegation training required in
chapter 18.88A RCW prior to authorizing delegation.
(iv) The nurse is accountable for his or her own individual actions
in the delegation process. Nurses acting within the protocols of their
delegation authority are immune from liability for any action performed
in the course of their delegation duties.
(v) On or before June 30, 2001, the nursing care quality assurance
commission, in conjunction with the professional nursing organizations
and the department of social and health services, shall make any needed
revisions or additions to nurse delegation protocols by rule, including
standards for nurses to obtain informed consent prior to the delegation
of nursing care tasks. Nursing task delegation protocols are not
intended to regulate the settings in which delegation may occur, but
are intended to ensure that nursing care services have a consistent
standard of practice upon which the public and the profession may rely,
and to safeguard the authority of the nurse to make independent
professional decisions regarding the delegation of a task.
(e) The nursing care quality assurance commission may adopt rules
to implement this section.
(4) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may instruct
nurses in technical subjects pertaining to nursing.
(5) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may hold herself
or himself out to the public or designate herself or himself as a
registered nurse.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.128.060 and 2001 c 193 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An application for license shall be made to the department upon
forms provided by it and shall contain such information as the
department reasonably requires.
(2) The department shall issue a license to an adult family home if
the department finds that the applicant and the home are in compliance
with this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter, unless (a)
the applicant has prior violations of this chapter relating to the
adult family home subject to the application or any other adult family
home, or of any other law regulating residential care facilities within
the past five years that resulted in revocation or nonrenewal of a
license; or (b) the applicant has a history of significant
noncompliance with federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations
relating to the provision of care or services to vulnerable adults or
to children.
(3) The license fee shall be submitted with the application.
(4) The department shall serve upon the applicant a copy of the
decision granting or denying an application for a license. An
applicant shall have the right to contest denial of his or her
application for a license as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by
requesting a hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after receipt
of the notice of denial.
(5) The department shall not issue a license to a provider if the
department finds that the provider or any partner, officer, director,
managerial employee, or owner of five percent or more if the provider
has a history of significant noncompliance with federal or state
regulations, rules, or laws in providing care or services to vulnerable
adults or to children.
(6) The department shall license an adult family home for the
maximum level of care that the adult family home may provide. The
department shall define, in rule, license levels based upon the
education, training, and caregiving experience of the licensed provider
or staff.
(7) The department shall establish, by rule, standards used to
license nonresident providers and multiple facility operators.
(8) The department shall establish, by rule, for multiple facility
operators educational standards substantially equivalent to recognized
national certification standards for residential care administrators.
(9) The license fee shall be set at fifty dollars per year for each
home. A fifty dollar processing fee shall also be charged each home
when the home is initially licensed.
(10) A provider who receives notification of the department's
initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of an
adult family home license may, in lieu of appealing the department's
action, surrender or relinquish the license. The department shall not
issue a new license to or contract with the provider, for the purposes
of providing care to vulnerable adults or children, for a period of
twenty years following the surrendering or relinquishment of the former
license. The licensing record shall indicate that the provider
relinquished or surrendered the license, without admitting the
violations, after receiving notice of the department's initiation of a
denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license.
(11) The department, the adult family home, a resident or a
resident's legal representative, or the long-term care ombudsman may
utilize the services of a qualified third-party dispute resolution
center or organization currently contracted for services by the
department under existing funds, if the informal dispute resolution
process fails to produce an agreement by the parties. This subsection
does not preclude the utilization of dispute resolution centers or
organizations that may provide pro bono services, whether or not the
entity is currently contracted by the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.128.064 and 2001 c 319 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to prevent disruption to current residents, at the request
of the current licensed provider, the department shall give processing
priority to the application of a person seeking to be licensed as the
new provider for the adult family home. The department may issue a
provisional license when a currently licensed adult family home
provider has applied to be licensed as the new provider for a currently
licensed adult family home, the application has been initially
processed, and all that remains to complete the application process is
an on-site inspection. This section applies if a name on an adult
family home license is changed due to the death of a spouse, divorce,
or changes of corporate officers or partnerships. Provisional licenses
must be available while the remaining parties on the license verify
qualifications and capabilities necessary to qualify as the responsible
entity on the license. Licenses must be processed by the department
within sixty days of the submission of a completed application.
Applications reviewed by the department must include a comprehensive
list of omissions or errors and a corresponding list of necessary
corrections before the application is returned to the provider.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.128.140 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 26 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each adult family home shall meet applicable local licensing,
zoning, building, and housing codes, and state and local fire safety
regulations as they pertain to a single-family residence. ((It is the
responsibility of the home to check with local authorities to ensure
all local codes are met.)) Adult family homes are subject to uniform
application of state building code requirements by local jurisdictions
as applied to residential group 3 designation. The state building code
council may make reasonable and affordable stipulations for residents'
rights under chapter 70.129 RCW and safety pursuant to the federal fair
housing act, other applicable federal laws, and RCW 36.70A.410,
provided that these stipulations accommodate uniform application of
adult family homes in neighborhoods.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.128.040 and 1995 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules and standards with respect to
adult family homes and the operators thereof to be licensed under this
chapter to carry out the purposes and requirements of this chapter.
The rules and standards relating to applicants and operators shall
address the differences between individual providers and providers that
are partnerships, corporations, associations, or companies. The rules
and standards shall also recognize and be appropriate to the different
needs and capacities of the various populations served by adult family
homes such as but not limited to the developmentally disabled and the
elderly. In developing rules and standards the department shall
recognize the residential family-like nature of adult family homes and
not develop rules and standards which by their complexity serve as an
overly restrictive barrier to the development of the adult family homes
in the state. Procedures and forms established by the department shall
be developed so they are easy to understand and comply with. Paper
work requirements shall be minimal. Easy to understand materials shall
be developed for applicants and providers explaining licensure
requirements and procedures.
(2) In developing the rules and standards, the department shall
consult with all divisions and administrations within the department
serving the various populations living in adult family homes, including
the division of developmental disabilities and the aging and adult
services administration. Involvement by the divisions and
administration shall be for the purposes of assisting the department to
develop rules and standards appropriate to the different needs and
capacities of the various populations served by adult family homes.
During the initial stages of development of proposed rules, the
department shall provide notice of development of the rules to
organizations representing adult family homes and their residents, and
other groups that the department finds appropriate. The notice shall
state the subject of the rules under consideration and solicit written
recommendations regarding their form and content.
(3) Except where provided otherwise, chapter 34.05 RCW shall govern
all department rule-making and adjudicative activities under this
chapter.
(4) Liability insurance requirements are subject to the
availability and affordability of liability insurance in the
marketplace.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.128.090 and 2001 c 319 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During inspections of an adult family home, the department
shall have access and authority to examine areas and articles in the
home used to provide care or support to residents, including residents'
records, accounts, and the physical premises, including the buildings,
grounds, and equipment. The personal records of the provider are not
subject to department inspection nor is the separate bedroom of the
provider, not used in direct care of a client, subject to review. The
department may inspect all rooms during the initial licensing of the
home. However, during a complaint investigation, the department shall
have access to the entire premises and all pertinent records when
necessary to conduct official business. The department also shall have
the authority to interview the provider and residents of an adult
family home.
(2) An inspection must be conducted every eighteen months unless an
adult family home is in good standing with previous inspection
complaint investigations and citations, in which case the adult family
home will be allowed to continue without inspection for two years.
Whenever an inspection is conducted, the department shall prepare a
written report that summarizes all information obtained during the
inspection, and if the home is in violation of this chapter, serve a
copy of the inspection report upon the provider at the same time as a
notice of violation. This notice shall be mailed to the provider
within ten working days of the completion of the inspection process.
If the home is not in violation of this chapter, a copy of the
inspection report shall be mailed to the provider within ten calendar
days of the inspection of the home. All inspection reports shall be
made available to the public at the department during business hours.
Upon completion of an inspection, a copy of the inspection report must
be left with the adult family home prior to leaving. The inspection
must also include a consultation with the adult family home on how to
improve performance.
(3) The provider shall develop corrective measures for any
violations found by the department's inspection. The department shall
upon request provide consultation and technical assistance to assist
the provider in developing effective corrective measures. The
department shall include a statement of the provider's corrective
measures in the department's inspection report.

--- END ---