BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.84.030 and 1987 c 202 s 121 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any action under Title 26 RCW in the superior court of
Washington the prevailing party shall be entitled to his or her costs
and disbursements; but the plaintiff shall in no case be entitled to
costs taxed as attorneys' fees in actions within the jurisdiction of
the district court when commenced in the superior court.
(2) In any action in a court of record in Washington other than
actions under Title 26 RCW, the prevailing or substantially prevailing
party shall be entitled to his or her costs and disbursements,
including reasonable attorneys' fees. The court shall determine and
award the amount of reasonable attorneys' fees and costs under this
chapter. A party shall be considered to prevail if it obtains
substantial relief on a material issue or material issues sought.
Reasonable attorneys' fees shall be proportionate to the total number
of attorneys' hours necessary to prevail on the material issue or
material issues multiplied by a reasonable hourly rate of compensation.
The hourly rate of compensation is presumed reasonable if substantially
similar to fees charged by other attorneys in the same area for work of
similar substance and complexity.

--- END ---