BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.110 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The municipal research council shall contract for the provision
of research and services to special purpose districts. A contract for
at least one FTE shall be made with a state agency, educational
institution, or private consulting firm, that in the judgment of
council members is qualified to provide such research and services.
(2) Research and services to special purpose districts shall
consist of: (a) Studying and researching issues relating to special
purpose district government; and (b) furnishing legal, technical,
consultative, and field services to special purpose districts
concerning issues relating to special purpose district government.
(3) The activities, programs, and services of the municipal
research council to special purpose districts shall be carried on in
cooperation with the associations representing the various special
purpose districts. Services to special purpose districts shall be
based upon the moneys appropriated to the municipal research council
from the special purpose district research services account under
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.110 RCW
to read as follows:
A special account is created in the state treasury to be known as
the special purpose district research services account. The account
shall consist of all money transferred or appropriated to the account
by the legislature. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. The account is subject to the allotment process under
chapter 43.88 RCW.
Moneys in the special purpose district research services account
may be expended only to finance the costs of special purpose district
research and services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of one hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2004, from the public works trust fund to the
special purpose district research services account.
(2) The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2005, from the public works trust fund to the special purpose district
research services account.

--- END ---