BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.60.045 and 2003 c 53 s 79 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal impersonation in the second
degree if the person:
(a)(i) Claims to be a law enforcement officer or creates an
impression that he or she is a law enforcement officer; and
(((b))) (ii) Under circumstances not amounting to criminal
impersonation in the first degree, does an act with intent to convey
the impression that he or she is acting in an official capacity and a
reasonable person would believe the person is a law enforcement
officer; or
(b) Falsely assumes the identity of an active or retired veteran of
the armed forces of the United States with intent to defraud for the
purpose of personal gain or to facilitate any unlawful activity.
(2) Criminal impersonation in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---