BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.305.010 and 1992 c 56 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state board of education shall be comprised of ((one)) two
nonpartisan members from each congressional district of the state, not
including any congressional district at large, elected by the ((members
of the boards of directors of school districts thereof, as hereinafter
in this chapter provided, the superintendent of public instruction and
one member elected at large, as provided in this chapter, by the
members of the boards of directors of all private schools in the state
meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The member representing
private schools shall not vote on matters affecting public schools. If
there is a dispute about whether or not an issue directly affects
public schools, the dispute shall be settled by a majority vote of the
other members of the board)) voters of each congressional district in
the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.305.030 and 1992 c 56 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any new and additional congressional district is
created, except a congressional district at large, ((the superintendent
of public instruction shall call an election in such district at the
time of making the call provided for in RCW 28A.305.020. Such election
shall be conducted as other elections provided for in this chapter))
two persons shall be elected at the next general election at which
state board of education members are elected to serve as members of the
state board of education. At the first such election one member of the
state board of education shall be elected for a term of four years.
(2) The terms of office of members of the state board of education
who are elected from the various congressional districts shall not be
affected by the creation of either new or new and additional districts.
In such an event, each board member may continue to serve in office for
the balance of the term for which he or she was elected or appointed:
PROVIDED, That the board member continues to reside within the
boundaries of the congressional district as they existed at the time of
his or her election or appointment. Vacancies ((which)) that occur in
a board member position during the balance of any such term shall be
filled ((pursuant to RCW 28A.305.090)) under section 3 of this act by
a successor who resides within the boundaries of the congressional
district from which the member whose office was vacated was elected as
they existed at the time of his or her election. At the election
immediately preceding expiration of the term of office of each board
member provided for in this subsection following the creation of either
new or new and additional congressional districts, and thereafter, a
successor shall be elected from the congressional district ((which))
that corresponds in number with the congressional district from which
the incumbent was appointed or elected.
(((3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or
chapter, in order to reduce the number of state board of education
members elected from each congressional district from two members to
one member the following transitional measures shall govern board
member terms, elections, and voting:
(a) The terms of office for each of the sixteen state board of
education members and positions representing the first through the
eighth congressional districts shall terminate in a sequence commencing
with the terms of the four members and positions representing the third
and sixth congressional districts as of the second Monday of January
1993, followed by the terms of the six members and positions
representing the first, fourth, and seventh congressional districts as
of the second Monday of January 1994, and ending with the termination
of the terms of the six members and positions representing the second,
fifth, and eighth congressional districts as of the second Monday of
January 1995;
(b) An election shall be conducted under RCW 28A.305.040 through
28A.305.060 each year preceding the termination of one or more terms
under (a) of this subsection for the purpose of electing one state
board of education member from each correspondingly numbered
congressional district for a term of four years;
(c) If for any reason a vacancy occurs in one of two positions
representing a congressional district before the termination of the
term for the position under (a) of this subsection, no replacement may
be appointed or elected and the position shall be deemed eliminated;
and
(d) During the transition period from the second Monday of January
1993, to the second Monday of January 1995, a vote on any matter before
the state board of education by any one of two members representing the
same congressional district shall be equal to one-half [of] a vote and
a vote by any other member shall be equal to one full vote.
Thereafter, the vote of each member shall be equal to one full vote.))

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.305.090 and 1990 c 33 s 264 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever there shall be a vacancy upon the state board of
education, from any cause whatever, it shall be the duty of the
remaining members of the board to fill such vacancy by appointment, and
the person so appointed shall continue in office until his or her
successor has been ((specially)) elected((, as hereinafter in this
section provided,)) and has qualified. ((Whenever a vacancy occurs,
the superintendent of public instruction shall call, in the month of
August)) At the next general election following the date of the
occurrence of ((such)) the vacancy, ((a special election to be held in
the same manner as other elections provided for in this chapter, at
which election)) a successor shall be elected to hold office for the
unexpired term of the member whose office was vacated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
An election shall be held at the general election after the
effective date of this section to elect members to the state board of
education. Members shall take office on the second Monday of January
following the election, on which date the terms of all members of the
state board of education holding office on the effective date of this
section shall expire. Of the initial members elected under this
section, members elected from even-numbered congressional districts
shall serve four-year terms and members elected from odd-numbered
congressional districts shall serve two-year terms. Newly elected
members of the state board of education shall serve until their
successors are elected and qualified. Members who are elected
subsequently shall be elected to four-year terms of office and shall
serve until their successors are elected and qualified and assume
office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.305.020 (Call and notice of elections) and 1990 c 33 s
258, 1988 c 255 s 2, 1981 c 38 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.020;
(2) RCW 28A.305.040 (Declarations of candidacy -- Qualifications of
candidates -- Members restricted from service on local boards -- Forfeiture
of office) and 1990 c 33 s 260, 1982 1st ex.s. c 7 s 2, 1980 c 179 s 4,
1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 49, 1971 c 48 s 1, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.04.040;
(3) RCW 28A.305.050 (Qualifications of voters -- Ballots -- Voting
instructions -- Candidates' biographical data) and 1990 c 33 s 261, 1988
c 255 s 3, 1981 c 38 s 2, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.050;
(4) RCW 28A.305.060 (Election procedure -- Certificate) and 1990 c 33
s 262, 1981 c 38 s 3, 1980 c 179 s 5, 1975 c 19 s 2, 1969 ex.s. c 283
s 25, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.04.060; and
(5) RCW 28A.305.070 (Action to contest election -- Grounds--Procedure) and 1980 c 179 s 6 & 1975 c 19 s 1.

--- END ---