BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An additional fee of one hundred dollars shall be paid and
collected upon car tab renewal on each passenger car that exceeds six
thousand pounds unladen gross vehicle weight if the passenger car is
also subject to the registration fee under RCW 46.16.0621.
(2) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
fee at the same time and in the same manner as registration fees under
RCW 46.16.0621.
(3) Revenue from the fee shall be deposited into the multimodal
transportation account in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) The following vehicles are not subject to the fee under this
section:
(a) Trucks subject to the gross weight fee under RCW 46.16.070 in
lieu of the registration fee under RCW 46.16.0621; and
(b) Motor homes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2004.

--- END ---