BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.100.030 and 1999 c 165 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A public facilities district is authorized to acquire,
construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate
(a) sports facilities, entertainment facilities, convention facilities,
or regional centers as defined in RCW 35.57.020, and (b) for districts
formed after January 1, 2000, recreational facilities, together with
contiguous parking facilities. The taxes that are provided for in this
chapter may only be imposed for these purposes.
(2) A public facilities district may enter into agreements under
chapter 39.34 RCW for the joint provision and operation of such
facilities and may enter into contracts under chapter 39.34 RCW where
any party to the contract provides and operates such facilities for the
other party or parties to the contract.
(3) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit
service system, a public ((facility [facilities])) facilities district
may contract with a public or private entity for the operation or
management of its public facilities.
(4) A public facilities district is authorized to use the
supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth
in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction,
reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any of its public facilities.
(5) A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for
the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts,
grants, and donations.

--- END ---