BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.050 and 2002 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7) and 82.04.290.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of coin-operated laundry facilities
when such facilities are situated in an apartment house, rooming house,
or mobile home park for the exclusive use of the tenants thereof, and
also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and
all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4) The term shall also include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property to consumers and the rental of equipment with an
operator.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of telephone service,
as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of canned software other
than a sale to a person who presents a resale certificate under RCW
82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery to the end user, but
shall not include custom software or the customization of canned
software.
(7) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(8) The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(9) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.
(10) ((Until July 1, 2003,)) The term shall not include the sale of
or charge made for labor and services rendered for environmental
remedial action as defined in RCW 82.04.2635(2).

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.2635 and 2001 c 320 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
environmental remedial action, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the value of the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate 0.471 percent.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, "environmental remedial action"
means:
(a) Those services related to the identification, investigation, or
cleanup arising out of the release or threatened release of hazardous
substances that are conducted under contract with the department of
ecology or under an enforcement order, agreed order, or consent decree
executed by the department of ecology, or those services, when
evaluated as a whole, that are the substantial equivalent of a
department of ecology-conducted or supervised remedial action under the
model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW; or
(b) Those services related to the identification, investigation, or
cleanup of a facility that are conducted under contract with the United
States environmental protection agency or under an order or consent
decree executed by the United States environmental protection agency,
or that are consistent with the national contingency plan adopted under
the comprehensive environmental response compensation and liability
act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July 1, 1998, and those
services are conducted at facilities that are included on the national
priorities list adopted under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July
1, 1998, or at facilities subject to a removal action authorized under
42 U.S.C. Sec. 9604 as it exists on July 1, 1998.
(3) A site is eligible for environmental remedial action upon
submittal, via certified mail to the department of ecology and the
department of revenue, of the following:
(a) A certification from the owner, the department of ecology, or
the United States environmental protection agency, containing the
following information:
(i) The location of the site, shown on a map and identified by
parcel number or numbers and street address;
(ii) The name and address and daytime phone number of a contact
person;
(iii) A statement that the proposed environmental remedial actions
will be conducted by the department of ecology or its authorized
contractor under chapter 70.105D RCW or will be substantially
equivalent to a department of ecology-conducted or supervised remedial
action under the model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW, or will
be conducted by the United States environmental protection agency or
its authorized contractor or will be consistent with the national
contingency plan under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July 1,
1998; and
(iv) A description of the proposed environmental remedial actions
to be taken; and
(b)(i) A certification from a certified underground storage tank
service supervisor as authorized in chapter 90.76 RCW, from a
professional engineer licensed in the state of Washington, or from an
environmental professional who subscribes to a code of professional
responsibility administered by a recognized organization representing
such professions containing the following information:
(A) Confirmation that an environmental remedial action as defined
in this section is to be conducted at the site;
(B) The location of the site, shown on a map and identified by
parcel number or numbers and street address, and the approximate
location of the proposed environmental remedial action; and
(C) The name, address, telephone number, and uniform business
identifier of the person providing the certification; or
(ii) If applicable to the site, a copy of an enforcement order,
agreed order, or consent decree executed by the department of ecology
or the United States environmental protection agency.
(4) The department of revenue shall respond in writing to the owner
within thirty days confirming receipt of the certification, or
certifications, of eligibility. Under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m),
certification is subject to disclosure and copies may be obtained from
the department upon request. The request shall be in writing and shall
identify the site by county and parcel number or numbers.
(5) The owner shall provide a copy of the confirmation from the
department of revenue to each person who renders environmental remedial
action at the site. Each person who renders such action shall
separately state the charges for labor and services associated with the
environmental remedial action.
(6) Upon completion of the environmental remedial action, the owner
shall submit to the department of ecology a report documenting the
environmental remedial actions conducted at the site and documenting
compliance with the requirements of chapter 70.105D RCW.
(7) In addition to any other penalties, a person who files a
certificate with the department of ecology or the department of revenue
that contains falsehoods or misrepresentations are subject to penalties
authorized under chapter 18.43 or 90.76 RCW or RCW 9A.76.175. Also, a
person who improperly reports the person's tax class shall be assessed
a penalty of fifty percent of the tax due, in addition to other taxes
or penalties, together with interest. The department of revenue shall
waive the penalty imposed under this section if it finds that the
falsehoods or misrepresentations or improper reporting of the tax
classification was due to circumstances beyond the control of the
person.
(((8) This section expires July 1, 2003.))

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.190 and 2002 c 367 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal property
in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such property
as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving,
constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for
consumers or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale a new
article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale or (d) purchases for the purpose of
consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary
purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any
telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for resale in
the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases, acquires,
or uses any service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) or any amusement and
recreation service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other than for
resale in the regular course of business; and (d) any person who is an
end user of software;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of
way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in
or upon the right of way of such street, place, road, highway,
easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the
meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other
structure by such person;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer";
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and development;
and
(9) ((Until July 1, 2003,)) Any person engaged in the business of
conducting environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---