BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.62.011 and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter is intended to provide the exclusive source of ((local
government entity)) authority to a local government entity or a
nonprofit corporation to individually or jointly self-insure risks,
jointly purchase insurance or reinsurance, and to contract for risk
management, claims, and administrative services. However, local
government entities and nonprofit corporations may not participate in
any activity or program authorized under this chapter in violation of
Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution. This chapter shall
be liberally construed to grant local government entities or nonprofit
corporations maximum flexibility in self-insuring to the extent the
self-insurance programs are operated in a safe and sound manner. This
chapter is intended to require prior approval for the establishment of
every individual local government or nonprofit corporation self-insured
employee health and welfare benefit program and every joint local
government or nonprofit corporation self-insurance program. In
addition, this chapter is intended to require every local government
entity or nonprofit corporation that establishes a self-insurance
program not subject to prior approval to notify the state of the
existence of the program and to comply with the regulatory and
statutory standards governing the management and operation of the
programs as provided in this chapter. This chapter is not intended to
authorize or regulate self-insurance of unemployment compensation under
chapter 50.44 RCW, or industrial insurance under chapter 51.14 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.62.021 and 2002 c 332 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Local government entity" or "entity" means every unit of local
government, both general purpose and special purpose, and includes, but
is not limited to, counties, cities, towns, port districts, public
utility districts, water-sewer districts, school districts, fire
protection districts, irrigation districts, metropolitan municipal
corporations, conservation districts, and other political subdivisions,
governmental subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal
corporations.
(2) "Risk assumption" means a decision to absorb the entity's
financial exposure to a risk of loss without the creation of a formal
program of advance funding of anticipated losses.
(3) "Self-insurance" means a formal program of advance funding and
management of entity financial exposure to a risk of loss that is not
transferred through the purchase of an insurance policy or contract.
(4) "Health and welfare benefits" means a plan or program
established by a local government entity or entities for the purpose of
providing its employees and their dependents, and in the case of school
districts, its district employees, students, directors, or any of their
dependents, with health care, accident, disability, death, and salary
protection benefits.
(5) "Property and liability risks" includes the risk of property
damage or loss sustained by a local government entity and the risk of
claims arising from the tortious or negligent conduct or any error or
omission of the local government entity, its officers, employees,
agents, or volunteers as a result of which a claim may be made against
the local government entity.
(6) "State risk manager" means the risk manager of the risk
management division within the office of financial management.
(7) "Nonprofit corporation" or "corporation" has the same meaning
as defined in RCW 24.03.005(3).

Sec. 3 RCW 48.62.031 and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing body of a local government entity or nonprofit
corporation may individually self-insure, may join or form a self-insurance program together with other entities or nonprofit
corporation, and may jointly purchase insurance or reinsurance with
other entities or corporations for property and liability risks, and
health and welfare benefits only as permitted under this chapter. In
addition, the entity or entities may contract for or hire personnel to
provide risk management, claims, and administrative services in
accordance with this chapter.
(2) The agreement to form a joint self-insurance program shall be
made under chapter 39.34 RCW.
(3) Every individual and joint self-insurance program is subject to
audit by the state auditor.
(4) If provided for in the agreement or contract established under
chapter 39.34 RCW, a joint self-insurance program may, in conformance
with this chapter:
(a) Contract or otherwise provide for risk management and loss
control services;
(b) Contract or otherwise provide legal counsel for the defense of
claims and other legal services;
(c) Consult with the state insurance commissioner and the state
risk manager;
(d) Jointly purchase insurance and reinsurance coverage in such
form and amount as the program's participants agree by contract; and
(e) Possess any other powers and perform all other functions
reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(5) A local government entity or nonprofit corporation that has
decided to assume a risk of loss must have available for inspection by
the state auditor a written report indicating the class of risk or
risks the governing body of the entity or corporation has decided to
assume.
(6) Every joint self-insurance program governed by this chapter
shall appoint the risk manager as its attorney to receive service of,
and upon whom shall be served, all legal process issued against it in
this state upon causes of action arising in this state.
(a) Service upon the risk manager as attorney shall constitute
service upon the program. Service upon joint insurance programs
subject to chapter 30, Laws of 1991 1st sp. sess. can be had only by
service upon the risk manager. At the time of service, the plaintiff
shall pay to the risk manager a fee to be set by the risk manager,
taxable as costs in the action.
(b) With the initial filing for approval with the risk manager,
each joint self-insurance program shall designate by name and address
the person to whom the risk manager shall forward legal process so
served upon him or her. The joint self-insurance program may change
such person by filing a new designation.
(c) The appointment of the risk manager as attorney shall be
irrevocable, shall bind any successor in interest or to the assets or
liabilities of the joint self-insurance program, and shall remain in
effect as long as there is in force in this state any contract made by
the joint self-insurance program or liabilities or duties arising
therefrom.
(d) The risk manager shall keep a record of the day and hour of
service upon him or her of all legal process. A copy of the process,
by registered mail with return receipt requested, shall be sent by the
risk manager, to the person designated for the purpose by the joint
self-insurance program in its most recent such designation filed with
the risk manager. No proceedings shall be had against the joint self-insurance program, and the program shall not be required to appear,
plead, or answer, until the expiration of forty days after the date of
service upon the risk manager.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.62.061 and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state risk manager, in consultation with the property and
liability advisory board, shall adopt rules governing the management
and operation of both individual and joint local government and
nonprofit corporation self-insurance programs covering property or
liability risks. The state risk manager shall also adopt rules
governing the management and operation of both individual and joint
local government and nonprofit corporation self-insured health and
welfare benefits programs in consultation with the health and welfare
benefits advisory board. All rules shall be appropriate for the type
of program and class of risk covered. The state risk manager's rules
shall include:
(1) Standards for the management, operation, and solvency of self-insurance programs, including the necessity and frequency of actuarial
analyses and claims audits;
(2) Standards for claims management procedures; and
(3) Standards for contracts between self-insurance programs and
private businesses including standards for contracts between third-party administrators and programs.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.62.071 and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before the establishment of a joint self-insurance program covering
property or liability risks by local government entities and nonprofit
corporations, or an individual or joint local government or nonprofit
corporation self-insured health and welfare benefits program, the
entity ((or)), entities, corporation, or corporations must obtain the
approval of the state risk manager. Risk manager approval is not
required for the establishment of an individual local government or
nonprofit corporation self-insurance program covering property or
liability risks. The entity ((or)), entities, corporation, or
corporations proposing creation of a self-insurance program requiring
prior approval shall submit a plan of management and operation to the
state risk manager and the state auditor that provides at least the
following information:
(1) The risk or risks to be covered, including any coverage
definitions, terms, conditions, and limitations or in the case of
health and welfare benefits programs, the benefits to be provided,
including any benefit definitions, terms, conditions, and limitations;
(2) The amount and method of financing the benefits or covered
risks, including the initial capital and proposed rates and projected
premiums;
(3) The proposed claim reserving practices;
(4) The proposed purchase and maintenance of insurance or
reinsurance in excess of the amounts retained by the self-insurance
program;
(5) In the case of a joint program, the legal form of the program,
including but not limited to any bylaws, charter, or trust agreement;
(6) In the case of a joint program, the agreements with members of
the program defining the responsibilities and benefits of each member
and management;
(7) The proposed accounting, depositing, and investment practices
of the program;
(8) The proposed time when actuarial analysis will be first
conducted and the frequency of future actuarial analysis;
(9) A designation of the individual upon whom service of process
shall be executed on behalf of the program. In the case of a joint
program, a designation of the individual to whom service of process
shall be forwarded by the risk manager on behalf of the program;
(10) All contracts between the program and private persons
providing risk management, claims, or other administrative services;
(11) A professional analysis of the feasibility of creation and
maintenance of the program; and
(12) Any other information required by rule of the state risk
manager that is necessary to determine the probable financial and
management success of the program or that is necessary to determine
compliance with this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.62.081 and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
A local government entity or nonprofit corporation may participate
in a joint self-insurance program covering property or liability risks
with similar local government entities and similar nonprofit
corporations from other states if the program satisfies the following
requirements:
(1) Only those local government entities of this state and similar
entities of other states that are provided insurance by the program may
have ownership interest in the program;
(2) Only those nonprofit corporations of this state and similar
corporations of other states that are provided insurance by the program
may have ownership interest in the program;
(3) The participating local government entities of this state and
other states shall elect a board of directors to manage the program, a
majority of whom shall be affiliated with one or more of the
participating entities;
(((3))) (4) The program must provide coverage through the delivery
to each participating entity or corporation of one or more written
policies effecting insurance of covered risks;
(((4))) (5) The program shall be financed, including the payment of
premiums and the contribution of initial capital, in accordance with
the plan of management and operation submitted to the state risk
manager in accordance with this chapter;
(((5))) (6) The financial statements of the program shall be
audited annually by the certified public accountants for the program,
and such audited financial statements shall be delivered to the
Washington state auditor and the state risk manager not more than one
hundred twenty days after the end of each fiscal year of the program;
(((6))) (7) The investments of the program shall be initiated only
with financial institutions and/or broker-dealers doing business in
those states in which participating entities or corporations are
located, and such investments shall be audited annually by the
certified public accountants for the program, and a list of such
investments shall be delivered to the Washington state auditor not more
than one hundred twenty days after the end of each fiscal year of the
program;
(((7))) (8) The treasurer of a multistate joint self-insurance
program shall be designated by resolution of the program and such
treasurer shall be located in the state of one of the participating
entities or corporations;
(((8))) (9) The participating entities or corporations may have no
contingent liabilities for covered claims, other than liabilities for
unpaid premiums, retrospective premiums, or assessments, if assets of
the program are insufficient to cover the program's liabilities; and
(((9))) (10) The program shall obtain approval from the state risk
manager in accordance with this chapter and shall remain in compliance
with the provisions of this chapter, except to the extent that such
provisions are modified by or inconsistent with this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.62.091 and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Within one hundred twenty days of receipt of a plan of
management and operation, the state risk manager shall either approve
or disapprove the formation of the self-insurance program after
reviewing the plan to determine whether the proposed program complies
with this chapter and all rules adopted in accordance with this
chapter.
(2) If the state risk manager denies a request for approval, the
state risk manager shall specify in detail the reasons for denial and
the manner in which the program fails to meet the requirements of this
chapter or any rules adopted in accordance with this chapter.
(3) Whenever the state risk manager determines that a joint self-insurance program covering property or liability risks or an individual
or joint self-insured health and welfare benefits program is in
violation of this chapter or is operating in an unsafe financial
condition, the state risk manager may issue and serve upon the program
an order to cease and desist from the violation or practice.
(a) The state risk manager shall deliver the order to the
appropriate entity ((or)), entities, corporation, or corporations
directly or mail it to the appropriate entity ((or)), entities,
corporation, or corporations by registered mail with return receipt
requested.
(b) If the program violates the order or has not taken steps to
comply with the order after the expiration of twenty days after the
cease and desist order has been received by the program, the program is
deemed to be operating in violation of this chapter, and the state risk
manager shall notify the state auditor and the attorney general of the
violation.
(c) After hearing or with the consent of a program governed by this
chapter and in addition to or in lieu of a continuation of the cease
and desist order, the risk manager may levy a fine upon the program in
an amount not less than three hundred dollars and not more than ten
thousand dollars. The order levying such fine shall specify the period
within which the fine shall be fully paid. The period within which
such fines shall be paid shall not be less than fifteen nor more than
thirty days from the date of such order. Upon failure to pay any such
fine when due the risk manager shall request the attorney general to
bring a civil action on the risk manager's behalf to collect the fine.
The risk manager shall pay any fine so collected to the state treasurer
for the account of the general fund.
(4) Each self-insurance program approved by the state risk manager
shall annually file a report with the state risk manager and state
auditor providing:
(a) Details of any changes in the articles of incorporation,
bylaws, or interlocal agreement;
(b) Copies of all the insurance coverage documents;
(c) A description of the program structure, including participants'
retention, program retention, and excess insurance limits and
attachment point;
(d) An actuarial analysis, if required;
(e) A list of contractors and service providers;
(f) The financial and loss experience of the program; and
(g) Such other information as required by rule of the state risk
manager.
(5) No self-insurance program requiring the state risk manager's
approval may engage in an act or practice that in any respect
significantly differs from the management and operation plan that
formed the basis for the state risk manager's approval of the program
unless the program first notifies the state risk manager in writing and
obtains the state risk manager's approval. The state risk manager
shall approve or disapprove the proposed change within sixty days of
receipt of the notice. If the state risk manager denies a requested
change, the risk manager shall specify in detail the reasons for denial
and the manner in which the program would fail to meet the requirements
of this chapter or any rules adopted in accordance with this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.01.050 and 1990 c 130 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Insurer" as used in this code includes every person engaged in the
business of making contracts of insurance, other than a fraternal
benefit society. A reciprocal or interinsurance exchange is an
"insurer" as used in this code. Two or more hospitals, as defined in
RCW ((70.39.020(3))) 70.41.020, which join and organize as a mutual
corporation pursuant to chapter 24.06 RCW for the purpose of insuring
or self-insuring against liability claims, including medical liability,
through a contributing trust fund shall not be deemed an "insurer"
under this code. Two or more local governmental entities or nonprofit
corporations, as defined in ((RCW 48.62.020, which pursuant to RCW
48.62.040, 48.62.035, or any other provision of law)) RCW 48.62.021,
may join together and organize to form an organization for the purpose
of jointly self-insuring or self-funding shall not be deemed an
"insurer" under this code. Two or more persons engaged in the business
of commercial fishing who enter into an arrangement with other such
persons for the pooling of funds to pay claims or losses arising out of
loss or damage to a vessel or machinery used in the business of
commercial fishing and owned by a member of the pool shall not be
deemed an "insurer" under this code.

Sec. 9 RCW 24.03.035 and 1991 c 72 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each corporation shall have power:
(1) To have perpetual succession by its corporate name unless a
limited period of duration is stated in its articles of incorporation.
(2) To sue and be sued, complain and defend, in its corporate name.
(3) To have a corporate seal which may be altered at pleasure, and
to use the same by causing it, or a facsimile thereof, to be impressed
or affixed or in any other manner reproduced.
(4) To purchase, take, receive, lease, take by gift, devise or
bequest, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use and otherwise
deal in and with real or personal property, or any interest therein,
wherever situated.
(5) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer
and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets.
(6) To lend money or credit to its employees other than its
officers and directors.
(7) To purchase, take, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise
acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or
otherwise dispose of, and otherwise use and deal in and with, shares or
other interests in, or obligations of, other domestic or foreign
corporations, whether for profit or not for profit, associations,
partnerships or individuals, or direct or indirect obligations of the
United States, or of any other government, state, territory,
governmental district or municipality or of any instrumentality
thereof.
(8) To make contracts and incur liabilities, borrow money at such
rates of interest as the corporation may determine, issue its notes,
bonds, and other obligations, and secure any of its obligations by
mortgage or pledge of all or any of its property, franchises and
income.
(9) To lend money for its corporate purposes, invest and reinvest
its funds, and take and hold real and personal property as security for
the payment of funds so loaned or invested.
(10) To individually or jointly with other corporations or local
government entities, as defined in RCW 48.62.021, self-insure risks,
jointly purchase insurance or reinsurance, and to contract for risk
management, claims, and administrative services as authorized in RCW
48.62.031.
(11) To conduct its affairs, carry on its operations, and have
offices and exercise the powers granted by this chapter in any state,
territory, district, or possession of the United States, or in any
foreign country.
(((11))) (12) To elect or appoint officers and agents of the
corporation, and define their duties and fix their compensation.
(((12))) (13) To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with its
articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for the
administration and regulation of the affairs of the corporation.
(((13))) (14) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of
incorporation, to make donations for the public welfare or for
charitable, scientific or educational purposes; and in time of war to
make donations in aid of war activities.
(((14))) (15) To indemnify any director or officer or former
director or officer or other person in the manner and to the extent
provided in RCW 23B.08.500 through 23B.08.600, as now existing or
hereafter amended.
(((15))) (16) To make guarantees respecting the contracts,
securities, or obligations of any person (including, but not limited
to, any member, any affiliated or unaffiliated individual, domestic or
foreign, profit or not for profit, corporation, partnership,
association, joint venture or trust) if such guarantee may reasonably
be expected to benefit, directly or indirectly, the guarantor
corporation. As to the enforceability of the guarantee, the decision
of the board of directors that the guarantee may be reasonably expected
to benefit, directly or indirectly, the guarantor corporation shall be
binding in respect to the issue of benefit to the guarantor
corporation.
(((16))) (17) To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension
trusts, and other benefit plans for any or all of its directors,
officers, and employees.
(((17))) (18) To be a promoter, partner, member, associate or
manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise.
(((18))) (19) To be a trustee of a charitable trust, to administer
a charitable trust and to act as executor in relation to any charitable
bequest or devise to the corporation. This subsection shall not be
construed as conferring authority to engage in the general business of
trusts nor in the business of trust banking.
(((19))) (20) To cease its corporate activities and surrender its
corporate franchise.
(((20))) (21) To have and exercise all powers necessary or
convenient to effect any or all of the purposes for which the
corporation is organized.

--- END ---