BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that services
administered to aid persons with developmental disabilities be based on
valid client information. The legislature recognizes that the state's
capacity to provide services to individuals is dependent upon good
business practices commensurate with the complex job of managing
discrete services and limited resources to a population with diverse
needs. The legislature finds that current systems do not allow for
informed authorization of services, efficient and consistent
eligibility determinations, complete and consistent plans of care,
thorough coordination of services, and the uniform application of
program policies. The fragmented nature of current information systems
at the department of social and health services does not allow
policymakers to obtain a clear understanding of how public resources
are spent.
By December 1, 2003, the department of social and health services
shall report to the legislature on the costs associated with providing
a consolidated and unified management information system that will
allow for informed authorization of services, efficient and consistent
eligibility determinations, complete and consistent plans of care,
thorough coordination of services, and uniform application of program
policies on behalf of clients with developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop a tool for the comprehensive
assessment of need for services under this title. The tool shall
identify any supports the individual receives from family, friends, and
the community, including state, local, and federal programs. The
comprehensive assessment tool shall be used for both children and
adults whose needs may evolve as they mature. The tool must include
the financial status of children and their family income and resources.
Development of a comprehensive assessment tool must be done within
available funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature recognizes that
developmental disabilities advocates have invaluable insights into the
needs of vulnerable people. The department of social and health
services shall consider their views when deciding on priority
populations in the allocation of services. The determination of
priorities is a demonstration that the state has limited resources and
that not all people who complete a comprehensive assessment will be
able to have all their needs met. Setting priorities is a deliberate
effort to make a system of service delivery equitable within funding
limits. The department shall report back to the legislature by
December 1, 2003, on categories of priority populations and the range
of services that may be available to different priority populations.
The report shall include a process for maintaining information on
individuals in nonpriority status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of social and health services
shall convene a work group of stakeholders to develop alternatives to
current eligibility standards for services under Title 71A RCW. The
work group shall identify categories of individuals who are currently
eligible as developmentally disabled, but whose needs may be better
addressed by alternatives, including, but not limited to, other
programs within the department. The report shall include some estimate
of the number of individuals who would become reclassified under any
new definition of developmentally disabled, and alternatives for how
they might be served. The work group shall report to the legislature
by December 1, 2003.

Sec. 5 RCW 71A.18.020 and 1988 c 176 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary may provide a service to a person eligible under this
title if funds are available. If there is an individual service plan,
the secretary shall consider the need for services as provided in that
plan. Limitations in funding may be the basis for denying services to
a person with a developmental disability not enrolled in a federal
medicaid waiver program, and limitations in funding may be the basis
for denying nonwaiver services to a person with a developmental
disability enrolled in a federal medicaid waiver program. The specific
provisions of the federal medicaid waiver control whether limitation in
funding is permitted as a basis for denial of services.

--- END ---