BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.020 and 2002 c 56 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional transportation
investment district.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(3) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the transportation commission, its successor
entity, or the legislature.
(4) "Lead agency" means a public agency that by law can plan,
design, and build a transportation project and has been so designated
by the district.
(5) "Regional transportation investment district" or "district"
means a municipal corporation whose boundaries are coextensive with two
or more contiguous counties and that has been created by county
legislative authorities and a vote of the people under this chapter to
implement a regional transportation investment plan.
(6) "Regional transportation investment district planning
committee" or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created
under RCW 36.120.030 to create and propose to county legislative
authorities a regional transportation investment plan to develop,
finance, and construct transportation projects.
(7) "Regional transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a
plan to develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or
projects.
(8) "Transportation project" means:
(a) A capital improvement or improvements to a highway that has
been designated, in whole or in part, as a highway of statewide
significance, including an extension, that:
(i) Adds a lane or new lanes to an existing state or federal
highway; or
(ii) Repairs or replaces a lane or lanes damaged by an event
declared an emergency by the governor before January 1, 2002.
(b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
highway of statewide significance, including an extension, and may
include the following associated multimodal capital improvements:
(i) Approaches to highways of statewide significance;
(ii) High-occupancy vehicle lanes;
(iii) Flyover ramps;
(iv) Park and ride lots;
(v) Bus pullouts;
(vi) Vans for vanpools;
(vii) Buses; and
(viii) Signalization, ramp metering, and other transportation
system management improvements.
(c) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
city street, county road, or existing highway or the creation of a new
highway that intersects with a highway of statewide significance, if
all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The project is included in a plan that makes highway
improvement projects that add capacity to a highway or highways of
statewide significance;
(ii) The secretary of transportation determines that the project
would better relieve traffic congestion than investing that same money
in adding capacity to a highway of statewide significance;
(iii) Matching money equal to one-third of the total cost of the
project is provided by local entities, including but not limited to a
metropolitan planning organization, county, city, port, or private
entity in which a county participating in a plan is located. Local
entities may use federal grants to meet this matching requirement;
(iv) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed ten percent of the revenues generated by the
district;
(v) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed one billion dollars; and
(vi) The specific projects are included within the plan and
submitted as part of the plan to a vote of the people.
(d) Operations, preservation, and maintenance are excluded from
this definition and may not be included in a regional transportation
investment plan. However, operations, preservation, and maintenance of
toll-related facilities where toll revenues have been pledged for the
payment of contracts is expressly authorized and may be included in a
regional transportation investment plan.
(9) "Weighted vote" means a vote that reflects the population each
board or planning committee member represents relative to the
population represented by the total membership of the board or planning
committee. Population will be determined using the federal 2000 census
or subsequent federal census data.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.120.050 and 2003 c 350 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may, as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
recommend the imposition of some or all of the following revenue
sources, which a regional transportation investment district may impose
upon approval of the voters as provided in this chapter:
(a) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of
up to 0.5 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event in the regional transportation
investment district;
(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
district. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined
under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;
(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060 and
chapter 81.104 RCW;
(e) A local option fuel tax under RCW 82.80.120;
(f) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030; and
(g) Vehicle tolls on new or reconstructed facilities or, in the
case of improvements to a bridge or viaduct, any approaches or
connectors to the bridge or viaduct. Unless otherwise specified by law
or contract, the department shall administer the collection of vehicle
tolls on designated facilities, and the state transportation
commission, or its successor, shall be the tolling authority.
(2) Taxes, fees, and tolls may not be imposed without an
affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of
the district voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW
36.120.070. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to
implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate
entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees
authorized in this section.
(3) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes,
at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not
intended to be altered by this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.56.076 and 2002 c 56 s 403 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, and only for the purposes authorized
in RCW 36.120.050(1)(((f))) (g), a regional transportation investment
district may impose vehicle tolls on state routes where improvements
financed in whole or in part by a regional transportation investment
district add additional lanes to, or reconstruct lanes on, a highway of
statewide significance, and in the case of improving a bridge or
viaduct, any approaches or connectors to the bridge or viaduct. The
department shall administer the collection of vehicle tolls on
designated facilities unless otherwise specified in law or by contract,
and the state transportation commission, or its successor, shall ((be
the tolling authority)) set and impose the tolls in amounts sufficient
to implement the plan and issue bonds and maintain and operate the toll
facility within the scope and intent of the regional transportation
investment plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this chapter, a
regional transportation investment district may impose vehicle tolls on
either Lake Washington bridge upon approval of a majority of the voters
voting on a regional transportation investment plan ballot measure
within its boundaries as authorized in chapter 36.120 RCW and RCW
47.56.076.

--- END ---