BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.135.055 and 2001 c 314 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No fee may increase in any fiscal year by a percentage in
excess of the fiscal growth factor for that fiscal year without prior
legislative approval.
(2) This section does not apply to an assessment made by an
agricultural commodity commission or board created by state statute or
created under a marketing agreement or order under chapter 15.65 or
15.66 RCW, or to the forest products commission, if the assessment is
approved by referendum in accordance with the provisions of the
statutes creating the commission or board or chapter 15.65 or 15.66 RCW
for approving such assessments.
(3) This section does not apply to fees by the department of
agriculture used to fund fee-for-service inspection programs.

--- END ---