BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 PURPOSE. The learning assistance program
requirements in this chapter are designed to: (1) Promote the use of
assessment data when developing programs to assist underachieving
students; and (2) guide school districts when implementing programs to
assist underachieving students. Districts are encouraged to place
special emphasis on addressing the needs of students in the early
grades. Further, this chapter provides the means by which a school
district becomes eligible for learning assistance program funds and the
distribution of those funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Approved program" means a program submitted to and approved by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and conducted
pursuant to the plan that addresses the required elements as provided
for in this chapter.
(2) "Basic skills areas" means reading, writing, and mathematics as
well as readiness associated with these skills.
(3) "Participating student" means a student in kindergarten through
grade eleven who scores below standard for his or her grade level on
the statewide assessments and who is identified in the approved plan to
receive services. Beginning with the 2007-2008 school year,
"participating student" means a student in kindergarten through grade
twelve who scores below standard for his or her grade level on the
statewide assessments and who is identified in the approved plan to
receive services.
(4) "Statewide assessments" means statewide tests at the third
grade level established pursuant to RCW 28A.230.190, sixth grade level
established pursuant to RCW 28A.230.193, and ninth grade level
established pursuant to RCW 28A.230.230 and the Washington assessment
of student learning pursuant to chapter 28A.655 RCW in the other
relevant grades.
(5) "Underachieving students" means students with the greatest
academic deficits in basic skills as identified by the statewide
assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PROGRAM PLAN. By July 1st of each year, a
participating school district shall submit the district's plan for
using learning assistance funds to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction for approval. For the 2004-05 school year, school
districts must identify the program activities to be implemented from
section 4 of this act and are encouraged to implement the elements in
subsections (1) through (8) of this section. Beginning in the 2005-06
school year, the program plan must identify the program activities to
be implemented from section 4 of this act and implement all of the
elements in subsections (1) through (8) of this section. The school
district plan shall include the following:
(1) District and school-level data on reading, writing, and
mathematics achievement as reported pursuant to chapter 28A.655 RCW and
relevant federal law;
(2) Processes used for identifying the underachieving students to
be served by the program, including the identification of school or
program sites providing program activities;
(3) How accelerated learning plans are developed and implemented
for participating students. Accelerated learning plans may be
developed as part of existing student achievement plan process such as
student plans for achieving state high school graduation standards,
individual student academic plans, or the achievement plans for groups
of students. Accelerated learning plans shall include:
(a) Achievement goals for the students;
(b) Roles of the student, parents, or guardians and teachers in the
plan;
(c) Communication procedures regarding student accomplishment; and
(d) Plan reviews and adjustments processes;
(4) How state level and classroom assessments are used to inform
instruction;
(5) How focused and intentional instructional strategies have been
identified and implemented;
(6) How highly qualified instructional staff are developed and
supported in the program and in participating schools;
(7) How other federal, state, district, and school resources are
coordinated with school improvement plans and the district's strategic
plan to support underachieving students; and
(8) How a program evaluation will be conducted to determine
direction for the following school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 PROGRAM ACTIVITIES. Use of best practices
magnifies the opportunities for student success. The following are
services and activities that may be supported by the learning
assistance program:
(1) Extended learning time opportunities occurring:
(a) Before or after the regular school day;
(b) On Saturday; and
(c) Beyond the regular school year;
(2) Professional development for certificated and classified staff
that focuses on:
(a) The needs of the student population;
(b) Specific literacy and mathematics content and instructional
strategies; and
(c) The use of student work to guide effective instruction;
(3) Consultant teachers to assist in implementing effective
instructional practices by teachers serving participating students;
(4) Tutoring support for participating students; and
(5) Outreach activities and support for parents of participating
students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 PLAN APPROVAL PROCESS. A participating
school district shall annually submit a program plan to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction for approval. The program
plan must address all of the elements in section 3 of this act and
identify the program activities to be implemented from section 4 of
this act.
School districts achieving state reading and mathematics goals as
prescribed in chapter 28A.655 RCW shall have their program approved
once the program plan and activities submittal is completed.
School districts not achieving state reading and mathematics goals
as prescribed in chapter 28A.655 RCW and that are not in a state or
federal program of school improvement shall be subject to program
approval once the plan components are reviewed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of receiving
technical assistance in the final development of the plan.
School districts with one or more schools in a state or federal
program of school improvement shall have their plans and activities
reviewed and approved in conjunction with the state or federal program
school improvement program requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 FUNDS--ELIGIBILITY--DISTRIBUTION. Each
school district with an approved program is eligible for state funds
provided for the learning assistance program. The funds shall be
appropriated for the learning assistance program in accordance with the
biennial appropriations act. The distribution formula is for school
district allocation purposes only. The distribution formula shall be
based upon an assessment of students and on one or more family income
factors measuring economic need.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 MONITORING. To ensure that school districts
are meeting the requirements of an approved program, the superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor such programs no less than once
every four years. Individual student records shall be maintained at
the school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RULES. The superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW that
are necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.165.010 (Intent) and 1989 c 233 s 1 & 1987 c 478 s 1;
(2) RCW 28A.165.012 (Program created) and 1987 c 478 s 2;
(3) RCW 28A.165.030 (Definitions) and 1999 c 78 s 1, 1990 c 33 s
148, & 1987 c 478 s 3;
(4) RCW 28A.165.040 (Application for state funds -- Needs
assessment -- Plan) and 1990 c 33 s 149, 1989 c 233 s 2, & 1987 c 478 s
4;
(5) RCW 28A.165.050 (Identification of students -- Coordination of
use of funds) and 1987 c 478 s 5;
(6) RCW 28A.165.060 (Services or activities under program) and 1989
c 233 s 3 & 1987 c 478 s 6;
(7) RCW 28A.165.070 (Eligibility for funds -- Distribution of funds -- Development of allocation formula) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 13 s 1, 1993
sp.s. c 24 s 520, 1990 c 33 s 150, & 1987 c 478 s 7;
(8) RCW 28A.165.080 (Monitoring) and 1990 c 33 s 151 & 1987 c 478
s 8; and
(9) RCW 28A.165.090 (Rules) and 1990 c 33 s 152 & 1987 c 478 s 9.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 9 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.165 RCW.

--- END ---