BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.065 and 1995 c 265 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that every individual possesses a
fundamental right to exercise their religious beliefs and conscience.
The legislature further recognizes that in developing public policy,
conflicting religious and moral beliefs must be respected. Therefore,
while recognizing the right of conscientious objection to participating
in specific health services, the state shall also recognize the right
of individuals enrolled with plans containing the basic health plan
services to receive the full range of services covered under the plan.
(2)(a) No individual health care provider, religiously sponsored
health carrier, or health care facility may be required by law or
contract in any circumstances to participate in the provision of or
payment for a specific service if they object to so doing for reason of
conscience or religion. No person may be discriminated against in
employment or professional privileges because of such objection.
(b) The provisions of this section are not intended to result in an
enrollee being denied timely access to any service included in the
basic health plan services. Each health carrier shall:
(i) Provide written notice to enrollees, upon enrollment with the
plan, listing services that the carrier refuses to cover for reason of
conscience or religion;
(ii) Provide written information describing how an enrollee may
directly access services in an expeditious manner; and
(iii) Ensure that enrollees refused services under this section
have prompt access to the information developed pursuant to (b)(ii) of
this subsection.
(c) The insurance commissioner shall establish by rule a mechanism
or mechanisms to recognize the right to exercise conscience while
ensuring enrollees timely access to services and to assure prompt
payment to service providers.
(3)(a) No individual or organization with a religious or moral
tenet opposed to a specific service may be required to purchase or
otherwise provide coverage for that service or services if they object
to doing so for reason of conscience or religion.
(b) The provisions of this section shall not result in an enrollee
being denied coverage of, and timely access to, any service or services
excluded from their benefits package as a result of their employer's or
another individual's exercise of the conscience clause in (a) of this
subsection.
(c) The insurance commissioner shall define by rule the process
through which health carriers may offer the basic health plan services
to individuals and organizations identified in (a) and (b) of this
subsection in accordance with the provisions of subsection (2)(c) of
this section.
(4) Nothing in this section requires a health carrier, health care
facility, or health care provider to provide any health care services
without appropriate payment of premium or fee.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47.160 and 1995 c 266 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that every individual possesses a
fundamental right to exercise their religious beliefs and conscience.
The legislature further recognizes that in developing public policy,
conflicting religious and moral beliefs must be respected. Therefore,
while recognizing the right of conscientious objection to participating
in specific health services, the state shall also recognize the right
of individuals enrolled with the basic health plan to receive the full
range of services covered under the basic health plan.
(2)(a) No individual health care provider, religiously sponsored
health carrier, or health care facility may be required by law or
contract in any circumstances to participate in the provision of or
payment for a specific service if they object to so doing for reason of
conscience or religion. No person may be discriminated against in
employment or professional privileges because of such objection.
(b) The provisions of this section are not intended to result in an
enrollee being denied timely access to any service included in the
basic health plan. Each health carrier shall:
(i) Provide written notice to enrollees, upon enrollment with the
plan, listing services that the carrier refuses to cover for reason of
conscience or religion;
(ii) Provide written information describing how an enrollee may
directly access services in an expeditious manner; and
(iii) Ensure that enrollees refused services under this section
have prompt access to the information developed pursuant to (b)(ii) of
this subsection.
(c) The administrator shall establish a mechanism or mechanisms to
recognize the right to exercise conscience while ensuring enrollees
timely access to services and to assure prompt payment to service
providers.
(3)(a) No individual or organization with a religious or moral
tenet opposed to a specific service may be required to purchase or
otherwise provide coverage for that service or services if they object
to doing so for reason of conscience or religion.
(b) The provisions of this section shall not result in an enrollee
being denied coverage of, and timely access to, any service or services
excluded from their benefits package as a result of their employer's or
another individual's exercise of the conscience clause in (a) of this
subsection.
(c) The administrator shall define the process through which health
carriers may offer the basic health plan to individuals and
organizations identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection in
accordance with the provisions of subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(4) Nothing in this section requires the health care authority,
health carriers, health care facilities, or health care providers to
provide any basic health plan service without payment of appropriate
premium share or enrollee cost sharing.

--- END ---