BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the first
amendment to the United States Constitution and Article I, section 11
of the Washington state Constitution guarantee and protect freedom of
religion. In the twenty-first century, biomedical technology has made
many research, pharmaceutical, and treatment options available or
technologically possible. However, not all of the options created by
medical science are morally acceptable, according to the doctrinal
beliefs of some religions. Human cloning, euthanasia, contraception,
and abortion may be profoundly morally unacceptable to some
individuals, health care providers, religious organizations, and
employers. Biotechnology may create new objectionable medical options
in the future.
The legislature finds that state law has long recognized the right
of health care providers and religious organizations to conscientious
objection to certain biomedical treatment, procedures, or provision of
pharmaceuticals, regardless of their secular legality or availability.
Such "conscience clauses" serve to guarantee to individuals and
religious organizations the fundamental constitutional right to the
exercise of religious belief.
The legislature intends to strengthen and enhance the reliability
of conscience clauses for the protection of the constitutional first
amendment rights of persons and religious organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person may be
required to pay for or otherwise provide, directly or indirectly, any
biomedical treatment, service, procedure, pharmaceutical, or technology
to which that person has a bona fide doctrinal religious objection.
(2) This section shall be broadly construed to provide enhanced
reliance upon conscience clauses in the protection of the
constitutional right of free exercise of religion.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Person" includes natural persons, licensed health care
providers, pharmacists, religious organizations, and religious
employers.
(b) "Religious employer" means an employer that is a church or
other entity exempt from taxation under internal revenue code section
501(c)(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person may be
required to pay for or otherwise provide, directly or indirectly, any
biomedical treatment, service, procedure, pharmaceutical, or technology
to which that person has a bona fide doctrinal religious objection.
(2) This section shall be broadly construed to provide enhanced
reliance upon conscience clauses in the protection of the
constitutional right of free exercise of religion.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Person" includes natural persons, licensed health care
providers, pharmacists, religious organizations, and religious
employers.
(b) "Religious employer" means an employer that is a church or
qualified church-controlled organization as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
3121.

--- END ---