BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.58.020 and 1995 c 347 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that the shorelines of the state are among
the most valuable and fragile of its natural resources and that there
is great concern throughout the state relating to their utilization,
protection, restoration, and preservation. In addition it finds that
ever increasing pressures of additional uses are being placed on the
shorelines necessitating increased coordination in the management and
development of the shorelines of the state. The legislature further
finds that much of the shorelines of the state and the uplands adjacent
thereto are in private ownership; that unrestricted construction on the
privately owned or publicly owned shorelines of the state is not in the
best public interest; and therefore, coordinated planning is necessary
in order to protect the public interest associated with the shorelines
of the state while, at the same time, recognizing and protecting
private property rights consistent with the public interest. There is,
therefor, a clear and urgent demand for a planned, rational, and
concerted effort, jointly performed by federal, state, and local
governments, to prevent the inherent harm in an uncoordinated and
piecemeal development of the state's shorelines.
It is the policy of the state to provide for the management of the
shorelines of the state by planning for and fostering all reasonable
and appropriate uses. This policy is designed to insure the
development of these shorelines in a manner which, while allowing for
limited reduction of rights of the public in the navigable waters, will
promote and enhance the public interest. The public interest and the
statewide interest include the development of water-dependent publicly
owned facilities. This policy contemplates protecting against adverse
effects to the public health, the land and its vegetation and wildlife,
and the waters of the state and their aquatic life, while protecting
generally public rights of navigation and corollary rights incidental
thereto.
The legislature declares that the interest of all of the people
shall be paramount in the management of shorelines of statewide
significance. The department, in adopting guidelines for shorelines of
statewide significance, and local government, in developing master
programs for shorelines of statewide significance, shall give
preference to uses in the following order of preference which:
(1) Recognize and protect the statewide interest over local
interest;
(2) Preserve the natural character of the shoreline;
(3) Result in long term over short term benefit;
(4) Protect the resources and ecology of the shoreline;
(5) Increase public access to publicly owned areas of the
shorelines;
(6) Increase recreational opportunities for the public in the
shoreline;
(7) Provide for any other element as defined in RCW 90.58.100
deemed appropriate or necessary.
In the implementation of this policy the public's opportunity to
enjoy the physical and aesthetic qualities of natural shorelines of the
state shall be preserved to the greatest extent feasible consistent
with the overall best interest of the state and the people generally.
To this end uses shall be preferred which are consistent with control
of pollution and prevention of damage to the natural environment, or
are unique to or dependent upon use of the state's shoreline.
Alterations of the natural condition of the shorelines of the state, in
those limited instances when authorized, shall be given priority for
single family residences and their appurtenant structures, ports,
shoreline recreational uses including but not limited to parks,
marinas, piers, and other improvements facilitating public access to
shorelines of the state, industrial and commercial developments which
are particularly dependent on their location on or use of the
shorelines of the state and other development that will provide an
opportunity for substantial numbers of the people to enjoy the
shorelines of the state. Alterations of the natural condition of the
shorelines and shorelands of the state shall be recognized by the
department. Shorelines and shorelands of the state shall be
appropriately classified and these classifications shall be revised
when circumstances warrant regardless of whether the change in
circumstances occurs through man-made causes or natural causes. Any
areas resulting from alterations of the natural condition of the
shorelines and shorelands of the state no longer meeting the definition
of "shorelines of the state" shall not be subject to the provisions of
chapter 90.58 RCW.
Permitted uses in the shorelines of the state shall be designed and
conducted in a manner to minimize, insofar as practical, any resultant
damage to the ecology and environment of the shoreline area and any
interference with the public's use of the water.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.480 and 1995 c 347 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For shorelines of the state, the goals and policies of the
shoreline management act as set forth in RCW 90.58.020 are added as one
of the goals of this chapter as set forth in RCW 36.70A.020. The goals
and policies of a shoreline master program for a county or city
approved under chapter 90.58 RCW shall be considered an element of the
county or city's comprehensive plan, on an equal priority with the
other stated goals of RCW 36.70A.020. All other portions of the
shoreline master program for a county or city adopted under chapter
90.58 RCW, including use regulations, shall be considered a part of the
county or city's development regulations.
(2) The shoreline master program shall be adopted pursuant to the
procedures of chapter 90.58 RCW rather than the procedures set forth in
this chapter for the adoption of a comprehensive plan or development
regulations.

--- END ---