BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.24.070 and 1992 c 54 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In each county that maintains a county or regional law library
pursuant to this chapter, the county treasurer shall deposit in the
county or regional law library fund a sum equal to twelve dollars for
every new probate or civil filing fee, including appeals, collected by
the clerk of the superior court and six dollars for every fee collected
for the commencement of a civil action in district court for the
support of the law library in that county or the regional law library
to which the county belongs((: PROVIDED, That)).
(2) Upon a showing of need the twelve dollar contribution deposited
for each superior court filing fee under subsection (1) of this section
may be increased to up to fifteen dollars for each such fee upon the
request of the law library board of trustees and with the approval of
the county legislative body or bodies.
(3) Upon a showing of need by the law library board of trustees, a
county legislative body or bodies may impose a surcharge not to exceed
fifteen dollars on every new probate or civil filing, including
appeals, in superior court for the purpose of funding the county law
library. Any surcharge imposed shall be collected by the clerk of the
court and remitted to the county treasurer for deposit in the county or
regional law library fund. However, no surcharge under this subsection
is valid if, before imposing the surcharge, a county has increased the
contribution as allowed under subsection (2) of this section and then
has reduced such contribution before or after imposing the surcharge.

--- END ---