BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is established in the office of the attorney general a
special environmental crimes prosecutor, whose sole function is to
prosecute criminal violations of the environmental laws of the state
that have caused serious harm to public health, safety, or the
environment. The attorney general shall appoint the special
environmental crimes prosecutor with the advice and confirmation of the
senate, who shall serve during the term of office of the attorney
general. The attorney general, upon request of the special
environmental crimes prosecutor, may employ such professional,
technical, research, and clerical staff as may be necessary within
available appropriations. The prosecutor may call upon the assistance
and services of the department of ecology, other state agencies, any
county prosecuting attorney, any law enforcement office in the state,
and any other state or local government official or employee for the
purpose of carrying out the function of the prosecutor established
under this section.
(2) The special environmental crimes prosecutor may from time to
time provide recommendations to the attorney general and to the
legislature for modifications to the state's environmental criminal
statutes and other statutes to strengthen deterrence against
environmental violations, to improve the administration and prosecution
of environmental crimes proceedings, and to strengthen the state's
interests in cases where there is concurrent federal and state
environmental crimes jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
The department of ecology shall provide assistance as requested by
the special environmental crimes prosecutor in carrying out the
criminal investigation and prosecutorial functions assigned under
section 1 of this act.

--- END ---