BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Toxic pollutants released to the air
comprise approximately seventy-five percent of all toxic releases in
Washington. Like many other states and the federal government,
presently Washington state's principal strategy for reducing the
release of toxic pollutants focuses on releases from industrial
sources. This approach uses a technology-based system to address the
releases and places a primary emphasis on conventional air pollutants
such as particulates and carbon monoxide.
The legislature finds that while this approach has had considerable
success in controlling conventional sources of pollution, the state
needs to examine a different approach for dealing with the public
health risks associated with toxic air pollutants. Toxic air emissions
should be evaluated using a public health, risk-based approach that
prioritizes state action on the most dangerous toxic air pollutants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop a planned strategy to address
toxic air pollutant emissions based on their relative risk to public
health. The toxic air pollutant emission strategy must:
(a) Identify the most significant toxic air pollutants being
released in Washington;
(b) Include an evaluation, based on existing scientific
information, of the risks associated with the identified toxic air
pollutants;
(c) Evaluate the relative public health risk posed by the toxic air
pollutants; and
(d) Prioritize the toxic air pollutants by the relative risk.
(2) The department shall establish a ten-year schedule to adopt
emission reduction standards that significantly reduce emissions for
the top ten toxic air pollutants.
(3) The department shall undertake actions, including any necessary
rule making, to begin emission reductions for the six toxic air
pollutants posing the greatest relative risk, as determined by the
department, no later than January 1, 2006. The department shall use
the authorities provided under this chapter to achieve such reductions,
and incorporate the actions as appropriate into the state's clean air
implementation plan.
(4) In developing the toxic air emission strategy, the department
may involve an advisory committee with a balanced representation of
local government, business, agriculture, and environmental, public
health, and community groups. Interested tribes and federal agencies
should be encouraged to participate if an advisory committee is formed.

--- END ---