BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that community health
clinics are critical to providing preventive services and medical
treatment, including prescription drugs, to low-income people in
Washington, and that the state should continue to support these
clinics. However, it is also essential that we protect the viability
of our private health care providers, who are also fundamental to the
health of our population and, especially in rural areas, the economic
well-being of our communities. It is the intent of the legislature
that community health clinics complement, and not compete with, private
health care services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The authority shall distribute funds to a community health clinic
that provides its patients with outpatient prescription drugs covered
by section 340B of the public health services act only: (1) If the
clinic has in effect a contract for pharmacy service between itself and
a local retail pharmacy; or (2) upon proof that there is no retail
pharmacy within ten miles of the clinic able and willing to contract
with the clinic to provide pharmacy services.

--- END ---