BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.30.010 and 1990 c 59 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every ballot for a single combination of issues and offices shall
be uniform within a precinct and shall identify the type of primary or
election, the county, and the date of the primary or election, and the
ballot or voting device shall contain instructions on the proper method
of recording a vote, including write-in votes and abstentions. Each
position, together with the names of the candidates for that office and
an opportunity for the voter to indicate abstention from voting on that
office, shall be clearly separated from other offices or positions in
the same jurisdiction. The offices in each jurisdiction shall be
clearly separated from each other. No paper ballot or ballot card may
be marked in any way that would permit the identification of the person
who voted that ballot.

--- END ---