BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.178 and 2002 c 294 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
surcharge of ten dollars per instrument shall be charged by the county
auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any
other charge authorized by law. The auditor may retain up to five
percent of these funds collected to administer the collection of these
funds. Of the remaining funds, forty percent of the revenue generated
through this surcharge will be transmitted monthly to the state
treasurer who will deposit the funds into the Washington housing trust
account. The office of community development of the department of
community, trade, and economic development will develop guidelines for
the use of these funds to support building operation and maintenance
costs of housing projects or units within housing projects that are
affordable to extremely low-income persons with incomes at or below
thirty percent of the area median income, and that require a supplement
to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses. Sixty percent of
the revenue generated by this surcharge will be retained by the county
and be deposited into a fund that must be used by the county and its
cities and towns for housing projects or units within housing projects
that are affordable to very low-income persons with incomes at or below
fifty percent of the area median income. The portion of the surcharge
retained by a county shall be allocated to very low-income housing
projects or units within such housing projects in the county and the
cities within a county according to an interlocal agreement between the
county and the cities within the county, consistent with countywide and
local housing needs and policies. The funds generated with this
surcharge shall not be used for construction of new housing if at any
time the vacancy rate for available low-income housing within the
county rises above ten percent. The vacancy rate for each county shall
be developed using the state low-income vacancy rate standard developed
under subsection (3) of this section. Permissible uses of these local
funds are limited to:
(a) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to very
low-income persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area
median income;
(b) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects ((built with)) eligible to
receive housing trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income
persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median
income, and that require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing
operating expenses;
(c) Rental assistance vouchers for housing projects or units within
housing projects that are affordable to very low-income persons with
incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median income, to be
administered by a local public housing authority or other local
organization that has an existing rental assistance voucher program,
consistent with the United States department of housing and urban
development's section 8 rental assistance voucher program standards;
and
(d) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed overnight
youth shelters.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.
(3) The real estate research center at Washington State University
shall develop a vacancy rate standard for low-income housing in the
state as described in RCW 18.85.540(1)(i).

--- END ---