BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A livestock nutrient management program is
essential to ensuring a healthy and productive livestock industry in
Washington state. The goal of the program must be to provide clear
guidance to livestock farms as to their responsibilities under state
and federal law to protect water quality while maintaining a healthy
business climate for these farms. The program should develop
reasonable financial assistance resources, educational and technical
assistance to meet these responsibilities, and provide for periodic
inspection and enforcement actions to ensure compliance with state and
federal water quality laws. The legislature intends that by 2006,
there will be a fully functioning state program for concentrated animal
feeding operations in the state, and that this program will be a single
program for all livestock sectors.
The legislature finds that a livestock nutrient management program
is necessary to address the federal rule changes with which livestock
operations must comply. Furthermore, budgetary conditions demand
efficient and effective governance. In addition, many of the existing
requirements and goals for dairy farms will be completed by December
2003, and revisions will be needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A livestock nutrient management program
development and oversight committee is created comprised of the
following members, appointed as follows:
(a) The director of the department of agriculture, or the
director's designee, who shall serve as committee chair;
(b) The director of the department of ecology, or the director's
designee;
(c) A representative of the United States environmental protection
agency, appointed by the regional director of the agency unless the
agency chooses not to be represented on the committee;
(d) A representative of commercial shellfish growers, nominated by
an organization representing these growers, appointed by the governor;
(e) A representative of an environmental interest organization with
familiarity and expertise in water quality issues, appointed by the
governor;
(f) A representative of tribal governments as nominated by an
organization representing tribal governments, appointed by the
governor;
(g) A representative of Washington State University appointed by
the dean of the college of agriculture and home economics;
(h) Three representatives of dairy producers nominated by a
statewide organization representing dairy producers in the state,
appointed by the governor;
(i) Two representatives of beef cattle producers nominated by a
statewide organization representing beef cattle producers in the state,
appointed by the governor;
(j) One representative of poultry producers nominated by a
statewide organization representing poultry producers in the state,
appointed by the governor;
(k) One representative of the commercial cattle feedlots nominated
by a statewide organization representing commercial cattle feedlots in
the state, appointed by the governor; and
(l) A representative of any other segment of the livestock industry
determined by the director of agriculture to be subject to federal
rules regulating animal feeding or concentrated animal feeding
operations.
(2) The state department of agriculture shall provide staff for the
committee. The department of agriculture may request staff assistance
be assigned by the United States environmental protection agency to
assist the director in staffing the committee.
(3) The committee shall establish a work plan that includes a list
of tasks and a projected completion date for each task.
(4) The committee may establish a subcommittee for each of the
major industry segments that is covered by the recently adopted federal
regulations that pertain to animal feeding operations and concentrated
animal feeding operations. The subcommittee shall be composed of
selected members of the full committee and additional representatives
from that major segment of the livestock industry as determined by the
director. The committee shall assign tasks to the subcommittees and
shall establish dates for each subcommittee to report back to the full
committee.
(5) The committee shall examine the recently adopted federal
regulations that provide for the regulation of animal feeding
operations and concentrated animal feeding operations and develop a
program to be administered by the department of agriculture that meets
the requirements and time frames contained in the federal rules.
Elements that the committee shall evaluate include:
(a) A process for adopting standards and for developing plans for
each operation that meet these standards;
(b) A process for revising current national pollution discharge
elimination system permits currently held by livestock operations and
to transition these permits into the new system; and
(c) In consultation with the director, a determination of what
other work is needed and what other institutional relationships are
needed or desirable. The committee shall consult with representatives
of the statewide association of conservation districts regarding any
functions or activities that are proposed to be provided through local
conservation districts.
(6) The committee shall review and comment on proposals for grants
from the livestock nutrient management account created in RCW
90.64.150.
(7) The committee shall develop draft proposed legislation that
includes:
(a) Statutory changes, including a time line to achieve the phased-in levels of regulation under federal law, to comply with the minimum
requirements under federal law and the minimum requirements under
chapter 90.48 RCW. These changes must meet the requirements necessary
to enable the department of agriculture and the department of ecology
to pursue the United States environmental protection agency's approval
of the transfer of the permitting program as it relates to the
concentrated animal feeding operations from the department of ecology
to the department of agriculture;
(b) Statutory changes necessitated by the transfer of functions
under chapter 90.64 RCW from the department of ecology to the
department of agriculture;
(c) Continued inspection of dairy operations at least once every
two years;
(d) An outreach and education program to inform the various animal
feeding operations and concentrated animal feeding operations of the
program's elements; and
(e) Annual reporting to the legislature on the progress of the
state strategy for implementing the animal feeding operation and
concentrated animal feeding operation.
(8) The committee shall provide a report by December 1, 2003, to
appropriate committees of the legislature that includes the results of
the committee's evaluation under subsection (5) of this section and
draft legislation to initiate the program.
(9) This section expires June 30, 2006.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.64.030 and 2002 c 327 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Under the inspection program established in RCW 90.64.023, the
department may investigate a dairy farm to determine whether the
operation is discharging pollutants or has a record of discharging
pollutants into surface or ground waters of the state. Upon concluding
an investigation, the department shall make a written report of its
findings, including the results of any water quality measurements,
photographs, or other pertinent information, and provide a copy of the
report to the dairy producer within twenty days of the investigation.
(2) The department shall investigate a written complaint filed with
the department within three working days and shall make a written
report of its findings including the results of any water quality
measurements, photographs, or other pertinent information. Within
twenty days of receiving a written complaint, a copy of the findings
shall be provided to the dairy producer subject to the complaint, and
to the complainant if the person gave his or her name and address to
the department at the time the complaint was filed.
(3) The department may consider past complaints against the same
dairy farm from the same person and the results of its previous
inspections, and has the discretion to decide whether to conduct an
inspection if:
(a) The same or a similar complaint or complaints have been filed
against the same dairy farm within the immediately preceding six-month
period; and
(b) The department made a determination that the activity that was
the subject of the prior complaint was not a violation.
(4) If the decision of the department is not to conduct an
inspection, it shall document the decision and the reasons for the
decision within twenty days. The department shall provide the decision
to the complainant if the name and address were provided to the
department, and to the dairy producer subject to the complaint, and the
department shall place the decision in the department's administrative
records.
(5) The report of findings of any inspection conducted as the
result of either an oral or a written complaint shall be placed in the
department's administrative records. Only findings of violations shall
be entered into the data base identified in RCW 90.64.130.
(6) A dairy farm that is determined to be a significant contributor
of pollution based on actual water quality tests, photographs, or other
pertinent information is subject to the provisions of this chapter and
to the enforcement provisions of chapters 43.05 and 90.48 RCW,
including civil penalties levied under RCW 90.48.144.
(7) If the department determines that an unresolved water quality
problem from a dairy farm requires immediate corrective action, the
department shall notify the producer and the district in which the
problem is located. When corrective actions are required to address
such unresolved water quality problems, the department shall provide
copies of all final dairy farm inspection reports and documentation of
all formal regulatory and enforcement actions taken by the department
against that particular dairy farm to the local conservation district
and to the appropriate dairy farm within twenty days.
(8) For a violation of water quality laws that is a first offense
for a dairy producer, the penalty may be waived to allow the producer
to come into compliance with water quality laws. The department shall
record all legitimate violations and subsequent enforcement actions.
(9) A discharge, including a storm water discharge, to surface
waters of the state shall not be considered a violation of this
chapter, chapter 90.48 RCW, or chapter 173-201A WAC, and shall
therefore not be enforceable by the department of ecology or a third
party, if at the time of the discharge, a violation is not occurring
under RCW 90.64.010(18). In addition, a dairy producer shall not be
held liable for violations of this chapter, chapter 90.48 RCW, chapter
173-201A WAC, or the federal clean water act due to the discharge of
dairy nutrients to waters of the state resulting from spreading these
materials on lands other than where the nutrients were generated, when
the nutrients are spread by persons other than the dairy producer or
the dairy producer's agent.
(10) As provided under RCW 7.48.305, agricultural activities
associated with the management of dairy nutrients are presumed to be
reasonable and shall not be found to constitute a nuisance unless the
activity has a substantial adverse effect on public health and safety.
(11) This section specifically acknowledges that if a holder of a
general or individual national pollutant discharge elimination system
permit complies with the permit and the dairy nutrient management plan
conditions for appropriate land application practices, the permit
provides compliance with the federal clean water act and acts as a
shield against citizen or agency enforcement for any additions of
pollutants to waters of the state or of the United States as authorized
by the permit.
(12) A dairy producer who fails to have an approved dairy nutrient
management plan by July 1, 2002, or a certified dairy nutrient
management plan by December 31, 2003, and for which no appeals have
been
filed with the pollution control hearings board, is in violation
of this chapter. Each month beyond these deadlines that a dairy
producer is out of compliance with the requirement for either plan
approval or plan certification shall be considered separate violations
of chapter 90.64 RCW that may be subject to penalties. Such penalties
may not exceed one hundred dollars per month for each violation up to
a combined total of five thousand dollars. The department has
discretion in imposing penalties for failure to meet deadlines for plan
approval or plan certification if the failure to comply is due to lack
of state funding for implementation of the program. Failure to
register as required in RCW 90.64.017 shall subject a dairy producer to
a maximum penalty of one hundred dollars. Penalties shall be levied by
the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.64.150 and 1998 c 262 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((dairy waste)) livestock nutrient management account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
monetary penalties levied pursuant to violations of this chapter must
be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be
used only ((for the commission)) to provide grants ((to local
conservation districts for the sole purpose of assisting dairy
producers to develop and fully implement dairy nutrient management
plans)) for research or education proposals that assist livestock
operations to achieve compliance with state and federal water quality
laws. The director of agriculture shall accept and prioritize research
proposals and education proposals. Only the ((chairman of the
commission)) director or the ((chairman's)) director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of ecology
pertaining to chapter 90.64 RCW are transferred to the department of
agriculture. All references to the director of ecology or the
department of ecology in the Revised Code of Washington shall be
construed to mean the director of agriculture or the department of
agriculture when referring to the functions transferred in this
section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
ecology pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the department of agriculture.
All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other
tangible property employed by the department of ecology in carrying out
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available
to the department of agriculture. All funds, credits, or other assets
held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be assigned to the department of agriculture.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of ecology for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
department of agriculture.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of
ecology pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the department of agriculture.
All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and
shall be performed by the department of agriculture.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of ecology shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.48.260 and 1988 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ecology is hereby designated as the State Water
Pollution Control Agency for all purposes of the federal clean water
act as it exists on February 4, 1987, and is hereby authorized to
participate fully in the programs of the act as well as to take all
action necessary to secure to the state the benefits and to meet the
requirements of that act. With regard to the national estuary program
established by section 320 of that act, the department shall exercise
its responsibility jointly with the Puget Sound water quality
authority. The department of ecology may delegate its national
pollution discharge elimination permit system authority and duties
regarding animal feeding operations and concentrated animal feeding
operations to the department of agriculture through a memorandum of
understanding. The powers granted herein include, among others, and
notwithstanding any other provisions of chapter 90.48 RCW or otherwise,
the following:
(1) Complete authority to establish and administer a comprehensive
state point source waste discharge or pollution discharge elimination
permit program which will enable the department to qualify for full
participation in any national waste discharge or pollution discharge
elimination permit system and will allow the department to be the sole
agency issuing permits required by such national system operating in
the state of Washington subject to the provisions of RCW 90.48.262(2).
Program elements authorized herein may include, but are not limited
to: (a) Effluent treatment and limitation requirements together with
timing requirements related thereto; (b) applicable receiving water
quality standards requirements; (c) requirements of standards of
performance for new sources; (d) pretreatment requirements; (e)
termination and modification of permits for cause; (f) requirements for
public notices and opportunities for public hearings; (g) appropriate
relationships with the secretary of the army in the administration of
his responsibilities which relate to anchorage and navigation, with the
administrator of the environmental protection agency in the performance
of his duties, and with other governmental officials under the federal
clean water act; (h) requirements for inspection, monitoring, entry,
and reporting; (i) enforcement of the program through penalties,
emergency powers, and criminal sanctions; (j) a continuing planning
process; and (k) user charges.
(2) The power to establish and administer state programs in a
manner which will insure the procurement of moneys, whether in the form
of grants, loans, or otherwise; to assist in the construction,
operation, and maintenance of various water pollution control
facilities and works; and the administering of various state water
pollution control management, regulatory, and enforcement programs.
(3) The power to develop and implement appropriate programs
pertaining to continuing planning processes, area-wide waste treatment
management plans, and basin planning.
The governor shall have authority to perform those actions required
of him or her by the federal clean water act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 and 5 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2003.

--- END ---