BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that: The state's
highly productive and efficient agriculture sector is composed
predominately of family owned and managed farms and an industrious and
efficient work force; the supreme court has directed the department of
labor and industries to initiate rule making regarding monitoring of
agriculture workers who are exposed to certain pesticides. It is the
intent of this act that the safety and health of workers be protected,
and that this can best be accomplished through a pilot project to
determine whether mandatory medical monitoring is effective and
beneficial to workers who mix, load, or apply cholinesterase inhibiting
pesticides, and whether mandatory medical monitoring is feasible
considering all of the technical requirements of such a regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of labor and industries
shall initiate a pilot project, in accordance with RCW 34.05.313, to
determine whether mandatory medical monitoring for class one and class
two organophosphate and carbamate pesticides is practical and effective
to promote worker safety. The pilot project shall be completed by
December 31, 2005.
(2) In accordance with RCW 34.05.350, the department of labor and
industries may adopt emergency rules necessary to protect the health
and safety of farmworkers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---