BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.050 and 2000 c 107 s 266 are each amended to
read as follows:
All recreational licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by
this title and raffle tickets authorized under chapter 77.12 RCW shall
be issued under the authority of the commission. The commission shall
adopt rules for the issuance of recreational licenses, permits, tags,
stamps, and raffle tickets, and for the collection, payment, and
handling of license fees, terms and conditions to govern dealers, and
dealers' fees. A transaction fee on recreational ((licenses))
documents issued through an automated licensing system may be set by
the commission and collected from licensees. The department may
authorize all or part of such fee to be paid directly to a contractor
providing automated licensing system services. Fees retained by
dealers shall be uniform throughout the state. The department shall
authorize dealers to collect and retain dealer fees of at least two
dollars for purchase of a standard hunting or fishing recreational
license document, except that the commission may set a lower dealer fee
for issuance of tags or when a licensee buys a license that involves a
stamp or display card format rather than a standard department
licensing document form.

--- END ---