BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.24.020 and 2002 c 313 s 116 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a Washington apple commission to be thus
known and designated. The commission shall be composed of ((nine))
eleven practical apple producers and four practical apple dealers. The
director shall be an ex officio member of the commission without vote.
The ((nine)) eleven producer members shall be citizens and
residents of this state, over the age of twenty-five years, each of
whom, either individually or as an executive officer of a corporation,
firm or partnership, is and has been actually engaged in growing and
producing apples within the state of Washington for a period of five
years, currently operates a commercial producing orchard in the
district represented, and has during that period derived a substantial
portion of his or her income therefrom((: PROVIDED, That he or she may
own and operate an apple warehouse and pack and store apples grown by
others, without being disqualified, so long as a substantial quantity
of the apples handled in such warehouse are grown by him or her; and he
or she may sell apples grown by himself, herself, and others so long as
he or she does not sell a larger quantity of apples grown by others
than those grown by himself or herself)). The four dealer members
shall be persons who, either individually or as executive officers of
a corporation, firm, partnership, association, or cooperative
organization, are and have been actively engaged as dealers in apples
within the state of Washington for a period of five years, and are
citizens and residents of this state, and are engaged as apple dealers
in the district represented. The qualifications of members of the
commission as herein set forth must continue during their term of
office.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.24.030 and 1989 c 354 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Thirteen)) Fifteen persons with the qualifications stated in RCW
15.24.020 shall be elected members of said commission. Four of the
grower members, being positions one, two, three, and four, shall be
from grower district No. 1, at least one of whom shall be a resident of
and engaged in growing and producing apples in Okanogan county;
((four)) five of the grower members, being positions five, six, seven
((and)), eight, and nine from grower district No. 2; and ((one)) two
grower members, being positions ((nine)) ten and eleven from grower
district No. 3, at least one of whom must be engaged in growing and
producing apples in Grant county. Two of the dealer members, being
positions ((ten and eleven)) twelve and thirteen, shall be from dealer
district No. 1; and two of the dealer members, being positions ((twelve
and thirteen)) fourteen and fifteen, shall be from dealer district No.
2.
The commission shall have authority in its discretion to establish
by regulation one or more subdivisions of grower district No. 1 and one
or more subdivisions of grower district No. 2; provided that each of
the same includes a substantial apple producing district or districts,
and provided the same does not result in an unfair or unequitable
voting situation or an unfair or unequitable representation of apple
growers on said commission. In such event each of said subdivisions
shall be entitled to be represented by one of the said grower members
of the commission, who shall be elected by vote of the qualified apple
growers in said subdivision of said district, and who shall be a
resident of and engaged in growing and producing apples in said
subdivision.
The regular term of office of the members of the commission shall
be three years from March 1st following their election and until their
successors are elected and qualified. The commission shall hold its
annual meeting during the month of March each year for the purpose of
electing officers and the transaction of other business and shall hold
such other meetings during the year as it shall determine.

--- END ---