BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.70.011 and 2001 c 272 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Vehicle" means and includes every device capable of being
moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or
property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway,
excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively
upon stationary rails or tracks.
(2) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle which is self-propelled and
every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from
overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails, and which is
required to be registered and titled under Title 46 RCW, Motor
Vehicles.
(3) "Vehicle dealer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, not excluded by subsection (4) of this section,
engaged in the business of buying, selling, listing, exchanging,
offering, brokering, leasing with an option to purchase, auctioning,
soliciting, or advertising the sale of new or used vehicles, or
arranging or offering or attempting to solicit or negotiate on behalf
of others, a sale, purchase, or exchange of an interest in new or used
motor vehicles, irrespective of whether the motor vehicles are owned by
that person. Vehicle dealers shall be classified as follows:
(a) A "motor vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals in new
or used motor vehicles, or both;
(b) A "mobile home and travel trailer dealer" is a vehicle dealer
that deals in mobile homes, park trailers, or travel trailers, or more
than one type of these vehicles;
(c) A "miscellaneous vehicle dealer" is a vehicle dealer that deals
in motorcycles or vehicles other than motor vehicles or mobile homes
and travel trailers or any combination of such vehicles.
(4) The term "vehicle dealer" does not include, nor do the
licensing requirements of RCW 46.70.021 apply to, the following
persons, firms, associations, or corporations:
(a) Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or
other persons appointed by, or acting under a judgment or order of, any
court; or
(b) Public officers while performing their official duties; or
(c) Employees of vehicle dealers who are engaged in the specific
performance of their duties as such employees; or
(d) Any person engaged in an isolated sale of a vehicle in which
that person is the registered or legal owner, or both, thereof; or
(e) Any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, engaged
in the selling of equipment other than vehicles, subject to
registration, used for agricultural or industrial purposes; or
(f) A real estate broker licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW, or an
affiliated licensee, who, on behalf of another negotiates the purchase,
sale, lease, or exchange of a manufactured or mobile home in
conjunction with the purchase, sale, exchange, rental, or lease of the
land upon which the manufactured or mobile home is, or will be,
located; or
(g) Owners who are also operators of the special highway
construction equipment or of the highway construction equipment for
which a vehicle license and display vehicle license number plate is
required as defined in RCW 46.16.010; or
(h) Any bank, trust company, savings bank, mutual savings bank,
savings and loan association, credit union, and any parent, subsidiary,
or affiliate thereof, authorized to do business in this state under
state or federal law with respect to the sale or other disposition of
a motor vehicle owned and used in their business; or with respect to
the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the entity has acquired an interest as a lessor, lessee, or
secured party; or
(i) Any person who is regularly engaged in the business of
acquiring leases or installment contracts by assignment, with respect
to the acquisition and sale or other disposition of a motor vehicle in
which the person has acquired an interest as a result of the business.
(5) "Vehicle salesperson" means any person who for any form of
compensation sells, auctions, leases with an option to purchase, or
offers to sell or to so lease vehicles on behalf of a vehicle dealer.
(6) "Department" means the department of licensing, which shall
administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.
(7) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(8) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or
assembles new and unused vehicles or remanufactures vehicles in whole
or in part and further includes the terms:
(a) "Distributor," which means any person, firm, association,
corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in part
offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new and unused vehicle to
vehicle dealers or who maintains factory representatives.
(b) "Factory branch," which means a branch office maintained by a
manufacturer for the purpose of selling or offering for sale, vehicles
to a distributor, wholesaler, or vehicle dealer, or for directing or
supervising in whole or in part factory or distributor representatives,
and further includes any sales promotion organization, whether a
person, firm, or corporation, which is engaged in promoting the sale of
new and unused vehicles in this state of a particular brand or make to
vehicle dealers.
(c) "Factory representative," which means a representative employed
by a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch for the purpose of
making or promoting for the sale of their vehicles or for supervising
or contracting with their dealers or prospective dealers.
(9) "Established place of business" means a location meeting the
requirements of RCW 46.70.023(1) at which a vehicle dealer conducts
business in this state.
(10) "Principal place of business" means that dealer firm's
business location in the state, which place the dealer designates as
their principal place of business.
(11) "Subagency" means any place of business of a vehicle dealer
within the state, which place is physically and geographically
separated from the principal place of business of the firm or any place
of business of a vehicle dealer within the state, at which place the
firm does business using a name other than the principal name of the
firm, or both.
(12) "Temporary subagency" means a location other than the
principal place of business or subagency within the state where a
licensed vehicle dealer may secure a license to conduct the business
and is licensed for a period of time not to exceed ten days for a
specific purpose such as auto shows, shopping center promotions, tent
sales, exhibitions, or similar merchandising ventures. No more than
six temporary subagency licenses may be issued to a licensee in any
twelve-month period.
(13) "Wholesale vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who buys and
sells other than at retail.
(14) "Retail vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who may buy and
sell at both wholesale and retail.
(15) "Listing dealer" means a used mobile home dealer who makes
contracts with sellers who will compensate the dealer for obtaining a
willing purchaser for the seller's mobile home.
(16) "Auction" means a transaction conducted by means of exchanges
between an auctioneer and the members of the audience, constituting a
series of oral invitations for offers for the purchase of vehicles made
by the auctioneer, offers to purchase by members of the audience, and
the acceptance of the highest or most favorable offer to purchase.
(17) "Auction company" means a sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, or other legal or commercial entity licensed under chapter
18.11 RCW that only sells or offers to sell vehicles at auction or only
arranges or sponsors auctions.
(18) "Buyer's agent" means any person, firm, partnership,
association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
or corporation retained or employed by a consumer to arrange for or to
negotiate, or both, the purchase or lease of a new motor vehicle on
behalf of the consumer, and who is paid a fee or receives other
compensation from the consumer for its services.
(19) "New motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is self-propelled and is required to be registered and titled under Title 46
RCW, has not been previously titled to a retail purchaser or lessee,
and is not a "used vehicle" as defined under RCW 46.04.660.
(20) "Broker" means any person, partnership, corporation, or
association acting independently, who for a commission, fee, or any
other form of compensation arranges or engages in the wholesale or
retail purchase, sale, or lease with option to purchase of a vehicle.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.70.041 and 2001 c 272 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every application for a vehicle dealer license shall contain
the following information to the extent it applies to the applicant:
(a) Proof as the department may require concerning the applicant's
identity, including but not limited to his or her fingerprints, the
honesty, truthfulness, and good reputation of the applicant for the
license, or of the officers of a corporation making the application;
(b) The applicant's form and place of organization including if the
applicant is a corporation, proof that the corporation is licensed to
do business in this state;
(c) The qualification and business history of the applicant and any
partner, officer, or director;
(d) The applicant's financial condition or history including a bank
reference and whether the applicant or any partner, officer, or
director has ever been adjudged bankrupt or has any unsatisfied
judgment in any federal or state court;
(e) Whether the applicant has been adjudged guilty of a crime which
directly relates to the business for which the license is sought and
the time elapsed since the conviction is less than ten years, or has
suffered any judgment within the preceding five years in any civil
action involving fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion and in the
case of a corporation or partnership, all directors, officers, or
partners;
(f) A business telephone with a listing in the local directory;
(g) The name or names of new vehicles the vehicle dealer wishes to
sell;
(h) The names and addresses of each manufacturer from whom the
applicant has received a franchise;
(i) A certificate by a representative of the department, that the
applicant's principal place of business and each subagency business
location in the state of Washington meets the location requirements as
required by this chapter. The certificate shall include proof of the
applicant's ownership or lease of the real property where the
applicant's principal place of business is established;
(j) A copy of a current service agreement with a manufacturer, or
distributor for a foreign manufacturer, requiring the applicant, upon
demand of any customer receiving a new vehicle warranty to perform or
arrange for, within a reasonable distance of his or her established
place of business, the service repair and replacement work required of
the manufacturer or distributor by such vehicle warranty. This
requirement ((applies only)) does not apply to applicants seeking ((to
sell, to exchange,)) to offer, ((to auction,)) to solicit, ((to
advertise,)) or to broker or lease new ((or current-model)) vehicles
((with factory or distributor warranties)) that are sold by a
franchised dealer having a valid written service agreement as required
by this chapter;
(k) The class of vehicles the vehicle dealer will be buying,
selling, listing, exchanging, offering, brokering, leasing, auctioning,
soliciting, or advertising, and which classification or classifications
the dealer wishes to be designated as;
(l) Effective July 1, 2002, a certificate from the provider of each
education program or test showing that the applicant has completed the
education programs and passed the test required under RCW 46.70.079 if
the applicant is a dealer subject to the education and test
requirements;
(m) Any other information the department may reasonably require.
(2) If the applicant is a manufacturer the application shall
contain the following information to the extent it is applicable to the
applicant:
(a) The name and address of the principal place of business of the
applicant and, if different, the name and address of the Washington
state representative of the applicant;
(b) The name or names under which the applicant will do business in
the state of Washington;
(c) Evidence that the applicant is authorized to do business in the
state of Washington;
(d) The name or names of the vehicles that the licensee
manufactures;
(e) The name or names and address or addresses of each and every
distributor, factory branch, and factory representative;
(f) The name or names and address or addresses of resident
employees or agents to provide service or repairs to vehicles located
in the state of Washington only under the terms of any warranty
attached to new or unused vehicles manufactured, unless such
manufacturer requires warranty service to be performed by all of its
dealers pursuant to a current service agreement on file with the
department;
(g) Any other information the department may reasonably require.

--- END ---