BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW
to read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, or the
state of Washington, its political subdivisions, or municipal
corporations to require, directly or indirectly, that any employee or
prospective employee submit genetic information or submit to screening
for genetic information as a condition of employment or continued
employment.
"Genetic information" for purposes of this chapter, is information
about inherited characteristics that can be derived from a DNA-based or
other laboratory test, family history, or medical examination.

--- END ---