BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to adopt in
statute the conclusions of attorney general opinion, number 3 (2001).

Sec. 2 RCW 54.16.005 and 2000 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.
(2) "End user" means a retail customer, whether a person or public
or private entity, that purchases telecommunications services.
(3) "Telecommunications" has the same meaning as that contained in
RCW 80.04.010, and includes internet services.
(((3))) (4) "Telecommunications facilities" means lines, conduits,
ducts, poles, wires, cables, crossarms, receivers, transmitters,
instruments, machines, appliances, instrumentalities and all devices,
real estate, easements, apparatus, property, and routes used, operated,
owned, or controlled by any entity to facilitate the provision of
telecommunications services.
(((4))) (5) "Wholesale telecommunications services" means the
provision of telecommunications services or facilities for resale by an
entity authorized to provide telecommunications services to the general
public and internet service providers.

Sec. 3 RCW 54.16.330 and 2000 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public utility district in existence on June 8, 2000, may
construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease, license, handle,
provide, add to, contract for, interconnect, alter, improve, repair,
operate, and maintain any telecommunications facilities within or
without the district's limits for the following purposes:
(a) For the district's internal telecommunications needs; and
(b) For the provision of wholesale telecommunications services
within the district and by contract with another public utility
district.
((Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize))
Public utility districts ((to)) shall not: (i) Provide
telecommunications services to end users; or (ii) market the services
provided by entities authorized to provide telecommunications services
to end users, except that information provided by a district describing
the capabilities of the district's network and a listing of private
providers may be marketed.
Public utility districts shall not provide wholesale
telecommunications services to public agencies, as defined in RCW
39.34.020, unless the agencies are authorized by statute to provide
telecommunications services to end users.
(2) A public utility district providing wholesale
telecommunications services shall ensure that rates, terms, and
conditions for such services are not unduly or unreasonably
discriminatory or preferential. Rates, terms, and conditions are
discriminatory or preferential when a public utility district offering
rates, terms, and conditions to an entity for wholesale
telecommunications services does not offer substantially similar rates,
terms, and conditions to all other entities seeking substantially
similar services.
(3) ((When)) A public utility district ((establishes a separate
utility function for the provision of wholesale telecommunications
services, it)) providing wholesale telecommunications services shall
separately account for any ((and all)) revenues ((and)), expenditures
((related to its)), property, allocation of costs to its internal
communications needs, and amount of funds required from other utility
functions to support the provision of wholesale telecommunications
((facilities and)) services ((separately from revenues and expenditures
related to its internal telecommunications operations)). Any revenues
received from the provision of wholesale telecommunications services
must be dedicated to the utility function that includes the provision
of wholesale telecommunications services for costs incurred to build
and maintain the telecommunications facilities until such time as any
bonds or other financing instruments executed after June 8, 2000, and
used to finance the telecommunications facilities are discharged or
retired.
(4) When a public utility district ((establishes a separate utility
function for the provision of)) provides wholesale telecommunications
services, all telecommunications services rendered ((by the separate
function)) to the district for the district's internal
telecommunications needs shall be charged at its true and full value.
A public utility district may not charge its nontelecommunications
operations rates that are preferential or discriminatory compared to
those it charges entities purchasing wholesale telecommunications
services.
(5) A public utility district shall not exercise powers of eminent
domain to acquire telecommunications facilities or contractual rights
held by any other person or entity to telecommunications facilities.
(6) Except as otherwise specifically provided, a public utility
district may exercise any of the powers granted to it under this title
and other applicable laws in carrying out the powers authorized under
this section. Nothing in chapter 81, Laws of 2000 limits any existing
authority of a public utility district under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
A public utility district providing wholesale telecommunications
services shall provide, at a just and reasonable rate,
nondiscriminatory access for private providers of telecommunications
services to poles, conduits, or other permanent distribution facilities
owned by the public utility district unless the facilities have
insufficient capacity for such access and additional capacity cannot
reasonably be added to the facilities or such access would violate
standard industry safety and operational requirements. Except as
provided in a facilities use contract between a public utility district
and a private telecommunications service provider, a public utility
district shall not require the removal or prohibit the replacement of
telecommunications facilities owned by private telecommunications
service providers from its facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
When the state auditor makes a finding that a public utility
district providing wholesale telecommunications services has violated
RCW 54.16.330 or section 4 of this act, the district shall submit a
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature within thirty
days of the issue date of the finding. The report must include, at a
minimum: (1) A description of all activities relating to the
construction, acquisition, operation, marketing, and leasing of
telecommunications facilities and wholesale telecommunications
services; and (2) a description of the number of new locations
connected to the telecommunications facilities resulting from the
provision of wholesale telecommunications services to internet service
providers and entities authorized to provide telecommunications
services to the general public.

--- END ---