BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. The
legislature finds that businesses in Washington are concerned about the
potential for multiple taxation that arises due to the various city
business and occupation taxes and are concerned about the lack of
uniformity among city jurisdictions. The current system has a negative
impact on Washington's business climate. The legislature further finds
that local business and occupation tax revenue provides a sizable
portion of city revenue that is used for essential services. The
legislature recognizes that local government services contribute to a
healthy business climate.
The legislature intends to provide for a more uniform system of
city business and occupation taxes that eliminates multiple taxation,
while allowing for some continued local control and flexibility to
cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX--LIMITED SCOPE. This act does not apply to taxes on any service that
historically or traditionally has been taxed as a utility business for
municipal tax purposes, such as:
(1) A light and power business or a natural gas distribution
business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010;
(2) A telephone business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065;
(3) Cable television services;
(4) Sewer or water services;
(5) Drainage services;
(6) Solid waste services; or
(7) Steam services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS TAX--DEFINITIONS.
The definitions in this section apply throughout this act, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business" has the same meaning as given in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(2) "City" means a city, town, or code city.
(3) "Business and occupation tax" or "gross receipts tax" means a
tax imposed on or measured by the value of products, the gross income
of the business, or the gross proceeds of sales, as the case may be,
and that is the legal liability of the business.
(4) "Value of products" has the same meaning as given in chapter
82.04 RCW.
(5) "Gross income of the business" has the same meaning as given in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(6) "Gross proceeds of sales" has the same meaning as given in
chapter 82.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX--MODEL
ORDINANCE. (1)(a) The cities, working through the association of
Washington cities, shall form a model ordinance development committee
made up of a representative sampling of cities that as of the effective
date of this section impose a business and occupation tax. This
committee shall work through the association of Washington cities to
adopt a model ordinance on municipal gross receipts business and
occupation tax. The model ordinance and subsequent amendments shall be
adopted using a process that includes opportunity for substantial input
from business stakeholders and other members of the public. Input
shall be solicited from statewide business associations and from local
chambers of commerce and downtown business associations in cities that
levy a business and occupation tax.
(b) The municipal research council shall contract to post the model
ordinance on an internet web site and to make paper copies available
for inspection upon request. The department of revenue and the
department of licensing shall post copies of or links to the model
ordinance on their internet web sites. Additionally, a city that
imposes a business and occupation tax must make copies of its ordinance
available for inspection and copying as provided in chapter 42.17 RCW.
(c) The definitions and tax classifications in the model ordinance
may not be amended more frequently than once every four years, however
the model ordinance may be amended at any time to comply with changes
in state law. Any amendment to a mandatory provision of the model
ordinance must be adopted with the same effective date by all cities.
(2) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax must adopt
the mandatory provisions of the model ordinance. The following
provisions are mandatory:
(a) A system of credits that meets the requirements of section 6 of
this act and a form for such use;
(b) A uniform, minimum small business tax threshold of at least the
equivalent of twenty thousand dollars in gross income annually. A city
may elect to deviate from this requirement by creating a higher
threshold or exemption but it shall not deviate lower than the level
required in this subsection;
(c) Tax reporting frequencies that meet the requirements of section
7 of this act;
(d) Penalty and interest provisions that meet the requirements of
sections 8 and 9 of this act;
(e) Claim periods that meet the requirements of section 10 of this
act;
(f) Refund provisions that meet the requirements of section 11 of
this act; and
(g) Definitions, which at a minimum, must include the definitions
enumerated in sections 3 and 12 of this act. The definitions in
chapter 82.04 RCW shall be used as the baseline for all definitions in
the model ordinance, and any deviation in the model ordinance from
these definitions must be described by a comment in the model
ordinance.
(3) Except for the system of credits developed to address multiple
taxation under subsection (2)(a) of this section, a city may adopt its
own provisions for tax exemptions, tax credits, and tax deductions.
(4) Any city that adopts an ordinance that deviates from the
nonmandatory provisions of the model ordinance shall make a description
of such differences available to the public, in written and electronic
form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 MUNICIPAL GROSS RECEIPTS TAX--NEXUS. A city
may not impose a business and occupation tax on a person unless that
person has nexus with the city. For the purposes of this section, the
term "nexus" means business activities conducted by a person sufficient
to subject that person to the taxing jurisdiction of a city under the
standards established for interstate commerce under the commerce clause
of the United States Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX--MULTIPLE TAXATION--CREDIT SYSTEM. (1) A city that imposes a business
and occupation tax shall provide for a system of credits to avoid
multiple taxation as follows:
(a) Persons who engage in business activities that are within the
purview of more than one classification of the tax shall be taxable
under each applicable classification.
(b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, if
imposition of the tax would place an undue burden upon interstate
commerce or violate constitutional requirements, a taxpayer shall be
allowed a credit only to the extent necessary to preserve the validity
of the tax.
(c) Persons taxable under the retailing or wholesaling
classification with respect to selling products in a city shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any eligible gross receipts
taxes paid by the person (i) with respect to the manufacturing of the
products sold in the city, and (ii) with respect to the extracting of
the products, or the ingredients used in the products, sold in the
city. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability
arising with respect to the sale of those products.
(d) Persons taxable under the manufacturing classification with
respect to manufacturing products in a city shall be allowed a credit
against that tax for any eligible gross receipts tax paid by the person
with respect to extracting the ingredients of the products manufactured
in the city and with respect to manufacturing the products other than
in the city. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising with respect to the manufacturing of those products.
(e) Persons taxable under the retailing or wholesaling
classification with respect to selling products in a city shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any eligible gross receipts
taxes paid by the person with respect to the printing, or the printing
and publishing, of the products sold within the city. The amount of
the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising with respect to
the sale of those products.
(2) The model ordinance shall be drafted to address the issue of
multiple taxation for those tax classifications that are in addition to
those enumerated in subsection (1)(c) through (e) of this section. The
objective of any such provisions shall be to eliminate multiple
taxation of the same income by two or more cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX--REPORTING FREQUENCY. A city that imposes a business and occupation tax
shall allow reporting and payment of tax on a monthly, quarterly, or
annual basis. The frequency for any particular person may be assigned
at the discretion of the city, except that monthly reporting may be
assigned only if it can be demonstrated that the taxpayer is remitting
excise tax to the state on a monthly basis. For persons assigned a
monthly frequency, payment is due within the same time period provided
for monthly taxpayers under RCW 82.32.045. For persons assigned a
quarterly or annual frequency, payment is due within the same time
period as provided for quarterly or annual frequency under RCW
82.32.045.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX--PENALTIES AND INTEREST. (1) A city that imposes a business and
occupation tax shall compute interest charged a taxpayer on an
underpaid tax or penalty in accordance with RCW 82.32.050.
(2) A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall compute
interest paid on refunds or credits of amounts paid or other recovery
allowed a taxpayer in accordance with RCW 82.32.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX--PENALTIES. A city that imposes a business and occupation tax shall
provide for the imposition of penalties in accordance with chapter
82.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX--CLAIM PERIOD. The provisions relating to the time period allowed for
an assessment or correction of an assessment for additional taxes,
penalties, or interest shall be in accordance with chapter 82.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX--REFUND PERIOD. The provisions relating to the time period allowed for
a refund of taxes paid shall be in accordance with chapter 82.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX--DEFINITIONS--TAX CLASSIFICATIONS. (1) In addition to the definitions
in section 3 of this act, the following terms and phrases must be
defined in the model ordinance under section 4 of this act, and such
definitions shall include any specific requirements as noted in this
subsection:
(a) Eligible gross receipts tax.
(b) Extracting.
(c) Manufacturing. Software development may not be defined as a
manufacturing activity.
(d) Retailing.
(e) Retail sale.
(f) Services. The term "services" excludes retail or wholesale
services.
(g) Wholesale sale.
(h) Wholesaling.
(i) To manufacture.
(j) Commercial and industrial use.
(k) Engaging in business.
(l) Person.
(2) Any tax classifications in addition to those enumerated in
subsection (1) of this section that are included in the model ordinance
must be uniform among all cities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX--ALLOCATION AND APPORTIONMENT OF INCOME. A city that imposes a business
and occupation tax shall provide for the allocation and apportionment
of a person's gross income, other than persons subject to the
provisions of chapter 82.14A RCW, as follows:
(1) Gross income derived from all activities other than those taxed
as service or royalties shall be allocated to the location where the
activity takes place.
(a) In the case of sales of tangible personal property, the
activity takes place where delivery to the buyer occurs.
(b) If a business activity allocated under this subsection (1)
takes place in more than one city and all cities impose a gross
receipts tax, a credit shall be allowed as provided in section 6 of
this act; if not all of the cities impose a gross receipts tax, the
affected cities shall allow another credit or allocation system as they
and the taxpayer agree.
(2) Gross income derived as royalties from the granting of
intangible rights shall be allocated to the commercial domicile of the
taxpayer.
(3) Gross income derived from activities taxed as services shall be
apportioned to a city by multiplying apportionable income by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the payroll factor plus the
service-income factor and the denominator of which is two.
(a) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the
total amount paid in the city during the tax period by the taxpayer for
compensation and the denominator of which is the total compensation
paid everywhere during the tax period. Compensation is paid in the
city if:
(i) The individual is primarily assigned within the city;
(ii) The individual is not primarily assigned to any place of
business for the tax period and the employee performs fifty percent or
more of his or her service for the tax period in the city; or
(iii) The individual is not primarily assigned to any place of
business for the tax period, the individual does not perform fifty
percent or more of his or her service in any city and the employee
resides in the city.
(b) The service income factor is a fraction, the numerator of which
is the total service income of the taxpayer in the city during the tax
period, and the denominator of which is the total service income of the
taxpayer everywhere during the tax period. Service income is in the
city if:
(i) The customer location is in the city; or
(ii) The income-producing activity is performed in more than one
location and a greater proportion of the service-income-producing
activity is performed in the city than in any other location, based on
costs of performance, and the taxpayer is not taxable at the customer
location; or
(iii) The service-income-producing activity is performed within the
city, and the taxpayer is not taxable in the customer location.
(c) If the allocation and apportionment provisions of this
subsection do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's
business activity in the city or cities in which the taxpayer does
business, the taxpayer may petition for or the tax administrators may
jointly require, in respect to all or any part of the taxpayer's
business activity, that one of the following methods be used jointly by
the cities to allocate or apportion gross income, if reasonable:
(i) Separate accounting;
(ii) The use of a single factor;
(iii) The inclusion of one or more additional factors that will
fairly represent the taxpayer's business activity in the city; or
(iv) The employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable
allocation and apportionment of the taxpayer's income.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Apportionable income" means the gross income of the business
taxable under the service classifications of a city's gross receipts
tax, including income received from activities outside the city if the
income would be taxable under the service classification if received
from activities within the city, less any exemptions or deductions
available.
(b) "Compensation" means wages, salaries, commissions, and any
other form of remuneration paid to individuals for personal services
that are or would be included in the individual's gross income under
the federal internal revenue code.
(c) "Individual" means any individual who, under the usual common
law rules applicable in determining the employer-employee relationship,
has the status of an employee of that taxpayer.
(d) "Customer location" means the city or unincorporated area of a
county where the majority of the contacts between the taxpayer and the
customer take place.
(e) "Primarily assigned" means the business location of the
taxpayer where the individual performs his or her duties.
(f) "Service-taxable income" or "service income" means gross income
of the business subject to tax under either the service or royalty
classification.
(g) "Tax period" means the calendar year during which tax liability
is accrued. If taxes are reported by a taxpayer on a basis more
frequent than once per year, taxpayers shall calculate the factors for
the previous calendar year for reporting in the current calendar year
and correct the reporting for the previous year when the factors are
calculated for that year, but not later than the end of the first
quarter of the following year.
(h) "Taxable in the customer location" means either that a taxpayer
is subject to a gross receipts tax in the customer location for the
privilege of doing business, or that the government where the customer
is located has the authority to subject the taxpayer to gross receipts
tax regardless of whether, in fact, the government does so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 MUNICIPAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX--IMPLEMENTATION BY CITIES--CONTINGENT AUTHORITY. Cities imposing
business and occupation taxes must comply with all requirements of
sections 2 through 13 of this act by December 31, 2004. A city that
has not complied with the requirements of sections 2 through 13 of this
act by December 31, 2004, may not impose a tax that is imposed by a
city on the privilege of engaging in business activities. Cities
imposing business and occupation taxes after December 31, 2004, must
comply with sections 2 through 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 STUDY OF POTENTIAL NET FISCAL IMPACTS. (1)
The department of revenue shall conduct a study of the net fiscal
impacts of this act, with particular emphasis on the revenue impacts of
the apportionment and allocation method contained in section 13 of this
act and any revenue impact resulting from the increased uniformity and
consistency provided through the model ordinance. In conducting the
study, the department shall use, and regularly consult with, a
committee composed of an equal representation from interested business
representatives and from a representative sampling of cities imposing
business and occupation taxes. The department shall report the final
results of the study to the governor and the fiscal committees of the
legislature by January 1, 2006. In addition, the department shall
provide progress reports to the governor and the fiscal committees of
the legislature on January 1, 2004, and January 1, 2005. As part of
its report, the department shall suggest alternatives for addressing
any adverse revenue impacts to local jurisdictions.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "net fiscal impacts" means
accounting for the potential of both positive and negative fiscal
impacts on local jurisdictions that may result from this act.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature through this study to
provide accurate fiscal impact analysis and recommended options to
alleviate revenue impacts from this act so as to allow local
jurisdictions to anticipate and appropriately address any potential
adverse revenue impacts from this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 BASELINE STUDY. The department of revenue
shall report by December 31, 2004, to the governor and the fiscal
committees of the legislature on the definitions used in the proposed
model ordinance. The report shall detail the status of the definitions
using the baseline standards under section 4(2)(g) of this act, noting
any deviations from the definitions in chapter 82.04 RCW and the reason
for such deviation. The report shall also estimate the fiscal impact
on taxpayers of any deviations from the definitions under chapter 82.04
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are
not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 2 through 14 of this act are each
added to chapter 35.21 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 13 of this act
takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---