BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.16.010 and 1993 c 281 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section,
all state officers and employees shall be paid for services rendered
from the first day of the month through the fifteenth day of the month
and for services rendered from the sixteenth day of the month through
the last calendar day of the month. Paydates for these two pay periods
shall be established by the director of financial management through
the administrative hearing process and the official paydates shall be
established six months prior to the beginning of each subsequent
calendar year. Under no circumstance shall the paydate be established
more than ten days after the pay period in which the wages are earned
except when the designated paydate falls on Sunday, in which case the
paydate shall not be later than the following Monday. Payment shall be
deemed to have been made by the established paydates if: (a) The
salary warrant is available at the geographic work location at which
the warrant is normally available to the employee; or (b) the salary
has been electronically transferred into the employee's account at the
employee's designated financial institution; or (c) the salary warrants
are mailed at least two days before the established paydate for those
employees engaged in work in remote or varying locations from the
geographic location at which the payroll is prepared, provided that the
employee has requested payment by mail.
The office of financial management shall develop the necessary
policies and operating procedures to assure that all remuneration for
services rendered including basic salary, shift differential, standby
pay, overtime, penalty pay, salary due based on contractual agreements,
and special pay provisions, as provided for by law, Washington
personnel resources board rules, agency policy or rule, or contract,
shall be available to the employee on the designated paydate.
Overtime, penalty pay, and special pay provisions may be paid by the
next following paydate if the postponement of payment is attributable
to: The employee's not making a timely or accurate report of the facts
which are the basis for the payment, or the employer's lack of
reasonable opportunity to verify the claim.
Compensable benefits payable because of separation from state
service shall be paid with the earnings for the final period worked
unless the employee separating has not provided the agency with the
proper notification of intent to terminate.
One-half of the employee's basic monthly salary shall be paid in
each pay period. Employees paid on an hourly basis or employees who
work less than a full pay period shall be paid for actual salary
earned.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply in instances
where it would conflict with contractual rights or, with the approval
of the office of financial management, to short-term, intermittent,
noncareer state employees, to student employees of institutions of
higher education, and to liquor control agency managers who are paid a
percentage of monthly liquor sales.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
beginning with the second contiguous term of employment, excluding
summer term, part-time faculty members at community and technical
colleges and four-year institutions must be paid on the same schedule
as full-time faculty, except when the first paydate for a given term
occurs prior to the commencement of a part-time faculty member's duties
for that term.

--- END ---