BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.0357 and 2002 c 324 s 3 and 2002 c 175 s 20 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

JUVENILE
DISPOSITION
OFFENSE
CATEGORY DESCRIPTION (RCW CITATION) JUVENILE DISPOSITION
CATEGORY FOR
ATTEMPT, BAILJUMP,
CONSPIRACY, OR
SOLICITATION

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (<$50 is E class)
(9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)
B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary (9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol
(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug
(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug
with Intent to Sell (69.41.030) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug (69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Narcotic,
Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale
(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40 grams
(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled
Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit
(69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Narcotic,
Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam
Counterfeit Substances (69.50.401(b)(1) (i)
or (ii)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit
Substances (69.50.401(b)(1) (iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled
Substance (69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled
Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled
Substance (69.50.401(c))
C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm (9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18)
(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon
(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use of
Weapon (9.41.270)
E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)
D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)
C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon (9A.84.010) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure (Victim <14)
(9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over)
(9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)(a)) D

D Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(2)(b)) E

D Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (9.35.010) E

B Possession of Stolen Property 1
(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2
(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3
(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
1 and 2 (9A.56.070 (1) and (2))
D

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License (46.20.005) E

B+ Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502 and 46.61.504)
E

Other

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls
(9.61.230) E

A Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
A Felony B+

B Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
B Felony C

C Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
C Felony D

D Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation of Order of Restitution,
Community Supervision, or Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses
and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks
confinement
2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks
confinement
3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month
period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order,
it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may
select sentencing option A, B, ((or)) C, or D.

OPTION A
JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID
STANDARD RANGE

A+
180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

EXCEPT

30-40

WEEKS FOR

15-17

YEAR OLDS

Current B+ 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

Offense WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL 52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) 15-36 WEEKS WEEKS

C+ LS

15-36 WEEKS

C LS 15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions:

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Restitution

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4
or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of
confinement.
(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category.
The current offense category is determined by the offense of
adjudication.
(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior
adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior
felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation,
misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4
point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.
(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined
by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications
and the row defined by the current offense category.
(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense.
(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an
offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall
not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B SUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition
involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the
standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the
offender comply with one or more local sanctions.
(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition,
the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke
the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.
(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option
under this section if the offender is:
(a) Adjudicated of an A+ offense;
(b) Fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or
more of the following offenses:
(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation
to commit a class A offense;
(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060); or
(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in
the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW
9A.40.030), robbery in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.210), residential
burglary (RCW 9A.52.025), burglary in the second degree (RCW
9A.52.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW
46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), intimidating a
witness (RCW 9A.72.110), violation of the uniform controlled substances
act (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW
9A.32.070), when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon
another or when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the
offense the respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;
(c) Ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under
RCW 13.40.193; or
(d) Adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

OR

OPTION C CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not
committed an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition
under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION ((C)) D MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A ((or)), B, or
C would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

Sec. 2 RCW 13.40.160 and 2002 c 175 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The standard range disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an
offense is determined according to RCW 13.40.0357.
(a) When the court sentences an offender to a local sanction as
provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option A, the court shall impose a
determinate disposition within the standard ranges, except as provided
in subsections (2), (3), ((and)) (4), (5), and (6) of this section.
The disposition may be comprised of one or more local sanctions.
(b) When the court sentences an offender to a standard range as
provided in RCW 13.40.0357 option A that includes a term of confinement
exceeding thirty days, commitment shall be to the department for the
standard range of confinement, except as provided in subsections (2),
(3), ((and)) (4), (5), and (6) of this section.
(2) If the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion,
that disposition within the standard range would effectuate a manifest
injustice the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard
range, as indicated in option ((C)) D of RCW 13.40.0357. The court's
finding of manifest injustice shall be supported by clear and
convincing evidence.
A disposition outside the standard range shall be determinate and
shall be comprised of confinement or community supervision, or a
combination thereof. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and
imposes a sentence of confinement exceeding thirty days, the court
shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term, and the provisions of
RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A disposition
outside the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the
state or the respondent. A disposition within the standard range is
not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.
(3) When a juvenile offender is found to have committed a sex
offense, other than a sex offense that is also a serious violent
offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, and has no history of a prior sex
offense, the court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the
respondent, may order an examination to determine whether the
respondent is amenable to treatment.
The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the
following: The respondent's version of the facts and the official
version of the facts, the respondent's offense history, an assessment
of problems in addition to alleged deviant behaviors, the respondent's
social, educational, and employment situation, and other evaluation
measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
evaluator's information.
The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's
amenability to treatment and relative risk to the community. A
proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a
minimum:
(a)(i) Frequency and type of contact between the offender and
therapist;
(ii) Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and
description of planned treatment modalities;
(iii) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living
conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members,
legal guardians, or others;
(iv) Anticipated length of treatment; and
(v) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.
The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state
shall order, a second examination regarding the offender's amenability
to treatment. The evaluator shall be selected by the party making the
motion. The defendant shall pay the cost of any second examination
ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent in which
case the state shall pay the cost.
After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then
consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from use
of this special sex offender disposition alternative and consider the
victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment
disposition under this section. If the court determines that this
special sex offender disposition alternative is appropriate, then the
court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard range
for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its
conclusions, that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice,
the court shall impose a disposition under option ((C)) D, and the
court may suspend the execution of the disposition and place the
offender on community supervision for at least two years. As a
condition of the suspended disposition, the court may impose the
conditions of community supervision and other conditions, including up
to thirty days of confinement and requirements that the offender do any
one or more of the following:
(b)(i) Devote time to a specific education, employment, or
occupation;
(ii) Undergo available outpatient sex offender treatment for up to
two years, or inpatient sex offender treatment not to exceed the
standard range of confinement for that offense. A community mental
health center may not be used for such treatment unless it has an
appropriate program designed for sex offender treatment. The
respondent shall not change sex offender treatment providers or
treatment conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the
probation counselor, and the court, and shall not change providers
without court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or probation
counselor object to the change;
(iii) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify
the court or the probation counselor prior to any change in the
offender's address, educational program, or employment;
(iv) Report to the prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to
any change in a sex offender treatment provider. This change shall
have prior approval by the court;
(v) Report as directed to the court and a probation counselor;
(vi) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations, perform
community restitution, or any combination thereof;
(vii) Make restitution to the victim for the cost of any counseling
reasonably related to the offense;
(viii) Comply with the conditions of any court-ordered probation
bond; or
(ix) The court shall order that the offender may not attend the
public or approved private elementary, middle, or high school attended
by the victim or the victim's siblings. The parents or legal guardians
of the offender are responsible for transportation or other costs
associated with the offender's change of school that would otherwise be
paid by the school district. The court shall send notice of the
disposition and restriction on attending the same school as the victim
or victim's siblings to the public or approved private school the
juvenile will attend, if known, or if unknown, to the approved private
schools and the public school district board of directors of the
district in which the juvenile resides or intends to reside. This
notice must be sent at the earliest possible date but not later than
ten calendar days after entry of the disposition.
The sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports
on the respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties.
The reports shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum
the following: Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with
requirements, treatment activities, the respondent's relative progress
in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at the time
of the disposition.
At the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review
hearings as the court considers appropriate.
Except as provided in this subsection (3), after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall
only be conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the
department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW. A sex offender
therapist who examines or treats a juvenile sex offender pursuant to
this subsection does not have to be certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that: (A) The
offender has already moved to another state or plans to move to another
state for reasons other than circumventing the certification
requirements; (B) no certified providers are available for treatment
within a reasonable geographical distance of the offender's home; and
(C) the evaluation and treatment plan comply with this subsection (3)
and the rules adopted by the department of health.
If the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the
court finds that the respondent is failing to make satisfactory
progress in treatment, the court may revoke the suspension and order
execution of the disposition or the court may impose a penalty of up to
thirty days' confinement for violating conditions of the disposition.
The court may order both execution of the disposition and up to thirty
days' confinement for the violation of the conditions of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time
previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the
suspension is being revoked.
For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has
sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to
person or property as a direct result of the crime charged. "Victim"
may also include a known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor
child unless the parent or guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.
A disposition entered under this subsection (3) is not appealable
under RCW 13.40.230.
(4) If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range
disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has
not committed an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose the disposition
alternative under RCW 13.40.165.
(5) If a juvenile is subject to a commitment of 15 to 65 weeks of
confinement, the court may impose the disposition alternative under
section 3 of this act.
(6) When the offender is subject to a standard range commitment of
15 to 36 weeks and is ineligible for a suspended disposition
alternative, a manifest injustice disposition below the standard range,
special sex offender disposition alternative, chemical dependency
disposition alternative, or mental health disposition alternative, the
court may impose the disposition alternative under section 4 of this
act.
(7) RCW 13.40.193 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile
adjudicated of possessing a firearm in violation of RCW
9.41.040(1)(b)(iii) or any crime in which a special finding is entered
that the juvenile was armed with a firearm.
(((6))) (8) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for
time spent in detention prior to a dispositional order, the
dispositional order shall specifically state the number of days of
credit for time served.
(((7))) (9) Except as provided under subsection (3) ((or)), (4),
(5), or (6) of this section or RCW 13.40.127, the court shall not
suspend or defer the imposition or the execution of the disposition.
(((8))) (10) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by
the court at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be
subjected for the same offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When an offender is subject to a standard range commitment of
15 to 65 weeks, the court may:
(a) Impose the standard range; or
(b) Suspend the standard range disposition on condition that the
offender complies with the terms of this mental health disposition
alternative.
(2) The court may impose this disposition alternative when the
court finds the following:
(a) The offender has a current diagnosis, consistent with the
American psychiatry association diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, of axis I psychiatric disorder, excluding youth that
are diagnosed as solely having a conduct disorder, oppositional defiant
disorder, substance abuse disorder, paraphilia, or pedophilia;
(b) An appropriate treatment option is available in the local
community;
(c) The plan for the offender identifies and addresses requirements
for successful participation and completion of the treatment
intervention program including: Incentives and graduated sanctions
designed specifically for amenable youth, including the use of
detention, detoxication, and in-patient or outpatient substance abuse
treatment and psychiatric hospitalization, and structured community
support consisting of mental health providers, probation, educational
and vocational advocates, child welfare services, and family and
community support. For any mental health treatment ordered for an
offender under this section, the treatment option selected shall be
chosen from among programs which have been successful in addressing
mental health needs of juveniles and successful in mental health
treatment of juveniles. A list of programs which meet these criteria
shall be agreed upon by: The Washington association of juvenile court
administrators, the juvenile rehabilitation administration of the
department of social and health services, a representative of the
division of public behavioral health and justice policy at the
University of Washington, and the Washington institute for public
policy. The list of programs shall be created not later than July 1,
2003. The group shall provide the list to all superior courts, its own
membership, the legislature, and the governor. The group shall meet
annually and revise the list as appropriate; and
(d) The offender, offender's family, and community will benefit
from use of the mental health disposition alternative.
(3) The court on its own motion may order, or on motion by either
party, shall order a comprehensive mental health evaluation to
determine if the offender has a designated mental disorder. The court
may also order a chemical dependency evaluation to determine if the
offender also has a co-occurring chemical dependency disorder. The
evaluation shall include at a minimum the following: The offender's
version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
offender's offense, an assessment of the offender's mental health and
drug-alcohol problems and previous treatment attempts, and the
offender's social, criminal, educational, and employment history and
living situation.
(4) The evaluator shall determine if the offender is amenable to
research-based treatment. A proposed case management and treatment
plan shall include at a minimum:
(a) The availability of treatment;
(b) Anticipated length of treatment;
(c) Whether one or more treatment interventions are proposed and
the anticipated sequence of those treatment interventions;
(d) The education plan;
(e) The residential plan; and
(f) The monitoring plan.
(5) The court on its own motion may order, or on motion by either
party, shall order a second mental health or chemical dependency
evaluation. The party making the motion shall select the evaluator.
The requesting party shall pay the cost of any examination ordered
under this subsection and subsection (3) of this section unless the
court finds the offender is indigent and no third party insurance
coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(6) Upon receipt of the assessments, evaluations, and reports the
court shall consider whether the offender and the community will
benefit from use of the mental health disposition alternative. The
court shall consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive the option.
(7) If the court determines that the mental health disposition
alternative is appropriate, the court shall impose a standard range
disposition of not more than 65 weeks, suspend execution of the
disposition, and place the offender on community supervision up to one
year and impose one or more other local sanctions. Confinement in a
secure county detention facility, other than county group homes,
inpatient psychiatric treatment facilities, and substance abuse
programs, shall be limited to thirty days. As a condition of a
suspended disposition, the court shall require the offender to
participate in the recommended treatment interventions.
(8) The treatment providers shall submit monthly reports to the
court and parties on the offender's progress in treatment. The report
shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the
following: Dates of attendance, offender's compliance with
requirements, treatment activities, medication management, the
offender's relative progress in treatment, and any other material
specified by the court at the time of the disposition.
(9) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition,
the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke
the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.
(10) An offender is ineligible for the mental health disposition
option under this section if the offender is adjudicated of a sex or
violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the offender is subject to a standard range commitment of
15 to 36 weeks and is ineligible for a suspended disposition
alternative, a manifest injustice disposition below the standard range,
special sex offender disposition alternative, chemical dependency
disposition alternative, or mental health disposition alternative, the
court may impose a community commitment disposition alternative and:
(a) Retain juvenile court jurisdiction over the youth;
(b) Confine the youth in a county detention facility:
(i) For the standard range; or
(ii) After finding a manifest injustice, a determinate disposition
up to 52 weeks; and
(c) Impose a term of postrelease community supervision for up to
one year.
If the youth receives a standard range disposition, the court shall
set the release date within the standard range. The court shall
determine the release date prior to expiration of sixty percent of the
juvenile's minimum term of confinement.
(2) The court may impose this community commitment disposition
alternative if the court finds the following:
(a) Placement in a local detention facility in close proximity to
the youth's family or local support systems will facilitate a smoother
reintegration to the youth's family and community;
(b) Placement in the local detention facility will allow the youth
to benefit from locally provided family intervention programs and other
research-based treatment programs, school, employment, and drug and
alcohol or mental health counseling; or
(c) Confinement in a facility operated by the department would
result in a negative disruption to local services, school, or
employment or impede or delay developing those services and support
systems in the community.
(3) The court shall consider the youth's offense, prior criminal
history, security classification, risk level, and treatment needs and
history when determining whether the youth is appropriate for the
community commitment disposition alternative. If the court finds that
a community commitment disposition alternative is appropriate, the
court shall order the youth into secure detention while the details of
the reintegration program are developed.
(4) Upon approval of the treatment and community reintegration
plan, the court may order the youth to serve the term of confinement in
one or more of the following placements or combination of placements:
Secure detention, an alternative to secure detention such as electronic
home monitoring, county group care, day or evening reporting, or home
detention. The court may order the youth to serve time in detention on
weekends or intermittently. The court shall set periodic reviews to
review the youth's progress in the program. At least fifty percent of
the term of confinement shall be served in secure detention.
(5) If the youth violates the conditions of the community
commitment program, the court may impose sanctions under RCW 13.40.200
or modify the terms of the reintegration plan and order the youth to
serve all or a portion of the remaining confinement term in secure
detention.
(6) A county may enter into interlocal agreements with other
counties to develop joint community commitment programs or to allow one
county to send a youth appropriate for this alternative to another
county that has a community commitment program.
(7) Implementation of this alternative is subject to available
state funding for the costs of the community commitment program,
including costs of detention and community supervision.

Sec. 5 RCW 13.40.165 and 2002 c 175 s 23 and 2002 c 42 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of this disposition alternative is to ensure that
successful treatment options to reduce recidivism are available to
eligible youth, pursuant to RCW 70.96A.520. The court must consider
eligibility for the chemical dependency disposition alternative when a
juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A-or B+ offense, other than a first time B+ offense under chapter 69.50
RCW. The court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the
respondent if the evidence shows that the offender may be chemically
dependent or substance abusing, may order an examination by a chemical
dependency counselor from a chemical dependency treatment facility
approved under chapter 70.96A RCW to determine if the youth is
chemically dependent or substance abusing. The offender shall pay the
cost of any examination ordered under this subsection unless the court
finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance
coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(2) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the
following: The respondent's version of the facts and the official
version of the facts, the respondent's offense history, an assessment
of drug-alcohol problems and previous treatment attempts, the
respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of
the examiner's information.
(3) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's
relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be
provided and shall include, at a minimum:
(a) Whether inpatient and/or outpatient treatment is recommended;
(b) Availability of appropriate treatment;
(c) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living
conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members,
legal guardians, or others;
(d) Anticipated length of treatment; and
(e) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.
(4) The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the
state or the respondent shall order, a second examination. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The
requesting party shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under
this subsection unless the requesting party is the offender and the
court finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance
coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(5)(a) After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall
then consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from
use of this chemical dependency disposition alternative and consider
the victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment
disposition under this section.
(b) If the court determines that this chemical dependency
disposition alternative is appropriate, then the court shall impose the
standard range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters
reasons for its conclusion, that such disposition would effectuate a
manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition above the
standard range as indicated in option ((C)) D of RCW 13.40.0357 if the
disposition is an increase from the standard range and the confinement
of the offender does not exceed a maximum of fifty-two weeks, suspend
execution of the disposition, and place the offender on community
supervision for up to one year. As a condition of the suspended
disposition, the court shall require the offender to undergo available
outpatient drug/alcohol treatment and/or inpatient drug/alcohol
treatment. For purposes of this section, inpatient treatment may not
exceed ninety days. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the
court may impose conditions of community supervision and other
sanctions, including up to thirty days of confinement, one hundred
fifty hours of community restitution, and payment of legal financial
obligations and restitution.
(6) The drug/alcohol treatment provider shall submit monthly
reports on the respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the
parties. The reports shall reference the treatment plan and include at
a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance
with requirements, treatment activities, the respondent's relative
progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at
the time of the disposition.
At the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review
hearings as the court considers appropriate.
If the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the
court finds that the respondent is failing to make satisfactory
progress in treatment, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW
13.40.200 or revoke the suspension and order execution of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time
previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the
suspension is being revoked.
(7) For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has
sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to
person or property as a direct result of the offense charged.
(8) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time
spent in detention prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional
order shall specifically state the number of days of credit for time
served.
(9) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court
at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the
same offense.
(10) A disposition under this section is not appealable under RCW
13.40.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Because model adherence and competent
delivery of research-based intervention programs is critical for
reducing recidivism, the Washington state institute for public policy
shall develop adherence and outcome standards for measuring
effectiveness of treatment programs referred to in this act. The
standards shall be developed and presented to the governor and
legislature no later than January 1, 2004. The standards shall include
methods for measuring competent delivery of interventions as well as
success factors following treatment. The standards shall include, but
not be limited to hiring, training and retaining qualified providers,
managing and overseeing the delivery of treatment services, and
developing quality assurance measures. The department shall utilize
these standards to assess program effectiveness. The courts shall also
utilize these standards in determining their continued use of these
alternatives. The courts shall not continue to use programs that do
not comply with these standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A task force is created for the purpose
of examining the coordination of information, education services, and
matters of public safety when juvenile offenders are placed into public
schools, following their conviction.
(2) The task force shall be chaired by the superintendent of public
instruction and include a representative from the juvenile
rehabilitation
administration of the department of social and health
services, the state board of education, associations which represent
school teachers, administrators, and school boards, superior court
judges, the Washington association of juvenile court administrators,
prosecuting attorneys, the governor, attorneys whose practice includes
criminal defense work for juvenile defendants, three groups whose
primary purpose is the delivery of services to families and children,
and law enforcement. The three groups who deliver services shall be
selected by the superintendent of public instruction.
(3) The task force shall identify specific policies and statutory,
administrative, and practice processes and barriers that may operate to
impede: (a) The identification and delivery of appropriate and
coordinated services to juvenile offenders who are placed in, or
returned to public schools following conviction of an offense; and (b)
transmittal of information regarding juvenile offenders who are
returned to, or placed in, public schools following conviction of an
offense. The task force shall recommend specific statutory and
administrative changes as it finds appropriate to eliminate or reduce
the barriers identified as a result of this subsection (3).
(4) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor, the legislature, and the agencies represented on the task
force not later than December 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 6 and 7 of this act expire December
31, 2003.

--- END ---