BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that prescription
drugs are an effective and important part of efforts to maintain and
improve the health of Washington state residents. However, their
increased cost and utilization is straining the resources of many
people, particularly low-income elderly people who lack insurance
coverage for such drugs. Furthermore, inappropriate use of
prescription drugs can result in unnecessary expenditures and lead to
serious health consequences. It is therefore the intent of the
legislature to develop programs to provide prescription drugs at an
affordable price to those in need, and increase public awareness
regarding their safe and cost-effective use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington institute for public policy shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2003, on the
projected five-year costs, benefits, enrollment levels, and
implications for other state-funded medicaid services of a medicaid
waiver program that would provide prescription drug benefits to persons
aged sixty-five and older who would not otherwise be eligible for
medicaid. The department shall actively cooperate and assist the
institute in preparation of this report.
(2) The report shall assess at least three alternative benefit
designs, involving differing enrollee premium levels, point-of-service
cost-sharing arrangements, and deductible levels.
(3) For each alternative benefit design, the institute shall
provide five-year estimates of the number of state residents who would
be eligible for the program, the number who would seek coverage, and
the projected cost of covering all applicants if eligibility for the
program were limited to legal residents aged sixty-five and older with
incomes at or below: (a) One hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level; and (b) two hundred percent of the federal poverty level
as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services.
(4) For each alternative benefit design and income eligibility
level, the institute shall estimate the type and amount of medicaid
expenditures on behalf of senior citizens that would need to be avoided
as a result of the medicaid waiver program in order to meet federal
budget neutrality requirements; the likelihood of avoiding such
expenditures; and an assessment of the impacts upon the state budget
and upon enrollment in the medicaid waiver program if the cost
avoidance needed to meet federal budget neutrality requirements is not
achieved.
(5) The report shall include suggestions about how the medicaid
waiver drug benefit should be designed to promote coordination with,
and avoid duplication of, drug benefits that may be made available
under the federal medicare program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The health care authority shall implement a program whereby it
negotiates with prescription drug manufacturers for price discounts,
comparable to those preferred prices it negotiates for its own
purchases, to be available to any Washington resident:
(a) Whose family income does not exceed two hundred fifty percent
of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services;
(b) Who does not otherwise have insurance that provides
prescription drug coverage; and
(c) Who is: (i) At least fifty years old; or (ii) between the ages
of nineteen and forty-nine and is otherwise eligible for benefits under
Title II of the social security act, federal old age, survivors, and
disability insurance benefits.
(2) The administrator shall charge participants in this program an
annual enrollment fee sufficient to offset the cost of program
administration.
(3) The price discounts available pursuant to this section shall
not be at the expense of retail pharmacies.
(4) This program will be terminated within twelve months after
implementation of a prescription drug benefit under Title XVIII of the
social security act, or by June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The consolidated prescription drug purchasing account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts under section 3(2) of
this act from the fees from the price discount program created in
section 3 of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the purposes of section 3 of this
act. Only the administrator or the administrator's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrator shall establish and advertise a pharmacy
connection program through which health care providers and members of
the public can obtain information about manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance programs. The administrator shall ensure
that the program has staff available who can assist persons in
procuring free or discounted medications from manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance programs by:
(a) Determining whether an assistance program is offered for the
needed drug or drugs;
(b) Evaluating the likelihood of a person obtaining drugs from an
assistance program under the guidelines formulated;
(c) Assisting persons with the application and enrollment in an
assistance program;
(d) Coordinating and assisting physicians and others authorized to
prescribe medications with communications, including applications, made
on behalf of a person to a participating manufacturer to obtain
approval of the person in an assistance program; and
(e) Working with participating manufacturers to simplify the system
whereby eligible persons access drug assistance programs, including
development of a single application form and uniform enrollment
process.
(2) Notice regarding the pharmacy connection program shall
initially target senior citizens, but the program shall be available to
anyone, and shall include a toll-free telephone number, available
during regular business hours, that may be used to obtain information.
(3) The administrator may apply for and accept grants or gifts and
may enter into interagency agreements or contracts with other state
agencies or private organizations to assist with the implementation of
this program including, but not limited to, contracts, gifts, or grants
from pharmaceutical manufacturers to assist with the direct costs of
the program.
(4) The administrator shall notify pharmaceutical companies doing
business in Washington of the pharmacy connection program. Any
pharmaceutical company that does business in this state and that offers
a pharmaceutical assistance program shall notify the administrator of
the existence of the program, the drugs covered by the program, and all
information necessary to apply for assistance under the program.
(5) For purposes of this section, "manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance program" means a program offered by a
pharmaceutical company through which the company provides a drug or
drugs to eligible persons at no charge or at a reduced cost. The term
does not include the provision of a drug as part of a clinical trial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Each of the state's area agencies on aging shall implement a
program intended to inform and train persons sixty-five years and older
in the safe and appropriate use of prescription and nonprescription
medications. To further this purpose, the department shall award a
development grant of up to twenty-five thousand dollars to each of the
agencies upon a showing that:
(1) The agency has the ability to effectively administer such a
program, including an understanding of the relevant issues and
appropriate outreach and follow-up;
(2) The agency can bring resources to the program in addition to
those funded by the grant; and
(3) The program will be a collaborative effort between the agency
and other health care providers and programs in the location to be
served, including doctors, pharmacists, and long-term care providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The authority may adopt rules to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 By January 1, 2005, the administrator of the
health care authority and the director of the department of social and
health services shall submit to the governor and the legislature a
progress report regarding the implementation of the programs created in
this act.

--- END ---