BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.36.010 and 1998 c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The director shall supervise the prevention of the spread and
the suppression of infectious, contagious, communicable, and dangerous
diseases affecting animals within, in transit through, and imported
into the state.
(2) The director may issue a quarantine order and enforce the
quarantine of any animal or its reproductive products ((that is)) when
any animal or its reproductive products are affected with or ((has))
have been exposed to disease or when there is reasonable cause to
investigate whether any animal or its reproductive products are
affected with or have been exposed to disease, either within or outside
the state. Overt disease or exposure to disease in any animal or its
reproductive products need not be immediately obvious for a quarantine
order to be issued or enforced. The quarantine shall remain in effect
as long as the director deems necessary.
(3) The director may issue a hold order when:
(a) Overt disease or exposure to disease in an animal is not
immediately obvious but there is reasonable cause to investigate
whether an animal is diseased or has been exposed to disease;
(b) Import health papers, permits, or other transportation
documents required by law or rule are not complete or are suspected to
be fraudulent; or
(c) Further transport of an animal would jeopardize the well-being
of the animal or other animals in Washington state.
A hold order is in effect for seven days and expires at midnight on
the seventh day from the date of the hold order. A hold order may be
replaced with a quarantine order for the purpose of animal disease
control.
(4) Any animal or animal reproductive product placed under a
quarantine or hold order shall be kept separate and apart from other
animals designated in the instructions of the quarantine or hold order,
and shall not be allowed to have anything in common with other animals.
(5) The expenses of handling and caring for any animal or animal
reproductive product placed under a quarantine or hold order are the
responsibility of the owner.
(6) The director has authority over the quarantine or hold area
until the quarantine or hold order is released or the hold order
expires.
(7) Any animal or animal reproductive product placed under a
quarantine or hold order may not be moved, transported, or sold without
written approval from the director or until the quarantine or hold
order is released, or the hold order expires.
(8) The director may administer oaths and examine witnesses and
records in the performance of his or her duties to control diseases
affecting animals.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.36.060 and 1998 c 8 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The director has the authority to enter the animal premises of
any animal owner at any reasonable time to ((make tests on or
examinations of any animals)) conduct tests, examinations, or
inspections for disease conditions when there is reasonable ((evidence
that)) cause to investigate whether animals on the premises or that
have been on the premises are infected with or have been exposed to a
reportable disease. It is unlawful for any person to interfere with
the tests, inspections, or examinations, or to alter any segregation or
identification systems made in connection with the tests, inspections,
or examinations. Where disease or contamination is suspected, the
director may seize those items necessary to conduct the tests,
inspections, or examinations.
(2) If the director is denied access to the animal premises or the
animals for purposes of conducting tests, inspections, or examinations
or the animal owner fails to comply with an order of the director, the
director may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for an
administrative search warrant. The warrant may authorize access to any
animal or animal premises for purposes of conducting tests,
inspections, or examinations of any animal or animal premises, or
taking samples, and may authorize seizure or destruction of property.
The warrant shall be issued upon probable cause. It is sufficient
probable cause to show a potential threat to the agricultural interests
of this state or a potential threat which seriously endangers animals,
human health, the environment, or public welfare. To show that access
is denied, the director shall file with the court an affidavit or
declaration containing a description of all attempts to notify and
locate the owner or the owner's agent and to secure consent.

Sec. 3 RCW 16.36.090 and 1998 c 8 s 9 are each amended to read as
follows:
When public welfare demands, the director may order the slaughter
or destruction of any animal affected with or exposed to any
contagious, infectious, or communicable disease that is affecting or
may affect the health of the state's animal population. The director
may order destruction of any animal held under quarantine when public
welfare demands or the owner of the animal fails or refuses to follow
a herd or flock plan. The director shall give a written order
directing an animal be destroyed by or under the direction of the state
veterinarian.

Sec. 4 RCW 16.36.098 and 1998 c 8 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person whose animal or animal reproductive products are placed
under a quarantine, a hold order, or destruct order under RCW 16.36.090
may request a hearing. The request for a hearing must be in writing
and filed with the director. Any hearing will be held in conformance
with RCW 34.05.422 and 34.05.479.

--- END ---