BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) All school districts with a student enrollment of less than
three thousand students are exempt from all state statutes and rules
applicable to school districts and school district boards of directors
except as provided in this section.
(2) All such school districts may elect to comply with one or more
provisions of the statutes or rules that are applicable to school
districts and school district board of directors.
(3) All such school districts shall:
(a) Comply with state and federal health, safety, and civil rights
laws applicable to school districts;
(b) Participate in nationally normed standardized achievement tests
as required in RCW 28A.230.190, 28A.230.193, and 28A.230.230 and the
elementary, middle school, and high school standards and assessment
examinations as required in RCW 28A.655.060;
(c) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW
28A.410.010, but may hire noncertificated instructional staff of
unusual competence and in exceptional cases as specified in RCW
28A.150.260;
(d) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW
28A.400.303;
(e) Be subject to the same financial and audit requirements as
other school districts;
(f) Comply with the annual performance report under RCW
28A.655.110;
(g) Follow the performance improvement goals and requirements
adopted by the academic achievement and accountability commission by
rule under RCW 28A.655.030;
(h) Report at least annually to parents of children enrolled in the
district on progress toward the student performance goals specified in
(g) of this subsection; and
(i) Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW;
and
(j) Comply with chapters 41.56, 41.58, and 41.59 RCW.

--- END ---