BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the merits of a
1998 United States secretary of transportation determination that the
many existing elements of the region's marine transportation system
comprise a safe system. The legislature finds that systemwide risk
reductions are the most cost-effective means to improve this already
excellent system. Although this region enjoys the lowest commercial
vessel oil spill rate in the country, there are risks due to weather
and other conditions that can be further mitigated in a cost-effective
manner. Furthermore, an undue and cost-prohibitive regulatory burden
on a key jobs-producing sector of the state economy is not the desire
of the legislature. The legislature therefore finds reason to augment
significant improvements brought about by the international maritime
organization, the oil pollution act of 1990, and United States coast
guard and industry safety initiatives to further protect Washington
waters through the establishment of a targeted systemwide tug safety
net plan. The legislature finds cost-effective protection for all
state waters to be superior to a single tug, single location approach.
The plan should include the following principles:
(1) The plan should be systemwide and targeted to augment the
existing safety net during high risk events throughout all of
Washington's shorelines where commercial vessels transit including the
Columbia river and Strait of Juan de Fuca and approaches, Port Angeles,
San Juan Islands, Anacortes, Admiralty Inlet, Seattle, Tacoma, and all
of Puget Sound;
(2) The major benefit of tug use in this plan would be to mitigate
pollution threats caused by drift groundings of disabled vessels or
vessels at anchor. The legislature recognizes that tugs do little to
mitigate collision or power grounding risks caused by navigational
errors;
(3) A systemwide approach best leverages limited public funds to
mitigate substantial threats of an oil spill due to disabled commercial
vessels thereby providing benefit to all Washington waters used by
commercial vessels;
(4) The plan should require collaboration with the maritime
community and United States coast guard to facilitate cost-effective
use of our resources to further mitigate substantial threats of an oil
spill thereby increasing protection of waters and quality of life while
ensuring a strong maritime and state economy;
(5) The plan should be based on risk reduction principles that
fully consider and document such information as the lessons learned
from all past incidents of disabled commercial vessels in Washington
waters that led to the release of oil;
(6) The plan should include provisions to fully leverage the oil
pollution act of 1990 funding opportunities to mitigate substantial
threats of an oil spill due to disabled vessels' concerns;
(7) The plan should include a provision to use, other than the oil
pollution act of 1990, federal funding if it becomes available for
state use; and
(8) The plan should leverage federal government maritime safety net
activities and move to eliminate wasteful duplication activities
between state and federal agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 88.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Establishment of a systemwide tug safety net plan shall be
based on development of a tug presence matrix. A third party
professional engineering company or equivalent shall be used to design
the tug presence matrix with input from industry and government
officials with expertise in the construction, movement, and vital
system operations of targeted vessels and tug operations. Recognized
maritime industry organizations such as the Puget Sound steamship
operators association, Columbia steamship operators association,
American waterway operators, North Pacific fishing vessel owners'
association, western states petroleum association, BC chamber of
shipping, council of marine carriers, and pilot groups from Puget
Sound, the Columbia river, and British Columbia shall be used to
provide such expertise. Development of this matrix shall be based on
the following:
(a) Past drift grounding oil spill incident data by vessel category
for state waters;
(b) Drift rates of laden and unladen tank vessels, container
vessels, bulk vessels, car carriers, cruise ships, and tank barges
under a combination of tidal current, wind, swell, or wave conditions
in areas where tug presence is less than average;
(c) Anchor dragging incident data where vessel crew actions and
implementation of standards of care are not sufficient to mitigate the
grounding threat;
(d) International tug of opportunity tug distribution data and tug
response times from common tug locations;
(e) Tug capabilities;
(f) Risk mitigation maneuvering, anchoring, or other crew actions
during a single mode failure of either propulsion or steering;
(g) Vessel propulsion and design including thruster use and
effectiveness;
(h) Grounding energy needed to cause significant outflow of cargo
or fuel oil taking into account vessel design, cargo and fuel tank
locations, and bottom and shoreline type;
(i) Achieving the grounding mitigation success factor of ninety-five percent incorporated into the time-proven San Francisco tug escort
scheme; and
(j) Mitigating substantial threats of pollution from disabled drift
groundings or anchor dragging groundings of commercial vessels over
three hundred gross tons.
(2) The matrix shall be developed within twelve months of the
effective date of this section. Once established the matrix shall be
implemented as provided for in this section.
(a) The department of ecology shall establish contracts with tug
companies similar to the basic ordering agreements of the federal
government. Contracts shall include provisions for the state and the
tug company to share in salvage claim awards. Any such awards to the
state shall be used to fund the provisions of this section and section
3 of this act.
(b) The department of ecology shall develop protocols to implement
the matrix based on coast guard captain of the port communications
indicating a need in one or more areas during high-risk events.
(c) The matrix shall be used only when oil pollution act of 1990
funding authority is not applicable to mitigate the substantial threat
and shall not duplicate natural distribution of tugs best determined by
an international tug of opportunity or other means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 88.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of ecology shall prepare the following reports
by October 1, 2003.
(a) A summary of all drift groundings within Washington waters of
commercial vessels over three hundred gross tons that have resulted in
oil releases and that addresses the potential mitigation of tug use
during each of the oil spill incidents. The report shall include the
geographic area involved, the vessel drift rate, and time involved and
nearest locations of normal tug presence.
(b) A review of all current state prevention activities that lists
in order of priority where tug mitigation funding ranks and whether
current resources need to be reprogrammed to fund such activities. The
listing shall be based on risk reduction measurements tied directly to
the activity. The listing shall identify areas of state duplication
with the federal government as candidate activities for reprogramming.
A no reprogramming recommendation from the department means that all
current activities are higher priority than tug use and there is no
duplication with the federal government.
(c) The department shall work with the office of the attorney
general and the United States coast guard to list all potential uses of
oil pollution act of 1990 funding for the mitigation benefits of
targeted tug use.
(d) The department shall work with the office of the attorney
general to list all past uses of the state-funded Neah Bay tug that
were candidates for salvage claim awards. The list should include best
estimates of potential awards. The department shall provide a
comparison of department risk reduction assessments of tug use with the
elements necessary to pursue salvage claim awards.
(2) The department of ecology shall establish a reporting protocol
to capture the implementation and outcome facts every time the matrix
is used. The department shall consult with the captain of the port to
ensure all facts are accurately captured and the report shall be made
public.
(3) The department of ecology shall not develop rules separate from
those under this section and section 2 of this act to require tug
presence directly or indirectly through credits or other means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 88.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The maritime safety and improvement account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from federal sources for
tug use and maritime safety and mitigation purposes shall be deposited
into this account. In addition, any appropriations by the legislature
for purposes of maritime safety and improvement shall be deposited into
this account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, and all funds in the account are subject to
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes stated in sections 2 and 3 of this act. Funding shall be
reprogrammed from sources that have provided for the current rescue tug
or redirected from current state expenditures on marine safety. No new
funding or fee schemes are created in sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Should federal funding, activities, or regulations address any similar
tug safety net plan at any time as provided in sections 2 and 3 of this
act, then the department shall make all reports required by sections 2
and 3 of this act and provide input to the federal government in its
plan development and implementation efforts. Under such circumstances,
the state tug safety net plan terminates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---