BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 SHORT TITLE. This act shall be known as the
building Washington's future act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 INTENT. The state's institutions of higher
education are a vital component of the future economic prosperity of
our state. In order to ensure that Washington continues to be able to
provide a highly qualified work force that can attract businesses and
support the economic vitality of the state, it is the intent of this
bond act to provide new money for capital projects to help fulfill
higher education needs across the state.
This new source of funding for the critical capital needs of the
state's institutions of higher education furthers the mission of higher
education and is intended to enhance the abilities of those
institutions, over the next six years, to fulfill their critical roles
in maintaining and stimulating the state's economy.
It is the intent of the legislature that this new source of funding
not displace funding levels for the capital and operating budgets of
the institutions of higher education. It is instead intended that the
new funding will allow the institutions, over the next three biennia,
to use the current level of capital funding to provide for many of
those urgent preservation, replacement, and maintenance needs that have
been deferred. This approach is designed to maintain or improve the
current infrastructure of our institutions of higher education, and
simultaneously to provide new instruction and research capacity to
serve the increasing number of traditional college-aged students and
those adults returning to college to update skills or retrain so that
they can meet the demands of Washington's changing work force. This
new source of funding may also be used for major preservation projects
that renovate, replace, or modernize facilities to enhance
capacity/access by maintaining or improving the usefulness of existing
space for important instruction and research programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Bonds" means bonds, notes, commercial paper, certificates of
indebtedness, or other evidences of indebtedness of the state issued
under this chapter.
(2) "Institutions of higher education" means the University of
Washington and Washington State University, Western Washington
University at Bellingham, Central Washington University at Ellensburg,
Eastern Washington University at Cheney, The Evergreen State College,
and the community colleges and technical colleges as defined by RCW
28B.50.030.
(3) "Washington's future bonds" means all or any portion of the
general obligation bonds authorized in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 WASHINGTON'S FUTURE BONDS AUTHORIZED. (1)
For the purpose of providing needed capital improvements consisting of
the predesign, design, acquisition, construction, modification,
renovation, expansion, equipping, and other improvement of state
buildings and facilities for the institutions of higher education, the
state finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds
of the state of Washington in the sum of seven hundred seventy-two
million five hundred thousand dollars, or so much thereof as may be
required, to finance all or a part of the cost of these projects and
all costs incidental thereto. The bonds issued under the authority of
this section shall be known as Washington's future bonds.
(2) Bonds authorized in this section shall be sold in the manner,
at the time or times, in amounts, and at such prices as the state
finance committee shall determine.
(3) No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale
without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale
of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 BOND ISSUANCE--INTENT. It is the intent of
the legislature that the proceeds of new bonds authorized in this
chapter will be appropriated in phases over three biennia, beginning
with the 2003-2005 biennium, to provide additional funding for capital
projects and facilities of the institutions of higher education above
historical levels of funding.
This chapter is not intended to limit the legislature's ability to
appropriate bond proceeds if the full amount authorized in this chapter
has not been appropriated after three biennia, and the authorization to
issue bonds contained in this chapter does not expire until the full
authorization has been appropriated and issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 TERMS AND COVENANTS. (1) The state finance
committee is authorized to prescribe the form, terms, conditions, and
covenants of the bonds provided for in this chapter, the time or times
of sale of all or any portion of them, and the conditions and manner of
their sale and issuance.
(2) Bonds issued under this chapter shall state that they are a
general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full
faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof
and the interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to
pay the principal and interest as the same shall become due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 PROCEEDS. (1) The proceeds from the sale of
the bonds authorized in section 4 of this act shall be deposited in the
Gardner-Evans higher education construction account created in section
13 of this act.
(2) The proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes in
section 4 of this act and for the payment of the expenses incurred in
connection with the sale and issuance of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The legislature intends to use the proceeds
from the sale of bonds issued under this chapter for the following
projects during the 2005-07 and 2007-09 biennia:
(1) For the University of Washington:
(a) Life sciences I building;
(b) Bothell branch campus phase 2B;
(2) For Washington State University:
(a) Spokane Riverpoint campus - academic center building;
(b) Pullman campus - Holland Library renovation;
(c) Pullman campus - biotechnology/life sciences 1;
(d) TriCities campus - bioproducts and sciences building; and
(e) Intercollegiate College of Nursing, Spokane - nursing building
at Riverpoint;
(3) For Eastern Washington University: Hargreaves Hall;
(4) For Central Washington University: Hogue technology;
(5) For The Evergreen State College:
(a) Daniel J. Evans building;
(b) Communications building and theater expansion;
(6) For Western Washington University:
(a) Academic instructional center;
(b) Parks Hall;
(c) Performing Arts Center renovation;
(7) For the community and technical college system:
(a) Green River Community College science building;
(b) Walla Walla Community College basic skills/computer lab;
(c) Pierce College Puyallup, communication arts and allied health;
or
(8) For other projects that maintain or increase access to
institutions of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 PAYMENT PROCEDURES. (1) The debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account shall be used for the payment of
the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in this chapter.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in this chapter.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued under this chapter, the state treasurer
shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state
treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement
account an amount equal to the amount certified by the state finance
committee to be due on the payment date.
(4) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 BONDS--LEGAL INVESTMENT FOR PUBLIC FUNDS.
The bonds authorized by this chapter shall constitute a legal
investment for all state funds or for funds under state control and all
funds of municipal corporations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 ADDITIONAL METHODS OF PAYING DEBT SERVICE
AUTHORIZED. The legislature may provide additional means for raising
moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds
authorized under this chapter, and section 9 of this act shall not be
deemed to provide an exclusive method for payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 CHAPTER SUPPLEMENTAL. This chapter
provides a complete, additional, and alternative method for
accomplishing the purposes of this chapter and is supplemental and
additional to powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of bonds
under this chapter shall not be deemed to be the only method to fund
projects under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 CREATION OF THE GARDNER-EVANS HIGHER
EDUCATION CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT. The Gardner-Evans higher education
construction account is created in the state treasury. Proceeds from
the bonds issued under section 4 of this act shall be deposited in the
account. The account shall be used for purposes of section 4 of this
act. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---