BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds
that an actively coordinated and cooperatively facilitated railcar pool
for transportation of perishable agricultural commodities is necessary
for the continued viability and competitiveness of Washington's
agricultural industry. The legislature also finds that the rail
transportation model established by the Washington Grain Train program
has been successful in serving the shipping needs of the wheat
industry.
It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to authorize and
direct the Washington department of transportation to develop a railcar
program for Washington's perishable commodity industries to be known as
the Washington Produce Railcar Pool. This railcar program should be
modeled from the Washington Grain Train program, but be made flexible
enough to work with entities outside state government in order to
fulfill its mission, including, but not limited to, the federal and
local governments, commodity commissions, and private entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITION. As used in this act "short line
railroad" means a Class II or Class III railroad as defined by the
United States Surface Transportation Board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEPARTMENTAL AUTHORITY. In addition to
powers otherwise granted by law, the department may establish a
Washington Produce Railcar Pool to promote viable, cost-effective rail
service for Washington produce, including but not limited to apples,
onions, pears, and potatoes, both processed and fresh.
To the extent that funds are appropriated, the department may:
(1) Operate the Washington Produce Railcar Pool program while
working in close coordination with the department of agriculture,
interested commodity commissions, port districts, and other interested
parties;
(2) For the purposes of this program:
(a) Purchase or lease new or used refrigerated railcars;
(b) Accept donated refrigerated railcars; and
(c) Refurbish and remodel the railcars.
(3) Hire, in consultation with affected stakeholders, including but
not limited to short line railroads, commodity commissions, and port
districts, a transportation management firm to perform the function
outlined in section 5 of this act; and
(4) Contribute the efforts of a short line rail-financing expert to
find funding for the project to help interested short line railroads in
this state to accomplish the necessary operating arrangements once the
railcars are ready for service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 FUNDING. To the extent that funds are
appropriated, the department shall fund the program as follows: The
department may accept funding from the federal government, or other
public or private sources, to purchase or lease new or used railcars
and to refurbish and remodel the railcars as needed. Nothing in this
section precludes other entities, including but not limited to short
line railroads, from performing the remodeling under sections 1 through
6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RAILCAR POOL MANAGEMENT. (1) The
transportation management firm hired under section 3(3) of this act
shall manage the day-to-day operations of the railcars, such as
monitoring the location of the cars, returning them to this state,
distributing them, arranging for pretrips and repairs, and arranging
for per diem, mileage allowances, and other freight billing charges
with the railroads.
(2) The railcar pool must be managed over the life of the railcars
so that the railcars will be distributed to railroads and port
districts around the state for produce loadings as market conditions
warrant or to other users, including out-of-state users by contractual
agreement, during times of excess capacity.
(3) To maximize railcar availability and use, the department or the
transportation management firm may make agreements with the
transcontinental railroad systems to pool Washington-owned or
Washington-managed railcars with those of the railroads. In such
instances, the railroad must agree to provide immediately an equal
number of railcars to the Washington railcar pool.
(4) The department shall act in an oversight role to verify that
the railcar pool is managed in accordance with subsections (2) and (3)
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 PRODUCE RAILCAR POOL ACCOUNT. The produce
railcar pool account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from per diem charges, mileage charges, and freight
billing charges paid by railroads and shippers that use the railcars in
the Washington Produce Railcar Pool must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of
sections 1 through 5 of this act. Only the secretary of transportation
or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.84.092 and 2002 c 242 s 2, 2002 c 114 s 24, and
2002 c 56 s 402 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the produce railcar pool account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1,
2004, the public health supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal
settlement account, the regional transportation investment district
account, the resource management cost account, the site closure
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled
trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma
Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1
account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3
account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment
fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section captions used in this act are not
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.76 RCW.

--- END ---