BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Research suggests that creating a more
integrated, seamless education system involves a host of complex
issues, including standards, testing, educator preparation, college
admissions policies, governance, and funding streams. Over the past
decade, a number of states have begun to move away from dealing with
such issues on a piecemeal basis in favor of a more comprehensive
approach. Commonly referred to as P-16 or P-20, these comprehensive
state programs reflect the central vision of a coherent, flexible
continuum of public education that stretches from preschool through the
baccalaureate degree or beyond.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act shall be known as the master plan
for education act of 2003.

--- END ---