BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that southwest
Washington continues to be the fastest-growing region in the state and
is successfully attracting a wide array of corporations and businesses
vital to the future expansion of the economy of the region and the
entire state. In partnership, the branch campus of Washington State
University at Vancouver, Clark College, and Lower Columbia College have
successfully expanded educational opportunities for students and
created avenues for research and training to support the economy of the
region over the last decade. However, the legislature also recognizes
that southwest Washington is the largest urban area in the state
without access to an in-state, public four-year institution of higher
education. Therefore, the legislature finds it necessary to examine
thoroughly and objectively the prospect of creating additional
baccalaureate and graduate opportunities in Vancouver. The legislature
also recognizes there may be other unserved or underserved areas in the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall conduct a feasibility study for the creation of
additional baccalaureate and graduate opportunities for public higher
education in Vancouver. The study must include the following analyses:
(a) A detailed regional analysis of student demand and
institutional supply of degree programs, including potential economic
development, and including consultation with community leaders;
(b) Consideration of alternative models for providing baccalaureate
and professional graduate education in the region, including expanding
the current partnerships between the branch campus of Washington State
University at Vancouver, Clark College, and Lower Columbia College;
(c) An examination of the possible role and mission of a
transitional comprehensive four-year university, including the
possibility of an innovative combination of instruction and research
suitable for meeting the region's needs for access to higher education
for recent high school graduates, placebound students, and transfer
students as well as support of the expansion of the region's economic
viability; and
(d) A comparison of short and long-term costs.
(2) The institute shall submit its findings from the feasibility
study to the higher education and fiscal committees of the senate and
house of representatives by December 15, 2004.
(3) The institute shall develop a proposal for a study that may
investigate the need for additional baccalaureate access in other parts
of Washington state that are either unserved or underserved.

--- END ---