BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.020 and 1999 c 164 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board.
(2) "Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or
other evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the board pursuant
to this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Financial institution" means any bank, savings and loan
association, credit union, development credit corporation, insurance
company, investment company, trust company, savings institution, or
other financial institution approved by the board and maintaining an
office in the state.
(5) "Industrial development facilities" means "industrial
development facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.
(6) "Industrial development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt revenue
bonds used to fund industrial development facilities.
(7) "Local government" or "political subdivision" means any port
district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
providing for public facilities under this chapter.
(8) "Sponsor" means any of the following entities which customarily
provide service or otherwise aid in industrial or other financing and
are approved as a sponsor by the board: A bank, trust company, savings
bank, investment bank, national banking association, savings and loan
association, building and loan association, credit union, insurance
company, or any other financial institution, governmental agency, or
holding company of any entity specified in this subsection.
(9) "Umbrella bonds" means industrial development revenue bonds
from which the proceeds are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made
available to two or more users under this chapter.
(10) "User" means one or more persons acting as lessee, purchaser,
mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and receiving or
applying to receive revenues from bonds issued under this chapter.
(11) "Public facilities" means a project of a local government or
a federally recognized Indian tribe for the planning, acquisition,
construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or
improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and industrial water, earth
stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity,
telecommunications, transportation, natural gas, buildings or
structures, and port facilities, all for the purpose of job creation,
job retention, or job expansion.
(12) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of
fewer than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the
office of financial management.
(13) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:
(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial
census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(14) of this section;
(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty
thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five
criteria as set forth in subsection (14) of this section; or
(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census,
that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (14) of this section.
(14) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:
(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses
of one hundred positions or more;
(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses
of one hundred positions or more; and
(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state
average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by
the employment security department for the most recent year for which
data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs
under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code
delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for
eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized
area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip
codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also
considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make
available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and
organizations providing services under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.160.030 and 1996 c 51 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The community economic revitalization board is hereby created
to exercise the powers granted under this chapter.
(2) The board shall consist of the chairman of and one minority
member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives from
the committee of the house of representatives that deals with issues of
economic development, the chairman of and one minority member appointed
by the president of the senate from the committee of the senate that
deals with issues of economic development, and the following members
appointed by the governor: A recognized private or public sector
economist; one port district official; one county official; one city
official; one representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe;
one representative of the public; one representative of small
businesses each from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area
east of Puget Sound and west of the Cascade range, (c) the area east of
the Cascade range and west of the Columbia river, and (d) the area east
of the Columbia river; one executive from large businesses each from
the area west of the Cascades and the area east of the Cascades. The
appointive members shall initially be appointed to terms as follows:
Three members for one-year terms, three members for two-year terms, and
three members for three-year terms which shall include the chair.
Thereafter each succeeding term shall be for three years. The chair of
the board shall be selected by the governor. The members of the board
shall elect one of their members to serve as vice-chair. The director
of community, trade, and economic development, the director of revenue,
the commissioner of employment security, and the secretary of
transportation shall serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board.
(3) Management services, including fiscal and contract services,
shall be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing
this chapter and the allocation of private activity bonds.
(4) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of
appointive members of the board, the governor shall fill the same for
the unexpired term. Members of the board may be removed for
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges by
the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) A member appointed by the governor may not be absent from more
than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one
calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence limitation is
deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be replaced by the
governor.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.160.200 and 1999 c 164 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The economic development account is created within the public
facilities construction loan revolving fund under RCW 43.160.080.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of RCW
43.160.010(5) and this section. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) Applications under this section for assistance from the
economic development account are subject to all of the applicable
criteria set forth under this chapter, as well as procedures and
criteria established by the board, except as otherwise provided.
(3) Eligible applicants under this section are limited to political
subdivisions of the state and federally recognized Indian tribes in
rural natural resources impact areas and rural counties.
(4) Applicants must demonstrate that their request is part of an
economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning
requirements. Applicants must demonstrate that tourism projects have
been approved by the local government or federally recognized Indian
tribe. Industrial projects must be approved by the local government or
the federally recognized Indian tribe and the associate development
organization.
(5) Publicly owned projects may be financed under this section upon
proof by the applicant that the public project is a necessary component
of, or constitutes in whole, a tourism project.
(6) Applications must demonstrate local match and participation.
Such match may include: Land donation, other public or private funds
or both, or other means of local commitment to the project.
(7) Board financing for project-specific environmental, capital
facilities, land use, permitting, feasibility(([,])), and marketing
studies and plans; project engineering, design, and site planning and
analysis; and project debt and revenue impact analysis shall not exceed
fifty thousand dollars per study. Board funds for these purposes may
be provided as a grant and require a match.
(8) Board financing for tourism projects shall not exceed two
hundred fifty thousand dollars. Other public facility construction
projects under this section shall not exceed one million dollars.
Loans with flexible terms and conditions to meet the needs of the
applicants shall be provided. Grants may also be authorized, but only
when, and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given
the limited resources of the political subdivision.
(9) The board shall develop guidelines for allowable local match
and planning and predevelopment activities.
(10) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to
be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the
economic development project assisted under this section.
(11) Applications under this section need not demonstrate evidence
that specific private development or expansion is ready to occur or
will occur if funds are provided.
(12) The board shall establish guidelines for providing financial
assistance under this section to ensure that the requirements of this
chapter are complied with. The guidelines shall include:
(a) A process to equitably compare and evaluate applications from
competing communities.
(b) Criteria to ensure that approved projects will have a high
probability of success and are likely to provide long-term economic
benefits to the community. The criteria shall include: (i) A minimum
amount of local participation, determined by the board per application,
to verify community support for the project; (ii) an analysis that
establishes the project is feasible using standard economic principles;
and (iii) an explanation from the applicant regarding how the project
is consistent with the communities' economic strategy and goals.
(c) A method of evaluating the impact of the financial assistance
on the economy of the community and whether the financial assistance
achieved its purpose.

--- END ---