BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Before any child in preschool through fifth grade is allowed to
work or help in a school kitchen, a parental/guardian permission slip
that details the duties and responsibilities, as well as the potential
risks to the student, must be signed and returned to appropriate food
service management.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the Washington state school directors' association, parents, and
representatives of food service employee groups, shall develop a policy
to be implemented in all elementary schools for protecting children in
preschool through fifth grade who assist in school kitchens. The
policy must:
(a) Regulate exposure to hazardous equipment that is no less
stringent than restrictions adopted by the department of labor and
industries for minors;
(b) Determine age-appropriate standards for physical activities
including, but not limited to, lifting, pushing, or moving crates,
carts, or other heavy equipment, consistent with federal occupational
safety and health administration standards;
(c) Require that any injury requiring medical attention to a
preschool through fifth grade student who is injured while working in
a school kitchen be reported to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction; and
(d) Require age-appropriate training.
(3) By January 1, 2004, the superintendent of public instruction
shall verify that all districts are implementing the policy and report
to the legislature.

--- END ---