BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.031 and 1995 c 343 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in
effect in all counties and cities the state building code which shall
consist of the following codes which are hereby adopted by reference:
(1) Uniform Building Code and Uniform Building Code Standards,
published by the International Conference of Building Officials,
including the most up-to-date nationally recognized natural disaster
mitigation standards;
(2) Uniform Mechanical Code, ((including Chapter 13, Fuel Gas
Piping, Appendix B,)) published by the International ((Conference of
Building)) Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials;
(3) The Uniform Fire Code and Uniform Fire Code Standards,
published by the ((International Fire Code Institute: PROVIDED,
That,)) National Fire Protection Association. However, notwithstanding
any wording in this code, participants in religious ceremonies shall
not be precluded from carrying hand-held candles;
(4) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code
and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International
Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials((: PROVIDED, That
chapters 11 and 12 of such code)). However, any provisions of these
codes affecting sewers or fuel gas piping are not adopted; and
(5) The rules and regulations adopted by the council establishing
standards for making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable
by the physically handicapped or elderly persons as provided in RCW
70.92.100 through 70.92.160.
In case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1),
(2), (3), and (4) of this section, the first named code shall govern
over those following.
The codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the
council as provided in RCW 19.27.074.
The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request
of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated
codes.

--- END ---