BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The people of the state of Washington
recognize that public health plays a vital role in the safety of their
families, communities, and workplaces. Historically, the people of
Washington have been leaders in their support for public health. The
nation's first public health district was established in Washington
state. The people of Washington further recognize that public health
is a cost-effective way of preventing disease and reducing health care
costs. The people find that the existing system of funding public
health is inadequate to assure the provision of traditional services
such as immunization, food and water supply safety, environmental
health, and communicable disease control and at the same time meet the
new challenges posed by issues such as bioterrorism, West Nile virus,
and drug resistant tuberculosis. By this act, the people intend to
establish a stable and continuing funding source for local public
health services and state services which support local public health
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the levy provided for in RCW 84.52.065, in each
year the state shall levy for collection in the following year a state
tax of twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value upon
the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state
adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated
ratio fixed by the state department of revenue.
(2) The taxes levied by the state under this section shall be
deposited into the local public health trust fund hereby created in the
state treasury. Money in the local public health trust fund may be
spent only for distribution to counties and health districts and to the
health services account solely for the purpose of maintaining and
improving local public health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The levy by the state under section 2 of this act shall:
(a) Not be subject to RCW 84.55.010; and
(b) Be set in any year so that the taxes payable in the following
year shall not exceed a dollar amount calculated by multiplying one
hundred percent plus the fiscal growth factor by the amount of taxes
lawfully levied in the previous year, plus an additional dollar amount
calculated by multiplying the increase in assessed value in the state
resulting from new construction, improvements to property, and any
increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property by the levy
rate for the preceding year. In no case shall the levy exceed twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value upon the assessed
valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted to the
state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by
the state department of revenue.
(2) The limitation provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section
does not apply to the first levy by the state under section 2 of this
act.
(3) For purposes of this section, "fiscal growth factor" has the
same meaning as in RCW 43.135.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Beginning in calendar year 2004, the
state treasurer shall make the following annual distributions, based on
calculations by the office of financial management, from the local
public health trust fund to the counties and health districts and the
health services account as follows:
(a) Forty-three percent of the revenue shall be distributed based
on each department's or district's proportional share of total 1999
local support from counties and their component cities to their
respective health department or district;
(b) Seventeen and nine-tenths percent of the revenue shall be
distributed solely for public health services in order to maintain
support previously provided from the health services account. Each
health department or district shall receive a distribution based on
their proportional share of funds appropriated in the 2003-2005
biennial operating budget;
(c) Three and two-tenths percent shall be distributed to counties
or districts to bring per capita funding for county health departments
or health districts up to seventy percent of the statewide average per
capita funding under (a) and (b) of this subsection;
(d) Twenty-one and one-tenth percent of the revenue shall be
distributed on a per capita basis to each department or district based
on their share of the total state population solely to improve public
health services and emergency response and prevention capacity for acts
of terrorism committed with biological agents, West Nile virus, and
communicable diseases;
(e) One and four-tenths percent will be distributed to counties or
districts to bring total funding under (a) through (d) of this
subsection up to an amount equal to eighty-five percent of the taxes
raised for distributions under those sections; and
(f) Thirteen and four-tenths percent shall be distributed to the
health services account for activities and support of local public
health.
(2) In each year following calendar year 2004: In calculating the
amounts to be distributed to each county under subsection (1)(a) and
(b) of this section the office of financial management shall treat
funding increases attributable to the population change component of
the fiscal growth factor in the following manner: Only those counties
with population growth shall have a change in funding for population.
Funding increases generated by the population component of the fiscal
growth factor shall be distributed to those counties based on the
county's pro rata share of the population increase component of the
fiscal growth factor as provided in RCW 43.135.025(9).
(3) The state treasurer shall make the distributions under this
section to the counties and districts and to the health services
account as follows:
(a) One-half of the total amount that each county or district and
the health services account is entitled to receive for a calendar year
shall be distributed to the counties on July 1st of that calendar year;
and
(b) The remainder of the funds that the counties or districts and
the health services account are entitled to receive shall be
distributed to the counties on January 1st of the following calendar
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each local board of health shall establish performance measures
for the health department that it governs and shall report annually to
the citizens of the health district or county about its performance
against those measures. In selecting measures, each board shall take
into account local public health priorities identified in a community
assessment conducted by the local health jurisdiction and the
performance standards adopted in the state public health improvement
plan. In the case of those departments and districts where cities have
provided funding for enhanced levels of service since 1999, the city
shall establish, in consultation with the local board of health,
performance objectives for that portion of the distribution under
section 4(1)(a) of this act attributable to city contributions for
enhanced service levels. A special annual report shall be made by the
local board of health to the city and to the citizens of such cities
about performance against those objectives.
(2) Additionally, the secretary of health, in consultation with
local public health jurisdictions, shall annually select performance
standards from among those adopted in the state public health
improvement plan on which each local health department or district
shall be required to report. These performance measures shall be
designed to demonstrate progress toward meeting the standards and
progress made by the public health system toward improving the status
of the public's health as required in RCW 43.70.580(5). The secretary
of health shall report to the legislature, the governor, and the people
of the state regarding local health department and district
performance, comparing performance among jurisdictions and highlighting
local priorities.
(3) Within available resources, it shall be the responsibility of
the local board of health to implement the state public health
improvement plan within its jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation. If approved by a majority of those voting at
the November 2003 general election, sections 2 through 4 of this act
apply to taxes levied in 2003 for collection in 2004 and every year
thereafter, and sections 1 and 5 of this act take effect on January 1,
2004. If this act is not approved by a majority of the voters voting
at the next general election it is null and void in its entirety.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.52.065 and 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state
shall levy for collection in the following year for the support of
common schools of the state a tax of three dollars and ((sixty))
thirty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value upon the
assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted to
the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed
by the state department of revenue.
As used in this section, "the support of common schools" includes
the payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued for capital
construction projects for the common schools.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.55.010 and 1997 c 3 s 202 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this chapter, the levy for a taxing
district in any year shall be set so that the regular property taxes
payable in the following year shall not exceed the limit factor
multiplied by the amount of regular property taxes lawfully levied for
such district in the highest of the three most recent years in which
such taxes were levied for such district plus an additional dollar
amount calculated by multiplying the increase in assessed value in that
district resulting from new construction, improvements to property, and
any increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property by the
regular property tax levy rate of that district for the preceding year.
(2) The tax levy authorized under section 2 of this act is not
subject to the requirements of this section.

--- END ---