BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall use its powers and rule-making authority
under this chapter to develop a program to protect patient access to
medical treatments provided by any health profession under RCW
18.130.040. This program applies to any state agency that adopts rules
limiting patients' access to the full range of medical treatments
available and necessary to treat their medical problems. The program
must be based on the following operational principles and state
agencies must bring their rules into compliance with these principles:
(a) When any treatment is subject to prior authorization, the
agency must provide health professions and patients with a specific set
of clinical criteria setting forth the terms under which the treatment
is authorized for coverage;
(b) When authorization for any treatment is denied, the agency must
promptly provide both the patient and health professional with a
written explanation of the reasons for denial. The explanation must be
specific to the individual patients' condition and be written in clear
language that is comprehensible to the patient;
(c) When a health professional and patient have established a
successful treatment regimen that is covered under an agency's program,
the agency may not place restrictions or exclusions on any part of the
established treatment regimen, including prescription medicines;
(d) A pharmacist filling a prescription under a state program using
a preferred drug list or formulary drug schedule may not substitute a
preferred drug or formulary drug within a given therapeutic class when
the prescribing health professional has indicated on the prescription
that the nonpreferred or nonformulary drug must be dispensed as
written; and
(e) Before making a decision to restrict access to treatment for a
medical problem, the agency must seek and consider comments from
practicing health professionals and patient groups familiar with the
medical problem.
(2) The program under this section must provide for regular reports
to the legislature on health care outcomes and overall financial
impacts on the provision of health care services.

--- END ---