BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Requests for records to the state toxicology laboratory for records
related to testing performed on deceased individuals in death
investigations and on living suspects in impaired driving cases must be
made to the agency that submitted the material for analysis.

--- END ---