BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the number
of unsolicited commercial text messages sent to cellular telephones and
pagers is increasing. This practice is raising serious concerns on the
part of cellular telephone and pager subscribers. These unsolicited
messages often result in costs to the cellular telephone and pager
subscribers in that they pay for use when a message is received through
their devices. The limited memory of these devices can be exhausted by
unwanted text messages resulting in the inability to receive necessary
and expected messages.
The legislature intents to limit the practice of sending
unsolicited commercial text messages to cellular telephone or pager
numbers in Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.190.010 and 1999 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assist the transmission" means actions taken by a person to
provide substantial assistance or support which enables any person to
formulate, compose, send, originate, initiate, or transmit a commercial
electronic mail message or a commercial electronic text message when
the person providing the assistance knows or consciously avoids knowing
that the initiator of the commercial electronic mail message or the
commercial electronic text message is engaged, or intends to engage, in
any practice that violates the consumer protection act.
(2) "Commercial electronic mail message" means an electronic mail
message sent for the purpose of promoting real property, goods, or
services for sale or lease. It does not mean an electronic mail
message to which an interactive computer service provider has attached
an advertisement in exchange for free use of an electronic mail
account, when the sender has agreed to such an arrangement.
(3) "Commercial electronic text message" means an electronic text
message sent to promote real property, goods, or services for sale or
lease.
(4) "Electronic mail address" means a destination, commonly
expressed as a string of characters, to which electronic mail may be
sent or delivered.
(((4))) (5) "Electronic text message" means a text message sent to
a cellular telephone or pager equipped with short message service or
any similar capability, whether the message is initiated as a short
message service message or as an electronic mail message.
(6) "Initiate the transmission" refers to the action by the
original sender of an electronic mail message or an electronic text
message, not to the action by any intervening interactive computer
service that may handle or retransmit the message, unless such
intervening interactive computer service assists in the transmission of
an electronic mail message when it knows, or consciously avoids
knowing, that the person initiating the transmission is engaged, or
intends to engage, in any act or practice that violates the consumer
protection act.
(((5))) (7) "Interactive computer service" means any information
service, system, or access software provider that provides or enables
computer access by multiple users to a computer server, including
specifically a service or system that provides access to the internet
and such systems operated or services offered by libraries or
educational institutions.
(((6))) (8) "Internet domain name" refers to a globally unique,
hierarchical reference to an internet host or service, assigned through
centralized internet naming authorities, comprising a series of
character strings separated by periods, with the right-most string
specifying the top of the hierarchy.
(((7))) (9) "Person" means a person, corporation, partnership, or
association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person conducting business in the state may initiate or
assist in the transmission of an electronic commercial text message to
a telephone number assigned to a Washington resident for cellular
telephone or pager service that is equipped with short message
capability or any similar capability allowing the transmission of text
messages.
(2) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is not a violation of section 2 of this act if:
(a) The commercial electronic text message is transmitted at the
direction of a person offering cellular telephone or pager service and
the subscriber has elected to receive these text messages;
(b) The commercial electronic text message is transmitted by a
person that has an existing business relationship with the subscriber
and the subscriber has elected to receive these text messages; or
(c) The commercial electronic text message is transmitted by an
affiliate of a person who has an existing business relationship with
the subscriber and the subscriber has provided consent to the person
with whom he or she has an existing business relationship to receive
these messages from affiliates of the person. For purposes of this
subsection, "affiliate" means any company that controls, is controlled
by, or is under common control with another company.
(2) No person offering cellular or pager service may be held liable
for serving merely as an intermediary between the sender and the
recipient of a commercial electronic text message sent in violation of
this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.190.040 and 1998 c 149 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Damages to the recipient of a commercial electronic mail
message or a commercial electronic text message sent in violation of
this chapter are five hundred dollars, or actual damages, whichever is
greater.
(2) Damages to an interactive computer service resulting from a
violation of this chapter are one thousand dollars, or actual damages,
whichever is greater.

--- END ---