BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.155.010 and 1993 c 507 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in RCW 82.24.010 shall apply to RCW
70.155.020 through 70.155.130. In addition, for the purposes of this
chapter, unless otherwise required by the context:
(1) "Board" means the Washington state liquor control board.
(2) "Delivery sale" means any sale of cigarettes to a consumer in
the state where either: (a) The purchaser submits an order for a sale
by means of a telephonic or other method of voice transmission, mail
delivery, any other delivery service, or the internet or other online
service; or (b) the cigarettes are delivered by use of mail delivery or
any other delivery service. A sale of cigarettes shall be a delivery
sale regardless of whether the seller is located within or without the
state. A sale of cigarettes not for personal consumption to a person
who is a wholesaler licensed pursuant to chapter 82.24 RCW or a
retailer pursuant to chapter 82.24 RCW is not a delivery sale.
(3) "Delivery service" means any private carrier engaged in the
commercial delivery of letters, packages, or other containers that
requires the recipient of that letter, package, or container to sign to
accept delivery.
(4) "Minor" refers to an individual who is less than eighteen years
old.
(((3))) (5) "Public place" means a public street, sidewalk, or
park, or any area open to the public in a publicly owned and operated
building.
(((4))) (6) "Sample" means a tobacco product distributed to members
of the general public at no cost or at nominal cost for product
promotion purposes.
(((5))) (7) "Sampler" means a person engaged in the business of
sampling other than a retailer.
(((6))) (8) "Sampling" means the distribution of samples to members
of the general public in a public place.
(((7))) (9) "Shipping container" means a container in which
cigarettes are shipped in connection with a delivery sale.
(10) "Shipping documents" means bills of lading, airbills, or any
other documents used to evidence the undertaking by a delivery service
to deliver letters, packages, or other containers.
(11) "Tobacco product" means a product that contains tobacco and is
intended for human consumption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.155 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the responsibility of the person who mails, ships, or
otherwise delivers cigarettes before the first delivery sale of
cigarettes to:
(a) Verify the age of the receiver of the cigarettes upon delivery;
and
(b) Obtain in writing verification of the receiver's address and
that the receiver of the cigarettes is not a minor. The statement must
also confirm if the prospective consumer understands: (i) That signing
another person's name to the certification is a violation of RCW
9A.60.040 (1)(a); (ii) that the sale of cigarettes to a minor is a
violation of RCW 26.28.080; (iii) that the purchase of cigarettes by
minors is a violation of RCW 70.155.080; and (iv) that he or she has
the option to receive mailings from a tobacco company about tobacco
products.
(2) No person shall mail, ship, or otherwise deliver cigarettes in
connection with a delivery sale unless before the first delivery sale
to the consumer that person:
(a) Makes a good faith effort to verify the information contained
in the certification provided by the prospective consumer in subsection
(1) of this section against a commercially available data base, or
obtains a photocopy of an officially issued identification containing
the bearer's age, signature, and photograph. The only forms of
identification that are acceptable as proof of age for the purchase for
tobacco products are: (i) A liquor control authority card of
identification issued by a state of the United States or Canada, (ii)
a driver's license, instruction permit, or identification card issued
by a state of the United States or Province of Canada, (iii) a United
States military identification card, (iv) a passport, or (v) a merchant
marine identification card issued by the United States coast guard;
(b) Provides to the prospective consumer through electronic mail or
other means a notice that meets the requirements of subsection (3) of
this section;
(c) In the case of an order for cigarettes pursuant to an
advertisement on the internet, receives payment for the delivery sale
from the prospective consumer by a credit card or debit card, or by
check that has been issued in the prospective consumer's name.
(3) The notice required under subsection (2)(b) of this section
must include:
(a) A prominent and clearly legible statement that cigarette sales
to minors are illegal;
(b) A prominent and clearly legible statement that consists of one
of the warnings set forth in section 4(a)(1) of the federal cigarette
labeling and advertising act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1333(a)(1)) rotated on a
quarterly basis;
(c) A prominent and clearly legible statement that sales of
cigarettes are restricted to those consumers who provide verifiable
proof of age in accordance with subsection (1) of this section; and
(d) A prominent and clearly legible statement that cigarette sales
are subject to tax pursuant to chapters 82.24 and 82.12 RCW, with an
explanation of how the tax has been, or is to be, paid with respect to
a delivery sale.
(4) It is the responsibility of the person who mails, ships, or
otherwise delivers cigarettes in connection with a delivery sale to:
(a) Include as part of the bill of lading, or other shipping
documents, a clear and conspicuous statement that states: "Cigarettes:
Washington Law Prohibits Shipping to Individuals Under 18, and Requires
the Payment of all Applicable Taxes";
(b) Contract only with private carriers who employ delivery agents
who will verify the receiver of the cigarettes is not a minor upon
delivery. The only forms of identification that are acceptable as
proof of age for the purchase for tobacco products are: (i) A liquor
control authority card of identification issued by a state of the
United States or Canada, (ii) a driver's license, instruction permit,
or identification card issued by a state of the United States or
Province of Canada, (iii) a United States military identification card,
(iv) a passport, or (v) a merchant marine identification card issued by
the United States coast guard;
(c) Provide to the delivery service retained for the delivery sale
evidence of full compliance with subsection (6) of this section.
(5)(a) Before making delivery sales or mailings, shipping, or
otherwise delivering cigarettes to a Washington address in connection
with any sales, any person who mails, ships, or otherwise delivers
cigarettes shall file with the board a statement setting forth the
person's name, trade name, and the address of the person's principal
place of business and any other place of business.
(b) Any person who mails, ships, or otherwise delivers cigarettes
in connection with a delivery sale shall within fifteen days after the
first of each month file with the board a report of all delivery sales
made by the person within this state for the preceding month. The
report shall show the name and address of the consumer to whom the
cigarettes were sold, the kind and quality, and the date of delivery
thereof.
(6)(a) Any person failing to collect or remit to the department of
revenue any tax required under chapter 82.24 RCW in connection with a
delivery sale shall be assessed, in addition to any other penalty, a
penalty of five times the retail value of the cigarettes involved.
(b) Cigarettes sold or attempted to be sold in a delivery sale that
do not meet the requirements of this chapter shall be forfeited to the
state and destroyed as prescribed in chapter 82.24 RCW.
(c) Cigarettes delivered or attempted to be delivered in a delivery
sale that do not meet the requirements of this chapter shall be
forfeited to the state and destroyed as prescribed in chapter 82.24
RCW.
(d) All fixtures, equipment, and all other materials and personal
property on the premises of any person who, with the intent to defraud
the state, violates any of the requirements of this chapter, shall be
forfeited to the state as prescribed in chapter 82.24 RCW.

--- END ---