BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.17.845 and 1971 ex.s. c 73 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 904, designated
as the Lieutenant Colonel Michael P. Anderson Memorial Highway, is
established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number 90 in the vicinity
of Tyler, thence northeasterly via Cheney to a junction with state
route number 90 in the vicinity of Four Lakes.

--- END ---