BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that public
health programs are the first line of defense against threats of
bioterrorism and epidemics. The legislature also recognizes that
federal funding for protection against bioterrorism and other safety
measures are primarily for planning, not for implementation.
Furthermore, the legislature finds that poor nutrition contributes
to significant and expensive health problems in our society, including
obesity, tooth decay, cardiovascular disease, diabetes, and cancer.
The legislature recognizes the value of creating disincentives for
unhealthy behavior, including poor eating habits.
The state's public health system is an important resource for
protecting the population as well as promoting good nutrition and
helping to reduce the incidence of disease in the population. The
legislature recognizes that public health programs are not adequately
funded to carry out their job of protecting the public's health.
The legislature declares that paying for programs that will help
protect the public against disease and bioterrorism is a necessary and
worthy cause.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.0293 and 1988 c 103 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
food products for human consumption.
"Food products" include cereals and cereal products, oleomargarine,
meat and meat products including livestock sold for personal
consumption, fish and fish products, eggs and egg products, vegetables
and vegetable products, fruit and fruit products, spices and salt,
sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee substitutes, tea, cocoa and
cocoa products.
"Food products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted
milks, and any other similar type beverages which are composed at least
in part of milk or a milk product and which require the use of milk or
a milk product in their preparation.
"Food products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and
other beverages except bottled water, spirituous, malt or vinous
liquors or carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen.
"Food products" do not include medicines and preparations in
liquid, powdered, granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form
sold as dietary supplements or adjuncts.
(2) The exemption of "food products" provided for in subsection (1)
of this section shall not apply: (a) When the food products are
ordinarily sold for immediate consumption on or near a location at
which parking facilities are provided primarily for the use of patrons
in consuming the products purchased at the location, even though such
products are sold on a "takeout" or "to go" order and are actually
packaged or wrapped and taken from the premises of the retailer, or (b)
when the food products are sold for consumption within a place, the
entrance to which is subject to an admission charge, except for
national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a food product, when
sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be handled on the vendor's
premises by a person with a food and beverage service worker's permit
under RCW 69.06.010, including but not ((be)) limited to sandwiches
prepared or chicken cooked on the premises, deli trays, home-delivered
pizzas or meals, and salad bars but excluding:
(i) Raw meat prepared by persons who slaughter animals, including
fish and fowl, or dress or wrap slaughtered raw meat such as fish
mongers, butchers, or meat wrappers;
(ii) Meat and cheese sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity
determined by the buyer, sold by vendors such as meat markets,
delicatessens, and grocery stores;
(iii) Bakeries which only sell baked goods;
(iv) Combination bakery businesses, as prescribed by rule of the
department, to the extent that sales of baked goods are separately
accounted for and the baked goods claimed for exemption are not sold as
part of meals or with beverages in unsealed containers; or
(v) Bulk food products sold from bins or barrels, including but not
limited to flour, fruits, vegetables, sugar, salt, ((candy,)) chips,
and cocoa.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food products" provided in this section shall apply to
food products which are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or
low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under
chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail sale
of food products is subject to sales tax under RCW 82.08.020 if the
food products are sold through a vending machine, and in this case the
selling price for purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of
the gross receipts.
This subsection does not apply to hot prepared food products, other
than food products which are heated after they have been dispensed from
the vending machine.
For tax collected under this subsection, the requirements that the
tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be stated as
a separate item are waived.
(5) The exemption of "food products" provided for in subsection (1)
of this section shall not apply to candy. For purposes of this
subsection, "candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other
natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits,
nuts, or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces. Candy does not include any preparation containing flour nor
shall it include any products that require refrigeration.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.0293 and 1988 c 103 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of food products for human consumption.
"Food products" include cereals and cereal products, oleomargarine,
meat and meat products including livestock sold for personal
consumption, fish and fish products, eggs and egg products, vegetables
and vegetable products, fruit and fruit products, spices and salt,
sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee substitutes, tea, cocoa and
cocoa products.
"Food products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted
milks, and any other similar type beverages which are composed at least
in part of milk or a milk product and which require the use of milk or
a milk product in their preparation.
"Food products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and
other beverages except bottled water, spirituous, malt or vinous
liquors or carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen.
"Food products" do not include medicines and preparations in
liquid, powdered, granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form
sold as dietary supplements or adjuncts.
(2) The exemption of "food products" provided for in subsection (1)
of this section shall not apply: (a) When the food products are
ordinarily sold for immediate consumption on or near a location at
which parking facilities are provided primarily for the use of patrons
in consuming the products purchased at the location, even though such
products are sold on a "takeout" or "to go" order and are actually
packaged or wrapped and taken from the premises of the retailer, or (b)
when the food products are sold for consumption within a place, the
entrance to which is subject to an admission charge, except for
national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a food product, when
sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be handled on the vendor's
premises by a person with a food and beverage service worker's permit
under RCW 69.06.010, including but not ((be)) limited to sandwiches
prepared or chicken cooked on the premises, deli trays, home-delivered
pizzas or meals, and salad bars but excluding:
(i) Raw meat prepared by persons who slaughter animals, including
fish and fowl, or dress or wrap slaughtered raw meat such as fish
mongers, butchers, or meat wrappers;
(ii) Meat and cheese sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity
determined by the buyer, sold by vendors such as meat markets,
delicatessens, and grocery stores;
(iii) Bakeries which only sell baked goods;
(iv) Combination bakery businesses, as prescribed by rule of the
department, to the extent that sales of baked goods are separately
accounted for and the baked goods claimed for exemption are not sold as
part of meals or with beverages in unsealed containers; or
(v) Bulk food products sold from bins or barrels, including but not
limited to flour, fruits, vegetables, sugar, salt, ((candy,)) chips,
and cocoa.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food products" provided in this section shall apply to
food products which are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or
low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under
chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.
(4) The exemption of "food products" provided for in subsection (1)
of this section shall not apply to candy. For purposes of this
subsection, "candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other
natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits,
nuts, or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces. Candy does not include any preparation containing flour nor
shall it include any products that require refrigeration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of revenue shall deposit twenty-five one-hundredths
of one percent of the revenues collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW into the county public health account in RCW 70.05.125.

--- END ---