BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.54.010 and 1997 c 49 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this subchapter.
(1) (("Department" means the military department.
(2) "The adjutant general" means the adjutant general of the
military department)) "Chief" means the chief of the Washington state
patrol.
(((3))) (2) "State fire marshal" means the director of fire
protection in the Washington state patrol.
(((4))) (3) "Fire chief" includes the chief officer of a
statutorily authorized fire agency, or the fire chief's authorized
representative. Also included are the department of natural resources
fire control chief, and the department of natural resources regional
managers.
(((5))) (4) "Jurisdiction" means state, county, city, fire
district, or port district fire fighting units, or other units covered
by this chapter.
(((6))) (5) "Mobilization" means that fire fighting resources
beyond those available through existing agreements will be requested
and, when available, sent in response to an emergency or disaster
situation that has exceeded the capabilities of available local
resources. During a large scale emergency, mobilization includes the
redistribution of regional or statewide fire fighting resources to
either direct emergency incident assignments or to assignment in
communities where fire fighting resources are needed.
When mobilization is declared and authorized as provided in this
chapter, all fire fighting resources including those of the host fire
protection authorities, i.e. incident jurisdiction, shall be deemed as
mobilized under this chapter, including those that responded earlier
under existing mutual aid or other agreement. All nonhost fire
protection authorities providing fire fighting resources in response to
a mobilization declaration shall be eligible for expense reimbursement
as provided by this chapter from the time of the mobilization
declaration.
This chapter shall not reduce or suspend the authority or
responsibility of the department of natural resources under chapter
76.04 RCW.
(((7))) (6) "Mutual aid" means emergency interagency assistance
provided without compensation under an agreement between jurisdictions
under chapter 39.34 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 38.54.020 and 1997 c 49 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Because of the possibility of the occurrence of disastrous fires or
other disasters of unprecedented size and destructiveness, the need to
insure that the state is adequately prepared to respond to such a fire
or disaster, the need to establish a mechanism and a procedure to
provide for reimbursement to state agencies and local fire fighting
agencies that respond to help others in time of need or to a host fire
district that experiences expenses beyond the resources of the fire
district, and generally to protect the public peace, health, safety,
lives, and property of the people of Washington, it is hereby declared
necessary to:
(1) Provide the policy and organizational structure for large scale
mobilization of fire fighting resources in the state through creation
of the Washington state fire services mobilization plan;
(2) Confer upon the ((adjutant general)) chief the powers provided
herein;
(3) Provide a means for reimbursement to state agencies and local
fire jurisdictions that incur expenses when mobilized by the ((adjutant
general)) chief under the Washington state fire services mobilization
plan; and
(4) Provide for reimbursement of the host fire department or fire
protection district when it has: (a) Exhausted all of its resources;
and (b) invoked its local mutual aid network and exhausted those
resources. Upon implementation of state fire mobilization, the host
district resources shall become state fire mobilization resources
consistent with the fire mobilization plan.
It is the intent of the legislature that mutual aid and other
interlocal agreements providing for enhanced emergency response be
encouraged as essential to the public peace, safety, health, and
welfare, and for the protection of the lives and property of the people
of the state of Washington. If possible, mutual aid agreements should
be without stated limitations as to resources available, time, or area.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or interpreted to limit the
eligibility of any nonhost fire protection authority for reimbursement
of expenses incurred in providing fire fighting resources for
mobilization.

Sec. 3 RCW 38.54.030 and 1997 c 49 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state fire protection policy board shall review and make
recommendations to the ((adjutant general)) chief on the refinement and
maintenance of the Washington state fire services mobilization plan,
which shall include the procedures to be used during fire and other
emergencies for coordinating local, regional, and state fire
jurisdiction resources. In carrying out this duty, the fire protection
policy board shall consult with and solicit recommendations from
representatives of state and local fire and emergency management
organizations, regional fire defense boards, and the department of
natural resources. The Washington state fire services mobilization
plan shall be consistent with, and made part of, the Washington state
comprehensive emergency management plan. The ((adjutant general))
chief shall review the fire services mobilization plan as submitted by
the fire protection policy board, recommend changes that may be
necessary, and approve the fire services mobilization plan for
inclusion within the state comprehensive emergency management plan.
It is the responsibility of the ((adjutant general)) chief to
mobilize jurisdictions under the Washington state fire services
mobilization plan. The state fire marshal shall serve as the state
fire resources coordinator when the Washington state fire services
mobilization plan is mobilized.

Sec. 4 RCW 38.54.050 and 1997 c 49 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((department)) Washington state patrol in consultation with the
office of financial management and the Washington military department
shall develop procedures to facilitate reimbursement to state agencies
and jurisdictions from appropriate federal and state funds when state
agencies and jurisdictions are mobilized by the ((adjutant general))
chief under the Washington state fire services mobilization plan. The
((department)) Washington state patrol shall ensure that these
procedures provide reimbursement to the host district in as timely a
manner as possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following sections shall be recodified
as new sections within chapter 43.43 RCW under the subchapter heading
"State Fire Service Mobilization":
(1) RCW 38.54.010 (as amended by this act);
(2) RCW 38.54.020 (as amended by this act);
(3) RCW 38.54.030 (as amended by this act);
(4) RCW 38.54.040;
(5) RCW 38.54.050 (as amended by this act); and
(6) RCW 38.54.900.

--- END ---