BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current
financial responsibility laws for vessels are in need of update and
revision. The legislature intends that, whenever possible, the
standards set for Washington state provide the highest level of
protection consistent with other western states and to ultimately
achieve a more uniform system of financial responsibility on the
Pacific Coast.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.40.011 and 2000 c 69 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Barge" means a vessel that is not self-propelled.
(2) "Cargo vessel" means a self-propelled ship in commerce, other
than a tank vessel, fishing vessel, or a passenger vessel, of three
hundred or more gross tons((, including but not limited to, commercial
fish processing vessels and freighters)).
(((2))) (3) "Bulk" means material that is stored or transported in
a loose, unpackaged liquid, powder, or granular form capable of being
conveyed by a pipe, bucket, chute, or belt system.
(((3))) (4) "Covered vessel" means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, or
passenger vessel.
(((4))) (5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((5))) (6) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology.
(((6))) (7)(a) "Facility" means any structure, group of structures,
equipment, pipeline, or device, other than a vessel, located on or near
the navigable waters of the state that transfers oil in bulk to or from
((a tank)) any vessel with an oil carrying capacity over two hundred
fifty barrels or pipeline, that is used for producing, storing,
handling, transferring, processing, or transporting oil in bulk.
(b) A facility does not include any: (i) Railroad car, motor
vehicle, or other rolling stock while transporting oil over the
highways or rail lines of this state; (ii) retail motor vehicle motor
fuel outlet; (iii) facility that is operated as part of an exempt
agricultural activity as provided in RCW 82.04.330; (iv) underground
storage tank regulated by the department or a local government under
chapter 90.76 RCW; or (v) marine fuel outlet that does not dispense
more than three thousand gallons of fuel to a ship that is not a
covered vessel, in a single transaction.
(((7))) (8) "Fishing vessel" means a self-propelled commercial
vessel of three hundred or more gross tons that is used for catching or
processing fish.
(9) "Gross tons" means tonnage as determined by the United States
coast guard under 33 C.F.R. section 138.30.
(10) "Hazardous substances" means any substance listed as of March
1, 2003, in Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted ((August 14,
1989,)) under section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive
environmental response, compensation, and liability act of 1980, as
amended by P.L. 99-499. The following are not hazardous substances for
purposes of this chapter:
(a) Wastes listed as F001 through F028 in Table 302.4; and
(b) Wastes listed as K001 through K136 in Table 302.4.
(((8) "Inland barge" means any barge operating on the waters of the
state and certified by the coast guard as an inland barge.
(9))) (11) "Navigable waters of the state" means those waters of
the state, and their adjoining shorelines, that are subject to the ebb
and flow of the tide and/or are presently used, have been used in the
past, or may be susceptible for use to transport intrastate,
interstate, or foreign commerce.
(((10))) (12) "Oil" or "oils" means any naturally occurring liquid
hydrocarbons at atmospheric temperature and pressure coming from the
earth, including condensate and natural gasoline, and any fractionation
thereof, including, but not limited to, crude oil, petroleum, gasoline,
fuel oil, diesel oil, oil sludge, oil refuse, and oil mixed with wastes
other than dredged spoil. Oil does not include any substance listed as
of March 1, 2003, in Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted ((August
14, 1989,)) under section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive
environmental response, compensation, and liability act of 1980, as
amended by P.L. 99-499.
(((11))) (13) "Offshore facility" means any facility located in,
on, or under any of the navigable waters of the state, but does not
include a facility any part of which is located in, on, or under any
land of the state, other than submerged land.
(((12))) (14) "Onshore facility" means any facility any part of
which is located in, on, or under any land of the state, other than
submerged land, that because of its location, could reasonably be
expected to cause substantial harm to the environment by discharging
oil into or on the navigable waters of the state or the adjoining
shorelines.
(((13))) (15)(a) "Owner or operator" means (i) in the case of a
vessel, any person owning, operating, or chartering by demise, the
vessel; (ii) in the case of an onshore or offshore facility, any person
owning or operating the facility; and (iii) in the case of an abandoned
vessel or onshore or offshore facility, the person who owned or
operated the vessel or facility immediately before its abandonment.
(b) "Operator" does not include any person who owns the land
underlying a facility if the person is not involved in the operations
of the facility.
(((14))) (16) "Passenger vessel" means a ship of three hundred or
more gross tons with a fuel capacity of at least six thousand gallons
carrying passengers for compensation.
(((15))) (17) "Ship" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other
floating craft of any kind.
(((16))) (18) "Spill" means an unauthorized discharge of oil into
the waters of the state.
(((17))) (19) "Tank vessel" means a ship that is constructed or
adapted to carry, or that carries, oil in bulk as cargo or cargo
residue, and that:
(a) Operates on the waters of the state; or
(b) Transfers oil in a port or place subject to the jurisdiction of
this state.
(((18))) (20) "Waters of the state" includes lakes, rivers, ponds,
streams, inland waters, underground water, salt waters, estuaries,
tidal flats, beaches and lands adjoining the seacoast of the state,
sewers, and all other surface waters and watercourses within the
jurisdiction of the state of Washington.

Sec. 3 RCW 88.40.020 and 2000 c 69 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any ((inland)) barge that transports hazardous substances in
bulk as cargo, using any port or place in the state of Washington or
the navigable waters of the state shall establish evidence of financial
responsibility in the amount of the greater of ((one)) five million
dollars, or ((one)) three hundred ((fifty)) dollars per gross ton of
such vessel.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) or (c) of this subsection, a tank
vessel that carries oil as cargo in bulk shall demonstrate financial
responsibility to pay at least five hundred million dollars. The
amount of financial responsibility required under this subsection is
one billion dollars after January 1, 2004.
(b) The director by rule may establish a lesser standard of
financial responsibility for ((barges)) tank vessels of three hundred
gross tons or less. The standard shall set the level of financial
responsibility based on the quantity of cargo the ((barge)) tank vessel
is capable of carrying. The director shall not set the standard for
((barges)) tank vessels of three hundred gross tons or less below that
required under federal law.
(c) The owner or operator of a tank vessel who is a member of an
international protection and indemnity mutual organization and is
covered for oil pollution risks up to the amounts required under this
section is not required to demonstrate financial responsibility under
this chapter. The director ((may)) shall require the owner or operator
of a tank vessel to prove membership in such an organization.
(3) A cargo vessel or passenger vessel that carries oil as fuel
shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay ((the greater of at
least six hundred dollars per gross ton or five hundred thousand)) at
least three hundred million dollars.
(4) A fishing vessel while on the navigable waters of the state
must demonstrate financial responsibility in the following amounts:
(a) For a fishing vessel carrying predominantly nonpersistent product,
one hundred thirty-three dollars and forty cents per incident, for each
barrel of total oil storage capacity, persistent and nonpersistent
product, on the vessel or one million three hundred thirty-four
thousand dollars, whichever is greater; or (b) for a fishing vessel
carrying predominantly persistent product, four hundred dollars and
twenty cents per incident, for each barrel of total oil storage
capacity, persistent product and nonpersistent product, on the vessel
or six million six hundred seventy thousand dollars, whichever is
greater.
(5) The documentation of financial responsibility shall demonstrate
the ability of the document holder to meet state and federal financial
liability requirements for the actual costs for removal of oil spills,
for natural resource damages, and for necessary expenses related to a
spill or natural resource damage.
(((5) The department may by rule set a lesser amount of financial
responsibility for a tank vessel that meets standards for construction,
propulsion, equipment, and personnel established by the department.
The department shall require as a minimum level of financial
responsibility under this subsection the same level of financial
responsibility required under federal law.))
(6) This section shall not apply to a covered vessel owned or
operated by the federal government or by a state or local government.

Sec. 4 RCW 88.40.040 and 2000 c 69 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The department shall deny entry to the waters of the state to
any vessel that does not meet the financial responsibility requirements
of this chapter)) It is unlawful for any vessel required to have
financial responsibility under this chapter to enter or operate on
Washington waters without meeting the requirements of this chapter or
rules adopted under this chapter, except when necessary to avoid injury
to the vessel's crew or passengers. Any vessel owner or operator that
does not meet the financial responsibility requirements of this chapter
and any rules prescribed thereunder or the federal oil pollution act of
1990 shall be reported by the department to the United States coast
guard.
(2) The department shall enforce section 1016 of the federal oil
pollution act of 1990 as authorized by section 1019 of the federal act.

--- END ---