BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.08.250 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 914 and 2001 c 289
s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The money received by the state treasurer from fees, fines,
forfeitures, penalties, reimbursements or assessments by any court
organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, or chapter 2.08 RCW, shall be
deposited in the public safety and education account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. The legislature shall appropriate the
funds in the account to promote traffic safety education, highway
safety, criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation,
judicial education, the judicial information system, civil
representation of indigent persons under RCW 43.08.260 (as recodified
by this act), winter recreation parking, drug court operations, and
state game programs. During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2003,
the legislature may appropriate moneys from the public safety and
education account for purposes of appellate indigent defense and other
operations of the office of public defense, the criminal litigation
unit of the attorney general's office, the treatment alternatives to
street crimes program, crime victims advocacy programs, justice
information network telecommunication planning, treatment for
supplemental security income clients, sexual assault treatment,
operations of the office of administrator for the courts, security in
the common schools, alternative school start-up grants, programs for
disruptive students, criminal justice data collection, Washington state
patrol criminal justice activities, drug court operations, unified
family courts, local court backlog assistance, financial assistance to
local jurisdictions for extraordinary costs incurred in the
adjudication of criminal cases, domestic violence treatment and related
services, the department of corrections' costs in implementing chapter
196, Laws of 1999, reimbursement of local governments for costs
associated with implementing criminal and civil justice legislation,
the replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based
tracking system, and methamphetamine-related enforcement, education,
training, and drug and alcohol treatment services.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.08.260 and 1997 c 319 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature recognizes the ethical obligation of
attorneys to represent clients without interference by third parties in
the discharge of professional obligations to clients. However, to
ensure the most beneficial use of state resources, the legislature
finds that it is within the authority of the legislature to specify the
categories of legal cases in which qualified legal aid programs may
provide civil representation with state moneys. Accordingly, moneys
appropriated for civil legal representation ((pursuant to this
section)) shall not be used for legal representation that is either
outside the scope of this section or prohibited by this section.
(b) Nothing in this section is intended to limit the authority of
existing entities, including but not limited to the Washington state
bar association, the public disclosure commission, the state auditor,
and the federal legal services corporation to resolve issues within
their respective jurisdictions.
(2) Any money appropriated by the legislature ((from the public
safety and education account pursuant to RCW 43.08.250 or from any
other state fund or account)) for civil representation of indigent
persons shall be deposited in the state civil legal services account
under section 5 of this act and used solely for the purpose of
administering the account and contracting with qualified legal aid
programs for legal representation of indigent persons in matters
relating to: (a) Domestic relations and family law matters, (b) public
assistance and health care, (c) housing and utilities, (d) social
security, (e) mortgage foreclosures, (f) home protection bankruptcies,
(g) consumer fraud and unfair sales practices, (h) rights of residents
of long-term care facilities, (i) wills, estates, and living wills, (j)
elder abuse, and (k) guardianship.
(3) For purposes of this section, a "qualified legal aid program"
means a not-for-profit corporation incorporated and operating
exclusively in Washington which has received basic field funding for
the provision of civil legal services to indigents from the federal
legal services corporation or that has received funding for civil legal
services for indigents under this section before July 1, 1997.
(4) The ((department of community, trade, and economic
development)) administrator for the courts shall establish a
distribution formula based on the distribution by county of individuals
with incomes below the official federal poverty level guidelines. When
entering into a contract with a qualified legal services provider under
this section, the ((department)) administrator for the courts shall
require the provider to provide legal services in a manner that
maximizes geographic access in accordance with the formula established
in this subsection (4).
(5) Funds distributed to qualified legal aid programs under this
section may not be used directly or indirectly for:
(a) Lobbying.
(i) For purposes of this section, "lobbying" means any personal
service, advertisement, telegram, telephone communication, letter,
printed or written matter, or other device directly or indirectly
intended to influence any member of congress or any other federal,
state, or local nonjudicial official, whether elected or appointed:
(A) In connection with any act, bill, resolution, or similar
legislation by the congress of the United States or by any state or
local legislative body, or any administrative rule, rule-making
activity, standard, rate, or other enactment by any federal, state, or
local administrative agency;
(B) In connection with any referendum, initiative, constitutional
amendment, or any similar procedure of the congress, any state
legislature, any local council, or any similar governing body acting in
a legislative capacity; or
(C) In connection with inclusion of any provision in a legislative
measure appropriating funds to, or defining or limiting the functions
or authority of, the recipient of funds under this section.
(ii) "Lobbying" does not include the response of an employee of a
legal aid program to a written request from a governmental agency, an
elected or appointed official, or committee on a specific matter. This
exception does not authorize communication with anyone other than the
requesting party, or agent or employee of such agency, official, or
committee.
(b) Grass roots lobbying. For purposes of this section, "grass
roots lobbying" means preparation, production, or dissemination of
information the purpose of which is to encourage the public at large,
or any definable segment thereof, to contact legislators or their staff
in support of or in opposition to pending or proposed legislation; or
contribute to or participate in a demonstration, march, rally, lobbying
campaign, or letter writing or telephone campaign for the purpose of
influencing the course of pending or proposed legislation.
(c) Class action lawsuits.
(d) Participating in or identifying the program with prohibited
political activities. For purposes of this section, "prohibited
political activities" means (i) any activity directed toward the
success or failure of a political party, a candidate for partisan or
nonpartisan office, a partisan political group, or a ballot measure;
(ii) advertising or contributing or soliciting financial support for or
against any candidate, political group, or ballot measure; or (iii)
voter registration or transportation activities.
(e) Representation in fee-generating cases. For purposes of this
section, "fee-generating" means a case that might reasonably be
expected to result in a fee for legal services if undertaken by a
private attorney. The charging of a fee pursuant to subsection (6) of
this section does not establish the fee-generating nature of a case.
A fee-generating case may be accepted when: (i) The case has been
rejected by the local lawyer referral services or by two private
attorneys; (ii) neither the referral service nor two private attorneys
will consider the case without payment of a consultation fee; (iii)
after consultation with the appropriate representatives of the private
bar, the program has determined that the type of case is one that
private attorneys do not ordinarily accept, or do not accept without
prepayment of a fee; or (iv) the director of the program or the
director's designee has determined that referral of the case to the
private bar is not possible because documented attempts to refer
similar cases in the past have been futile, or because emergency
circumstances compel immediate action before referral can be made, but
the client is advised that, if appropriate and consistent with
professional responsibility, referral will be attempted at a later
time.
(f) Organizing any association, union, or federation, or
representing a labor union. However, nothing in this subsection (5)(f)
prohibits the provision of legal services to clients as otherwise
permitted by this section.
(g) Representation of undocumented aliens.
(h) Picketing, demonstrations, strikes, or boycotts.
(i) Engaging in inappropriate solicitation. For purposes of this
section, "inappropriate solicitation" means promoting the assertion of
specific legal claims among persons who know of their rights to make a
claim and who decline to do so. Nothing in this subsection precludes
a legal services program or its employees from providing information
regarding legal rights and responsibilities or providing information
regarding the program's services and intake procedures through
community legal education activities, responding to an individual's
specific question about whether the individual should consult with an
attorney or take legal action, or responding to an individual's
specific request for information about the individual's legal rights or
request for assistance in connection with a specific legal problem.
(j) Conducting training programs that: (i) Advocate particular
public policies; (ii) encourage or facilitate political activities,
labor or antilabor activities, boycotts, picketing, strikes, or
demonstrations; or (iii) attempt to influence legislation or rule
making. Nothing in this subsection (5)(j) precludes representation of
clients as otherwise permitted by this section.
(6) The ((department)) administrator for the courts may establish
requirements for client participation in the provision of civil legal
services under this section, including but not limited to copayments
and sliding fee scales.
(7)(a) Contracts entered into by the ((department of community,
trade, and economic development)) administrator for the courts with
qualified legal services programs under this section must specify that
the program's expenditures of moneys distributed under this section:
(i) Must be audited annually by an independent outside auditor.
These audit results must be provided to the ((department of community,
trade, and economic development)) administrator for the courts; and
(ii) Are subject to audit by the state auditor.
(b)(i) Any entity auditing a legal services program under this
section shall have access to all records of the legal services program
to the full extent necessary to determine compliance with this section,
with the exception of confidential information protected by the United
States Constitution, the state Constitution, the attorney-client
privilege, and applicable rules of attorney conduct.
(ii) The legal services program shall have a system allowing for
production of case-specific information, including client eligibility
and case type, to demonstrate compliance with this section, with the
exception of confidential information protected by the United States
Constitution, the state Constitution, the attorney-client privilege,
and applicable rules of attorney conduct. Such information shall be
available to any entity that audits the program.
(8) The ((department of community, trade, and economic
development)) administrator for the courts must recover or withhold
amounts determined by an audit to have been used in violation of this
section.
(9) The ((department of community, trade, and economic
development)) administrator for the courts may adopt rules to implement
this section. In addition to all other rule-making requirements and
procedures, the supreme court must approve proposed rules. The supreme
court may also recommend rules to be adopted by the administrator for
the courts.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.08.270 and 1997 c 319 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The joint legislative civil legal services oversight committee is
established.
(1) The committee's members are one member from each of the
minority and majority caucuses of the house of representatives, who are
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and one
member from each of the minority and majority caucuses of the senate,
who are appointed by the president of the senate.
(2)(a) The committee shall oversee the provision of civil legal
services funded through RCW 43.08.260 (as recodified by this act) and
shall act as a forum for discussion of issues related to state-funded
civil legal services.
(b) By December 1, 1997, and by December 1st of each year
thereafter, the committee must report to the appropriate standing
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the provision of
legal services under RCW 43.08.260 (as recodified by this act).
(3) The committee chairman is selected by the members and shall
serve a one-year term. The chairman position rotates between the house
and senate members and the political parties.
(4) The committee shall meet at least four times during each fiscal
year. The committee shall accept public testimony at a minimum of two
of these meetings.

Sec. 4 RCW 2.56.030 and 2002 c 49 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The administrator for the courts shall, under the supervision and
direction of the chief justice:
(1) Examine the administrative methods and systems employed in the
offices of the judges, clerks, stenographers, and employees of the
courts and make recommendations, through the chief justice, for the
improvement of the same;
(2) Examine the state of the dockets of the courts and determine
the need for assistance by any court;
(3) Make recommendations to the chief justice relating to the
assignment of judges where courts are in need of assistance and carry
out the direction of the chief justice as to the assignments of judges
to counties and districts where the courts are in need of assistance;
(4) Collect and compile statistical and other data and make reports
of the business transacted by the courts and transmit the same to the
chief justice to the end that proper action may be taken in respect
thereto;
(5) Prepare and submit budget estimates of state appropriations
necessary for the maintenance and operation of the judicial system and
make recommendations in respect thereto;
(6) Collect statistical and other data and make reports relating to
the expenditure of public moneys, state and local, for the maintenance
and operation of the judicial system and the offices connected
therewith;
(7) Obtain reports from clerks of courts in accordance with law or
rules adopted by the supreme court of this state on cases and other
judicial business in which action has been delayed beyond periods of
time specified by law or rules of court and make report thereof to
supreme court of this state;
(8) Act as secretary of the judicial conference referred to in RCW
2.56.060;
(9) Submit annually, as of February 1st, to the chief justice, a
report of the activities of the administrator's office for the
preceding calendar year including activities related to courthouse
security;
(10) Administer programs and standards for the training and
education of judicial personnel;
(11) Examine the need for new superior court and district judge
positions under a weighted caseload analysis that takes into account
the time required to hear all the cases in a particular court and the
amount of time existing judges have available to hear cases in that
court. The results of the weighted caseload analysis shall be reviewed
by the board for judicial administration which shall make
recommendations to the legislature. It is the intent of the
legislature that weighted caseload analysis become the basis for
creating additional district court positions, and recommendations
should address that objective;
(12) Provide staff to the judicial retirement account plan under
chapter 2.14 RCW;
(13) Attend to such other matters as may be assigned by the supreme
court of this state;
(14) Within available funds, develop a curriculum for a general
understanding of child development, placement, and treatment resources,
as well as specific legal skills and knowledge of relevant statutes
including chapters 13.32A, 13.34, and 13.40 RCW, cases, court rules,
interviewing skills, and special needs of the abused or neglected
child. This curriculum shall be completed and made available to all
juvenile court judges, court personnel, and service providers and be
updated yearly to reflect changes in statutes, court rules, or case
law;
(15) Develop, in consultation with the entities set forth in RCW
2.56.150(3), a comprehensive statewide curriculum for persons who act
as guardians ad litem under Title 13 or 26 RCW. The curriculum shall
be made available July 1, 1997, and include specialty sections on child
development, child sexual abuse, child physical abuse, child neglect,
clinical and forensic investigative and interviewing techniques, family
reconciliation and mediation services, and relevant statutory and legal
requirements. The curriculum shall be made available to all superior
court judges, court personnel, and all persons who act as guardians ad
litem;
(16) Develop a curriculum for a general understanding of crimes of
malicious harassment, as well as specific legal skills and knowledge of
RCW 9A.36.080, relevant cases, court rules, and the special needs of
malicious harassment victims. This curriculum shall be made available
to all superior court and court of appeals judges and to all justices
of the supreme court;
(17) Develop, in consultation with the criminal justice training
commission and the commissions established under chapters 43.113,
43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a curriculum for a general understanding of
ethnic and cultural diversity and its implications for working with
youth of color and their families. The curriculum shall be available
to all superior court judges and court commissioners assigned to
juvenile court, and other court personnel. Ethnic and cultural
diversity training shall be provided annually so as to incorporate
cultural sensitivity and awareness into the daily operation of juvenile
courts statewide;
(18) Authorize the use of closed circuit television and other
electronic equipment in judicial proceedings. The administrator shall
promulgate necessary standards and procedures and shall provide
technical assistance to courts as required;
(19) Develop a Washington family law handbook in accordance with
RCW 2.56.180;
(20) Administer funds for civil legal representation purposes under
RCW 43.08.260 (as recodified by this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The state civil legal services account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys appropriated
from any source, fund, or account for civil representation of indigent
persons shall be deposited in the civil legal services account. Any
revenues deposited directly into the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
civil representation of indigent persons as authorized in RCW 43.08.260
and 43.08.270 (both as recodified by this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 43.08.260 (as amended by this act) and
43.08.270 (as amended by this act) are each recodified as a new chapter
in Title 2 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 5 of this act is added to the new
chapter created in section 6 of this act.

--- END ---