BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.87.010 and 2002 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, except where a different
interpretation is required by the context:
(1) "Owner" means any person having title to or control of a
conveyance, as guardian, trustee, lessee, or otherwise;
(2) "Conveyance" means an elevator, escalator, dumbwaiter, belt
manlift, automobile parking elevator, moving walk, and other elevating
devices, as defined in this section;
(3) "Existing installations" means an installation defined as an
"installation, existing" in this chapter or in rules adopted under this
chapter;
(4) "Elevator" means a hoisting or lowering machine equipped with
a car or platform that moves in guides and serves two or more floors or
landings of a building or structure;
(a) "Passenger elevator" means an elevator (i) on which passengers
are permitted to ride and (ii) that may be used to carry freight or
materials when the load carried does not exceed the capacity of the
elevator;
(b) "Freight elevator" means an elevator (i) used primarily for
carrying freight and (ii) on which only the operator, the persons
necessary for loading and unloading, and other employees approved by
the department are permitted to ride;
(c) "Sidewalk elevator" means a freight elevator that: (i)
Operates between a sidewalk or other area outside the building and
floor levels inside the building below the outside area, (ii) has no
landing opening into the building at its upper limit of travel, and
(iii) is not used to carry automobiles;
(d) "Hand elevator" means an elevator utilizing manual energy to
move the car;
(e) "Inclined elevator" means an elevator that travels at an angle
of inclination of seventy degrees or less from the horizontal;
(f) "Multideck elevator" means an elevator having two or more
compartments located one immediately above the other;
(g) "Observation elevator" means an elevator designed to permit
exterior viewing by passengers while the car is traveling;
(h) "Power elevator" means an elevator utilizing energy other than
gravitational or manual to move the car;
(i) "Electric elevator" means an elevator where the energy is
applied by means of an electric driving machine;
(j) "Hydraulic elevator" means an elevator where the energy is
applied by means of a liquid under pressure in a cylinder equipped with
a plunger or piston;
(k) "Direct-plunger hydraulic elevator" means a hydraulic elevator
having a plunger or cylinder directly attached to the car frame or
platform;
(l) "Electro-hydraulic elevator" means a direct-plunger elevator
where liquid is pumped under pressure directly into the cylinder by a
pump driven by an electric motor;
(m) "Maintained-pressure hydraulic elevator" means a direct-plunger
elevator where liquid under pressure is available at all times for
transfer into the cylinder;
(n) "Roped hydraulic elevator" means a hydraulic elevator having
its plunger or piston connected to the car with wire ropes or
indirectly coupled to the car by means of wire ropes and sheaves;
(o) "Rack and pinion elevator" means a power elevator, with or
without a counterweight, that is supported, raised, and lowered by a
motor or motors that drive a pinion or pinions on a stationary rack
mounted in the hoistway;
(p) "Screw column elevator" means a power elevator having an
uncounterweighted car that is supported, raised, and lowered by means
of a screw thread;
(q) "Rooftop elevator" means a power passenger or freight elevator
that operates between a landing at roof level and one landing below and
opens onto the exterior roof level of a building through a horizontal
opening;
(r) "Special purpose personnel elevator" means an elevator that is
limited in size, capacity, and speed, and permanently installed in
structures such as grain elevators, radio antenna, bridge towers,
underground facilities, dams, power plants, and similar structures to
provide vertical transportation of authorized personnel and their tools
and equipment only;
(s) "Workmen's construction elevator" means an elevator that is not
part of the permanent structure of a building and is used to raise and
lower workers and other persons connected with, or related to, the
building project;
(t) "Boat launching elevator" means ((an elevator, as defined by
subsections (2) and (4) of this section,)) a conveyance that serves a
boat launching structure and a beach or water surface and is used for
the carrying or handling of boats in which people ride;
(u) "Limited-use/limited-application elevator" means a power
passenger elevator where the use and application is limited by size,
capacity, speed, and rise, intended principally to provide vertical
transportation for people with physical disabilities;
(5) "Escalator" means a power-driven, inclined, continuous stairway
used for raising and lowering passengers;
(6) "Dumbwaiter" means a hoisting and lowering mechanism equipped
with a car (a) that moves in guides in a substantially vertical
direction, (b) the floor area of which does not exceed nine square
feet, (c) the inside height of which does not exceed four feet, (d) the
capacity of which does not exceed five hundred pounds, and (e) that is
used exclusively for carrying materials;
(7) "Automobile parking elevator" means an elevator: (a) Located
in either a stationary or horizontally moving hoistway; (b) used
exclusively for parking automobiles where, during the parking process,
each automobile is moved either under its own power or by means of a
power-driven transfer device onto and off the elevator directly into
parking spaces or cubicles in line with the elevator; and (c) in which
no persons are normally stationed on any level except the receiving
level;
(8) "Moving walk" means a passenger carrying device (a) on which
passengers stand or walk and (b) on which the passenger carrying
surface remains parallel to its direction of motion;
(9) "Belt manlift" means a power driven endless belt provided with
steps or platforms and a hand hold for the transportation of personnel
from floor to floor;
(10) "Department" means the department of labor and industries;
(11) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her
representative;
(12) "Inspector" means an elevator inspector of the department or
an elevator inspector of a municipality having in effect an elevator
ordinance pursuant to RCW 70.87.200;
(13) "Permit" means a permit issued by the department to erect,
construct, install, alter, modernize, relocate, or operate a
conveyance;
(14) "Person" means this state, a political subdivision, any public
or private corporation, any firm, or any other entity as well as an
individual;
(15) "One-man capacity manlift" means a single passenger, hand-powered counterweighted device, or electric-powered device, that
travels vertically in guides and serves two or more landings;
(16) "Private residence conveyance" means a conveyance installed in
or on the premises of a single-family dwelling and operated for
transporting persons or property from one elevation to another;
(17) "Material hoist" means a hoist that is not a part of a
permanent structure used to raise or lower materials during
construction, alteration, or demolition. It is not applicable to the
temporary use of permanently installed personnel elevators as material
hoists;
(18) "Material lift" means a lift that (a) is permanently
installed, (b) is comprised of a car or platform that moves in guides,
(c) serves two or more floors or landings, (d) travels in a vertical or
inclined position, (e) is an isolated, self-contained lift, (f) is not
part of a conveying system, and (g) is installed in a commercial or
industrial area not accessible to the general public or intended to be
operated by the general public;
(19) "Casket lift" means a lift that (a) is installed at a
mortuary, (b) is designed exclusively for carrying of caskets, (c)
moves in guides in a basically vertical direction, and (d) serves two
or more floors or landings;
(20) "Wheelchair lift" means a lift that travels in a vertical or
inclined direction and is designed for use by physically handicapped
persons;
(21) "Stairway chair lift" means a lift that travels in a basically
inclined direction and is designed for use by physically handicapped
persons;
(22) "Personnel hoist" means a hoist that is not a part of a
permanent structure, is installed inside or outside buildings during
construction, alteration, or demolition, and used to raise or lower
workers and other persons connected with, or related to, the building
project. The hoist may also be used for transportation of materials;
(23) "Advisory committee" means the elevator advisory committee as
described in this chapter;
(24) "Elevator helper/apprentice" means a person who works under
the general direction of a licensed elevator mechanic. A license is
not required to be an elevator helper/apprentice;
(25) "Elevator mechanic" means any person who possesses an elevator
mechanic license in accordance with this chapter and who is engaged in
erecting, constructing, installing, altering, ((serving [servicing],))
repairing, wiring, dismantling, modernizing, relocating, or maintaining
((elevators or related)) conveyances covered by this chapter;
(26) "License" means a written license, duly issued by the
department, authorizing a person, firm, or company to carry on the
business of erecting, constructing, installing, altering,
((servicing,)) repairing, wiring, dismantling, modernizing, relocating,
or maintaining ((elevators or related)) conveyances covered by this
chapter;
(27) "Elevator contractor license" means a license that is issued
to an elevator contractor who has met the qualification requirements
established in RCW 70.87.240;
(28) "Elevator mechanic license" means a license that is issued to
a person who has met the qualification requirements established in RCW
70.87.240;
(29) "Licensee" means the elevator mechanic or elevator contractor;
(30) "Repair" means a process for the purpose of ensuring
performance in accordance with this chapter and not amounting to an
alteration, in which a part, device, or component that is basically the
same as the original is replaced, or the original is rehabilitated,
reconditioned, or renewed and returned into place;
(31) "Replacement" or "replace" means a process for the purpose of
ensuring performance in accordance with this chapter and not amounting
to an alteration, in which a new part, device, or component is
substituted for a part, device, or component that is removed in its
entirety;
(32) "Maintenance" means a scheduled or routine process for the
purpose of ensuring performance in accordance with this chapter and not
amounting to an alteration, in which parts, devices, or components are
examined, serviced, lubricated, cleaned, repaired, replaced, or
adjusted;
(33) "Alteration" means any process, including but not limited to
the replacement or repair of any part, device, or component modifying
any safety system, speed control, or travel of the conveyance. An
alteration requires testing of the conveyance before it is placed in or
returned to service. The department may identify by rule processes or
activities that constitute an alteration;
(34) "Public agency" means a county, incorporated city or town,
municipal corporation, state agency, institution of higher education,
political subdivision, or other public agency and includes any
department, bureau, office, board, commission, or institution of such
entity;
(35) "Platform" means a rigid surface that is maintained in a
horizontal position at all times when in use, and upon which passengers
stand or a load is carried.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.87.020 and 2002 c 98 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this chapter is to provide for safety of life
and limb, to promote safety awareness, and to ensure the safe, design,
mechanical and electrical operation, erection, installation,
construction, alteration, maintenance, ((inspection, and repair))
relocation, wiring, dismantling, or modernization of conveyances, and
all such operation, erection, installation, alteration, inspection, and
repair subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be reasonably
safe to persons and property and in conformity with the provisions of
this chapter and the applicable statutes of the state of Washington,
and all orders, and rules of the department. The use of unsafe and
defective lifting devices imposes a substantial probability of serious
and preventable injury to employees and the public exposed to unsafe
conditions. The prevention of these injuries and protection of
employees and the public from unsafe conditions is in the best interest
of the people of this state. ((Elevator)) Personnel performing work
covered by this chapter must, by documented training or experience or
both, be familiar with the operation and safety functions of the
components and equipment. Training and experience must include, but
not be limited to, recognizing the safety hazards and performing the
procedures to which ((they)) the personnel performing work covered by
this chapter are assigned in conformance with the requirements of ((the
[this])) this chapter. This chapter establishes the minimum standards
for ((elevator)) personnel performing work on conveyances.
(2) This chapter is not intended to prevent the use of systems,
methods, or devices of equivalent or superior quality, strength, fire
resistance, code effectiveness, durability, and safety to those
required by this chapter, provided that there is technical
documentation to demonstrate the equivalency of the system, method, or
device, as prescribed in this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter.
(3) In any suit for damages allegedly caused by a failure or
malfunction of the conveyance, conformity with the rules of the
department is prima facie evidence that the operation, erection,
installation, alteration, maintenance, and inspection((, and repair))
of the conveyance is reasonably safe to persons and property.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.87.030 and 2002 c 98 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall adopt rules governing the mechanical and
electrical operation, erection, installation, alterations, inspection,
construction, acceptance tests, relocation, modernization, wiring,
dismantling, and ((repair)) maintenance of conveyances that are
necessary and appropriate and shall also adopt minimum standards
governing existing installations. In the execution of this rule-making
power and before the adoption of rules, the department shall consider
the rules for the safe mechanical operation, erection, installation,
alteration, inspection, and ((repair)) maintenance of conveyances,
including the American National Standards Institute Safety Code for
Personnel and Material Hoists, the American Society of Mechanical
Engineers Safety Code for Elevators, Dumbwaiters, and Escalators, and
any amendatory or supplemental provisions thereto. The department by
rule shall establish a schedule of fees to pay the costs incurred by
the department for the work related to administration and enforcement
of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of the
department to prescribe or enforce general or special safety orders as
provided by law.
The department may consult with: Engineering authorities and
organizations concerned with standard safety codes; rules and
regulations governing the operation, maintenance, servicing,
construction, alteration, installation, and/or inspection of
((elevators, dumbwaiters, and escalators, etcetera)) conveyances; and
the qualifications that are adequate, reasonable, and necessary for the
elevator mechanic, contractor, and inspector.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.87.050 and 2002 c 98 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The operation, construction, erection, installation, alteration,
maintenance, inspection, modernization, wiring, and ((repair))
dismantling of any conveyance located in, or used in connection with,
any building owned by the state, a county, or a political subdivision,
other than those located within and owned by a city having an elevator
code, shall be under the jurisdiction of the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.87.060 and 1983 c 123 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The person erecting, constructing, installing, relocating,
modernizing, repairing, wiring, dismantling, or altering a conveyance
is responsible for its operation and maintenance until the department
has issued an operating permit for the conveyance, except during the
period when a limited operating permit in accordance with RCW
70.87.090(2) is in effect, and is also responsible for all tests of a
new, relocated, or altered conveyance until the department has issued
an operating permit for the conveyance.
(2) The owner or his or her duly appointed agent shall be
responsible for the safe operation and proper maintenance of the
conveyance after the department has issued the operating permit and
also during the period of effectiveness of any limited operating permit
in accordance with RCW 70.87.090(2). The owner shall be responsible
for all periodic tests required by the department.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.87.080 and 1983 c 123 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An installation or alteration permit shall be obtained from the
department before erecting, constructing, installing, relocating,
modernizing, wiring, dismantling, or altering a conveyance in any place
or structure.
(2) The installer of the conveyance shall submit an application for
the permit in duplicate, in a form that the department may prescribe.
(3) The permit issued by the department shall be kept posted
conspicuously at the site of installation.
(4) No permit is required for repairs and replacement normally
necessary for maintenance and made with parts of equivalent materials,
strength, and design.
(5) After July 1, 2004, the department may issue an installation or
alteration permit only to the holder of a valid elevator contractor's
license under this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.87.110 and 1983 c 123
s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The requirements of this chapter are intended to apply to all
conveyances except as modified or waived by the department. They are
intended to be modified or waived whenever any requirements are shown
to be impracticable, such as involving expense not justified by the
protection secured. However, the department shall not allow the
modification or waiver unless equivalent or safer construction is
secured in other ways. An exception applies only to the installation
covered by the application for waiver.
(2) The provisions of RCW 70.87.180(2), 70.87.230, and
70.87.240(2), insofar as they relate to the maintenance of a conveyance
other than a passenger elevator to which access by the general public
is not restricted, do not apply to a conveyance used in a facility in
which agricultural products are stored, food products are processed,
goods are manufactured, energy is generated, or similar industrial or
agricultural processes are performed, if the owner of the conveyance:
(a) Provides to all employees required or allowed to perform
maintenance on the conveyance adequate training to ensure the safety of
employees and adherence to the published operating specifications of
the conveyance manufacturer;
(b) Allows and restricts maintenance to be performed on the
conveyance to only:
(i) A licensed elevator contractor or mechanic;
(ii) A worker who (A) is regularly employed by the owner; (B) has
successfully completed the training required by (a) of this subsection;
and (C) has attained journeyman status in an electrical or mechanical
trade, only if the employer has or utilizes an established journeyman
program to train its electrical or mechanical trade employees and such
employees perform conveyor maintenance in the course of their regular
employment; or
(iii) A person authorized under subsection (3) of this section; and
(c) Maintains a (i) maintenance log describing the maintenance work
performed on the conveyance and identifying the person who performed
the work; and (ii) training log for each employee allowed to perform
conveyance maintenance describing the course of study provided,
including whether it is general or conveyance specific, and identifying
when the employee has successfully completed the training required by
(a) of this subsection and when such training was completed.
(3) The provisions of RCW 70.87.180(2), 70.87.230, and
70.87.240(2), insofar as they relate to the installation or maintenance
of a material lift, conveyor, and related equipment that is subject to
the standard designation B20.1 as established by the American Society
of Mechanical Engineers and not designed or intended to convey one or
more workers, do not apply to a person performing such work if:
(a) The person is employed by a licensed elevator contractor
engaged in the business of installing and maintaining such equipment
and has successfully completed a course of training, including any
training provided by the manufacturer, to ensure the safety of
employees and adherence to the published installation and operating
specifications of the conveyance manufacturer; and
(b) The employer maintains a (i) log identifying the equipment
installed or maintained, describing the work performed, and identifying
the person who performed the work; and (ii) training log describing the
course of study applicable to each conveyance and identifying each
employee who has successfully completed the training required by (a) of
this subsection and when such training was completed.
(4) The provisions of RCW 70.87.180(2), 70.87.230, and
70.87.240(2), insofar as they relate to the maintenance of a conveyance
located in a private residence, do not apply to a person performing
such maintenance work at the direction of the owner if the owner of the
conveyance and the residence resides in the residence where the
conveyance is located.
(5) It is a violation of RCW 49.17.060 for:
(a) An owner to allow a conveyance covered by subsection (2) of
this section to be maintained by a person other than as qualified
pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section; or
(b) An owner or employer to fail to maintain records required under
subsection (2)(c) or (3)(b) of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.87.125 and 2002 c 98 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A license issued under this chapter may be suspended, revoked,
or subject to civil penalty by the department upon verification that
any one or more of the following reasons exist:
(a) Any false statement as to a material matter in the application;
(b) Fraud, misrepresentation, or bribery in securing a license;
(c) Failure to notify the department and the owner or lessee of
((an elevator)) a conveyance or related mechanisms of any condition not
in compliance with this chapter; and
(d) A violation of any provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department may suspend or revoke a permit if:
(a) The permit was obtained through fraud or by error if, in the
absence of error, the department would not have issued the permit;
(b) The conveyance for which the permit was issued has not been
constructed, installed, maintained, or repaired in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter; or
(c) The conveyance has become unsafe.
(3) The department shall suspend any license issued under this
chapter promptly after receiving notice from the department of social
and health services that the holder of the license has been certified
pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 as a person who is not in compliance with a
support order. If the person has continued to meet all other license
requirements during the suspension, reissuance of the certificate of
licensure shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release
issued by the department of social and health services stating that the
person is in compliance with the order.
(4) The department shall notify in writing the owner, licensee, or
person installing the conveyance, of its action and the reason for the
action. The department shall send the notice by certified mail to the
last known address of the owner or person. The notice shall inform the
owner or person that a hearing may be requested pursuant to RCW
70.87.170.
(((4))) (5)(a) If the department has suspended or revoked a permit
or license because of fraud or error, and a hearing is requested, the
suspension or revocation shall be stayed until the hearing is concluded
and a decision is issued.
(b) If the department has revoked or suspended a license because
the ((elevator personnel)) licensee performing the work covered by this
chapter is working in a manner that does not effectively prevent
injuries or deaths or protect employees and the public from unsafe
conditions as is required by this chapter, the suspension or revocation
is effective immediately and shall not be stayed by a request for a
hearing.
(c) If the department has revoked or suspended a permit because the
conveyance is unsafe or is not constructed, installed, maintained, or
repaired in accordance with this chapter, the suspension or revocation
is effective immediately and shall not be stayed by a request for a
hearing.
(((5))) (6) The department must remove a suspension or reinstate a
revoked license if the licensee pays all the assessed civil penalties
and is able to demonstrate to the department that the licensee has met
all the qualifications established by this chapter.
(((6))) (7) The department shall remove a suspension or reinstate
a revoked permit if a conveyance is repaired or modified to bring it
into compliance with this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.87.170 and 2002 c 98 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person aggrieved by an order or action of the department
denying, suspending, revoking, or refusing to renew a permit or
license; assessing a penalty for a violation of this chapter; or
ordering the operation of a conveyance to be discontinued, may request
a hearing within fifteen days after notice (([of])) of the department's
order or action is received. The date the hearing was requested shall
be the date the request for hearing was postmarked. The party
requesting the hearing must accompany the request with a certified or
cashier's check for two hundred dollars payable to the department. The
department shall refund the two hundred dollars if the party requesting
the hearing prevails at the hearing; otherwise, the department shall
retain the two hundred dollars.
If the department does not receive a timely request for hearing,
the department's order or action is final and may not be appealed.
(2) If the aggrieved party requests a hearing, the department shall
ask an administrative law judge to preside over the hearing. The
hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.87.180 and 2002 c 98 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The construction, erection, installation, relocation,
alteration, ((maintenance,)) modernization, wiring, dismantling, or
operation of a conveyance without a permit by any person owning or
having the custody, management, or operation thereof, except as
provided in RCW 70.87.080 and 70.87.090, is a misdemeanor. Each day of
violation is a separate offense. No prosecution may be maintained
where the issuance or renewal of a permit has been requested but upon
which no action has been taken by the department.
(2) The construction, erection, installation, relocation,
alteration, maintenance, ((or operation)) modernization, wiring, or
dismantling of a conveyance without a license by any person except as
provided in RCW 70.87.110 is a misdemeanor. Each day of violation is
a separate offense. No prosecution may be maintained where the
issuance or renewal of a license has been requested by an applicant but
upon which no action has been taken by the department.

Sec. 11 RCW 70.87.220 and 2002 c 98 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may adopt the rules necessary to establish and
administer the elevator safety advisory committee. The purpose of the
advisory committee is to advise the department on the adoption of rules
that apply to conveyances; methods of enforcing and administering this
chapter; and matters of concern to the conveyance industry and to the
individual installers, owners, and users of conveyances. ((The
advisory committee consists of five persons appointed by)) The director
of the department or his or her designee with the advice of the chief
elevator inspector shall appoint the advisory committee members as
follows: One registered architect or professional engineer with
experience in the elevator industry; one employee of a licensed
elevator contractor who qualifies for or possesses an elevator mechanic
license; one contractor qualifying for or possessing an elevator
contractor license; one employer whose agricultural or industrial
facilities use conveyances in one or more storage or manufacturing
process; one employee who has five or more years' experience repairing
or maintaining conveyances for one such agricultural or industrial
employer; one manufacturer of conveyances; and one ad hoc member
representing a municipality with jurisdiction over conveyances under
RCW 70.87.200. The committee members shall serve four years.
The committee shall meet on the third Tuesday of February, May,
August, and November of each year, and at other times at the discretion
of the chief of the elevator section. The committee members shall
serve without per diem or travel expenses.
The chief elevator inspector shall be the secretary for the
advisory committee.

Sec. 12 RCW 70.87.230 and 2002 c 98 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided by RCW 70.87.110, no person shall erect,
construct, wire, install, alter, replace, maintain, ((remove))
relocate, modernize, or dismantle any conveyance ((contained within a
building or structures)) within the jurisdiction of this state unless
he or she has an elevator mechanic license and the person is working:
(1) For an owner, as defined in RCW 70.87.010(1) that operates a
facility described in RCW 70.87.110(2); (2) for a public agency, as
defined in RCW 70.87.010(34); or (3) under the direct supervision of a
person, firm, or company who has an elevator ((contractors
[contractor])) contractor license pursuant to this chapter.
A person, firm, public agency, or company is not required to have
an elevator ((contractors [contractor])) contractor license for
removing or dismantling conveyances that are destroyed as a result of
a complete demolition of a secured building or structure or where the
building is demolished back to the basic support structure whereby no
access is permitted therein to endanger the safety and welfare of a
person.

Sec. 13 RCW 70.87.240 and 2002 c 98 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, firm, or company wishing to engage in the business
of erecting, constructing, installing, altering, servicing, replacing,
repairing, relocating, wiring, dismantling, modernizing, or maintaining
((elevators, dumbwaiters, escalators, or moving sidewalks)) conveyances
within the jurisdiction of the department must make application for
((a)) an elevator contractor license with the department on a form
provided by the department and be a registered general or specialty
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(2) Except as provided by RCW 70.87.110, any person wishing to
((engage in installing, altering, repairing, or servicing elevators,
dumbwaiters, escalators, or moving sidewalks)) erect, construct,
install, alter, repair, maintain, relocate, modernize, wire, or
dismantle conveyances within the jurisdiction of the department must
make application for ((a)) an elevator mechanic license with the
department on a form provided by the department.
(3) No elevator contractor license may be granted to any person or
firm who has not proven to possess the following qualifications:
(a) Five years' work experience in the elevator industry in
construction, maintenance, and service or repair, as verified by
current and previous elevator contractor ((licenses)) licensed to do
business; or
(b) Satisfactory completion of a written examination administered
by the department on this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter.
(4) No elevator mechanic license may be granted to any person who
has not proven to possess the following qualifications:
(a) An acceptable combination of documented experience and
education credits: Not less than three years' work experience in the
elevator industry, in construction, or maintenance and service or
repair, as verified by current and previous public agency employers and
employers licensed to do business in this state; and
(b) Satisfactory completion of a written examination administered
by the department on this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter.
(5) Any person who furnishes the department with acceptable proof
that he or she has worked for at least three consecutive years as an
elevator constructor, or as a conveyance maintenance or repair person
shall upon making application for a license and paying the license fee
is entitled to receive a license without an examination. The person
must have:
(a) Worked without direct and immediate supervision for ((an
elevator)) (i) a general or specialty contractor ((licensed to do
business)) registered under chapter 18.27 RCW and engaged primarily in
the business of installing conveyances in this state; (ii) a public
agency; or (iii) a conveyance owner. This employment may not be less
than each and all of the three years immediately ((before June 13,
2002)) preceding July 1, 2004. The person must make application within
((one year of June 13, 2002)) ninety days after July 1, 2004, or the
effective date of rules adopted under this chapter establishing license
requirements;
(b) Obtained a certificate of completion and successfully passed
the mechanic examination of a nationally recognized training program
for the elevator industry such as the national elevator industry
educational program or its equivalent; or
(c) Obtained a certificate of completion of an apprenticeship
program for an elevator mechanic, having standards substantially equal
to those of this chapter, and registered with the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council.
(6) A license must be issued to an individual holding a valid
license from a state having entered into a reciprocal agreement with
the department and having standards substantially equal to those of
this chapter, upon application and without examination.
(7) The department shall adopt rules that become effective on or
after July 1, 2004, to implement this section and RCW 70.87.250.

Sec. 14 RCW 70.87.250 and 2002 c 98 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon approval of an application, the department may issue a
license that is ((biannually [biennially])) biennially renewable. The
fee for the license and for any renewal shall be set by the department
in rule.
(2) The department may issue temporary elevator mechanic licenses.
These temporary elevator mechanic licenses will be issued to those
certified as qualified and competent by licensed elevator contractors.
The company shall furnish proof of competency as the department may
require. Each license must recite that it is valid for a period of
thirty days from the date of issuance and for such particular
((elevators)) conveyances or geographical areas as the department may
designate, and otherwise entitles the licensee to the rights and
privileges of an elevator mechanic license issued in this chapter. A
temporary elevator mechanic license ((must)) may be renewed by the
department and a fee as established in rule must be charged for any
temporary elevator mechanic license or renewal.
(3) The renewal of all licenses granted under this section is
conditioned upon the submission of a certificate of completion of a
course designed to ensure the continuing education of licensees on new
and existing rules of the department. The course must consist of not
less than eight hours of instruction that must be attended and
completed within one year immediately preceding any license renewal.
(4) The courses must be taught by instructors through continuing
education providers that may include, but are not limited to,
association seminars and labor training programs. The department must
approve the continuing education providers. All instructors must be
approved by the department and are exempt from the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section with regard to his or her application
for license renewal, provided that such applicant was qualified as an
instructor at any time during the one year immediately preceding the
scheduled date for such renewal.
(5) A licensee who is unable to complete the continuing education
course required under this section before the expiration of his or her
license due to a temporary disability may apply for a waiver from the
department. This will be on a form provided by the department and
signed under the pains and penalties of perjury and accompanied by a
certified statement from a competent physician attesting to the
temporary disability. Upon the termination of the temporary
disability, the licensee must submit to the department a certified
statement from the same physician, if practicable, attesting to the
termination of the temporary disability. At which time a waiver
sticker, valid for ninety days, must be issued to the licensee and
affixed to his or her license.
(6) Approved training providers must keep uniform records, for a
period of ten years, of attendance of licensees, and these records must
be available for inspection by the department at its request. Approved
training providers are responsible for the security of all attendance
records and certificates of completion. However, falsifying or
knowingly allowing another to falsify attendance records or
certificates of completion constitutes grounds for suspension or
revocation of the approval required under this section.

Sec. 15 RCW 70.87.260 and 2002 c 98 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter cannot be construed to relieve or lessen the
responsibility or liability of any person, firm, or corporation owning,
operating, controlling, maintaining, erecting, constructing,
installing, altering, inspecting, testing, ((or repairing)) wiring, or
dismantling any ((elevator)) conveyance or other related mechanisms
covered by this chapter for damages to person or property caused by any
defect therein, nor does the state assume any such liability or
responsibility therefore or any liability to any person for whatever
reason whatsoever by the adoption of this chapter or any acts or
omissions arising hereunder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The elevator safety advisory committee
shall review chapter 70.87 RCW as it pertains to conveyances located in
private residences and shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---