BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that financial fraud
and identity theft crimes are increasingly too common. Further, the
legislature finds that such crimes can be deterred and prevented if
financial institutions verify the identity of their customers who make
in-person withdrawal transactions. The legislature declares that to
prevent such crimes from initially taking place, all financial
institutions doing business in the state must be diligent in verifying
identification before processing withdrawal requests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 30.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Financial institutions must verify the identity of their
customers before processing an in-person withdrawal request. Account
holders who do not want their identity verified may opt out by
providing written notice to the financial institution.
(2) Verification protocols will be determined by each financial
institution, and must include at least two forms of identification, one
of which may be an item of government or financial institution-issued
photo identification.
(3) All monetary losses to account holders that result from failure
to verify identification will be borne by the financial institution.

--- END ---