BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) It is in the best interest of the state of Washington, the
United States of America, and the earth as a whole, to encourage
voluntary actions to achieve all economically beneficial reductions of
greenhouse gas emissions from Washington sources.
(2) Mandatory reductions of greenhouse gas emissions may eventually
be imposed on Washington sources, and, consequently, the state has a
responsibility to use its best efforts to ensure that organizations
that voluntarily reduce their emissions receive appropriate
consideration for reductions in emissions made before mandatory
programs are implemented.
(3) Past programs in the state that took early and responsible
action to reduce pollution and to save energy have demonstrated
political, economic, and technological leadership, have benefited the
state, and have saved taxpayers, business owners, and homeowners
significant amounts of money.
(4) The state's tradition of environmental and energy leadership
should be recognized by establishing a registry to provide
documentation of reductions in greenhouse gas emissions that are
voluntarily achieved by sources within the state.
(5) Greenhouse gas emissions exchanges are being established with
the ability to buy and sell the rights to emissions reduction credits.
Washington sources will benefit as mature traders in these markets in
the future by early participation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The purposes of the Washington climate
action registry are to:
(1) Provide technical and educational resources to registrants
wishing to record and trade emissions inventories;
(2) Encourage voluntary actions to increase energy efficiency and
reduce greenhouse gas emissions;
(3) Publish basic definitions and protocols and publicize
organizations qualified to provide technical assistance so
participating organizations may record greenhouse gas emissions
inventories in a consistent format that is supported by third-party
verification;
(4) Develop procedures for the registration of inventories that
include the treatment of emissions released by or absorbed into fuels
and fiber produced by biological systems or from or into the biological
systems themselves;
(5) Ensure that registrants receive the greatest possible
consideration of their verified emissions inventories under any future
federal regulatory regime relating to greenhouse gas emissions;
(6) Recognize and publicize registrants and preserve and make
available emissions inventories recorded by registrants;
(7) Recruit broad participation in the process from all economic
sectors and regions of the state; and
(8) Establish a rigorous and transparent registry system that will
increase the opportunities for Washington registry participants to
trade greenhouse gas emissions reduction credits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Center" means the Washington climate and rural energy
development center established in RCW 28B.30.642.
(2) "Direct emissions" are emissions from sources, sinks, and
activities that the entity owns or has direct or effective control over
its operation, such as, but not limited to, on-site combustion and
process equipment emissions and vehicles owned or operated by the
entity.
(3) "Emissions" means the net of release and absorption of
greenhouse gases into or from the ambient air.
(4) "Emissions inventory" means the report of emissions and
normalized emissions for a calendar year.
(5) "Entity" means a for-profit or a nonprofit corporation filing
a separate federal income tax return, a city or county, each state
government department and agency and all other instruments of state and
local government, including municipal electric utilities and special
districts of all types.
(6) "Greenhouse gases" means those gaseous constituents of the
atmosphere, both natural and anthropogenic, that absorb and emit
radiation at wavelengths within the spectrum of infrared radiation
emitted by the Earth's surface, atmosphere, and clouds.
(7) "Indirect emissions" are emissions caused by an entity's
activities but controlled, directly or effectively, by another entity,
such as, but not limited to, emissions created during the manufacture
or transportation of energy or the generation and transmission of
electricity acquired from another entity.
(8) "Normalized emissions" means a ratio of emissions per unit time
divided by a factor such as, but not limited to, revenues,
expenditures, energy use, or production for the same time period and
for the same scope as the emissions.
(9) "Primary greenhouse gas" means carbon dioxide,
hydrofluorocarbons, methane, nitrous oxide, perfluorocarbons, and
sulfur hexafluoride.
(10) "Public process" means the involvement of current and
potential registrants, interested members of government, academic,
scientific, and business communities, and the public in the
development, evaluation, and adoption of protocols and other actions
necessary to the implementation of this chapter.
(11) "Registrant" means an entity that has filed with the registry
the required identifying information, notified the center that it
intends to record emissions inventories and has paid the necessary
fees.
(12) "Registry" means the Washington climate action registry
established under section 4 of this act.
(13) "Scope" means the sources, sinks, and activities creating
emissions that are included in the emissions inventory of an entity.
(14) "Secondary greenhouse gas" means those additional greenhouse
gases designated by the center through a public process.
(15) "Subsidiary" means an entity effectively under the control of
a parent entity, including but not limited to, public and private
nonprofit and for-profit corporations, whose board of directors or
similar managing authority is composed of a majority of persons
appointed by the legislative and/or executive authority of the parent
entity. However, each department and independent agency of the state
and each municipal electric utility shall not be considered a
subsidiary of a parent entity for the purpose of section 7(6) of this
act. "Subsidiary" includes entities that are joint ventures with other
entities with emissions assigned to the parent entities according to
mutual agreement or in the absence of an agreement in proportions
determined by the protocols of the registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The center shall establish and maintain
the Washington climate action registry.
(2) The center may contract with or otherwise agree to use
personnel of a state or local agency, a university, or a nonprofit
public corporation to operate the registry and to provide such
additional services necessary for the center to meet its
responsibilities under this chapter. Merit system regulations or
standards for the employment of personnel may be waived for personnel
hired under contract as provided for in this section.
(3) The center shall adopt a schedule of fees for registry services
adequate to cover the costs of operating the registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Participation in the registry is voluntary.
Any entity operating in the state may register with the center, record
its emissions inventory, and may use the services of the center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The center shall encourage entities from
various sectors of the state's economy and from various geographic
regions of the state to establish emissions inventories, establish
greenhouse gas reduction targets, implement energy efficiency
improvement and renewable energy programs to achieve those targets, and
participate in the registry.
(2) The center shall recognize, publicize, and promote registrants
that do any of the following:
(a) Commit to establish emissions inventories;
(b) Record their annual emissions inventories with the center; or
(c) Commit to set emissions or normalized emissions reduction
targets.
(3) The state commits to use its best efforts to ensure that
entities that register emissions inventories that are verified in
accordance with section 8 of this act receive appropriate consideration
under any future international, federal, or state regulatory scheme
relating to greenhouse gas emissions. However, the state cannot
guarantee that any regulatory regime relating to greenhouse gas
emissions will recognize the emissions inventories recorded in the
registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Emissions inventories recorded with the
registry shall be:
(a) Developed in a consistent manner across an economic sector;
(b) Complete, including all materially significant emissions within
the scope being reported;
(c) Accurate; and
(d) Verifiable.
(2) The center shall:
(a) Adopt through a public process protocols for defining the scope
of emissions inventories, and for measuring, calculating, reporting,
and verifying emissions, normalized emissions, and emission
inventories, which may be different for different economic sectors;
(b) Adopt through a public process a uniform format for reporting
emissions inventories to facilitate their recognition in any future
international, federal, or state regulatory regime;
(c) Maintain a record of all emissions inventories submitted by
active registrants that have been verified under section 8 of this act.
Records or other information furnished to the registry, other than the
total annual amount of emissions of each greenhouse gas by an entity,
that would be likely to affect adversely the competitive position of a
registrant if released to the public or to a competitor, and the
registrant so certifies, shall be only for the confidential use of the
center and the third-party organization or person conducting
verification review of the inventory as required by section 8 of this
act.
(3) The procedures for monitoring, calculating, reporting, and
verifying greenhouse gas emissions inventories established for the
registry under this chapter shall be the only protocols used to define
and report greenhouse gas emissions to the registry. In establishing
the registry design, operations, and protocols the center shall review
and consider the registry design, operations, and protocols established
or recommended by other governments and organizations to enhance the
credibility and acceptability of the information recorded in the
registry.
(4)(a) All registrants shall report emissions of carbon dioxide.
(b) All registrants may report emissions of all primary greenhouse
gases. After their third reporting year, a registrant shall include in
its emissions inventory the emissions of all primary greenhouse gases.
The registry shall include in its protocols factors for expressing
emissions from various greenhouse gases in common terms.
(c) After July 1, 2005, the registry may, through a public process,
create or expand the list of secondary greenhouse gases and may require
the inclusion of secondary greenhouse gases in emissions inventories.
(5) Registrants shall report direct emissions and indirect
emissions from acquired energy and electricity for the scope of their
operations as provided in the protocols adopted by the center.
Registrants may include additional indirect emissions that are
verifiable. After July 1, 2005, the center may, through a public
process, enlarge the scope of indirect emissions that are required to
be included.
(6)(a) The basic unit of participation in the registry shall be an
entity. The center shall not record with the registry emissions
inventories for subsidiaries, individual facilities, or projects, other
than as a subset of an entity's entire emissions inventory reporting.
(b) An entity's scope shall include all activities, sources, and
sinks in the state and may include the remainder of the entity in the
United States.
(c) An entity may report verified emissions inventories for
sequential multiple years after January 1, 1990, from facilities or
activities outside the entity for which it claims ownership of the net
change in emissions. It may separately report emissions inventories
for subsidiaries, facilities, projects, or portions of the entity in
other countries.
(d) Where the scope of the registrant changes significantly during
the year, the center may record with the registry for the year in which
the scope change occurs an emissions inventory including only the scope
of the prior year and shall add an explanatory note to the record.
(e) Entities may initially report emissions inventories for
subsidiaries or individual facilities located in the state if the
parent entity commits, in writing to the center, to report a complete
current annual emissions inventory for the entire portion of the entity
within the state by its third annual report of its emissions inventory.
(7)(a) Registrants shall record an emissions inventory for a
calendar year. Registrants that have sufficiently complete data for
prior years that can be verified may record emissions inventories for
consecutive years before the first year for which they report, but not
before January 1, 1990.
(b) The center shall adopt, through a public process, schedules for
the recording of verified emissions inventories for each year,
procedures for delisting registrants that fail to record complete
emissions inventories in future years or fail to report for the entire
portion of the entity within the state by their third annual report,
and fees to recover any costs necessary to reestablish registration.
(8)(a) An explanatory note shall be added in the registry to prior
years' data when there is a change in the procedures or protocols by
which a registrant's emissions inventories are created or if there is
a significant change in the scope included in the emissions inventory,
such as, but not limited to, the outsourcing or transfer to other
facilities of the entity of production previously included or the
merger into the company of an entity not previously within the scope.
Registrants may record emissions inventories with separately identified
adjustments to report the magnitude of the change due to a change in
scope. Registrants may record verified revised emissions inventories
for prior years to conform with current protocols or current scope.
(b) Registrants shall separately identify within their annual
emissions inventories any rights or ownership to emissions or emissions
credits for that year or between two years, that have been acquired
from or transferred to:
(i) Other entities located within or outside the state; or
(ii) Within the registrant entity, including its subsidiaries, to
or from locations outside the state that would not otherwise be
included in the annual report to the registry.
(c) Registrants shall identify and quantify any portion of the
emissions inventory that is being reported to any other registry of
greenhouse gas emissions, any differences between the reports and the
name and address of the other registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Registrants shall hire, at their own
expense, a third-party organization or person qualified under
subsection (2) of this section to independently verify and attest to
the accuracy of the emissions results reported to the registry each
year.
(2) The center shall, through a public process, develop a procedure
for identifying and qualifying organizations or persons recognized by
the registry as competent to verify an emissions inventory and able to
provide an opinion as to its consistency, completeness, and accuracy
that is independent and free from conflict of interest. The center may
limit its recognition of the organization or person to specific areas
of competency. The center shall reopen the qualification process
periodically to enable new organizations and persons to be added to the
list.
(3) An organization or person approved under subsection (2) of this
section shall:
(a) Review a registrant's energy usage records and such other
records as are necessary to verify its emissions inventory;
(b) Determine that the protocols of the registry have been
followed;
(c) If necessary to establish or confirm emissions or normalization
rates or quantities, require additional analyses, direct measurements,
monitoring, or testing; and
(d) After noting adjustments or otherwise accounting for any
changes in the scope of the entity, summarize its review in a report to
the appropriate executive or governing body of the registrant for the
portion of the entity that is submitting the emissions inventory, and
attesting to the accuracy of the reported emissions results, but noting
any exceptions, omissions, limitations, or other qualifications to
their representation of consistency, completeness, and accuracy.
(4) The center shall periodically perform a review and evaluation
of registrants' emissions inventories and documentation and the
performance of verifiers on its list. It shall record any findings
from the reviews and evaluations in writing with the registry and shall
include the findings in its annual report to the governor and the
legislature required under section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The center shall, through a public
process, develop a procedure for identifying and qualifying third-party
organizations or persons competent to provide technical assistance and
advice in any or all of the areas of measuring, monitoring, and
calculating greenhouse gas emissions, setting industry-specific
emissions reduction targets, and developing and implementing energy
efficiency improvement programs appropriate to various industries and
economic sectors.
(2) The center shall adopt a list of organizations or persons
recognized by the center as competent to carry out the responsibilities
described in subsection (1) of this section. The center may limit its
recognition of the organization or person to specific areas of
competency. The center shall reopen the qualification process
periodically to enable new organizations and persons to be added to the
list.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 By July 1, 2005, and biennially
thereafter, the center shall report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the number of organizations
participating in the registry, the percentage of the state's emissions
represented by the participants in the registry, and the reductions in
greenhouse gas emissions achieved by those participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---