BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in order to
comply with the community mental health services act, chapter 71.24
RCW, and the medicaid managed care mental health waiver, and to
effectively assist persons with mental illness and consumers of mental
health services in the assertion of their civil and human rights, and
to improve the quality of services available and promote the
rehabilitation, recovery, and reintegration of these persons, an
independent mental health ombudsman program should be instituted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Immediate family member," as pertaining to conflicts of
interest, means the spouse, parents, children, and siblings of the
mental health ombudsman.
(3) "Mental health consumer" or "consumer" means any individual who
is a current or past client, patient, or resident of a mental health
provider or facility, or an applicant for such mental health services.
(4) "Mental health ombudsman" or "ombudsman" means the state mental
health ombudsman, regional mental health ombudsmen, staff of the state
and regional mental health ombudsmen, and certified volunteer mental
health ombudsmen. A mental health ombudsman shall not be considered to
be a mental health provider.
(5) "Mental health provider or facility" means any of the
following:
(a) An agency, individual, or facility that is part of the
community mental health service delivery system, as defined in RCW
71.24.025;
(b) An evaluation and treatment facility, as defined in RCW
71.05.020 or 71.34.020;
(c) A long-term care facility, as defined in RCW 43.190.020, in
which adults or children with mental illness reside;
(d) A state hospital, as defined in RCW 72.23.010; and
(e) A facility or agency that receives funds from the state of
Washington to provide residential or treatment services to adults or
children with mental illness.
(6) "Office" means the office of the state mental health ombudsman.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The office of the state mental health
ombudsman is hereby created. The office shall be headed by an
individual known as the state mental health ombudsman, who shall be
selected from among individuals with expertise and experience in the
fields of mental health services, policy, and advocacy. The office
shall carry out, directly and through the use of mental health
ombudsmen, an independent statewide program known as the state mental
health ombudsman program.
(2) The department shall contract with a private nonprofit
organization to operate the office of the state mental health ombudsman
and to provide, directly or through subcontracts, mental health
ombudsman services as specified under, and consistent with, the
medicaid managed care mental health waiver, state law, the goals of the
state, and the needs of its residents. The organization that operates
the office of the state mental health ombudsman shall select the
individual to serve as the state mental health ombudsman, with
opportunity for prior stakeholder input, and shall revoke the
designation only upon a showing of neglect of duty, misconduct, or
inability to perform duties. The department shall ensure that all
program and staff support necessary to enable the mental health
ombudsman program to protect the interests of persons with mental
illness is provided, directly or through subcontracts, by the
organization that operates the office of the state mental health
ombudsman. The contracting organization and the office shall not be
considered to be state agencies or departments, but instead shall be
private entities operating under contract with the state.
(3) The department shall designate by a competitive bidding process
the organization that will contract to operate the office of the state
mental health ombudsman. The selection process shall include direct
stakeholder participation in the development of the request for
proposal, evaluation of bids, and final selection. The department
shall ensure that the designated organization is free from conflicts of
interest and has the demonstrated capacity to ensure that the
responsibilities of the office of the state mental health ombudsman are
carried out. The department shall undertake an annual review of the
designated organization to ensure compliance with the provisions of the
contract. The department shall not revoke the designation of the
organization operating the office of the state mental health ombudsman
except upon a showing of neglect of duty, misconduct, or inability to
perform duties. Prior to revoking the designation, the department
shall provide notice and an opportunity for the organization, the state
ombudsman, and the public to comment upon the proposed revocation, and
shall provide the organization an opportunity to appeal the decision to
the director of the department.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to carry out this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The office has the following powers and
duties:
(1) Establish appropriate procedures: For access by mental health
ombudsmen to all mental health consumers, consistent with section 12 of
this act; for ombudsman access to the records of mental health
consumers, with provisions to ensure confidentiality, consistent with
sections 12 and 13 of this act; and for the protection of the ombudsman
program's records and files, consistent with section 13 of this act;
(2) Maintain a statewide toll-free telephone number for the receipt
of complaints and inquiries;
(3) Offer and provide services to assist mental health consumers
and their representatives in order to assist in protecting the health,
safety, welfare, and rights of mental health consumers;
(4) Offer and provide information as appropriate to mental health
consumers, family members, guardians and other representatives,
employees of mental health providers and facilities, and others
regarding the rights of mental health consumers;
(5) Identify, investigate, and resolve complaints made by or on
behalf of mental health consumers that relate to action, inaction, or
decisions which:
(a) May adversely affect the rehabilitation, recovery,
reintegration, health, safety, welfare, or rights of mental health
consumers; and
(b) Involve a mental health provider or facility; a regulatory,
governmental, health, or social service agency; a guardian or other
representative; a family member; or another mental health consumer,
friend, or associate;
(6) Support and encourage mental health consumer participation in
treatment planning, delivery, and complaint resolution, both on an
individual basis and systemwide, and recruit and support the
participation of family members of the mental health consumer, close
friends, and guardians and other representatives in the consumer's
treatment and complaint resolution, unless the mental health consumer
expressly objects to such participation;
(7) Represent the interests of mental health consumers before
governmental agencies, and seek administrative, legal, and other
remedies to protect the health, safety, welfare, and rights of mental
health consumers;
(8) Monitor the development and implementation of federal, state,
and local laws, regulations, and policies with respect to mental health
services in this state, and provide information that the office
determines to be appropriate to the public, legislators, public and
private agencies, and other persons;
(9) Provide for the training, certification, and decertification
for good cause, of paid and volunteer mental health ombudsmen. Paid
mental health ombudsmen shall recruit, supervise, and provide ongoing
training of certified volunteer mental health ombudsmen, in accordance
with the policies and procedures established by the office;
(10) Where necessary to fulfill the purposes of this chapter,
subcontract with nonprofit organizations or individuals to perform the
functions of mental health ombudsman, provided however, that the state
office shall provide services for coordinating the activities of mental
health ombudsmen throughout the state;
(11) Establish a statewide uniform reporting system to collect and
analyze data relating to complaints, conditions, and service quality
provided by mental health providers and facilities, jails, and
correctional facilities, for the purpose of identifying and resolving
significant individual problems and analyzing, developing, and
advocating remedies in policy, practice, rule, or legislation for
systemic problems, with provision for submission of such data to
relevant agencies and entities on at least an annual basis, as
specified in sections 8 and 9 of this act. This reporting system must
be compatible with uniform child and adult consumer service outcomes,
where such outcome measures are established; and
(12) Carry out such other activities as the department deems
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 All mental health ombudsmen must receive
certification by the state mental health ombudsman and have training or
experience in the following areas prior to serving as mental health
ombudsmen:
(1) Mental health programs, other related social services programs,
and community resources;
(2) Mental health diagnoses, care, and treatment approaches;
(3) Advocacy and supporting consumer self-advocacy;
(4) The legal system; and
(5) Dispute resolution techniques, including investigation,
mediation, and negotiation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) All mental health ombudsmen must be free
from conflicts of interest, including:
(a) No mental health ombudsman shall have been employed by, or
participated in the management of, a regional support network or any
mental health provider or facility within the past year, except where
prior to the effective date of this act he or she has been employed by
or volunteered for a regional support network, subcontractor thereof,
or a state hospital to provide mental health ombudsman services
pursuant to the requirements of the federal medicaid managed care
mental health waiver. The office shall actively recruit persons who
provided ombudsman services through a regional support network,
subcontractor thereof, or state hospital;
(b) No mental health ombudsman or any member of his or her
immediate family may have, or have had within the past year, any
significant ownership or investment interest in the provision of mental
health services or in a mental health provider or facility;
(c) No mental health ombudsman shall have been employed in a
governmental position with direct involvement in the licensing,
certification, or regulation of a mental health provider or facility
within the past year; and
(d) No mental health ombudsman shall be assigned to a mental health
facility in which a member of that ombudsman's immediate family
resides.
(2) No individual, or immediate family member of such an
individual, who is involved in the designation or removal of the state
mental health ombudsman, or the designation or revocation of the
contractor or subcontractors, or who administers the contractor's or
subcontractor's contract, may be an official or employee with
responsibility for the licensing, certification, or regulation of
mental health providers or facilities or may be employed by, own,
operate, or manage mental health providers or facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Mental health ombudsmen shall act in
accordance with the policies and procedures established by the office,
and shall have the following authority and duties:
(a) Offer and provide services to assist mental health consumers
and their representatives in order to assist in protecting the health,
safety, welfare, and rights of mental health consumers;
(b) Offer and provide information as appropriate to mental health
consumers, family members of mental health consumers, guardians and
other representatives, employees of mental health providers and
facilities, and others regarding the rights of mental health consumers;
(c) Identify, investigate, and resolve complaints made by or on
behalf of mental health consumers that relate to action, inaction, or
decisions which:
(i) May adversely affect the rehabilitation, recovery,
reintegration, health, safety, welfare, or rights of mental health
consumers; and
(ii) Involve a mental health provider or facility; a regulatory,
governmental, health, or social service agency; a guardian or other
representative; a family member; or another mental health consumer,
friend, or associate;
(d) Support and encourage mental health consumer participation in
treatment planning, delivery, and complaint resolution, both on an
individual basis and systemwide, and recruit and support the
participation of family members, close friends, guardians, and other
representatives in the consumer's treatment and complaint resolution,
unless the mental health consumer expressly objects to such
participation;
(e) Represent the interests of mental health consumers before
governmental agencies, and seek administrative, legal, and other
remedies to protect the health, safety, welfare, and rights of mental
health consumers; and
(f) Perform other duties assigned by the office or its
subcontractors, consistent with the purposes of this chapter.
(2) Mental health ombudsmen shall attempt to resolve complaints
informally and at the lowest level possible, using direct discussion
with care providers and personnel, complaint and grievance processes,
and the fair hearing process if applicable, unless such avenues appear
to be futile, not feasible, or not in the best interest of the mental
health consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The office shall provide information
relevant to the quality of mental health services, and recommendations
for improvements in the quality of mental health services, to regional
support networks and the mental health division of the department of
social and health services.
(2) The mental health division and the regional support networks
shall work in cooperation with the office to develop agreements
regarding how this quality information will be incorporated into their
quality management systems. These agreements must ensure that
information related to complaints and grievances conforms to a
standardized form.
(3) The office shall ensure that its reports and recommendations
are broadly distributed and shall report annually regarding its
activities, findings, and recommendations to at least the following
entities: The mental health division, the mental health advisory
board, the state long-term care ombudsman, the state family and
children's ombudsman, the state designated protection and advocacy
system, the department of community, trade, and economic development,
regional support networks, and mental health advocacy groups.
(4) Regional support networks and the mental health division shall
promptly provide the office with demographic information they possess
regarding the diversity of individuals applying for, receiving, and
being denied services in each region, service utilization information,
contract and subcontract requirements, the results of all audits and
reviews conducted by the regional support networks or the mental health
division, and such other information collected or produced by the
regional support networks or the mental health division as may be
necessary for mental health ombudsmen in the performance of their
duties.
(5) Regional support networks and the mental health division shall
assist mental health ombudsmen in obtaining entry and meaningful access
to mental health providers and facilities, cooperation from their
staff, and access to mental health consumers.
(6) Regional support networks, state hospitals, and their
subcontractors shall respond in writing to all written recommendations
regarding quality improvement made by the office within thirty days of
issuance, and shall identify what action will be taken in response, and
if no action or action other than that which was recommended is taken,
the reasons for the variance must be explained in writing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The office shall provide the legislature
with an annual report that includes:
(1) An identification of the demographic status of those served by
the mental health ombudsman program;
(2) A description of the issues addressed during the past year and
a brief description of case scenarios in a form that does not
compromise confidentiality;
(3) An accounting of the monitoring activities by the mental health
ombudsman program;
(4) An identification of the results of measurements of consumer
satisfaction and other outcome measures;
(5) An identification of the numbers of certified volunteer mental
health ombudsmen;
(6) An identification of deficiencies in the mental health service
system and recommendations for remedial action in policy or practice;
(7) Recommendations for regulatory action by agencies that would
improve the quality of service to individuals with mental illness; and
(8) Recommendations for legislative action that would result in
improved services to individuals with mental illness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Every mental health provider and facility
shall post in a conspicuous location a notice providing the office's
toll-free number, and the name, address, and phone number of the office
of the appropriate local mental health ombudsman if any and a brief
description of the services provided. The form of the notice must be
approved by the office. This information must also be distributed to
mental health consumers, their legal guardians or representatives, and
family members of mental health consumers if appropriate, upon
application for mental health provider services and upon admission to
a mental health facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The office shall develop referral
procedures for mental health ombudsmen to refer appropriate complaints
to state or local government agencies, consistent with the
confidentiality provisions of this chapter. The state and local
agencies shall act promptly on any complaint referred to them by a
mental health ombudsman.
(2) The department of social and health services shall respond to
any complaint against a mental health provider or facility referred to
it by a mental health ombudsman and shall forward to that ombudsman a
summary of the results of the investigation and action proposed or
taken.
(3) The office, and its subcontractors if any, shall work in
cooperation with the state designated protection and advocacy agency,
the long-term care ombudsman program, and the office of children and
family ombudsman. The office shall develop and implement working
agreements with these advocacy organizations to ensure efficient,
coordinated services.
(4) The office shall develop and implement working agreements with
each regional support network, the state psychiatric hospitals, the
mental health division, and such other entities as necessary to
accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The office shall develop appropriate
procedures governing the right of entry of all mental health ombudsmen
to mental health providers and facilities, jails, and correctional
facilities, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Mental health ombudsmen shall have private access to all mental
health consumers at any time deemed necessary and reasonable by the
office to effectively carry out the provisions of this chapter. Mental
health ombudsmen shall be provided access to all mental health
consumers receiving or seeking services from mental health providers or
facilities, and to detainees and inmates of jails and correctional
facilities who have a mental illness, with provisions made for privacy,
for the purposes of providing information, hearing, investigating, and
resolving complaints, and monitoring the quality of mental health
services. Access shall be deemed necessary and reasonable during a
facility's regular visiting hours, other periods the facility or
provider is open to the public, and any other time access may be
required by the particular complaint or condition to be monitored or
investigated. Mental health ombudsmen seeking access to jails,
juvenile detention facilities, and correctional facilities must
successfully pass a criminal history background check as provided by
chapter 43.43 RCW.
(3) Nothing in this chapter restricts any right or privilege of a
mental health consumer to receive visitors of his or her choice.
Nothing in this chapter restricts, limits, or increases any existing
right of an organization or individual not described in subsections (1)
and (2) of this section to enter or provide assistance to mental health
consumers.
(4) Ombudsmen shall be permitted to review and copy the medical,
social, legal, and mental health records of a mental health consumer
if:
(a) The ombudsman has the written permission of the mental health
consumer or the representative of the consumer;
(b) The mental health consumer is unable to give informed consent
to the review and has no representative; or
(c) The representative of an incapacitated mental health consumer
refuses to give permission, the ombudsman reasonably believes the
representative is not acting in the consumer's best interest, and the
ombudsman receives prior written approval from the state mental health
ombudsman or his or her designee.
(5) Mental health ombudsmen shall be given prompt and timely access
to the mental health consumer's records, which in no case shall be
longer than the time period governing the consumer's access to his or
her records from the mental health provider or facility. The mental
health provider or facility may not refuse access to records to the
ombudsman on the basis that it is medically contraindicated or for
similar grounds. The identities of other patients, clients, residents,
or mental health consumers, if contained in the records of the mental
health consumer to which the ombudsman has access, must be redacted
prior to review by the ombudsman, if permission is not obtained by the
ombudsman from these individuals.
(6) The provisions of this section apply to accessing the records
of detainees and inmates of jails and correctional facilities who have
a mental illness.
(7) The office shall have timely access to, and copies when
requested of, the licensing, complaint investigation, and certification
records maintained by the state with respect to mental health providers
and facilities.
(8) For any copies obtained under this section, the ombudsman may
be charged a reasonable rate, which for public agencies or facilities
may not exceed the copying rate adopted under the public disclosure
laws, and for private facilities and providers may not exceed the rate
charged by commercial copy centers in the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) All records and files, and the
information therein, maintained by the mental health ombudsman program
shall remain confidential. Any disclosure of ombudsman program records
or files is subject to both of the following provisions:
(a) No disclosure may be made without the prior approval of the
state mental health ombudsman or his or her designee, provided however,
that requests to the ombudsman program by mental health consumers or
their representatives for assistance in obtaining service or better
service, or to file a complaint, may be communicated directly by the
mental health ombudsman to the mental health provider or facility or
oversight entity, without requiring prior approval of the state
ombudsman; and
(b) No disclosure of the identity or identifying information
regarding a mental health consumer, complainant, or witness shall be
made unless that individual or his or her representative consents in
writing to the disclosure, or disclosure is authorized by court order.
(2) Statistics, aggregate data, nonidentifying information and case
studies, and analysis may be disclosed at the discretion of the state
mental health ombudsman or his or her designee.
(3) All communications by a mental health ombudsman, if done in
good faith and reasonably related to the requirements of the
ombudsman's responsibilities under this chapter, are privileged, and
that privilege shall serve as a defense to any action in libel or
slander.
(4) All mental health ombudsmen are exempt from being required to
testify in any judicial or administrative proceeding as to any
confidential matters or records, except as a court may deem necessary
to enforce this chapter.
(5) In monitoring the office and its subcontractors, access to the
ombudsman program's files and records, minus identifying information
regarding any mental health consumer, complainant, or witness, shall be
available to the director or one senior manager of the department or
the contracting or subcontracting organization in which the state or
local ombudsman office is administratively located. The individuals
who perform the monitoring function must have no conflict of interest,
as provided in section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) It is unlawful to willfully interfere
with a mental health ombudsman in the performance of his or her duties
under this chapter.
(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be
taken against an employee of a mental health provider or facility, an
employee of a jail or correctional facility, an employee of a public,
health, or social service agency, or a mental health consumer or family
member, for any communication made, or information given or disclosed,
to aid a mental health ombudsman in carrying out his or her duties
under this chapter. This prohibition does not apply to communications
or false information provided maliciously or without good faith. This
subsection is not intended to infringe on the rights of the employer to
supervise, discipline, or terminate an employee for permissible
reasons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) It is the intent of the legislature
that the state mental health ombudsman program make reasonable efforts
to maintain and improve the current level and quality of mental health
ombudsman services, taking into account the transition period from the
current system of ombudsman programs within the regional support
networks and state hospitals.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that federal medicaid
requirements be complied with, and that the department of social and
health services no longer provide mental health ombudsman services
through the regional support networks and state hospitals effective
July 1, 2005.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that commencing July 1,
2005, the funds currently expended by the regional support networks
through their contracts with the department of social and health
services to provide mental health ombudsman services, and expended by
the department of social and health services to provide ombudsman or
patient advocate services at Western state hospital and Eastern state
hospital, shall be transferred to the department of community, trade,
and economic development for use by the office of mental health
ombudsman.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Effective July 1, 2004, the department of
social and health services shall transfer three hundred twenty-two
thousand eight hundred dollars from funding the office of consumer
affairs and training funds provided for the ombudsman quality review
teams within the mental health division of the department of social and
health services for mental health ombudsman services through the
regional support networks and state hospitals to the department of
community, trade, and economic development to provide funding for the
office of mental health ombudsman created in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---