BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A task force to review the
implementation of chapter 2, Laws of 1999 is created.
(2) The task force shall consist of one representative from each of
the following groups: County prosecuting attorneys; physicians
licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; the department of health; the
superior court judges; the attorney general; the association of
sheriffs and police chiefs; an attorney to be appointed by the
Washington state bar association with extensive experience in the area
of criminal defense and representation of clients whose legal history
includes interaction with law enforcement agencies on the matter of
medicinal marijuana use; an organization representing police officers
and deputy sheriffs; and the lieutenant governor.
(3) The task force shall review the history of the implementation
of chapter 2, Laws of 1999, to determine if further statutory or
administrative clarification is needed. In its review, the task force
shall examine issues of patient and physician utilization rates and
concerns, prosecution and law enforcement difficulties and needs,
relevant case law changes, statutory and administrative barriers to
full implementation of the act, and any concerns raised by the
applicable federal statutes. The task force shall make appropriate
findings and recommendations, but is not required to produce a formal
report.
(4) The first meeting of the task force shall be convened by the
department of health not later than July 15, 2003. The task force
shall present its findings and recommendations to the governor, the
legislature, and its membership not later than December 1, 2003.
(5) The members of the task force shall serve without compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The attorney general is requested to file,
in the federal district court for the district of western Washington,
a motion for declaratory judgment for the purpose of determining what
advice physicians may provide patients regarding the use of medicinal
marijuana under Washington state laws, consistent with the federal
uniform controlled substances act as determined by the case of Conant
v. Walters, 309 F.3rd 629 (9th Cir. 2002).

--- END ---