BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A hospital shall provide emergency services twenty-four hours
per day, seven days per week in a designated area of the hospital. A
hospital shall meet all the requirements for emergency facilities that
are established by the department and shall provide emergency services
in a manner that meets the requirements established by federal law for
the medical screening and stabilization of patients, including women in
active labor, who present to the hospital for emergency services.
(2) A hospital providing emergency services under this section
shall have, at a minimum, the following:
(a) A physician who is qualified to provide emergency services
immediately available in the hospital;
(b) A roster of on-call medical staff members; and
(c) Procedures to stabilize a patient until the patient is
transported or transferred to another hospital if emergency services
cannot be provided at the hospital to meet the needs of the patient in
an emergency. A specialty hospital providing emergency services under
this section shall maintain a transfer agreement with a general
hospital that establishes the process for patient transfers in a
situation in which the specialty hospital cannot provide continuing
care for a patient because of the specialty hospital's scope of
services.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) A specialty hospital that provides only psychiatric, pediatric,
long-term acute care, or rehabilitative services;
(b) A hospital that was licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW prior to
January 1, 2003; or
(c) A hospital designated as a critical access hospital under the
provisions of Part A Title XVIII of the Social Security Act Section
1820, 42 U.S.C., 1395i-4.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Emergency services" means health care services medically
necessary to evaluate and treat a medical condition that manifests
itself by the acute onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe
pain, that would lead a prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe
that a health condition exists that requires immediate medical
attention, and that the absence of immediate medical attention could
reasonably be expected to result in serious impairment to bodily
functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ or part, or would
place the person's health (or in the case of a pregnant woman, the
health of the woman or her unborn child) in serious jeopardy;
(b) "General hospital" means a hospital that provides general acute
care services, including emergency services;
(c) "Specialty hospital" means a subclass of hospital that either
provides hospital services within a specific branch of medicine or
limits admission according to age, sex, type of disease, or medical
condition;
(d) "Transfer agreement" means a written agreement providing an
effective process for the transfer of a patient requiring emergency
services to a general hospital providing emergency services and for
continuity of care for that patient.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of health, in
consultation with affected stakeholders such as hospitals, physicians,
and nurses, shall study the establishment of specialty hospitals, the
requirements of this act, and the impact that specialty hospitals have
on the delivery of health care. At a minimum the study shall include
but not be limited to evaluating the following issues as they pertain
to specialty hospitals:
(a) The availability and delivery of health care services;
(b) Patient safety;
(c) Continuity of patient care;
(d) The provision of emergency services, including the effect of
the presence or absence of an emergency department in specialty
hospitals;
(e) Staffing of any existing hospitals in the community served by
a specialty hospital, including the effect of specialty hospitals on
health care professional shortages, nursing staffing, and the
availability of specialty physicians to provide on-call emergency
services; and
(f) The provision of charity care, medicare and medicaid services,
services for medically indigent patients, uncompensated care, community
service, and access to health care services by medically underserved
populations.
(2) The study also shall include an evaluation of whether
requirements for establishing specialty hospitals should be addressed
through certificate of need or hospital licensing requirements.
(3) For the purposes of the study, "specialty hospitals" does not
include specialty hospitals that provide only psychiatric, pediatric,
long-term acute care, or rehabilitative services.
(4) The department of health shall prepare and present a report to
the legislature regarding the study no later than December 1, 2003.
The legislature shall reevaluate the requirements of this act based
upon the study.

--- END ---