BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A pedestrian may not intentionally impede, or otherwise
disrupt, the flow of traffic on a highway that has been designated, in
whole or in part, as a highway of statewide significance.
(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits the filing, at any time, of
a cause of action for damages resulting from the disruption of traffic
caused by a pedestrian or pedestrians.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.020 and 2001 c 325 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or
habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and
registration and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed
or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to initial registration of motor
vehicles;
(7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a
vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(22) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(23) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(24) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(25) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(26) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen,
and appraisers;
(27) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(28) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(29) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(30) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or fire fighters;
(31) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or
cooperate with an officer;
(32) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(33) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;
(34) Section 1 of this act relating to impeding traffic;
(35) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(((35))) (36) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(((36))) (37) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(((37))) (38) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor
vehicle;
(((38))) (39) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(((39))) (40) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent
driving;
(((40))) (41) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
roadway workers;
(((41))) (42) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on
highways;
(((42))) (43) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an
unattended vehicle with the motor running;
(((43))) (44) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle
fuel;
(((44))) (45) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or
attempt to cancel a traffic citation;
(((45))) (46) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((46))) (47) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic
offenders;
(((47))) (48) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to
obtain a refund;
(((48))) (49) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle
business practices, except where that chapter provides for the
assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((49))) (50) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((50))) (51) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((51))) (52) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((52))) (53) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((53))) (54) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((54))) (55) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((55))) (56) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((56))) (57) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

--- END ---