BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the department of
community, trade, and economic development has, through its individual
development accounts program, shown the value of economic development
efforts that focus on providing individuals with resources, skills, and
incentives to engage in gainful employment. It is the intent of the
legislature to promote economic development by creating the personal
reemployment account program in the department to provide for the
establishment of personal reemployment accounts for certain individuals
identified as likely to have problems becoming reemployed. The
personal reemployment account program is to assist such individuals by
accelerating reemployment, promoting retention in employment, and
providing enhanced flexibility, choice, and control in obtaining
intensive reemployment, training, and supportive services. It is the
further intent of the legislature to operate the program with funds
granted to the state from the federal government and private resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The personal reemployment account program is
established in the department of community, trade, and economic
development.
(1) An eligible individual may receive only one personal
reemployment account. The amount of each reemployment account is three
thousand dollars.
(2) An individual is eligible to receive a personal reemployment
account if, after the state receives federal grant funds, the
individual:
(a) Is identified, pursuant to section 303(j)(1) of the federal
social security act: (i) As likely to exhaust regular unemployment
compensation; (ii) to be in need of job search assistance to make a
successful transition to new employment; (iii) as receiving regular
unemployment compensation; and (iv) as eligible for not less than
twenty weeks of regular unemployment compensation; or
(b) Has exhausted all rights to any unemployment compensation, and:
(i) Is enrolled in training and needs additional support to
complete this training, with a priority of service to be provided to
the individuals who are training for shortage occupations or high-growth industries; or
(ii) Is separated from employment in an industry or occupation that
has experienced declining employment, or no longer provides any
employment, in the local labor market during the two-year period
preceding the individual's application for eligibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Prior to the establishment of a personal
reemployment account for an eligible individual, the department of
community, trade, and economic development and the one-stop delivery
system established under the federal work force investment act shall
ensure that the individual:
(a) Is informed of the requirements applicable to the personal
reemployment account, including the allowable uses of funds provided
for in section 4 of this act and the conditions for their receipt, and
the availability of and the limitations on access to services provided
for by federal law;
(b) Has the option to develop a personal reemployment plan which
will identify the employment goals and appropriate combination of
services selected by the individual to achieve the employment goals;
and
(c) Signs an attestation that the individual will comply with the
requirements relating to the personal reemployment accounts under this
chapter and federal law and will reimburse the account or, if the
account has been terminated, the program for any amounts expended from
the account that are not allowable.
(2) The department shall conduct periodic interviews with
recipients to assist them in meeting their individual employment goals
if, after they exhaust any unemployment compensation due to them, they
have remaining balances in their personal reemployment account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Subject to the requirements of federal
law, a recipient may use amounts in a personal reemployment account to
purchase one or more of the following:
(a) Intensive services, including:
(i) Comprehensive and specialized assessments of skill level and
service needs;
(ii) Development of an individual employment plan;
(iii) Counseling and career planning;
(iv) Case management of training selected by the recipient; and
(v) Short-term prevocational services such as communication skills,
learning skills, interviewing skills, and personal conduct skills;
(b) Training services, including:
(i) Occupational skills training and retraining;
(ii) On-the-job training;
(iii) Programs that combine workplace training with related
instruction;
(iv) Entrepreneurial training; and
(v) Job readiness and literacy training;
(c) Supportive services such as transportation, child care,
dependent care, and housing, that are necessary to enable an individual
to become reemployed but not needs-related payments; and
(d) Assistance to purchase or lease an automobile, if this
assistance is necessary to allow the recipient to accept a bona fide
offer of employment for which there is a reasonable expectation of
long-term duration.
(2) A recipient eligible under section 2(2)(b) of this act may
withdraw amounts from the personal reemployment account on a weekly
basis for purposes of income support in amounts up to the average
weekly amount of unemployment compensation that was received prior to
his or her exhaustion of unemployment benefits, provided the recipient
is engaged in job search, intensive services, or training that is
expected to lead to employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Consistent with federal law, a recipient may
receive a reemployment bonus of the balance of his or her personal
reemployment account if he or she obtains full-time employment within
thirteen weeks of:
(1) Starting unemployment payments for those recipients receiving
unemployment benefits at the time their reemployment account was
established; or
(2) The establishment of the reemployment account for those
recipients who had exhausted unemployment benefits at the time their
personal reemployment account was established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall, consistent with federal requirements and in
cooperation with the work force training and education coordinating
board and the employment security department, develop and submit a
state plan for operating the personal reemployment account program
authorized by this chapter. The department may operate the personal
reemployment account program in conjunction with its related community-based programs and is authorized to seek private resources to assist in
operating these programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Personal reemployment accounts and
disbursements from these accounts shall not be counted as income or
resources for purposes of determining eligibility or benefit level for
all cash assistance programs administered by the department of social
and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal law, the conflicting part of this act is
inoperative solely to the extent the conflict cannot be reconciled with
this act, and this finding does not affect the operation of the
remainder of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---