BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Proper collection and review of credible water quality data is
necessary to ensure compliance with the requirements of the federal
clean water act;
(b) Developing and implementing water quality protection measures
based only on credible water quality data ensures that the financial
resources of state and local governments and regulated entities are
prioritized to address our state's most important water quality issues;
and
(c) The state currently lacks standards relating to the collection
of water quality data even though the collection and analysis of that
data provides the basis for water quality protection efforts and can
have significant regulatory and financial impacts.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to establish a system of
standards and procedures to ensure that only credible water quality
data is used as the basis for specific state water quality programs.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that a water body in which
pollutant loadings from naturally occurring conditions alone are
sufficient to cause a violation of applicable surface water quality
standards not be listed as impaired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 3 through 6 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Credible data" means data meeting the requirements of section
4 of this act.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of ecology.
(3) "Impaired water" means a water body or segment thereof for
which credible data exists that satisfies the requirements of sections
3 through 6 of this act that demonstrates that the water body should be
identified pursuant to 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1313(d).
(4) "Naturally occurring condition" means any condition affecting
water quality that is not caused by human influence on the environment
including, but not limited to, soils, geology, hydrology, climate,
wildlife influence on the environment, and water flow with specific
consideration given to seasonal and other natural variations.
(5) "Section 303(d)" means 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1313(d).
(6) "Section 305(b)" means 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1315(b).
(7) "Total maximum daily load" has the same meaning as in the
federal water pollution control act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall use only credible
data for the following actions after the effective date of this
section:
(a) Developing and reviewing any water quality standard;
(b) Determining whether any water of the state is to be placed on
or removed from any section 303(d) list;
(c) Establishing a total maximum daily load for any water of the
state;
(d) Determining whether any water of the state is supporting its
designated use or other classification; or
(e) Determining any degradation of a water of the state.
(2) The department may require use of credible data for any other
purpose not specifically included in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) For any action specifically included in subsection (1) of this
section that was completed before the effective date of this section,
the department shall adopt a process to evaluate whether credible data
was used, and, if not, to ensure compliance with the requirements of
this act, if requested by a person regulated under this chapter or a
person who consumes water from, fishes from, swims in, or otherwise
uses waters that are the subject of the data.
(4) When evaluating the waters of the state for any section 303(d)
list, the department may not categorize as "polluted waters that do not
require a TMDL" (water quality assessment category 4) or "polluted
waters that require a TMDL" (water quality assessment category 5)
unless credible data supports such a listing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In collecting and analyzing water
quality data for any purpose identified in section 3 of this act, data
is considered credible data only if the department has determined all
of the following:
(a) Appropriate quality assurance and quality control procedures
were followed and documented in collecting and analyzing the data;
(b) The samples or analyses are representative of water quality
conditions at the time the data was collected;
(c) The data consists of an adequate number of samples based on the
nature of the water in question and the parameters being analyzed;
(d) The method of sampling and analysis, including analytical,
statistical, and modeling methods, is generally accepted and validated
in the scientific community as appropriate for use in assessing the
condition of the water; and
(e) The data was collected in a manner consistent with the
requirements of this section.
(2) The department shall adopt rules describing the training and
experience required for a person to be a qualified data collector for
the purposes of this section. The rules shall require the training to
include a thorough knowledge of the applicable sampling protocols and
field methods so that the data collection and interpretation are
reproducible, scientifically defensible, and free from preconceived
bias. The rules must authorize individuals with the necessary academic
credentials and experience to train other persons to be qualified data
collectors. The rules must require a person who chooses to submit data
for consideration as credible data to document the person's status as
a qualified data collector and certify that the credible data were
collected in accordance with the provisions of this section. The
department shall verify that a person submitting data is a qualified
data collector, review all data collected, and verify the accuracy of
the data. If the department determines that the data are accurate and
were collected by a qualified data collector in accordance with the
required procedures, the department shall approve the data as credible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In assessing whether a water body is
impaired, the department shall consider the data available in light of
the nature of the water in question, including whether the water body
is ephemeral.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Any employee of the department who knowingly
misrepresents data shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 42.20.040
and 42.20.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 90.48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 By January 31, 2005, the department of
ecology shall report to the appropriate committees of the senate and
the house of representatives the status of activities undertaken to
comply with the provisions of this act, and shall report by January
2006 any rule making required to implement this act including changes
in listings resulting from the use of credible data.

--- END ---