BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.52.001 and 1961 c 13 s 47.52.001 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Unrestricted access to and from public highways has resulted in
congestion and peril for the traveler. It has caused undue slowing of
all traffic in many areas. The investment of the public in highway
facilities has been impaired and highway facilities costing vast sums
of money will have to be relocated and reconstructed.
(2) Personal wireless service is a critical part of the state's
infrastructure. The rapid deployment of personal wireless facilities
is critical to ensure public safety, network access, quality of
service, and rural economic development.
(3) It is, therefore, the declared policy of this state to limit
access to the highway facilities of this state in the interest of
highway safety and for the preservation of the investment of the public
in such facilities; however, approaches to partially controlled limited
access highways shall be permitted for the deployment of personal
wireless facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall authorize an off and on approach to
partially controlled limited access highways for the placement and
service of facilities providing personal wireless services.
(a) The approach shall be in a legal manner not to exceed thirty
feet in width.
(b) The approach may be specified at a point satisfactory to the
department at or between designated highway stations.
(2) The department shall authorize the approach by an annual
permit, which may only be canceled upon one hundred eighty days'
written notice to the permit holder.
(a) The permit shall cost no more than five hundred dollars a year.
(b) The permit shall be assignable to the contractors and
subcontractors of the permit holder. The permit shall also be
transferable to a new owner following the sale or merger of the permit
holder.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Personal wireless services" means any federally licensed
personal wireless service.
(b) "Facilities" means unstaffed facilities that are used for the
transmission or reception, or both, of wireless communication services
including, but not necessarily limited to, antenna arrays, transmission
cables, equipment shelters, and support structures.

--- END ---