BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that light rail
transit service in certain counties is more costly, and provides
substantially less service, than other transit alternatives, and should
therefore be prohibited. The legislature further finds that regional
transit authorities should consider alternatives to light rail transit
service in certain counties to ensure that the most cost-effective
transit service is provided throughout the service area. However, the
legislature finds that in those counties where light rail transit
service is not cost-effective, a regional transit authority should not
be prohibited from implementing other high-capacity transportation
systems, such as commuter rail, monorail, intercity bus service, and
park and ride lots. Additionally, light rail transit service in the
less populous counties of a service area should remain as a viable
option for a regional transit authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a regional transit
authority may not make any expenditure, incur any debt, issue any
bonds, or enter into any agreement, for the purpose of implementing a
light rail transit system in a county with a population over one
million five hundred thousand persons.
(2) A regional transit authority may make expenditures under this
section solely for the purpose of retiring debt, if any, relative to a
light rail transit system that was incurred before the effective date
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---