BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.68.240 and 2000 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter, or
any of the rules, regulations, or orders issued pursuant thereto, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided under
chapter 9A.20 RCW, except that any person violating any of the
provisions of RCW 47.68.220, 47.68.230, or 47.68.255 shall be guilty of
a gross misdemeanor which shall be punished as provided under chapter
9A.20 RCW. In addition to, or in lieu of, the penalties provided in
this section, or as a condition to the suspension of a sentence which
may be imposed pursuant thereto, for violations of RCW 47.68.220 and
47.68.230, the court in its discretion may prohibit the violator from
operating an aircraft within the state for such period as it may
determine but not to exceed one year. Violation of the duly imposed
prohibition of the court may be treated as a separate offense under
this section or as a contempt of court.
(2) In addition to the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, failure to register an aircraft, as required by this chapter,
is subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars per aircraft for
the first violation. Subsequent violations in the same year are
subject to the following civil penalties:
(a) For the second violation, a civil penalty of two hundred
dollars per aircraft;
(b) For the third and subsequent violations, a civil penalty of
four hundred dollars per aircraft.
(3) In addition to the provisions in subsection (1) of this
section, failure to register as a pilot, airman, or airwoman, as
required by this chapter, is subject to a civil penalty of four times
the fees that are due.
(4) The revenue from penalties prescribed in subsection (2) of this
section must be deposited into the aeronautics account under RCW
82.42.090. The revenue from penalties prescribed in subsection (3) of
this section must be deposited into the aircraft search and rescue,
safety, and education account under RCW 47.68.236.

--- END ---