BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 20.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It shall be a violation of this chapter for any agent, broker,
cash buyer, commission merchant, dealer, or processor to purchase or
receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, concord grapes grown in
Washington for use by a processor in the commercial production of
juice, jam, or jelly unless (a) the processor sets forth a stated price
in dollars and cents of all amounts paid or to be paid per unit
thereof, and makes the stated price available to any selling or
delivering party not later than the fifteenth day of August in the year
in which such grapes are to be delivered; (b) where a selling or
delivering party has a contract for delivery of such grapes to a
processor, the processor has, not later than the fifteenth day of
August in the year in which such grapes are to be delivered, mailed to
the delivering or selling party written notice of the stated grape
price and opportunity to refuse to deliver with respect thereto; and
(c) the processor has mailed to the director not later than the
fifteenth day of August of each year in which such grapes are to be
delivered, a written statement of the stated price to be paid for such
grape or grapes.
(2) Any notice required under subsection (1) of this section shall
be mailed using the United States postal service. The cancellation
mark stamped by the United States postal service employee upon the
envelope or other appropriate wrapper containing any such notice
required by this subsection shall be prima facie evidence of the date
of such mailing.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any contract
or other arrangement for the purchase or sale of concord grapes (a)
entered into prior to the effective date of this act; or (b) for
delivery to a cooperative marketing association or federation
incorporated under, or whose articles of incorporation and bylaws are
equivalent to, the requirements of chapter 23.86 RCW by a member patron
or nonmember patron of such cooperative corporation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect September 1, 2003.

--- END ---