BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
An insurer may not deny coverage for the treatment of an injury
solely because the injury was sustained as a consequence of the
insured's being intoxicated or under the influence of a narcotic.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
An insurer may not deny coverage for the treatment of an injury
solely because the injury was sustained as a consequence of the
insured's being intoxicated or under the influence of a narcotic.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A health care service contractor may not deny coverage for the
treatment of an injury solely because the injury was sustained as a
consequence of the enrolled participant's being intoxicated or under
the influence of a narcotic.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
A health maintenance organization may not deny coverage for the
treatment of an injury solely because the injury was sustained as a
consequence of the enrolled participant's being intoxicated or under
the influence of a narcotic.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 48.20.272 (Optional standard provision
No. 23--Intoxicants and narcotics) and 1951 c 229 s 28 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act applies to all contracts issued or
renewed on or after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---