BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.100.020 and 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 302 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A public facilities district shall be governed by a board of
directors consisting of five or seven members as provided in this
section. If the largest city in the county has a population that is at
least forty percent of the total county population, the board of
directors of the public facilities district shall consist of five or
seven members selected as follows: (a) Two members appointed by the
county legislative authority to serve for four-year staggered terms;
(b) two members appointed by the city council of the largest city in
the county to serve for four-year staggered terms; ((and)) (c) one
person to serve for a four-year term who is selected by the other
directors; and (d) if the second largest city in the county has a
population that is at least fifteen percent of the total county
population, one member to serve for a four-year term staggered with the
appointee selected under (c) of this subsection who is selected by the
legislative authority of the second largest city in the county and one
member to serve for a four-year term who is selected by the other
directors. If the largest city in the county has a population of less
than forty percent of the total county population, the county
legislative authority shall establish in the resolution creating the
public facilities district whether the board of directors of the public
facilities district has either five or seven members, and the county
legislative authority shall appoint the members of the board of
directors to reflect the interests of cities and towns in the county,
as well as the unincorporated area of the county. However, if the
county has a population of one million or more, the largest city in the
county has a population of less than forty percent of the total county
population, and the county operates under a county charter, which
provides for an elected county executive, three members shall be
appointed by the governor and the remaining members shall be appointed
by the county executive subject to confirmation by the county
legislative authority. Of the members appointed by the governor, the
speaker of the house of representatives and the majority leader of the
senate shall each recommend to the governor a person to be appointed to
the board.
(2) At least one member on the board of directors shall be
representative of the lodging industry in the public facilities
district before the public facilities district imposes the excise tax
under RCW 36.100.040.
(3) Members of the board of directors shall serve four-year terms
of office, except that two of the initial five board members or three
of the initial seven board members shall serve two-year terms of
office.
(4) A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment was made and the person appointed to fill a vacancy shall
serve for the remainder of the unexpired term of the office for the
position to which he or she was appointed.
(5) A director appointed by the governor may be removed from office
by the governor. Any other director may be removed from office by
action of at least two-thirds of the members of the legislative
authority which made the appointment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2005.

--- END ---