BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.275 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any contract for employee benefits executed after April 13,
1990, between a school district and a benefit provider or employee
bargaining unit is null and void unless it contains an agreement to
abide by state laws relating to school district employee benefits. The
term of the contract may not exceed one year.
(2) School districts shall annually submit to the Washington state
health care authority summary descriptions of all benefits offered
under the district's employee benefit plan. The districts shall also
submit data to the health care authority specifying the total number of
employees and, for each employee, types of coverage or benefits
received including numbers of covered dependents, the number of
eligible dependents, the amount of the district's contribution,
additional premium costs paid by the employee through payroll
deductions, and the age and sex of the employee and each dependent.
The plan descriptions and the data shall be submitted in a format and
according to a schedule established by the health care authority.
(3) Any benefit provider offering a benefit plan by contract with
a school district under subsection (1) of this section shall agree to
make available to the school district the benefit plan descriptions
and, where available, the demographic information on plan subscribers
that the district is required to report to the Washington state health
care authority under this section.
(4) Beginning with contracts negotiated after the effective date of
this section, school districts may provide for interdistrict health
benefits that provide spouses employed in different school districts to
receive benefits at the same rate as spouses employed in a single
school district.
(5) This section shall not apply to benefit plans offered in the
1989-90 school year.

--- END ---