BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that counties have
been given the authority to designate agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance and that such lands are protected as a matter
of state law. The legislature finds that counties have also been given
the authority to designate fish habitat and that these areas are to be
protected as a matter of state law. In addition, the legislature finds
that the department of fish and wildlife has been granted authority to
protect fish habitat in streams.
The legislature finds that several fish habitat restoration
processes have been established for the specific purpose of developing
plans acceptable to the local communities to restore fish habitat and
that several millions of dollars of public funds have been dedicated to
projects supported by the local community, including many in Skagit
county.
The legislature finds that instead of using fish habitat
restoration processes, the department of fish and wildlife has
attempted
in Skagit county to use regulatory statutes that are limited
to the protection of fish habitat. However, these regulatory statutes
do not require the restoration or enhancement of habitat.
The legislature finds that historical interpretations by the agency
have changed without a corresponding change in the underlying statute.
Further, the term "protection" has been determined to be equivalent to
a no net loss standard in the administrative code pertaining to
hydraulic project approvals. Likewise, the legislature finds that the
protection requirement for agricultural land designated as having long-term commercial significance has been interpreted by the state supreme
court in a similar fashion of no reduction and no net loss.
The legislature further finds that for over fifty years that
fishway statutes have been in effect, they have not been applied to
tide gates on agricultural drainage facilities.
The legislature finds that a collaborative process to examine
reasonable and feasible alternatives to enhance tidal fish habitat
should be used to focus and expedite efforts where there is a gain in
tidal fish habitat without harming designated agricultural lands. The
legislature also finds that pilot projects may be needed to test
creative solutions to achieve the dual goals of enhancing tidal fish
habitat while protecting designated agricultural lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The purposes of this act are:
(1) To protect lands designated by the county as agricultural land
of long-term commercial significance from the effects of saltwater
intrusion and diminishment of drainage capability for drainage
infrastructure, including flood gates, pump stations, ditches, and tide
gates;
(2) To require examination of opportunities to enhance tidal fish
habitat on hundreds of acres of publicly owned land while maintaining
habitat for migratory birds and that opportunities on publicly owned
lands outside the dikes be considered first; and
(3) To allow tide gates located on bona fide streams to proceed
through a fish habitat restoration planning process to find
opportunities to use fish habitat while avoiding harm to existing land
uses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter
77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) From funds appropriated to the department of fish and wildlife
for salmon restoration activities, the fish and wildlife commission, in
coordination with the Skagit county legislative authority and diking
and drainage district commissioners, and local landowners, shall
establish the Skagit tidal fish habitat pilot project to jointly
develop a strategy and to propose projects to enhance tidal fish
habitat and address the management, operation, and maintenance of tide
gates on streams in Skagit county while assuring no net loss of
agricultural lands or their productivity. The strategy and proposed
projects must be submitted to the appropriate standing committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2004. The strategy must consider the
following elements:
(a) An inventory of existing tide gates located on bona fide
streams in Skagit county. The inventory must include location, age,
type, and maintenance history of the tide gate, and other factors as
determined by the commission, the county, diking and drainage
districts, and local landowners;
(b) An assessment of the role of tide gates located on bona fide
streams in the Skagit county; the role of tidal fish habitat for
various life stages of salmon; the quantity and characterization of
tidal fish habitat currently accessible to fish; the quantity and
characterization of the present tidal fish habitat created at the time
the dikes and outlets were constructed; the quantity of potential tidal
fish habitat on public lands and alternatives to enhance this habitat;
the effects of salt water intrusion on agricultural land including the
effects of backfeeding of salt water through the underground drainage
system; the role of tide gates in drainage systems including relieving
excess water from saturated soil and providing reservoir functions
between tides; the effect of saturated soils on production of crops;
the characteristics of properly functioning tidal fish habitat; the
description of agricultural lands designated by the county as having
long-term commercial significance and the effect of that designation;
the description and identification of natural water courses and the
effect of that designation; and the economic impacts to existing land
uses for various alternatives for tide gate alteration; and
(c) A long-term proposal for fish habitat enhancement to meet the
two goals of salmon recovery and no net loss of designated agricultural
lands. The fish and wildlife commission, the Skagit county legislative
authority, and diking and drainage district commissioners shall jointly
convene a work group of interested parties, including local landowners,
tribal councilmembers, local governments, federal fishery agencies,
diking and drainage districts, and representatives of the local lead
entity under RCW 77.85.050, to develop the strategy and proposed
projects, based on the inventory and assessment under (a) and (b) of
this subsection. Legislators shall be appointed to the work group,
with an equal number from each of the four major caucuses in the house
of representatives and the senate as determined by the speaker of the
house of representatives and the president of the senate. The proposal
shall include methods to increase fish passage and enhance tidal
habitat on public lands, voluntary methods to increase fish passage on
private lands, a priority list of fish passage projects on bona fide
streams, and recommendations for funding of high priority projects.
(2) The strategy shall proceed in four phases as follows:
(a) Examining opportunities and proposing projects for tidal fish
habitat improvements on public land outside the dike;
(b) Examining opportunities and proposing projects for tidal fish
habitat improvements on public land inside the dike;
(c) Examining opportunities and proposing projects for tidal fish
habitat improvements on areas that have bona fide streams; and
(d) Examining voluntary opportunities for tidal fish habitat
improvements where there are no bona fide streams.
(3) The department of fish and wildlife may not require fish
passage under RCW 77.55.060 or as a condition of hydraulic project
approval for maintenance, improvement, or replacement of agricultural
drainage systems under this chapter unless the condition is consistent
with the strategy developed under this section and the strategy has
been approved by the legislature.
(4) Any condition requiring fish passage in an existing hydraulic
project approval issued for a tide gate in Skagit county under this
chapter is stayed unless the condition is consistent with the strategy
developed under this section and the strategy has been approved by the
legislature.
(5) For the purpose of this section, "stream" or "bona fide stream"
means the Skagit river, the Samish river, Carpenter creek, and Colony
creek.

--- END ---