BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.56.180 and 2002 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The administrator for the courts will create a handbook
explaining the sections of Washington law pertaining to the rights and
responsibilities of marital partners to each other and to any children
during a marriage and a dissolution of marriage. The handbook may also
be provided in videotape or other electronic form.
(2) The handbook created under subsection (1) of this section will
be provided by the county auditor when an individual ((files a marriage
certificate under RCW 26.04.090)) applies for a marriage license under
RCW 26.04.140.
(3) The information contained in the handbook created under
subsection (1) of this section will be reviewed and updated annually.
The handbook must contain the following information:
(a) Information on prenuptial agreements as contracts and as a
means of structuring financial arrangements and other aspects of the
marital relationship;
(b) Information on shared parental responsibility for children,
including establishing a residential schedule for the child in the
event of the dissolution of the marriage;
(c) Information on notice requirements and standards for parental
relocation;
(d) Information on child support for minor children;
(e) Information on property rights, including equitable
distribution of assets and premarital and postmarital property rights;
(f) Information on spousal maintenance;
(g) Information on domestic violence, child abuse, and neglect,
including penalties;
(h) Information on the court process for dissolution;
(i) Information on the effects of dissolution on children;
(j) Information on community resources that are available to
separating or divorcing persons and their children.

--- END ---