BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that throughout
the entire history of the state of Washington, the staff and volunteers
at residential habilitation centers and their predecessor institutions
have provided compassionate care to persons with developmental
disabilities. This dedication and care has continued even while
changing social attitudes and family preferences have shifted the
demand for services from state institutions to community living.
Today, most individuals with developmental disabilities and their
families expect to live, learn, and work within their communities. The
Americans with disabilities act of 1990 bolstered those expectations.
Because of these changing expectations, the number of persons served in
residential habilitation centers continues to decline. This decline
results in increased costs to serve the remaining residents due
to significant fixed costs at the institutions. The result is fewer
resources available to support individuals with developmental
disabilities and their families in the community.
(2) The legislature intends to honor the legacy of compassionate
care at residential habilitation centers, by ensuring that state
funding and the value of state assets previously devoted to
institutional care is retained for services for individuals with
developmental disabilities living in the community. In order to
improve the cost-efficiency of care at residential habilitation centers
and begin to shift resources to expand community services, Fircrest
School shall be closed during the 2003-2005 biennium. The secretary of
social and health services shall develop and implement a transition
plan that ensures that residents of Fircrest School shall be offered
the choice of services at another residential habilitation center,
community services, or, if appropriate, services in a skilled nursing
facility. The proceeds from the eventual disposal of Fircrest property
shall be deposited in the Fircrest legacy trust account established in
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The Fircrest legacy trust account is created in the state treasury.
All proceeds from the disposal of surplus property at Fircrest School
must be deposited into the account. "Proceeds" include the net
receipts from the sale of all or a portion of the property or the lease
payments for all or a portion of the property. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for services to individuals with developmental
disabilities and their families.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.190.020 and 1990 c 33 s 171 are each amended to
read as follows:
The term "residential school" as used in RCW 28A.190.020 through
28A.190.060, 72.01.200, 72.05.010 and 72.05.130, each as now or
hereafter amended, shall mean Green Hill school, Maple Lane school,
Naselle Youth Camp, Cedar Creek Youth Camp, Mission Creek Youth Camp,
Echo Glen, Lakeland Village, Rainier school, Yakima Valley school,
Interlake school, ((Fircrest school,)) Francis Haddon Morgan Center,
the Child Study and Treatment Center and Secondary School of Western
State Hospital, and such other schools, camps, and centers as are now
or hereafter established by the department of social and health
services for the diagnosis, confinement and rehabilitation of juveniles
committed by the courts or for the care and treatment of persons who
are exceptional in their needs by reason of mental and/or physical
deficiency: PROVIDED, That the term shall not include the state
schools for the deaf and blind or adult correctional institutions.

Sec. 4 RCW 28C.04.390 and 1999 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The college board worker retraining program funds shall be used
for training programs and related support services, including financial
aid, counseling, referral to training resources, job referral, and job
development that:
(a) Are consistent with the unified plan for work force
development;
(b) Provide increased enrollments for dislocated workers and
Fircrest employees who lost their jobs with the closure of Fircrest
School;
(c) Provide customized training opportunities for dislocated
workers and Fircrest employees who lost their jobs with the closure of
Fircrest School; and
(d) Provide increased enrollments and support services, including
financial aid for those students not receiving unemployment insurance
benefits, that do not replace or supplant any existing enrollments,
programs, support services, or funding sources.
(2) The college board shall develop a plan for use of the worker
retraining program funds in conjunction with the work force training
customer advisory committee established in subsection (3) of this
section. In developing the plan the college board shall:
(a) Provide that applicants for worker retraining program funds
shall solicit financial support for training programs and give priority
in receipt of funds to those applicants which are most successful in
matching public dollars with financial support;
(b) Provide that applicants for worker retraining program funds
shall develop training programs in partnership with local businesses,
industry associations, labor, and other partners as appropriate and
give priority in receipt of funds to those applicants who develop
customized training programs in partnership with local businesses,
industry associations, and labor organizations;
(c) Give priority in receipt of funds to those applicants serving
rural areas;
(d) Ensure that applicants receiving worker retraining program
funds gather information from local work force development councils on
employer work force needs, including the needs of businesses with less
than twenty-five employees; and
(e) Provide for specialized vocational training at a private career
school or college at the request of a recipient eligible under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. Available tuition for the training
is limited to the amount that would otherwise be payable per enrolled
quarter to a public institution.
(3) The executive director of the college board shall appoint a
work force training customer advisory committee by July 1, 1999, to:
(a) Assist in the development of the plan for the use of the
college board worker retraining program funds and recommend guidelines
to the college board for the operation of worker retraining programs;
(b) Recommend selection criteria for worker retraining programs and
grant applicants for receipt of worker retraining program grants;
(c) Provide advice to the college board on other work force
development activities of the community and technical colleges;
(d) Recommend selection criteria for job skills grants, consistent
with criteria established in this chapter and chapter 121, Laws of
1999. Such criteria shall include a prioritization of job skills
applicants in rural areas;
(e) Recommend guidelines to the college board for the operation of
the job skills program; and
(f) Recommend grant applicants for receipt of job skills program
grants.
(4) Members of the work force training customer advisory committee
shall consist of three college system representatives selected by the
executive director of the college board, three representatives of
business selected from nominations provided by statewide business
organizations, and three representatives of labor selected from
nominations provided by a statewide labor organization representing a
cross-section of workers in the state.

Sec. 5 RCW 50.62.020 and 1987 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Job service" means the employment assistance program of the
employment security department;
(2) "Employment assistance" means services to unemployed persons
focused on and measured by the obtaining of employment;
(3) "Labor exchange" means those activities which match labor
supply and labor demand, including recruitment, screening, and referral
of qualified workers to employers;
(4) "Special account of the administrative contingency fund" means
that fund under RCW 50.24.014 established within the administrative
contingency fund of the employment security department which provides
revenue for the purposes of this chapter.
(5) "Continuous wage and benefit history" means an information and
research system utilizing a longitudinal data base containing
information on both employment and unemployment.
(6) "Long-term unemployed" means demographic groups of unemployment
insurance claimants identified by the employment security department
pursuant to RCW 50.62.040(1)(e) which have the highest percentages of
persons who have drawn at least fifteen weeks of unemployment insurance
benefits or have the highest percentage of persons who have exhausted
their unemployment insurance benefits.
(7) "Older unemployed workers" means unemployment insurance
claimants who are at least fifty years of age.
(8) "Unemployed Fircrest workers" are those persons employed at the
Fircrest School whose jobs were eliminated by the closure of Fircrest
School.

Sec. 6 RCW 50.62.030 and 1995 c 135 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Job service resources shall be used to assist with the reemployment
of unemployed workers using the most efficient and effective means of
service delivery. The job service program of the employment security
department may undertake any program or activity for which funds are
available and which furthers the goals of this chapter. These programs
and activities shall include, but are not limited to:
(1) Giving unemployed Fircrest workers, older unemployed workers,
and the long-term unemployed the highest priority for all services made
available under this section. The employment security department shall
make the services provided under this chapter available to the
unemployed Fircrest workers, older unemployed workers, and the long-term unemployed as soon as they register under the employment
assistance program;
(2) Supplementing basic employment services, with special job
search and claimant placement assistance designed to assist
unemployment insurance claimants to obtain employment;
(3) Providing employment services, such as recruitment, screening,
and referral of qualified workers, to agricultural areas where these
services have in the past contributed to positive economic conditions
for the agricultural industry; and
(4) Providing otherwise unobtainable information and analysis to
the legislature and program managers about issues related to employment
and unemployment.

Sec. 7 RCW 50.04.075 and 1984 c 181 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Dislocated worker" means any individual who:
(1) Has been terminated or received a notice of termination from
employment;
(2) Is eligible for or has exhausted entitlement to unemployment
compensation benefits; and
(3) Is unlikely to return to employment in the individual's
principal occupation or previous industry because of a diminishing
demand for their skills in that occupation or industry or is an
employee at Fircrest School whose job was terminated by the closure of
Fircrest School.

Sec. 8 RCW 71A.20.020 and 1994 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following residential habilitation centers are permanently
established to provide services to persons with developmental
disabilities: Lakeland Village, located at Medical Lake, Spokane
county; Rainier School, located at Buckley, Pierce county; Yakima
Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county; ((Fircrest School,
located at Seattle, King county;)) and Frances Haddon Morgan
((Children's)) Center, located at Bremerton, Kitsap county.

Sec. 9 RCW 71A.20.050 and 1990 c 33 s 589 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall appoint a superintendent for each
residential habilitation center. The superintendent of a residential
habilitation center shall have a demonstrated history of knowledge,
understanding, and compassion for the needs, treatment, and training of
persons with developmental disabilities.
(2) The secretary shall have custody of all residents of the
residential habilitation centers and control of the medical,
educational, therapeutic, and dietetic treatment of all residents,
except that the school district that conducts the program of education
provided pursuant to RCW 28A.190.030 through 28A.190.050 shall have
control of and joint custody of residents while they are participating
in the program. The secretary shall cause surgery to be performed on
any resident only upon gaining the consent of a parent, guardian, or
limited guardian as authorized, except, if after reasonable effort to
locate the parents, guardian, or limited guardian as authorized, and
the health of the resident is certified by the attending physician to
be jeopardized unless such surgery is performed, the required consent
shall not be necessary.
(3) In the event that a resident must be transferred from one
residential habilitation center to another due to a reduction in
capacity or closure of the facility, the secretary shall consult with
the resident's family or guardian in the manner provided in RCW
71A.10.070. Consultation shall include assurance that residents
transferring from one residential habilitation center to another be
provided comparable or better services and care at their new
residential habilitation center. When more than one resident must be
transferred, the secretary shall consider the proximity and level of
family involvement when prioritizing transfers to the closest
appropriate residential habilitation center with available capacity.
A transfer under this section may not be delayed by proceedings under
RCW 71A.20.080.

Sec. 10 RCW 71A.20.080 and 1989 c 175 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever in the judgment of the secretary, the treatment and
training of any resident of a residential habilitation center has
progressed to the point that it is deemed advisable to return such
resident to the community, the secretary may grant placement on such
terms and conditions as the secretary may deem advisable after
consultation in the manner provided in RCW 71A.10.070. The secretary
shall give written notice of the decision to return a resident to the
community as provided in RCW 71A.10.060. The notice must include a
statement advising the recipient of the right to an adjudicative
proceeding under RCW 71A.10.050 and the time limits for filing an
application for an adjudicative proceeding. The notice must also
include a statement advising the recipient of the right to judicial
review of an adverse adjudicative order as provided in chapter 34.05
RCW.
Except under RCW 71A.20.050(3), a placement decision shall not be
implemented at any level during any period during which an appeal can
be taken or while an appeal is pending and undecided, unless authorized
by court order so long as the appeal is being diligently pursued.
The department of social and health services shall periodically
evaluate at reasonable intervals the adjustment of the resident to the
specific placement to determine whether the resident should be
continued in the placement or returned to the institution or given a
different placement.

Sec. 11 RCW 72.05.010 and 1985 c 378 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purposes of RCW 72.05.010 through 72.05.210 are: To provide
for every child with behavior problems, mentally and physically
handicapped persons, and hearing and visually impaired children, within
the purview of RCW 72.05.010 through 72.05.210, ((as now or hereafter
amended,)) such care, guidance and instruction, control and treatment
as will best serve the welfare of the child or person and society; to
insure nonpolitical and qualified operation, supervision, management,
and control of the Green Hill school, the Maple Lane school, the
Naselle Youth Camp, the Mission Creek Youth Camp, Echo Glen, the
Cascadia Diagnostic Center, Lakeland Village, Rainier school, the
Yakima Valley school, Interlake school, ((Fircrest school,)) the
Francis Haddon Morgan Center, the Child Study and Treatment Center and
Secondary School of Western State Hospital, and like residential state
schools, camps and centers hereafter established, and to place them
under the department of social and health services except where
specified otherwise; and to provide for the persons committed or
admitted to those schools that type of care, instruction, and treatment
most likely to accomplish their rehabilitation and restoration to
normal citizenship.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.84.092 and 2002 c 242 s 2, 2002 c 114 s 24, and
2002 c 56 s 402 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the Fircrest legacy trust
account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health
services account, the state higher education construction account, the
higher education construction account, the highway infrastructure
account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges'
retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax
account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and
use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment
fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account,
the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the
urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 71A.20.030 (Facilities for Interlake
School) and 1988 c 176 s 703 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---