BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The business of prepaid legal service plans is not insurance
under RCW 48.01.040 and is not subject to regulation under this title.
(2) For purposes of this section, "prepaid legal service plan"
means an arrangement that provides specified legal services or
reimbursement for legal expenses in consideration of a specified
payment for an interval of time. It does not include a policy of
insurance, or coverage incidental to that insurance, issued by an
insurer having a valid certificate of authority in this state if the
policy is issued under the general laws in this title pertaining to
insurance.

--- END ---