BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that athletic events
in which children participate have become increasingly competitive.
The legislature finds that officials with appropriate training can
create a safer environment where children can learn the principles of
fair play. The legislature finds that establishing minimum standards
for officials in athletic events involving children under the age of
eighteen promotes the safety and health of the children participating
in athletic games and competitions, the people watching the event, and
the officials enforcing the rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(3) "Official" means the person determining whether or not the
rules of the athletic event are being followed by the participants in
athletic events.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A person shall not practice or represent
himself or herself as an official in an athletic event where children
under the age of eighteen participate unless the person is registered
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In addition to any other authority provided
by law, the director may:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this
chapter;
(2) Establish registration and renewal fees that may be established
at a level to support the administration of the program under this
chapter;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Register any applicants who have met the requirements for
registration and deny registration to applicants who do not meet the
requirements of this chapter;
(5) Establish training criteria for each sport, establish criteria
for approved training programs, which shall include but not be limited
to the rules of the sport and conflict management, and develop
assessments as needed;
(6) Hire clerical, administrative investigative, and other staff as
needed to implement this chapter, and contract with a voluntary
nonprofit entity regulating the conduct of athletic or recreational
events; and
(7) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and
persons registered under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The director shall keep an official record
of all proceedings. A part of the record shall consist of a register
of all applicants for registration under this chapter and the results
of each application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Applicants for registration shall submit the
appropriate fee and a completed criminal history background check with
their applications. The applicant shall designate the specific sports
at which the official wants to officiate and demonstrate that the
applicant has taken the appropriate training for that sport.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The director shall establish by rule the
procedural requirements and fees for renewal of a registration. At a
minimum, the director shall require a background check once every three
years and annual attendance at training for specific sports and annual
passage of approved tests in the appropriate sport.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---