BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that adult day care
services can provide a needed service to individuals who find it
difficult to care for themselves in their own residences during the
day. The legislature intends that families be able to care for their
family members with disabilities at home and that neighbors help
neighbors with this care without permission from the government. Adult
day care can assist family members in providing continuous community-based care for their family members with disabilities and reduce the
need for more expensive nursing and other residential facility care.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.128.030 and 1989 c 427 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following residential facilities shall be exempt from the
operation of this chapter:
(1) Nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW;
(2) Boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;
(3) Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;
(4) Residential treatment centers for the mentally ill licensed
under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(5) Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW;
(6) Homes for the developmentally disabled licensed under chapter
74.15 RCW;
(7) Adult day care homes which are regular private family abodes in
which the home owner is the resident manager and primary care giver,
and provides care to no more than five adults during the day and does
not provide overnight care, which means that clients may not receive
care for longer than twelve hours a day.

--- END ---