BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Personal wireless service is a critical part
of the state's infrastructure. The rapid deployment of personal
wireless service facilities is critical to ensure public safety,
network access, quality of service, and rural economic development.
The use of all state highway rights of way must be permitted for the
deployment of personal wireless service facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.04.010 and 1975 c 62 s 50 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following words and phrases, wherever used in this title, shall
have the meaning as in this section ascribed to them, unless where used
the context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary or unless
otherwise defined in the chapter of which they are a part:
(1) "Alley." A highway within the ordinary meaning of alley not
designated for general travel and primarily used as a means of access
to the rear of residences and business establishments;
(2) "Arterial highway." Every highway, as herein defined, or
portion thereof designated as such by proper authority;
(3) "Business district." The territory contiguous to and including
a highway, as herein defined, when within any six hundred feet along
such highway there are buildings in use for business or industrial
purposes, including but not limited to hotels, banks, or office
buildings, railroad stations, and public buildings which occupy at
least three hundred feet of frontage on one side or three hundred feet
collectively on both sides of the highway;
(4) "Center line." The line, marked or unmarked parallel to and
equidistant from the sides of a two-way traffic roadway of a highway
except where otherwise indicated by painted lines or markers;
(5) "Center of intersection." The point of intersection of the
center lines of the roadways of intersecting highways;
(6) "City street." Every highway as herein defined, or part
thereof located within the limits of incorporated cities and towns,
except alleys;
(7) "Combination of vehicles." Every combination of motor vehicle
and motor vehicle, motor vehicle and trailer, or motor vehicle and
semitrailer;
(8) "Commercial vehicle." Any vehicle the principal use of which
is the transportation of commodities, merchandise, produce, freight,
animals, or passengers for hire;
(9) "County road." Every highway as herein defined, or part
thereof, outside the limits of incorporated cities and towns and which
has not been designated as a state highway, or branch thereof;
(10) "Crosswalk." The portion of the roadway between the
intersection area and a prolongation or connection of the farthest
sidewalk line or in the event there are no sidewalks then between the
intersection area and a line ten feet therefrom, except as modified by
a marked crosswalk;
(11) "Highway." Every way, lane, road, street, boulevard, and
every way or place in the state of Washington open as a matter of right
to public vehicular travel both inside and outside the limits of
incorporated cities and towns;
(12) "Intersection area." (a) The area embraced within the
prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then
the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two or more highways
which join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the
area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at
any other angle may come in conflict;
(b) Where a highway includes two roadways thirty feet or more
apart, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by
an intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection.
In the event such intersecting highway also includes two roadways
thirty feet or more apart, then every crossing of two roadways of such
highways shall be regarded as a separate intersection;
(c) The junction of an alley with a street or highway shall not
constitute an intersection;
(((12))) (13) "Intersection control area." The intersection area
as herein defined, together with such modification of the adjacent
roadway area as results from the arc or curb corners and together with
any marked or unmarked crosswalks adjacent to the intersection;
(((13))) (14) "Laned highway." A highway the roadway of which is
divided into clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic;
(((14))) (15) "Local authorities." Every county, municipal, or
other local public board or body having authority to adopt local police
regulations under the Constitution and laws of this state;
(((15))) (16) "Marked crosswalk." Any portion of a roadway
distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings
on the surface thereof;
(((16))) (17) "Metal tire." Every tire, the bearing surface of
which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other
hard, nonresilient material;
(((17))) (18) "Motor truck." Any motor vehicle, as herein defined,
designed or used for the transportation of commodities, merchandise,
produce, freight, or animals;
(((18))) (19) "Motor vehicle." Every vehicle, as herein defined,
which is in itself a self-propelled unit;
(((19))) (20) "Multiple lane highway." Any highway the roadway of
which is of sufficient width to reasonably accommodate two or more
separate lanes of vehicular traffic in the same direction, each lane of
which shall be not less than the maximum legal vehicle width, and
whether or not such lanes are marked;
(((20))) (21) "Operator." Every person who drives or is in actual
physical control of a vehicle as herein defined;
(((21))) (22) "Peace officer." Any officer authorized by law to
execute criminal process or to make arrests for the violation of the
statutes generally or of any particular statute or statutes relative to
the highways of this state;
(((22))) (23) "Pedestrian." Any person afoot;
(((23))) (24) "Person." Every natural person, firm, copartnership,
corporation, association, or organization;
(((24))) (25) "Personal wireless service." Any federally licensed
personal wireless service;
(26) "Personal wireless service facilities." Unstaffed facilities
that are used for the transmission or reception, or both, of personal
wireless services including, but not necessarily limited to, antenna
arrays, transmission cables, equipment shelters, and support
structures;
(27) "Pneumatic tires." Every tire of rubber or other resilient
material designed to be inflated with compressed air to support the
load thereon;
(((25))) (28) "Private road or driveway." Every way or place in
private ownership and used for travel of vehicles by the owner or those
having express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other
persons;
(((26) "Highway." Every way, lane, road, street, boulevard, and
every way or place in the state of Washington open as a matter of right
to public vehicular travel both inside and outside the limits of
incorporated cities and towns;
(27))) (29) "Railroad." A carrier of persons or property upon
vehicles, other than street cars, operated upon stationary rails, the
route of which is principally outside incorporated cities and towns;
(((28))) (30) "Railroad sign or signal." Any sign, signal, or
device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a
railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks
or the approach of a railroad train;
(((29))) (31) "Residence district." The territory contiguous to
and including the highway, as herein defined, not comprising a business
district, as herein defined, when the property on such highway for a
continuous distance of three hundred feet or more on either side
thereof is in the main improved with residences or residences and
buildings in use for business;
(((30))) (32) "Roadway." The paved, improved, or proper driving
portion of a highway designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel;
(((31))) (33) "Safety zone." The area or space officially set
apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which
is protected or is marked or indicated by painted marks, signs,
buttons, standards, or otherwise so as to be plainly discernible;
(((32))) (34) "Sidewalk." That property between the curb lines or
the lateral lines of a roadway, as herein defined, and the adjacent
property, set aside and intended for the use of pedestrians or such
portion of private property parallel and in proximity to a highway and
dedicated to use by pedestrians;
(((33))) (35) "Solid tire." Every tire of rubber or other
resilient material which does not depend upon inflation with compressed
air for the support of the load thereon;
(((34))) (36) "State highway." Every highway as herein defined, or
part thereof, which has been designated as a state highway, or branch
thereof, by legislative enactment;
(((35))) (37) "Street car." A vehicle other than a train, as
herein defined, for the transporting of persons or property and
operated upon stationary rails principally within incorporated cities
and towns;
(((36))) (38) "Traffic." Pedestrians, ridden or herded animals,
vehicles, street cars, and other conveyances either singly or together
while using any highways for purposes of travel;
(((37))) (39) "Traffic control signal." Any traffic device, as
herein defined, whether manually, electrically, or mechanically
operated, by which traffic alternately is directed to stop or proceed
or otherwise controlled;
(((38))) (40) "Traffic devices." All signs, signals, markings, and
devices not inconsistent with this title placed or erected by authority
of a public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of
regulating, warning, or guiding traffic;
(((39))) (41) "Train." A vehicle propelled by steam, electricity,
or other motive power with or without cars coupled thereto, operated
upon stationary rails, except street cars;
(((40))) (42) "Vehicle." Every device capable of being moved upon
a highway and in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be
transported or drawn upon a highway, excepting devices moved by human
or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.
Words and phrases used herein in the past, present, or future tense
shall include the past, present, and future tenses; words and phrases
used herein in the masculine, feminine, or neuter gender shall include
the masculine, feminine, and neuter genders; and words and phrases used
herein in the singular or plural shall include the singular and plural;
unless the context thereof shall indicate to the contrary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.44 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to leases issued for the deployment of
personal wireless service facilities as provided in section 5 of this
act.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.52.001 and 1961 c 13 s 47.52.001 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Unrestricted access to and from public highways has resulted in
congestion and peril for the traveler. It has caused undue slowing of
all traffic in many areas. The investment of the public in highway
facilities has been impaired and highway facilities costing vast sums
of money will have to be relocated and reconstructed.
(2) Personal wireless service is a critical part of the state's
infrastructure. The rapid deployment of personal wireless service
facilities is critical to ensure public safety, network access, quality
of service, and rural economic development.
(3) It is, therefore, the declared policy of this state to limit
access to the highway facilities of this state in the interest of
highway safety and for the preservation of the investment of the public
in such facilities; except that the use of the rights of way of limited
access facilities must be permitted for the deployment of personal
wireless service facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section
is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Right of way" means all state-owned land within a state
highway corridor.
(b) "Service provider" means every corporation, company,
association, joint stock association, firm, partnership, or person
that owns, operates, or manages any personal wireless service facility.
"Service provider" includes a service provider's contractors,
subcontractors, and legal successors.
(2) The department shall establish a process for issuing a lease
for the use of the right of way by a service provider.
(a) The lease must include the right of direct ingress and egress
from the highway to the personal wireless service facility during
nonpeak hours if public safety is not adversely affected. However,
direct ingress and egress shall be allowed at any time for the
construction of the facility if public safety is not adversely
affected. The lease may specify an indirect ingress and egress to the
facility if it is reasonable and available for the particular location.
(b) The lease must require that personal wireless service
facilities are installed and maintained within the right of way so as
not to adversely affect public safety.
(3) The cost of the lease must be limited to the fair market value
of the portion of the right of way being used by the service provider
and the direct administrative expenses incurred by the department in
processing the lease application.
If the department and the service provider are unable to agree on
the cost of the lease, the service provider may submit the cost of the
lease to binding arbitration by serving written notice on the
department. Within thirty days of receiving the notice, each party
shall furnish a list of acceptable arbitrators. The parties shall
select an arbitrator; failing to agree on an arbitrator, each party
shall select one arbitrator and the two arbitrators shall select a
third arbitrator for an arbitration panel. The arbitrator or panel
shall determine the cost of the lease based on comparable siting
agreements. Costs of the arbitration, including compensation for the
arbitrator's services, must be borne equally by the parties
participating in the arbitration and each party shall bear its own
costs and expenses, including legal fees and witness expenses, in
connection with the arbitration proceeding.
(4) The department shall act on an application for a lease within
sixty days of receiving a completed application, unless a service
provider consents to a different time period.
(5) The reasons for a denial of a lease application must be
supported by substantial evidence contained in a written record.
(6) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.
(7) All lease money paid to the department under this section shall
be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The process for issuing leases required in
section 5(2) of this act must be established by the effective date of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department shall prepare a report on the
implementation of the lease process. The report must be submitted to
the house of representatives technology, telecommunications, and energy
committee and the senate technology and communications committee by
January 15, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Applications for wireless site leases
pending on the effective date of this act must be treated as
applications under section 5 of this act with the consent of the
applicant.

--- END ---