BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 2.48 RCW
to read as follows:
An active or inactive member of the bar is not required to pay the
annual membership fee for active or inactive members during any period
of time that the member is employed as a full-time employee by the
Washington state senate, the Washington state house of representatives,
or the statute law committee.
The board of governors may not provide for any additional
qualifications, requirements, or procedures for legislative attorneys
who are covered by this section beyond those imposed on other active or
inactive members, except that the board may provide by rule for
prorating the annual membership fees for partial years of employment
with the legislative agencies named in this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.48.130 and 1957 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The annual membership fees for active members shall be payable on
or before February 1st of each year. Subject to section 1 of this act,
the board of governors may establish the amount of such annual
membership fee to be effective each year: PROVIDED, That written
notice of any proposed increase in membership fee shall be sent to
active members not less than sixty days prior to the effective date of
such increase: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the board of governors may
establish the fee at a reduced rate for those who have been active
members for less than five years in this state or elsewhere.

Sec. 3 RCW 2.48.140 and 1955 c 34 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
Subject to section 1 of this act, the annual membership fee for
inactive members shall be the sum of two dollars, payable on or before
the first day of February of each year.

--- END ---