BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the liquor control board has developed
a retail services business plan to provide greater efficiency of
operations and to maximize revenues to the state. The legislature
intends to examine whether expanding liquor store operations to include
Sundays would provide additional revenue and provide increased customer
convenience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall devise a retail business plan, or amend an existing
retail business plan, to implement strategies to improve the efficiency
of retail sales operations and maximize revenue-generating
opportunities. Strategies to be implemented shall include, but are not
limited to:
(1) Expanding store operations to include Sunday sales in selected
liquor stores. Sunday sales are optional for liquor vendors operating
agency stores;
(2) Implementing a plan of in-store liquor merchandising, including
point-of-sale advertising, and product specific point-of-sale
promotional displays and carousels, including displays designed and
provided by vendors; and
(3) Implementing a plan for in-store liquor merchandising of
brands. The plan may not include provisions for selling liquor-related
items other than those items previously authorized.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
By September 1, 2003, the board shall expand operations in at least
twenty state-operated retail stores to include Sundays. The board
shall select the stores that are expected to gross the most revenues on
Sunday by considering factors including, but not limited to, population
density, proximity to shopping centers, and proximity to other
businesses that are open on Sunday. The selected stores shall be open
for retail business a minimum of five hours on Sunday. The board shall
track gross sales and expenses of the selected stores and compare them
to previous years' sales and projected sales and expenses before
opening on Sunday. The board shall also examine the sales of state and
contract liquor stores in proximity to those stores opened on Sundays
to determine whether Sunday openings has reduced the sales of other
state and contract liquor stores that are not open on Sundays. The
board shall present this information to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by January 31, 2004.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.08.026 and 2001 c 313 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All administrative expenses of the board incurred on and after
April 1, 1963, shall be appropriated and paid from the liquor revolving
fund. These administrative expenses shall include, but not be limited
to: The salaries and expenses of the board and its employees, the cost
of establishing, leasing, maintaining, and operating state liquor
stores and warehouses, legal services, pilot projects, annual or other
audits, and other general costs of conducting the business of the
board, and the costs of supplying, installing, and maintaining
equipment used in state liquor stores and agency liquor vendor stores
for the purchase of liquor ((by nonlicensees)) using debit or credit
cards. The administrative expenses shall not, however, be deemed to
include costs of liquor and lottery tickets purchased, the cost of
transportation and delivery to the point of distribution, other costs
pertaining to the acquisition and receipt of liquor and lottery
tickets, packaging and repackaging of liquor, agency commissions for
agency liquor vendor stores, transaction fees associated with credit or
debit card purchases for liquor in state liquor stores and in the
stores of agency liquor vendors pursuant to RCW 66.16.040 and
66.16.041, sales tax, and those amounts distributed pursuant to RCW
66.08.180, 66.08.190, 66.08.200, 66.08.210 and 66.08.220. Agency
commissions for agency liquor vendor stores shall be established by the
liquor control board after consultation with and approval by the
director of the office of financial management. All expenditures and
payment of obligations authorized by this section are subject to the
allotment requirements of chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.08.060 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall not advertise liquor in any form or through any
medium whatsoever.
(2) In-store liquor merchandising is not advertising for the
purposes of this section.
(3) The board shall have power to adopt any and all reasonable
((regulations)) rules as to the kind, character, and location of
advertising of liquor.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.16.041 and 1998 c 265 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state liquor control board shall accept bank credit card
and debit cards ((from nonlicensees)) for purchases in state liquor
stores, under such rules as the board may adopt. The board shall
authorize liquor vendors appointed under RCW 66.08.050 to accept bank
credit cards and debit cards for liquor purchases under this title,
under such rules as the board may adopt.
(2) If a liquor vendor operating an agency store chooses to use
credit or debit cards for liquor purchases ((by nonlicensees)), the
board shall provide equipment and installation and maintenance of the
equipment necessary to implement the use of credit and debit cards.
Any equipment provided by the board to an agency liquor vendor store
for this purpose may be used only for the purchase of liquor.
(3) If the revenues and expenditures associated with implementing
the use of credit and debit cards for the purchase of alcohol ((by
nonlicensees)) from state liquor stores and agency stores operated by
liquor vendors results in a reduction of the liquor revolving fund
balance for fiscal year 1999 and the 1999-01 biennium, the board shall
consider increasing the price of alcohol products to offset the
reduction.
(((4) The board shall provide a report evaluating the
implementation of this section, including revenue and expenditures, to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 1998.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the criteria stated in section 3 of this act, when
choosing which stores to open on Sundays, the board shall follow the
same criteria and procedures with respect to places of worship as
established in RCW 66.24.010(9) for retail licensees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The sum of nine hundred sixty-one thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the liquor revolving account to
the liquor control board for the purposes of implementing this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 66.16.080 (Sunday closing) and 1988 c
101 s 1 & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 11 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---