BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many
international companies with an interest in operating in Washington are
not aware of the various tax incentives that are available. It is the
intent of the legislature to ensure that these international companies
understand that they are eligible for these business and occupation tax
and sales and use tax deferrals when investing in Washington. It is
the further intent of the legislature that the department of community,
trade, and economic development and associate development organizations
make clear to international companies that they are eligible for the
state's various tax incentives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
An international company investing in Washington is included within
the definition of person in RCW 82.04.030 and is eligible for excise
tax incentives provided in Title 82 RCW in the same manner as any
domestic company.

--- END ---