BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "ultranarrow vehicle" refers to
any vehicle having a maximum width of forty-two inches from mirror to
mirror.
(2) Notwithstanding RCW 46.61.140, ultranarrow vehicles may operate
up to two abreast in a single lane.

--- END ---