BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Ultranarrow vehicle" means a vehicle having a maximum width of
forty-two inches from mirror to mirror.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.608 and 1975 c 62 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All motorcycles and ultranarrow vehicles are entitled to full
use of a lane and no motor vehicle shall be driven in such a manner as
to deprive any motorcycle or ultranarrow vehicle of the full use of a
lane. This subsection shall not apply to motorcycles or ultranarrow
vehicles operated two abreast in a single lane, under subsection (4) of
this section.
(2) The operator of a motorcycle or ultranarrow vehicle shall not
overtake and pass in the same lane occupied by the vehicle being
overtaken.
(3) No person shall operate a motorcycle or ultranarrow vehicle
between lanes of traffic or between adjacent lines or rows of vehicles.
(4) Motorcycles ((shall not)) and ultranarrow vehicles may be
operated ((more than)) up to two abreast in a single lane.
(5) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to
police officers in the performance of their official duties.

--- END ---