BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Spinal cord stimulators and drug infusion pumps are effective
sources of pain relief for patients with chronic pain conditions and
are covered by forty-nine of fifty state industrial insurance programs
as well as medicare, medicaid, and all major private insurers in the
state of Washington. Many Washington self-insurers cover the machines
under their industrial insurance as well.
(2) Patients cannot be expected to return to a productive life or
carry out the activities of daily living if they are in severe chronic
pain. Pain control is an essential feature of any muscular-skeletal
rehabilitation regimen. Spinal cord stimulators and drug infusion
pumps are often preferable to the administration of oral narcotics
because they dramatically reduce the adverse side effects of narcotics.
(3) Recent advances in medical technology have substantially
improved the life and performance of the implanted devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Spinal cord stimulator" means a device that delivers low
voltage electrical stimulation to the spinal cord to block the
sensation of pain. The device is implantable and consists of a lead
that delivers the stimulation to the spinal cord and an extension wire
that conducts electrical pulses from the battery power source to the
lead. The device covers or masks the sensation of pain with a tingling
sensation.
(2) "Drug infusion pump" means a drug delivery device designed to
deliver morphine and other medications to the intrathecal space of the
spinal cord in order to reduce pain. The system consists of an
implantable, programmable pump and intraspinal catheter. The catheter
is placed in the spinal cord's intrathecal space, allowing the delivery
of small amounts of pain reduction medication directly to the
cerebrospinal fluid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The health services available to an injured worker under this
chapter include the use of spinal cord stimulators and drug infusion
pumps at least in accordance with relevant standards adopted by
national payors and most state industrial insurance programs. The
devices shall be deemed corrective and rehabilitative as well as
necessary and proper. Nothing in this section prevents the department
from making informed decisions about the appropriateness of the device
in a specific case in accordance with the standards referred to in this
section or more permissive guidelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act shall be liberally construed in
order to provide coverage by the department of labor and industries
except in inappropriate individual cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---