BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.16.010 and 2001 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of pilotage commissioners of the state of Washington
is hereby created and shall consist of the assistant secretary of
marine transportation of the department of transportation of the state
of Washington, or the assistant secretary's designee who shall be an
employee of the marine division, who shall be chairperson, the director
of the department of ecology, or the director's designee, and seven
members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate. Each of
the appointed commissioners shall be appointed for a term of four years
from the date of the member's commission. No person shall be eligible
for appointment to the board unless that person is at the time of
appointment eighteen years of age or over and a citizen of the United
States and of the state of Washington. Two of the appointed
commissioners shall be pilots licensed under this chapter and actively
engaged in piloting upon the waters covered by this chapter for at
least three years immediately preceding the time of appointment and
while serving on the board. One pilot shall be from the Puget Sound
pilotage district and ((one)) the other pilot shall be from either the
Grays Harbor pilotage district or the Puget Sound pilotage district.
Two of the appointed commissioners shall be actively engaged in the
ownership, operation, or management of deep sea cargo and/or passenger
carrying vessels for at least three years immediately preceding the
time of appointment and while serving on the board. One of ((said))
the shipping commissioners shall be a representative of American and
one of foreign shipping. One of the commissioners shall be a
representative from a recognized environmental organization concerned
with marine waters. The remaining commissioners shall be persons
interested in and concerned with pilotage, maritime safety, and marine
affairs, with broad experience related to the maritime industry
exclusive of experience as either a state licensed pilot or as a
shipping representative.
(2) Any vacancy in an appointed position on the board shall be
filled by the governor for the remainder of the unfilled term, subject
to confirmation by the senate.
(3) Five members of the board shall constitute a quorum. At least
one pilot, one shipping representative, and one public member must be
present at every meeting. All commissioners and the chairperson shall
have a vote.

--- END ---