BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2002 c 290 s 21 and 2002 c 50 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (((2))) (4)
of this section, the term of the sentence of an offender committed to
a correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency
shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of
the offender actually earning the credits. Any program established
pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release
credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred
from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county
jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent
in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23,
1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits
or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that
results from any deadly weapon enhancements. In the case of an
offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex offense that
is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 1990, and before
July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifteen
percent of the sentence. In the case of an offender convicted of a
serious violent offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony,
committed on or after July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned release time
may not exceed ten percent of the sentence.
(b) In the case of an offender who qualifies under subsection (2)
of this section, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifty
percent of the sentence.
(c) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;
(2) An offender may earn up to fifty percent earned release time if
he or she is not confined pursuant to a sentence for an offense that is
a violent offense; a sex offense; a violation or attempt, solicitation,
or conspiracy to violate RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or
possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine; a violation or
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate RCW 69.50.406 (delivery
of a controlled substance to a minor); or a crime against a person as
defined in RCW 9.94A.411 and he or she:
(a) Has no prior conviction for a sex offense; a serious violent
offense; a violation or attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate
RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to
deliver methamphetamine; or a violation or attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to violate RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance
to a minor);
(b) Is not subject to court-ordered chemical dependency treatment
under RCW 9.94A.660 or the provisions of chapter 290, Laws of 2002; and
(c) Has an offender score of less than seven.
(3)(a) The department shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each eligible offender under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(b) Subsection (2) of this section applies retroactively to
eligible offenders serving terms of total confinement in a state
correctional facility as of the effective date of this section.
(c) Subsections (1)(b) and (2) of this section do not apply to
offenders convicted after July 1, 2010.
(4)(a) A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense
categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second degree,
vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in the second
degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A person convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, any
crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000, may
become eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the
department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned
release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community placement or community
custody terms eligible for release to community custody status in lieu
of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living
arrangement prior to release to the community;
(d) The department may deny transfer to community custody status in
lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if the department determines an offender's release plan, including
proposed residence location and living arrangements, may violate the
conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision, place the
offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence, place the
offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim safety or
community safety. The department's authority under this section is
independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory
provision regarding conditions for community custody or community
placement;
(((3))) (5) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant
to an authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders
may leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(((4))) (6)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to
require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition;
and
(iii) Granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in
a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time.
(((5))) (7) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and
pardons board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of
serious health problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary
meritorious acts, or other extraordinary circumstances;
(((6))) (8) No more than the final six months of the sentence may
be served in partial confinement designed to aid the offender in
finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in the community;
(((7))) (9) The governor may pardon any offender;
(((8))) (10) The department may release an offender from
confinement any time within ten days before a release date calculated
under this section; and
(((9))) (11) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender
sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a
mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released
from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory
minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed
under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not eligible for
extraordinary medical placement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature declares that the changes to the maximum
percentages of earned release time in this act do not create any
expectation that the percentage of earned release time cannot be
revised and offenders have no reason to conclude that the maximum
percentage of earned release time is an entitlement or creates any
liberty interest. The legislature retains full control over the right
to revise the percentages of earned release time available to offenders
at any time. This section applies to persons convicted on or after the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the department performs a risk assessment pursuant to RCW
9.94A.500, or to determine a person's conditions of supervision, the
risk assessment shall classify the offender into one of at least four
risk categories. The department shall supervise every offender
sentenced to a term of community custody, community placement, or
community supervision whose risk assessment places that offender in one
of the two highest risk categories. The department is not authorized
to, and may not, supervise any offender sentenced to a term of
community custody, community placement, or community supervision whose
risk assessment places that offender in any risk category other than
the two highest unless the offender is one for whom supervision is
required under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding an offender's classification in a risk category
other than the two highest risk categories, the department shall
supervise the offender if:
(a) He or she has a prior conviction for an offense that is a
serious violent offense, sex offense, manufacture or delivery or
possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine, or delivery of a
controlled substance to a minor;
(b) He or she is subject to court-ordered chemical dependency
treatment under RCW 9.94A.660 or the provisions of chapter 290, Laws of
2002, or he or she was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.670; or
(c) He or she is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2010.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.700 and 2002 c 175 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a court sentences an offender to a term of total confinement
in the custody of the department for any of the offenses specified in
this section, the court shall also sentence the offender to a term of
community placement as provided in this section. Except as provided in
section 3 of this act, the department shall supervise any sentence of
community placement imposed under this section.
(1) The court shall order a one-year term of community placement
for the following:
(a) A sex offense or a serious violent offense committed after July
1, 1988, but before July 1, 1990; or
(b) An offense committed on or after July 1, 1988, but before July
25, 1999, that is:
(i) Assault in the second degree;
(ii) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(iii) A crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission; or
(iv) A felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not
sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660.
(2) The court shall sentence the offender to a term of community
placement of two years or up to the period of earned release awarded
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728, whichever is longer, for:
(a) An offense categorized as a sex offense committed on or after
July 1, 1990, but before June 6, 1996, including those sex offenses
also included in other offense categories;
(b) A serious violent offense other than a sex offense committed on
or after July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 2000; or
(c) A vehicular homicide or vehicular assault committed on or after
July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 2000.
(3) The community placement ordered under this section shall begin
either upon completion of the term of confinement or at such time as
the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned
release. When the court sentences an offender to the statutory maximum
sentence then the community placement portion of the sentence shall
consist entirely of the community custody to which the offender may
become eligible. Any period of community custody actually served shall
be credited against the community placement portion of the sentence.
(4) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of any
community placement imposed under this section shall include the
following conditions:
(a) The offender shall report to and be available for contact with
the assigned community corrections officer as directed;
(b) The offender shall work at department-approved education,
employment, or community restitution, or any combination thereof;
(c) The offender shall not possess or consume controlled substances
except pursuant to lawfully issued prescriptions;
(d) The offender shall pay supervision fees as determined by the
department; and
(e) The residence location and living arrangements shall be subject
to the prior approval of the department during the period of community
placement.
(5) As a part of any terms of community placement imposed under
this section, the court may also order one or more of the following
special conditions:
(a) The offender shall remain within, or outside of, a specified
geographical boundary;
(b) The offender shall not have direct or indirect contact with the
victim of the crime or a specified class of individuals;
(c) The offender shall participate in crime-related treatment or
counseling services;
(d) The offender shall not consume alcohol; or
(e) The offender shall comply with any crime-related prohibitions.
(6) An offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor
victim after June 6, 1996, shall comply with any terms and conditions
of community placement imposed by the department relating to contact
between the sex offender and a minor victim or a child of similar age
or circumstance as a previous victim.
(7) Prior to or during community placement, upon recommendation of
the department, the sentencing court may remove or modify any
conditions of community placement so as not to be more restrictive.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.705 and 2000 c 28 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for persons sentenced under RCW 9.94A.700(2) or 9.94A.710,
when a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the
custody of the department for a violent offense, any crime against
persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or any felony offense under chapter
69.50 or 69.52 RCW not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, committed on or
after July 25, 1999, but before July 1, 2000, the court shall in
addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to
a one-year term of community placement beginning either upon completion
of the term of confinement or at such time as the offender is
transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (((2))) (4). When the court
sentences the offender under this section to the statutory maximum
period of confinement, then the community placement portion of the
sentence shall consist entirely of such community custody to which the
offender may become eligible, in accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and
(((2))) (4). Any period of community custody actually served shall be
credited against the community placement portion of the sentence.
Except as provided in section 3 of this act, the department shall
supervise any sentence of community placement or community custody
imposed under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.715 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 302 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department for a sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, a
violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or
a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or
after July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to the other terms of
the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for the
community custody range established under RCW 9.94A.850 or up to the
period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and
(((2))) (4), whichever is longer. The community custody shall begin:
(a) Upon completion of the term of confinement; (b) at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release
in accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (((2))) (4); or (c) with
regard to offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, upon failure to
complete or administrative termination from the special drug offender
sentencing alternative program. Except as provided in section 3 of
this act, the department shall supervise any sentence of community
custody imposed under this section.
(2)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5).
The court may also order the offender to participate in rehabilitative
programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to
the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending,
or the safety of the community, and the department shall enforce such
conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(b) As part of any sentence that includes a term of community
custody imposed under this subsection, the court shall also require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department under
RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall assess the offender's risk of
reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of the
offender's community custody based upon the risk to community safety.
In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and
to obey all laws.
(c) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court
imposed conditions. The department shall notify the offender in
writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the
department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.
(3) If an offender violates conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to this section during community custody, the
department may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement
status and impose other available sanctions as provided in RCW
9.94A.737 and 9.94A.740.
(4) Except for terms of community custody under RCW 9.94A.670, the
department shall discharge the offender from community custody on a
date determined by the department, which the department may modify,
based on risk and performance of the offender, within the range or at
the end of the period of earned release, whichever is later.
(5) At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex
offender's term of community custody, if the court finds that public
safety would be enhanced, the court may impose and enforce an order
extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to this section
for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as it
is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition
extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of
the sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as
contempt of court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court
extends a condition beyond the expiration of the term of community
custody, the department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender's compliance with the condition.
(6) Within the funds available for community custody, the
department shall determine conditions and duration of community custody
on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders
during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and
conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subsection.
(7) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of
a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may
request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds
that it is not reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The
crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (c) the
safety of the community.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.720 and 2002 c 175 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in section 3 of this act, all offenders
sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community
restitution, community placement, or community custody((, or legal
financial obligation)) shall be under the supervision of the department
and shall follow explicitly the instructions and conditions of the
department. The department may require an offender to perform
affirmative acts it deems appropriate to monitor compliance with the
conditions of the sentence imposed. The department may only supervise
the offender's compliance with payment of the legal financial
obligations during any period in which the department is authorized to
supervise the offender in the community under section 3 of this act.
(b) The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as
directed to a community corrections officer, remaining within
prescribed geographical boundaries, notifying the community corrections
officer of any change in the offender's address or employment, and
paying the supervision fee assessment.
(c) For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody
for crimes committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may
include, in addition to the instructions in (b) of this subsection, any
appropriate conditions of supervision, including but not limited to,
prohibiting the offender from having contact with any other specified
individuals or specific class of individuals.
(d) For offenders sentenced to terms of community custody for
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department may impose
conditions as specified in RCW 9.94A.715.
The conditions authorized under (c) of this subsection may be
imposed by the department prior to or during an offender's community
custody term. If a violation of conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710 occurs during community custody,
it shall be deemed a violation of community placement for the purposes
of RCW 9.94A.740 and shall authorize the department to transfer an
offender to a more restrictive confinement status as provided in RCW
9.94A.737. At any time prior to the completion of an offender's term
of community custody, the department may recommend to the court that
any or all of the conditions imposed by the court or the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710 or 9.94A.715 be continued beyond the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody as authorized in
RCW 9.94A.715 (3) or (5).
The department may require offenders to pay for special services
rendered on or after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring,
day reporting, and telephone reporting, dependent upon the offender's
ability to pay. The department may pay for these services for
offenders who are not able to pay.
(2) No offender sentenced to terms involving community supervision,
community restitution, community custody, or community placement under
the supervision of the department may own, use, or possess firearms or
ammunition. Offenders who own, use, or are found to be in actual or
constructive possession of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to
the violation process and sanctions under RCW 9.94A.634, 9.94A.737, and
9.94A.740. "Constructive possession" as used in this subsection means
the power and intent to control the firearm or ammunition. "Firearm"
as used in this subsection has the same definition as in RCW 9.41.010.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.94A.545 and 2000 c 28 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
On all sentences of confinement for one year or less, in which the
offender is convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, a crime
against a person under RCW 9.94A.411, or felony violation of chapter
69.50 or 69.52 RCW or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit
such a crime, the court may impose up to one year of community custody,
subject to conditions and sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 and
9.94A.720. An offender shall be on community custody as of the date of
sentencing. However, during the time for which the offender is in
total or partial confinement pursuant to the sentence or a violation of
the sentence, the period of community custody shall toll.

Sec. 9 2002 c 290 s 30 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Section 2 of this act expires ((July 1, 2004)) on the effective
date of section 9, chapter . . ., Laws of 2003 (section 9 of this act).

Sec. 10 2002 c 290 s 31 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Sections 7 through 11 and 14 through 23 of this act take effect
((July 1, 2004, and apply to crimes committed on or after July 1,
2004)) on the effective date of section 9, chapter . . ., Laws of 2003
(section 9 of this act).

Sec. 11 RCW 70.96A.350 and 2002 c 290 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a)
Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders
with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated,
would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a
prosecuting attorney in Washington state; and (b) the provision of drug
and alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for
nonviolent offenders within a drug court program. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's
successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program,
but does not include the following services: Housing other than that
provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program,
vocational training, and mental health counseling; and
(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient
or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and
child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's
ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.
(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of:
(a) ((Savings to the state general fund resulting from implementation
of chapter 290, Laws of 2002, as calculated)) Funds transferred to the
account pursuant to this section; and (b) any other revenues
appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(4)(a) ((The department of corrections, the sentencing guidelines
commission, the office of financial management, and the caseload
forecast council shall develop a methodology for calculating the
projected biennial savings under this section. Savings shall be
projected for the fiscal biennium beginning on July 1, 2003, and for
each biennium thereafter. By September 1, 2002, the proposed
methodology shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The methodology is deemed approved
unless the legislature enacts legislation to modify or reject the
methodology.
(b) When the department of corrections submits its biennial budget
request to the governor in 2002 and in each even-numbered year
thereafter, the department of corrections shall use the methodology
approved in (a) of this subsection to calculate savings to the state
general fund for the ensuing fiscal biennium resulting from reductions
in drug offender sentencing as a result of sections 2 and 3, chapter
290, Laws of 2002 and sections 7, 8, and 9, chapter 290, Laws of 2002.
The department shall report the dollar amount of the savings to the
state treasurer, the office of financial management, and the fiscal
committees of the legislature.
(c))) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, ((and each
fiscal biennium thereafter,)) the state treasurer shall transfer
((seventy-five percent of the amount reported in (b) of this
subsection)) eight million nine hundred fifty thousand dollars from the
general fund into the criminal justice treatment account, divided into
eight equal quarterly payments. ((However, the amount transferred to
the criminal justice treatment account shall not exceed the limit of
eight million two hundred fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year.
After the first fiscal year in which the amount to be transferred
equals or exceeds eight million two hundred fifty thousand dollars,
this limit)) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, and each
subsequent fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer eight
million two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the general fund to the
criminal justice treatment account, divided into four equal quarterly
payments. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and each
subsequent fiscal year, the amount transferred shall be increased on an
annual basis by the implicit price deflator as published by the federal
bureau of labor statistics.
(((d))) (b) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, and
each biennium thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer ((twenty-five percent of the amount reported in (b) of this subsection)) two
million nine hundred eighty-four thousand dollars from the general fund
into the violence reduction and drug enforcement account, divided into
eight quarterly payments. The amounts transferred pursuant to this
subsection (4)(((d))) (b) shall be used solely for providing drug and
alcohol treatment services to offenders confined in a state
correctional facility ((receiving a reduced sentence as a result of
implementation of chapter 290, Laws of 2002 and)) who are assessed with
an addiction or a substance abuse problem that if not treated would
result in addiction. ((Any excess funds remaining after providing drug
and alcohol treatment services to offenders receiving a reduced
sentence as a result of implementation of chapter 290, Laws of 2002 may
be expended to provide treatment for offenders confined in a state
correctional facility and who are assessed with an addiction or a
substance abuse problem that contributed to the crime.
(e))) (c) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall
appropriate the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment
account in (((c))) (a) of this subsection to the division of alcohol
and substance abuse for the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance
abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed
as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the
fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the
department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice
treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all
amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(((e))) (c) of this section in
accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the
department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated
under subsection (4)(((e))) (c) of this section for its administrative
costs.
(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the
distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of
alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, the sentencing guidelines commission, the Washington state
association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court
professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal
defense bar, representatives of substance abuse treatment providers,
and any other person deemed by the division to be necessary, shall
establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to
counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County
or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must
be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating
offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting
attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges'
association, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington defender's association or the Washington association of
criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington
state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse
treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county
or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants
approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that
treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.
(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor,
county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment
provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the
criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority,
and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court
shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative
authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b)
of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the
criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall
be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse
treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090 and treatment support services.
No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections
(4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties
participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment
support services.
(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and
submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under
this section.
(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used
for substance abuse treatment.
(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW
2.28.170(3)(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall study the results of the changes in earned release under
section 1 of this act. The study shall determine whether the changes
in earned release affect the rate of recidivism or the type of offenses
committed by persons whose release dates were affected by the changes
in this act. The Washington state institute for public policy shall
report its findings to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature no later than December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The sum of three million five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004, from the general
fund to the department of corrections for enhanced supervision by
community corrections officers of offenders classified in risk
classifications RM-A and RM-B.
(2) The sum of three million five hundred thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2005, from the general fund to the department of
corrections for enhanced supervision by community corrections officers
of offenders classified in risk classifications RM-A and RM-B.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---