BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.300 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 216 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1))) Secure community transition facilities shall meet the
following minimum staffing requirements:
(1)(a) At any time the census of a facility that accepts its first
resident before July 1, 2003, is six or fewer residents, the facility
shall maintain a minimum staffing ratio of one staff per three
residents during normal waking hours and one awake staff per four
residents during normal sleeping hours. In no case shall the staffing
ratio permit less than two staff per housing unit.
(b) At any time the census of a facility that accepts its first
resident on or after July 1, 2003, is six or fewer residents, the
facility shall maintain a minimum staffing ratio of one staff per
resident during normal waking hours and two awake staff per three
residents during normal sleeping hours. In no case shall the staffing
ratio permit less than two staff per housing unit.
(((b))) (2) At any time the census of a facility is six or fewer
residents, all staff shall be classified as residential rehabilitation
counselor II or have a classification that indicates ((a)) an
equivalent or higher level of skill, experience, and training.
(((c))) (3) Before being assigned to a facility, all staff shall
have training in sex offender issues, self-defense, and crisis de-escalation skills in addition to departmental orientation and, as
appropriate, management training. All staff with resident treatment or
care duties must participate in ongoing in-service training.
(((d))) (4) All staff must pass a departmental background check and
the check is not subject to the limitations in chapter 9.96A RCW. A
person who has been convicted of a felony, or any sex offense, may not
be employed at the secure community transition facility or be approved
as an escort for a resident of the facility.
(((2) With respect to the facility established pursuant to RCW
71.09.250(1), the department shall, no later than December 1, 2001,
provide a staffing plan to the appropriate committees of the
legislature that will cover the growth of that facility to its full
capacity.))

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.020 and 2002 c 68 s 4 and 2002 c 58 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Health care facility" means any hospital, hospice care center,
licensed or certified health care facility, health maintenance
organization regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW, federally qualified
health maintenance organization, federally approved renal dialysis
center or facility, or federally approved blood bank.
(3) "Health care practitioner" means an individual or firm licensed
or certified to engage actively in a regulated health profession.
(4) "Health care services" means those services provided by health
professionals licensed pursuant to RCW 18.120.020(4).
(5) "Health profession" means those licensed or regulated
professions set forth in RCW 18.120.020(4).
(6) "Less restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in
a setting less restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the
conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092.
(7) "Likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not
confined in a secure facility" means that the person more probably than
not will engage in such acts if released unconditionally from detention
on the sexually violent predator petition. Such likelihood must be
evidenced by a recent overt act if the person is not totally confined
at the time the petition is filed under RCW 71.09.030.
(8) "Mental abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition
affecting the emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the
person to the commission of criminal sexual acts in a degree
constituting such person a menace to the health and safety of others.
(9) "Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers; (b)
individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted
for the primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual
acquaintance with whom no substantial personal relationship exists.
(10) "Recent overt act" means any act or threat that has either
caused harm of a sexually violent nature or creates a reasonable
apprehension of such harm in the mind of an objective person who knows
of the history and mental condition of the person engaging in the act.
(11) "Risk potential activity" or "risk potential facility" means
an activity or facility that provides a higher incidence of risk to the
public from persons conditionally released from the special commitment
center. Risk potential activities and facilities include: Public and
private schools, school bus stops, licensed day care and licensed
preschool facilities, public parks, publicly dedicated trails, sports
fields, playgrounds, recreational and community centers, churches,
synagogues, temples, mosques, public libraries, and others identified
by the department following the hearings on a potential site required
in RCW 71.09.315. For purposes of this chapter, "school bus stops"
does not include bus stops established primarily for public transit.
(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services
or the secretary's designee.
(13) "Secure facility" means a residential facility for persons
civilly confined under the provisions of this chapter that includes
security measures sufficient to protect the community. Such facilities
include total confinement facilities, secure community transition
facilities, and any residence used as a court-ordered placement under
RCW 71.09.096.
(14) "Secure community transition facility" means a residential
facility for persons civilly committed and conditionally released to a
less restrictive alternative under this chapter. A secure community
transition facility has supervision and security, and either provides
or ensures the provision of sex offender treatment services. Secure
community transition facilities include but are not limited to the
((facilities)) facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i)
and any community-based facilities established under this chapter and
operated by the secretary or under contract with the secretary.
(15) "Sexually violent offense" means an act committed on, before,
or after July 1, 1990, that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A RCW as
rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree by forcible
compulsion, rape of a child in the first or second degree, statutory
rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen,
incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the
first or second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time
prior to July 1, 1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense
as defined in (a) of this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for a felony offense that under the laws of this state would
be a sexually violent offense as defined in this subsection; (c) an act
of murder in the first or second degree, assault in the first or second
degree, assault of a child in the first or second degree, kidnapping in
the first or second degree, burglary in the first degree, residential
burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at the time of
sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment
proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been determined beyond a
reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is
defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28
RCW, that is an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy
to commit one of the felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this
subsection.
(16) "Sexually violent predator" means any person who has been
convicted of or charged with a crime of sexual violence and who suffers
from a mental abnormality or personality disorder which makes the
person likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not
confined in a secure facility.
(17) "Total confinement facility" means a secure facility that
provides supervision and sex offender treatment services in a total
confinement setting. Total confinement facilities include the special
commitment center and any similar facility designated as a ((secure))
total confinement facility by the secretary.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.09.250 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 201 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary is authorized to site, construct, occupy, and
operate (i) a secure community transition facility on McNeil Island for
persons authorized to petition for a less restrictive alternative under
RCW 71.09.090(1) and who are conditionally released; and (ii) a special
commitment center on McNeil Island with up to four hundred four beds as
a total confinement facility under this chapter, subject to
appropriated funding for those purposes. The secure community
transition facility shall be authorized for the number of beds needed
to ensure compliance with the orders of the superior courts under this
chapter and the federal district court for the western district of
Washington. The total number of beds in the secure community
transition facility shall be limited to twenty-four, consisting of up
to fifteen transitional beds ((shall be limited to fifteen)) and up to
nine pretransitional beds. The residents occupying ((these)) the
transitional beds shall be the only residents eligible for transitional
services occurring in Pierce county. In no event shall more than
fifteen residents of the secure community transition facility be
participating in off-island transitional, educational, or employment
activity at the same time in Pierce county. The department shall
provide the Pierce county sheriff, or his or her designee, with a list
of the fifteen residents so designated, along with their photographs
and physical descriptions, and ((it)) the list shall be immediately
updated whenever a residential change occurs. The Pierce county
sheriff, or his or her designee, shall be provided an opportunity to
confirm the residential status of each resident leaving McNeil Island.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "transitional beds" means beds
only for residents ((in halfway house status)) who are judged by a
qualified expert to be suitable to leave the island for treatment,
education, and employment.
(2)(a) The secretary is authorized to site, either within the
secure community transition facility established pursuant to subsection
(1)(a)(i) of this section, or within the special commitment center, up
to nine pretransitional beds.
(b) Residents assigned to pretransitional beds shall not be
permitted to leave McNeil Island for education, employment, treatment,
or community activities in Pierce county.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "pretransitional beds" means
beds for residents whose progress toward a less secure residential
environment and transition into more complete community involvement is
projected to take substantially longer than a typical resident of the
special commitment center.
(3) Notwithstanding RCW 36.70A.103 or any other law, this statute
preempts and supersedes local plans, development regulations,
permitting requirements, inspection requirements, and all other laws as
necessary to enable the secretary to site, construct, occupy, and
operate a secure community transition facility on McNeil Island and a
total confinement facility on McNeil Island.
(4) To the greatest extent possible, until June 30, 2003, persons
who were not civilly committed from the county in which the secure
community transition facility established pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section is located may not be conditionally released to a setting
in that same county less restrictive than that facility.
(5) As of June 26, 2001, the state shall immediately cease any
efforts in effect on such date to site secure community transition
facilities, other than the facility authorized by subsection (1) of
this section, and shall instead site such facilities in accordance with
the provisions of this section.
(6) The department must:
(a) Identify the minimum and maximum number of secure community
transition facility beds in addition to the facility established under
subsection (1) of this section that may be necessary for the period of
May 2004 through May 2007 and provide notice of these numbers to all
counties by August 31, 2001; and
(b) ((In consultation with the joint select committee established
in section 225, chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.,)) Develop and
publish policy guidelines for the siting and operation of secure
community transition facilities ((by October 1, 2001; and
(c) Provide a status report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2002, on the development of facilities under
the incentive program established in RCW 71.09.255. The report shall
include a projection of the anticipated number of secure community
transition facility beds that will become operational between May 2004
and May 2007. If it appears that an insufficient number of beds will
be operational, the department's report shall recommend a progression
of methods to facilitate siting in counties and cities including, if
necessary, preemption of local land use planning process and other
laws)).
(7)(a) The total number of secure community transition facility
beds that may be required to be sited in a county between June 26,
2001, and June 30, 2008, may be no greater than the total number of
persons civilly committed from that county, or detained at the special
commitment center under a pending civil commitment petition from that
county where a finding of probable cause had been made on April 1,
2001. The total number of secure community transition facility beds
required to be sited in each county between July 1, 2008, and June 30,
2015, may be no greater than the total number of persons civilly
committed from that county or detained at the special commitment center
under a pending civil commitment petition from that county where a
finding of probable cause had been made as of July 1, 2008.
(b) Counties and cities that provide secure community transition
facility beds above the maximum number that they could be required to
site under this subsection are eligible for a bonus grant under the
incentive provisions in RCW 71.09.255. The county where the special
commitment center is located shall receive this bonus grant for the
number of beds in the facility established in subsection (1) of this
section in excess of the maximum number established by this subsection.
(c) No secure community transition facilities in addition to the
one established in subsection (1) of this section may be required to be
sited in the county where the special commitment center is located
until after June 30, 2008, provided however, that the county and its
cities may elect to site additional secure community transition
facilities and shall be eligible under the incentive provisions of RCW
71.09.255 for any additional facilities meeting the requirements of
that section.
(8) In identifying potential sites within a county for the location
of a secure community transition facility, the department shall work
with and assist local governments to provide for the equitable
distribution of such facilities. In coordinating and deciding upon the
siting of secure community transition facilities, great weight shall be
given by the county and cities within the county to:
(a) The number and location of existing residential facility beds
operated by the department of corrections or the mental health division
of the department of social and health services in each jurisdiction in
the county; and
(b) The number of registered sex offenders classified as level II
or level III and the number of sex offenders registered as homeless
residing in each jurisdiction in the county.
(9)(a) "Equitable distribution" means siting or locating secure
community transition facilities in a manner that will not cause a
disproportionate grouping of similar facilities either in any one
county, or in any one jurisdiction or community within a county, as
relevant; and
(b) "Jurisdiction" means a city, town, or geographic area of a
county in which ((district)) distinct political or judicial authority
may be exercised.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.09.275 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 211 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((By August 1, 2001, the department must provide the
appropriate committees of the legislature with a transportation plan to
address the issues of coordinating the movement of residents of the
secure community transition facility established pursuant to RCW
71.09.250(1) between McNeil Island and the mainland with the movement
of others who must use the same docks or equipment within the funds
appropriated for this purpose.
(2))) If the department does not provide a separate vessel for
transporting residents of the secure community transition facility
established in RCW 71.09.250(1) between McNeil Island and the mainland,
the ((plan)) department shall ((include at least the following
components)):
(a) ((The)) Separate residents ((shall be separated)) from minors
and vulnerable adults, except vulnerable adults who have been found to
be sexually violent predators.
(b) ((The)) Not transport residents ((shall not be transported))
during times when children are normally coming to and from the mainland
for school.
(((3))) (2) The department shall designate a separate waiting area
at the points of debarkation, and residents shall be required to remain
in this area while awaiting transportation.
(((4))) (3) The department shall provide law enforcement agencies
in the counties and cities in which residents of the secure community
transition facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i)
regularly participate in employment, education, or social services, or
through which these persons are regularly transported, with a copy of
the court's order of conditional release with respect to these persons.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.09.290 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 214 are each
amended to read as follows:
The secretary shall establish policy guidelines for the siting of
secure community transition facilities, other than the secure community
transition facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i),
which shall include at least the following minimum requirements:
(1) The following criteria must be considered prior to any real
property being listed for consideration for the location of or use as
a secure community transition facility:
(a) The proximity and response time criteria established under RCW
71.09.285;
(b) The site or building is available for lease for the anticipated
use period or for purchase;
(c) Security monitoring services and appropriate back-up systems
are available and reliable;
(d) Appropriate mental health and sex offender treatment providers
must be available within a reasonable commute; and
(e) Appropriate permitting for a secure community transition
facility must be possible under the zoning code of the local
jurisdiction.
(2) For sites which meet the criteria of subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall analyze and compare the criteria in
subsections (3) through (5) of this section using the method
established in RCW 71.09.285.
(3) Public safety and security criteria shall include at least the
following:
(a) Whether limited visibility between the facility and adjacent
properties can be achieved prior to placement of any person;
(b) The distance from, and number of, risk potential activities and
facilities, as measured using the ((rules)) policies adopted under RCW
71.09.285;
(c) The existence of or ability to establish barriers between the
site and the risk potential facilities and activities;
(d) Suitability of the buildings to be used for the secure
community transition facility with regard to existing or feasibly
modified features; and
(e) The availability of electronic monitoring that allows a
resident's location to be determined with specificity.
(4) Site characteristics criteria shall include at least the
following:
(a) Reasonableness of rental, lease, or sale terms including length
and renewability of a lease or rental agreement;
(b) Traffic and access patterns associated with the real property;
(c) Feasibility of complying with zoning requirements within the
necessary time frame; and
(d) A contractor or contractors are available to install, monitor,
and repair the necessary security and alarm systems.
(5) Program characteristics criteria shall include at least the
following:
(a) Reasonable proximity to available medical, mental health, sex
offender, and chemical dependency treatment providers and facilities;
(b) Suitability of the location for programming, staffing, and
support considerations;
(c) Proximity to employment, educational, vocational, and other
treatment plan components.
(6) For purposes of this section "available" or "availability" of
qualified treatment providers includes provider qualifications and
willingness to provide services, average commute time, and cost of
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 71.09.270 (Transition facility--Law
enforcement presence) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 210 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---