BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.12.080 and 1988 c 176 s 208 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall adopt rules concerning the eligibility of
residents of residential habilitation centers for placement in
community residential programs under this title; determination of
ability of such persons or their estates to pay all or a portion of the
cost of care, support, and training; the manner and method of licensing
or certification and inspection and approval of such community
residential programs for placement under this title; and procedures for
the payment of costs of care, maintenance, and training in community
residential programs. The rules shall include standards for care,
maintenance, and training to be met by such community residential
programs.
(2) In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section, the
secretary shall address a process for considering, as a priority, cost
impacts to contract service providers in carrying out requirements of
any rule or policy by the department. The process must incorporate
efficiencies to minimize administrative costs to (a) the service
provider in implementing a policy or rule; and (b) the department in
its oversight activities. Such cost containment measures must be
designed to address unnecessary duplication of efforts and paperwork,
but not interfere with what is deemed necessary to meet basic
compliance of the rule or policy.
(3) The secretary shall ensure that rules adopted under subsection
(1) of this section do not (a) duplicate requirements of service
providers that already exist; (b) require review by the department of
routine changes by service providers to administrative documents that
do not change or thwart the intent of the underlying policy; (c)
require staff performance reviews without giving service providers the
flexibility to conduct such reviews based on individual circumstances;
(d) require departmental approval of routine staff schedule changes by
service providers when the change does not alter the underlying
requirements of the contractual agreement; and (e) require service
providers to keep guardianship papers and federally required individual
support plan documents that are already maintained by the department.
(4) Subsection (2) of this section also applies to the adoption of
policies by the division of developmental disabilities that are not
codified into the Washington Administrative Code.
(5) The division of developmental disabilities shall give expanded
flexibility to service providers in policy to meet the terms of their
contracts by (a) allowing wage shifts between staff and nonstaff wages
to occur without department approval; (b) giving service providers
discretion in submitting damage claims to insurance companies; and (c)
authorizing service providers to determine whether a behavior support
plan is necessary for a single incident that resulted in property
damage.
(6) The secretary shall coordinate state activities and resources
relating to placement in community residential programs to help
efficiently expend state and local resources and, to the extent
designated funds are available, create an effective community
residential program.

--- END ---