BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.12.187 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 16 s 18 are each
amended to read as follows:
This chapter shall not be construed to interfere with, impede, or
in any way diminish the right of employees to bargain collectively with
their employers through representatives of their own choosing
concerning wages or standards or conditions of employment. Rules
adopted pursuant to this chapter regarding the appropriate meal and
rest periods, as they apply to construction trades employees who work
with hot asphalt or other materials or construction processes that do
not allow for scheduled and fixed breaks for work crews, may be
modified by the terms of a collective bargaining agreement if the
provisions of the collective bargaining agreement covering such
employees specifically prescribe rules concerning meal periods and rest
periods.

--- END ---