BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.703 and 1985 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((It shall be in the public purpose for all)) Cities ((to)) may
engage in economic development activities or programs. In order to
meet its economic development goals and objectives, any city or town is
authorized, without limitation, to transfer or loan to the state, any
city, county, special purpose district, public development authority or
other political subdivision or instrumentality, or the federal
government or any Indian tribe, any funds, real or personal property,
property interests, or services. In addition, cities may contract with
for-profit and nonprofit corporations or other entities in furtherance
of this and other acts relating to economic development.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.01.085 and 1985 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((It shall be in the public purpose for all)) Counties ((to)) may
engage in economic development activities or programs. In order to
meet its economic development goals and objectives, any county is
authorized, without limitation, to transfer or loan to the state, any
city, county, special purpose district, public development authority or
other political subdivision or instrumentality, or the federal
government or any Indian tribe, any funds, real or personal property,
property interests, or services. In addition, counties may contract
with for-profit and nonprofit corporations or other entities in
furtherance of this and other acts relating to economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The powers granted by this act are
supplemental to those previously authorized by law, and nothing in this
act shall be deemed to limit any other authority of cities, towns, and
counties. All prior actions consistent with the provisions of this act
are ratified, confirmed, and validated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---