BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 While the common law doctrine of sovereign
immunity declares that the state is immune from liability for the
tortious conduct of its employees and officers, Article II, section 26
of the state Constitution allows the legislature to waive its immunity
and specify by statute "in what manner, and in what courts, suit may be
brought against the state." In the granting or withholding of
sovereign immunity, there are limitations, gradations, and competing
interests to be balanced by the legislature, including fairness to the
citizens of the state, the preservation of proper and essential
functions of government, and the conservation of scarce public
resources.
In balancing these competing interests, the legislature must also
balance the traditional role of the jury in determining damages in
civil cases and the legislature's constitutional mandate under Article
VIII, section 4 of the state Constitution to protect the state treasury
through the appropriation process.
The legislature finds that these constitutional principles are not
adequately served by either complete sovereign immunity or the complete
waiver of sovereign immunity. Pursuant to the express authority of
Article II, section 26 of the state Constitution, the purpose of this
act is to recognize and implement these fundamental constitutional
principles while providing a fair and equitable means of recovery
against governmental entities for the negligent acts of their employees
and officers.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.22.070 and 1993 c 496 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all actions involving fault of more than one entity, the
trier of fact shall determine the percentage of the total fault which
is attributable to every entity which caused the claimant's damages
except entities immune from liability to the claimant under Title 51
RCW. The sum of the percentages of the total fault attributed to at-fault entities shall equal one hundred percent. The entities whose
fault shall be determined include the claimant or person suffering
personal injury or incurring property damage, defendants, third-party
defendants, entities released by the claimant, entities with any other
individual defense against the claimant, and entities immune from
liability to the claimant, but shall not include those entities immune
from liability to the claimant under Title 51 RCW. Judgment shall be
entered against each defendant except those who have been released by
the claimant or are immune from liability to the claimant or have
prevailed on any other individual defense against the claimant in an
amount which represents that party's proportionate share of the
claimant's total damages. The liability of each defendant shall be
several only and shall not be joint except:
(a) A party shall be responsible for the fault of another person or
for payment of the proportionate share of another party where both were
acting in concert or when a person was acting as an agent or servant of
the party.
(b) If the trier of fact determines that the claimant or party
suffering bodily injury or incurring property damages was not at fault,
the defendants against whom judgment is entered shall be jointly and
severally liable for the sum of their proportionate shares of the
((claimants [claimant's])) claimant's total damages, except as provided
in RCW 4.92.090(2) and 4.96.010(2).
(2) If a defendant is jointly and severally liable under one of the
exceptions listed in subsections (1)(a) or (1)(b) of this section, such
defendant's rights to contribution against another jointly and
severally liable defendant, and the effect of settlement by either such
defendant, shall be determined under RCW 4.22.040, 4.22.050, and
4.22.060.
(3)(a) Nothing in this section affects any cause of action relating
to hazardous wastes or substances or solid waste disposal sites.
(b) Nothing in this section shall affect a cause of action arising
from the tortious interference with contracts or business relations.
(c) Nothing in this section shall affect any cause of action
arising from the manufacture or marketing of a fungible product in a
generic form which contains no clearly identifiable shape, color, or
marking.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.56.115 and 1983 c 147 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Judgments founded on the tortious conduct of the state of
Washington or of the political subdivisions, municipal corporations,
and quasi municipal corporations of the state, whether acting in their
governmental or proprietary capacities, shall bear interest from the
date of entry at the maximum rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on the
date of entry thereof: PROVIDED, That in any case where a court is
directed on review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where
a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review,
interest on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed
shall date back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was
rendered.
Interest does not accrue on that portion of a judgment that is
subject to appropriation by the legislature under RCW 4.92.090 or by a
local legislative authority under RCW 4.96.010 until the appropriation
has been made by the legislature or local legislative authority.

Sec. 4 RCW 4.92.005 and 1985 c 217 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 4.92.060, 4.92.070, 4.92.090, 4.92.130,
((4.92.140,)) and 4.92.150, volunteer is defined in RCW 51.12.035.

Sec. 5 RCW 4.96.010 and 2001 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All local governmental entities, whether acting in a
governmental or proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages
arising out of their tortious conduct, or the tortious conduct of their
past or present officers, employees, or volunteers while performing or
in good faith purporting to perform their official duties, to the same
extent as if they were a private person or corporation, subject to the
limitations provided in subsection (2) of this section. Filing a claim
for damages within the time allowed by law shall be a condition
precedent to the commencement of any action claiming damages. The laws
specifying the content for such claims shall be liberally construed so
that substantial compliance therewith will be deemed satisfactory.
(2)(a) Local government entities, officers, employees, or
volunteers are liable to pay a claim or a judgment by any one person
that exceeds the sum of one million dollars or any claim or judgment,
or portions thereof, that, when totaled with all other claims or
judgments paid by the local government entities, officers, employees,
or volunteers arising out of the same incident or occurrence, exceeds
the sum of two million dollars. However, a judgment or judgments may
be claimed and rendered in excess of these amounts and may be settled
and paid under this section up to one million dollars or two million
dollars, as the case may be, and that portion of the judgment that
exceeds these amounts may be reported to the local legislative
authority, but may be paid in part or in whole only by further act of
the local legislative authority. Notwithstanding the limited waiver of
sovereign immunity provided in this section, the local government
entities, officers, employees, or volunteers may agree, within the
limits of insurance coverage provided, to settle a claim made or a
judgment rendered against it without further action by the local
legislative authority, but the local government entities, officers,
employees, or volunteers have not waived any defense of sovereign
immunity or increased the limits of its liability as a result of its
obtaining insurance coverage for tortious acts in excess of the waiver
provided in this section.
(b) The liability of the local government entities, officers,
employees, or volunteers is several only and is not joint.
(c) No attorney may charge, demand, receive, or collect, for
services rendered, fees in excess of twenty-five percent of any
judgment or settlement under this section.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, for the purposes
of this chapter, "local governmental entity" means a county, city,
town, special district, municipal corporation as defined in RCW
39.50.010, quasi-municipal corporation, or public hospital.
(((3))) (4) For the purposes of this chapter, "volunteer" is
defined according to RCW 51.12.035.

Sec. 6 RCW 4.92.040 and 2002 c 332 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No execution shall issue against the state on any judgment.
(2) Whenever a final judgment against the state is obtained in an
action on a claim arising out of tortious conduct, the claim shall be
paid from the liability account, subject to the limitations of RCW
4.92.090.
(3) Whenever a final judgment against the state shall have been
obtained in any other action, the clerk of the court shall make and
furnish to the risk management division a duly certified copy of such
judgment; the risk management division shall thereupon audit the amount
of damages and costs therein awarded, and the same shall be paid from
appropriations specifically provided for such purposes by law.
(4) Final judgments for which there are no provisions in state law
for payment shall be transmitted by the risk management division to the
senate and house of representatives committees on ways and means as
follows:
(a) On the first day of each session of the legislature, the risk
management division shall transmit judgments received and audited since
the adjournment of the previous session of the legislature.
(b) During each session of legislature, the risk management
division shall transmit judgments immediately upon completion of audit.
(5) All claims, other than judgments, made to the legislature
against the state of Washington for money or property, shall be
accompanied by a statement of the facts on which such claim is based
and such evidence as the claimant intends to offer in support of the
claim and shall be filed with the risk management division, which shall
retain the same as a record. All claims of two thousand dollars or
less shall be approved or rejected by the risk management division, and
if approved shall be paid from appropriations specifically provided for
such purpose by law. Such decision, if adverse to the claimant in
whole or part, shall not preclude the claimant from seeking relief from
the legislature. If the claimant accepts any part of his or her claim
which is approved for payment by the risk management division, such
acceptance shall constitute a waiver and release of the state from any
further claims relating to the damage or injury asserted in the claim
so accepted. The risk management division shall submit to the house
and senate committees on ways and means, at the beginning of each
regular session, a comprehensive list of all claims paid pursuant to
this subsection during the preceding year. For all claims not approved
by the risk management division, the risk management division shall
recommend to the legislature whether such claims should be approved or
rejected. Recommendations shall be submitted to the senate and house
of representatives committees on ways and means not later than the
thirtieth day of each regular session of the legislature. Claims which
cannot be processed for timely submission of recommendations shall be
held for submission during the following regular session of the
legislature. The recommendations shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) A summary of the facts alleged in the claim, and a statement as
to whether these facts can be verified by the risk management division;
(b) An estimate by the risk management division of the value of the
loss or damage which was alleged to have occurred;
(c) An analysis of the legal liability, if any, of the state for
the alleged loss or damage; and
(d) A summary of equitable or public policy arguments which might
be helpful in resolving the claim.
(6) The legislative committees to whom such claims are referred
shall make a transcript, recording, or statement of the substance of
the evidence given in support of such a claim. If the legislature
approves a claim the same shall be paid from appropriations
specifically provided for such purpose by law.
(7) Subsections (3) through (6) of this section do not apply to
judgments or claims against the state housing finance commission
created under chapter 43.180 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 4.92.090 and 1963 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state of Washington, whether acting in its governmental or
proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages arising out of its
tortious conduct to the same extent as if it were a private person or
corporation, subject to the limitations provided in this section.
(1) Neither the state nor its agencies, institutions, officers,
employees, or volunteers are liable to pay a claim or a judgment by any
one person that exceeds the sum of one million dollars or any claim or
judgment, or portions thereof, that, when totaled with all other claims
or judgments paid by the state or its agencies, institutions, officers,
employees, or volunteers arising out of the same incident or
occurrence, exceeds the sum of two million dollars. However, a
judgment or judgments may be claimed and rendered in excess of these
amounts and may be settled and paid under this section up to one
million dollars or two million dollars, as the case may be, and that
portion of the judgment that exceeds these amounts may be reported to
the legislature, but may be paid in part or in whole only by further
act of the legislature. Notwithstanding the limited waiver of
sovereign immunity provided in this section, the state or an agency,
institution, or any officer, employee, or volunteer may agree, within
the limits of insurance coverage provided, to settle a claim made or a
judgment rendered against it without further action by the legislature,
but the state or agency has not waived any defense of sovereign
immunity or increased the limits of its liability as a result of its
obtaining insurance coverage for tortious acts in excess of the waiver
provided in this section.
(2) The liability of the state, its agencies, and institutions is
several only and is not joint.
(3) No attorney may charge, demand, receive, or collect, for
services rendered, fees in excess of twenty-five percent of any
judgment or settlement under this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 4.92.130 and 2002 c 332 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
A liability account in the custody of the treasurer is hereby
created as a nonappropriated account to be used solely and exclusively
for the payment of liability settlements and judgments against the
state under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq. or for the tortious conduct of
its officers, employees, and volunteers and all related legal defense
costs. Legislative appropriation is required for expenditures from the
liability account to the extent specified in RCW 4.92.090.
(1) The purpose of the liability account is to: (a) Expeditiously
pay legal liabilities and defense costs of the state resulting from
tortious conduct; (b) promote risk control through a cost allocation
system which recognizes agency loss experience, levels of self-retention, and levels of risk exposure; and (c) establish an
actuarially sound system to pay incurred losses, within defined limits.
(2) The liability account shall be used to pay claims for injury
and property damages and legal defense costs exclusive of agency-retained expenses otherwise budgeted.
(3) No money shall be paid from the liability account, except for
defense costs, unless all proceeds available to the claimant from any
valid and collectible liability insurance shall have been exhausted and
unless:
(a) The claim shall have been reduced to final judgment in a court
of competent jurisdiction and legislative appropriation has been made
to the extent required by RCW 4.92.090; or
(b) The claim has been approved for payment.
(4) The liability account shall be financed through annual premiums
assessed to state agencies, based on sound actuarial principles, and
shall be for liability coverage in excess of agency-budgeted self-retention levels.
(5) Annual premium levels shall be determined by the risk manager,
with the consultation and advice of the risk management advisory
committee. An actuarial study shall be conducted to assist in
determining the appropriate level of funding.
(6) Disbursements for claims from the liability account shall be
made to the claimant, or to the clerk of the court for judgments, upon
written request to the state treasurer from the risk manager.
(7) The director may direct agencies to transfer moneys from other
funds and accounts to the liability account if premiums are delinquent.
(8) The liability account shall not exceed fifty percent of the
actuarial value of the outstanding liability as determined annually by
the risk management division. If the account exceeds the maximum
amount specified in this section, premiums may be adjusted by the risk
management division in order to maintain the account balance at the
maximum limits. If, after adjustment of premiums, the account balance
remains above the limits specified, the excess amount shall be prorated
back to the appropriate funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act applies to all claims that have
not been reduced to judgment on the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---