BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.155.070 and 2001 c 131 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(c) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(d) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(e) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(f) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(g) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(h) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(6) Before November 1 of each year, the board shall develop and
submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives a description of the loans made under RCW 43.155.065,
43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section during the preceding
fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects which are recommended
for funding by the legislature, including one copy to the staff of each
of the committees. The list shall include, but not be limited to, a
description of each project and recommended financing, the terms and
conditions of the loan or financial guarantee, the local government
jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's
critical need for the project and documentation of local funds being
used to finance the public works project. The list shall also include
measures of fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction recommended for
financial assistance, compared to authorized limits and state averages,
including local government sales taxes; real estate excise taxes;
property taxes; and charges for or taxes on sewerage, water, garbage,
and other utilities.
(7) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the
legislature ((has appropriated funds for a specific list of public
works projects)) appropriates funds for a specific list of public works
projects or February 15 of each year, whichever comes first. If the
legislature does not act on the prioritized list of projects by
February 15 of each year, the list is deemed approved. The legislature
may remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature shall not change the order of the priorities recommended
for funding by the board.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be
exempted from subsection (7) of this section.
(10) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling
facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that
the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary
to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by
the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.

--- END ---