BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to revise and
improve the processes for billing and collecting legal financial
obligations. The purpose of this act is to respond to suggestions and
requests made by county government officials, and in particular county
clerks, to assume the collection of such obligations in cooperation and
coordination with the department of corrections and the administrative
office for the courts. The legislature undertakes this effort
following a collaboration between local officials, the department of
corrections, and the administrative office for the courts. The intent
of this act is to promote an increased and more efficient collection of
legal financial obligations and, as a result, improve the likelihood
that the affected agencies will increase the collections which will
provide additional benefits to all parties and, in particular, crime
victims whose restitution is dependent upon the collections.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.760 and 2001 c 10 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a person is convicted of a felony, the court may order
the payment of a legal financial obligation as part of the sentence.
The court must on either the judgment and sentence or on a subsequent
order to pay, designate the total amount of a legal financial
obligation and segregate this amount among the separate assessments
made for restitution, costs, fines, and other assessments required by
law. On the same order, the court is also to set a sum that the
offender is required to pay on a monthly basis towards satisfying the
legal financial obligation. If the court fails to set the offender
monthly payment amount, the department shall set the amount. Upon
receipt of an offender's monthly payment, restitution shall be paid
prior to any payments of other monetary obligations. After restitution
is satisfied, the county clerk shall distribute the payment
proportionally among all other fines, costs, and assessments imposed,
unless otherwise ordered by the court.
(2) If the court determines that the offender, at the time of
sentencing, has the means to pay for the cost of incarceration, the
court may require the offender to pay for the cost of incarceration at
a rate of fifty dollars per day of incarceration. Payment of other
court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal financial
obligations and costs of supervision shall take precedence over the
payment of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court. All funds
recovered from offenders for the cost of incarceration in the county
jail shall be remitted to the county and the costs of incarceration in
a prison shall be remitted to the department.
(3) The court may add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent
order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction is to be
issued immediately. If the court chooses not to order the immediate
issuance of a notice of payroll deduction at sentencing, the court
shall add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a
statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other
income-withholding action may be taken, without further notice to the
offender if a monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment
is not paid when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount
payable for one month is owed.
If a judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay does not
include the statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued
or other income-withholding action may be taken if a monthly legal
financial obligation payment is past due, the department or the county
clerk may serve a notice on the offender stating such requirements and
authorizations. Service shall be by personal service or any form of
mail requiring a return receipt.
(4) Independent of the department or the county clerk, the party or
entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed shall have the
authority to use any other remedies available to the party or entity to
collect the legal financial obligation. These remedies include
enforcement in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the
party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed.
Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid through
the registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately
according to each victim's loss when there is more than one victim.
The judgment and sentence shall identify the party or entity to whom
restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity may enforce the
judgment. If restitution is ordered pursuant to RCW 9.94A.750(6) or
9.94A.753(6) to a victim of rape of a child or a victim's child born
from the rape, the Washington state child support registry shall be
identified as the party to whom payments must be made. Restitution
obligations arising from the rape of a child in the first, second, or
third degree that result in the pregnancy of the victim may be enforced
for the time periods provided under RCW 9.94A.750(6) and 9.94A.753(6).
All other legal financial obligations for an offense committed prior to
July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time during the ten-year period
following the offender's release from total confinement or within ten
years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends
later. Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the
superior court may extend the criminal judgment an additional ten years
for payment of legal financial obligations including crime victims'
assessments. All other legal financial obligations for an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time the
offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. For an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall retain jurisdiction
over the offender, for purposes of the offender's compliance with
payment of the legal financial obligations, until the obligation is
completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the
crime. The department ((of corrections shall)) may only supervise the
offender's compliance with payment of the legal financial obligations
((for ten years following the entry of the judgment and sentence, or
ten years following the offender's release from total confinement,
whichever period ends later)) during any period in which the department
is authorized to supervise the offender in the community under RCW
9.94A.728 and section 3, chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5990), Laws of
2003, or in which the offender is confined in a state correctional
institution or a correctional facility pursuant to a transfer agreement
with the department, and the department shall supervise the offender's
compliance during any such period. The department is not responsible
for supervision of the offender during any subsequent period of time
the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. The county clerk
is authorized to collect unpaid legal financial obligations at any time
the offender remains under the jurisdiction of the court for purposes
of his or her legal financial obligations.
(5) In order to assist the court in setting a monthly sum that the
offender must pay during the period of supervision, the offender is
required to report to the department for purposes of preparing a
recommendation to the court. When reporting, the offender is required,
under oath, to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions
concerning present, past, and future earning capabilities and the
location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender
is further required to bring all documents requested by the department.
(6) After completing the investigation, the department shall make
a report to the court on the amount of the monthly payment that the
offender should be required to make towards a satisfied legal financial
obligation.
(7)(a) During the period of supervision, the department may make a
recommendation to the court that the offender's monthly payment
schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in financial
circumstances. If the department sets the monthly payment amount, the
department may modify the monthly payment amount without the matter
being returned to the court. During the period of supervision, the
department may require the offender to report to the department for the
purposes of reviewing the appropriateness of the collection schedule
for the legal financial obligation. During this reporting, the
offender is required under oath to respond truthfully and honestly to
all questions concerning earning capabilities and the location and
nature of all property or financial assets. The offender shall bring
all documents requested by the department in order to prepare the
collection schedule.
(b) Subsequent to any period of supervision, or if the department
is not authorized to supervise the offender in the community, the
county clerk may make a recommendation to the court that the offender's
monthly payment schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in
financial circumstances. If the county clerk sets the monthly payment
amount, the clerk may modify the monthly payment amount without the
matter being returned to the court. During the period of repayment,
the county clerk may require the offender to report to the clerk for
the purpose of reviewing the appropriateness of the collection schedule
for the legal financial obligation. During this reporting, the
offender is required under oath to respond truthfully and honestly to
all questions concerning earning capabilities and the location and
nature of all property or financial assets. The offender shall bring
all documents requested by the county clerk in order to prepare the
collection schedule.
(8) After the judgment and sentence or payment order is entered,
the department is authorized, for any period of supervision, to collect
the legal financial obligation from the offender. Subsequent to any
period of supervision or, if the department is not authorized to
supervise the offender in the community, the county clerk is authorized
to collect unpaid legal financial obligations from the offender. Any
amount collected by the department shall be remitted daily to the
county clerk for the purpose of disbursements. The department ((is))
and the county clerks are authorized, but not required, to accept
credit cards as payment for a legal financial obligation, and any costs
incurred related to accepting credit card payments shall be the
responsibility of the offender.
(9) The department or any obligee of the legal financial obligation
may seek a mandatory wage assignment for the purposes of obtaining
satisfaction for the legal financial obligation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.7701. Any party obtaining a wage assignment shall notify the
county clerk. The county clerks shall notify the department, or the
administrative office of the courts, whichever is providing the monthly
billing for the offender.
(10) The requirement that the offender pay a monthly sum towards a
legal financial obligation constitutes a condition or requirement of a
sentence and the offender is subject to the penalties for noncompliance
as provided in RCW 9.94A.634, 9.94A.737, or 9.94A.740.
(11)(a) Until January 1, 2004, the department shall mail
individualized monthly billings to the address known by the department
for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2004, the administrative office of the
courts shall mail individualized monthly billings to the address known
by the office for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial
obligation.
(c) The billing shall direct payments, other than outstanding cost
of supervision assessments under RCW 9.94A.780, parole assessments
under RCW 72.04A.120, and cost of probation assessments under RCW
9.95.214, to the county clerk, and cost of supervision, parole, or
probation assessments to the department.
(d) The county clerk shall provide the ((department with
individualized monthly billings for each offender with an unsatisfied
legal financial obligation and shall provide the department))
administrative office of the courts with notice of payments by such
offenders no less frequently than weekly.
(e) The county clerks, the administrative office of the courts, and
the department shall maintain agreements to implement this subsection.
(12) The department ((may)) shall arrange for the collection of
unpaid legal financial obligations during any period of supervision in
the community through the county clerk((, or)). The department shall
either collect unpaid legal financial obligations or arrange for
collections through another entity if the clerk does not assume
responsibility for collection pursuant to subsection (4) of this
section. The costs for collection services shall be paid by the
offender.
(13) Nothing in this chapter makes the department, the state, the
counties, or any ((of its)) state or county employees, agents, or other
persons acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the
payment of these legal financial obligations or for the acts of any
offender who is no longer, or was not, subject to supervision by the
department for a term of community custody, community placement, or
community supervision, and who remains under the jurisdiction of the
court for payment of legal financial obligations.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.750 and 2000 c 28 s 32 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section applies to offenses committed on or before July 1,
1985.
(1) If restitution is ordered, the court shall determine the amount
of restitution due at the sentencing hearing or within one hundred
eighty days. The court may continue the hearing beyond the one hundred
eighty days for good cause. The court shall then set a minimum monthly
payment that the offender is required to make towards the restitution
that is ordered. The court should take into consideration the total
amount of the restitution owed, the offender's present, past, and
future ability to pay, as well as any assets that the offender may
have.
(2) During the period of supervision, the community corrections
officer may examine the offender to determine if there has been a
change in circumstances that warrants an amendment of the monthly
payment schedule. The community corrections officer may recommend a
change to the schedule of payment and shall inform the court of the
recommended change and the reasons for the change. The sentencing
court may then reset the monthly minimum payments based on the report
from the community corrections officer of the change in circumstances.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,
restitution ordered by a court pursuant to a criminal conviction shall
be based on easily ascertainable damages for injury to or loss of
property, actual expenses incurred for treatment for injury to persons,
and lost wages resulting from injury. Restitution shall not include
reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or
other intangible losses, but may include the costs of counseling
reasonably related to the offense. The amount of restitution shall not
exceed double the amount of the offender's gain or the victim's loss
from the commission of the offense.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the offender shall remain
under the court's jurisdiction for a term of ten years following the
offender's release from total confinement or ten years subsequent to
the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer.
Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the superior
court may extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional
ten years for payment of restitution. ((If jurisdiction under the
criminal judgment is extended, the department is not responsible for
supervision of the offender during the subsequent period.)) The
portion of the sentence concerning restitution may be modified as to
amount, terms and conditions during either the initial ten-year period
or subsequent ten-year period if the criminal judgment is extended,
regardless of the expiration of the offender's term of community
supervision and regardless of the statutory maximum sentence for the
crime. The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution
ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total
amount. The offender's compliance with the restitution shall be
supervised by the department only during any period which the
department is authorized to supervise the offender in the community
under RCW 9.94A.728, section 3, chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5990),
Laws of 2003, or in which the offender is in confinement in a state
correctional institution or a correctional facility pursuant to a
transfer agreement with the department, and the department shall
supervise the offender's compliance during any such period. The
department is responsible for supervision of the offender only during
confinement and authorized supervision and not during any subsequent
period in which the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction.
The county clerk is authorized to collect unpaid restitution at any
time the offender remains under the jurisdiction of the court for
purposes of his or her legal financial obligations.
(5) Restitution may be ordered whenever the offender is convicted
of an offense which results in injury to any person or damage to or
loss of property or as provided in subsection (6) of this section. In
addition, restitution may be ordered to pay for an injury, loss, or
damage if the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer
offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the
offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or
offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement.
(6) Restitution for the crime of rape of a child in the first,
second, or third degree, in which the victim becomes pregnant, shall
include: (a) All of the victim's medical expenses that are associated
with the rape and resulting pregnancy; and (b) child support for any
child born as a result of the rape if child support is ordered pursuant
to a proceeding in superior court or administrative order for support
for that child. The clerk must forward any restitution payments made
on behalf of the victim's child to the Washington state child support
registry under chapter 26.23 RCW. Identifying information about the
victim and child shall not be included in the order. The offender
shall receive a credit against any obligation owing under the
administrative or superior court order for support of the victim's
child. For the purposes of this subsection, the offender shall remain
under the court's jurisdiction until the offender has satisfied support
obligations under the superior court or administrative order but not
longer than a maximum term of twenty-five years following the
offender's release from total confinement or twenty-five years
subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period
is longer. The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution
ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total
amount. The department shall supervise the offender's compliance with
the restitution ordered under this subsection.
(7) In addition to any sentence that may be imposed, an offender
who has been found guilty of an offense involving fraud or other
deceptive practice or an organization which has been found guilty of
any such offense may be ordered by the sentencing court to give notice
of the conviction to the class of persons or to the sector of the
public affected by the conviction or financially interested in the
subject matter of the offense by mail, by advertising in designated
areas or through designated media, or by other appropriate means.
(8) This section does not limit civil remedies or defenses
available to the victim or offender including support enforcement
remedies for support ordered under subsection (6) of this section for
a child born as a result of a rape of a child victim. The court shall
identify in the judgment and sentence the victim or victims entitled to
restitution and what amount is due each victim. The state or victim
may enforce the court-ordered restitution in the same manner as a
judgment in a civil action. Restitution collected through civil
enforcement must be paid through the registry of the court and must be
distributed proportionately according to each victim's loss when there
is more than one victim.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.753 and 2000 c 226 s 3 and 2000 c 28 s 33 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
This section applies to offenses committed after July 1, 1985.
(1) When restitution is ordered, the court shall determine the
amount of restitution due at the sentencing hearing or within one
hundred eighty days except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section. The court may continue the hearing beyond the one hundred
eighty days for good cause. The court shall then set a minimum monthly
payment that the offender is required to make towards the restitution
that is ordered. The court should take into consideration the total
amount of the restitution owed, the offender's present, past, and
future ability to pay, as well as any assets that the offender may
have.
(2) During the period of supervision, the community corrections
officer may examine the offender to determine if there has been a
change in circumstances that warrants an amendment of the monthly
payment schedule. The community corrections officer may recommend a
change to the schedule of payment and shall inform the court of the
recommended change and the reasons for the change. The sentencing
court may then reset the monthly minimum payments based on the report
from the community corrections officer of the change in circumstances.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,
restitution ordered by a court pursuant to a criminal conviction shall
be based on easily ascertainable damages for injury to or loss of
property, actual expenses incurred for treatment for injury to persons,
and lost wages resulting from injury. Restitution shall not include
reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or
other intangible losses, but may include the costs of counseling
reasonably related to the offense. The amount of restitution shall not
exceed double the amount of the offender's gain or the victim's loss
from the commission of the crime.
(4) For the purposes of this section, for an offense committed
prior to July 1, 2000, the offender shall remain under the court's
jurisdiction for a term of ten years following the offender's release
from total confinement or ten years subsequent to the entry of the
judgment and sentence, whichever period ends later. Prior to the
expiration of the initial ten-year period, the superior court may
extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional ten years
for payment of restitution. For an offense committed on or after July
1, 2000, the offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction until
the obligation is completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory
maximum for the crime. The portion of the sentence concerning
restitution may be modified as to amount, terms, and conditions during
any period of time the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction,
regardless of the expiration of the offender's term of community
supervision and regardless of the statutory maximum sentence for the
crime. The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution
ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total
amount. The offender's compliance with the restitution shall be
supervised by the department ((for ten years following the entry of the
judgment and sentence or ten years following the offender's release
from total confinement. The department is not responsible for
supervision of the offender during any subsequent period of time the
offender remains under the court's jurisdiction)) only during any
period which the department is authorized to supervise the offender in
the community under RCW 9.94A.728, section 3, chapter . . . (Senate
Bill No. 5990), Laws of 2003, or in which the offender is in
confinement in a state correctional institution or a correctional
facility pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the
department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such
period. The department is responsible for supervision of the offender
only during confinement and authorized supervision and not during any
subsequent period in which the offender remains under the court's
jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to collect unpaid
restitution at any time the offender remains under the jurisdiction of
the court for purposes of his or her legal financial obligations.
(5) Restitution shall be ordered whenever the offender is convicted
of an offense which results in injury to any person or damage to or
loss of property or as provided in subsection (6) of this section
unless extraordinary circumstances exist which make restitution
inappropriate in the court's judgment and the court sets forth such
circumstances in the record. In addition, restitution shall be ordered
to pay for an injury, loss, or damage if the offender pleads guilty to
a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's
recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution to a
victim of an offense or offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to
a plea agreement.
(6) Restitution for the crime of rape of a child in the first,
second, or third degree, in which the victim becomes pregnant, shall
include: (a) All of the victim's medical expenses that are associated
with the rape and resulting pregnancy; and (b) child support for any
child born as a result of the rape if child support is ordered pursuant
to a civil superior court or administrative order for support for that
child. The clerk must forward any restitution payments made on behalf
of the victim's child to the Washington state child support registry
under chapter 26.23 RCW. Identifying information about the victim and
child shall not be included in the order. The offender shall receive
a credit against any obligation owing under the administrative or
superior court order for support of the victim's child. For the
purposes of this subsection, the offender shall remain under the
court's jurisdiction until the offender has satisfied support
obligations under the superior court or administrative order for the
period provided in RCW 4.16.020 or a maximum term of twenty-five years
following the offender's release from total confinement or twenty-five
years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever
period is longer. The court may not reduce the total amount of
restitution ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay
the total amount. The department shall supervise the offender's
compliance with the restitution ordered under this subsection.
(7) Regardless of the provisions of subsections (1) through (6) of
this section, the court shall order restitution in all cases where the
victim is entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation
act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the court does not order restitution and the
victim of the crime has been determined to be entitled to benefits
under the crime victims' compensation act, the department of labor and
industries, as administrator of the crime victims' compensation
program, may petition the court within one year of entry of the
judgment and sentence for entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt
of a petition from the department of labor and industries, the court
shall hold a restitution hearing and shall enter a restitution order.
(8) In addition to any sentence that may be imposed, an offender
who has been found guilty of an offense involving fraud or other
deceptive practice or an organization which has been found guilty of
any such offense may be ordered by the sentencing court to give notice
of the conviction to the class of persons or to the sector of the
public affected by the conviction or financially interested in the
subject matter of the offense by mail, by advertising in designated
areas or through designated media, or by other appropriate means.
(9) This section does not limit civil remedies or defenses
available to the victim, survivors of the victim, or offender including
support enforcement remedies for support ordered under subsection (6)
of this section for a child born as a result of a rape of a child
victim. The court shall identify in the judgment and sentence the
victim or victims entitled to restitution and what amount is due each
victim. The state or victim may enforce the court-ordered restitution
in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action. Restitution
collected through civil enforcement must be paid through the registry
of the court and must be distributed proportionately according to each
victim's loss when there is more than one victim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
If an offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation is
not subject to supervision by the department for a term of community
placement, community custody, or community supervision, or has not
completed payment of all legal financial obligations included in the
sentence at the expiration of his or her term of community placement,
community custody, or community supervision, the department shall
notify the administrative office of the courts of the termination of
the offender's supervision and provide information to the
administrative office of the courts to enable the county clerk to
monitor payment of the remaining obligations. The county clerk is
authorized to monitor payment after such notification. The secretary
of corrections and the administrator for the courts shall enter into an
interagency agreement to facilitate the electronic transfer of
information about offenders, unpaid obligations, and payees to carry
out the purposes of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.780 and 1991 c 104 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a punishment imposed under this chapter requires
supervision services to be provided, the offender shall pay to the
department of corrections the monthly assessment, prescribed under
subsection (2) of this section, which shall be for the duration of the
terms of supervision and which shall be considered as payment or part
payment of the cost of providing supervision to the offender. The
department may exempt or defer a person from the payment of all or any
part of the assessment based upon any of the following factors:
(a) The offender has diligently attempted but has been unable to
obtain employment that provides the offender sufficient income to make
such payments.
(b) The offender is a student in a school, college, university, or
a course of vocational or technical training designed to fit the
student for gainful employment.
(c) The offender has an employment handicap, as determined by an
examination acceptable to or ordered by the department.
(d) The offender's age prevents him or her from obtaining
employment.
(e) The offender is responsible for the support of dependents and
the payment of the assessment constitutes an undue hardship on the
offender.
(f) Other extenuating circumstances as determined by the
department.
(2) The department of corrections shall adopt a rule prescribing
the amount of the assessment. The department may, if it finds it
appropriate, prescribe a schedule of assessments that shall vary in
accordance with the intensity or cost of the supervision. The
department may not prescribe any assessment that is less than ten
dollars nor more than fifty dollars.
(3) All amounts required to be paid under this section shall be
collected by the department of corrections and deposited by the
department in the dedicated fund established pursuant to RCW 72.11.040.
(4) This section shall not apply to probation services provided
under an interstate compact pursuant to chapter 9.95 RCW or to
probation services provided for persons placed on probation prior to
June 10, 1982.
(5) If a county clerk assumes responsibility for collection of
unpaid legal financial obligations under RCW 9.94A.760, or under any
agreement with the department under that section, whether before or
after the completion of any period of community placement, community
custody, or community supervision, the clerk may impose a monthly or
annual assessment for the cost of collections. The amount of the
assessment shall not exceed the actual cost of collections. The county
clerk may exempt or defer payment of all or part of the assessment
based upon any of the factors listed in subsection (1) of this section.
The offender shall pay the assessment under this subsection to the
county clerk who shall apply it to the cost of collecting legal
financial obligations under RCW 9.94A.760.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.637 and 2002 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When an offender has completed all requirements of the
sentence, including any and all legal financial obligations, and while
under the custody and supervision of the department, the secretary or
the secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing court, which shall
discharge the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of
discharge by issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by
mailing the certificate to the offender's last known address.
(b)(i) When an offender has reached the end of his or her
supervision with the department and has completed all the requirements
of the sentence except his or her legal financial obligations, the
secretary's designee shall provide the county clerk with a notice that
the offender has completed all nonfinancial requirements of the
sentence.
(ii) When the department has provided the county clerk with notice
that an offender has completed all the requirements of the sentence and
the offender subsequently satisfies all legal financial obligations
under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the sentencing court,
including the notice from the department, which shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(2) The court shall send a copy of every signed certificate of
discharge to the auditor for the county in which the court resides and
to the department. The department shall create and maintain a data
base containing the names of all felons who have been issued
certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and the date of
conviction and offense.
(3) An offender who is not convicted of a violent offense or a sex
offense and is sentenced to a term involving community supervision may
be considered for a discharge of sentence by the sentencing court prior
to the completion of community supervision, provided that the offender
has completed at least one-half of the term of community supervision
and has met all other sentence requirements.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
discharge shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights lost by
operation of law upon conviction, and the certificate of discharge
shall so state. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of an
offender's prior record for purposes of determining sentences for later
offenses as provided in this chapter. Nothing in this section affects
or prevents use of the offender's prior conviction in a later criminal
prosecution either as an element of an offense or for impeachment
purposes. A certificate of discharge is not based on a finding of
rehabilitation.
(5) Unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court, a certificate
of discharge shall not terminate the offender's obligation to comply
with an order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW that excludes or prohibits
the offender from having contact with a specified person or coming
within a set distance of any specified location that was contained in
the judgment and sentence. An offender who violates such an order
after a certificate of discharge has been issued shall be subject to
prosecution according to the chapter under which the order was
originally issued.
(6) Upon release from custody, the offender may apply to the
department for counseling and help in adjusting to the community. This
voluntary help may be provided for up to one year following the release
from custody.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 36.23 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington association of county officials, in consultation
with county clerks, shall determine a funding formula for allocation of
moneys to counties for purposes of collecting legal financial
obligations, and report this formula to the legislature and the
administrative office of the courts by September 1, 2003. The
Washington association of county officials shall report on the amounts
of legal financial obligations collected by the county clerks to the
appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1,
2004, and annually thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW
to read as follows:
By October 1, 2003, and annually thereafter, the administrative
office of the courts shall distribute such funds to counties for county
clerk collection budgets as are appropriated by the legislature for
this purpose, using the funding formula recommended by the Washington
association of county officials. The administrative office of the
courts shall not deduct any amount for indirect or direct costs, and
shall distribute the entire amount appropriated by the legislature to
the counties for county clerk collection budgets. The administrative
office of the courts shall report on the amounts distributed to
counties to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than
December 1, 2003, and annually thereafter.
The administrative office of the courts may expend for the purposes
of billing for legal financial obligations, such funds as are
appropriated for the legislature for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, monthly payment
or starting dates set by the court or the department before or after
the effective date of this section shall not be construed as a
limitation on the due date or amount of legal financial obligations,
which may be immediately collected by civil means. Monthly payments
and commencement dates are to be construed to be applicable solely as
a limitation upon the deprivation of an offender's liberty for
nonpayment.

Sec. 11 RCW 4.56.100 and 1997 c 358 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When any judgment for the payment of money only shall have been
paid or satisfied, the clerk of the court in which such judgment was
rendered shall note upon the record in the execution docket
satisfaction thereof giving the date of such satisfaction upon either
the payment to such clerk of the amount of such judgment, costs and
interest and any accrued costs by reason of the issuance of any
execution, or the filing with such clerk of a satisfaction entitled in
such action and identifying the same executed by the judgment creditor
or his or her attorney of record in such action or his or her assignee
acknowledged as deeds are acknowledged. The clerk has the authority to
note the satisfaction of judgments for criminal and juvenile legal
financial obligations when the clerk's record indicates payment in full
or as directed by the court. Every satisfaction of judgment and every
partial satisfaction of judgment which provides for the payment of
money shall clearly designate the judgment creditor and his or her
attorney if any, the judgment debtor, the amount or type of
satisfaction, whether the satisfaction is full or partial, the cause
number, and the date of entry of the judgment. A certificate by such
clerk of the entry of such satisfaction by him or her may be filed in
the office of the clerk of any county in which an abstract of such
judgment has been filed. When so satisfied by the clerk or the filing
of such certificate the lien of such judgment shall be discharged.
(2) The department of social and health services shall file a
satisfaction of judgment for welfare fraud conviction if a person does
not pay money through the clerk as required under subsection (1) of
this section.
(((3) The department of corrections shall file a satisfaction of
judgment if a person does not pay money through the clerk's office as
required under subsection (1) of this section.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this act apply to all offenders currently, or in
the future, subject to sentences with unsatisfied legal financial
obligations. The provisions of this act do not change the amount of
any legal financial obligation or the maximum term for which any
offender is, or may be, under the jurisdiction of the court for
collection of legal financial obligations.

Sec. 13 RCW 72.09.111 and 2002 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall deduct taxes and legal financial
obligations from the gross wages ((or)), gratuities, or workers'
compensation benefits payable directly to the inmate under chapter
51.32 RCW, of each inmate working in correctional industries work
programs, ((taxes and legal financial obligations)) or otherwise
receiving such wages, gratuities, or benefits. The secretary shall
develop a formula for the distribution of offender wages ((and)),
gratuities, and benefits. The formula shall not reduce the inmate
account below the indigency level, as defined in RCW 72.09.015.
(a) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class I gross wages and from all others earning at least minimum wage:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court.
(b) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class II gross gratuities:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Fifteen percent to the department to contribute to the cost
of incarceration; and
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court.
(c) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
any workers' compensation benefits paid pursuant to RCW 51.32.080:
(i) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(iv) An amount equal to any legal financial obligations owed by the
inmate established by an order of any Washington state superior court
up to the total amount of the award.
(d) The formula shall include the following minimum deduction from
class IV gross gratuities: Five percent to the department to
contribute to the cost of incarceration.
(((d))) (e) The formula shall include the following minimum
deductions from class III gratuities: Five percent for the purpose of
crime victims' compensation.
(2) Any person sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility
of release or parole under chapter 10.95 RCW or sentenced to death
shall be exempt from the requirement under subsection (1)(a)(ii)
((or)), (b)(ii) ((of this subsection)), or (c)(ii).
(3) The department personal inmate savings account, together with
any accrued interest, shall only be available to an inmate at the time
of his or her release from confinement, unless the secretary determines
that an emergency exists for the inmate, at which time the funds can be
made available to the inmate in an amount determined by the secretary.
The management of classes I, II, and IV correctional industries may
establish an incentive payment for offender workers based on
productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.
(4) In the event that the offender worker's wages ((or)), gratuity,
or workers' compensation benefit is subject to garnishment for support
enforcement, the crime victims' compensation, savings, and cost of
incarceration deductions shall be calculated on the net wages after
taxes, legal financial obligations, and garnishment.
(((2))) (5) The department shall explore other methods of
recovering a portion of the cost of the inmate's incarceration and for
encouraging participation in work programs, including development of
incentive programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities paid for
only from wages earned while working in a correctional industries work
program.
(((3))) (6) The department shall develop the necessary
administrative structure to recover inmates' wages and keep records of
the amount inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and amenities.
All funds deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this
section for the purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration
shall be deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be
used only for the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional
industries work programs.
(((4))) (7) The expansion of inmate employment in class I and class
II correctional industries shall be implemented according to the
following schedule:
(a) Not later than June 30, 1995, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least two hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(b) Not later than June 30, 1996, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least four hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(c) Not later than June 30, 1997, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least six hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(d) Not later than June 30, 1998, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least nine hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(e) Not later than June 30, 1999, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand two hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 1994;
(f) Not later than June 30, 2000, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand five hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 1994.
(((5))) (8) It shall be in the discretion of the secretary to
apportion the inmates between class I and class II depending on
available contracts and resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 51.32 RCW
to read as follows:
If the department of labor and industries has received notice that
an injured worker entitled to benefits payable under this chapter is in
the custody of the department of corrections pursuant to a conviction
and sentence, the department shall send all such benefits to the worker
in care of the department of corrections, except those benefits payable
to a beneficiary as provided in RCW 51.32.040 (3)(c) and (4). Failure
of the department to send such benefits to the department of
corrections shall not result in liability to any party for either
department.

Sec. 15 RCW 51.32.040 and 1999 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 43.20B.720 ((and)), 72.09.111,
74.20A.260, and section 14 of this act, no money paid or payable under
this title shall, before the issuance and delivery of the check or
warrant, be assigned, charged, or taken in execution, attached,
garnished, or pass or be paid to any other person by operation of law,
any form of voluntary assignment, or power of attorney. Any such
assignment or charge is void unless the transfer is to a financial
institution at the request of a worker or other beneficiary and made in
accordance with RCW 51.32.045.
(2)(a) If any worker suffers (i) a permanent partial injury and
dies from some other cause than the accident which produced the injury
before he or she receives payment of the award for the permanent
partial injury or (ii) any other injury before he or she receives
payment of any monthly installment covering any period of time before
his or her death, the amount of the permanent partial disability award
or the monthly payment, or both, shall be paid to the surviving spouse
or the child or children if there is no surviving spouse. If there is
no surviving spouse and no child or children, the award or the amount
of the monthly payment shall be paid by the department or self-insurer
and distributed consistent with the terms of the decedent's will or, if
the decedent dies intestate, consistent with the terms of RCW
11.04.015.
(b) If any worker suffers an injury and dies from it before he or
she receives payment of any monthly installment covering time loss for
any period of time before his or her death, the amount of the monthly
payment shall be paid to the surviving spouse or the child or children
if there is no surviving spouse. If there is no surviving spouse and
no child or children, the amount of the monthly payment shall be paid
by the department or self-insurer and distributed consistent with the
terms of the decedent's will or, if the decedent dies intestate,
consistent with the terms of RCW 11.04.015.
(c) Any application for compensation under this subsection (2)
shall be filed with the department or self-insuring employer within one
year of the date of death. The department or self-insurer may satisfy
its responsibilities under this subsection (2) by sending any payment
due in the name of the decedent and to the last known address of the
decedent.
(3)(a) Any worker or beneficiary receiving benefits under this
title who is subsequently confined in, or who subsequently becomes
eligible for benefits under this title while confined in, any
institution under conviction and sentence shall have all payments of
the compensation canceled during the period of confinement. After
discharge from the institution, payment of benefits due afterward shall
be paid if the worker or beneficiary would, except for the provisions
of this subsection (3), otherwise be entitled to them.
(b) If any prisoner is injured in the course of his or her
employment while participating in a work or training release program
authorized by chapter 72.65 RCW and is subject to the provisions of
this title, he or she is entitled to payments under this title, subject
to the requirements of chapter 72.65 RCW, unless his or her
participation in the program has been canceled, or unless he or she is
returned to a state correctional institution, as defined in RCW
72.65.010(3), as a result of revocation of parole or new sentence.
(c) If the confined worker has any beneficiaries during the
confinement period during which benefits are canceled under (a) or (b)
of this subsection, they shall be paid directly the monthly benefits
which would have been paid to the worker for himself or herself and the
worker's beneficiaries had the worker not been confined.
(4) Any lump sum benefits to which a worker would otherwise be
entitled but for the provisions of this section shall be paid on a
monthly basis to his or her beneficiaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) Section 8 of this act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2003.
(2) Sections 1 through 7 and 9 through 16 of this act take effect
October 1, 2003.

--- END ---