BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.24.010 and 1987 c 466 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the responsibility of the state to provide a means for the
identification and preservation of survey points for the description of
common land boundaries in the interest of the people of the state and
for uniform use by all departments and agencies of state government.
There is a necessity for the adoption and maintenance of a system of
permanent reference as to boundary monuments. The department of
natural resources shall be the recognized agency for the establishment
of this system.

Sec. 2 RCW 58.24.020 and 1987 c 466 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of natural resources is designated as the
official agency for surveys and maps. The commissioner of public lands
shall appoint an advisory board of five members, the majority of whom
shall be registered professional engineers or land surveyors, who shall
serve at the pleasure of the commissioner. Members of the board shall
serve without salary but are to receive travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended
while actively engaged in the discharge of their duties.
(2) Surveys and maps, including maps of geographic, topographical,
and governmental boundaries, maintained by the department of natural
resources shall be controlling on and adhered to by all departments and
agencies of state government.
(3) This section does not affect surveys and maps recorded or filed
with a county auditor or county assessor's plats under chapter 58.18
RCW.

--- END ---