BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.240 and 2000 c 142 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic breweries; fee to be two
thousand dollars for production of sixty thousand barrels or more of
malt liquor per year.
(2) Any domestic brewery, except for a brand owner of malt
beverages under RCW 66.04.010(5), licensed under this section may also
act as a distributor and/or retailer for beer of its own production.
Any domestic brewery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under
this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws and rules
relating to distributors and/or retailers.
(3) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may contract-produce beer for a brand owner of malt beverages defined under RCW
66.04.010(5), and this contract-production is not a sale for the
purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and 66.28.180.
(4)(a) A domestic brewery licensed under this section and qualified
for a reduced rate of taxation pursuant to RCW 66.24.290(3)(b) may
apply to the board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own
production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying
farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five
dollars.
(b) For each month during which a domestic brewery will sell beer
at a qualifying farmers market, the domestic brewery must provide the
board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at
which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received
by the board before the domestic brewery may offer beer for sale at a
qualifying farmers market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the domestic brewery license for the purpose of this
title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a
domestic brewery. The domestic brewery may not store beer at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the domestic brewery offers bottled beer
for sale. The domestic brewery may not act as a distributor from a
farmers market location.
(e) Before a domestic brewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any domestic brewery with an endorsement approved
under this subsection to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved domestic brewery may sell bottled beer;
and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market
managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify
the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved domestic brewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (4)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation
of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.244 and 1998 c 126 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one
hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of
malt liquor per year.
(2) Any microbrewery license under this section may also act as a
distributor and/or retailer for beer of its own production. Any
microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this
subsection shall comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to
distributors and/or retailers.
(3) The board may issue an endorsement to this license allowing for
on-premises consumption of beer, wine, or both of other manufacture if
purchased from a Washington state-licensed distributor. Each
endorsement shall cost two hundred dollars per year, or four hundred
dollars per year allowing the sale and service of both beer and wine.
(4) The microbrewer obtaining such endorsement must determine, at
the time the endorsement is issued, whether the licensed premises will
be operated either as a tavern with persons under twenty-one years of
age not allowed as provided for in RCW 66.24.330, or as a beer and/or
wine restaurant as described in RCW 66.24.320.
(5)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the
board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars.
(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a
qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the board or
its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title.
The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection (5) do not constitute the tasting or sampling privilege of
a microbrewery. The microbrewery may not store beer at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers bottled beer for
sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor from a farmers
market location.
(e) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved under
this subsection (5) to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled beer; and
(ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers
who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the
locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of the application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation
of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and any additional rules necessary
to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection (5):
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

--- END ---