BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
I. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide local communities more tools to choose their level of public
services and taxes. The legislature recognizes that communities around
the state have different economic environments and one method of
financing local services does not work for all communities. It further
recognizes that in some cases short-term or long-term economic changes
have left communities unable to fund minimum required services by
taxing the local economic base. It also recognizes that some
communities have public safety, human service, or economic development
priorities that are not shared by other communities. It is the intent
of the legislature to provide voters in counties and cities across the
state the tools to shape the destinies of their own communities and to
provide for local priorities. It is further the intent of the
legislature to provide direct financial assistance to counties and
cities that cannot provide basic governmental services without state
assistance.

II. BUSINESS LICENSE TAX PARITY BETWEEN
INCORPORATED AND UNINCORPORATED AREAS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 36.01
RCW to read as follows:
The legislative authority of a county may exercise within the
unincorporated areas within the territorial boundaries of the county
the same authority authorized by general law for any class of city to
fix and collect a license tax for the purposes of revenue and
regulation, upon all occupations and trades, and all and every kind of
business authorized by law. However, this authority does not include
solid waste collection businesses operating under a contract with a
city or town in effect as of the effective date of this act, and for
the duration of that contract.

Sec. 202 RCW 35.21.870 and 1984 c 225 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) No county, city, or town may impose a tax on the privilege
of conducting an electrical energy, natural gas, steam energy, or
telephone business at a rate which exceeds ((six)) eight percent unless
the rate is first approved by a majority of the voters of the county,
city, or town voting on such a proposition.
(((2) If a city or town is imposing a rate of tax under subsection
(1) of this section in excess of six percent on April 20, 1982, the
city or town shall decrease the rate to a rate of six percent or less
by reducing the rate each year on or before November 1st by ordinances
to be effective on January 1st of the succeeding year, by an amount
equal to one-tenth the difference between the tax rate on April 20,
1982, and six percent.
Nothing in this subsection prohibits a city or town from reducing
its rates by amounts greater than the amounts required in this
subsection.
Voter approved rate increases under subsection (1) of this section
shall not be included in the computations under this subsection.))

Sec. 203 RCW 35.58.560 and 1971 ex.s. c 303 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
No ((county or)) city shall have the right to impose a tax upon the
gross revenues derived by a metropolitan municipal corporation from the
operation of a metropolitan sewage disposal, water supply, garbage
disposal or public transportation system.
A metropolitan municipal corporation may credit or offset against
the amount of any tax which is levied by the state during any calendar
year upon the gross revenues derived by such metropolitan municipal
corporation from the performance of any authorized function, the amount
of any expenditures made from such gross revenues by such metropolitan
municipal corporation during the same calendar year or any year prior
to May 21, 1971 in planning for or performing the function of
metropolitan public transportation and including interest on any moneys
advanced for such purpose from other funds and to the extent of such
credit a metropolitan municipal corporation may expend such revenues
for such purposes.
A metropolitan municipal corporation authorized to perform the
function of metropolitan public transportation and engaged in the
operation of an urban passenger transportation system shall receive a
refund of the amount of the motor vehicle fuel tax levied by the state
and paid on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel used, whether such
vehicle fuel tax has been paid either directly to the vendor from whom
the motor vehicle fuel was purchased or indirectly by adding the amount
of such tax to the price of such fuel: PROVIDED, That no refunds
authorized by this section shall be granted on fuel used by any urban
transportation vehicle on any trip where any portion of said trip is
more than six road miles beyond the corporate limits of the
metropolitan municipal corporation in which said trip originated.

III. COUNTYWIDE LOCAL REVENUE OPTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A county may, subject to voter approval, set and impose a sales
and use tax not to exceed two-tenths of one percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax, or the value of the article used in
the case of a use tax. The tax authorized in this section shall be in
addition to any other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within such
county.
(2) Money received from a countywide sales and use tax imposed
under this section shall be distributed between the county and the
cities according to the following formula unless otherwise agreed to by
the county and the cities in an interlocal agreement:
(a) Forty percent to the county;
(b) Forty percent to the cities within the county based ratably on
population; and
(c) Twenty percent to the county to be expended exclusively for
unincorporated services.
(3) If a county does not impose a sales and use tax under this
section, any city within the county may, subject to voter approval, set
and impose the local option sales and use tax authorized under this
section within the boundaries of the city. In the event that the
county later imposes a countywide local option sales and use tax under
this section, the tax imposed by the city shall be reduced such that
the combined rate of the tax imposed by the city and county shall not
exceed two-tenths of one percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 84.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A county or city may impose additional regular property tax
levies when specifically authorized to do so by a majority of the
voters of the taxing district voting on a ballot proposition
authorizing the levies. A ballot proposition authorizing a levy under
this section must conform with RCW 29.30.111. A proposition
authorizing the tax levies under this section shall not be submitted by
a county or city more than twice in any twelve-month period.
(2) The levies may be imposed for an amount up to:
(a) Twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of
property in the city in the case of a levy by a city; and
(b) Ten cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of property in
the county in the case of a levy by a county.
(3) A county unincorporated service area may impose regular annual
property tax levies in an amount equal to twenty-five cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value of property in the county
unincorporated service area when specifically authorized to do so by a
majority of the voters of the service area voting on a ballot
proposition authorizing the levies. A ballot proposition authorizing
a levy under this section must conform with RCW 29.30.111. A
proposition authorizing the tax levies under this section shall not be
submitted by a county unincorporated service area more than twice in
any twelve-month period.
(4) A levy under this section may be imposed for a specific number
of years or permanently. The duration of the levy shall be specified
in the ballot proposition. If the duration of a levy is not specified
in the ballot proposition, the levy shall be imposed for one year.
(5) A ballot proposition authorizing a levy under this section may
be submitted to voters by a county, county unincorporated service area,
and city at the same election.
(6) In the event a county, county unincorporated service area, or
city levying property taxes, which in combination with property taxes
levied by other taxing districts subject to the limitations provided in
RCW 84.52.043 and 84.52.050, exceeds these limitations, the levy of the
county, county unincorporated service area, or city shall be reduced or
eliminated consistent with RCW 84.52.010.
(7) If a ballot proposition approved under subsection (1) or (3) of
this section did not impose the maximum allowable levy amount
authorized for the taxing district under this section, any future
increase up to the maximum allowable levy amount must be specifically
authorized by the voters in accordance with subsection (1) or (3) of
this section at a general or special election.
(8) If a ballot proposition approved under subsection (1) or (3) of
this section provided that the levy would be for a specific number of
years, the taxing district may replace the levy with a permanent levy
when authorized by the voters in accordance with subsection (1) or (3)
of this section at a general or special election.
(9) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first
levy imposed under this section by a county, county unincorporated
service area, or city following the approval of the levies by the
voters under subsections (1) and (3) of this section.

Sec. 303 RCW 84.52.043 and 1995 c 99 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named shall be as follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a)
The levy by the state shall not exceed three dollars and ((sixty))
twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to
the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed
by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the
support of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not
exceed one dollar and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value, or one dollar and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value if the county imposes a levy under section 302 of this act; (c)
the levy by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; ((and)) (d) the
regular voted levy by any county unincorporated service area shall not
exceed twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (e)
the levy by any city ((or town)) shall not exceed three dollars and
thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value,
or three dollars and sixty-two and one-half cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value if the city imposes a levy under section 302 of this
act; and (f) the levy by any town shall not exceed three dollars and
thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value.
However any county is hereby authorized to increase its levy from one
dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for
general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and any
road district within the county do not exceed four dollars and five
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing
district has its levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.
Any county imposing a levy under section 302 of this act is authorized
to increase its levy from one dollar and ninety cents to a rate not to
exceed two dollars and fifty-seven and one-half cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value for general county purposes if the total
levies for both the county and any road district within the county do
not exceed four dollars and fifteen cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as a
result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, shall not exceed ((five)) six
dollars and ((ninety)) twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing districts" includes all
taxing districts other than the state, counties, county unincorporated
service areas, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law
by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; and
(f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are
protected under RCW 84.52.120.

Sec. 304 RCW 84.52.010 and 2002 c 248 s 15 and 2002 c 88 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
unincorporated service area, county road district, and city or town
purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding
the limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take
precedence over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any
purpose other than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of
the levies imposed under RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the
levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW
84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined rate of regular property tax
levies that are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these levies
shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the
combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the
one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair
value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230,
84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that
is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value,
shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall
be eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate of regular property tax
levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under
RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, library
districts, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the first fifty
cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for public
hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced
on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated.
In determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any
property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in that section, the
assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy, as apportioned to the
county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW 84.48.080
without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec. 305 RCW 84.52.065 and 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
Subject to the limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state
shall levy for collection in the following year for the support of
common schools of the state a tax of three dollars and ((sixty))
twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value upon the
assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted to
the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed
by the state department of revenue.
As used in this section, "the support of common schools" includes
the payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued for capital
construction projects for the common schools.

Sec. 306 RCW 29.30.111 and 1999 c 224 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
the regular property tax levies authorized in RCW 36.69.145, 67.38.130,
((or)) 84.52.069, or section 302 of this act shall contain in substance
the following:
"Shall the . . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose regular property tax levies of . . . . . . (insert
the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
for each of . . . . . . (insert the maximum number of years allowable)
consecutive years?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
Each voter shall indicate either "Yes" or "No" on his or her ballot
in accordance with the procedures established under this title.
(2) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
a permanent regular tax levy under RCW 84.52.069 or section 302 of this
act shall contain the following:
"Shall the . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose a PERMANENT regular property levy of . . . . .
(insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

IV. COUNTY UNINCORPORATED SERVICE AREAS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1) Any county shall have the power to
create a county unincorporated service area for any purpose specified
in the county ordinance or resolution. The county legislative
authority shall, by resolution, order an election of the voters of the
proposed county unincorporated service area to determine if the service
area shall be formed. The county legislative authority shall in their
resolution direct the county auditor to set the election to be held at
the next general election or at a special election held for such
purpose; describe the purposes of the proposed service area; and order
that notice of the election be published in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county at least twice prior to the election date.
(2) A county unincorporated service area shall be a quasi-municipal
corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing
district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution.
(3) A county unincorporated service area shall constitute a body
corporate and shall possess all the usual powers of a corporation for
public purposes including, but not limited to, the authority to hire
employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to accept and
expend or use gifts, grants, and donations, and to sue and be sued as
well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically
conferred by statute.
(4) The county legislative authority shall be the governing body of
a county unincorporated service area. The county treasurer shall act
as the ex officio treasurer of the county unincorporated service area.
The electors of a county unincorporated service area are all registered
voters residing within the service area.
(5) A county unincorporated service area shall consist solely of
all the unincorporated areas of the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A proposition to form a county
unincorporated service area shall be submitted to the voters of the
proposed service area. Upon approval by a majority of the voters
voting on the proposition, a county unincorporated service area shall
be established. The proposition submitted to the voters by the county
auditor on the ballot shall be in substantially the following form:

FORMATION OF COUNTY UNINCORPORATED SERVICE AREA

Shall a county unincorporated service area be established in
the unincorporated area of the county for the purpose of
. . . . . . .

Yes . . . . . No . . . . .

V. DIRECT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 The sum of twenty-five million dollars is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the general
fund to the department of community, trade, and economic development to
provide direct financial assistance to counties and cities that cannot
provide basic governmental services without state assistance.

VI. OTHER PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Sections 401 and 402 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 Section 302 of this act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2004 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---