BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the community and
technical colleges offer quality, cost-effective instructional programs
to the citizens of the state. The legislature also finds that an
experienced, educated faculty, up-to-date in respective disciplines and
effective teaching techniques is vital to the quality of instruction.
The legislature further finds that a system of compensation for all
academic employees that recognizes experience, education, and
continuing professional development will foster quality teaching
throughout the faculty ranks. It is the intent of the legislature that
state appropriations be adjusted to an amount which, together with
faculty turnover savings, provides for a fair and equitable funding of
faculty salary increments for both part-time and full-time faculty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Community and technical college boards of trustees shall award
faculty salary increments based on local agreements developed under
chapter 28B.52 RCW. Each biennium, the state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit in its biennial budget request an
amount of funds, which together with faculty turnover savings, is
sufficient to cover the projected costs of increments for the community
and technical college system. It is the intent of the legislature that
the annual cost of salary increments under this subsection, exclusive
of turnover savings, should be funded by legislative appropriation, not
to exceed three percent of the faculty salary base. Upon receipt of a
line item appropriation from the legislature, the state board for
community and technical colleges shall distribute the funds to the
college districts in a fair and equitable manner. Allocation from the
state board for community and technical colleges shall recognize
turnover savings.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
convene a task force comprised of representatives from the state board,
the presidents' organization, the trustees' organization, the
faculties' organization as defined by RCW 28B.52.020(7), as well as the
Washington part-time faculty association, to advise the state board on
guidelines for the fair and equitable distribution of increment funds
to both part-time and full-time faculty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The community and technical college boards of trustees shall
use the collective bargaining process to develop local agreements for
the awarding of part-time faculty increments using the principles in
this subsection.
(a) Part-time faculty salary increments shall be equitable and
comparable to full-time salary schedules. Colleges are encouraged to
allot increments in a manner so as to decrease the disparity between
part-time and full-time faculty pay; in no case may part-time faculty
increments contribute to an increase in the disparity between part-time
and full-time salaries.
(b) When a part-time faculty member is first hired, his or her
prior teaching experience shall be counted in placing him or her at the
appropriate increment step.
(c) Experience gained by part-time faculty at other institutions of
higher learning, including other community and technical colleges,
shall be counted toward moving up the increment scale.
(d) Current part-time faculty shall be placed on any new increment
scale according to prior experience, and in no case shall they receive
a lower salary rate than their current one.
(e) The number of part-time incremental steps should be comparable
to the number of full-time incremental steps, so as to ensure that
long-term part-time faculty remain eligible for moving up the increment
scale.
(2) If local part-time faculty increment scales include a service
component, then the college shall provide equal access for the part-time faculty in their efforts to attain service credits, engage in
professional development, and keep up with their disciplines through
continuing education. If necessary, the colleges shall develop
policies to support part-time faculty in these endeavors, including the
granting of professional leave.
(3) The colleges shall have their part-time salary increment scales
in place within one year of the effective date of this section, and
salary increments shall be awarded to part-time faculty retroactive to
the beginning of fall quarter 2003.

--- END ---