BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the industrial
insurance system administered by the department of labor and industries
should be improved, using methods that meet all of the following goals:
(1) The improvements should treat workers fairly;
(2) The improvements should promote a sound and stable financial
basis for the system; and
(3) The improvements should produce a system that is capable of
being administered efficiently and cost-effectively.

--- END ---