BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040(1)(f), the commission may offer on-line
games in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets occurs more
than once every twenty-four hours.

--- END ---