BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging in this state in the business of
providing staffing services that would otherwise be subject to tax
under RCW 82.04.290(2); as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of .484 percent. If the staffing
activities are conducted both within and without this state, the amount
of tax on such person shall be equal to the apportioned gross income of
the business multiplied by the rate of .484 percent.
(2) The apportioned gross income shall be calculated by multiplying
the apportionable income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the
sum of the property factor, if any, the payroll factor, if any, and the
sales factor, if any, and the denominator of which is three reduced by
the number of factors that have a denominator of zero. The
apportionment factors shall be calculated according to rules adopted by
the department consistent with the principles and concepts contained in
chapter 82.56 RCW but are not required to be identical to those
contained in chapter 82.56 RCW. If the provisions of this section do
not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's business activity in
this state, the taxpayer may petition for or the department may require
the use of an alternative apportionment method, if reasonable, such as
separate accounting, the exclusion of any one or more of the factors,
or the inclusion of one or more additional factors.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Apportionable income" means the gross income of the taxpayer,
which includes but is not limited to all amounts received for providing
the temporary workers, subject to tax under subsection (1) of this
section, less the exemptions and deductions allowable under this
chapter.
(b) "Staffing services" means an arrangement in which the taxpayer
recruits and hires employees from the labor market and assigns them on
a temporary basis to perform services for another to support or
supplement the customer's work force, or to provide assistance in
special work situations such as employee absences, skill shortages, and
seasonal workloads, or to perform special assignments or projects, all
under the direction and supervision of the customer. "Staffing
services" does not include employee leasing or employee placement
services.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.290 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 9 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to those enumerated in RCW
82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250, 82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270,
82.04.298, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2907, ((and)) 82.04.272,
section 1 of this act, and subsection (1) of this section; as to such
persons the amount of tax on account of such activities shall be equal
to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 1.5
percent.
This section includes, among others, and without limiting the scope
hereof (whether or not title to materials used in the performance of
such business passes to another by accession, confusion or other than
by outright sale), persons engaged in the business of rendering any
type of service which does not constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale
at wholesale." The value of advertising, demonstration, and
promotional supplies and materials furnished to an agent by his
principal or supplier to be used for informational, educational and
promotional purposes shall not be considered a part of the agent's
remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to taxation under
this section.

--- END ---