BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this chapter is to:
(1) Serve as standards for implementation of the policy of chapter
90.58 RCW for regulations of uses of the shorelines; and
(2) Provide criteria to local governments and the department in
developing master programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The provisions of this chapter shall apply
state-wide to all shorelines and shorelines of statewide significance
as defined in chapter 90.58 RCW and section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Development" means a use, consisting of the construction or
exterior alteration of structures; dredging; drilling; dumping;
filling; removal of any sand, gravel, or minerals; bulkheading; driving
of piling; placing of obstructions; or any project of a permanent or
temporary nature which interferes with the normal public use of the
surface of the waters overlying lands subject to chapter 90.58 RCW at
any state of water level.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(4) "Extreme low tide" means the lowest line on the land reached by
a receding tide.
(5) "Guidelines" means those standards adopted to implement the
policy of this chapter for regulation of use of the shorelines of the
state prior to adoption of master programs. Such standards shall also
provide criteria to local governments and the department in developing
master programs.
(6) "Hearings board" means the shorelines hearings board
established under chapter 90.58 RCW.
(7) "Local government" means any county, incorporated city, or town
that contains within its boundaries any lands or waters subject to
chapter 90.58 RCW.
(8) "Master program" means the comprehensive use plan for a
described area, and the use regulations, together with maps, diagrams,
charts, or other descriptive material and text, a statement of desired
goals and standards developed in accordance with the policies
enunciated in RCW 90.58.020.
(9) "Ordinary high-water mark" means the mark on all lakes,
streams, and tidal waters, which will be found by examining the beds
and banks and ascertaining where the presence and action of waters are
so common and usual, and so long continued in all ordinary years, as to
mark upon the soil a character distinct from that of the abutting
upland, in respect to vegetation, as that condition exists on June 1,
1971, as it may naturally change thereafter, or as it may change
thereafter in accordance with permits issued by a local government or
the department. In any area where the ordinary high-water mark cannot
be found, the ordinary high-water mark adjoining salt water shall be
the line of mean higher high tide and the ordinary high-water mark
adjoining fresh water shall be the line of mean high water.
(10) "Permit" means that required by chapter 90.58 RCW for
substantial development on shorelines, to be issued by the local
government entity having administrative jurisdiction and subject to
review by the department and the attorney general.
(11) "Shorelines" means all of the water areas of the state,
including reservoirs, and their associated wetlands, together with the
lands underlying them, except:
(a) Shorelines of statewide significance;
(b) Shorelines on segments of streams upstream of a point where the
mean annual flow is twenty cubic feet per second or less, and the
wetlands associated with such upstream segments; and
(c) Shorelines on lakes less than twenty acres in size and wetlands
associated with such small lakes.
(12) "Shorelines of statewide significance" means the following
shorelines of the state:
(a) The area between the ordinary high-water mark and the western
boundary of the state from Cape Disappointment on the south to Cape
Flattery on the north, including harbors, bays, estuaries, and inlets;
(b) Those areas of Puget Sound and adjacent salt waters and the
Strait of Juan de Fuca between the ordinary high-water mark and the
line of extreme low tide as follows:
(i) Nisqually Delta - from DeWolf Bight to Tatsolo Point;
(ii) Birch Bay - from Point Whitehorn to Birch Point;
(iii) Hood Canal - from Tala Point to Foulweather Bluff;
(iv) Skagit Bay and adjacent area - from Brown Point to Yokeko
Point; and
(v) Padilla Bay - from March Point to William Point;
(c) Those areas of Puget Sound and the Strait of Juan de Fuca and
adjacent salt waters north to the Canadian line and lying seaward from
the line of extreme low tide;
(d) Those lakes, whether natural, artificial, or a combination
thereof, with a surface acreage of one thousand acres or more, measured
at the ordinary high-water mark;
(e) Those natural rivers or segments thereof, as follows:
(i) Any west of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the mean annual flow is measured at one thousand cubic feet
per second or more;
(ii) Any east of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the annual flow is measured at two hundred cubic feet per
second or more, or those portions of rivers east of the crest of the
Cascade range downstream from the first three hundred square miles of
drainage area, whichever is longer;
(f) Those wetlands associated with (a), (b), (d), and (e) of this
subsection.
(13) "Shorelines of the state" means the total of all shorelines
and shorelines of statewide significance within the state.
(14) "State master program" means the cumulative total of all
master programs approved or adopted by the department.
(15) "Substantial development" means any development of which the
total cost or fair market value exceeds five thousand dollars, or any
development which materially interferes with the normal public use of
the water or shorelines of the state. The dollar threshold established
in this subsection must be adjusted for inflation by the office of
financial management every five years, beginning July 1, 2007, based
upon changes in the consumer price index during that time period.
"Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor and statistics, United States department of labor. The office of
financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold and
transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in the
Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect. The following shall not be considered
substantial developments for the purpose of this chapter:
(a) Normal maintenance or repair of existing structures or
developments, including damage by accident, fire, or elements;
(b) Construction of the normal protective bulkhead common to single
family residences;
(c) Emergency construction necessary to protect property from
damage by the elements;
(d) Construction and practices normal or necessary for farming,
irrigation, and ranching activities, including agricultural service
roads and utilities on shorelands, and the construction and maintenance
of irrigation structures including but not limited to head gates,
pumping facilities, and irrigation channels. A feedlot of any size,
all processing plants, other activities of a commercial nature,
alteration of the contour of the shorelands by leveling or filling
other than that which results from normal cultivation, shall not be
considered normal or necessary farming or ranching activities. A
feedlot shall be an enclosure or facility used or capable of being used
for feeding livestock hay, grain, silage, or other livestock feed, but
shall not include land for growing crops or vegetation for livestock
feeding and/or grazing, nor shall it include normal livestock wintering
operations;
(e) Construction or modification of navigational aids such as
channel markers and anchor buoys;
(f) Construction on shorelands by an owner, lessee, or contract
purchaser of a single family residence for his or her own use or for
the use of his or her family, which residence does not exceed a height
of thirty-five feet above average grade level and which meets all
requirements of the state agency or local government having
jurisdiction thereof, other than requirements imposed pursuant to this
chapter;
(g) Construction of a dock, including a community dock, designed
for pleasure craft only, for the private noncommercial use of the
owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of single and multiple family
residences. This exception applies if either: (i) In salt waters, the
fair market value of the dock does not exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars; or (ii) in fresh waters, the fair market value of the dock
does not exceed ten thousand dollars, but if subsequent construction
having a fair market value exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars
occurs within five years of completion of the prior construction, the
subsequent construction shall be considered a substantial development
for the purpose of this chapter;
(h) Operation, maintenance, or construction of canals, waterways,
drains, reservoirs, or other facilities that now exist or are hereafter
created or developed as a part of an irrigation system for the primary
purpose of making use of system waters, including return flow and
artificially stored ground water for the irrigation of lands;
(i) The marking of property lines or corners on state owned lands,
when such marking does not significantly interfere with normal public
use of the surface of the water;
(j) Operation and maintenance of any system of dikes, ditches,
drains, or other facilities existing on September 8, 1975, which were
created, developed, or utilized primarily as a part of an agricultural
drainage or diking system;
(k) Site exploration and investigation activities that are
prerequisite to preparation of an application for development
authorization under this chapter, if:
(i) The activity does not interfere with the normal public use of
the surface waters;
(ii) The activity will have no significant adverse impact on the
environment including, but not limited to, fish, wildlife, fish or
wildlife habitat, water quality, and aesthetic values;
(iii) The activity does not involve the installation of a
structure, and upon completion of the activity the vegetation and land
configuration of the site are restored to conditions existing before
the activity;
(iv) A private entity seeking development authorization under this
section first posts a performance bond or provides other evidence of
financial responsibility to the local jurisdiction to ensure that the
site is restored to preexisting conditions; and
(v) The activity is not subject to the permit requirements of RCW
90.58.550;
(l) The process of removing or controlling an aquatic noxious weed,
as defined in RCW 17.26.020, through the use of an herbicide or other
treatment methods applicable to weed control that are recommended by a
final environmental impact statement published by the department of
agriculture or the department jointly with other state agencies under
chapter 43.21C RCW.
(16) "Wetlands" or "wetland areas" means areas that are inundated
or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and
duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do
support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in
saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes,
bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial
wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but
not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales,
canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm
ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1,
1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction
of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial
wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas to mitigate the
conversion of wetlands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) The master program is to be developed
by local government to provide an objective guide for regulating the
use of shorelines. The master program should clearly state local
policies for the development of shorelands and indicate how these
policies relate to the goals of the local citizens and to specific
regulations of uses affecting the physical development of land and
water resources throughout the local governments' jurisdiction.
The master program developed by each local government will reflect
the unique shoreline conditions and the development requirements which
exist and are projected in that area. As part of the process of master
program development, local governments can identify problems and seek
solutions which best satisfy their needs.
(b) A master program, is general, comprehensive, and long range in
order to be applicable to the whole area for a reasonable length of
time under changing conditions.
(i) "General" means that the policies, proposals, and guidelines
are not directed towards any specific sites.
(ii) "Comprehensive" means that the program is directed towards all
land and water uses, their impact on the environment and logical
estimates of future growth. It also means that the program shall
recognize plans and programs of the other government units, adjacent
jurisdictions, and private developers.
(iii) "Long range" means that the program is to be directed at
least twenty years into the future, look beyond immediate issues, and
follow creative objectives rather than a simple projection of current
trends and conditions.
(c) Finally, chapter 90.58 RCW requires that the master program
shall constitute use regulations for the various shorelines of the
state. Specific guidelines are outlined in RCW 90.58.100(1) for
preparing the master programs to accomplish this purpose. It is the
intention of these guidelines, especially those related to citizen
involvement and the inventory, to aid in carrying out RCW 90.58.100.
(2) To facilitate an effective implementation of chapter 90.58 RCW
throughout the state, the procedures in this chapter shall be observed
while developing master programs for the shorelines. Exceptions to
some of the specific provisions of these guidelines may occur where
unique circumstances justify such departure. Any departure from these
guidelines must, however, be compatible with the intent of chapter
90.58 RCW as enunciated in RCW 90.58.020. Further, in all cases, local
governments must meet the master program requirements specified in
chapter 90.58 RCW.
(3) Citizen involvement. While public involvement and notification
is required of the master program at the time of adoption by chapter
90.58 RCW, the general public must be involved in the initial planning
stage during formulation of the master plan.
Chapter 90.58 RCW requires that prior to approval or adoption of a
master program, or a portion thereof, by the department, at least one
public hearing shall be held in each county affected by the program for
the purpose of obtaining the views and comments of the public.
Chapter 90.58 RCW charges the state and local government with not
only the responsibility of making reasonable efforts to inform the
people of the state about the shoreline management program, but also
actively encourages participation by all persons, private groups, and
entities, which have an interest in shoreline management.
To meet these responsibilities, the local government agencies
responsible for the development of the master program should establish
a method for obtaining and utilizing citizen involvement. The extent
of citizen involvement in the formulation of the master program will be
considered by the department in the review of the program. A failure
by the local government to encourage and utilize citizen involvement,
or to justify not having done so, may be noted as a failure to comply
with chapter 90.58 RCW.
Though the department recognizes various forms of citizen
involvement as viable approaches for involving the public in the master
program, the local government will be encouraged to utilize the method
as suggested in these guidelines. If a local government does not
follow these guidelines, it should provide an explanation of the method
used. The department will be available to explain and help organize
the suggested approach to citizen involvement upon request.
The suggested approach to citizen involvement to be utilized by the
local government agency responsible for the development of the master
program includes the following:
(a) Appoint a citizen advisory committee whose function will be to
guide the formulation of the master program through a series of public
evening meetings and at least one public hearing. The committee
members should represent both commercial interests as well as
environmentalists. However, the advisory committee itself is not to be
a substitute for general citizen involvement and input. The aim of the
committee will be to utilize citizen input in:
(i) Studying existing public policies related to shorelines;
(ii) Defining the needs to satisfy local demands for shorelines;
(iii) Studying the type and condition of local shorelines relative
to needs;
(iv) Developing goals and policies for the master program with the
local government fulfilling the specifications of the master program,
including designation of the environments;
(v) Identifying use conflicts;
(vi) Proposing alternatives for the use of shorelines;
(vii) Examining the effects of the master program on the
environment.
(b) The citizen advisory committee should hold at least three
public meetings during development of the master program and
designation of the environments according to the following guidelines:
(i) Public notice must be provided seven days prior to the evening
meeting.
(ii) All meetings must be open to the public for free discussion.
(iii) Meetings should be held in the evening at a location
accessible to the general public.
(iv) Record of all meetings should be filed with the local
government and made available to the public.
(v) Local government should provide resource persons to assist in
the preparation, organization, and diffusion of information.
(vi) The final evening meeting should be held at least seven days
prior to the public hearing.
(c) A newsletter should be published by the advisory committee in
cooperation with the local government.
(i) The information sheet should be available to the public at
posted locations.
(ii) It should be available after the first evening public meeting
and prior to the second.
(iii) The date, time, and location of future meetings and hearings
should be stated.
(iv) A phone number should be provided to obtain further
information.
(v) Public notice should be made of the availability of the
newsletter as stated in (d) of this subsection.
(d) Publicity of the master program should utilize:
(i) Public notice postings as per (i) of this subsection;
(ii) Newsletter;
(iii) Radio, television, and local news media;
(iv) A local paper of general circulation;
(v) Announcements to community groups.
(e) At least one public hearing should be held by the local
government after the three public meetings have been held to discuss
the proposed master plan.
(i) Public notice must be made a minimum of once in each of three
weeks immediately preceding the hearing in one or more newspapers of
general circulation in the area in which the hearing is to be held.
(ii) The master program should be available for public inspection
at the local government office and available upon request at least
seven days prior to the public hearing.
(f) Prior to adoption of the master program, all reasonable
attempts should have been made to obtain a general concurrence of the
public and the advisory committee. The method of obtaining or
measuring concurrence must be established by the local government and
must provide a clear indication of how citizen input is utilized.
(g) If the level of concurrence on the master program is not
considered adequate by the advisory committee at the conclusion of the
public hearing, the local government should hold subsequent public
meetings and public hearings until such time as adequate concurrence as
per (f) of this subsection is reached.
(h) Attached to the master program upon its submission to the
department shall be a record of public meetings and citizen
involvement. A discussion of the use of citizen involvement and
measurement on concurrence should be included.
(i) Public notice shall include:
(i) Reference to the authority under which the rule is proposed;
(ii) A statement of either the terms or substance of the proposed
rule or a description of the subjects and issues involved;
(iii) The time, place, and manner in which interested persons may
present their views thereon, as stated in RCW 34.05.320.
(4) Policy statements. Each local government shall submit policy
statements, developed through the citizen involvement process,
regarding shoreline development as part of its master program. Because
goal statements are often too general to be useful to very specific
decision problems, the policy statements are to provide a bridge for
formulating and relating use regulations to the goals also developed
through the citizen involvement process. In summary, the policy
statements must reflect the intent of chapter 90.58 RCW, the goals of
the local citizens, and specifically relate the shoreline management
goals to the master program use regulations.
Clearly stated policies are essential to the viability of the
master programs. The policy statements will not only support the
environmental designations explained below, but, also being more
specific than goal statements, will provide an indication of needed
environmental designations and use regulations.
The following methodology for developing policy statements is
recommended:
(a) Obtain a broad citizen input in developing policy by involving
interested citizens and all private and public entities having interest
or responsibilities relating to shorelines. Form a citizen advisory
committee and conduct public meetings as outlined in subsection (3) of
this section to encourage citizens to become involved in developing a
master program;
(b) Analyze existing policies to identify those policies that may
be incorporated into the master program and those which conflict with
the intent of chapter 90.58 RCW. Further, identify constraints to
local planning and policy implementation which are a result of previous
government actions, existing land-use patterns, actions of adjacent
jurisdictions, or other factors not subject to local control or
influence;
(c) Formulate goals for the use of shoreline areas and develop
policies to guide shoreline activities to achieve these goals.
The policies should be consistent with RCW 90.58.020 and provide
guidance and support to local government actions regarding shoreline
management. Additionally, the policies should express the desires of
local citizens and be based on principles of resource management which
reflect the statewide public interest in all shorelines of statewide
significance.
(5) Master program elements. Consistent with the general nature of
master programs, the following land and water use elements are to be
dealt with, when appropriate, in the local master programs. By dealing
with shoreline uses, systematically as belonging to these generic
classes of activities, the policies and goals in the master programs
can be clearly applied to different shoreline uses. In the absence of
this kind of specificity in the master programs, the application of
policy and use regulations could be inconsistent and arbitrary.
The plan elements are:
(a) Economic development element for the location and design of
industries, transportation facilities, port facilities, tourist
facilities, and commercial and other developments that are particularly
dependent on shoreland locations;
(b) Public access element for assessing the need for providing
public access to shoreline areas;
(c) Circulation element for assessing the location and extent of
existing and proposed major thoroughfares, transportation routes,
terminals, and other public facilities and correlating those facilities
with the shoreline use elements;
(d) Recreational element for the preservation and expansion of
recreational opportunities through programs of acquisition,
development, and various means of less-than-fee acquisition;
(e) Shoreline use element for considering:
(i) The pattern of distribution and location requirements of land
uses on shorelines and adjacent areas, including, but not limited to,
housing, commerce, industry, transportation, public buildings and
utilities, agriculture, education, and natural resources;
(ii) The pattern of distribution and location requirements of water
uses including, but not limited to, aquaculture, recreation, and
transportation;
(f) Conservation element for the preservation of the natural
shoreline resources, considering such characteristics as scenic vistas,
parkways, estuarine areas for fish and wildlife protection, beaches,
and other valuable natural or aesthetic features;
(g) Historical/cultural element for protection and restoration of
buildings, sites, and areas having historic cultural, educational, or
scientific values;
(h) In addition to the above-described elements, local governments
are encouraged to include in their master programs, an element
concerned with the restoration of areas to a natural useful condition
which are blighted by abandoned and dilapidated structures. Local
governments are also encouraged to include in their master programs any
other elements, which, because of present uses or future needs, are
deemed appropriate and necessary to effectuate chapter 90.58 RCW.
(6) Environments. In order to plan and effectively manage
shoreline resources, a system of categorizing shoreline areas is
required for use by local governments in the preparation of master
programs. The system is designed to provide a uniform basis for
applying policies and use regulations within distinctively different
shoreline areas. To accomplish this, the environmental designation to
be given any specific area is to be based on the existing development
pattern, the biophysical capabilities and limitations of the shoreline
being considered for development, and the goals and aspirations of
local citizenry.
The recommended system classifies shorelines into four distinct
environments, natural, conservancy, rural, and urban, which provide the
framework for implementing shoreline policies and regulatory measures.
This system is designed to encourage uses in each environment which
enhance the character of that environment. At the same time, local
government may place reasonable standards and restrictions on
development so that such development does not disrupt or destroy the
character of the environment.
The basic intent of this system is to utilize performance standards
which regulate use activities in accordance with goals and objectives
defined locally rather than to exclude any use from any one
environment. Thus, the particular uses or type of developments placed
in each environment must be designed and located so that there are no
effects detrimental to achieving the objectives of the environment
designations and local development criteria.
This approach provides an "umbrella" environment class over local
planning and zoning on the shorelines. Since every area is endowed
with different resources, has different intensity of development, and
attaches different social values to these physical and economic
characteristics, the environment designations should not be regarded as
a substitute for local planning and land-use regulations.
(a) The basic concept for using the system is for local governments
to designate their shorelines into environment categories that reflect
the natural character of the shoreline areas and the goals for use of
characteristically different shorelines. The determination as to which
designation should be given any specific area should be made in the
following manner:
(i) The resources of the shoreline areas should be analyzed for
their opportunities and limitations for different uses. Completion of
the comprehensive inventory of resources is a requisite to identifying
resource attributes which determine these opportunities and
limitations.
(ii) Each of the plan elements should be analyzed for their effect
on the various resources throughout shoreline areas. Since shorelines
are only a part of the system of resources within local jurisdiction,
it is particularly important that planning for shorelines be considered
an integral part of area-wide planning. Further, plans, policies, and
regulations for lands adjacent to the shorelines of the state should be
reviewed in accordance with RCW 90.58.340.
(iii) Public desires should be considered through the citizen
involvement process to determine which environment designations reflect
local values and aspirations for the development of different shoreline
areas.
(b) The management objectives and features which characterize each
of the environments are given below to provide a basis for environment
designation within local jurisdictions.
(i) Natural environment. The natural environment is intended to
preserve and restore those natural resource systems existing relatively
free of human influence. Local policies to achieve this objective
should aim to regulate all potential developments degrading or changing
the natural characteristics which make these areas unique and valuable.
The main emphasis of regulation in these areas should be on natural
systems and resources which require severe restrictions of intensities
and types of uses to maintain them in a natural state. Therefore,
activities which may degrade the actual or potential value of this
environment should be strictly regulated. Any activity which would
bring about a change in the existing situation would be desirable only
if such a change would contribute to the preservation of the existing
character.
The primary determinant for designating an area as a natural
environment is the actual presence of some unique natural or cultural
features considered valuable in their natural or original condition
which are relatively intolerant of intensive human use. Such features
should be defined, identified, and quantified in the shoreline
inventory. The relative value of the resources is to be based on local
citizen opinion and the needs and desires of other people in the rest
of the state.
(ii) Conservancy environment. The objective in designating a
conservancy environment is to protect, conserve, and manage existing
natural resources and valuable historic and cultural areas in order to
ensure a continuous flow of recreational benefits to the public and to
achieve sustained resource utilization.
The conservancy environment is for those areas which are intended
to maintain their existing character. The preferred uses are those
which are nonconsumptive of the physical and biological resources of
the area. Nonconsumptive uses are those uses which can utilize
resources on a sustained yield basis while minimally reducing
opportunities for other future uses of the resources in the area.
Activities and uses of a nonpermanent nature which do not substantially
degrade the existing character of an area are appropriate uses for a
conservancy environment. Examples of uses that might be predominant in
a conservancy environment include diffuse outdoor recreation
activities, timber harvesting on a sustained yield basis, passive
agricultural uses such as pasture and range lands, and other related
uses and activities.
The designation of conservancy environments should seek to satisfy
the needs of the community as to the present and future location of
recreational areas proximate to concentrations of population, either
existing or projected. For example, a conservancy environment
designation can be used to complement city, county, or state plans to
legally acquire public access to the water.
The conservancy environment would also be the most suitable
designation for those areas which present too severe biophysical
limitations to be designated as rural or urban environments. Such
limitations would include areas of steep slopes presenting erosion and
slide hazards, areas prone to flooding, and areas which cannot provide
adequate water supply or sewage disposal.
(iii) Rural environment. The rural environment is intended to
protect agricultural land from urban expansion, restrict intensive
development along undeveloped shorelines, function as a buffer between
urban areas, and maintain open spaces and opportunities for
recreational uses compatible with agricultural activities.
The rural environment is intended for those areas characterized by
intensive agricultural and recreational uses and those areas having a
high capability to support active agricultural practices and intensive
recreational development. Hence, those areas that are already used for
agricultural purposes, or which have agricultural potential should be
maintained for present and future agricultural needs. Designation of
rural environments should also seek to alleviate pressures of urban
expansion on prime farming areas.
New developments in a rural environment are to reflect the
character of the surrounding area by limiting residential density,
providing permanent open space, and maintaining adequate building
setbacks from water to prevent shoreline resources from being destroyed
for other rural types of uses.
Public recreation facilities for public use which can be located
and designed to minimize conflicts with agricultural activities are
recommended for the rural environment. Linear water access which will
prevent overcrowding in any one area, trail systems for safe
nonmotorized traffic along scenic corridors, and provisions for
recreational viewing of water areas illustrate some of the ways to
ensure maximum enjoyment of recreational opportunities along shorelines
without conflicting with agricultural uses. In a similar fashion,
agricultural activities should be conducted in a manner which will
enhance the opportunities for shoreline recreation. Farm management
practices which prevent erosion and subsequent siltation of water
bodies and minimize the flow of waste material into water courses are
to be encouraged by the master program for rural environments.
(iv) Urban environment. The objective of the urban environment is
to ensure optimum utilization of shorelines within urbanized areas by
providing for intensive public use and by managing development so that
it enhances and maintains shorelines for a multiplicity of urban uses.
The urban environment is an area of high-intensity land use
including residential, commercial, and industrial development. The
environment does not necessarily include all shorelines within an
incorporated city, but is particularly suitable to those areas
presently subjected to extremely intensive use pressure, as well as
areas planned to accommodate urban expansion. Shorelines planned for
future urban expansion should present few biophysical limitations for
urban activities and not have a high priority for designation as an
alternative environment.
Because shorelines suitable for urban uses are a limited resource,
emphasis should be given to development within already developed areas
and particularly to water-dependent industrial and commercial uses
requiring frontage on navigable waters.
In the master program, priority is also to be given to planning for
public visual and physical access to water in the urban environment.
Identifying needs and planning for the acquisition of urban land for
permanent public access to the water in the urban environment should be
accomplished in the master program. To enhance waterfront and ensure
maximum public use, industrial and commercial facilities should be
designed to permit pedestrian waterfront activities. Where
practicable, various access points ought to be linked to nonmotorized
transportation routes, such as bicycle and hiking paths.
(7) Shorelines of statewide significance. Chapter 90.58 RCW
designated certain shorelines as shorelines of statewide significance.
Shorelines thus designated are important to the entire state. Because
these shorelines are major resources from which all people in the state
derive benefit, the guidelines and master programs must give preference
to uses which favor public and long-range goals.
Accordingly, chapter 90.58 RCW established that local master
programs shall give preference to uses which meet the principles
outlined below in order of preference. Guidelines for ensuring that
these principles are incorporated into the master programs and adhered
to in implementing chapter 90.58 RCW follow each principle.
(a) Recognize and protect the statewide interest over local
interest. Development guidelines:
(i) Solicit comments and opinions from groups and individuals
representing statewide interests by circulating proposed master
programs for review and comment by state agencies, adjacent
jurisdictions' citizen advisory committees, and statewide interest
groups;
(ii) Recognize and take into account state agencies' policies,
programs, and recommendations in developing use regulations;
(iii) Solicit comments, opinions, and advice from individuals with
expertise in ecology, oceanography, geology, limnology, aquaculture,
and other scientific fields pertinent to shoreline management. Names
of organizations and individuals which can provide expert advice can be
obtained from the department's resource specialist listing;
(b) Preserve the natural character of the shoreline. Development
guidelines:
(i) Designate environments and use regulations to minimize man-made
intrusions on shorelines;
(ii) Where intensive development already occurs, upgrade and
redevelop those areas to reduce their adverse impact on the environment
and to accommodate future growth rather than allowing high-intensity
uses to extend into low-intensity use or underdeveloped areas;
(iii) Ensure that where commercial timber cutting is allowed as
provided in RCW 90.58.150, reforestation will be possible and
accomplished as soon as practicable;
(c) Result in long-term over short-term benefit. Development
guidelines:
(i) Prepare master programs on the basis of preserving the
shorelines for future generations. For example, actions that would
convert resources into irreversible uses or detrimentally alter natural
conditions characteristic of shorelines of statewide significance,
should be severely limited;
(ii) Evaluate the short-term-economic gain or convenience of
developments in relationship to long-term and potentially costly
impairments to the natural environment;
(iii) Actively promote aesthetic considerations when contemplating
new development, redevelopment of existing facilities, or for the
general enhancement of shoreline areas;
(d) Protect the resources and ecology of shorelines. Development
guidelines:
(i) Leave undeveloped those areas which contain a unique or fragile
natural resource;
(ii) Prevent erosion and sedimentation that would alter the natural
function of the water system. In areas where erosion and sediment
control practices will not be effective, excavations or other
activities which increase erosion are to be severely limited;
(iii) Restrict or prohibit public access onto areas which cannot be
maintained in a natural condition under human uses;
(e) Increase public access to publicly owned areas of the
shorelines. Development guidelines:
(i) In master programs, give priority to developing paths and
trails to shoreline areas, linear access along the shorelines, and to
developing upland parking;
(ii) Locate development inland from the ordinary high-water mark so
that access is enhanced;
(f) Increase recreational opportunities for the public on the
shorelines. Development guidelines:
(i) Plan for and encourage development of facilities for
recreational use of the shorelines;
(ii) Reserve areas for lodging and related facilities on uplands
well away from the shorelines with provisions for nonmotorized access
to the shorelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This section contains brief and general
descriptions of the natural geographic systems around which the
shoreline management program is designed. The intent of this section
is to define those natural systems to which chapter 90.58 RCW applies,
to highlight some of the features of those systems which are
susceptible to damage from human activity, and to provide a basis for
the guidelines pertaining to human-use activities contained in section
6 of this act.
It is intended that this section will provide criteria to local
governments in the development of their master programs, as required in
RCW 90.58.030(3)(a).
(1) Marine beaches. Beaches are relatively level land areas which
are contiguous with the sea and are directly affected by the sea even
to the point of origination. The most common types of beaches in
Washington marine waters are:
(a) Sandy beaches. Waves, wind, tide, and geological material are
the principal factors involved in the formation of beaches. The beach
material can usually be traced to one of four possible sources: The
cliffs behind the beach; from the land via rivers; offshore wind; and
finally from longshore drifting of material. Longshore-drifting
material must have been derived initially from the first three sources.
Most beach material in Puget Sound is eroded from the adjacent bluffs
composed of glacial till.
The effect of wave action on the movement and deposition of beach
material varies depending upon the size of the material. Hence, in
most cases, beaches composed of different sized material are usually
characterized by different slopes and profiles. The entire process of
beach formation is a dynamic process resulting from the effect of wave
action on material transport and deposition. Initially, wave action
will establish currents which transport and deposit material in various
patterns. However, once a particular beach form and profile is
established it begins to modify the effects of waves thus altering the
initial patterns of material transport and deposition. Hence, in
building beach structures such as groins, bulkheads, or jetties, it is
particularly important to recognize that subsequent changes in wave and
current patterns will result in a series of changes in beach formation
over time.
In the process of beach formation, sand particles are transported
up the beach by breaking waves that wash onto the beach in a diagonal
direction and retreat in a vertical direction. At the same time,
longshore currents are created in the submerged intertidal area by the
force of diagonally approaching waves. Beach material suspended by the
force of the breaking waves is transported in one direction or another
by the longshore current. Longshore drifting of material often results
in the net transportation of beach material in one direction causing
the loss of material in some areas and gains in others.
The profile of a beach at any time will be determined by the wave
conditions during the preceding period. Severe storms will erode or
scour much material away from the beaches due to the force of
retreating waves. During calm weather, however, the waves will
constructively move material back onto the beach. This destructive and
constructive action, called cut and fill, is evidenced by the presence
of beach ridges or berms. New ridges are built up in front of those
that survive storm conditions as sand is supplied to the beach in
succeeding phases of calmer weather. In time, the more stable landward
ridges are colonized by successional stages of vegetation. The
vegetation stabilizes the ridges, protects them from erosion, and
promotes the development of soil.
(b) Rocky beaches. Rocky beaches, composed of cobbles, boulders,
and/or exposed bedrock are usually steeper and more stable than sandy
shores. Coarse material is very permeable which allows attacking waves
to sink into the beach causing the backwash to be reduced
correspondingly. On sandy shores a strong backwash distributes sand
more evenly, thus creating a flatter slope.
On rocky shores a zonal pattern in the distribution of plants and
animals is more evident than on muddy or sandy shores. The upper beach
zone is frequently very dry, limiting inhabitants to species which can
tolerate a dry environment. The intertidal zone is a narrow area
between mean low tide and mean high tide that experiences uninterrupted
covering and uncovering by tidal action. One of the major
characteristics of this zone is the occurrence of tidal pools which
harbor separate communities which can be considered subzones within the
intertidal zone. The subtidal zone is characterized by less stressful
tidal influences but is subject to the forces of waves and currents
which affect the distribution and kinds of organisms in this zone.
(c) Muddy shores. Muddy shores occur where the energy of coastal
currents and wave action is minimal, allowing fine particles of silt to
settle to the bottom. The result is an accumulation of mud on the
shores of protected bays and mouths of coastal streams and rivers.
Most muddy beaches occur in estuarine areas. However, some muddy shore
areas may be found in coastal inlets and embayments where salinity is
about the same as the adjacent sea.
Few plants have adapted to living on muddy shores. Their growth is
restricted by turbidity which reduces light penetration into the water
and thereby inhibits photosynthesis. In addition, the lack of solid
structures to which algae may attach itself and siltation which
smothers plants effectively prevents much plant colonization of muddy
shores. While the lack of oxygen in mud makes life for fauna in muddy
shores difficult, the abundance of food as organic detritus provides
nutrition for a large number of detritus feeders.
(2) Spits and bars. Spits and bars are natural formations composed
of sand and gravel and shaped by wind and water currents and littoral
drifting. Generally a spit is formed from a headland beach (tall cliff
with a curved beach at the foot) and extends out into the water (hooks
are simply hookshaped spits). While spits usually have one end free in
open water, bars generally are attached to land at both ends. These
natural forms enclose an area which is protected from wave action,
allowing life forms such as shellfish, to reproduce and live protected
from the violence of the open coast.
(3) Dunes. Dunes are mounds or hills of sand which have been
heaped up by wind action. Typically, dunes exhibit four distinct
features:
(a) Primary dunes. The first system of dunes shoreward of the
water, having little or no vegetation, which are intolerant of
unnatural disturbances;
(b) Secondary dunes. The second system of dunes shoreward from the
water, with some vegetative cover;
(c) Back dunes. The system of dunes behind the secondary dunes,
generally having vegetation and some top soil, and being more tolerant
of development than the primary and secondary systems;
(d) Troughs. The valleys between the dune systems.
Dunes are a natural levee and a final protection line against the
sea. The destructive leveling of, or interference with the primary
dune system (such as cutting through the dunes for access) can endanger
upland areas by subjecting them to flooding from heavy wave action
during severe storms and destroy a distinct and disappearing natural
feature. Removal of sand from the beach and shore in dune areas
starves dunes of their natural supply of sand and may cause their
destruction from lack of sand. Appropriate vegetation can and should
be encouraged throughout the entire system for stabilization.
(4) Islands. An island, broadly defined, is a land mass surrounded
by water. Islands are particularly important to the state of
Washington since two entire counties are made up of islands and parts
of several other counties are islands. A fairly small island, such as
those in our Puget Sound and north coast area, is an intriguing
ecosystem, in that no problem or area of study can be isolated. Every
living and nonliving thing is an integral part of the functioning
system. Each island, along with the mystique afforded it by man, is a
world of its own, with a biological chain, fragile and delicately
balanced. Obviously it does not take as much to upset this balance as
it would the mainland system. Because of this, projects should be
planned with a more critical eye toward preserving the very qualities
which make island environments viable systems as well as aesthetically
captivating to humans.
(5) Estuaries. An estuary is that portion of a coastal stream
influenced by the tide of the marine waters into which it flows and
within which the sea water is measurably diluted with fresh water
derived from land drainage.
Estuaries are zones of ecological transition between fresh and salt
water. The coastal brackish water areas are rich in aquatic life, some
species of which are important food organisms for anadromous fish
species which use these areas for feeding, rearing, and migration. An
estuarine area left untouched by man is rare since historically they
have been the sites for major cities and port developments. Because of
their importance in the food production chain and their natural beauty,
the limited estuarial areas require careful attention in the planning
function. Close scrutiny should be given to all plans for development
in estuaries which reduce the area of the estuary and interfere with
water flow. Special attention should be given to plans for upstream
projects which could deplete the fresh water supply of the estuary.
(6) Marshes, bogs, swamps. Marshes, bogs, and swamps are areas
which have a water table very close to the surface of the ground. They
are areas which were formerly shallow water areas that gradually filled
through nature's processes of sedimentation, often accelerated by man's
activities, and the decay of shallow water vegetation.
Although considered abysmal wastelands by many, these wet areas are
extremely important to the food chain. Many species of both animal and
plant life depend on this wet environment for existence. Birds and
waterfowl choose these locations for nesting places. Wet areas are
important as ground water recharge areas and have tremendous flood
control value.
The high-water table and poor foundation support provided by the
organic soils in these areas usually prevent development on them. The
extraction of peat from bogs is possible when it is accomplished in
such a manner that the surrounding vegetation and wildlife is left
undisturbed and the access roads and shorelines are returned to a
natural state upon completion of the operation.
The potential of marshes, bogs, and swamps to provide permanent
open space in urbanizing regions is high because of the costs involved
in making these areas suitable for use. Unlimited public access into
them, however, may cause damage to the fragile plant and animal life
residing there.
(7) Lakes. A lake can be defined broadly as a body of standing
water located inland. Lakes originate in several ways. Many lakes are
created each year by man, either by digging a lake basin or by damming
a natural valley. Natural lakes can be formed in several ways: By
glaciers gouging basins and melting and depositing materials in such a
way as to form natural dams; by landslides which close off open ends of
valleys; extinct craters which fill with water; changes in the earth's
crust, as can happen during earthquakes, forming basins which fill with
water; or by changes in a river or stream course which isolate parts of
the old course forming lakes, called oxbow lakes.
A lake, like its inhabitants, has a life span. This life span may
be thousands of years for a large lake or just a few years for a pond.
This process of a lake aging is known generally as eutrophication. It
is a natural process which is usually accelerated by man's activities.
Human sewage, industrial waste, and the drainage from agricultural
lands increases the nutrients in a lake which in turn increases the
growth of algae and other plants. As plants die, the chemical process
of decomposition depletes the water's supply of oxygen necessary for
fish and other animal life. These life forms then disappear from the
lake, and the lake becomes a marsh or swamp.
Shallow lakes are extremely susceptible to increases in the rate of
eutrophication resulting from discharges of waste and nutrient-laden
runoff waters. Temperature stratification does not normally occur in
shallow lakes. Efficient bottom-to-surface circulation of water in
these shallow lakes moves nutrients to the surface photosynthetic zone
encouraging increased biotic productivity. Large quantities of organic
matter are produced under these conditions. Upon decomposition, heavy
demands are made on the dissolved oxygen content of shallow lakes.
Eventually, the oxygen level drops and some fish and other life forms
die.
The entire ecosystem of a lake can be altered by man. By removing
the surrounding forest for lumber or to provide a building site or farm
land, erosion into the lake is accelerated. Fertilizers, whether
agricultural or those used by homeowners, can enter the lake either
from runoff or leaching along with other chemicals that interfere with
the intricate balance of living organisms. The construction of
bulkheads to control erosion and filling behind them to enlarge
individual properties can rob small fish and amphibians of their
habitats. The indiscriminate construction of piers, docks and
boathouses, can deprive all of the waterfront owners and the general
public of a serene natural view and reduce the lake's surface.
(8) Rivers, streams, and creeks. Generally, rivers, streams, and
creeks can be defined as surface-water runoff flowing in a natural or
modified channel. Runoff results either from excessive precipitation
which cannot infiltrate the soil, or from ground water where the water
table intersects the surface of the ground. Drawn by gravity to
progressively lower levels and eventually to the sea, the surface
runoff organizes into a system of channels which drain a particular
geographic area.
The drainage system serves as a transportation network for nature's
leveling process, selectively eroding materials from the higher
altitudes and transporting the materials to lower elevations where they
are deposited. A portion of these materials eventually reaches the sea
where they may form beaches, dunes, or spits.
Typically, a river exhibits several distinct stages as it flows
from the headwaters to the mouth. In the upper reaches where the
gradient is steepest, the hydraulic action of the flowing water results
in a net erosion of the stream bed and a V-shaped cross section, with
the stream occupying all or most of the valley floor.
Proceeding downstream, the gradient decreases and the valley walls
become gentler in slope. A point is eventually reached where erosion
and deposition equalize and the action of the stream changes from
vertical cutting to lateral meandering. As the lateral movement
continues, a flood plain is formed, over which the river meanders and
upon which materials are deposited during floods. Finally, when the
river enters a body of standing water, the remaining sediment load is
deposited.
Extensive human use is made of rivers, including transportation,
recreation, waste and sewage dumping, and for drinking water. Rivers
are dammed for the production of electric power, diked for flood
control, and withdrawn for the irrigation of crops. Many of these
activities directly affect the natural hydraulic functioning of the
streams and rivers as well as the biology of the water courses.
(9) Flood plains. A flood plain is a shoreland area which has been
or is subject to flooding. It is a natural corridor for water which
has accumulated from snow melt or from heavy rainfall in a short
period. Flood plains are usually flat areas with rich soil because
they have been formed by deposits from flood waters. As such they are
attractive places for man to build and farm until the next flood passes
across the plain. In certain areas, these plains can be flood proofed
by diking or building levees along the adjacent river or stream, but
always with provisions for tremendous amounts of water that will sooner
or later be generated by weather conditions. Streamway modifications
can be placed in such a way to cause channelization. Channelization
tends to destroy the vital and fragile flood-plain-shoreline habitats
and increase the velocity of waters in times of extreme flow.
This may cause considerable damage downstream even in areas already
given some flood protection. In unprotected flood plains, land-use
regulations must be applied to provide an adequate open corridor within
which the effects of bank erosion, channel shifts, and increased runoff
may be contained. Obviously, structures which must be built on a flood
plain should be of a design to allow the passage of water and, wherever
possible, permanent vegetation should be preserved to prevent erosion,
retard runoff, and contribute to the natural beauty of the flood plain.
(10) Puget Sound. Puget Sound is a complex of interconnected
inlets, bays, and channels with tidal sea water entering from the west
and fresh-water streams entering at many points throughout the system.
Most of what is known as Puget Sound was formed by glacial action that
terminated near Tenino in Thurston county. The entire system, of which
Puget Sound is actually a small portion, also includes the Strait of
Georgia and the Strait of Juan de Fuca. The large complex may be
divided into nine oceanographic areas which are interrelated: Strait
of Juan de Fuca, Admiralty Inlet, Puget Sound Basin, Southern Puget
Sound, Hood Canal, Possession Sound, Bellingham Bay, San Juan
Archipelago, and Georgia Strait.
The economic development of the central Puget Sound Basin has been
stimulated by the fact that the sound is one of the few areas in the
world which provides several deepwater inland harbors. The use of
Puget Sound waters by deep-draft vessels is on the increase due to its
proximity to the developing Asian countries. This increased trade will
attract more industry and more people which will put more use pressure
on the Sound in the forms of recreation (sport fishing, boating, and
other water-related sports) and the requirements for increased food
supply.
Puget Sound waters are rich in nutrients and support a wide variety
of marine fish and shellfish species. An estimated two thousand eight
hundred twenty miles of stream are utilized by anadromous fish for
spawning and rearing throughout the area. Some of these fish are
chinook, coho, sockeye, pink, and chum salmon, steelhead, searun
cutthroat, and Dolly Vardon trout. All these fish spend a portion of
their lives in the salt waters of Puget Sound and the Pacific Ocean
before returning to streams of origin to spawn. The juveniles of these
fish spend varying amounts of time in the shore waters of the area
before moving to sea to grow to maturity. Aquaculture or sea farming
is now in the process of becoming reality in the Puget Sound complex.
The mass production of seaweed, clams, geoducks, scallops, shrimp,
oysters, small salmon, lobsters, and other possibilities looms as an
important new industry. Shoreline management is particularly crucial
to the success of sea farming. Aquaculture on any scale can be
compatible and coexist with maritime shipping and shoreland industrial
activities only by careful planning and regulation.
The shoreline resources of Puget Sound include few beach areas
which are not covered at high tide. Bluffs ranging from ten to five
hundred feet in height rim nearly the entire extent of the Sound making
access to beach and intertidal areas difficult. Because of the
glacial-till composition of these bluffs, they are susceptible to
fluvial and marine erosion and present constant slide hazards.
Although Puget Sound is protected from the direct influence of Pacific
Ocean weather, storm conditions can create very turbulent and sometimes
destructive wave action. Without recognizing the tremendous energy
contained in storm waves, development of shoreline resources can be
hazardous and deleterious to the resource characteristics which make
Puget Sound beaches attractive.
(11) Pacific Ocean. From Cape Flattery on the north to Cape
Disappointment on the south, there are approximately one hundred sixty
miles of beaches, rocky headlands, inlets, and estuaries on
Washington's Pacific Coast. The shoreline south of Cape Flattery to
the Quinault river is generally characterized as being rugged and
rocky, with high bluffs. The remaining shoreline south of the Quinault
river is predominantly flat sandy beaches with low banks and dunes.
During the winter, Pacific currents set toward the north, while
during summer months they set to the south. Associated with the summer
currents is a general offshore movement of surface water, resulting in
upwelling of water from lower depths. This upwelled water is cold,
high in salinity, low in oxygen content, and rich in nutrients. It is
this latter characteristic which causes upwelled water to be extremely
significant in biological terms, since it often triggers blooms of
marine plant life.
Directions of wave action and littoral drift of sediments shift
seasonally with Pacific Ocean storms. Although very little data are
available on the net direction of littoral transport, the University of
Washington has offshore data which indicate a northerly offshore flow.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This section contains guidelines for the
local regulation of use activities proposed for shorelines. Each
topic, representing a specific use or group of uses, is broadly defined
and followed by several guidelines. These guidelines represent the
criteria upon which judgments for proposed shoreline developments will
be based until master programs are completed. In addition, these
guidelines are intended to provide the basis for the development of
that portion of the master program concerned with the regulation of
such uses.
In addition to application of the guidelines in this section, the
local government should identify the type or types of natural systems,
as described in section 5 of this act, within which a use is proposed
and should impose regulations on those developments and uses which
would tend to affect adversely the natural characteristics needed to
preserve the integrity of the system. Examples would include but would
not be limited to proposed uses that would threaten the character of
fragile dune areas, reduce water tables in marshes, impede water flow
in estuaries, or threaten the stability of spits and bars.
These guidelines have been prepared in recognition of the
flexibility needed to carry out effective local planning of shorelines.
Therefore, the interpretation and application of the guidelines may
vary relative to different local conditions. Exceptions to specific
provisions of these guidelines may occur where local circumstances
justify such departure. Any departure from these guidelines must,
however, be compatible with the intent of chapter 90.58 RCW as
enunciated in RCW 90.58.020.
It should be noted that there are several guidelines for certain
activities which are not explicitly defined in chapter 90.58 RCW as
developments for which substantial development permits are not
required, for example, the suggestion that a buffer of permanent
vegetation be maintained along water bodies in agriculture areas.
While such activities generally cannot be regulated through the permit
system, it is intended that they be dealt with in the comprehensive
master program in a manner consistent with policy and intent of chapter
90.58 RCW. To effectively provide for the management of the shorelines
of the state, master programs should plan for and foster all reasonable
and appropriate uses as provided in RCW 90.58.020.
Finally, most of the guidelines are intentionally written in
general terms to allow some latitude for local government to expand and
elaborate on them as local conditions warrant. The guidelines are
state law, however, and must be complied with both in permit
application review and in master program development.
(1) Agricultural practices.
(a) Agricultural activities shall be defined as in RCW 90.58.065.
(b) Guidelines for regulation of agricultural activities as allowed
under RCW 90.58.065 are as follows:
(i) Local governments should encourage the maintenance of a buffer
of permanent vegetation between tilled areas and associated water
bodies which will retard surface runoff and reduce siltation.
(ii) Master programs should establish criteria for the location of
confined animal feeding operations, retention and storage ponds for
feed lot wastes, and stock piles of manure solids in shorelines of the
state so that water areas will not be polluted. Control guidelines
prepared by the United States environmental protection agency should be
followed.
(iii) Local governments should encourage the use of erosion control
measures, such as crop rotation, mulching, strip cropping, and contour
cultivation in conformance with guidelines and standards established by
the soil conservation service, United States department of agriculture.
(2) Aquaculture. Aquaculture is the culture or farming of food
fish, shellfish, or other aquatic plants and animals. This activity is
of statewide and national interest. Properly managed, it can result in
long-term over short-term benefit and can protect the resources and
ecology of the shoreline. Aquaculture is dependent on the use of the
water area and, when consistent with control of pollution and
prevention of damage to the environment, is a preferred use of the
water area.
Potential locations for aquaculture are relatively restricted due
to specific requirements for water quality, temperature, flows, oxygen
content, adjacent land uses, wind protection, commercial navigation,
and, in marine waters, salinity. The technology associated with
present-day aquaculture is still in its formative stages and
experimental. Local shoreline master plans should therefore recognize
the necessity for some latitude in the development of this emerging
economic water use as well as its potential impact on existing uses and
natural systems.
(a) Guidelines:
(i) Aquacultural activities and structures should be located in
areas where the navigational access of upland owners, recreational
boaters, and commercial traffic is not significantly restricted.
(ii) Recognition should be given to the possible detrimental impact
aquacultural development might have on the visual access of upland
owners and on the general aesthetic quality of the shoreline area.
(iii) As aquaculture technology expands with increasing knowledge
and experience, emphasis should be placed on structures which do not
significantly interfere with navigation or impair the aesthetic quality
of Washington shorelines.
(iv) Certain aquacultural activities are of statewide interest and
should be managed in a consistent manner statewide. Local master
program development and administration should therefore seek to support
state aquaculture management programs as expressed in state laws,
regulations, and established management plans. State management
programs should seek to determine and accommodate local environmental
concerns. To facilitate state-local coordination, the department will
encourage state agencies to develop specific resource management plans
and to include participation of local shoreline agencies.
(v) Shellfish resources and conditions suitable for aquaculture
only occur in limited areas. The utility and productivity of these
sites is threatened by activities and developments which reduce water
quality such as waste discharges, nonpoint runoff, and disruption of
bottom sediments. Proposed developments and activities should be
evaluated for impact on productive aquaculture areas. Identified
impacts should be mitigated through permit conditions and performance
standards.
(vi) Aquaculture is a preferred, water-dependent use. Water
surface, column, and bedland areas suitable for aquaculture are limited
to certain sites. These sites are subject to pressures from competing
uses and degradation of water quality. The shoreline program is
intended to provide a comprehensive land and water use plan which will
reduce these conflicts and provide for appropriate uses. Therefore, a
special effort should be made through the shoreline management program
to identify and resolve resource use conflicts and resource management
issues in regard to use of identified sites.
(b) Implementation of (a)(vi) of this subsection:
(i) Within one month of the effective date of this act, the
department shall notify each local jurisdiction in which major subtidal
clam or geoduck beds have been identified by the department of fish and
wildlife that a program update will be required. The department shall
provide maps showing the general location of each jurisdiction's major
subtidal clam and geoduck beds. The department shall also provide
information on subtidal clam and geoduck harvesting techniques,
environmental impacts, mitigation measures, and guidance on format and
issue coverage for submittal of proposed amendments.
(ii) Each local jurisdiction with identified major beds shall
evaluate the application of its shoreline master program to commercial
use of the identified beds. Where necessary, amendments to the master
program shall be prepared to better address management and use of the
beds. For example, such amendments may be necessary to address newly
identified concerns, to coordinate with statewide interests, or to
bring policies into conformance with current scientific knowledge.
(iii) Within four months of notification under (b)(i) of this
subsection, each affected jurisdiction shall submit a progress report
to the department. This report shall outline the procedure which will
be used to comply with (b)(ii) of this subsection and an assessment of
the need for coastal zone management financial assistance.
(iv) Within thirteen months of notification by the department under
(b)(i) of this subsection, each affected local government shall submit
to the department for approval all portions of the shoreline management
master program affecting use of the identified sites for shellfish
management. Submittals shall include relevant existing master program
elements proposed to be retained as well as program additions.
Explanation shall be submitted to the department for any use
designations or management standards which would prohibit or prevent
use of identified sites.
(v) The department, in considering local program submittals, will
consider the advice of the state departments of fish and wildlife and
natural resources, other interested local, state, and federal agencies,
and interest groups pertaining to the scientific basis, sufficiency,
and practicality of proposed standards and use regulations.
(vi) The department may postpone notification under (b)(i) of this
subsection for those subtidal clam and geoduck beds which the
department of health believes are not certifiable. Should a bed become
certifiable at some future date, the department shall make the
notification required in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(vii) If a local shoreline jurisdiction does not or is unable to
comply with the requirements of this subsection, the department may
undertake the required master program evaluation and preparation and
adoption of necessary amendments.
(3) Forest management practices. Forest management practices are
those methods used for the protection, production, and harvesting of
timber. Trees along a body of water provide shade which insulate the
waters from detrimental temperature change and dissolved oxygen
release. A stable water temperature and dissolved oxygen level provide
a healthy environment for fish and other more delicate forms of aquatic
life. Poor logging practices on shorelines alter this balance as well
as result in slash and debris accumulation and may increase the
suspended sediment load and the turbidity of the water. Guidelines:
(a) Local master programs should rely on the forest practices act
and rules implementing the Act and the Forest and Fish Report as
adequate management of commercial forest uses within shoreline
jurisdictions. Where forest practices fall within the applicability of
the forest practices act, local governments should consult with the
department of natural resources, other applicable agencies, and local
timber owners and operators in the development of their local master
program.
(b) Local governments should ensure that timber harvesting on
shorelines of statewide significance does not exceed the limitations
established in RCW 90.58.150 except as provided in cases where
selective logging is rendered ecologically detrimental or is inadequate
for preparation of land for other uses.
(4) Commercial development. Commercial developments are those uses
which are involved in wholesale and retail trade or business
activities. Commercial developments range from small businesses within
residences, to high-rise office buildings. Commercial developments are
intensive users of space because of extensive floor areas and because
of facilities, such as parking, necessary to service them. Guidelines:
(a) Although many commercial developments benefit by a shoreline
location, priority should be given to those commercial developments
which are particularly dependent on their location and/or use of the
shorelines of the state and other development that will provide an
opportunity for substantial numbers of the people to enjoy the
shorelines of the state.
(b) New commercial developments on shorelines should be encouraged
to locate in those areas where current commercial uses exist.
(c) An assessment should be made of the effect a commercial
structure will have on a scenic view significant to a given area or
enjoyed by a significant number of people.
(d) Parking facilities should be placed inland away from the
immediate water's edge and recreational beaches.
(5) Marinas. Marinas are facilities which provide boat launching,
storage, supplies, and services for small pleasure craft. There are
two basic types of marinas: The open-type construction with floating
breakwater and/or open-pile work and solid-type construction with
bulkhead and/or landfill. Depending upon the type of construction,
marinas affect fish and shellfish habitats. Guidelines:
(a) In locating marinas, special plans should be made to protect
the fish and shellfish resources that may be harmed by construction and
operation of the facility.
(b) Marinas should be designed in a manner that will reduce damage
to fish and shellfish resources and be aesthetically compatible with
adjacent areas.
(c) Master programs should identify locations that are near
high-use or potentially high-use areas for proposed marina sites.
Local as well as regional "need" data should be considered as input in
location selection.
(d) Special attention should be given to the design and development
of operational procedures for fuel handling and storage in order to
minimize accidental spillage and provide satisfactory means for
handling those spills that do occur.
(e) Shallow-water embayments with poor flushing action should not
be considered for overnight and long-term moorage facilities.
(f) The department of fish and wildlife has prepared guidelines
concerning the construction of marinas. These guidelines should be
consulted in planning for marinas.
(g) State and local health agencies have standards and guidelines
for the development of marinas which shall be consulted by local
agencies.
(6) Mining. Mining is the removal of naturally occurring materials
from the earth for economic use. The removal of sand and gravel from
shoreline areas of Washington usually results in erosion of land and
silting of water. These operations can create silt and kill
bottom-living animals. The removal of sand from marine beaches can
deplete a limited resource which may not be restored through natural
processes. Guidelines:
(a) When rock, sand, gravel, and minerals are removed from
shoreline areas, adequate protection against sediment and silt
production should be provided.
(b) Excavations for the production of sand, gravel, and minerals
should be done in conformance with the Washington state surface mining
act.
(c) Local governments should strictly control or prohibit the
removal of sand and gravel from marine beaches.
(d) When removal of sand and gravel from marine beaches is
permitted by existing law, it should be taken from the least sensitive
biophysical areas of the beach.
(7) Outdoor advertising, signs, and billboards. Signs are publicly
displayed boards whose purpose is to provide information, direction, or
advertising. Signs may be pleasing or distracting, depending upon
their design and location. A sign, in order to be effective, must
attract attention; however, a message can be clear and distinct without
being offensive. There are areas where signs are not desirable, but
generally it is the design that is undesirable, not the sign itself.
(a) Off-premise outdoor advertising signs should be limited to
areas of high-intensity land use, such as commercial and industrial
areas.
(b) Master programs should establish size, height, density, and
lighting limitations for signs.
(c) Vistas and viewpoints should not be degraded and visual access
to the water from such vistas should not be impaired by the placement
of signs.
(d) Outdoor advertising signs, where permitted under local
regulations, should be located on the upland side of public
transportation routes which parallel and are adjacent to rivers and
water bodies unless it can be demonstrated that views will not be
substantially obstructed.
(e) When feasible, signs should be constructed against existing
buildings to minimize visual obstructions of the shoreline and water
bodies.
(8) Residential development. The following guidelines should be
recognized in the development of any subdivision on the shorelines of
the state. To the extent possible, planned unit developments should be
encouraged within the shoreline area. Within planned unit
developments, substantial portions of land are reserved as open space
or recreational areas for the joint use of the occupants of the
development. This land may be provided by allowing houses to be placed
on lots smaller than the legal minimum size for normal subdivisions, as
long as the total number of dwellings in the planned unit development
does not exceed the total allowable in a regular subdivision.
Guidelines:
(a) Subdivisions should be designed at a level of density of site
coverage and of occupancy compatible with the physical capabilities of
the shoreline and water.
(b) Subdivisions should be designed so as to adequately protect the
water and shoreline aesthetic characteristics.
(c) Subdividers should be encouraged to provide public pedestrian
access to the shorelines within the subdivision.
(d) Residential development over water should not be permitted.
(e) Floating homes are to be located at moorage slips approved in
accordance with the guidelines dealing with marinas, piers, and docks.
In planning for floating homes, local governments should ensure that
waste disposal practices meet local and state health regulations, that
the homes are not located over highly productive fish food areas, and
that the homes are located to be compatible with the intent of the
designated environments.
(f) Residential developers should be required to indicate how they
plan to preserve shore vegetation and control erosion during
construction.
(g) Sewage disposal facilities, as well as water supply facilities,
must be provided in accordance with appropriate state and local health
regulations. Storm drainage facilities should be separate, not
combined with sewage disposal systems.
(h) Adequate water supplies should be available so that the ground
water quality will not be endangered by overpumping.
(9) Utilities. Utilities are services which produce and carry
electric power, gas, sewage, communications, and oil. At this time the
most feasible methods of transmission are the lineal ones of pipes and
wires. The installation of this apparatus necessarily disturbs the
landscape but can usually be planned to have a minimal visual and
physical effect on the environment. Guidelines:
(a) Upon completion of installation/maintenance projects on
shorelines, banks should be restored to preproject configuration,
replanted with native species, and provided maintenance care until the
newly planted vegetation is established.
(b) Whenever these facilities must be placed in a shoreline area,
the location should be chosen so as not to obstruct or destroy scenic
views. Whenever feasible, these facilities should be placed
underground, or designed to do minimal damage to the aesthetic
qualities of the shoreline area.
(c) To the extent feasible, local government should attempt to
incorporate major transmission line right of ways on shorelines into
their program for public access to and along water bodies.
(d) Utilities should be located to meet the needs of future
populations in areas planned to accommodate this growth.
The Washington state thermal power plant siting law regulates the
location of electrical generating and distribution facilities. Under
this law, the state preempts the certification and regulation of
thermal power plant sites and thermal power plants.
(10) Ports and water-related industries. Ports are centers for
water-borne traffic and as such have become gravitational points for
industrial/manufacturing firms. Heavy industry may not specifically
require a waterfront location, but is attracted to port areas because
of the variety of transportation available. Guidelines:
(a) Water-dependent industries which require frontage on navigable
water should be given priority over other industrial uses.
(b) Port facilities should be designed to permit viewing of harbor
areas from view points, waterfront restaurants, and similar public
facilities which would not interfere with port operations or endanger
public health and safety.
(c) Sewage treatment, water reclamation, desalinization, and power
plants should be located where they do not interfere with and are
compatible with recreational, residential, or other public uses of the
water and shorelands. Waste treatment ponds for water-related industry
should occupy as little shoreline as possible.
(d) The cooperative use of docking, parking, cargo handling, and
storage facilities should be strongly encouraged in waterfront
industrial areas.
(e) Land transportation and utility corridors serving ports and
water-related industry should follow the guidelines provided under the
sections dealing with utilities and road and railroad design and
construction. Where feasible, transportation and utility corridors
should be located upland to reduce pressures for the use of waterfront
sites.
(f) Master program planning should be based on a recognition of the
regional nature of port services. Prior to allocating shorelands for
port uses, local governments should consider statewide needs and
coordinate planning with other jurisdictions to avoid wasteful
duplication of port services within port-service regions.
(g) Since industrial docks and piers are often longer and greater
in bulk than recreational or residential piers, careful planning must
be undertaken to reduce the adverse impact of such facilities on other
water-dependent uses and shoreline resources. Because heavy industrial
activities are associated with industrial piers and docks, the location
of these facilities must be considered a major factor determining the
environmental compatibility of such facilities.
(11) Bulkheads. Bulkheads or seawalls are structures erected
parallel to and near the high-water mark for the purpose of protecting
adjacent uplands from the action of waves or currents. Bulkheads are
constructed of steel, timber, or concrete piling, and may be either of
solid or open-piling construction. For ocean-exposed locations,
bulkheads do not provide a long-lived permanent solution, because
eventually a more substantial wall is required as the beach continues
to recede and layer waves reach the structure.
While bulkheads and seawalls may protect the uplands, they do not
protect the adjacent beaches, and in many cases are actually
detrimental to the beaches by speeding up the erosion of the sand in
front of the structures.
The following guidelines apply to the construction of bulkheads and
seawalls designed to protect the immediate upland area. Proposals for
landfill must comply with the guidelines for that specific activity.
Guidelines:
(a) Bulkheads and seawalls should be located and constructed in
such a manner which will not result in adverse effects on nearby
beaches and will minimize alterations of the natural shoreline.
(b) Bulkheads and seawalls should be constructed in such a way as
to minimize damage to fish and shellfish habitats. Open-piling
construction is preferable in lieu of the solid type.
(c) Consider the effect of a proposed bulkhead on public access to
publicly owned shorelines.
(d) Bulkheads and seawalls should be designed to blend in with the
surroundings and not to detract from the aesthetic qualities of the
shoreline.
(e) The construction of bulkheads should be permitted only where
they provide protection to upland areas or facilities, not for the
indirect purpose of creating land by filling behind the bulkhead.
Landfill operations should satisfy the guidelines under subsection (14)
of this section.
(12) Breakwaters. Breakwaters are another protective structure
usually built offshore to protect beaches, bluffs, dunes, or harbor
areas from wave action. However, because offshore breakwaters are
costly to build, they are seldom constructed to protect the natural
features alone, but are generally constructed for navigational purposes
also. Breakwaters can be either rigid in construction or floating.
The rigid breakwaters, which are usually constructed of riprap or rock,
have both beneficial and detrimental effects on the shore. All
breakwaters eliminate wave action and thus protect the shore
immediately behind them. They also obstruct the free flow of sand
along the coast and starve the downstream beaches. Floating
breakwaters do not have the negative effect on sand movement, but
cannot withstand extensive wave action and thus are impractical with
present construction methods in many areas. Guidelines:
(a) Floating breakwaters are preferred to solid landfill types in
order to maintain sand movement and fish habitat.
(b) Solid breakwaters should be constructed only where design
modifications can eliminate potentially detrimental effects on the
movement of sand and circulation of water.
(c) The restriction of the public use of the water surface as a
result of breakwater construction must be recognized in the master
program and must be considered in granting shoreline permits for their
construction.
(13) Jetties and groins. Jetties and groins are structures
designed to modify or control sand movement. A jetty is generally
employed at inlets for the purpose of navigation improvements. When
sand being transported along the coast by waves and currents arrives at
an inlet, it flows inward on the flood tide to form an inner bar, and
outward on ebb tide to form an outer bar. Both formations are harmful
to navigation through the inlet.
A jetty is usually constructed of steel, concrete, or rock. The
type depends on foundation conditions and wave, climate, and economic
considerations. To be of maximum aid in maintaining the navigation
channel, the jetty must be high enough to completely obstruct the sand
stream. The adverse effect of a jetty is that sand is impounded at the
updrift jetty and the supply of sand to the shore downdrift from the
inlet is reduced, thus causing erosion.
Groins are barrier-type structures extending from the backshore
seaward across the beach. The basic purpose of a groin is to interrupt
the sand movement along a shore.
Groins can be constructed in many ways using timber, steel,
concrete, or rock, but can be classified into basic physical categories
as high or low, long or short, and permeable or impermeable.
Trapping of sand by a groin is done at the expense of the adjacent
downdrift shore, unless the groin system is filled with sand to its
entrapment capacity. Guidelines:
(a) Master programs must consider sand movement and the effect of
proposed jetties or groins on that sand movement. Provisions can be
made to compensate for the adverse effects of the structures either by
artificially transporting sand to the downdrift side of an inlet with
jetties, or by artificially feeding the beaches in case of groins.
(b) Special attention should be given to the effect these
structures will have on wildlife propagation and movement, and to the
design of these structures which will not detract from the aesthetic
quality of the shoreline.
(14) Landfill is the creation of dry upland area by the filling or
depositing of sand, soil, or gravel into a wetland area. Landfills
also occur to replace shoreland areas removed by wave action or the
normal erosive processes of nature. However, most landfills destroy
the natural character of land, create unnatural heavy erosion and
silting problems and diminish the existing water surface. Guidelines:
(a) Shoreline fills or cuts should be designed and located so that
significant damage to existing ecological values or natural resources,
or alteration of local currents will not occur, creating a hazard to
adjacent life, property, and natural resources systems.
(b) All perimeters of fills should be provided with vegetation,
retaining walls, or other mechanisms for erosion prevention.
(c) Fill materials should be of such quality that it will not cause
problems of water quality. Shoreline areas are not to be considered
for sanitary landfills or the disposal of solid waste.
(d) Priority should be given to landfills for water-dependent uses
and for public uses. In evaluating fill projects and in designating
areas appropriate for fill, such factors as total water surface
reduction, navigation restriction, impediment to water flow and
circulation, reduction of water quality, and destruction of habitat
should be considered.
(15) Solid waste disposal. Generally, all solid waste is a
possible source of much nuisance. Rapid, safe, and nuisance-free
storage, collection, transportation, and disposal are of vital concern
to all persons and communities. If the disposal of solid waste
material is not carefully planned and regulated, it can become not only
a nuisance but a severe threat to the health and safety of human
beings, livestock, wildlife, and other biota. Guidelines:
(a) Local master programs and use regulations must be consistent
with approved county or multicounty comprehensive solid waste
management plans and regulations of jurisdictional health agencies.
(b) Local governments must regulate sanitary landfills and solid
waste handling in accordance with regulations for solid waste handling
when adopted by the department. New regulations restricting sanitary
landfills within any water course and within flood plains of any water
course have been proposed for adoption by the department.
(16) Dredging. Dredging is the removal of earth from the bottom of
a stream, river, lake, bay, or other water body for the purposes of
deepening a navigational channel or to obtain use of the bottom
materials for landfill. A significant portion of all dredged materials
are deposited either in the water or immediately adjacent to it, often
resulting in problems of water quality. Guidelines:
(a) Local governments should control dredging to minimize damage to
existing ecological values and natural resources of both the area to be
dredged and the area for deposit of dredged materials.
(b) Local master programs must include long-range plans for the
deposit and use of spoils on land. Spoil deposit sites in water areas
should also be identified by local government in cooperation with the
state departments of natural resources and fish and wildlife.
Depositing of dredge material in water areas should be allowed only for
habitat improvement, to correct problems of material distribution
affecting adversely fish and shellfish resources, or where the
alternatives of depositing material on land is more detrimental to
shoreline resources than depositing it in water areas.
(c) Dredging of bottom materials for the single purpose of
obtaining fill material should be discouraged.
(17) Shoreline protection. Flood protection and streamway
modifications are those activities occurring within the streamway and
wetland areas which are designed to reduce overbank flow of high waters
and stabilize eroding streambanks. Reduction of flood damage, bank
stabilization to reduce sedimentation, and protection of property from
erosion are normally achieved through watershed and flood plain
management and by structural works. Such measures are often
complementary to one another and several measures together may be
necessary to achieve the desired end. Guidelines:
(a) Riprapping and other bank stabilization measures should be
located, designed, and constructed so as to avoid the need for
channelization and to protect the natural character of the streamway.
(b) Where flood protection measures such as dikes are planned, they
should be placed landward of the streamway, including associated swamps
and marshes and other wetlands directly interrelated and interdependent
with the stream proper.
(c) Flood protection measures which result in channelization should
be avoided.
(18) Road and railroad design and construction. A road is a linear
passageway, usually for motor vehicles, and a railroad is a surface
linear passageway with tracks for train traffic. Their construction
can limit access to shorelines, impair the visual qualities of
water-oriented vistas, expose soils to erosion, and retard the runoff
of flood waters. Guidelines:
(a) Whenever feasible, major highways, freeways, and railways
should be located away from shorelands, except in port and heavy
industrial areas, so that shoreland roads may be reserved for
slow-moving recreational traffic.
(b) Roads located in wetland areas should be designed and
maintained to prevent erosion and to permit a natural movement of
ground water.
(c) All debris, overburden, and other waste materials from
construction should be disposed of in such a way as to prevent their
entry by erosion from drainage, high water, or other means into any
water body.
(d) Road locations should be planned to fit the topography so that
minimum alterations of natural conditions will be necessary.
(e) Scenic corridors with public roadways should have provision for
safe pedestrian and other nonmotorized travel. Also, provision should
be made for sufficient view points, rest areas, and picnic areas in
public shorelines.
(f) Extensive loops or spurs of old highways with high aesthetic
quality should be kept in service as pleasure bypass routes, especially
where main highways, paralleling the old highway, must carry large
traffic volumes at high speeds.
(g) Since land-use and transportation facilities are so highly
interrelated, the plans for each should be coordinated. The
designation of potential high-use areas in master programs should be
done after the environmental impact of the transportation facilities
needed to serve those areas have been assessed.
(19) Piers. A pier or dock is a structure built over or floating
upon the water, used as a landing place for marine transport or for
recreational purposes. While floating docks generally create less of
a visual impact than those on piling, they constitute an impediment to
boat traffic and shoreline trolling. Floating docks can also alter
beach sand patterns in areas where tides and littoral drift are
significant. On lakes, a proliferation of piers along the shore can
have the effect of substantially reducing the usable water surface.
Guidelines:
(a) The use of floating docks should be encouraged in those areas
where scenic values are high and where conflicts with recreational
boaters and fishermen will not be created.
(b) Open-pile piers should be encouraged where shore trolling is
important, where there is significant littoral drift, and where scenic
values will not be impaired.
(c) Priority should be given to the use of community piers and
docks in all new major waterfront subdivisions. In general,
encouragement should be given to the cooperative use of piers and
docks.
(d) Master programs should address the problem of the proliferation
of single-purpose private piers and should establish criteria for their
location, spacing, and length. The master programs should also delimit
geographical areas where pile piers will have priority over floating
docks.
(e) In providing for boat docking facilities in the master program,
local governments should consider the capacity of the shoreline sites
to absorb the impact of waste discharges from boats including gas and
oil spillage.
(20) Archaeological areas and historic sites. Archaeological
areas, ancient villages, military forts, old settlers homes, ghost
towns, and trails were often located on shorelines because of the
proximity of food resources and because water provided an important
means of transportation. These sites are nonrenewable resources and
many are in danger of being lost through present day changes in land
use and urbanization. Because of their rarity and the educational link
they provide to our past, these locations should be preserved.
Guidelines:
(a) In preparing shoreline master programs, local governments
should consult with professional archaeologists to identify areas
containing potentially valuable archaeological data, and to establish
procedures for salvaging the data.
(b) Where possible, sites should be permanently preserved for
scientific study and public observation. In areas known to contain
archaeological data, local governments should attach a special
condition to a shoreline permit providing for a site inspection and
evaluation by an archaeologist to ensure that possible archaeological
data are properly salvaged. Such a condition might also require
approval by local government before work can resume on the project
following such an examination.
(c) Shoreline permits, in general, should contain special
provisions which require developers to notify local governments if any
possible archaeological data are uncovered during excavations.
(d) The national historic preservation act of 1966 and state law
provide for the protection, rehabilitation, restoration, and
reconstruction of districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects
significant in American and Washington history, architecture,
archaeology, or culture. The state legislation names the director of
the Washington state parks and recreation commission as the person
responsible for this program.
(21) Recreation. Recreation is the refreshment of body and mind
through forms of play, amusement, or relaxation. Water-related
recreation accounts for a very high proportion of all recreational
activity in the Pacific Northwest. The recreational experience may be
either an active one involving boating, swimming, fishing, or hunting
or the experience may be passive such as enjoying the natural beauty of
a vista of a lake, river, or salt-water area. Guidelines:
(a) Priority will be given to developments, other than single
family residences which are exempt from the permit requirements of
chapter 90.58 RCW, which provide recreational uses and other
improvements facilitating public access to shorelines.
(b) Access to recreational locations such as fishing streams and
hunting areas should be a combination of areas and linear access
(parking areas and easements, for example) to prevent concentrations of
use pressure at a few points.
(c) Master programs should encourage the linkage of shoreline parks
and public access points through the use of linear access. Many types
of connections can be used such as hiking paths, bicycle trails, and/or
scenic drives.
(d) Attention should be directed toward the effect the development
of a recreational site will have on the environmental quality and
natural resources of an area.
(e) Master programs should develop standards for the preservation
and enhancement of scenic views and vistas.
(f) To avoid wasteful use of the limited supply of recreational
shoreland, parking areas should be located inland away from the
immediate edge of the water and recreational beaches. Access should be
provided by walkways or other methods. Automobile traffic on beaches,
dunes, and fragile shoreland resources should be discouraged.
(g) Recreational developments should be of such variety as to
satisfy the diversity of demands from groups in nearby population
centers.
(h) The supply of recreation facilities should be directly
proportional to the proximity of population and compatible with the
environment designations.
(i) Facilities for intensive recreational activities should be
provided where sewage disposal and vector control can be accomplished
to meet public health standards without adversely altering the natural
features attractive for recreational uses.
(j) In locating proposed recreational facilities such as playing
fields and golf courses and other open areas which use large quantities
of fertilizers and pesticides in their turf maintenance programs,
provisions must be made to prevent these chemicals from entering water.
If this type of facility is approved on a shoreline location, provision
should be made for protection of water areas from drainage and surface
runoff.
(k) State and local health agencies have broad regulations which
apply to recreation facilities, recreation watercraft, and ocean
beaches which should be consulted by local governments in preparing use
regulations and issuing permits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Purpose and intent. This section
implements the ocean resources management act, RCW 43.143.005 through
43.143.030. The law requires the department to develop guidelines and
policies for the management of ocean uses and to serve as the basis for
evaluation and modification of local shoreline management master
programs of coastal local governments in Jefferson, Clallam, Grays
Harbor, and Pacific counties. The guidelines are intended to clarify
state shoreline management policy regarding use of coastal resources,
address evolving interest in ocean development, and prepare state and
local agencies for new ocean developments and activities.
(2) Geographical application. The guidelines apply to Washington's
coastal waters from Cape Disappointment at the mouth of the Columbia
river north one hundred sixty miles to Cape Flattery at the entrance to
the Strait of Juan de Fuca including the offshore ocean area, the near
shore area under state ownership, shorelines of the state, and their
adjacent uplands. Their broadest application would include an area
seaward two hundred miles and landward to include those uplands
immediately adjacent to land under permit jurisdiction for which
consistent planning is required under RCW 90.58.340. The guidelines
address uses occurring in Washington's coastal waters, but not impacts
generated from activities offshore of Oregon, Alaska, California, or
British Columbia or impacts from Washington's offshore on the Strait of
Juan de Fuca or other inland marine waters.
(3) Ocean uses defined. Ocean uses are activities or developments
involving renewable and/or nonrenewable resources that occur on
Washington's coastal waters and include their associated off shore,
near shore, inland marine, shoreland, and upland facilities and the
supply, service, and distribution activities, such as crew ships,
circulating to and between the activities and developments. Ocean uses
involving nonrenewable resources include such activities as extraction
of oil, gas, and minerals, energy production, disposal of waste
products, and salvage. Ocean uses which generally involve sustainable
use of renewable resources include commercial, recreational, and tribal
fishing, aquaculture, recreation, shellfish harvesting, and pleasure
craft activity.
(4) Relationship to existing management programs. These guidelines
augment existing requirements of chapter 90.58 RCW and those chapters
in Title 173 of the Washington Administrative Code that implement
chapter 90.58 RCW. They are not intended to modify current resource
allocation procedures or regulations administered by other agencies,
such as the department of fish and wildlife's management of commercial,
recreational, and tribal fisheries. They are not intended to regulate
recreational uses or currently existing commercial uses involving
fishing or other renewable marine or ocean resources. Every effort
will be made to take into account tribal interests and programs in the
guidelines and master program amendment processes. After inclusion in
the state coastal zone management program, these guidelines and
resultant master programs will be used for federal consistency purposes
in evaluating federal permits and activities in Washington's coastal
waters. Participation in the development of these guidelines and
subsequent amendments to master programs will not preclude state and
local government from opposing the introduction of new uses, such as
oil and gas development.
These and other statutes, documents, and regulations referred to or
cited in this chapter may be reviewed at the department.
(5) Regional approach. The guidelines are intended to foster a
regional perspective and consistent approach for the management of
ocean uses. While local governments may have need to vary their
programs to accommodate local circumstances, local government should
attempt and the department will review local programs for compliance
with this chapter for development of master programs. It is recognized
that further amendments to the master programs may be required to
address new information on critical and sensitive habitats and
environmental impacts of ocean uses or to address future activities,
such as oil development. In addition to the criteria in RCW
43.143.030, these guidelines apply to ocean uses until local master
program amendments are adopted. The amended master program shall be
the basis for review of an action that is either located exclusively
in, or its environmental impacts confined to, one county. Where a
proposal clearly involves more than one local jurisdiction, the
guidelines shall be applied and remain in effect in addition to the
provisions of the local master programs.
(6) Permit criteria. Local government and the department may
permit ocean or coastal uses and activities as a substantial
development, variance, or conditional use only if the criteria of RCW
43.143.030(2) listed below are met or exceeded:
(a) There is a demonstrated significant local, state, or national
need for the proposed use or activity;
(b) There is no reasonable alternative to meet the public need for
the proposed use or activity;
(c) There will be no likely long-term significant adverse impacts
to coastal or marine resources or uses;
(d) All reasonable steps are taken to avoid and minimize adverse
environmental impacts, with special protection provided for the marine
life and resources of the Columbia river, Willapa Bay, and Grays Harbor
estuaries, and Olympic National Park;
(e) All reasonable steps are taken to avoid and minimize adverse
social and economic impacts, including impacts on aquaculture,
recreation, tourism, navigation, air quality, and recreational,
commercial, and tribal fishing;
(f) Compensation is provided to mitigate adverse impacts to coastal
resources or uses;
(g) Plans and sufficient performance bonding are provided to ensure
that the site will be rehabilitated after the use or activity is
completed; and
(h) The use or activity complies with all applicable local, state,
and federal laws and regulations.
(7) General ocean uses guidelines. The following guidelines apply
to all ocean uses, their service, distribution, and supply activities
and their associated facilities that require shoreline permits.
(a) Ocean uses and activities that will not adversely impact
renewable resources shall be given priority over those that will.
Correspondingly, ocean uses that will have less adverse impacts on
renewable resources shall be given priority over uses that will have
greater adverse impacts.
(b) Ocean uses that will have less adverse social and economic
impacts on coastal uses and communities should be given priority over
uses and activities that will have more such impacts.
(c) When the adverse impacts are generally equal, the ocean use
that has less probable occurrence of a disaster should be given
priority.
(d) The alternatives considered to meet a public need for a
proposed use should be commensurate with the need for the proposed use.
For example, if there is a demonstrated national need for a proposed
use, then national alternatives should be considered.
(e) Chapter 197-11 WAC provides guidance in the application of the
permit criteria and guidelines of this section. The range of impacts
to be considered should be consistent with WAC 197-11-060 (4)(e) and
197-11-792 (2)(c). The determination of significant adverse impacts
should be consistent with WAC 197-11-330(3) and 197-11-794. The
sequence of actions described in WAC 197-11-768 should be used as an
order of preference in evaluating steps to avoid and minimize adverse
impacts.
(f) Impacts on commercial resources, such as the crab fishery, on
noncommercial resources, such as environmentally critical and sensitive
habitats, and on coastal uses, such as loss of equipment or loss of a
fishing season, should be considered in determining compensation to
mitigate adverse environmental, social, and economic impacts to coastal
resources and uses.
(g) Allocation of compensation to mitigate adverse impacts to
coastal resources or uses should be based on the magnitude and/or
degree of impact on the resource, jurisdiction, and use.
(h) Rehabilitation plans and bonds prepared for ocean uses should
address the effects of planned and unanticipated closures, completion
of the activity, reasonably anticipated disasters, inflation, new
technology, and new information about the environmental impacts to
ensure that state of the art technology and methods are used.
(i) Local governments should evaluate their master programs and
select the environment(s) for coastal waters that best meets the intent
of this chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW.
(j) Ocean uses and their associated coastal or upland facilities
should be located, designed, and operated to prevent, avoid, and
minimize adverse impacts on migration routes and habitat areas of
species listed as endangered or threatened, environmentally critical
and sensitive habitats such as breeding, spawning, nursery, foraging
areas, and wetlands, and areas of high productivity for marine biota
such as upwelling and estuaries.
(k) Ocean uses should be located to avoid adverse impacts on
proposed or existing environmental and scientific preserves and
sanctuaries, parks, and designated recreation areas.
(l) Ocean uses and their associated facilities should be located
and designed to avoid and minimize adverse impacts on historic or
culturally significant sites in compliance with chapter 27.34 RCW.
Permits in general should contain special provisions that require
permittees to comply with chapter 27.53 RCW if any archaeological sites
or archaeological objects such as artifacts and shipwrecks are
discovered.
(m) Ocean uses and their distribution, service, and supply vessels
and aircraft should be located, designed, and operated in a manner that
minimizes adverse impacts on fishing grounds, aquatic lands, or other
renewable resource ocean use areas during the established, traditional,
and recognized times they are used or when the resource could be
adversely impacted.
(n) Ocean use service, supply, and distribution vessels and
aircraft should be routed to avoid environmentally critical and
sensitive habitats such as sea stacks and wetlands, preserves,
sanctuaries, bird colonies, and migration routes, during critical times
those areas or species could be affected.
(o) In locating and designing associated onshore facilities,
special attention should be given to the environment, the
characteristics of the use, and the impact of a probable disaster, in
order to assure adjacent uses, habitats, and communities adequate
protection from explosions, spills, and other disasters.
(p) Ocean uses and their associated facilities should be located
and designed to minimize impacts on existing water dependent businesses
and existing land transportation routes to the maximum extent feasible.
(q) Onshore facilities associated with ocean uses should be located
in communities where there is adequate sewer, water, power, and
streets. Within those communities, if space is available at existing
marine terminals, the onshore facilities should be located there.
(r) Attention should be given to the scheduling and method of
constructing ocean use facilities and the location of temporary
construction facilities to minimize impacts on tourism, recreation,
commercial fishing, local communities, and the environment.
(s) Special attention should be given to the effect that ocean use
facilities will have on recreational activities and experiences such as
public access, aesthetics, and views.
(t) Detrimental effects on air and water quality, tourism,
recreation, fishing, aquaculture, navigation, transportation, public
infrastructure, public services, and community culture should be
considered in avoiding and minimizing adverse social and economic
impacts.
(u) Special attention should be given to designs and methods that
prevent, avoid, and minimize adverse impacts such as noise, light,
temperature changes, turbidity, water pollution, and contaminated
sediments on the marine, estuarine, or upland environment. Such
attention should be given particularly during critical migration
periods and life stages of marine species and critical oceanographic
processes.
(v) Preproject environmental baseline inventories and assessments
and monitoring of ocean uses should be required when little is known
about the effects on marine and estuarine ecosystems, renewable
resource uses, and coastal communities or the technology involved is
likely to change.
(w) Oil and gas, mining, disposal, and energy producing ocean uses
should be designed, constructed, and operated in a manner that
minimizes environmental impacts on the coastal waters environment,
particularly the seabed communities, and minimizes impacts on
recreation and existing renewable resource uses such as fishing.
(x) To the extent feasible, the location of oil and gas, and mining
facilities should be chosen to avoid and minimize impacts on shipping
lanes or routes traditionally used by commercial and recreational
fishermen to reach fishing areas.
(y) Discontinuance or shutdown of oil and gas, mining, or energy
producing ocean uses should be done in a manner that minimizes impacts
to renewable resource ocean uses such as fishing, and restores the
seabed to a condition similar to its original state to the maximum
extent feasible.
(8) Oil and gas uses and activities. Oil and gas uses and
activities involve the extraction of oil and gas resources from beneath
the ocean.
(a) Whenever feasible oil and gas facilities should be located and
designed to permit joint use in order to minimize adverse impacts to
coastal resources and uses and the environment.
(b) Special attention should be given to the availability and
adequacy of general disaster response capabilities in reviewing ocean
locations for oil and gas facilities.
(c) Because environmental damage is a very probable impact of oil
and gas uses, the adequacy of plans, equipment, staffing, procedures,
and demonstrated financial and performance capabilities for preventing,
responding to, and mitigating the effects of accidents and disasters
such as oil spills should be major considerations in the review of
permits for their location and operation. If a permit is issued, it
should ensure that adequate prevention, response, and mitigation can be
provided before the use is initiated and throughout the life of the
use.
(d) Special attention should be given to the response times for
public safety services such as police, fire, emergency medical, and
hazardous materials spill response services in providing and reviewing
onshore locations for oil and gas facilities.
(e) Oil and gas facilities including pipelines should be located,
designed, constructed, and maintained in conformance with applicable
requirements but should at a minimum ensure adequate protection from
geological hazards such as liquefaction, hazardous slopes, earthquakes,
physical oceanographic processes, and natural disasters.
(f) Upland disposal of oil and gas construction and operation
materials and waste products such as cuttings and drilling muds should
be allowed only in sites that meet applicable requirements.
(9) Ocean mining. Ocean mining includes such uses as the mining of
metal, mineral, sand, and gravel resources from the sea floor.
(a) Seafloor mining should be located and operated to avoid
detrimental effects on ground fishing or other renewable resource uses.
(b) Seafloor mining should be located and operated to avoid
detrimental effects on beach erosion or accretion processes.
(c) Special attention should be given to habitat recovery rates in
the review of permits for seafloor mining.
(10) Energy production. Energy production uses involve the
production of energy in a usable form directly in or on the ocean
rather than extracting a raw material that is transported elsewhere to
produce energy in a readily usable form. Examples of these ocean uses
are facilities that use wave action or differences in water temperature
to generate electricity.
(a) Energy-producing uses should be located, constructed, and
operated in a manner that has no detrimental effects on beach accretion
or erosion and wave processes.
(b) An assessment should be made of the effect of energy-producing
uses on upwelling, and other oceanographic and ecosystem processes.
(c) Associated energy distribution facilities and lines should be
located in existing utility rights of way and corridors whenever
feasible, rather than creating new corridors that would be detrimental
to the aesthetic qualities of the shoreline area.
(11) Ocean disposal. Ocean disposal uses involve the deliberate
deposition or release of material at sea, such as solid wastes,
industrial waste, radioactive waste, incineration, incinerator residue,
dredged materials, vessels, aircraft, ordnance, platforms, or other
man-made structures.
(a) Storage, loading, transporting, and disposal of materials shall
be done in conformance with local, state, and federal requirements for
protection of the environment.
(b) Ocean disposal shall be allowed only in sites that have been
approved by the department of ecology, the department of natural
resources, the United States environmental protection agency, and the
United States army corps of engineers as appropriate.
(c) Ocean disposal sites should be located and designed to prevent,
avoid, and minimize adverse impacts on environmentally critical and
sensitive habitats, coastal resources and uses, or loss of
opportunities for mineral resource development. Ocean disposal sites
for which the primary purpose is habitat enhancement may be located in
a wider variety of habitats, but the general intent of the guidelines
should still be met.
(12) Transportation. Ocean transportation includes such uses as:
Shipping, transferring between vessels, and offshore storage of oil and
gas; transport of other goods and commodities; and offshore ports and
airports. The following guidelines address transportation activities
that originate or conclude in Washington's coastal waters or are
transporting a nonrenewable resource extracted from the outer
continental shelf off Washington.
(a) An assessment should be made of the impact transportation uses
will have on renewable resource activities such as fishing and on
environmentally critical and sensitive habitat areas, environmental and
scientific preserves, and sanctuaries.
(b) When feasible, hazardous materials such as oil, gas,
explosives, and chemicals, should not be transported through highly
productive commercial, tribal, or recreational fishing areas. If no
such feasible route exists, the routes used should pose the least
environmental risk.
(c) Transportation uses should be located or routed to avoid
habitat areas of endangered or threatened species, environmentally
critical and sensitive habitats, migration routes of marine species and
birds, marine sanctuaries, and environmental or scientific preserves to
the maximum extent feasible.
(13) Ocean research. Ocean research activities involve scientific
investigation for the purpose of furthering knowledge and
understanding. Investigation activities involving necessary and
functionally related precursor activities to an ocean use or
development may be considered exploration or part of the use or
development. Since ocean research often involves activities and
equipment, such as drilling and vessels, that also occur in exploration
and ocean uses or developments, a case-by-case determination of the
applicable regulations may be necessary.
(a) Ocean research should be encouraged to coordinate with other
ocean uses occurring in the same area to minimize potential conflicts.
(b) Ocean research meeting the definition of "exploration activity"
of WAC 173-15-020 shall comply with the requirements of chapter 173-15
WAC: Permits for oil or natural gas exploration activities conducted
from state marine waters.
(c) Ocean research should be located and operated in a manner that
minimizes intrusion into or disturbance of the coastal waters
environment consistent with the purposes of the research and the intent
of the general ocean use guidelines.
(d) Ocean research should be completed or discontinued in a manner
that restores the environment to its original condition to the maximum
extent feasible, consistent with the purposes of the research.
(e) Public dissemination of ocean research findings should be
encouraged.
(14) Ocean salvage. Ocean salvage uses share characteristics of
other ocean uses and involve relatively small sites occurring
intermittently. Historic shipwreck salvage which combines aspects of
recreation, exploration, research, and mining is an example of such a
use.
(a) Nonemergency marine salvage and historic shipwreck salvage
activities should be conducted in a manner that minimizes adverse
impacts to the coastal waters environment and renewable resource uses
such as fishing.
(b) Nonemergency marine salvage and historic shipwreck salvage
activities should not be conducted in areas of cultural or historic
significance unless part of a scientific effort sanctioned by
appropriate governmental agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Chapter 90.58 RCW states that each local
master program shall contain provisions covering conditional uses and
variances. Any permit for a variance or a conditional use granted by
local government under an approved master program must be submitted to
the department for approval, approval with conditions, or disapproval.
The criteria contained in WAC 173-14-140 for shoreline conditional use
and variance permits shall constitute the minimum criteria for review
of these permits by local government and the department. More
restrictive criteria may be applied where it exists in approved and
adopted local master programs.
These provisions should be utilized in a manner which, while
protecting the environment, will assure that a person will be able to
utilize his or her property in a fair and equitable manner.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.58.020 and 1995 c 347 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that the shorelines of the state are among
the most valuable and fragile of its natural resources and that there
is great concern throughout the state relating to their utilization,
protection, restoration, and preservation. In addition it finds that
ever increasing pressures of additional uses are being placed on the
shorelines necessitating increased coordination in the management and
development of the shorelines of the state. The legislature further
finds that much of the shorelines of the state and the uplands adjacent
thereto are in private ownership; that unrestricted construction on the
privately owned or publicly owned shorelines of the state is not in the
best public interest; and therefore, coordinated planning is necessary
in order to protect the public interest associated with the shorelines
of the state while, at the same time, recognizing and protecting
private property rights consistent with the public interest. There is,
therefor, a clear and urgent demand for a planned, rational, and
concerted effort, jointly performed by federal, state, and local
governments, to prevent the inherent harm in an uncoordinated and
piecemeal development of the state's shorelines.
It is the policy of the state to provide for the management of the
shorelines of the state by planning for and fostering all reasonable
and appropriate uses. This policy is designed to insure the
development of these shorelines in a manner which, while allowing for
limited reduction of rights of the public in the navigable waters, will
promote and enhance the public interest. This policy contemplates
protecting against adverse effects to the public health, the land and
its vegetation and wildlife, and the waters of the state and their
aquatic life, while protecting generally public rights of navigation
and corollary rights incidental thereto.
The legislature declares that the interest of all of the people
shall be paramount in the management of shorelines of statewide
significance. ((The department, in adopting guidelines for shorelines
of statewide significance, and)) Local government, in developing master
programs for shorelines of statewide significance, shall give
preference to uses in the following order of preference which:
(1) Recognize and protect the statewide interest over local
interest;
(2) Preserve the natural character of the shoreline;
(3) Result in long term over short term benefit;
(4) Protect the resources and ecology of the shoreline;
(5) Increase public access to publicly owned areas of the
shorelines;
(6) Increase recreational opportunities for the public in the
shoreline;
(7) Provide for any other element as defined in RCW 90.58.100
deemed appropriate or necessary.
In the implementation of this policy the public's opportunity to
enjoy the physical and aesthetic qualities of natural shorelines of the
state shall be preserved to the greatest extent feasible consistent
with the overall best interest of the state and the people generally.
To this end uses shall be preferred which are consistent with control
of pollution and prevention of damage to the natural environment, or
are unique to or dependent upon use of the state's shoreline.
Alterations of the natural condition of the shorelines of the state, in
those limited instances when authorized, shall be given priority for
single family residences and their appurtenant structures, ports,
shoreline recreational uses including but not limited to parks,
marinas, piers, and other improvements facilitating public access to
shorelines of the state, industrial and commercial developments which
are particularly dependent on their location on or use of the
shorelines of the state and other development that will provide an
opportunity for substantial numbers of the people to enjoy the
shorelines of the state. Alterations of the natural condition of the
shorelines and shorelands of the state shall be recognized by the
department. Shorelines and shorelands of the state shall be
appropriately classified and these classifications shall be revised
when circumstances warrant regardless of whether the change in
circumstances occurs through man-made causes or natural causes. Any
areas resulting from alterations of the natural condition of the
shorelines and shorelands of the state no longer meeting the definition
of "shorelines of the state" shall not be subject to the provisions of
chapter 90.58 RCW.
Permitted uses in the shorelines of the state shall be designed and
conducted in a manner to minimize, insofar as practical, any resultant
damage to the ecology and environment of the shoreline area and any
interference with the public's use of the water.

Sec. 10 RCW 90.58.030 and 2002 c 230 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
following definitions and concepts apply:
(1) Administration:
(a) "Department" means the department of ecology;
(b) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology;
(c) "Local government" means any county, incorporated city, or town
which contains within its boundaries any lands or waters subject to
this chapter;
(d) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, organization, cooperative, public or municipal
corporation, or agency of the state or local governmental unit however
designated;
(e) "Hearing board" means the shoreline hearings board established
by this chapter.
(2) Geographical:
(a) "Extreme low tide" means the lowest line on the land reached by
a receding tide;
(b) "Ordinary high water mark" on all lakes, streams, and tidal
water is that mark that will be found by examining the bed and banks
and ascertaining where the presence and action of waters are so common
and usual, and so long continued in all ordinary years, as to mark upon
the soil a character distinct from that of the abutting upland, in
respect to vegetation as that condition exists on June 1, 1971, as it
may naturally change thereafter, or as it may change thereafter in
accordance with permits issued by a local government or the department:
PROVIDED, That in any area where the ordinary high water mark cannot be
found, the ordinary high water mark adjoining salt water shall be the
line of mean higher high tide and the ordinary high water mark
adjoining fresh water shall be the line of mean high water;
(c) "Shorelines of the state" are the total of all "shorelines" and
"shorelines of statewide significance" within the state;
(d) "Shorelines" means all of the water areas of the state,
including reservoirs, and their associated shorelands, together with
the lands underlying them; except (i) shorelines of statewide
significance; (ii) shorelines on segments of streams upstream of a
point where the mean annual flow is twenty cubic feet per second or
less and the wetlands associated with such upstream segments; and (iii)
shorelines on lakes less than twenty acres in size and wetlands
associated with such small lakes;
(e) "Shorelines of statewide significance" means the following
shorelines of the state:
(i) The area between the ordinary high water mark and the western
boundary of the state from Cape Disappointment on the south to Cape
Flattery on the north, including harbors, bays, estuaries, and inlets;
(ii) Those areas of Puget Sound and adjacent salt waters and the
Strait of Juan de Fuca between the ordinary high water mark and the
line of extreme low tide as follows:
(A) Nisqually Delta -- from DeWolf Bight to Tatsolo Point,
(B) Birch Bay -- from Point Whitehorn to Birch Point,
(C) Hood Canal -- from Tala Point to Foulweather Bluff,
(D) Skagit Bay and adjacent area -- from Brown Point to Yokeko Point,
and
(E) Padilla Bay -- from March Point to William Point;
(iii) Those areas of Puget Sound and the Strait of Juan de Fuca and
adjacent salt waters north to the Canadian line and lying seaward from
the line of extreme low tide;
(iv) Those lakes, whether natural, artificial, or a combination
thereof, with a surface acreage of one thousand acres or more measured
at the ordinary high water mark;
(v) Those natural rivers or segments thereof as follows:
(A) Any west of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the mean annual flow is measured at one thousand cubic feet
per second or more,
(B) Any east of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the annual flow is measured at two hundred cubic feet per
second or more, or those portions of rivers east of the crest of the
Cascade range downstream from the first three hundred square miles of
drainage area, whichever is longer;
(vi) Those shorelands associated with (i), (ii), (iv), and (v) of
this subsection (2)(e);
(f) "Shorelands" or "shoreland areas" means those lands extending
landward for two hundred feet in all directions as measured on a
horizontal plane from the ordinary high water mark; floodways and
contiguous floodplain areas landward two hundred feet from such
floodways; and all wetlands and river deltas associated with the
streams, lakes, and tidal waters which are subject to the provisions of
this chapter; the same to be designated as to location by the
department of ecology. Any county or city may determine that portion
of a one-hundred-year-flood plain to be included in its master program
as long as such portion includes, as a minimum, the floodway and the
adjacent land extending landward two hundred feet therefrom;
(g) "Floodway" means those portions of the area of a river valley
lying streamward from the outer limits of a watercourse upon which
flood waters are carried during periods of flooding that occur with
reasonable regularity, although not necessarily annually, said floodway
being identified, under normal condition, by changes in surface soil
conditions or changes in types or quality of vegetative ground cover
condition. The floodway shall not include those lands that can
reasonably be expected to be protected from flood waters by flood
control devices maintained by or maintained under license from the
federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of the state;
(h) "Wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by
surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration sufficient to
support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence
of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions.
Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas.
Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and
drainage ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities,
wastewater treatment facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities,
or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally
created as a result of the construction of a road, street, or highway.
Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland areas to mitigate the conversion of wetlands.
(3) Procedural terms:
(a) (("Guidelines" means those standards adopted to implement the
policy of this chapter for regulation of use of the shorelines of the
state prior to adoption of master programs. Such standards shall also
provide criteria to local governments and the department in developing
master programs;
(b))) "Master program" shall mean the comprehensive use plan for a
described area, and the use regulations together with maps, diagrams,
charts, or other descriptive material and text, a statement of desired
goals, and standards developed in accordance with the policies
enunciated in RCW 90.58.020;
(((c))) (b) "State master program" is the cumulative total of all
master programs approved or adopted by the department of ecology;
(((d))) (c) "Development" means a use consisting of the
construction or exterior alteration of structures; dredging; drilling;
dumping; filling; removal of any sand, gravel, or minerals;
bulkheading; driving of piling; placing of obstructions; or any project
of a permanent or temporary nature which interferes with the normal
public use of the surface of the waters overlying lands subject to this
chapter at any state of water level;
(((e))) (d) "Substantial development" shall mean any development of
which the total cost or fair market value exceeds five thousand
dollars, or any development which materially interferes with the normal
public use of the water or shorelines of the state. The dollar
threshold established in this subsection (3)(((e))) (d) must be
adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five
years, beginning July 1, 2007, based upon changes in the consumer price
index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index,
Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers,
all items, compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United
States department of labor. The office of financial management must
calculate the new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the
code reviser for publication in the Washington State Register at least
one month before the new dollar threshold is to take effect. The
following shall not be considered substantial developments for the
purpose of this chapter:
(i) Normal maintenance or repair of existing structures or
developments, including damage by accident, fire, or elements;
(ii) Construction of the normal protective bulkhead common to
single family residences;
(iii) Emergency construction necessary to protect property from
damage by the elements;
(iv) Construction and practices normal or necessary for farming,
irrigation, and ranching activities, including agricultural service
roads and utilities on shorelands, and the construction and maintenance
of irrigation structures including but not limited to head gates,
pumping facilities, and irrigation channels. A feedlot of any size,
all processing plants, other activities of a commercial nature,
alteration of the contour of the shorelands by leveling or filling
other than that which results from normal cultivation, shall not be
considered normal or necessary farming or ranching activities. A
feedlot shall be an enclosure or facility used or capable of being used
for feeding livestock hay, grain, silage, or other livestock feed, but
shall not include land for growing crops or vegetation for livestock
feeding and/or grazing, nor shall it include normal livestock wintering
operations;
(v) Construction or modification of navigational aids such as
channel markers and anchor buoys;
(vi) Construction on shorelands by an owner, lessee, or contract
purchaser of a single family residence for his own use or for the use
of his or her family, which residence does not exceed a height of
thirty-five feet above average grade level and which meets all
requirements of the state agency or local government having
jurisdiction thereof, other than requirements imposed pursuant to this
chapter;
(vii) Construction of a dock, including a community dock, designed
for pleasure craft only, for the private noncommercial use of the
owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of single and multiple family
residences. This exception applies if either: (A) In salt waters, the
fair market value of the dock does not exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars; or (B) in fresh waters, the fair market value of the dock does
not exceed ten thousand dollars, but if subsequent construction having
a fair market value exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars occurs
within five years of completion of the prior construction, the
subsequent construction shall be considered a substantial development
for the purpose of this chapter;
(viii) Operation, maintenance, or construction of canals,
waterways, drains, reservoirs, or other facilities that now exist or
are hereafter created or developed as a part of an irrigation system
for the primary purpose of making use of system waters, including
return flow and artificially stored ground water for the irrigation of
lands;
(ix) The marking of property lines or corners on state owned lands,
when such marking does not significantly interfere with normal public
use of the surface of the water;
(x) Operation and maintenance of any system of dikes, ditches,
drains, or other facilities existing on September 8, 1975, which were
created, developed, or utilized primarily as a part of an agricultural
drainage or diking system;
(xi) Site exploration and investigation activities that are
prerequisite to preparation of an application for development
authorization under this chapter, if:
(A) The activity does not interfere with the normal public use of
the surface waters;
(B) The activity will have no significant adverse impact on the
environment including, but not limited to, fish, wildlife, fish or
wildlife habitat, water quality, and aesthetic values;
(C) The activity does not involve the installation of a structure,
and upon completion of the activity the vegetation and land
configuration of the site are restored to conditions existing before
the activity;
(D) A private entity seeking development authorization under this
section first posts a performance bond or provides other evidence of
financial responsibility to the local jurisdiction to ensure that the
site is restored to preexisting conditions; and
(E) The activity is not subject to the permit requirements of RCW
90.58.550;
(xii) The process of removing or controlling an aquatic noxious
weed, as defined in RCW 17.26.020, through the use of an herbicide or
other treatment methods applicable to weed control that are recommended
by a final environmental impact statement published by the department
of agriculture or the department jointly with other state agencies
under chapter 43.21C RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 90.58.065 and 2002 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((guidelines adopted by the department and)) master
programs developed or amended by local governments ((according to RCW
90.58.080)) shall not require modification of or limit agricultural
activities occurring on agricultural lands. In jurisdictions where
agricultural activities occur, master programs developed or amended
after June 13, 2002, shall include provisions addressing new
agricultural activities on land not meeting the definition of
agricultural land, conversion of agricultural lands to other uses, and
development not meeting the definition of agricultural activities.
Nothing in this section limits or changes the terms of the current
exception to the definition of substantial development in RCW
90.58.030(3)(e)(iv). This section applies only to this chapter, and
shall not affect any other authority of local governments.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Agricultural activities" means agricultural uses and practices
including, but not limited to: Producing, breeding, or increasing
agricultural products; rotating and changing agricultural crops;
allowing land used for agricultural activities to lie fallow in which
it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land used for
agricultural activities to lie dormant as a result of adverse
agricultural market conditions; allowing land used for agricultural
activities to lie dormant because the land is enrolled in a local,
state, or federal conservation program, or the land is subject to a
conservation easement; conducting agricultural operations; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural equipment; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural facilities, provided that the
replacement facility is no closer to the shoreline than the original
facility; and maintaining agricultural lands under production or
cultivation;
(b) "Agricultural products" includes but is not limited to
horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, vegetable, fruit, berry,
grain, hops, hay, straw, turf, sod, seed, and apiary products; feed or
forage for livestock; Christmas trees; hybrid cottonwood and similar
hardwood trees grown as crops and harvested within twenty years of
planting; and livestock including both the animals themselves and
animal products including but not limited to meat, upland finfish,
poultry and poultry products, and dairy products;
(c) "Agricultural equipment" and "agricultural facilities"
includes, but is not limited to: (i) The following used in
agricultural operations: Equipment; machinery; constructed shelters,
buildings, and ponds; fences; upland finfish rearing facilities; water
diversion, withdrawal, conveyance, and use equipment and facilities
including but not limited to pumps, pipes, tapes, canals, ditches, and
drains; (ii) corridors and facilities for transporting personnel,
livestock, and equipment to, from, and within agricultural lands; (iii)
farm residences and associated equipment, lands, and facilities; and
(iv) roadside stands and on-farm markets for marketing fruit or
vegetables; and
(d) "Agricultural land" means those specific land areas on which
agriculture activities are conducted.
(3) ((The department and)) Local governments shall assure that
local shoreline master programs use definitions consistent with the
definitions in this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 90.58.090 and 1997 c 429 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A master program, segment of a master program, or an amendment
to a master program shall become effective when approved by the
department. ((Within the time period provided in RCW 90.58.080,)) Each
local government shall have submitted a master program, either totally
or by segments, for all shorelines of the state within its jurisdiction
to the department for review and approval.
(2) Upon receipt of a proposed master program or amendment, the
department shall:
(a) Provide notice to and opportunity for written comment by all
interested parties of record as a part of the local government review
process for the proposal and to all persons, groups, and agencies that
have requested in writing notice of proposed master programs or
amendments generally or for a specific area, subject matter, or issue.
The comment period shall be at least thirty days, unless the department
determines that the level of complexity or controversy involved
supports a shorter period;
(b) In the department's discretion, conduct a public hearing during
the thirty-day comment period in the jurisdiction proposing the master
program or amendment;
(c) Within fifteen days after the close of public comment, request
the local government to review the issues identified by the public,
interested parties, groups, and agencies and provide a written response
as to how the proposal addresses the identified issues;
(d) Within thirty days after receipt of the local government
response pursuant to (c) of this subsection, make written findings and
conclusions regarding the consistency of the proposal with the policy
of RCW 90.58.020 and ((the applicable guidelines)) chapter 90.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 8 of this act), provide a response to the issues
identified in (c) of this subsection, and either approve the proposal
as submitted, recommend specific changes necessary to make the proposal
approvable, or deny approval of the proposal in those instances where
no alteration of the proposal appears likely to be consistent with the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and ((the applicable guidelines)) chapter 90.--RCW (sections 1 through 8 of this act). The written findings and
conclusions shall be provided to the local government, all interested
persons, parties, groups, and agencies of record on the proposal;
(e) If the department recommends changes to the proposed master
program or amendment, within thirty days after the department mails the
written findings and conclusions to the local government, the local
government may:
(i) Agree to the proposed changes. The receipt by the department
of the written notice of agreement constitutes final action by the
department approving the amendment; or
(ii) Submit an alternative proposal. If, in the opinion of the
department, the alternative is consistent with the purpose and intent
of the changes originally submitted by the department and with this
chapter it shall approve the changes and provide written notice to all
recipients of the written findings and conclusions. If the department
determines the proposal is not consistent with the purpose and intent
of the changes proposed by the department, the department may resubmit
the proposal for public and agency review pursuant to this section or
reject the proposal.
(3) The department shall approve the segment of a master program
relating to shorelines unless it determines that the submitted segments
are not consistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and ((the
applicable guidelines)) chapter 90.-- RCW (sections 1 through 8 of this
act).
(4) The department shall approve those segments of the master
program relating to shorelines of statewide significance only after
determining the program provides the optimum implementation of the
policy of this chapter to satisfy the statewide interest. If the
department does not approve a segment of a local government master
program relating to a shoreline of statewide significance, the
department may develop and ((by rule)) adopt an alternative to the
local government's proposal.
(5) In the event a local government has not complied with the
requirements of RCW 90.58.070 it may thereafter upon written notice to
the department elect to adopt a master program for the shorelines
within its jurisdiction, in which event it shall comply with the
provisions established by this chapter for the adoption of a master
program for such shorelines.
Upon approval of such master program by the department it shall
supersede such master program as may have been adopted by the
department for such shorelines.
(6) A master program or amendment to a master program takes effect
when and in such form as approved or adopted by the department.
Shoreline master programs that were adopted by the department prior to
July 22, 1995, in accordance with the provisions of this section then
in effect, shall be deemed approved by the department in accordance
with the provisions of this section that became effective on that date.
The department shall maintain a record of each master program, the
action taken on any proposal for adoption or amendment of the master
program, and any appeal of the department's action. The department's
approved document of record constitutes the official master program.

Sec. 13 RCW 90.58.100 and 1997 c 369 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The master programs provided for in this chapter, when adopted
or approved by the department shall constitute use regulations for the
various shorelines of the state. In preparing the master programs, and
any amendments thereto, the department and local governments shall to
the extent feasible:
(a) Utilize a systematic interdisciplinary approach which will
insure the integrated use of the natural and social sciences and the
environmental design arts;
(b) Consult with and obtain the comments of any federal, state,
regional, or local agency having any special expertise with respect to
any environmental impact;
(c) Consider all plans, studies, surveys, inventories, and systems
of classification made or being made by federal, state, regional, or
local agencies, by private individuals, or by organizations dealing
with pertinent shorelines of the state;
(d) Conduct or support such further research, studies, surveys, and
interviews as are deemed necessary;
(e) Utilize all available information regarding hydrology,
geography, topography, ecology, economics, and other pertinent data;
(f) Employ, when feasible, all appropriate, modern scientific data
processing and computer techniques to store, index, analyze, and manage
the information gathered.
(2) The master programs shall include, when appropriate, the
following:
(a) An economic development element for the location and design of
industries, industrial projects of statewide significance,
transportation facilities, port facilities, tourist facilities,
commerce and other developments that are particularly dependent on
their location on or use of the shorelines of the state;
(b) A public access element making provision for public access to
publicly owned areas;
(c) A recreational element for the preservation and enlargement of
recreational opportunities, including but not limited to parks,
tidelands, beaches, and recreational areas;
(d) A circulation element consisting of the general location and
extent of existing and proposed major thoroughfares, transportation
routes, terminals, and other public utilities and facilities, all
correlated with the shoreline use element;
(e) A use element which considers the proposed general distribution
and general location and extent of the use on shorelines and adjacent
land areas for housing, business, industry, transportation,
agriculture, natural resources, recreation, education, public buildings
and grounds, and other categories of public and private uses of the
land;
(f) A conservation element for the preservation of natural
resources, including but not limited to scenic vistas, aesthetics, and
vital estuarine areas for fisheries and wildlife protection;
(g) An historic, cultural, scientific, and educational element for
the protection and restoration of buildings, sites, and areas having
historic, cultural, scientific, or educational values;
(h) An element that gives consideration to the statewide interest
in the prevention and minimization of flood damages; and
(i) Any other element deemed appropriate or necessary to effectuate
the policy of this chapter.
(3) The master programs shall include such map or maps, descriptive
text, diagrams and charts, or other descriptive material as are
necessary to provide for ease of understanding.
(4) Master programs will reflect that state-owned shorelines of the
state are particularly adapted to providing wilderness beaches,
ecological study areas, and other recreational activities for the
public and will give appropriate special consideration to same.
(5) Each master program shall contain provisions to allow for the
varying of the application of use regulations of the program, including
provisions for permits for conditional uses and variances, to insure
that strict implementation of a program will not create unnecessary
hardships or thwart the policy enumerated in RCW 90.58.020. Any such
varying shall be allowed only if extraordinary circumstances are shown
and the public interest suffers no substantial detrimental effect.
((The concept of this subsection shall be incorporated in the rules
adopted by the department relating to the establishment of a permit
system as provided in RCW 90.58.140(3).))
(6) Each master program shall contain standards governing the
protection of single family residences and appurtenant structures
against damage or loss due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall
govern the issuance of substantial development permits for shoreline
protection, including structural methods such as construction of
bulkheads, and nonstructural methods of protection. The standards
shall provide for methods which achieve effective and timely protection
against loss or damage to single family residences and appurtenant
structures due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall provide a
preference for permit issuance for measures to protect single family
residences occupied prior to January 1, 1992, where the proposed
measure is designed to minimize harm to the shoreline natural
environment.

Sec. 14 RCW 90.58.120 and 1995 c 347 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
((All rules, regulations, designations, and guidelines, issued by
the department, and)) Master programs and amendments adopted by the
department pursuant to RCW 90.58.070(2) or 90.58.090(4) shall be
adopted or approved in accordance with the provisions of RCW 34.05.310
through 34.05.395 insofar as such provisions are not inconsistent with
the provisions of this chapter. In addition:
(1) Prior to the adoption by the department of a master program, or
portion thereof pursuant to RCW 90.58.070(2) or 90.58.090(4), at least
one public hearing shall be held in each county affected by a program
or portion thereof for the purpose of obtaining the views and comments
of the public. Notice of each such hearing shall be published at least
once in each of the three weeks immediately preceding the hearing in
one or more newspapers of general circulation in the county in which
the hearing is to be held.
(2) All ((guidelines, regulations, designations, or)) master
programs adopted or approved under this chapter shall be available for
public inspection at the office of the department or the appropriate
county and city. ((The terms "adopt" and "approve" for purposes of
this section, shall include modifications and rescission of
guidelines.))

Sec. 15 RCW 90.58.130 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
To insure that all persons and entities having an interest in ((the
guidelines and)) master programs developed under this chapter are
provided with a full opportunity for involvement in both their
development and implementation, the department and local governments
shall:
(1) Make reasonable efforts to inform the people of the state about
the shoreline management program of this chapter and in the performance
of the responsibilities provided in this chapter, shall not only invite
but actively encourage participation by all persons and private groups
and entities showing an interest in shoreline management programs of
this chapter; and
(2) Invite and encourage participation by all agencies of federal,
state, and local government, including municipal and public
corporations, having interests or responsibilities relating to the
shorelines of the state. State and local agencies are directed to
participate fully to insure that their interests are fully considered
by the department and local governments.

Sec. 16 RCW 90.58.140 and 1995 c 347 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A development shall not be undertaken on the shorelines of the
state unless it is consistent with the policy of this chapter and,
after adoption or approval, as appropriate, the applicable
((guidelines, rules,)) provisions of chapter 90.-- RCW (sections 1
through 8 of this act) or the master program.
(2) A substantial development shall not be undertaken on shorelines
of the state without first obtaining a permit from the government
entity having administrative jurisdiction under this chapter.
A permit shall be granted:
(a) From June 1, 1971, until such time as an applicable master
program has become effective, only when the development proposed is
consistent with: (i) The policy of RCW 90.58.020; and (ii) ((after
their adoption, the guidelines and rules of the department; and (iii)))
so far as can be ascertained, the master program being developed for
the area;
(b) After adoption or approval, as appropriate, by the department
of an applicable master program, only when the development proposed is
consistent with the applicable master program and this chapter.
(3) The local government shall establish a program, consistent with
((rules adopted by the department)) chapter 90.-- RCW (sections 1
through 8 of this act), for the administration and enforcement of the
permit system provided in this section. The administration of the
system so established shall be performed exclusively by the local
government.
(4) Except as otherwise specifically provided in subsection (11) of
this section, the local government shall require notification of the
public of all applications for permits governed by any permit system
established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by ensuring that
notice of the application is given by at least one of the following
methods:
(a) Mailing of the notice to the latest recorded real property
owners as shown by the records of the county assessor within at least
three hundred feet of the boundary of the property upon which the
substantial development is proposed;
(b) Posting of the notice in a conspicuous manner on the property
upon which the project is to be constructed; or
(c) Any other manner deemed appropriate by local authorities to
accomplish the objectives of reasonable notice to adjacent landowners
and the public.
The notices shall include a statement that any person desiring to
submit written comments concerning an application, or desiring to
receive notification of the final decision concerning an application as
expeditiously as possible after the issuance of the decision, may
submit the comments or requests for decisions to the local government
within thirty days of the last date the notice is to be published
pursuant to this subsection. The local government shall forward, in a
timely manner following the issuance of a decision, a copy of the
decision to each person who submits a request for the decision.
If a hearing is to be held on an application, notices of such a
hearing shall include a statement that any person may submit oral or
written comments on an application at the hearing.
(5) The system shall include provisions to assure that construction
pursuant to a permit will not begin or be authorized until twenty-one
days from the date the permit decision was filed as provided in
subsection (6) of this section; or until all review proceedings are
terminated if the proceedings were initiated within twenty-one days
from the date of filing as defined in subsection (6) of this section
except as follows:
(a) In the case of any permit issued to the state of Washington,
department of transportation, for the construction and modification of
SR 90 (I-90) on or adjacent to Lake Washington, the construction may
begin after thirty days from the date of filing, and the permits are
valid until December 31, 1995;
(b) Construction may be commenced no sooner than thirty days after
the date of the appeal of the board's decision is filed if a permit is
granted by the local government and (i) the granting of the permit is
appealed to the shorelines hearings board within twenty-one days of the
date of filing, (ii) the hearings board approves the granting of the
permit by the local government or approves a portion of the substantial
development for which the local government issued the permit, and (iii)
an appeal for judicial review of the hearings board decision is filed
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. The appellant may request, within ten
days of the filing of the appeal with the court, a hearing before the
court to determine whether construction pursuant to the permit approved
by the hearings board or to a revised permit issued pursuant to the
order of the hearings board should not commence. If, at the conclusion
of the hearing, the court finds that construction pursuant to such a
permit would involve a significant, irreversible damaging of the
environment, the court shall prohibit the permittee from commencing the
construction pursuant to the approved or revised permit until all
review proceedings are final. Construction pursuant to a permit
revised at the direction of the hearings board may begin only on that
portion of the substantial development for which the local government
had originally issued the permit, and construction pursuant to such a
revised permit on other portions of the substantial development may not
begin until after all review proceedings are terminated. In such a
hearing before the court, the burden of proving whether the
construction may involve significant irreversible damage to the
environment and demonstrating whether such construction would or would
not be appropriate is on the appellant;
(c) If the permit is for a substantial development meeting the
requirements of subsection (11) of this section, construction pursuant
to that permit may not begin or be authorized until twenty-one days
from the date the permit decision was filed as provided in subsection
(6) of this section.
If a permittee begins construction pursuant to subsections (a),
(b), or (c) of this subsection, the construction is begun at the
permittee's own risk. If, as a result of judicial review, the courts
order the removal of any portion of the construction or the restoration
of any portion of the environment involved or require the alteration of
any portion of a substantial development constructed pursuant to a
permit, the permittee is barred from recovering damages or costs
involved in adhering to such requirements from the local government
that granted the permit, the hearings board, or any appellant or
intervener.
(6) Any decision on an application for a permit under the authority
of this section, whether it is an approval or a denial, shall,
concurrently with the transmittal of the ruling to the applicant, be
filed with the department and the attorney general. With regard to a
permit other than a permit governed by subsection (10) of this section,
"date of filing" as used herein means the date of actual receipt by the
department. With regard to a permit for a variance or a conditional
use, "date of filing" means the date a decision of the department
rendered on the permit pursuant to subsection (10) of this section is
transmitted by the department to the local government. The department
shall notify in writing the local government and the applicant of the
date of filing.
(7) Applicants for permits under this section have the burden of
proving that a proposed substantial development is consistent with the
criteria that must be met before a permit is granted. In any review of
the granting or denial of an application for a permit as provided in
RCW 90.58.180 (1) and (2), the person requesting the review has the
burden of proof.
(8) Any permit may, after a hearing with adequate notice to the
permittee and the public, be rescinded by the issuing authority upon
the finding that a permittee has not complied with conditions of a
permit. If the department is of the opinion that noncompliance exists,
the department shall provide written notice to the local government and
the permittee. If the department is of the opinion that the
noncompliance continues to exist thirty days after the date of the
notice, and the local government has taken no action to rescind the
permit, the department may petition the hearings board for a rescission
of the permit upon written notice of the petition to the local
government and the permittee if the request by the department is made
to the hearings board within fifteen days of the termination of the
thirty-day notice to the local government.
(9) The holder of a certification from the governor pursuant to
chapter 80.50 RCW shall not be required to obtain a permit under this
section.
(10) Any permit for a variance or a conditional use by local
government under approved master programs must be submitted to the
department for its approval or disapproval.
(11)(a) An application for a substantial development permit for a
limited utility extension or for the construction of a bulkhead or
other measures to protect a single family residence and its appurtenant
structures from shoreline erosion shall be subject to the following
procedures:
(i) The public comment period under subsection (4) of this section
shall be twenty days. The notice provided under subsection (4) of this
section shall state the manner in which the public may obtain a copy of
the local government decision on the application no later than two days
following its issuance;
(ii) The local government shall issue its decision to grant or deny
the permit within twenty-one days of the last day of the comment period
specified in (i) of this subsection; and
(iii) If there is an appeal of the decision to grant or deny the
permit to the local government legislative authority, the appeal shall
be finally determined by the legislative authority within thirty days.
(b) For purposes of this section, a limited utility extension means
the extension of a utility service that:
(i) Is categorically exempt under chapter 43.21C RCW for one or
more of the following: Natural gas, electricity, telephone, water, or
sewer;
(ii) Will serve an existing use in compliance with this chapter;
and
(iii) Will not extend more than twenty-five hundred linear feet
within the shorelines of the state.

Sec. 17 RCW 90.58.180 and 1997 c 199 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person aggrieved by the granting, denying, or rescinding of
a permit on shorelines of the state pursuant to RCW 90.58.140 may seek
review from the shorelines hearings board by filing a petition for
review within twenty-one days of the date of filing as defined in RCW
90.58.140(6).
Within seven days of the filing of any petition for review with the
board as provided in this section pertaining to a final decision of a
local government, the petitioner shall serve copies of the petition on
the department, the office of the attorney general, and the local
government. The department and the attorney general may intervene to
protect the public interest and insure that the provisions of this
chapter are complied with at any time within fifteen days from the date
of the receipt by the department or the attorney general of a copy of
the petition for review filed pursuant to this section. The shorelines
hearings board shall schedule review proceedings on the petition for
review without regard as to whether the period for the department or
the attorney general to intervene has or has not expired.
(2) The department or the attorney general may obtain review of any
final decision granting a permit, or granting or denying an application
for a permit issued by a local government by filing a written petition
with the shorelines hearings board and the appropriate local government
within twenty-one days from the date the final decision was filed as
provided in RCW 90.58.140(6).
(3) The review proceedings authorized in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section are subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW
pertaining to procedures in adjudicative proceedings. Judicial review
of such proceedings of the shorelines hearings board is governed by
chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall issue its decision on the appeal
authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section within one
hundred eighty days after the date the petition is filed with the board
or a petition to intervene is filed by the department or the attorney
general, whichever is later. The time period may be extended by the
board for a period of thirty days upon a showing of good cause or may
be waived by the parties.
(((4) Any person may appeal any rules, regulations, or guidelines
adopted or approved by the department within thirty days of the date of
the adoption or approval. The board shall make a final decision within
sixty days following the hearing held thereon.
(5) The board shall find the rule, regulation, or guideline to be
valid and enter a final decision to that effect unless it determines
that the rule, regulation, or guideline:
(a) Is clearly erroneous in light of the policy of this chapter; or
(b) Constitutes an implementation of this chapter in violation of
constitutional or statutory provisions; or
(c) Is arbitrary and capricious; or
(d) Was developed without fully considering and evaluating all
material submitted to the department during public review and comment;
or
(e) Was not adopted in accordance with required procedures.
(6) If the board makes a determination under subsection (5)(a)
through (e) of this section, it shall enter a final decision declaring
the rule, regulation, or guideline invalid, remanding the rule,
regulation, or guideline to the department with a statement of the
reasons in support of the determination, and directing the department
to adopt, after a thorough consultation with the affected local
government and any other interested party, a new rule, regulation, or
guideline consistent with the board's decision.
(7) A decision of the board on the validity of a rule, regulation,
or guideline shall be subject to review in superior court, if
authorized pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. A petition for review of the
decision of the shorelines hearings board on a rule, regulation, or
guideline shall be filed within thirty days after the date of final
decision by the shorelines hearings board.))

Sec. 18 RCW 90.58.190 and 1995 c 347 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The appeal of the department's decision to adopt a master
program or amendment pursuant to RCW 90.58.070(2) or 90.58.090(4) is
governed by RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(2)(a) The department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a
proposed master program or amendment adopted by a local government
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the growth
management hearings board with jurisdiction over the local government.
The appeal shall be initiated by filing a petition as provided in RCW
36.70A.250 through 36.70A.320.
(b) If the appeal to the growth management hearings board concerns
shorelines, the growth management hearings board shall review the
proposed master program or amendment for compliance with the
requirements of this chapter and chapter 36.70A RCW, the policy of RCW
90.58.020 and ((the applicable guidelines)) chapter 90.-- RCW (sections
1 through 8 of this act), and chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to the
adoption of master programs and amendments under chapter 90.58 RCW.
(c) If the appeal to the growth management hearings board concerns
a shoreline of statewide significance, the board shall uphold the
decision by the department unless the board, by clear and convincing
evidence, determines that the decision of the department is
inconsistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and ((the applicable
guidelines)) chapter 90.-- RCW (sections 1 through 8 of this act).
(d) The appellant has the burden of proof in all appeals to the
growth management hearings board under this subsection.
(e) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of a growth management
hearings board under this subsection may appeal the decision to
superior court as provided in RCW 36.70A.300.
(3)(a) The department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a
proposed master program or master program amendment by a local
government not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the
shorelines hearings board by filing a petition within thirty days of
the date of the department's written notice to the local government of
the department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a proposed
master program or master program amendment as provided in RCW
90.58.090(2).
(b) In an appeal relating to shorelines, the shorelines hearings
board shall review the proposed master program or master program
amendment and, after full consideration of the presentations of the
local government and the department, shall determine the validity of
the local government's master program or amendment in light of the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and ((the applicable guidelines)) chapter 90.--RCW (sections 1 through 8 of this act).
(c) In an appeal relating to shorelines of statewide significance,
the shorelines hearings board shall uphold the decision by the
department unless the board determines, by clear and convincing
evidence that the decision of the department is inconsistent with the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and ((the applicable guidelines)) chapter 90.--RCW (sections 1 through 8 of this act).
(d) Review by the shorelines hearings board shall be considered an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative
Procedure Act. The aggrieved local government shall have the burden of
proof in all such reviews.
(e) Whenever possible, the review by the shorelines hearings board
shall be heard within the county where the land subject to the proposed
master program or master program amendment is primarily located. The
department and any local government aggrieved by a final decision of
the hearings board may appeal the decision to superior court as
provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) A master program amendment shall become effective after the
approval of the department or after the decision of the shorelines
hearings board to uphold the master program or master program
amendment, provided that the board may remand the master program or
master program adjustment to the local government or the department for
modification prior to the final adoption of the master program or
master program amendment.

Sec. 19 RCW 90.58.195 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 2 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1) The department of ecology, in cooperation with other state
agencies and coastal local governments, shall prepare and adopt ocean
use guidelines and policies to be used in reviewing, and where
appropriate, amending, shoreline master programs of local governments
with coastal waters or coastal shorelines within their boundaries.
These guidelines shall be finalized by April 1, 1990.
(2) After the department of ecology has adopted the guidelines
required in subsection (1) of this section,)) Counties, cities, and
towns with coastal waters or coastal shorelines shall review their
shoreline master programs to ensure that the programs conform with RCW
43.143.010 and 43.143.030 ((and with the department of ecology's ocean
use guidelines. Amended master programs shall be submitted to the
department of ecology for its approval under RCW 90.58.090 by June 30,
1991)).

Sec. 20 RCW 90.58.200 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 20 are each amended
to read as follows:
((The department and)) Local governments are authorized to adopt
such rules as are necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions
of this chapter.

Sec. 21 RCW 90.58.250 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 25 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department is directed to cooperate fully with local
governments in discharging their responsibilities under this chapter.
Funds shall be available for distribution to local governments on the
basis of applications for preparation of master programs. Such
applications shall be submitted ((in accordance with regulations
developed by)) to the department. The department is authorized to make
and administer grants within appropriations authorized by the
legislature to any local government within the state for the purpose of
developing a master shorelines program.
No grant shall be made in an amount in excess of the recipient's
contribution to the estimated cost of such program.

Sec. 22 RCW 90.58.340 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 34 are each amended
to read as follows:
All state agencies, counties, and public and municipal corporations
shall review administrative and management policies, regulations,
plans, and ordinances relative to lands under their respective
jurisdictions adjacent to the shorelines of the state so as ((the
[to])) to achieve a use policy on said land consistent with the policy
of this chapter((, the guidelines,)) and chapter 90.-- RCW (sections 1
through 8 of this act) and the master programs for the shorelines of
the state. The department may develop recommendations for land use
control for such lands. Local governments shall, in developing use
regulations for such areas, take into consideration any recommendations
developed by the department as well as any other state agencies or
units of local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 90.58.060 (Review and adoption of guidelines -- Public
hearings, notice of -- Amendments) and 1995 c 347 s 304 & 1971 ex.s. c
286 s 6; and
(2) RCW 90.58.080 (Timetable for local governments to develop or
amend master programs) and 1995 c 347 s 305, 1974 ex.s. c 61 s 1, &
1971 ex.s. c 286 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

--- END ---