BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
to read as follows:
Any member receiving or having received a distribution under
chapter 41.34 RCW may make an irrevocable choice to waive all rights to
a benefit under RCW 41.32.840 by notifying the department in writing of
their intention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
to read as follows:
Any member receiving or having received a distribution under
chapter 41.34 RCW may make an irrevocable choice to waive all rights to
a benefit under RCW 41.35.620 by notifying the department in writing of
their intention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
to read as follows:
Any member receiving or having received a distribution under
chapter 41.34 RCW may make an irrevocable choice to waive all rights to
a benefit under RCW 41.40.790 by notifying the department in writing of
their intention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---