BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
transfer the duties and functions, including the ability to accept
contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise, of the Washington
council for the prevention of child abuse and neglect to the family
policy council. Any references in this code to the Washington council
for the prevention of child abuse and neglect shall be construed to
mean the family policy council.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.190.010 and 1996 c 132 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrative costs" means the costs associated with
procurement; payroll processing; personnel functions; management;
maintenance and operation of space and property; data processing and
computer services; accounting; budgeting; auditing; indirect costs; and
organizational planning, consultation, coordination, and training.
(2) "Assessment" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.70.010.
(3) "At-risk" children are children who engage in or are victims of
at-risk behaviors.
(4) "At-risk behaviors" means violent delinquent acts, teen
substance abuse, teen pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide
attempts, dropping out of school, child abuse or neglect, and domestic
violence.
(5) "Child" means an unmarried person who is under eighteen years
of age.
(6) "Community public health and safety networks" or "networks"
means the organizations authorized under RCW 70.190.060.
(((6))) (7) "Comprehensive plan" means a two-year plan that
examines available resources and unmet needs for a county or
multicounty area, barriers that limit the effective use of resources,
and a plan to address these issues that is broadly supported by local
residents.
(((7))) (8) "Participating state agencies" means the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of social and
health services, the department of health, the employment security
department, the department of community, trade, and economic
development, and such other departments as may be specifically
designated by the governor.
(((8))) (9) "Family policy council" or "council" means the
superintendent of public instruction, the secretary of social and
health services, the secretary of health, the commissioner of the
employment security department, and the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development or their designees, one
legislator from each caucus of the senate and house of representatives,
and one representative of the governor.
(((9))) (10) "Fiduciary interest" means (a) the right to
compensation from a health, educational, social service, or justice
system organization that receives public funds, or (b) budgetary or
policy-making authority for an organization listed in (a) of this
subsection. A person who acts solely in an advisory capacity and
receives no compensation from a health, educational, social service, or
justice system organization, and who has no budgetary or policy-making
authority is deemed to have no fiduciary interest in the organization.
(((10))) (11) "Outcome" or "outcome based" means defined and
measurable outcomes used to evaluate progress in reducing the rate of
at-risk children and youth through reducing risk factors and increasing
protective factors.
(((11))) (12) "Matching funds" means an amount no less than twenty-five percent of the amount budgeted for a network. The network's
matching funds may be in-kind goods and services. Funding sources
allowable for match include appropriate federal or local levy funds,
private charitable funding, and other charitable giving. Basic
education funds shall not be used as a match. State general funds
shall not be used as a match for violence reduction and drug
enforcement account funds created under RCW 69.50.520.
(((12))) (13) "Policy development" has the same meaning as provided
in RCW 43.70.010.
(((13))) (14) "Primary prevention" of child abuse and neglect means
any effort designed to inhibit or preclude the initial occurrence of
child abuse and neglect, both by the promotion of positive parenting
and family interaction, and the remediation of factors linked to causes
of child maltreatment.
(15) "Protective factors" means those factors determined by the
department of health to be empirically associated with behaviors that
contribute to socially acceptable and healthy nonviolent behaviors.
Protective factors include promulgation, identification, and acceptance
of community norms regarding appropriate behaviors in the area of
delinquency, early sexual activity, alcohol and substance abuse,
educational opportunities, employment opportunities, and absence of
crime.
(((14))) (16) "Risk factors" means those factors determined by the
department of health to be empirically associated with at-risk
behaviors that contribute to violence.
(17) "Secondary prevention" means services and programs that
identify and assist families under such stress that abuse or neglect is
likely or families display symptoms associated with child abuse or
neglect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 43.121.050, 43.121.060, 43.121.100,
43.121.140, and 43.121.150 are each recodified as new sections in
chapter 70.190 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.121.010 (Legislative declaration, intent) and 1982 c 4
s 1;
(2) RCW 43.121.015 (Definitions) and 1988 c 278 s 4 & 1987 c 351 s
2;
(3) RCW 43.121.020 (Council established -- Members, chairperson--Appointment, qualifications, terms, vacancies) and 1996 c 10 s 1, 1994
c 48 s 1, 1989 c 304 s 4, 1987 c 351 s 3, 1984 c 261 s 1, & 1982 c 4 s
2;
(4) RCW 43.121.030 (Compensation and travel expenses of members)
and 1984 c 287 s 87 & 1982 c 4 s 3;
(5) RCW 43.121.040 (Executive director, salary -- Staff) and 1982 c
4 s 4;
(6) RCW 43.121.070 (Contracts for services -- Factors in awarding)
and 1982 c 4 s 7;
(7) RCW 43.121.080 (Contracts for services -- Partial funding by
administering organization, what constitutes) and 1982 c 4 s 8;
(8) RCW 43.121.110 (Parenting skills -- Legislative findings) and
1988 c 278 s 1;
(9) RCW 43.121.120 (Community-based early parenting skills
programs -- Funding) and 1988 c 278 s 2;
(10) RCW 43.121.130 (Decreased state funding of parenting skills
programs -- Evaluation) and 1998 c 245 s 48 & 1988 c 278 s 3; and
(11) RCW 43.121.910 (Severability -- 1982 c 4) and 1982 c 4 s 15.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---