BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.04.005 and 2000 c 218 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this title, unless the context indicates
otherwise, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Public assistance" or "assistance" -- Public aid to persons in
need thereof for any cause, including services, medical care,
assistance grants, disbursing orders, work relief, general assistance
and federal-aid assistance.
(2) "Department" -- The department of social and health services.
(3) "County or local office" -- The administrative office for one or
more counties or designated service areas.
(4) "Director" or "secretary" means the secretary of social and
health services.
(5) "Federal-aid assistance" -- The specific categories of assistance
for which provision is made in any federal law existing or hereafter
passed by which payments are made from the federal government to the
state in aid or in respect to payment by the state for public
assistance rendered to any category of needy persons for which
provision for federal funds or aid may from time to time be made, or a
federally administered needs-based program.
(6)(((a))) "General assistance" -- ((Aid to persons in need who:
(i) Are not eligible to receive federal-aid assistance, other than
food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically and
medical assistance; however, an individual who refuses or fails to
cooperate in obtaining federal-aid assistance, without good cause, is
not eligible for general assistance;
(ii) Meet one of the following conditions:
(A) Pregnant: PROVIDED, That need is based on the current income
and resource requirements of the federal temporary assistance for needy
families program; or
(B) Subject to chapter 165, Laws of 1992, incapacitated from
gainful employment by reason of bodily or mental infirmity that will
likely continue for a minimum of ninety days as determined by the
department.
(C) Persons who are unemployable due to alcohol or drug addiction
are not eligible for general assistance. Persons receiving general
assistance on July 26, 1987, or becoming eligible for such assistance
thereafter, due to an alcohol or drug-related incapacity, shall be
referred to appropriate assessment, treatment, shelter, or supplemental
security income referral services as authorized under chapter 74.50
RCW. Referrals shall be made at the time of application or at the time
of eligibility review. Alcoholic and drug addicted clients who are
receiving general assistance on July 26, 1987, may remain on general
assistance if they otherwise retain their eligibility until they are
assessed for services under chapter 74.50 RCW. Subsection
(6)(a)(ii)(B) of this section shall not be construed to prohibit the
department from granting general assistance benefits to alcoholics and
drug addicts who are incapacitated due to other physical or mental
conditions that meet the eligibility criteria for the general
assistance program;
(iii) Are citizens or aliens lawfully admitted for permanent
residence or otherwise residing in the United States under color of
law; and
(iv) Have furnished the department their social security account
number. If the social security account number cannot be furnished
because it has not been issued or is not known, an application for a
number shall be made prior to authorization of assistance, and the
social security number shall be provided to the department upon
receipt.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (6)(a)(i), (ii),
and (c) of this section, general assistance shall be provided to the
following recipients of federal-aid assistance:
(i) Recipients of supplemental security income whose need, as
defined in this section, is not met by such supplemental security
income grant because of separation from a spouse; or
(ii) To the extent authorized by the legislature in the biennial
appropriations act, to recipients of temporary assistance for needy
families whose needs are not being met because of a temporary reduction
in monthly income below the entitled benefit payment level caused by
loss or reduction of wages or unemployment compensation benefits or
some other unforeseen circumstances. The amount of general assistance
authorized shall not exceed the difference between the entitled benefit
payment level and the amount of income actually received.
(c) General assistance shall be provided only to persons who are
not members of assistance units receiving federal aid assistance,
except as provided in subsection (6)(a)(ii)(A) and (b) of this section,
and will accept available services which can reasonably be expected to
enable the person to work or reduce the need for assistance unless
there is good cause to refuse. Failure to accept such services shall
result in termination until the person agrees to cooperate in accepting
such services and subject to the following maximum periods of
ineligibility after reapplication:
(i) First failure: One week;
(ii) Second failure within six months: One month;
(iii) Third and subsequent failure within one year: Two months.
(d) Persons found eligible for general assistance based on
incapacity from gainful employment may, if otherwise eligible, receive
general assistance pending application for federal supplemental
security income benefits. Any general assistance that is subsequently
duplicated by the person's receipt of supplemental security income for
the same period shall be considered a debt due the state and shall by
operation of law be subject to recovery through all available legal
remedies.
(e) The department shall adopt by rule medical criteria for general
assistance eligibility to ensure that eligibility decisions are
consistent with statutory requirements and are based on clear,
objective medical information.
(f) The process implementing the medical criteria shall involve
consideration of opinions of the treating or consulting physicians or
health care professionals regarding incapacity, and any eligibility
decision which rejects uncontroverted medical opinion must set forth
clear and convincing reasons for doing so.
(g) Recipients of general assistance based upon a finding of
incapacity from gainful employment who remain otherwise eligible shall
not have their benefits terminated absent a clear showing of material
improvement in their medical or mental condition or specific error in
the prior determination that found the recipient eligible by reason of
incapacitation. Recipients of general assistance based upon pregnancy
who relinquish their child for adoption, remain otherwise eligible, and
are not eligible to receive benefits under the federal temporary
assistance for needy families program shall not have their benefits
terminated until the end of the month in which the period of six weeks
following the birth of the recipient's child falls. Recipients of the
federal temporary assistance for needy families program who lose their
eligibility solely because of the birth and relinquishment of the
qualifying child may receive general assistance through the end of the
month in which the period of six weeks following the birth of the child
falls.
(h) No person may be considered an eligible individual for general
assistance with respect to any month if during that month the person:
(i) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid custody or
confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt to commit a
felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the place from
which the person flees; or
(ii) Is violating a condition of probation, community supervision,
or parole imposed under federal or state law for a felony or gross
misdemeanor conviction)) An income assistance program for eligible
persons as described in section 2 of this act.
(7) "Applicant" -- Any person who has made a request, or on behalf of
whom a request has been made, to any county or local office for
assistance.
(8) "Recipient" -- Any person receiving assistance and in addition
those dependents whose needs are included in the recipient's
assistance.
(9) "Standards of assistance" -- The level of income required by an
applicant or recipient to maintain a level of living specified by the
department.
(10) "Resource" -- Any asset, tangible or intangible, owned by or
available to the applicant at the time of application, which can be
applied toward meeting the applicant's need, either directly or by
conversion into money or its equivalent. The department may by rule
designate resources that an applicant may retain and not be ineligible
for public assistance because of such resources. Exempt resources
shall include, but are not limited to:
(a) A home that an applicant, recipient, or their dependents is
living in, including the surrounding property;
(b) Household furnishings and personal effects;
(c) A motor vehicle, other than a motor home, used and useful
having an equity value not to exceed five thousand dollars;
(d) A motor vehicle necessary to transport a physically disabled
household member. This exclusion is limited to one vehicle per
physically disabled person;
(e) All other resources, including any excess of values exempted,
not to exceed one thousand dollars or other limit as set by the
department, to be consistent with limitations on resources and
exemptions necessary for federal aid assistance. The department shall
also allow recipients of temporary assistance for needy families to
exempt savings accounts with combined balances of up to an additional
three thousand dollars;
(f) Applicants for or recipients of general assistance shall have
their eligibility based on resource limitations consistent with the
temporary assistance for needy families program rules adopted by the
department; and
(g) If an applicant for or recipient of public assistance possesses
property and belongings in excess of the ceiling value, such value
shall be used in determining the need of the applicant or recipient,
except that: (i) The department may exempt resources or income when
the income and resources are determined necessary to the applicant's or
recipient's restoration to independence, to decrease the need for
public assistance, or to aid in rehabilitating the applicant or
recipient or a dependent of the applicant or recipient; and (ii) the
department may provide grant assistance for a period not to exceed nine
months from the date the agreement is signed pursuant to this section
to persons who are otherwise ineligible because of excess real property
owned by such persons when they are making a good faith effort to
dispose of that property: PROVIDED, That:
(A) The applicant or recipient signs an agreement to repay the
lesser of the amount of aid received or the net proceeds of such sale;
(B) If the owner of the excess property ceases to make good faith
efforts to sell the property, the entire amount of assistance may
become an overpayment and a debt due the state and may be recovered
pursuant to RCW 43.20B.630;
(C) Applicants and recipients are advised of their right to a fair
hearing and afforded the opportunity to challenge a decision that good
faith efforts to sell have ceased, prior to assessment of an
overpayment under this section; and
(D) At the time assistance is authorized, the department files a
lien without a sum certain on the specific property.
(11) "Income" -- (a) All appreciable gains in real or personal
property (cash or kind) or other assets, which are received by or
become available for use and enjoyment by an applicant or recipient
during the month of application or after applying for or receiving
public assistance. The department may by rule and regulation exempt
income received by an applicant for or recipient of public assistance
which can be used by him or her to decrease his or her need for public
assistance or to aid in rehabilitating him or her or his or her
dependents, but such exemption shall not, unless otherwise provided in
this title, exceed the exemptions of resources granted under this
chapter to an applicant for public assistance. In addition, for cash
assistance the department may disregard income pursuant to RCW
74.08A.230 and 74.12.350.
(b) If, under applicable federal requirements, the state has the
option of considering property in the form of lump sum compensatory
awards or related settlements received by an applicant or recipient as
income or as a resource, the department shall consider such property to
be a resource.
(12) "Need" -- The difference between the applicant's or recipient's
standards of assistance for himself or herself and the dependent
members of his or her family, as measured by the standards of the
department, and value of all nonexempt resources and nonexempt income
received by or available to the applicant or recipient and the
dependent members of his or her family.
(13) For purposes of determining eligibility for public assistance
and participation levels in the cost of medical care, the department
shall exempt restitution payments made to people of Japanese and Aleut
ancestry pursuant to the Civil Liberties Act of 1988 and the Aleutian
and Pribilof Island Restitution Act passed by congress, P.L. 100-383,
including all income and resources derived therefrom.
(14) In the construction of words and phrases used in this title,
the singular number shall include the plural, the masculine gender
shall include both the feminine and neuter genders and the present
tense shall include the past and future tenses, unless the context
thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The general assistance program shall provide temporary income
assistance for eligible persons who:
(a) Are not eligible to receive federal-aid assistance, other than
medical assistance and food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred
electronically. However, an individual who refuses or fails to
cooperate in obtaining federal aid assistance, without good cause, is
not eligible for general assistance;
(b) Meet one of the following conditions:
(i) Are determined by the department to have a physical or mental
impairment or combination of these impairments that can be expected to
last for a continuous period of not less than twelve months from the
date of request and that meets or equals the listings of impairment
found under social security disability criteria;
(ii) Are determined by the department to be incapacitated from
gainful employment by reason of bodily or mental infirmity that will
likely continue for a minimum of ninety days;
(iii) Are legal immigrants and are otherwise eligible for
supplemental security income except due to immigration status; or
(iv) Are pregnant and meet the current income and resource
requirements of the federal temporary assistance for needy families
program but are not otherwise eligible for temporary assistance for
needy families;
(c) Are citizens, qualified aliens as defined by the immigration
and naturalization act, or otherwise residing in the United States
under color of law; and
(d) Have furnished the department their social security number. If
the social security number cannot be furnished because it has not been
issued or is not known, an application for a number shall be made
before authorization of assistance, and the social security number
shall be provided to the department upon receipt.
(2)(a) Persons who are unemployable due to alcohol or drug
addiction are not eligible for general assistance. Applicants for
general assistance who are unemployable due to alcohol or drug-related
incapacity shall be referred to appropriate assessment and treatment
services as authorized under chapter 74.50 RCW. This section does not
prohibit the department from granting general assistance benefits to
alcoholics and drug addicts who are incapacitated due to other physical
or mental conditions that meet the eligibility criteria for the general
assistance program.
(b) In determining the need for general assistance for unemployable
persons as defined in this section, the department may by rule
establish a monthly earned income exemption in an amount not to exceed
the exemption allowable under disability programs authorized in Title
XVI of the federal social security act.
(c) Persons eligible for general assistance under this section are
eligible for mental health services to the extent that they meet the
client definitions and priorities established by chapter 71.24 RCW.
(3) General assistance shall be provided only to persons who will
accept available services that can reasonably be expected to enable the
person to work or reduce the need for assistance unless there is good
cause to refuse that service. Failure to accept such services shall
result in termination until the person cooperates in accepting such
services.
(4) Persons eligible under subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section are
not eligible unless the person applies for supplemental security income
and complies with the application process, and assigns initial or
reinstated supplemental security income payments to the department to
cover the cost of general assistance cash payments that have provided
for basic needs from the date of application for supplemental security
income. Persons found eligible for general assistance based on
incapacity from gainful employment may, if otherwise eligible, receive
general assistance pending application for federal supplemental
security income benefits. Any general assistance that is subsequently
duplicated by the person's receipt of supplemental security income for
the same period shall be considered a debt due to the state and shall
by operation of law be subject to recovery through all available legal
remedies.
(5) Persons eligible under subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section
are not eligible to receive general assistance for more than six months
in any twenty-four consecutive months.
(6) Persons eligible under subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section and
whose application for supplemental security income has been denied by
the federal government without further opportunity for administrative
appeal, or if the department does not consider it feasible to pursue an
appeal, shall become eligible under subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this
section and subject to the time limits in subsection (5) of this
section. Such time limits shall begin in the month following the
receipt of the final denial for supplemental security income.
(7) Persons eligible under subsection (1)(b)(iii) of this section
must pursue becoming a naturalized citizen unless the department
determines there is good cause not to naturalize, and are not eligible
to receive general assistance for more than twelve months in their
lifetime.
(8) The department shall adopt by rule medical criteria for general
assistance eligibility to ensure that eligibility decisions are
consistent with statutory requirements and are based on clear,
objective medical information.
(9) No person may be considered an eligible individual for general
assistance with respect to any month if during that month the person:
(a) Is fleeing to avoid prosecution of, or to avoid custody or
confinement for conviction of, a felony, or an attempt to commit a
felony, under the laws of the state of Washington or the place from
which the person flees; or
(b) Is violating a condition of probation, community supervision,
or parole imposed under federal or state law for a felony or gross
misdemeanor conviction.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.08A.100 and 2002 c 366 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state shall exercise its option under P.L. 104-193 to continue
services to legal immigrants under temporary assistance for needy
families, medicaid to the extent allowed by federal law, the state's
basic health plan as provided in chapter 70.47 RCW, and social services
block grant programs. Eligibility for these benefits for legal
immigrants arriving after August 21, 1996, is limited to those families
where the parent, parents, or legal guardians have been in residence in
Washington state for a period of twelve consecutive months before
making their application for assistance. ((Legal immigrants who lose
benefits under the supplemental security income program as a result of
P.L. 104-193 are immediately eligible for benefits under the state's
general assistance-unemployable program. The department shall
redetermine income and resource eligibility at least annually, in
accordance with existing state policy.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 74.04.230 (General assistance -- Mental health services) and
1982 c 204 s 16;
(2) RCW 74.04.266 (General assistance -- Earned income exemption to
be established for unemployable persons) and 1977 ex.s. c 215 s 1;
(3) RCW 74.50.035 (Shelter services -- Eligibility) and 1989 1st
ex.s. c 18 s 2; and
(4) RCW 74.50.060 (Shelter assistance program) and 1989 1st ex.s.
c 18 s 3, 1988 c 163 s 4, & 1987 c 406 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---