BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.080 and 1992 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) It is the policy of this state that all persons selected for
jury service be selected at random from a fair cross section of the
population of the area served by the court, and that all qualified
citizens have the opportunity in accordance with chapter 135, Laws of
1979 ex. sess. to be considered for jury service in this state and have
an obligation to serve as jurors when summoned for that purpose, unless
excused.
(2) It is the policy of this state to maximize the availability of
residents of the state for jury service. It also is the policy of this
state to minimize the burden on the prospective jurors, their families,
and employers resulting from jury service. The jury term and jury
service should be set at as brief an interval as is practical given the
size of the jury source list for the judicial district. ((The optimal
jury term is two weeks or less. Optimal juror service is one day or
one trial, whichever is longer.))
(3) A citizen shall not be excluded from jury service in this state
on account of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or economic
status.
(4) This section does not affect the right to peremptory challenges
under RCW 4.44.130.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.36.093 and 1992 c 93 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) At such time as the judge or judges of any court of any county
shall deem that the public business requires a jury term to be held,
the judge or judges shall direct that a jury panel be selected and
summoned to serve for the ensuing jury term or terms.
(2) ((The court shall establish the length and number of jury terms
in a consecutive twelve-month period, and shall establish the time of
juror service consistent with the provisions of RCW 2.36.010)) Service
of prospective jurors shall be for no more than one court day in actual
attendance, unless a prospective juror is selected to serve in trial or
is under consideration to serve on a trial and such consideration
covers a period of two or more days. Once selected, a juror shall
serve on the jury for the duration of the trial unless excused by the
presiding judge.
(3) A juror who has served on a petit jury in this state shall not
be summoned to serve again as a petit juror in any court of this state
for two years following the last day of such service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 2.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Individuals scheduled to appear for jury service may postpone
the date of their initial appearance for jury service one time only.
When requested, postponements shall be granted if:
(a) The prospective juror has not previously been granted a
postponement;
(b) The prospective juror appears in person or contacts the clerk
of the court by telephone, electronic mail, or in writing to request a
postponement; and
(c) Before granting a postponement with the concurrence of the
clerk of the court, the prospective juror fixes a date certain on which
he or she will appear for jury service that is not more than six months
after the date on which the prospective juror originally was called to
serve and on which date the court will be in session.
(2) A subsequent request to postpone jury service may be approved
by a judicial officer only in the event of an extreme emergency, such
as a death in the family, sudden grave illness, a natural disaster, or
a national emergency in which the prospective juror is personally
involved, that could not have been anticipated at the time the initial
postponement was granted. Before granting a second postponement, the
prospective juror must fix a date certain on which the individual will
appear for jury service within six months of the postponement on a date
when the court will be in session.

Sec. 4 RCW 2.36.100 and 1992 c 93 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except for a person who is not qualified for jury service under
RCW 2.36.070, no person may be excused from jury service by the court
except upon a showing of a mental or physical condition that causes the
person to be incapable of performing jury service, undue or extreme
physical or financial hardship((, extreme inconvenience)) to the
prospective juror or a person under his or her care or supervision, or
public necessity((, or any reason deemed sufficient by the court)) for
a period of time ((the court deems necessary)) up to twenty-four
months.
(2) ((At the discretion of the court's designee, after a request by
a prospective juror to be excused, a prospective juror excused from
juror service for a particular time may be assigned to another jury
term within the twelve-month period. If the assignment to another jury
term is made at the time a juror is excused from the jury term for
which he or she was summoned, a second summons under RCW 2.36.095 need
not be issued)) If the prospective juror has a mental or physical
condition that causes him or her to be incapable of performing jury
service, the juror, or the juror's personal representative, must
provide the court with documentation from a physician licensed to
practice medicine verifying that a mental or physical condition renders
the person unfit for jury service for a period of up to twenty-four
months.
(3)(a) For claims that jury service would cause undue or extreme
physical or financial hardship to the prospective juror or a person
under his or her care or supervision, a judge of the court for which
the individual was called to jury service shall make undue or extreme
physical or financial hardship determinations. The authority to make
these determinations is delegable only to court officials or personnel
who are authorized by the laws of this state to function as members of
the judiciary.
(b) A person asking to be excused based on a finding of undue or
extreme physical or financial hardship must take all actions necessary
to have obtained a ruling on that request by no later than the date on
which the individual is scheduled to appear for jury duty.
(c) For purposes of this chapter, "undue or extreme physical or
financial hardship" is limited to circumstances in which an individual
would:
(i) Be required to abandon a person under his or her personal care
or supervision due to the impossibility of obtaining an appropriate
substitute caregiver during the period of participation in the jury
pool or on the jury; or
(ii) Incur costs that would have a substantial adverse impact on
the payment of the individual's necessary daily living expenses or on
those for whom he or she provides the principle means of support; or
(iii) Suffer physical hardship that would result in illness or
disease.
(d) Undue or extreme physical or financial hardship does not exist
solely based on the fact that a prospective juror will be required to
be absent from his or her place of employment.
(e) A person asking a judge to grant an excuse based on undue or
extreme physical or financial hardship must provide the judge with
documentation, such as, but not limited to, federal and state income
tax returns, medical statements from licensed physicians, proof of
dependency or guardianship, and similar documents, which the judge
finds to clearly support the request to be excused. Failure to provide
satisfactory documentation shall result in a denial of the request to
be excused.
(4) After twenty-four months, a person excused from jury service
shall become eligible once again for qualification as a juror unless
the person was excused from service permanently. A person is excused
from jury service permanently only when the deciding judge determines
that the underlying grounds for being excused are of a permanent
nature.
(((3))) (5) When the jury source list has been fully summoned
within a consecutive ((twelve-month)) twenty-four-month period and
additional jurors are needed, jurors who have already served during the
consecutive ((twelve-month)) twenty-four-month period may be summoned
again for service. A juror who has previously served may only be
excused if he or she served at least two weeks of juror service within
the preceding ((twelve)) twenty-four months. An excuse for prior
service shall be granted only upon the written request of the
prospective juror, which request shall certify the terms of prior
service. Prior jury service may include service in superior court, in
a court of limited jurisdiction, in the United States District Court,
or on a jury of inquest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 2.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The supreme court shall adopt rules to establish a lengthy
trial fund to be used to provide full or partial wage replacement or
wage supplementation to jurors who serve as petit juries for more than
ten days.
(2) The court rules shall provide for the following:
(a) The selection and appointment of an administrator for the fund;
(b) Procedures for the administration of the fund, including
payments of salaries of the administrator and other necessary
personnel;
(c) Procedures for the accounting, auditing, and investment of
money in the lengthy trial fund in accordance with state law pertaining
to similar funds; and
(d) A report by the supreme court on the administration of the
lengthy trial fund in its annual report on the judicial branch, setting
forth the money collected for and disbursed from the fund.
(3) Notwithstanding any other fees paid under state law, each trial
court in the state shall collect from each attorney who files a civil
case, unless otherwise exempted under this section, a fee of twenty
dollars per case to be paid into the lengthy trial fund. A lawyer will
be deemed to have "filed a case" at the time the first pleading or
other filing on which an individual lawyer's name appears is submitted
to the court for filing and opens a new case. All such fees shall be
forwarded to the administrator of the lengthy trial fund for deposit.
(4) The court may pay replacement or supplemental wages of up to
three hundred dollars per day per juror beginning on the eleventh day
of jury service. In addition, for any jurors who qualify for payment
by virtue of having served on a jury for more than ten days, the court
may, upon finding that such service posed a significant financial
hardship to a juror, even in light of payments made with respect to
jury service after the tenth day, award replacement or supplemental
wages of up to one hundred dollars per day from the fourth to the tenth
day of jury service.
(5)(a) Any juror who is serving or has served on a jury that
qualifies for payment from the lengthy trial fund may submit a request
for payment from the lengthy trial fund on a form that the
administrator provides, if the service commenced on or after the
effective date of this section. Payment is limited to the difference
between the state paid jury fee and the actual amount of wages a juror
earns, up to the maximum level payable, minus any amount the juror
actually receives from the employer during the same time period.
(b) The form shall disclose the juror's regular wages, the amount
the employer will pay during the term of jury service starting on the
eleventh day and thereafter, the amount of replacement or supplemental
wages requested, and any other information the administrator deems
necessary for proper payment.
(c)(i) The juror also shall be required to submit verification from
the employer as to the wage information provided to the administrator,
for example, the employee's most recent earnings statement or similar
document, before initiation of payment from the fund.
(ii) If an individual is self-employed or receives compensation
other than wages, the individual may provide a sworn affidavit
attesting to his or her approximate gross weekly income, together with
such other information as the administrator may require, in order to
verify weekly income.
(6) The following attorneys and causes of action are exempt from
payment of the lengthy trial fund fee:
(a) Government attorneys entering appearances in the course of
their official duties;
(b) Pro se litigants;
(c) Cases in small claims court or the state equivalent thereof; or
(d) Claims seeking social security disability determinations;
individual veterans' compensation or disability determinations;
recoupment actions for government-backed educational loans or
mortgages; child custody and support cases; actions brought in forma
pauperis; and any other filings designated by rule that involve minimal
use of court resources and that customarily are not afforded the
opportunity for a trial by jury.

Sec. 6 RCW 2.36.165 and 1988 c 188 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An employer shall provide an employee with a sufficient leave
of absence from employment to serve as a juror when that employee is
summoned pursuant to chapter 2.36 RCW. An employee may not be required
or requested to use annual, vacation, or sick leave for time spent
responding to a summons for jury duty, time spent participating in the
jury selection process, or for time spent actually serving on a jury.
This subsection shall not be construed to require an employer to
provide annual, vacation, or sick leave to employees under this
subsection who otherwise are not entitled to such benefits under
company policies.
(2) An employer shall not deprive an employee of employment or
threaten, coerce, or harass an employee, or deny an employee
promotional opportunities because the employee receives a summons,
responds to the summons, serves as a juror, or attends court for
prospective jury service.
(3) An employer who intentionally violates subsection (1) or (2) of
this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(4) If an employer commits an act in violation of subsection (2) of
this section the employee may bring a civil action for damages as a
result of the violation and for an order requiring the reinstatement of
the employee. If the employee prevails, the employee shall be allowed
a reasonable attorney's fee as determined by the court.
(5) For purposes of this section employer means any person,
association, partnership, or private or public corporation who employs
or exercises control over wages, hours, or working conditions of one or
more employees.
(6) A court shall automatically postpone and reschedule the service
of a summoned juror of an employer with five or fewer full-time
employees, or their equivalent, if another employee of that employer is
summoned to appear during the same period. Such postponement does not
affect an individual's right to one postponement under section 3 of
this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 2.36.170 and 1988 c 188 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person summoned for jury service who intentionally fails to
appear as directed or to comply with the provisions for postponements
and exemptions under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and
is subject to imprisonment and fines in accordance with the laws of
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---