BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is imperative
to ensure that people who are arrested for driving under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug are not released to third parties
who then allow them to resume control of a motor vehicle. It is the
purpose of this act to enhance public safety by reducing the
probability that a person arrested for driving under the influence of
alcohol or drugs will have access to a motor vehicle while still
impaired by the alcohol or drugs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the driver of a vehicle is arrested for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the vehicle is subject to impoundment at
the direction of a law enforcement officer. The impounded vehicle may
be redeemed after twelve hours have expired from the time of arrest and
after all towing, removal, and storage fees are paid.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a rental car
business may immediately redeem a rental vehicle it owns by payment of
the costs of removal, towing, and storage.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a motor vehicle
dealer or lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle may
redeem or lawfully repossess a vehicle immediately by payment of the
costs of removal, towing, and storage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before a law enforcement officer releases a person arrested for
a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 to a third person, the
officer shall serve notice in writing on the third person advising the
person of potential civil and criminal liability if the person
facilitates or permits the arrested person released to his custody to
resume operation of a motor vehicle while still intoxicated or
impaired.
(2) Before the arrested person is released to a third person,
receipt of the notice must be acknowledged in writing by the third
person.
(3) If the third person refuses to sign the acknowledgment, the
person arrested for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall
remain in custody.

--- END ---