BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the
responsibilities, training, and ongoing physical requirements of public
employees' retirement system plan 2 members working as corrections
officers beyond the age of fifty-five may put themselves, coworkers,
and the public at risk. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide
an alternative retirement option by reducing the financial disincentive
to retiring before age sixty-five.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.630 and 2000 c 247 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service
credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant
to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially
reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3)(a) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.
(b) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least twenty service credit years as a corrections officer and has
attained age fifty-five while serving as a corrections officer shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five. For the purposes of this subsection, a corrections
officer is an employee of a jail, as defined in RCW 70.48.020, or a
state corrections facility; employed as a correctional employee,
whether uniformed or nonuniformed; or a security officer, whether
commissioned or noncommissioned, and who is trained for and charged
with the responsibility of controlling and maintaining custody of
inmates in the jail or state corrections facility and safeguarding
inmates from other inmates.

--- END ---