BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.62.090 and 2001 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines,
forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions,
by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW a public safety and
education assessment equal to ((sixty)) seventy percent of such fines,
forfeitures, or penalties, which shall be remitted as provided in
chapters 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW. The assessment required by
this section shall not be suspended or waived by the court.
(2) There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines,
forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions
and for fines levied under RCW 46.61.5055, and in addition to the
public safety and education assessment required under subsection (1) of
this section, by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, an
additional public safety and education assessment equal to fifty
percent of the public safety and education assessment required under
subsection (1) of this section, which shall be remitted to the state
treasurer and deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The additional
assessment required by this subsection shall not be suspended or waived
by the court.
(3) This section does not apply to the fee imposed under RCW
46.63.110(((6))) (7) or the penalty imposed under RCW 46.63.110(((7)))
(8).

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.110 and 2002 c 279 s 15 and 2002 c 175 s 36 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.55.105(2) is two
hundred fifty dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the
period in which the penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on
or before the time established for payment the court shall notify the
department of the failure to pay the penalty, and the department shall
suspend the person's driver's license or driving privilege until the
penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in subsection (4) of
this section has been paid.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed
a fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall
this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an additional penalty of
((ten)) twenty dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend
the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent. If a community restitution program for offenders is
available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to
offset all or a part of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by
participation in the community restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited as
provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the revenue received by the
county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into
the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city
or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.

--- END ---