BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Workplace harassment" means a knowing and willful course of
conduct directed at a specific person which seriously alarms, annoys,
harasses, or is detrimental to such person, and which serves no
legitimate or lawful purpose. The course of conduct shall be such as
would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional
distress, and shall actually cause substantial emotional distress to
the petitioner.
(2) "Course of conduct" means a pattern of conduct composed of a
series of acts over a period of time, however short, evidencing a
continuity of purpose. "Course of conduct" includes, in addition to
any other form of communication, contact, or conduct, the sending of an
electronic communication. Constitutionally protected activity is not
included within the meaning of "course of conduct."
(3) "Employer" means an individual, partnership, association, or
corporation, or a person or group of persons who act, directly or
indirectly, on behalf of or in the interest of an employer and with the
consent of the employer. "Employer" includes the state, a political
subdivision of the state, and any school district or other special
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 COURSE OF CONDUCT--DETERMINATION OF PURPOSE.
In determining whether the course of conduct serves any legitimate or
lawful purpose, the court should consider whether:
(1) Any current contact between the parties was initiated by the
respondent only or was initiated by both parties;
(2) The respondent has been given clear notice that all further
contact with the petitioner is unwanted;
(3) The respondent's course of conduct appears designed to alarm,
annoy, or harass the petitioner;
(4) The respondent is acting pursuant to any statutory authority,
including but not limited to acts which are reasonably necessary to:
(a) Protect property or liberty interests;
(b) Enforce the law; or
(c) Meet specific statutory duties or requirements;
(5) The respondent's course of conduct has the purpose or effect of
unreasonably interfering with the petitioner's privacy or the purpose
or effect of creating an intimidating, hostile, or offensive living
environment for the petitioner;
(6) Contact by the respondent with the petitioner or the
petitioner's family has been limited in any manner by any previous
court order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PROTECTION ORDER--PETITION. An employer or
an authorized agent of an employer may petition for an order for
protection in cases of workplace harassment.
(1) A petition for relief shall allege the existence of harassment
and shall be accompanied by an affidavit made under oath stating the
specific facts and circumstances from which relief is sought.
(2) A petition for relief may be made regardless of whether or not
there is a pending lawsuit, complaint, petition, or other action
between the parties.
(3) All court clerks' offices shall make available simplified forms
and instructional brochures. Any assistance or information provided by
clerks under this section does not constitute the practice of law and
clerks are not responsible for incorrect information contained in a
petition.
(4) Filing fees are set in RCW 36.18.020, but no filing fee may be
charged for a petition filed in an existing action or under an existing
cause number brought under this chapter in the jurisdiction where the
relief is sought or as provided in section 6 of this act. Forms and
instructional brochures shall be provided free of charge.
(5) A person is not required to post a bond to obtain relief in any
proceeding under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 COURT ORDERED REMEDIES. If the court grants
a petition for relief against workplace harassment, the court may do
any of the following:
(1) Restrain the defendant from coming near the employer's property
or place of business;
(2) Restrain the defendant from contacting the employer, or other
person while that person is on or at the employer's property or place
of business or is performing official work duties; and
(3) Grant any other relief necessary for the protection of the
employer, the workplace, the employer's employees, or any other person
who is on or at the employer's property or place of business or who is
performing official work duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 ADMINISTRATOR FOR COURTS--FORMS,
INFORMATION. The administrator for the courts shall develop and
prepare, in consultation with interested persons, model forms and
instructional brochures required under section 3(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 FEES EXCUSED, WHEN. No fees for filing or
service of process may be charged by a public agency to petitioners
seeking relief under this chapter from a person who has stalked them as
that term is defined in RCW 9A.46.110, or from a person who has engaged
in conduct that would constitute a sex offense as defined in RCW
9A.44.130, or from a person who is a family or household member as
defined in RCW 26.50.010(2) who has engaged in conduct that would
constitute domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 PROCEEDING IN FORMA PAUPERIS. Persons
seeking relief under this chapter may file an application for leave to
proceed in forma pauperis on forms supplied by the court. If the court
determines that a petitioner lacks the funds to pay the costs of
filing, the petitioner shall be granted leave to proceed in forma
pauperis and no filing fee or any other court related fees shall be
charged by the court to the petitioner for relief sought under this
chapter. If the petitioner is granted leave to proceed in forma
pauperis, then no fees for service may be charged to the petitioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 HEARING--SERVICE. Upon receipt of the
petition, the court shall order a hearing which shall be held not later
than fourteen days from the date of the order. Except as provided in
section 10 of this act, personal service shall be made upon the
respondent not less than five court days before the hearing. If timely
personal service cannot be made, the court shall set a new hearing date
and shall either require additional attempts at obtaining personal
service or permit service by publication as provided by section 10 of
this act. If the court permits service by publication, the court shall
set the hearing date not later than twenty-four days from the date of
the order. The court may issue an ex parte order for protection
pending the hearing as provided in sections 9 and 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 ANTIHARASSMENT PROTECTION ORDERS--EX PARTE
TEMPORARY--HEARING--LONGER TERM, RENEWAL. (1) Upon filing a petition
for a civil antiharassment protection order under this chapter, the
petitioner may obtain an ex parte temporary antiharassment protection
order. An ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order may be
granted with or without notice upon the filing of an affidavit which,
to the satisfaction of the court, shows reasonable proof of workplace
harassment of the petitioner by the respondent and that great or
irreparable harm will result to the petitioner if the temporary
antiharassment protection order is not granted.
(2) An ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order shall be
effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days or twenty-four
days if the court has permitted service by publication under section 10
of this act. The ex parte order may be reissued. A full hearing, as
provided in this chapter, shall be set for not later than fourteen days
from the issuance of the temporary order or not later than twenty-four
days if service by publication is permitted. Except as provided in
sections 8 and 10 of this act, the respondent shall be personally
served with a copy of the ex parte order along with a copy of the
petition and notice of the date set for the hearing. The ex parte
order and notice of hearing shall include at a minimum the date and
time of the hearing set by the court to determine if the temporary
order should be made effective for one year or more, and notice that if
the respondent should fail to appear or otherwise not respond, an order
for protection will be issued against the respondent pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, for a minimum of one year from the date of
the hearing. The notice shall also include a brief statement of the
provisions of the ex parte order and notify the respondent that a copy
of the ex parte order and notice of hearing has been filed with the
clerk of the court.
(3) At the hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the
evidence that workplace harassment exists, a civil antiharassment
protection order shall issue prohibiting such workplace harassment.
(4) An order issued under this chapter shall be effective for not
more than one year unless the court finds that the respondent is likely
to resume workplace harassment of the petitioner when the order
expires. If so, the court may enter an order for a fixed time
exceeding one year or may enter a permanent antiharassment protection
order.
(5) At any time within the three months before the expiration of
the order, the petitioner may apply for a renewal of the order by
filing a petition for renewal. The petition for renewal shall state
the reasons why the petitioner seeks to renew the protection order.
Upon receipt of the petition for renewal, the court shall order a
hearing which shall be not later than fourteen days from the date of
the order. Except as provided in section 10 of this act, personal
service shall be made upon the respondent not less than five days
before the hearing. If timely service cannot be made the court shall
set a new hearing date and shall either require additional attempts at
obtaining personal service or permit service by publication as provided
by section 10 of this act. If the court permits service by
publication, the court shall set the new hearing date not later than
twenty-four days from the date of the order. If the order expires
because timely service cannot be made the court shall grant an ex parte
order of protection as provided in this section. The court shall grant
the petition for renewal unless the respondent proves by a
preponderance of the evidence that the respondent will not resume
harassment of the petitioner when the order expires. The court may
renew the protection order for another fixed time period or may enter
a permanent order as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The court, in granting an ex parte temporary antiharassment
protection order or a civil antiharassment protection order, shall have
broad discretion to grant such relief as the court deems proper,
including an order:
(a) Restraining the respondent from making any attempts to contact
the petitioner;
(b) Restraining the respondent from making any attempts to keep the
petitioner under surveillance;
(c) Requiring the respondent to stay a stated distance from the
petitioner's residence and workplace; and
(d) Considering the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.
(7) A petitioner may not obtain an ex parte temporary
antiharassment protection order against a respondent if the petitioner
has previously obtained two such ex parte orders against the same
respondent but has failed to obtain the issuance of a civil
antiharassment protection order unless good cause for such failure can
be shown.
(8) The court order shall specify the date an order issued pursuant
to subsections (4) and (5) of this section expires if any. The court
order shall also state whether the court issued the protection order
following personal service or service by publication and whether the
court has approved service by publication of an order issued under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 HEARING RESET AFTER EX PARTE ORDER--SERVICE
BY PUBLICATION--CIRCUMSTANCES. (1) If the respondent was not
personally served with the petition, notice of hearing, and ex parte
order before the hearing, the court shall reset the hearing for twenty-
four days from the date of entry of the order and may order service by
publication instead of personal service under the following
circumstances:
(a) The sheriff or municipal officer files an affidavit stating
that the officer was unable to complete personal service upon the
respondent. The affidavit must describe the number and types of
attempts the officer made to complete service;
(b) The petitioner files an affidavit stating that the petitioner
believes that the respondent is hiding from the server to avoid
service. The petitioner's affidavit must state the reasons for the
belief that the respondent is avoiding service;
(c) The server has deposited a copy of the summons, in
substantially the form prescribed in subsection (3) of this section,
notice of hearing, and the ex parte order of protection in the post
office, directed to the respondent at the respondent's last known
address, unless the server states that the server does not know the
respondent's address; and
(d) The court finds reasonable grounds exist to believe that the
respondent is concealing himself or herself to avoid service, and that
further attempts to personally serve the respondent would be futile or
unduly burdensome.
(2) The court shall reissue the temporary order of protection not
to exceed another twenty-four days from the date of reissuing the ex
parte protection order and order to provide service by publication.
(3) The publication shall be made in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county where the petition was brought and in the
county of the last known address of the respondent once a week for
three consecutive weeks. The newspaper selected must be one of the
three most widely circulated papers in the county. The publication of
summons shall not be made until the court orders service by publication
under this section. Service of the summons shall be considered
complete when the publication has been made for three consecutive
weeks. The summons must be signed by the petitioner. The summons
shall contain the date of the first publication, and shall require the
respondent upon whom service by publication is desired, to appear and
answer the petition on the date set for the hearing. The summons shall
also contain a brief statement of the reason for the petition and a
summary of the provisions under the ex parte order. The summons shall
be essentially in the following form:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 REPRESENTATION OR APPEARANCE. (1) Nothing
in this chapter shall preclude either party from representation by
private counsel or from appearing on his or her own behalf.
(2) The court may require the respondent to pay the filing fee and
court costs, including service fees, and to reimburse the petitioner
for costs incurred in bringing the action, including a reasonable
attorney's fee. If the petitioner has been granted leave to proceed in
forma pauperis, the court may require the respondent to pay the filing
fee and costs, including services fees, to the county or municipality
incurring the expense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 SERVICE OF ORDER. (1) An order issued
under this chapter shall be personally served upon the respondent,
except as provided in subsections (5) and (7) of this section.
(2) The sheriff of the county or the peace officers of the
municipality in which the respondent resides shall serve the respondent
personally unless the petitioner elects to have the respondent served
by a private party.
(3) If the sheriff or municipal peace officer cannot complete
service upon the respondent within ten days, the sheriff or municipal
peace officer shall notify the petitioner.
(4) Returns of service under this chapter shall be made in
accordance with the applicable court rules.
(5) If an order entered by the court recites that the respondent
appeared in person before the court, the necessity for further service
is waived and proof of service of that order is not necessary. The
court's order, entered after a hearing, need not be served on a
respondent who fails to appear before the court, if material terms of
the order have not changed from those contained in the temporary order,
and it is shown to the court's satisfaction that the respondent has
previously been personally served with the temporary order.
(6) Except in cases where the petitioner has fees waived under
section 6 of this act or is granted leave to proceed in forma pauperis,
municipal police departments serving documents as required under this
chapter may collect the same fees for service and mileage authorized by
RCW 36.18.040 to be collected by sheriffs.
(7) If the court previously entered an order allowing service by
publication of the notice of hearing and temporary order of protection
pursuant to section 10 of this act, the court may permit service by
publication of the order of protection issued under section 9 of this
act. Service by publication must comply with the requirements of
section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 ORDER FOLLOWING SERVICE BY PUBLICATION.
Following completion of service by publication as provided in section
10 of this act, if the respondent fails to appear at the hearing, the
court may issue an order of protection as provided in section 9 of this
act. That order must be served pursuant to section 12 of this act, and
forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency pursuant to section
14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 NOTICE TO LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES--ENFORCEABILITY. (1) A copy of an antiharassment protection order
granted under this chapter shall be forwarded by the clerk of the court
on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement
agency specified in the order.
Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall
forthwith enter the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence
information system available in this state used by law enforcement
agencies to list outstanding warrants. The law enforcement agency
shall expunge expired orders from the computer system. Entry into the
law enforcement information system constitutes notice to all law
enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully
enforceable in any county in the state.
(2) The information entered into the computer-based system shall
include notice to law enforcement whether the order was personally
served or served by publication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 ENFORCEMENT OF ORDER--KNOWLEDGE
PREREQUISITE TO PENALTIES--REASONABLE EFFORTS TO SERVE COPY OF ORDER.
(1) When the court issues an order of protection pursuant to section 9
of this act, the court shall advise the petitioner that the respondent
may not be subjected to the penalties set forth in sections 16 and 22
of this act for a violation of the order unless the respondent knows of
the order.
(2) When a peace officer investigates a report of an alleged
violation of an order for protection issued under this chapter the
officer shall attempt to determine whether the respondent knew of the
existence of the protection order. If the officer determines that the
respondent did not or probably did not know about the protection order,
the officer shall make reasonable efforts to obtain a copy of the
protection order and serve it on the respondent during the
investigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 DISOBEDIENCE OF ORDER--PENALTIES. Any
willful disobedience by a respondent age eighteen years or over of any
temporary antiharassment protection order or civil antiharassment
protection order issued under this chapter subjects the respondent to
criminal penalties under this chapter. Any respondent age eighteen
years or over who willfully disobeys the terms of any order issued
under this chapter may also, in the court's discretion, be found in
contempt of court and subject to penalties under chapter 7.21 RCW. Any
respondent under the age of eighteen years who willfully disobeys the
terms of an order issued under this chapter may, in the court's
discretion, be found in contempt of court and subject to the sanction
specified in RCW 7.21.030(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 SERVICE BY PUBLICATION--COSTS. The court
may permit service by publication under this chapter only if the
petitioner pays the cost of publication or if the petitioner's costs
have been waived pursuant to section 6 of this act, unless the county
legislative authority allocates funds for service of process by
publication for petitioners who are granted leave to proceed in forma
pauperis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN ACTIONS. Protection
orders authorized under this chapter shall not be issued for any action
specifically covered by chapter 10.99 or 26.50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 OTHER REMEDIES. Nothing in this chapter
shall preclude a petitioner's right to utilize other existing civil
remedies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 JURISDICTION. (1) The district courts
shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of any civil actions and
proceedings brought under this chapter, except the district court shall
transfer such actions and proceedings to the superior court when it is
shown that the respondent to the petition is under eighteen years of
age.
(2) Superior courts shall have concurrent jurisdiction to receive
transfer of antiharassment petitions in cases where a district court
judge makes findings of fact and conclusions of law showing that
meritorious reasons exist for the transfer. The municipal and district
courts shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of any criminal actions
brought under RCW 10.14.120 and 10.14.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 WHERE ACTION MAY BE BROUGHT. For the
purposes of this chapter an action may be brought in:
(1) The judicial district of the county in which the alleged acts
of workplace harassment occurred;
(2) The judicial district of the county where any respondent
resides at the time the petition is filed; or
(3) The judicial district of the county where a respondent may be
served if it is the same county or judicial district where a respondent
resides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 CRIMINAL PENALTY. Any respondent age
eighteen years or over who willfully disobeys any civil antiharassment
protection order issued pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 MODIFICATION OF ORDER. Upon application
with notice to all parties and after a hearing, the court may modify
the terms of an existing order under this chapter. In any situation
where an order is terminated or modified before its expiration date,
the clerk of the court shall forward on or before the next judicial day
a true copy of the modified order or the termination order to the
appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the modified order or
termination order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement
agency shall promptly enter it in the law enforcement information
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHTS. Nothing in this
chapter shall be construed to infringe upon any constitutionally
protected rights including, but not limited to, freedom of speech and
freedom of assembly.

Sec. 25 RCW 36.18.020 and 2000 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division
with the state public safety and education account under RCW 36.18.025
and with the county or regional law library fund under RCW 27.24.070.
(2) Clerks of superior courts shall collect the following fees for
their official services:
(a) The party filing the first or initial paper in any civil
action, including, but not limited to an action for restitution,
adoption, or change of name, shall pay, at the time the paper is filed,
a fee of one hundred ten dollars except, in an unlawful detainer action
under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW for which the plaintiff shall pay a
case initiating filing fee of thirty dollars, or in proceedings filed
under RCW 28A.225.030 alleging a violation of the compulsory attendance
laws where the petitioner shall not pay a filing fee. The thirty
dollar filing fee under this subsection for an unlawful detainer action
shall not include an order to show cause or any other order or judgment
except a default order or default judgment in an unlawful detainer
action.
(b) Any party, except a defendant in a criminal case, filing the
first or initial paper on an appeal from a court of limited
jurisdiction or any party on any civil appeal, shall pay, when the
paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(c) For filing of a petition for judicial review as required under
RCW 34.05.514 a filing fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(d) For filing of a petition for unlawful harassment under RCW
10.14.040 or for workplace harassment under section 5 of this act a
filing fee of forty-one dollars.
(e) For filing the notice of debt due for the compensation of a
crime victim under RCW 7.68.120(2)(a) a fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(f) In probate proceedings, the party instituting such proceedings,
shall pay at the time of filing the first paper therein, a fee of one
hundred ten dollars.
(g) For filing any petition to contest a will admitted to probate
or a petition to admit a will which has been rejected, or a petition
objecting to a written agreement or memorandum as provided in RCW
11.96A.220, there shall be paid a fee of one hundred ten dollars.
(h) Upon conviction or plea of guilty, upon failure to prosecute an
appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction as provided by law, or upon
affirmance of a conviction by a court of limited jurisdiction, a
defendant in a criminal case shall be liable for a fee of one hundred
ten dollars.
(i) With the exception of demands for jury hereafter made and
garnishments hereafter issued, civil actions and probate proceedings
filed prior to midnight, July 1, 1972, shall be completed and governed
by the fee schedule in effect as of January 1, 1972: PROVIDED, That no
fee shall be assessed if an order of dismissal on the clerk's record be
filed as provided by rule of the supreme court.
(3) No fee shall be collected when a petition for relinquishment of
parental rights is filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.080 or for forms and
instructional brochures provided under RCW 26.50.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 EMPLOYER'S DUTIES NOT MODIFIED. Nothing in
this chapter shall be construed to expand, diminish, alter, or modify
the duty of an employer to provide a safe workplace for its employees
and other persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 NOTICE. When the employer has knowledge
that a specific person or persons are the target of workplace
harassment, the employer shall make a good faith effort to provide
notice to the person or persons that the employer intends to petition
the court for a petition for relief from workplace harassment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 EMPLOYER IMMUNITY. An employer is immune
from civil liability for seeking or failing to seek a petition for
relief under this chapter unless the employer is seeking a petition for
relief primarily to accomplish a purpose for which the petition was not
designed. An action or statement by an employer under this chapter
shall not be deemed an admission by the employer of any fact. An
action or statement by an employer under this chapter may be used for
impeachment purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
chapter are not part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Sections 1 through 24 and 26 through 29 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

--- END ---