BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.010 and 2002 c 26 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to provide a dependable and
systematic process for funding the benefits provided to members and
retirees of the public employees' retirement system, chapter 41.40 RCW;
the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW; the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement systems, chapter 41.26 RCW; the
school employees' retirement system, chapter 41.35 RCW; and the
Washington state patrol retirement system, chapter 43.43 RCW.
The legislature finds that the funding status of the state
retirement systems has improved dramatically since 1989. Because of
the big reduction in unfunded pension liabilities, it is now prudent to
adjust the long-term economic assumptions that are used in the
actuarial studies conducted by the state actuary. The legislature
finds that it is reasonable to increase the salary growth assumption in
light of Initiative Measure No. 732, to increase the investment return
assumption in light of the asset allocation policies and historical
returns of the state investment board, and to reestablish June 30,
2024, as the target date to achieve full funding of all liabilities in
the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1, and the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1.
The funding process established by this chapter is intended to
achieve the following goals:
(1) To continue to fully fund the public employees' retirement
system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3,
the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, and the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 as
provided by law;
(2) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1, not later than June 30, 2024;
(3) To establish predictable long-term employer contribution rates
which will remain a relatively constant proportion of the future state
budgets, while allowing for adjustments to reflect changing economic,
demographic, and financial conditions; and
(4) To fund, to the extent feasible, benefit increases for plan 1
members and all benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the working
lives of those members so that the cost of those benefits are paid by
the taxpayers who receive the benefit of those members' service.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.45.054 and 2002 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The basic employer and state contribution rates and plan 2 member
contribution rates are changed to reflect the 2000 actuarial valuation,
incorporating the 1995-2000 actuarial experience study conducted by the
office of the state actuary, and to reflect changes in actuarial
methods adopted by the 2003 legislature. The results of the 2000
actuarial valuation shall be adjusted to reflect an April 1, 2002,
implementation date.
(1) Beginning ((April 1, 2002)) July 1, 2003, the following
employer contribution rates shall be charged:
(a) ((1.10)) 1.21 percent for the public employees' retirement
system; and
(b) ((2.64)) 3.03 percent for the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.
(2) Beginning ((April 1, 2002)) July 1, 2003, the basic state
contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 shall be ((1.75)) 2.02 percent.
(3) Beginning ((April 1, 2002)) September 1, 2003, the following
employer contribution rates shall be charged:
(a) ((0.96)) 1.16 percent for the school employees' retirement
system; and
(b) ((1.05)) 0.80 percent for the teachers' retirement system.
(4) Beginning ((April 1, 2002)) July 1, 2003, the following member
contribution rates shall be charged:
(a) ((0.65)) 0.54 percent for the public employees' retirement
system plan 2; and
(b) ((4.39)) 5.05 percent for the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.
(5) Beginning ((April 1, 2002)) September 1, 2003, the following
member contribution rates shall be charged:
(a) ((0.35)) 0.49 percent for the school employees' retirement
system plan 2; and
(b) ((0.15)) 0.0 percent for the teachers' retirement system plan
2.
(((6) The contribution rates in this section shall be collected
through June 30, 2003.))

Sec. 3 RCW 41.45.060 and 2002 c 26 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state actuary shall provide actuarial valuation results
based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing technique
included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted by the council under RCW 41.45.030
or 41.45.035.
(2) Not later than September 30, 2002, and every two years
thereafter, consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value
smoothing technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW
41.45.030 or 41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes
to:
(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system;
(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington
state patrol retirement system to be used in the ensuing biennial
period; and
(c) A basic employer contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system for funding both that system and the public
employees' retirement system plan 1.
The contribution rates adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.
(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the
council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:
(a) To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan
1 not later than June 30, 2024, except as provided in subsection (5) of
this section. The net contribution rate developed in subsection (4) of
this section shall be used as the normal cost;
(b) To also continue to fully fund the public employees' retirement
system plans 2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3,
the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, and the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 in
accordance with RCW 41.45.061, 41.45.067, and this section; and
(c) For the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system
plan 2 the rate charged to employers, except as provided in RCW
41.26.450, shall be thirty percent of the cost of the retirement system
and the rate charged to the state shall be twenty percent of the cost
of the retirement system.
(4) The ((aggregate actuarial cost)) projected unit credit method
with a fifteen-year amortization of unfunded liabilities shall be used
to calculate a combined plan 2 and 3 employer contribution rate ((and
a)). The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate
the Washington state patrol retirement system contribution rate.
(5) The council shall immediately notify the directors of the
office of financial management and department of retirement systems of
the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall be
effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any legislative
modifications.
(6) The director of the department of retirement systems shall
collect the rates established in RCW ((41.45.053 through June 30,
2003)) 41.45.054. ((Thereafter, the director shall collect those rates
adopted by the council. The rates established in RCW 41.45.053, or by
the council, shall be subject to revision by the council.))

Sec. 4 RCW 41.45.070 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 16 and 2001 2nd
sp.s. c 11 s 15 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established
in RCW 41.45.060 or ((41.45.053)) 41.45.054, the department shall also
charge employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers'
retirement system, school employees' retirement system, or Washington
state patrol retirement system members an additional supplemental rate
to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted to members
of those systems. Except as provided in subsections (6) and (7) of
this section, the supplemental contribution rates required by this
section shall be calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged
regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which
authorizes additional benefits.
(2) In addition to the basic state contribution rate established in
RCW 41.45.060 or ((41.45.053)) 41.45.054 for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, the department
shall also establish a supplemental rate to pay for the cost of
additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2. Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, this supplemental rate
shall be calculated by the state actuary and the state treasurer shall
transfer the additional required contributions regardless of language
to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes the
additional benefits.
(3) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active members of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
Washington state patrol retirement system, shall be calculated as the
level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the
benefit not later than June 30, 2024.
(4) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active and retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, and the school employees'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3((, or)) shall be sufficient to
amortize the unfunded liability portion of the cost of the benefit over
a fifteen-year period. The supplemental rate charged under this
section to fund benefit increases provided to the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2((,)) shall be
calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund
the cost of the benefit, as calculated under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061,
or 41.45.067.
(5) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
postretirement adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic basis
to current retirees shall be calculated as the percentage of pay needed
to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the retirees. The
supplemental rate charged under this section to fund automatic
postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to
fund the cost of the automatic adjustments not later than June 30,
2024.
(6) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of
1998.
(7) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW;
section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---