BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.050 and 2002 c 56 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may, as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
recommend the imposition of some or all of the following revenue
sources, which a regional transportation investment district may impose
upon approval of the voters as provided in this chapter:
(a) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of
up to 0.5 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event in the regional transportation
investment district;
(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
district. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined
under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;
(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060 and
chapter 81.104 RCW;
(e) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030; and
(f) Vehicle tolls on new or reconstructed facilities. Unless
otherwise specified by law, the department shall administer the
collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities, and the state
transportation commission, or its successor, shall be the tolling
authority.
(2) Taxes, fees, and tolls may not be imposed without an
affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of
the district voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW
36.120.070. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to
implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate
entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees
authorized in this section.
(3) District tax revenue must be allocated proportionately to the
member counties based on the share of tax revenue each county
generates. The tax revenue allocated to a county must be used to
finance costs incurred for projects within the county.
(4) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes,
at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not
intended to be altered by this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.05.022 and 2002 c 56 s 302 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((legislature designates)) following highways are of statewide
significance:
(1) That portion of state route number 509 that runs or will run
from state route number 518 in the north to the intersection with
interstate 5 in the south ((as a state highway of statewide
significance));
(2) The cross-base highway, state route number 704, beginning at a
junction with state route number 5 in south Pierce county, thence
easterly across Fort Lewis to a junction with state route number 7.

--- END ---