BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.16.190 and 1972 ex.s. c 108 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For all injuries committed by a married person, there shall be
no recovery against the separate property of the other spouse except in
cases where there would be joint responsibility if the marriage did not
exist.
(2) Debt incurred during a marriage by one spouse without the
knowledge or consent of the other spouse when no community benefit is
realized shall not be considered a community debt and is an affirmative
defense of the nonconsenting spouse. The burden of proof shall be upon
the nonconsenting spouse as to lack of knowledge and benefit. The
party seeking to hold the nonconsenting spouse liable has the burden of
proof as to all other issues. For the purposes of this section, a debt
is any obligation arising out of an express or implied contract.

--- END ---