BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter is created in furtherance of
findings from the higher education facility preservation study,
undertaken by the joint legislative audit and review committee, whose
final report was submitted to the legislature January 8, 2003. The
legislature affirms that preventive and ongoing facility maintenance,
properly supported, can prevent and mitigate preservation backlogs.
The legislature declares its intent to set in motion a series of
structural changes that will support facility stewardship and ensure
that, moving forward in time, the state of Washington and its
institutions of higher education do not again face a 1.3 billion dollar
deficit of capital improvements to preserve existing buildings for
their current use; preservation needs that will likely take a decade or
longer to redress. To that end and as a first step, this chapter
implements the summary recommendation that asks the legislature to
designate an agency to sustain and expand the comparable framework and
assemble information as needed to support facilities-related budget and
policy development for biennial sessions starting in 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Auxiliary programs" are secondary to the missions of state
institutions of higher education and, being enterprise in character,
draw supporting revenue from user fees and charges. Examples include
housing and dining; food services; vehicular parking; infirmaries;
hospitals; recreation and student-activity centers; campus stores
retailing textbooks, supplies, clothing, and objects bearing
institutional logos or emblems; and media reproduction centers, among
others.
(2) "Comparable framework" means methods and systems to collect,
cross-walk, calibrate, verify on a sample basis, and assemble
facilities information produced and maintained by institutions of
higher education and other state agencies into a data framework that
can be used to understand and budget for state and mixed facilities.
(3) "Educational and general programs" are those that support the
primary missions of state institutions of higher education: Student
instruction, faculty research, and educational public service.
(4) "Enterprise facility" means a state-owned building structure
exclusively housing auxiliary programs, and includes infrastructure
necessary for safe and normal operations by its occupants.
(5) "Facility rating" is a score that reflects an individual
building's ability to support its current use as measured against one
out of five condition classes as follows:
(a) "One" or "superior" means a building with major systems that
are in extremely good condition and functioning well;
(b) "Two" or "good" means a building with major systems in good
condition, functioning adequately, and within their expected life
cycles;
(c) "Three" or "adequate" means a building with some older major
systems that, though still functional, are approaching the end of their
expected life cycles;
(d) "Four" or "limited functionality" means a building with some
major systems that are in poor condition, exceed expected life cycles,
and require immediate attention to prevent or mitigate impacts on
function;
(e) "Five" or "marginal functionality" means a building with some
major systems that are failing and significantly restrict continued use
of the building.
(6) "Major building system" refers to foundations, building
structures, roofs, interior construction and finishes, heating,
ventilation and air condition systems, electrical systems, plumbing,
and other components necessary for safe and normal plant operation.
(7) "Mixed facility" means a state-owned building structure where
educational and general and auxiliary programs are jointly housed, and
includes infrastructure necessary for safe and normal operations by its
occupants.
(8) "Preservation" means routine and preventive inspection,
mechanical adjustments, and minor work to replace or repair systems,
surfaces, or materials undertaken to maintain a building and its
existing infrastructure for current use by current occupants.
(9) "State facility" means a state-owned building structure
exclusively housing educational and general programs, and includes
infrastructure necessary for safe and normal operation by its
occupants.
(10) "Stewardship" means the collective action undertaken with
appropriated and nonappropriated funds by institutional authorities to
keep facilities in safe and functional condition for occupants, without
deterioration for lack of attention or resources, that optimize the
useful life of installed building systems and material construction,
given advancing age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall periodically update the comparative framework. The
scope of work, focus, funding, and expectations for data and support
from state agencies shall be as defined by the legislature through the
omnibus appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The higher education facility preservation
account is created in the state treasury. The account shall consist of
moneys transferred or appropriated to the account by the legislature.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation and solely
for preservation projects and activities to keep state and mixed
facilities that are currently classified in the comparable framework as
adequate, good, or superior in condition from deteriorating until such
time as a capital project to modernize, renovate, or replace the
facility is approved by the legislature. Preservation projects and
activities must clearly extend the remaining useful life of the
facility, and shall only take place in state and mixed facilities that
will be operated for not less than thirteen years from the date of
investment.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.88.032 and 1997 c 96 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Normal maintenance costs, except for funds appropriated for
facility preservation of state institutions of higher education under
chapter 28B.--- RCW (sections 1 through 4 of this act), shall be
programmed in the operating budget rather than in the capital budget.
(2) All debt-financed pass-through money to local governments shall
be programmed and separately identified in the budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---