BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any facility constructed by the department for the purpose of
building pontoons or supporting equipment for bridges shall not be used
for vessel construction, overhaul, conversion, or repair. However, the
department may lease the facility, or a portion of the facility, to
other parties, either public or private, for vessel construction,
overhaul, conversion, or repair, only if a full and fair market rate is
charged for the use of the facility.
(2) For the purposes of this section, full and fair market rate
shall be determined by a survey of rates and charges at marine
construction and repair facilities in Washington state.
(3) The department may not dispose, sell, or trade the facility
except under the conditions of RCW 47.12.063, including the requirement
of fair market value.
(4) Any revenues derived from the use of the facility shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account.

--- END ---