BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.660.020 and 2001 c 158 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each district or consortia of school districts applying for
((state funds through this)) the alternative route certification
program shall submit a proposal to the Washington professional educator
standards board specifying:
(a) The route or routes the partnership program intends to offer
and a detailed description of how the routes will be structured and
operated by the partnership;
(b) The number of candidates that will be enrolled per route;
(c) An identification, indication of commitment, and description of
the role of approved teacher preparation programs that are partnering
with the district or consortia of districts;
(d) An assurance of district provision of adequate training for
mentor teachers either through participation in a state mentor training
academy or district-provided training that meets state-established
mentor-training standards specific to the mentoring of alternative
route candidates;
(e) An assurance that significant time will be provided for mentor
teachers to spend with the alternative route teacher candidates
throughout the internship. Partnerships must provide each candidate
with intensive classroom mentoring until such time as the candidate
demonstrates the competency necessary to manage the classroom with less
intensive supervision and guidance from a mentor;
(f) A description of the rigorous screening process for applicants
to alternative route programs, including entry requirements specific to
each route, as provided in RCW 28A.660.040; and
(g) The design and use of a teacher development plan for each
candidate. The plan shall specify the alternative route coursework and
training required of each candidate and shall be developed by comparing
the candidate's prior experience and coursework with the state's new
performance-based standards for residency certification and adjusting
any requirements accordingly. The plan may include the following
components:
(i) A minimum of one-half of a school year, and an additional
significant amount of time if necessary, of intensive mentorship,
starting with full-time mentoring and progressing to increasingly less
intensive monitoring and assistance as the intern demonstrates the
skills necessary to take over the classroom with less intensive
support. For route one and two candidates, before the supervision is
diminished, the mentor of the teacher candidate at the school and the
supervisor of the teacher candidate from the higher education teacher
preparation program must both agree that the teacher candidate is ready
to manage the classroom with less intensive supervision. For route
three candidates, the mentor of the teacher candidate shall make the
decision;
(ii) Identification of performance indicators based on the
knowledge and skills standards required for residency certification by
the state board of education;
(iii) Identification of benchmarks that will indicate when the
standard is met for all performance indicators;
(iv) A description of strategies for assessing candidate
performance on the benchmarks;
(v) Identification of one or more tools to be used to assess a
candidate's performance once the candidate has been in the classroom
for about one-half of a school year; and
(vi) A description of the criteria that would result in residency
certification after about one-half of a school year but before the end
of the program.
(2) ((Districts may apply for program funds to pay stipends to both
mentor teachers and interns during their mentored internship. For both
intern stipends and accompanying mentor stipends, the per intern
district request for funds may not exceed the amount designated by the
BA+0 cell on the statewide teacher salary allocation schedule. This
amount shall be prorated for internships and mentorships that last less
than a full school year. Interns in the program for a full year shall
be provided a stipend of at least eighty percent of the amount
generated by the BA+0 cell on the statewide teacher salary allocation
schedule. This amount shall be prorated for internships that last less
than a full school year)) To the extent funds are appropriated for this
purpose, districts may apply for program funds to pay stipends to
trained mentor teachers of interns during the mentored internship. The
per intern amount of mentor stipend shall not exceed five hundred
dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.660.030 and 2001 c 158 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board, with support from
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall select
school districts and consortia of school districts to receive
partnership grants ((from)) to the extent that funds are appropriated
by the legislature ((for this purpose)) to administer alternative route
certification programs. Factors to be considered in selecting
proposals include, but are not limited to:
(a) The degree to which the district, or consortia of districts in
partnership, are currently experiencing teacher shortages;
(b) The degree to which the proposal addresses criteria specified
in RCW 28A.660.020 and is in keeping with specifications of program
routes in RCW 28A.660.040;
(c) The cost-effectiveness of the proposed program; and
(d) Any demonstrated district and in-kind contributions to the
program.
(2) Selection of proposals shall also take into consideration the
need to ensure an adequate number of candidates for each type of route
in order to evaluate their success.
(3) Funds appropriated for the partnership grant program in this
chapter shall be administered by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2001 c 158 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The alternative route conditional scholarship program is created
under the following guidelines:
(1) The program shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. In administering the program, the higher education
coordinating board has the following powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the program;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the program.
(2) Participation in the alternative route conditional scholarship
program is limited to ((classified staff in routes one and two))
interns of the partnership grant programs under RCW 28A.660.040. ((The
Washington professional educator standards board shall select
classified staff to receive conditional scholarships.))
(3) In order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients
shall be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative certification
routes through the partnership grant program, as provided in RCW
28A.660.040. Recipients must continue to make satisfactory progress
towards completion of the alternative route certification program and
receipt of a residency teaching certificate.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients that fail
to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The higher education coordinating board
shall adopt rules to define the terms for repayment, including
applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) To the extent funds are appropriated for this specific purpose,
the annual amount of the scholarship is the annual cost of tuition for
the alternative route certification program in which the recipient is
enrolled, not to exceed ((four)) eight thousand dollars. The board may
adjust the annual award by the average rate of resident undergraduate
tuition and fee increases at the state universities as defined in RCW
28B.10.016.
(7) The higher education coordinating board may deposit all
appropriations, collections, and any other funds received for the
program in this chapter in the student loan account authorized in RCW
28B.102.060.

--- END ---