BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that the
costs incurred by the department of natural resources for processing
forest practices applications and notifications be partially recovered
by imposing a fee based on the volume of timber harvested.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.065 and 2000 c 11 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Effective July 1, 1997,)) An applicant shall pay an
application fee and a recording fee, if applicable, at the time an
application or notification is submitted to the department or to the
local governmental entity as provided in this chapter.
(2) For applications and notifications submitted to the department,
the application fee shall be fifty dollars for class II, III, and IV
forest practices applications or notifications relating to the
commercial harvest of timber. However, the fee shall be five hundred
dollars for class IV forest practices applications on lands being
converted to other uses or on lands which are not to be reforested
because of the likelihood of future conversion to urban development or
on lands that are contained within "urban growth areas," designated
pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except the fee shall be fifty dollars
on those lands where the forest landowner provides:
(a) A written statement of intent signed by the forest landowner
not to convert to a use other than commercial forest product operations
for ten years, accompanied by either a written forest management plan
acceptable to the department or documentation that the land is enrolled
under the provisions of chapter 84.33 RCW; or
(b) A conversion option harvest plan approved by the local
governmental entity and submitted to the department as part of the
forest practices application.
All money collected from fees under this subsection shall be deposited
in the state general fund.
(3) For applications submitted to the local governmental entity,
the fee shall be five hundred dollars for class IV forest practices on
lands being converted to other uses or lands that are contained within
"urban growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except
as otherwise provided in this section, unless a different fee is
otherwise provided by the local governmental entity.
(4) Recording fees shall be as provided in chapter 36.18 RCW.
(5) In addition to the fees imposed under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section, at the time an application or notification is
submitted to the department, the applicant shall pay a fee of ten cents
per thousand board feet to be harvested under the application or
notification. The fee imposed by this subsection shall not apply to
applications submitted to a local government entity as provided in this
chapter. The department may adjust the amount due under this
subsection to reflect the actual volume of timber harvested under an
application or notification.
(6) An application fee under subsection (2) of this section shall
be refunded or credited to the applicant if either the application or
notification is disapproved by the department or the application or
notification is withdrawn by the applicant due to restrictions imposed
by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---