BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the enactment of
chapter 236, Laws of 1988 amended the definition of employer under the
industrial welfare act, chapter 49.12 RCW, to ensure that the family
care provisions of that act applied to the state and political
subdivisions. The legislature further finds that this amendment of the
definition of employer may be interpreted as creating an ambiguity as
to whether the other provisions of chapter 49.12 RCW have applied to
the state and its political subdivisions. The purpose of this act is
to make retroactive, remedial, curative, and technical amendments to
clarify the intent of chapter 49.12 RCW and chapter 236, Laws of 1988
and resolve any ambiguity. It is the intent of the legislature to
establish that, prior to the effective date of this act, chapter 49.12
RCW and the rules promulgated thereunder did not apply to the state or
its agencies and political subdivisions except as expressly provided
for in RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295 and 49.12.450.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.12.005 and 1998 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) ((The term)) "Department" means the department of labor and
industries.
(2) ((The term)) "Director" means the director of the department of
labor and industries, or the director's designated representative.
(3) ((The term)) (a) Prior to the effective date of this act,
"employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, business
trust, legal representative, or other business entity which engages in
any business, industry, profession, or activity in this state and
employs one or more employees ((and)) but does not include the state,
any state institution, any state agency, political subdivisions of the
state, and any municipal corporation or quasi-municipal corporation.
For the purposes of RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295 and 49.12.450 only,
"employer" also includes the state, any state institution, any state
agency, political subdivisions of the state, and any municipal
corporation or quasi-municipal corporation.
(b) After the effective date of this act, "employer" means any
person, firm, corporation, partnership, business trust, legal
representative, or other business entity which engages in any business,
industry, profession, or activity in this state and employs one or more
employees. "Employer" includes the state, any state institution, state
agency, political subdivisions of the state, and any municipal
corporation or quasi-municipal corporation: PROVIDED, That (i) this
chapter and the rules adopted thereunder apply to these public
employers only to the extent that this chapter and the rules adopted
thereunder do not conflict with any statute, rule, regulation, or
ordinance adopted under the authority of the appropriate legislative
body; and (ii) employees of public employers may enter into collective
bargaining contracts or other employment agreements that specify hours,
wages, and working conditions that vary from or supersede the standards
and requirements of this chapter and the rules promulgated thereunder.
(4) ((The term)) "Employee" means an employee who is employed in
the business of the employee's employer whether by way of manual labor
or otherwise.
(5) ((The term)) "Conditions of labor" ((shall)) means and includes
the conditions of rest and meal periods for employees including
provisions for personal privacy, practices, methods and means by or
through which labor or services are performed by employees and includes
bona fide physical qualifications in employment, but shall not include
conditions of labor otherwise governed by statutes and rules and
regulations relating to industrial safety and health administered by
the department.
(6) For the purpose of chapter 16, Laws of 1973 2nd ex. sess. a
minor is defined to be a person of either sex under the age of eighteen
years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---