BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.68.233 and 2000 c 176 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall require that every pilot who is a resident of
this state and every nonresident pilot who regularly operates any
aircraft in this state be registered with the department. The
department shall charge an annual fee ((not to exceed ten dollars)) of
fifteen dollars for each registration. All registration certificates
issued under this section shall be renewed annually during the month of
the registrant's birthdate.
The registration fee imposed by this section shall be used by the
department for the purpose of (a) search and rescue of lost and downed
aircraft and airmen under the direction and supervision of the
secretary, (b) safety and education, and (c) volunteer recognition and
support.
Registration shall be effected by filing with the department a
certified written statement that contains the information reasonably
required by the department. The department shall issue certificates of
registration and in connection therewith shall prescribe requirements
for the possession and exhibition of the certificates.
The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(1) A pilot who operates an aircraft exclusively in the service of
any government or any political subdivision thereof, including the
government of the United States, any state, territory, or possession of
the United States, or the District of Columbia;
(2) A pilot registered under the laws of a foreign country;
(3) A pilot engaged exclusively in commercial flying constituting
an act of interstate or foreign commerce;
(4) A person piloting an aircraft equipped with fully functioning
dual controls when a licensed instructor is in full charge of one set
of the controls and the flight is solely for instruction or for the
demonstration of the aircraft to a bona fide prospective purchaser.
Failure to register as provided in this section is a violation of
RCW 47.68.230 and subjects the offender to the penalties incident
thereto.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.68.234 and 1993 c 208 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall require that every airman or airwoman that is
not registered under RCW 47.68.233 and who is a resident of this state,
or every nonresident airman or airwoman who is regularly performing
duties as an airman or airwoman within this state, be registered with
the department. The department shall charge an annual fee ((not to
exceed ten dollars)) of fifteen dollars for each registration. A
registration certificate issued under this section is to be renewed
annually during the month of the registrant's birthdate.
The department shall use the registration fee imposed under this
section for the purposes of: (1) Search and rescue of lost and downed
aircraft and airmen or airwomen under the direction and supervision of
the secretary; and (2) safety and education.
Registration is ((affected [effected])) effected by filing with the
department a certified written statement that contains the information
reasonably required by the department. The department shall issue
certificates of registration and, in connection with the certificates,
shall provide requirements for the possession and exhibition of the
certificates.
Failure to register as provided in this section is a violation of
RCW 47.68.230 and subjects the offender to the penalties incident to
this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.68.240 and 2000 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter, or
any of the rules, regulations, or orders issued pursuant thereto, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided under
chapter 9A.20 RCW, except that any person violating any of the
provisions of RCW 47.68.220, 47.68.230, or 47.68.255 shall be guilty of
a gross misdemeanor which shall be punished as provided under chapter
9A.20 RCW. In addition to, or in lieu of, the penalties provided in
this section, or as a condition to the suspension of a sentence which
may be imposed pursuant thereto, for violations of RCW 47.68.220 and
47.68.230, the court in its discretion may prohibit the violator from
operating an aircraft within the state for such period as it may
determine but not to exceed one year. Violation of the duly imposed
prohibition of the court may be treated as a separate offense under
this section or as a contempt of court.
(2) In addition to the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, failure to register an aircraft, as required by this chapter,
is subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars per aircraft for
the first violation. Subsequent violations in the same year are
subject to the following civil penalties:
(a) For the second violation, a civil penalty of two hundred
dollars per aircraft;
(b) For the third and subsequent violations, a civil penalty of
four hundred dollars per aircraft.
(3) In addition to the provisions in subsection (1) of this
section, failure to register as a pilot, airman, or airwoman, as
required by this chapter, is subject to a civil penalty of four times
the fees that are due.
(4) The revenue from penalties prescribed in subsection (2) of this
section must be deposited into the aeronautics account under RCW
82.42.090. The revenue from penalties prescribed in subsection (3) of
this section must be deposited into the aircraft search and rescue,
safety, and education account under RCW 47.68.236.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.68.250 and 1999 c 302 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every aircraft shall be registered with the department for each
calendar year in which the aircraft is operated or is based within this
state. A fee of ((eight)) fifteen dollars shall be charged for each
such registration and each annual renewal thereof.
Possession of the appropriate effective federal certificate,
permit, rating, or license relating to ownership and airworthiness of
the aircraft, and payment of the excise tax imposed by Title 82 RCW for
the privilege of using the aircraft within this state during the year
for which the registration is sought, and payment of the registration
fee required by this section shall be the only requisites for
registration of an aircraft under this section.
The registration fee imposed by this section shall be payable to
and collected by the secretary. The fee for any calendar year must be
paid during the month of January, and shall be collected by the
secretary at the time of the collection by him or her of the said
excise tax. If the secretary is satisfied that the requirements for
registration of the aircraft have been met, he or she shall thereupon
issue to the owner of the aircraft a certificate of registration
therefor. The secretary shall pay to the state treasurer the
registration fees collected under this section, which registration fees
shall be credited to the aeronautics account in the transportation
fund.
It shall not be necessary for the registrant to provide the
secretary with originals or copies of federal certificates, permits,
ratings, or licenses. The secretary shall issue certificates of
registration, or such other evidences of registration or payment of
fees as he or she may deem proper; and in connection therewith may
prescribe requirements for the possession and exhibition of such
certificates or other evidences.
The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(1) An aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the service of any
government or any political subdivision thereof, including the
government of the United States, any state, territory, or possession of
the United States, or the District of Columbia, which is not engaged in
carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;
(2) An aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country;
(3) An aircraft which is owned by a nonresident and registered in
another state: PROVIDED, That if said aircraft shall remain in and/or
be based in this state for a period of ninety days or longer it shall
not be exempt under this section;
(4) An aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying
constituting an act of interstate or foreign commerce;
(5) An aircraft owned by the commercial manufacturer thereof while
being operated for test or experimental purposes, or for the purpose of
training crews for purchasers of the aircraft;
(6) An aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery, test, or
demonstration purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft dealer
licensed under Title 14 RCW;
(7) An aircraft based within the state that is in an unairworthy
condition, is not operated within the registration period, and has
obtained a written exemption issued by the secretary.
The secretary shall be notified within ((one week)) thirty days of
any change in ownership of a registered aircraft. The notification
shall contain the N, NC, NR, NL, or NX number of the aircraft, the full
name and address of the former owner, and the full name and address of
the new owner. For failure to so notify the secretary, the
registration of that aircraft may be canceled by the secretary, subject
to reinstatement upon application and payment of a reinstatement fee of
ten dollars by the new owner.
A municipality or port district that owns, operates, or leases an
airport, as defined in RCW 47.68.020, with the intent to operate, shall
require from an aircraft owner proof of aircraft registration ((or
proof of intent to register an aircraft)) as a condition of leasing or
selling tiedown or hangar space for an aircraft. The airport shall
inform the lessee or purchaser of the tiedown or hangar space of the
state law requiring registration and direct the person to comply with
the state law if the person has not already done so. The airport may
lease or sell tiedown or hangar space to owners of nonregistered
aircraft after presenting them with the appropriate state registration
forms. It is then the responsibility of the lessee or purchaser to
register the aircraft. The airport shall report to the department's
aviation division at the end of each month, the names, addresses, and
"N" numbers of those aircraft owners not yet registered.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.42.020 and 1996 c 104 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby levied, and there shall be collected by every
distributor of aircraft fuel, an excise tax at the rate ((computed
under RCW 82.42.025)) of ten cents on each gallon of aircraft fuel
sold, delivered or used in this state: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That such
aircraft fuel excise tax shall not apply to fuel for aircraft that both
operate from a private, non-state-funded airfield during at least
ninety-five percent of the aircraft's normal use and are used
principally for the application of pesticides, herbicides, or other
agricultural chemicals: PROVIDED FURTHER, That there shall be
collected from every consumer or user of aircraft fuel either the use
tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020, as amended, or the retail sales tax
imposed by RCW 82.08.020, as amended, collection procedure to be as
prescribed by law and/or rule or regulation of the department of
revenue. The taxes imposed by this chapter shall be collected and paid
to the state but once in respect to any aircraft fuel.
The tax required by this chapter, to be collected by the seller, is
held in trust by the seller until paid to the department, and a seller
who appropriates or converts the tax collected to his or her own use or
to any use other than the payment of the tax to the extent that the
money required to be collected is not available for payment on the due
date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a felony, or gross
misdemeanor in accordance with the theft and anticipatory provisions of
Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership, corporation, or corporate officer
who fails to collect the tax imposed by this section, or who has
collected the tax and fails to pay it to the department in the manner
prescribed by this chapter, is personally liable to the state for the
amount of the tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 82.42.025 (Computation of aircraft fuel
tax rate) and 1983 c 49 s 2 & 1982 1st ex.s. c 25 s 3 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---