BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.068 and 2001 c 3 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) A portion of the proceeds of the state property tax levy shall
be distributed to school districts in the amounts and in the manner
provided in this section.
(2) The amount of the distribution to each school district shall be
based upon the average number of full-time equivalent students in the
school district during the previous school year, and shall be
calculated as follows:
(a) Out of taxes collected in calendar years 2001 through and
including 2003, an annual amount equal to one hundred forty dollars per
each full-time equivalent student in all school districts shall be
deposited in the student achievement fund to be distributed to each
school district based on one hundred forty dollars per full-time
equivalent student in the school district for each year beginning with
the school year 2001-2002 and through the end of the 2003-2004 school
year.
(b) ((Out of taxes collected in calendar year 2004)) For the 2004-2005 school year, an annual amount equal to ((four)) two hundred fifty-four dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school districts
shall be deposited in the student achievement fund to be distributed to
each school district based on ((four)) two hundred fifty-four dollars
per full-time equivalent student ((for each year beginning with the
school year 2004-2005)).
(c) For the 2005-2006 school year, an amount equal to three hundred
dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school districts shall
be deposited in the student achievement fund to be distributed to each
school district based on three hundred dollars per full-time equivalent
student.
(d) For the 2006-2007 school year, an amount equal to three hundred
seventy-five dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school
districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund to be
distributed to each school district based on three hundred seventy-five
dollars per full-time equivalent student.
(e) For the 2007-2008 school year, an amount equal to four hundred
fifty dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school districts
shall be deposited in the student achievement fund to be distributed to
each school district based on four hundred fifty dollars per full-time
equivalent student.
(f) Each subsequent year following the 2007-2008 school year, the
amount deposited and distributed shall be adjusted for inflation as
defined in RCW 43.135.025(((7))) (8).
(3) For the 2001-2002 through 2003-2004 school years, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall verify the average
number of full-time equivalent students in each school district from
the previous school year to the state treasurer by August 1st of each
year.
(4) Beginning with the 2004-2005 school year:
(a) The annual distributions to each school district shall be based
on the average number of full-time equivalent students in the school
district from the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year; and
(b) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall notify the department of the
monthly amounts to be deposited into the student achievement fund to
meet the apportionment schedule distributions.

--- END ---