BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2001 c 4 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, except for the 2003-04 and
2004-05 school years, each school district shall be provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase
((for the salaries, including mandatory salary-related benefits, of all
employees of the district)).
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for ((all))
school employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other
certificated instructional staff, the rate of the annual cost-of-living
increase funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied
to the base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used
to recognize school district personnel costs.
(((d) Beginning with the 2001-02 school year, the state shall fully
fund the cost-of-living increase in this section as part of its
obligation to meet the basic education requirements under Article IX of
the Washington Constitution.))
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.206 and 2001 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington Constitution establishes "the paramount duty of the
state to make ample provision for the education of all children."
Providing quality education for all children in Washington requires
well-qualified and experienced teachers and other school employees.
However, salaries for educators have not kept up with the increased
cost-of-living in the state. The failure to keep up with inflation
threatens Washington's ability to compete with other states to attract
first-rate teachers to Washington classrooms and to keep well-qualified
educators from leaving for other professions. The state must provide
a fair and reasonable cost-of-living increase, as provided in this act,
to help ensure that the state attracts and keeps the best teachers and
school employees for the children of Washington.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.50.465 and 2001 c 4 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Academic employees of community and technical college districts
shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in
accordance with this section. For purposes of this section, "academic
employee" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.52.020.
(a) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, except as provided in (d) of this subsection,
each college district shall receive a cost-of-living allocation
sufficient to increase academic employee salaries, including mandatory
salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly increase in the
cost-of-living index.
(b) A college district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
other compensation policies. No later than the end of the fiscal year,
each college district shall certify to the college board that it has
spent funds provided for cost-of-living increases on salaries and
salary-related benefits.
(c) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living
increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases
for academic employees in subsequent years.
(d) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year except for the 2003-04 and 2004-05 fiscal years,
the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase set forth in
this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.50.468 and 2001 c 4 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Classified employees of technical colleges shall be provided an
annual salary cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
For purposes of this section, "technical college" has the same meaning
as defined in RCW 28B.50.030. This section applies to only those
classified employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW.
(a) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, except as provided in (d) of this subsection,
each technical college board of trustees shall receive a cost-of-living
allocation sufficient to increase classified employee salaries,
including mandatory salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly
increase in the cost-of-living index.
(b) A technical college board of trustees shall distribute its
cost-of-living allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in
accordance with the technical college's salary schedules, collective
bargaining agreements, and other compensation policies. No later than
the end of the fiscal year, each technical college shall certify to the
college board that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living
increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases
for technical college classified employees in subsequent years.
(d) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year except for the 2003-2004 and 2004-2005 fiscal
years, the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase set forth
in this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

--- END ---