BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.58.080 and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
Local governments shall develop or amend, within ((twenty-four))
sixty months after the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW
90.58.060, a master program for regulation of uses of the shorelines of
the state consistent with the required elements of the guidelines
adopted by the department.

--- END ---