BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - LICENSE FEES
Sec. 101 RCW 46.16.070 and 1994 c 262 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In lieu of all other vehicle licensing fees, unless
specifically exempt, and in addition to ((the excise tax prescribed in
chapter 82.44 RCW and)) the mileage fees prescribed for buses and
stages in RCW 46.16.125, there shall be paid and collected annually for
each truck, motor truck, truck tractor, road tractor, tractor, motor
home, bus, auto stage, or for hire vehicle with seating capacity of
more than six, based upon the declared combined gross weight or
declared gross weight ((thereof pursuant to the provisions of)) under
chapter 46.44 RCW, the following licensing fees by such gross weight:

DECLARED GROSS WEIGHT SCHEDULE A SCHEDULE B

4,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 37.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 37.00

6,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 44.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 44.00

8,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 55.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 55.00

10,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62.00

((12,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 72.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 72.00

14,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 82.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 82.00

16,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 92.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 92.00

18,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 137.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 137.00

20,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 152.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 152.00

22,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 164.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 164.00

24,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 177.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 177.00

26,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 187.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 187.00

28,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 220.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 220.00

30,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 253.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 253.00

32,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 304.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 304.00

34,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 323.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 323.00

36,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350.00

38,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 384.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 384.00

40,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 439.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 439.00

42,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 456.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 546.00

44,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 466.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 556.00

46,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 591.00

48,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 522.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 612.00

50,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 566.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 656.00

52,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 595.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 685.00

54,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 642.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 732.00

56,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 677.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 767.00

58,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 704.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 794.00

60,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 840.00

62,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 804.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 894.00

64,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 822.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 912.00

66,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 915.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,005.00

68,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 954.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,044.00

70,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,027.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,117.00

72,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,098.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,188.00

74,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,193.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,283.00

76,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,289.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,379.00

78,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,407.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,497.00

80,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,518.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,608.00

82,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,623.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,713.00

84,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,728.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,818.00

86,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,833.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,923.00

88,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,938.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,028.00

90,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,043.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,133.00

92,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,148.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,238.00

94,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,253.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,343.00

96,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,358.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,448.00

98,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,463.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,553.00

100,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,568.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,658.00

102,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,673.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,763.00

104,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,778.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,868.00

105,500 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,883.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,973.00))

12,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 79.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 79.00

14,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90.00

16,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 102.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 102.00

18,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 154.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 154.00

20,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 171.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 171.00

22,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 185.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 185.00

24,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200.00

26,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 211.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 211.00

28,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249.00

30,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 287.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 287.00

32,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 346.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 346.00

34,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 368.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 368.00

36,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 399.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 399.00

38,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 438.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 438.00

40,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00

42,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 521.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 611.00

44,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 532.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 622.00

46,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 572.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 662.00

48,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 596.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 686.00

50,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 647.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 737.00

52,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 680.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 770.00

54,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 734.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 824.00

56,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 775.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 865.00

58,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 806.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 896.00

60,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 859.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 949.00

62,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 921.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,011.00

64,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 941.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,031.00

66,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,048.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,138.00

68,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,093.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,183.00

70,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,177.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,267.00

72,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,259.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,349.00

74,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1, 368.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,458.00

76,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,478.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,568.00

78,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,614.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,704.00

80,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,742.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,832.00

82,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,863.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,953.00

84,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,983.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,073.00

86,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,104.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,194.00

88,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,225.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,315.00

90,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,346.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,436.00

92,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,466.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,556.00

94,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,587.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,677.00

96,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,708.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,798.00

98,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,829.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,919.00

100,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,949.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,039.00

102,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,070.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,160.00

104,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,191.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,281.00

105,500 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,312.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,402.00

Schedule A applies to vehicles either used exclusively for hauling
logs or that do not tow trailers. Schedule B applies to vehicles that
tow trailers and are not covered under Schedule A.
Every truck, motor truck, truck tractor, and tractor exceeding
6,000 pounds empty scale weight registered under chapter 46.16, 46.87,
or 46.88 RCW shall be licensed for not less than one hundred fifty
percent of its empty weight unless the amount would be in excess of the
legal limits prescribed for such a vehicle in RCW 46.44.041 or
46.44.042, in which event the vehicle shall be licensed for the maximum
weight authorized for such a vehicle or unless the vehicle is used only
for the purpose of transporting any well drilling machine, air
compressor, rock crusher, conveyor, hoist, donkey engine, cook house,
tool house, bunk house, or similar machine or structure attached to or
made a part of such vehicle.
The following provisions apply when increasing gross or combined
gross weight for a vehicle licensed under this section:
(a) The new license fee will be one-twelfth of the fee listed above
for the new gross weight, multiplied by the number of months remaining
in the period for which licensing fees have been paid, including the
month in which the new gross weight is effective.
(b) Upon surrender of the current certificate of registration or
cab card, the new licensing fees due shall be reduced by the amount of
the licensing fees previously paid for the same period for which new
fees are being charged.
(2) The proceeds from the fees collected under subsection (1) of
this section shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.

Sec. 102 RCW 46.68.035 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
All proceeds from combined vehicle licensing fees received by the
director for vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085 shall
be forwarded to the state treasurer to be distributed into accounts
according to the following method:
(1) The sum of two dollars for each vehicle shall be deposited into
the multimodal transportation account, except that for each vehicle
registered by a county auditor or agent to a county auditor pursuant to
RCW 46.01.140, the sum of two dollars shall be credited to the current
county expense fund.
(2) The remainder shall be distributed as follows:
(a) ((23.677)) 21.434 percent shall be deposited into the state
patrol highway account of the motor vehicle fund;
(b) ((1.521)) 1.368 percent shall be deposited into the Puget Sound
ferry operations account of the motor vehicle fund; ((and))
(c) 11.771 percent shall be deposited into the transportation 2003
account; and
(d) The remaining proceeds shall be deposited into the motor
vehicle fund.

PART II - SALES AND USE TAX
Sec. 201 RCW 82.08.020 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax
on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW
47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(5) The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive
retail sales of the same property.
(((4))) (6) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.12.020 and 2003 c 5 (EHB 1977) s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every
person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within
this state as a consumer: (a) Any article of tangible personal
property purchased at retail, or acquired by lease, gift, repossession,
or bailment, or extracted or produced or manufactured by the person so
using the same, or otherwise furnished to a person engaged in any
business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); or (b) any canned
software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding canned
software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for
temporary use in viewing information, or both.
(2) This tax shall apply to the use of every service defined as a
retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a) and the use of every
article of tangible personal property, including property acquired at
a casual or isolated sale, and including byproducts used by the
manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter provided, irrespective of
whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are
available for purchase within this state.
(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property or service taxable
under RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) or (3)(a) purchased at retail or acquired by
lease, gift, or bailment if the sale to, or the use by, the present
user or his bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under
chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the
present user or by his bailor or donor.
(4) Except as provided in this section, payment by one purchaser or
user of tangible personal property or service of the tax imposed by
chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not have the effect of exempting any
other purchaser or user of the same property or service from the taxes
imposed by such chapters. If the sale to, or the use by, the present
user or his or her bailor or donor has already been subjected to the
tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid
by the present user or by his or her bailor or donor; or in respect to
the use of property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid
based on reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by
the value of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax
rate imposed by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of
first use; or in respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a
previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general
activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961, the tax
imposed by this chapter does not apply.
(5) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used or value of the service used by the taxpayer
multiplied by the rates in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW
82.08.020.

Sec. 203 RCW 82.12.045 and 1996 c 149 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In the collection of the use tax on motor vehicles, the
department of revenue may designate the county auditors of the several
counties of the state as its collecting agents. Upon such designation,
it shall be the duty of each county auditor to collect the tax at the
time an applicant applies for the registration of, and transfer of
title to, the motor vehicle, except in the following instances:
(a) Where the applicant exhibits a dealer's report of sale showing
that the retail sales tax has been collected by the dealer;
(b) Where the application is for the renewal of registration;
(c) Where the applicant presents a written statement signed by the
department of revenue, or its duly authorized agent showing that no use
tax is legally due; or
(d) Where the applicant presents satisfactory evidence showing that
the retail sales tax or the use tax has been paid by ((him)) the
applicant on the vehicle in question.
(2) The term "motor vehicle," as used in this section means and
includes all motor vehicles, trailers and semitrailers used, or of a
type designed primarily to be used, upon the public streets and
highways, for the convenience or pleasure of the owner, or for the
conveyance, for hire or otherwise, of persons or property, including
fixed loads, facilities for human habitation, and vehicles carrying
exempt licenses.
(3) It shall be the duty of every applicant for registration and
transfer of certificate of title who is subject to payment of tax under
this section to declare upon ((his)) the application the value of the
vehicle for which application is made, which shall consist of the
consideration paid or contracted to be paid therefor.
(4) Each county auditor who acts as agent of the department of
revenue shall at the time of remitting license fee receipts on motor
vehicles subject to the provisions of this section pay over and account
to the state treasurer for all use tax revenue collected under this
section, after first deducting as ((his)) a collection fee the sum of
two dollars for each motor vehicle upon which the tax has been
collected. All revenue received by the state treasurer under this
section shall be credited to the general fund. The auditor's
collection fee shall be deposited in the county current expense fund.
A duplicate of the county auditor's transmittal report to the state
treasurer shall be forwarded forthwith to the department of revenue.
(5) Any applicant who has paid use tax to a county auditor under
this section may apply to the department of revenue for refund thereof
if he or she has reason to believe that such tax was not legally due
and owing. No refund shall be allowed unless application therefor is
received by the department of revenue within the statutory period for
assessment of taxes, penalties, or interest prescribed by RCW
82.32.050(3). Upon receipt of an application for refund the department
of revenue shall consider the same and issue its order either granting
or denying it and if refund is denied the taxpayer shall have the right
of appeal as provided in RCW 82.32.170, 82.32.180 and 82.32.190.
(6) The provisions of this section shall be construed as cumulative
of other methods prescribed in chapters 82.04 to 82.32 RCW, inclusive,
for the collection of the tax imposed by this chapter. The department
of revenue shall have power to promulgate such rules as may be
necessary to administer the provisions of this section. Any duties
required by this section to be performed by the county auditor may be
performed by the director of licensing but no collection fee shall be
deductible by said director in remitting use tax revenue to the state
treasurer.
(7) The use tax revenue collected on the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(3) shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation
account under RCW 47.66.070.

Sec. 204 RCW 82.08.064 and 2000 c 104 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sales and use tax rate change under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW shall be imposed (((1))) (a) no sooner than seventy-five days
after its enactment into law and (((2))) (b) only on the first day of
January, April, July, or October.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the tax rate
change in section 201 of this act.

PART III - MOTOR AND SPECIAL FUEL TAXES
Sec. 301 RCW 82.36.025 and 1999 c 269 s 16 and 1999 c 94 s 29 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A motor vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-three cents per gallon
((shall apply)) applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor
vehicle fuel.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative motor fuel
tax rate of five cents per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or
use of motor vehicle fuel. This subsection (2) expires when the bonds
issued for transportation 2003 projects are retired.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.38.030 and 2002 c 183 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and imposed upon special fuel users a
tax at the rate ((computed in the manner provided in RCW 82.36.025 on
each)) of twenty-three cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one
hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard
pressure and temperature.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of five cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users. This subsection
(2) expires when the bonds issued for transportation 2003 projects are
retired.
(3) ((The tax)) Taxes are imposed ((by subsection (1) of this
section is imposed)) when:
(a) Special fuel is removed in this state from a terminal if the
special fuel is removed at the rack unless the removal is to a licensed
exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state, or
the removal is to a special fuel distributor for direct delivery to an
international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320;
(b) Special fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if either
of the following applies:
(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of
the special fuel immediately before the removal is not a licensee; or
(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack unless the removal is to
a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the
state, or the removal is to a special fuel distributor for direct
delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW
82.38.320;
(c) Special fuel enters into this state for sale, consumption, use,
or storage if either of the following applies:
(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a
licensee; or
(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;
(d) Special fuel is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed
entity unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the
special fuel;
(e) Blended special fuel is removed or sold in this state by the
blender of the fuel. The number of gallons of blended special fuel
subject to tax is the difference between the total number of gallons of
blended special fuel removed or sold and the number of gallons of
previously taxed special fuel used to produce the blended special fuel;
(f) Dyed special fuel is used on a highway, as authorized by the
internal revenue code, unless the use is exempt from the special fuel
tax;
(g) Dyed special fuel is held for sale, sold, used, or is intended
to be used in violation of this chapter;
(h) Special fuel purchased by an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320 is used on a highway; and
(i) Special fuel is sold by a licensed special fuel supplier to a
special fuel distributor, special fuel importer, or special fuel
blender and the special fuel is not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(((3))) (4) The tax imposed by this chapter, if required to be
collected by the licensee, is held in trust by the licensee until paid
to the department, and a licensee who appropriates or converts the tax
collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is
guilty of a felony, or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the theft
and anticipatory provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership,
corporation, or corporate officer who fails to collect the tax imposed
by this section, or who has collected the tax and fails to pay it to
the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, is personally
liable to the state for the amount of the tax.

Sec. 303 RCW 46.68.090 and 1999 c 269 s 2 and 1999 c 94 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle
fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be
first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be distributed monthly
by the state treasurer in ((the proportions set forth in (c) through
(l))) accordance with subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this
((subsection)) section.
(a) For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special
fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;
(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to
appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state
treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state
of Washington in the administration of the motor vehicle fuel tax and
the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed monthly((;)).
(((c))) (2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1) shall be distributed as set forth in (a)
through (j) of this section.
(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as
defined in RCW 46.68.130;
(((d))) (b) For distribution to the special category C account,
hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609
percent to be expended for special category C projects. Special
category C projects are category C projects that, due to high cost
only, will require bond financing to complete construction.
The following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used
in determining which special category C projects have the highest
priority:
(i) Accident experience;
(ii) Fatal accident experience;
(iii) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable
speeds without undue congestion; and
(iv) Continuity of development of the highway transportation
network.
Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor
vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under
this subsection (((1)(d))) (2)(b);
(((e))) (c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;
(((f))) (d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital
construction account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
2.3726 percent;
(((g))) (e) For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;
(((h))) (f) For distribution to the transportation improvement
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and
expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;
(((i))) (g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor
vehicle fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW
46.68.110;
(((j))) (h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall
be distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of
transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to
the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed
monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;
(((k))) (i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation
account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
1.9565 percent. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the
number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural,
safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road
administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies
to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management
system is used;
(((l))) (j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended
in accordance with RCW 36.79.020.
(((2))) (3) One hundred percent of the net tax amount collected
under RCW 82.36.025(2) and 82.38.030(2) shall be distributed to the
transportation 2003 account.
(4) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so
as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway
construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and
whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

Sec. 304 RCW 46.68.110 and 1999 c 269 s 3 and 1999 c 94 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Funds credited to the incorporated cities and towns of the state as
set forth in RCW 46.68.090(((1)(i))) (2)(g) shall be subject to
deduction and distribution as follows:
(1) One and one-half percent of such sums distributed under RCW
46.68.090(2)(g) shall be deducted monthly as such sums are credited and
set aside for the use of the department of transportation for the
supervision of work and expenditures of such incorporated cities and
towns on the city and town streets thereof, including the supervision
and administration of federal-aid programs for which the department of
transportation has responsibility: PROVIDED, That any moneys so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the incorporated cities and towns in proportion to deductions herein
made;
(2) Thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent of such funds
distributed under RCW 46.68.090(2)(g) shall be deducted monthly, as
such funds accrue, and set aside for the use of the department of
transportation for the purpose of funding the cities' share of the
costs of highway jurisdiction studies and other studies. Any funds so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the cities in proportion to the deductions made;
(3) One percent of such funds distributed under RCW 46.68.090(2)(g)
shall be deducted monthly, as such funds accrue, to be deposited in the
urban arterial trust account, to implement the city hardship assistance
program, as provided in RCW 47.26.164. However, any moneys so retained
and not required to carry out the program as of July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, shall be provided within sixty days to the
treasurer and distributed in the manner prescribed in subsection (5) of
this section;
(4) After making the deductions under subsections (1) through (3)
of this section and RCW 35.76.050, 31.86 percent of the fuel tax
distributed to the cities and towns in RCW 46.68.090(((1)(i))) (2)(g)
shall be allocated to the incorporated cities and towns in the manner
set forth in subsection (5) of this section and subject to deductions
in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, subject to RCW
35.76.050, to be used exclusively for: The construction, improvement,
chip sealing, seal-coating, and repair for arterial highways and city
streets as those terms are defined in RCW 46.04.030 and 46.04.120; the
maintenance of arterial highways and city streets for those cities with
a population of less than fifteen thousand; or the payment of any
municipal indebtedness which may be incurred in the construction,
improvement, chip sealing, seal-coating, and repair of arterial
highways and city streets; and
(5) The balance remaining to the credit of incorporated cities and
towns after such deduction shall be apportioned monthly as such funds
accrue among the several cities and towns within the state ratably on
the basis of the population last determined by the office of financial
management.

Sec. 305 RCW 82.38.035 and 2001 c 270 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A licensed supplier shall remit tax on special fuel to the
department as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2)(a))) (3)(a). On a two-party exchange, or buy-sell agreement between two licensed suppliers,
the receiving exchange partner or buyer shall remit the tax.
(2) A refiner shall remit tax to the department on special fuel
removed from a refinery as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2)(b))) (3)(b).
(3) An importer shall remit tax to the department on special fuel
imported into this state as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2)(c))) (3)(c).
(4) A blender shall remit tax to the department on the removal or
sale of blended special fuel as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2)(e)))
(3)(e).
(5) A dyed special fuel user shall remit tax to the department on
the use of dyed special fuel as provided in RCW 82.38.030(((2)(f)))
(3)(f).

Sec. 306 RCW 82.38.047 and 1998 c 176 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
A terminal operator is jointly and severally liable for remitting
the tax imposed under RCW 82.38.030(((1))) if, in connection with the
removal of special fuel that is not dyed or marked in accordance with
internal revenue service requirements, the terminal operator provides
a person with a bill of lading, shipping paper, or similar document
indicating that the special fuel is dyed or marked in accordance with
internal revenue service requirements.

Sec. 307 RCW 46.09.170 and 1995 c 166 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on ((the)) a tax rate ((in effect January 1, 1990)) of: (a)
Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2003,
through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; (c) twenty-one cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2009;
(d) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2009, through June 30, 2011; and (e) twenty-three cents per gallon of
motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011, and thereafter, less proper
deductions for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW
46.68.090. The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund
as follows:
(((a))) (i) Forty percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of
natural resources solely for planning, maintenance, and management of
ORV recreation facilities, nonhighway roads, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(((i))) (A) Not more than five percent may be expended for
information programs under this chapter;
(((ii))) (B) Not less than ten percent and not more than fifty
percent may be expended for ORV recreation facilities;
(((iii))) (C) Not more than twenty-five percent may be expended for
maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(((iv))) (D) Not more than fifty percent may be expended for
nonhighway road recreation facilities;
(((v))) (E) Ten percent shall be transferred to the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation for grants to law enforcement agencies
in those counties where the department of natural resources maintains
ORV facilities. This amount is in addition to those distributions made
by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under (((d)(i)))
(e)(iv)(A) of this subsection;
(((b))) (ii) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the
ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department
of fish and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of nonhighway roads and recreation
facilities;
(((c))) (iii) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the parks and recreation
commission solely for the maintenance and management of ORV use areas
and facilities; and
(((d))) (iv) Fifty-four and one-half percent, together with the
funds received by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation
under RCW 46.09.110, shall be credited to the nonhighway and off-road
vehicle activities program account to be administered by the committee
for planning, acquisition, development, maintenance, and management of
ORV recreation facilities and nonhighway road recreation facilities;
ORV user education and information; and ORV law enforcement programs.
The funds under this subsection shall be expended in accordance with
the following limitations:
(((i))) (A) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for ORV
education, information, and law enforcement programs under this
chapter;
(((ii))) (B) Not less than an amount equal to the funds received by
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110
and not more than sixty percent may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(((iii))) (C) Not more than twenty percent may be expended for
nonhighway road recreation facilities.
(2) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.

Sec. 308 RCW 46.10.170 and 1994 c 262 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
From time to time, but at least once each four years, the
department shall determine the amount of moneys paid to it as motor
vehicle fuel tax that is tax on snowmobile fuel. Such determination
shall use one hundred thirty-five gallons as the average yearly fuel
usage per snowmobile, the number of registered snowmobiles during the
calendar year under determination, and ((the)) a fuel tax rate ((in
effect January 1, 1990)) of: (1) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (2) twenty cents
per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30,
2007; (3) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July
1, 2007, through June 30, 2009; (4) twenty-two cents per gallon of
motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (5)
twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1,
2011, and thereafter.

Sec. 309 RCW 79A.25.070 and 2000 c 11 s 73 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon expiration of the time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming
of refunds of tax on marine fuel, the state of Washington shall succeed
to the right to such refunds. The director of licensing, after taking
into account past and anticipated claims for refunds from and deposits
to the marine fuel tax refund account and the costs of carrying out the
provisions of RCW 79A.25.030, shall request the state treasurer to
transfer monthly from the marine fuel tax refund account an amount
equal to the proportion of the moneys in the account representing
((the)) a motor vehicle fuel tax rate ((under RCW 82.36.025 in effect
on January 1, 1990)) of: (1) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (2) twenty cents
per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30,
2007; (3) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July
1, 2007, through June 30, 2009; (4) twenty-two cents per gallon of
motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (5)
twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1,
2011, and thereafter, to the recreation resource account and the
remainder to the motor vehicle fund.

PART IV - ACCOUNT CREATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 46.68
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The transportation 2003 account is hereby created in the motor
vehicle fund. Money in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used only for
projects or improvements identified as transportation 2003 projects or
improvements in the omnibus transportation budget and to pay the
principal and interest on the bonds authorized for transportation 2003
projects or improvements. Upon completion of the projects or
improvements identified as transportation 2003 projects or
improvements, moneys deposited in this account must only be used to pay
the principal and interest on the bonds authorized for transportation
2003 projects or improvements, and any funds in the account in excess
of the amount necessary to make the principal and interest payments may
be used for maintenance on the completed projects or improvements.
(2) The "nickel account" means the transportation 2003 account.

Sec. 402 RCW 43.84.092 and 2002 c 242 s 2, 2002 c 114 s 24, and
2002 c 56 s 402 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund,
the federal forest revolving account, the health services account, the
public health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
regional transportation investment district account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund,
the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

PART V - CLEAN AIR FEE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 70.94
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to other fees and taxes required under this chapter,
registered owners of motor vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.320 shall
annually, upon renewal, pay a clean air fee of two dollars. Eighty-seven and one-half percent of the proceeds from the clean air fee must
be deposited in a segregated subaccount of the air pollution control
account created in RCW 70.94.015, and twelve and one-half percent of
the proceeds from the clean air fee must be deposited in the vessel
response account in section 503 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 A new section is added to chapter 70.94
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Money from the clean air fee under section 501 of this act that
is deposited in the segregated subaccount of the air pollution control
account created in RCW 70.94.015 may be used for the purposes of this
chapter, including the following:
(a) Retrofitting motor vehicles, including school buses and transit
fleets, with exhaust emission control devices;
(b) Reducing vehicle air contaminant emissions and cleaning up air
pollution;
(c) Reducing and monitoring toxic air contaminants;
(d) Providing funding for fueling infrastructure necessary to allow
school bus fleets to use alternative, cleaner fuels.
(2) Money from the clean air fee under section 501 of this act
deposited in the segregated subaccount of the air pollution control
account created in RCW 70.94.015 is subject to distribution as follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent of the money must be distributed to the air
pollution control authorities created under this chapter. The money
must be distributed in direct proportion with the amount of fees
imposed under section 501 of this act that are collected within the
boundaries of each authority. However, an amount in direct proportion
with those fees collected in counties for which no air pollution
control authority exists must be distributed to the department.
(b) Fifteen percent of the money from the fee under section 501 of
this act must be distributed to the department and used by the
department for the following purposes:
(i) Retrofitting motor vehicles, including school buses and transit
fleets, with exhaust emission control devices;
(ii) Reducing vehicle air contaminant emissions and cleaning up air
pollution;
(iii) Reducing and monitoring toxic air contaminants;
(iv) Providing funding for fueling infrastructure necessary to
allow school bus fleets to use alternative, cleaner fuels.
(3) Money in the air pollution control account may be spent by the
department only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 A new section is added to chapter 90.56
RCW to read as follows:
The vessel response account is created in the state treasury.
Receipts from the clean air fee in section 501 of this act shall be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used by the
department of ecology for a dedicated rescue tug, deployed at the
entrance of the Strait of Juan de Fuca, whose primary mission is to
arrest the drift of disabled vessels to prevent a pollution event. The
tug may be also equipped and available to provide other emergency
services and assistance including intervention support for the
coordinated vessel traffic service, assisting search and rescue
efforts, marine fire fighting, and early oil spill response.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 Section 501 of this act expires July 1,
2030.

PART VI - MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---