BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to provide funds necessary for the
location, design, right of way, and construction of selected projects
or improvements that are identified as transportation 2003 projects or
improvements in the omnibus transportation budget, there shall be
issued and sold upon the request of the transportation commission a
total of two billion six hundred million dollars of general obligation
bonds of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Upon the request of the transportation
commission, as appropriate, the state finance committee shall supervise
and provide for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the bonds in this
act in accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds authorized by this act
shall be sold in the manner, at time or times, in amounts, and at the
price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds may be
offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net
proceeds of the sale of the bonds.
The state finance committee shall consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of
more favorable interest rates, lower total interest costs, and
increased marketability and for the purpose of retiring the bonds
during the life of the project for which they were issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) in the motor vehicle fund.
The proceeds shall be available only for the purposes enumerated in
section 1 of this act, for the payment of bond anticipation notes, if
any, and for the payment of bond issuance costs, including the costs of
underwriting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Bonds issued under the authority of sections
1 through 6 of this act shall distinctly state that they are a general
obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and
credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the
interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay
such principal and interest as the same shall become due. The
principal and interest on the bonds shall be first payable in the
manner provided in sections 1 through 6 of this act from the proceeds
of the state excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels imposed by
chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. Proceeds of these excise taxes are
hereby pledged to the payment of any bonds and the interest thereon
issued under the authority of sections 1 through 6 of this act, and the
legislature agrees to continue to impose these excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels in amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the
principal and interest on all bonds issued under the authority of
sections 1 through 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Both principal and interest on the bonds
issued for the purposes of sections 1 through 6 of this act shall be
payable from the highway bond retirement fund. The state finance
committee may provide that a special account be created in the fund to
facilitate payment of the principal and interest. The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the
state treasurer the amount required for principal and interest on the
bonds in accordance with the bond proceedings. The state treasurer
shall withdraw revenues from the transportation 2003 account (nickel
account) in the motor vehicle fund and deposit in the highway bond
retirement fund, or a special account in the fund, such amounts, and at
such times, as are required by the bond proceedings.
Any funds required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds
authorized by sections 1 through 6 of this act shall be taken from that
portion of the motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and that is distributed
to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) in the motor
vehicle fund. Funds required shall never constitute a charge against
any other allocations of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax
revenues to the state, counties, cities, and towns unless the amount
arising from excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
distributed to the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) proves
insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest
on any such bonds.
Any payments for bond retirement or interest on the bonds taken
from other revenues from the motor vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes
that are distributable to the state, counties, cities, and towns shall
be repaid from the first revenues from the motor vehicle fuel or
special fuel taxes distributed to the transportation 2003 account
(nickel account) not required for bond retirement or interest on the
bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Bonds issued under the authority of sections
1 through 5 of this act and this section and any other general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington that have been or that may
be authorized and that pledge motor vehicle and special fuels excise
taxes for the payment of principal and interest thereon shall be an
equal charge against the revenues from such motor vehicle and special
fuels excise taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 For the purpose of providing funds for the
planning, design, construction, reconstruction, and other necessary
costs for transportation projects, the state finance committee is
authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington
in the sum of three hundred forty-nine million five hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance these
projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this
section may be sold at such price as the state finance committee shall
determine. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale
without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale
of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The proceeds of the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 7 of this act must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account and must be used exclusively for the purposes
specified in section 7 of this act and for the payment of expenses
incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The nondebt-limit reimbursable bond
retirement account must be used for the payment of the principal and
interest on the bonds authorized in section 7 of this act.
(2)(a) The state finance committee must, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 7 of this act.
(b) On or before the date on which any interest or principal and
interest is due, the state treasurer shall transfer from the multimodal
transportation account for deposit into the nondebt-limit reimbursable
bond retirement account the amount computed in (a) of this subsection
for bonds issued for the purposes of section 7 of this act.
(3) If the multimodal transportation account has insufficient
revenues to pay the principal and interest computed in subsection
(2)(a) of this section, then the debt-limit reimbursable bond
retirement account must be used for the payment of the principal and
interest on the bonds authorized in section 7 of this act from any
additional means provided by the legislature.
(4) If at any time the multimodal transportation account has
insufficient revenues to repay the bonds, the legislature may provide
additional means for the payment of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Bonds issued under section 7 of this
act must state that they are a general obligation of the state of
Washington, must pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of the principal and interest, and must contain an
unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as it becomes
due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The legislature may provide additional
means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal and interest
on the bonds authorized in section 7 of this act, and sections 9 and 10
of this act are not deemed to provide an exclusive method for their
payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The bonds authorized in section 7 of this
act are a legal investment for all state funds or funds under state
control and for all funds of any other public body.

Sec. 13 RCW 39.42.060 and 2002 c 240 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
No bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed
money shall be issued by the state which will cause the aggregate debt
contracted by the state to exceed that amount for which payments of
principal and interest in any fiscal year would require the state to
expend more than seven percent of the arithmetic mean of its general
state revenues, as defined in RCW 39.42.070, for the three immediately
preceding fiscal years as certified by the treasurer in accordance with
RCW 39.42.070. It shall be the duty of the state finance committee to
compute annually the amount required to pay principal of and interest
on outstanding debt. In making such computation, the state finance
committee shall include all borrowed money represented by bonds, notes,
or other evidences of indebtedness which are secured by the full faith
and credit of the state or are required to be paid, directly or
indirectly, from general state revenues and which are incurred by the
state, any department, authority, public corporation or quasi public
corporation of the state, any state university or college, or any other
public agency created by the state but not by counties, cities, towns,
school districts, or other municipal corporations, and shall include
debt incurred pursuant to section 3 of Article VIII of the Washington
state Constitution, but shall exclude the following:
(1) Obligations for the payment of current expenses of state
government;
(2) Indebtedness incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;
(3) Principal of and interest on bond anticipation notes;
(4) Any indebtedness which has been refunded;
(5) Financing contracts entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;
(6) Indebtedness authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993,
pursuant to statute which requires that the state treasury be
reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and the interest on such
indebtedness, from money other than general state revenues or from the
special excise tax imposed pursuant to chapter 67.40 RCW;
(7) Indebtedness authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993,
pursuant to statute that requires that the state treasury be
reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and the interest on such
indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the state treasury, except higher
education operating fees, (b) higher education building fees, (c)
indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts, and (d)
fees and charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by
institutions of higher education;
(8) Any agreement, promissory note, or other instrument entered
into by the state finance committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection
with its acquisition of bond insurance, letters of credit, or other
credit support instruments for the purpose of guaranteeing the payment
or enhancing the marketability, or both, of any state bonds, notes, or
other evidence of indebtedness;
(9) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes identified in RCW
43.99N.020;
(10) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the school district
bond guaranty established by chapter 39.98 RCW;
(11) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of replacing the
waterproof membrane over the east plaza garage and revising related
landscaping construction pursuant to RCW 43.99Q.070; ((and))
(12) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the state
legislative building rehabilitation, to the extent that principal and
interest payments of such indebtedness are paid from the capitol
building construction account pursuant to RCW 43.99Q.140(2)(b); and
(13) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of financing projects
under section 7 of this act.
To the extent necessary because of the constitutional or statutory
debt limitation, priorities with respect to the issuance or
guaranteeing of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness by the
state shall be determined by the state finance committee.

Sec. 14 RCW 35.95A.120 and 2002 c 248 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The city transportation authority may be dissolved by a vote of the
people residing within the boundaries of the authority if the authority
is faced with significant financial problems. However, the authority
may covenant with holders of its bonds that it may not be dissolved and
shall continue to exist solely for the purpose of continuing to levy
and collect any taxes or assessments levied by it and pledged to the
repayment of debt and to take other actions, including the appointment
of a trustee, as necessary to allow it to repay any remaining debt. No
such debt may be incurred by the authority on a project until thirty
days after a final environmental impact statement on that project has
been issued as required by chapter 43.21C RCW. The amount of the
authority's initial bond issue is limited to the amount of the project
costs in the subsequent two years as documented by a certified engineer
or by submitted bids, plus any reimbursable capital expenses already
incurred at the time of the bond issue. The authority may size the
first bond issue consistent with the internal revenue service five-year
spend down schedule if an independent financial advisor recommends such
an approach is financially advisable. Any referendum petition to
dissolve the city transportation authority must be filed with the city
council and contain provisions for dissolution of the authority.
Within seven days, the city prosecutor must review the validity of the
petition and submit its report to the petitioner and city council. If
the petitioner's claims are deemed valid by the city prosecutor, within
ten days of the petitioner's filing, the city council will confer with
the petitioner concerning the form and style of the petition, issue an
identification number for the petition, and write a ballot title for
the measure. The ballot title must be posed as a question and an
affirmative vote on the measure results in authority retention and a
negative vote on the measure results in the authority's dissolution.
The petitioner will be notified of the identification number and ballot
title within this ten-day period.
After this notification, the petitioner has ninety days in which to
secure on petition forms, the signatures of not less than fifteen
percent of the registered voters in the authority area and to file the
signed petitions with the filing officer. Each petition form must
contain the ballot title and the full text of the measure to be
referred. The filing officer will verify the sufficiency of the
signatures on the petitions. If sufficient valid signatures are
properly submitted, the filing officer shall submit the initiative to
the authority area voters at a general or special election held on one
of the dates provided in RCW 29.13.010 as determined by the city
council, which election will not take place later than one hundred
twenty days after the signed petition has been filed with the filing
officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 12 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---