BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.55.030 and 1989 c 111 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for licensing as a registered tow truck operator
shall be made on forms furnished by the department, shall be
accompanied by an inspection certification from the Washington state
patrol, shall be signed by the applicant or an agent, and shall include
the following information:
(a) The name and address of the person, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation under whose name the business is to be
conducted;
(b) The names and addresses of all persons having an interest in
the business, or if the owner is a corporation, the names and addresses
of the officers of the corporation;
(c) The names and addresses of all employees who serve as tow truck
drivers;
(d) Proof of minimum insurance required by subsection (3) of this
section;
(e) The vehicle license and vehicle identification numbers of all
tow trucks of which the applicant is the registered owner;
(f) Any other information the department may require; and
(g) A certificate of approval from the Washington state patrol
certifying that:
(i) The applicant has an established place of business and that
mail is received at the address shown on the application;
(ii) The address of any storage locations where vehicles may be
stored is correctly stated on the application;
(iii) The place of business has an office area that is accessible
to the public without entering the storage area; and
(iv) The place of business has adequate and secure storage
facilities, as defined in this chapter and the rules of the department,
where vehicles and their contents can be properly stored and protected.
(2) Before issuing a registration certificate to an applicant the
department shall require the applicant to file with the department a
surety bond in the amount of five thousand dollars running to the state
and executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this
state. The bond shall be approved as to form by the attorney general
and conditioned that the operator shall conduct his business in
conformity with the provisions of this chapter pertaining to abandoned
or unauthorized vehicles, and to compensate any person, company, or the
state for failure to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted
hereunder, or for fraud, negligence, or misrepresentation in the
handling of these vehicles. Any person injured by the tow truck
operator's failure to fully perform duties imposed by this chapter and
the rules adopted hereunder, or an ordinance or resolution adopted by
a city, town, or county is entitled to recover actual damages,
including reasonable attorney's fees against the surety and the tow
truck operator. Successive recoveries against the bond shall be
permitted, but the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons
shall not exceed the amount of the bond. As a condition of authority
to do business, the operator shall keep the bond in full force and
effect. Failure to maintain the penalty value of the bond or
cancellation of the bond by the surety automatically cancels the
operator's registration.
(3) Before the department may issue a registration certificate to
an applicant, the applicant shall provide proof of minimum insurance
requirements of:
(a) One hundred thousand dollars for liability for bodily injury or
property damage per occurrence; and
(b) Fifty thousand dollars of legal liability per occurrence, to
protect against vehicle damage, including but not limited to fire and
theft, from the time a vehicle comes into the custody of an operator
until it is redeemed or sold.
Cancellation of or failure to maintain the insurance required by (a)
and (b) of this subsection automatically cancels the operator's
registration.
(4) The fee for each original registration and annual renewal is
one hundred dollars per company, plus ((fifty)) seventy-five dollars
per truck. The department shall forward the registration fee to the
state treasurer for deposit in the motor vehicle fund.
(5) The applicant must submit an inspection certificate from the
state patrol before the department may issue or renew an operator's
registration certificate or tow truck permits.
(6) Upon approval of the application, the department shall issue a
registration certificate to the registered operator to be displayed
prominently at the operator's place of business.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.70.061 and 2002 c 352 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The annual fees for original licenses issued for twelve
consecutive months from the date of issuance under this chapter shall
be:
(a) Vehicle dealers, principal place of business for each and every
license classification: Seven hundred fifty dollars;
(b) Vehicle dealers, each subagency, and temporary subagency: One
hundred dollars;
(c) Vehicle manufacturers: ((Five)) Seven hundred fifty dollars.
(2) The annual fee for renewal of any license issued pursuant to
this chapter shall be:
(a) Vehicle dealers, principal place of business for each and every
license classification: ((Two)) Five hundred ((fifty)) dollars;
(b) Vehicle dealer, each and every subagency: ((Twenty-five))
Fifty dollars;
(c) Vehicle manufacturers: Two hundred fifty dollars.
If any licensee fails or neglects to apply for such renewal within
thirty days after the expiration of the license, or assigned renewal
date under a staggered licensing system, the license shall be declared
canceled by the director, in which case the licensee will be required
to apply for an original license and pay the fee required for the
original license.
(3)(a) The fee for the transfer to another location of any license
classification issued pursuant to this chapter ((shall be twenty-five))
is one hundred dollars.
(b) The fee for changing a vehicle dealer's name is one hundred
dollars.
(4) The fee for vehicle dealer license plates and manufacturer
license plates shall be the amount required by law for vehicle license
plates exclusive of excise tax and gross weight and tonnage fees.
(5) All fees collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the
state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle fund.
(6) The fees prescribed in this section are in addition to any
excise taxes imposed by chapter 82.44 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.76.040 and 1990 c 250 s 68 are each amended to read
as follows:
The fee for an original transporter's license is ((twenty-five))
one hundred dollars. Transporter license number plates bearing an
appropriate symbol and serial number shall be attached to all vehicles
being delivered in the conduct of the business licensed under this
chapter. The plates may be obtained for a fee of two dollars for each
set.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.76.050 and 1985 c 109 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A transporter's license expires on the date assigned by the
director, and may be renewed by filing a proper application and paying
an annual fee of ((fifteen)) fifty dollars.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.79.040 and 1971 ex.s. c 110 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Application for a hulk hauler's license, together with a fee of
((ten)) fifty dollars, or application for a scrap processor's license,
together with a fee of twenty-five dollars, shall be forwarded to the
director. Upon receipt of the application the director shall, if the
application be in order, issue the license applied for authorizing him
to do business as such and forward the fee, together with an itemized
and detailed report, to the state treasurer, to be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund. Upon receiving the certificate the owner shall
cause it to be prominently displayed at the address shown in his
application, where it may be inspected by an investigating officer at
any time.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.79.050 and 1985 c 109 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A license issued pursuant to this chapter expires on the date
assigned by the director, and may be renewed by filing a proper
application and payment of a fee of ((ten)) twenty-five dollars.
Whenever a hulk hauler or scrap processor ceases to do business or
the license has been suspended or revoked, the license shall
immediately be surrendered to the director.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.80.040 and 1995 c 256 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The application, together with a fee of ((twenty-five)) one hundred
dollars, and a surety bond as provided in RCW 46.80.070, shall be
forwarded to the department. Upon receipt of the application the
department shall, if the application is in order, issue a vehicle
wrecker's license authorizing the wrecker to do business as such and
forward the fee to the state treasurer, to be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund. Upon receiving the certificate the owner shall cause it
to be prominently displayed in the place of business, where it may be
inspected by an investigating officer at any time.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.80.050 and 1995 c 256 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A license issued on this application remains in force until
suspended or revoked and may be renewed annually upon reapplication
according to RCW 46.80.030 and upon payment of a fee of ((ten)) fifty
dollars. A vehicle wrecker who fails or neglects to renew the license
before the assigned expiration date shall pay the fee for an original
vehicle wrecker license as provided in this chapter.
Whenever a vehicle wrecker ceases to do business as such or the
license has been suspended or revoked, the wrecker shall immediately
surrender the license to the department.

--- END ---