BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.0621 and 2002 c 352 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) License tab fees shall be thirty dollars per year for all
vehicles.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "license tab fees" are
defined as the general fees paid annually for licensing motor vehicles
and trailers as defined in RCW 46.04.620 and 46.04.623. ((Trailers
licensed under RCW 46.16.068 or 46.16.085 and)) Campers licensed under
RCW 46.16.505 are not required to pay license tab fees under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Private passenger car one or two-wheel trailers of two thousand
pounds gross weight or less, may be licensed upon the payment of a
license fee in the sum of four dollars and fifty cents or, if the
vehicle was previously licensed in this state and has not been
registered in another jurisdiction in the intervening period, a renewal
license fee in the sum of three dollars and twenty-five cents, but only
if such trailers are to be operated upon the public highway by the
owners thereof.
(2) Private use trailers over two thousand pounds gross weight
operated upon a public highway by the owner of the trailer may be
licensed upon the payment of a license fee of twenty-seven dollars, or
if the trailer was previously licensed in this state and has not been
registered in another jurisdiction in the intervening period, a renewal
fee of twenty-three dollars and seventy-five cents.
(3) It is the intention of the legislature that the reduced license
fee under this section applies only to trailers operated for personal
use of the owners and not trailers held for rental to the public.

--- END ---