BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Money deposited in the segregated subaccount of the air
pollution control account under RCW 46.68.020(2) shall be distributed
as follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent shall be distributed to air pollution
control authorities created under this chapter. The money must be
distributed in direct proportion with the amount of fees imposed under
RCW 46.12.080, 46.12.170, and 46.12.181 that are collected within the
boundaries of each authority. However, an amount in direct proportion
with those fees collected in counties for which no air pollution
control authority exists must be distributed to the department.
(b) The remaining fifteen percent shall be distributed to the
department.
(2) Money distributed to air pollution control authorities and the
department under subsection (1) of this section must be used as
follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent of the money received by an air pollution
control authority or the department must be used to retrofit school
buses with exhaust emission control devices or to provide funding for
fueling infrastructure necessary to allow school bus fleets to use
alternative, cleaner fuels.
(b) The remaining fifteen percent may be used by the air pollution
control authority or department to reduce vehicle air contaminant
emissions and clean up air pollution, or reduce and monitor toxic air
contaminants.
(3) Money in the air pollution control account may be spent by the
department only after appropriation.
(4) The department shall provide a report to the legislative
transportation committees on the progress of the implementation of this
section by December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of ten million dollars is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the segregated
subaccount of the air pollution control account to the department of
ecology for the purposes of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The vessel response account is created in the state treasury.
Grants, gifts, and federal funds may be deposited into the account.
Oil spill penalties assessed against ships under RCW 90.56.330 and
90.48.144 shall also be deposited into the account as well as the money
distributed under RCW 46.68.020(2). Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. The department of ecology is authorized to
utilize the vessel response account to preposition a dedicated rescue
tug at the entrance to the Strait of Juan de Fuca to reduce the risk of
major maritime accidents and oil spills on the outer coast and western
strait. Prior to authorizing the rescue tug to respond to a distressed
vessel, the department shall work with the United States Coast Guard
and industry to determine if another capable, unencumbered commercial
tug is available in the area that can respond. If such a tug can
respond without increasing the risk of a casualty, it should be
deployed as the tug of choice and the state-contracted rescue tug
should not be taken off standby duty. The department is also
authorized to spot charter tugs as needed during major storms and other
high risk periods to protect maritime commerce and the environment
anywhere in state waters.
The department shall not proceed with rule making related to
emergency towing pursuant to chapter 88.46 RCW, so long as the deposit
of the fee into the vessel response account under RCW 46.68.020(2) is
continued and is appropriated for the purpose of the dedicated rescue
tug.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of ecology shall complete an
evaluation of tug escort requirements for laden tankers to determine if
the current escort system requirements under RCW 88.16.190 should be
modified to recognize safety enhancements of the new double hull
tankers deployed with redundant systems. The department shall provide
a report with recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The sum of two million eight hundred
seventy-six thousand dollars is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2005, from the vessel response account to the department of
ecology for the purposes of section 3 of this act.
(2) The sum of two hundred thousand dollars is appropriated for the
biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the oil spill prevention account to
the department of ecology for the purposes of section 4 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.12.040 and 2002 c 352 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The application accompanied by a draft, money order, certified
bank check, or cash for five dollars, together with the last preceding
certificates or other satisfactory evidence of ownership, shall be
forwarded to the director.
(2) The fee shall be in addition to any other fee for the license
registration of the vehicle. The certificate of ownership shall not be
required to be renewed annually, or at any other time, except as by law
provided.
(3) In addition to the application fee and any other fee for the
license registration of a vehicle, the department shall collect from
the applicant a fee of fifteen dollars for vehicles previously
registered in any other state or country. ((The proceeds from the fee
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. For vehicles requiring
a physical examination, the inspection fee shall be fifty dollars and
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.))

Sec. 7 RCW 46.12.101 and 2002 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A transfer of ownership in a motor vehicle is perfected by
compliance with the requirements of this section.
(1) If an owner transfers his or her interest in a vehicle, other
than by the creation, deletion, or change of a security interest, the
owner shall, at the time of the delivery of the vehicle, execute an
assignment to the transferee and provide an odometer disclosure
statement under RCW 46.12.124 on the certificate of ownership or as the
department otherwise prescribes, and cause the certificate and
assignment to be transmitted to the transferee. The owner shall notify
the department or its agents or subagents, in writing, on the
appropriate form, of the date of the sale or transfer, the name and
address of the owner and of the transferee, the transferee's driver's
license number if available, and such description of the vehicle,
including the vehicle identification number, the license plate number,
or both, as may be required in the appropriate form provided or
approved for that purpose by the department. The report of sale will
be deemed properly filed if all information required in this section is
provided on the form and includes a department-authorized notation that
the document was received by the department, its agents, or subagents
on or before the fifth day after the sale of the vehicle, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and state and federal holidays. Agents and
subagents shall immediately electronically transmit the seller's report
of sale to the department. Reports of sale processed and recorded by
the department's agents or subagents may be subject to fees as
specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b). By January 1, 2003, the
department shall create a system enabling the seller of a vehicle to
transmit the report of sale electronically. The system created by the
department must immediately indicate on the department's vehicle record
that a seller's report of sale has been filed.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section to provide
an odometer disclosure statement apply to the transfer of vehicles held
for lease when transferred to a lessee and then to the lessor at the
end of the leasehold and to vehicles held in a fleet when transferred
to a purchaser.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.70.122 the transferee shall within
fifteen days after delivery to the transferee of the vehicle, execute
the application for a new certificate of ownership in the same space
provided therefor on the certificate or as the department prescribes,
and cause the certificates and application to be transmitted to the
department.
(4) Upon request of the owner or transferee, a secured party in
possession of the certificate of ownership shall, unless the transfer
was a breach of its security agreement, either deliver the certificate
to the transferee for transmission to the department or, when the
secured party receives the owner's assignment from the transferee, it
shall transmit the transferee's application for a new certificate, the
existing certificate, and the required fee to the department.
Compliance with this section does not affect the rights of the secured
party.
(5) If a security interest is reserved or created at the time of
the transfer, the certificate of ownership shall be retained by or
delivered to the person who becomes the secured party, and the parties
shall comply with the provisions of RCW 46.12.170.
(6) If the purchaser or transferee fails or neglects to make
application to transfer the certificate of ownership and license
registration within fifteen days after the date of delivery of the
vehicle, he or she shall on making application for transfer be assessed
a twenty-five dollar penalty on the sixteenth day and two dollars
additional for each day thereafter, but not to exceed one hundred
dollars. The director may by rule establish conditions under which the
penalty will not be assessed when an application for transfer is
delayed for reasons beyond the control of the purchaser. Conditions
for not assessing the penalty may be established for but not limited to
delays caused by:
(a) The department requesting additional supporting documents;
(b) Extended hospitalization or illness of the purchaser;
(c) Failure of a legal owner to release his or her interest;
(d) Failure, negligence, or nonperformance of the department,
auditor, or subagent.
Failure or neglect to make application to transfer the certificate
of ownership and license registration within forty-five days after the
date of delivery of the vehicle is a misdemeanor.
(7) Upon receipt of an application for reissue or replacement of a
certificate of ownership and transfer of license registration,
accompanied by the endorsed certificate of ownership or other
documentary evidence as is deemed necessary, the department shall, if
the application is in order and if all provisions relating to the
certificate of ownership and license registration have been complied
with, issue new certificates of title and license registration as in
the case of an original issue and shall transmit the fees together with
an itemized detailed report to the state treasurer((, to be deposited
in the motor vehicle fund)).
(8) Once each quarter the department shall report to the department
of revenue a list of those vehicles for which a seller's report has
been received but no transfer of title has taken place.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.68.020 and 2002 c 352 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall forward all fees for certificates of ownership
or other moneys accruing under the provisions of chapter 46.12 RCW to
the state treasurer, together with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit such moneys ((to the
multimodal transportation account in RCW 47.66.070, and all expenses
incurred in carrying out the provisions of that chapter shall be paid
from such account as authorized by legislative appropriation)) as
follows:
(1) The fees collected under RCW 46.12.040(1) shall be credited to
the multimodal transportation account in RCW 47.66.070.
(2)(a) Beginning with the effective date of this section, and until
July 1, 2008, the fees collected under RCW 46.12.080, 46.12.170, and
46.12.181 shall be credited as follows:
(i) 58.12 percent shall be credited to a segregated subaccount of
the air pollution control account in RCW 70.94.015;
(ii) 15.71 percent shall be credited to the vessel response account
created in section 3 of this act; and
(iii) The remainder shall be credited into the transportation 2003
account (nickel account).
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, and thereafter, the fees collected
under RCW 46.12.080, 46.12.170, and 46.12.181 shall be credited to the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account).
(3) All other fees under chapter 46.12 RCW shall be credited to the
motor vehicle account, unless specified otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 and 3 of this act expire July 1,
2008.

--- END ---