BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that testing and
monitoring of beaches used for recreational shellfishing is essential
to ensure the health of recreational shellfishers. The legislature
also finds that it is essential to have a stable and reliable source of
funding for such biotoxin testing and monitoring. The legislature also
finds that the cost of the resident and nonresident personal use
shellfish and seaweed licenses is undervalued and not properly aligned
with neighboring states and provinces.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the fees authorized in this chapter, the department
shall include a surcharge to fund biotoxin testing and monitoring by
the department of health of beaches used for recreational shellfishing,
and to fund monitoring by the Olympic region harmful algal bloom
program of the Olympic natural resources center at the University of
Washington. A surcharge of three dollars applies to resident and
nonresident shellfish and seaweed licenses as authorized by RCW
77.32.520(2) (a) and (b); and a surcharge of two dollars applies to
resident and nonresident adult combination licenses as authorized by
RCW 77.32.470(2)(a). Amounts collected from these surcharges must be
deposited in the general fund--local account managed by the department
of health, except that one hundred fifty thousand dollars per year
shall be deposited in the general fund--local account managed by the
University of Washington.
Amounts in excess of the annual costs of the department of health
recreational shellfish testing and monitoring program shall be
transferred to the general fund by the department of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The fee increase proposed in this act must
be implemented in the department of fish and wildlife's license fee
structure beginning July 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2003.

--- END ---