BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.64.090 and 2003 c . . . (ESHB 1853) s 205 are each
amended to read as follows:
USE OF STATE FERRY FACILITIES. (1) Except as provided in section
203 ((of this act)), chapter . . . (ESHB 1853), Laws of 2003 and
subsection (2) of this section, or as provided in section 303 ((of this
act)), chapter . . . (ESHB 1853), Laws of 2003 and subsection (3) of
this section, if any party assumes the operation and maintenance of any
ferry or ferry system by rent, lease, or charter from the department of
transportation, such party shall assume and be bound by all the
provisions herein and any agreement or contract for such operation of
any ferry or ferry system entered into by the department shall provide
that the wages to be paid, hours of employment, working conditions, and
seniority rights of employees will be established by the marine
employees' commission in accordance with the terms and provisions of
this chapter and it shall further provide that all labor disputes shall
be adjudicated in accordance with chapter 47.64 RCW.
(2) If a public transportation benefit area meeting the
requirements of section 201 ((of this act)), chapter . . . (ESHB 1853),
Laws of 2003 has voter approval to operate passenger-only ferry
service, it may enter into an agreement with Washington State Ferries
to rent, lease, or purchase passenger-only vessels, related equipment,
or terminal space for purposes of loading and unloading the passenger-only ferry. Charges for the vessels, equipment, and space must be fair
market value taking into account the public benefit derived from the
ferry service. A benefit area or subcontractor of that benefit area
that qualifies under this subsection is not subject to the restrictions
of subsection (1) of this section, but is subject to:
(a) The terms of those collective bargaining agreements that it or
its subcontractors negotiate with the exclusive bargaining
representatives of its or its subcontractors' employees under chapter
41.56 RCW or the National Labor Relations Act, as applicable;
(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a
requirement that the benefit area and any contract with its
subcontractors, give preferential hiring to former employees of the
department of transportation who separated from employment with the
department because of termination of the ferry service by the state of
Washington; and
(c) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a
requirement that the benefit area and any contract with its
subcontractors, on any questions concerning representation of employees
for collective bargaining purposes, may be determined by conducting a
cross-check comparing an employee organization's membership records or
bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the
employer.
(3) If a ferry district is formed under section 301 ((of this
act)), chapter . . . (ESHB 1853), Laws of 2003 to operate passenger-only ferry service, it may enter into an agreement with Washington
State Ferries to rent, lease, or purchase vessels, related equipment,
or terminal space for purposes of loading and unloading the ferry.
Charges for the vessels, equipment, and space must be fair market value
taking into account the public benefit derived from the ferry service.
A ferry district or subcontractor of that district that qualifies under
this subsection is not subject to the restrictions of subsection (1) of
this section, but is subject to:
(a) ((Subject to)) The terms of those collective bargaining
agreements that it or its subcontractors negotiate with the exclusive
bargaining representatives of its or its subcontractors' employees
under chapter 41.56 RCW or the National Labor Relations Act, as
applicable;
(b) ((Subject to)) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state
law, a requirement((, to be included by)) that the ferry district
((in)) and any contract with ((the district's)) its subcontractors,
((to)) give preferential hiring to former employees of the department
of transportation who separated from employment with the department
because of termination of the ferry service by the state of Washington;
and
(c) ((Subject to)) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state
law, a requirement((, to be included by)) that the ferry district
((in)) and any contract with ((the district's)) its subcontractors,
((that)) on any questions concerning representation of employees for
collective bargaining purposes, may be determined by conducting a
cross-check comparing an employee organization's membership records or
bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the
employer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter
does apply to:
(1) Public employees of public transportation benefit areas
providing passenger-only ferry service as provided in RCW 47.64.090;
and
(2) Public employees of ferry districts providing passenger-only
ferry service as provided in RCW 47.64.090.

Sec. 3 RCW 88.40.020 and 2000 c 69 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any ((inland)) barge that transports hazardous substances in
bulk as cargo, using any port or place in the state of Washington or
the navigable waters of the state shall establish evidence of financial
responsibility in the amount of the greater of ((one)) five million
dollars, or ((one)) three hundred ((fifty)) dollars per gross ton of
such vessel.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) or (c) of this subsection, a tank
vessel that carries oil as cargo in bulk shall demonstrate financial
responsibility to pay at least five hundred million dollars. The
amount of financial responsibility required under this subsection is
one billion dollars after January 1, 2004.
(b) The director by rule may establish a lesser standard of
financial responsibility for ((barges)) tank vessels of three hundred
gross tons or less. The standard shall set the level of financial
responsibility based on the quantity of cargo the ((barge)) tank vessel
is capable of carrying. The director shall not set the standard for
((barges)) tank vessels of three hundred gross tons or less below that
required under federal law.
(c) The owner or operator of a tank vessel who is a member of an
international protection and indemnity mutual organization and is
covered for oil pollution risks up to the amounts required under this
section is not required to demonstrate financial responsibility under
this chapter. The director may require the owner or operator of a tank
vessel to prove membership in such an organization.
(3)(a) A cargo vessel or passenger vessel that carries oil as fuel
shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay ((the greater of at
least six hundred dollars per gross ton or five hundred thousand)) at
least three hundred million dollars. However, a passenger vessel that
transports passengers and vehicles between Washington state and a
foreign country shall demonstrate financial responsibility to pay the
greater of at least six hundred dollars per gross ton or five hundred
thousand dollars.
(b) The owner or operator of a cargo vessel or passenger vessel who
is a member of an international protection and indemnity mutual
organization and is covered for oil pollution risks up to the amounts
required under this section is not required to demonstrate financial
responsibility under this chapter. The director may require the owner
or operator of a cargo vessel or passenger vessel to prove membership
in such an organization.
(4) A fishing vessel while on the navigable waters of the state
must demonstrate financial responsibility in the following amounts:
(a) For a fishing vessel carrying predominantly nonpersistent product,
one hundred thirty-three dollars and forty cents per incident, for each
barrel of total oil storage capacity, persistent and nonpersistent
product, on the vessel or one million three hundred thirty-four
thousand dollars, whichever is greater; or (b) for a fishing vessel
carrying predominantly persistent product, four hundred dollars and
twenty cents per incident, for each barrel of total oil storage
capacity, persistent product and nonpersistent product, on the vessel
or six million six hundred seventy thousand dollars, whichever is
greater.
(5) The documentation of financial responsibility shall demonstrate
the ability of the document holder to meet state and federal financial
liability requirements for the actual costs for removal of oil spills,
for natural resource damages, and for necessary expenses.
(((5) The department may by rule set a lesser amount of financial
responsibility for a tank vessel that meets standards for construction,
propulsion, equipment, and personnel established by the department.
The department shall require as a minimum level of financial
responsibility under this subsection the same level of financial
responsibility required under federal law.))
(6) This section shall not apply to a covered vessel owned or
operated by the federal government or by a state or local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately, but only if Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1853 has become law. If Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1853 has not become law by June 30, 2003, sections 1 and
2 of this act are null and void.

--- END ---