BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.015 and 1965 ex.s. c 133 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All determinations of the prevailing rate of wage shall be made
by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries. By January 1, 2004, the industrial statistician shall
determine the prevailing rate of wage using a stratified random
sampling method.
(2)(a) A stratified random sampling method must be used to the
broadest extent possible, subject to available resources.
(b) If it is determined by the industrial statistician, in
consultation with the prevailing wage advisory committee established in
subsection (4) of this section, that sample size, strata size, or other
factors do not permit the effective use of a stratified random sampling
method, an equally reliable statistical method must be used.
(3) In order to ensure a fair and scientifically accurate
stratified random sampling survey, the industrial statistician shall
consult with the prevailing wage advisory committee established in
subsection (4) of this section regarding the necessary scientific
methods, implementation parameters, and resource allocations.
(4) The director shall appoint a prevailing wage advisory committee
composed of eleven members: Four members representing subject workers,
each of whom must be appointed from a list of names submitted by a
recognized statewide organization of employees, representing a majority
of employees in a cross-section of state industries; four members
representing subject employers, each of whom must be appointed from a
list of names submitted by a recognized statewide organization of
employers, representing a majority of employers in a cross-section of
state industries; and three ex officio members, without a vote, two of
whom must represent the counties, and the other representing the
department. The member representing the department shall be
chairperson. Labor, business, and county representatives must include
representatives from both large and small entities. The committee
shall, as necessary, report to the legislative committees dealing with
commerce and labor regarding the implementation of this section.
(5) Subsections (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this section expire
December 31, 2004.

--- END ---