BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 24.03.065 and 1986 c 240 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A corporation may have one or more classes of members or may
have no members. If the corporation has one or more classes of
members, the designation of such class or classes, the manner of
election or appointment and the qualifications and rights of the
members of each class shall be set forth in the articles of
incorporation or the bylaws. Unless otherwise specified in the
articles of incorporation or the bylaws, an individual, domestic or
foreign profit or nonprofit corporation, a general or limited
partnership, an association or other entity may be a member of a
corporation. If the corporation has no members, that fact shall be set
forth in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. A corporation
may issue certificates evidencing membership therein.
(2) A corporation may have one or more member committees. The
creation, makeup, authority, and operating procedures of any such
member committee or committees shall be addressed in the corporation's
articles of incorporation or bylaws.

Sec. 2 RCW 24.03.075 and 1986 c 240 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Meetings of members may be held at such place, either within
or without this state, as may be stated in or fixed in accordance with
the bylaws. In the absence of any such provision, all meetings shall
be held at the registered office of the corporation in this state.
(b) An annual meeting of the members shall be held at such time as
may be stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. Failure to
hold the annual meeting at the designated time shall not work a
forfeiture or dissolution of the corporation.
(c) Special meetings of the members may be called by the president
or by the board of directors. Special meetings of the members may also
be called by such other officers or persons or number or proportion of
members as may be provided in the articles of incorporation or the
bylaws. In the absence of a provision fixing the number or proportion
of members entitled to call a meeting, a special meeting of members may
be called by members having one-twentieth of the votes entitled to be
cast at such meeting.
(2) Except as may be otherwise restricted by the articles of
incorporation or the bylaws, members and any committee of members of
the corporation may participate in a meeting of members or a committee
of members by means of a conference telephone or similar communications
equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting
can hear each other at the same time and participation by such means
shall constitute presence in person at a meeting.

Sec. 3 RCW 24.03.465 and 1967 c 235 s 94 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any action required by this chapter to be taken at a meeting of
the members or ((directors of a corporation)) a committee of members,
or any action which may be taken at a meeting of the members or
((directors)) a committee of the members under a corporation's articles
of incorporation or bylaws, may be taken without a meeting, except as
otherwise restricted by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, if a
consent in ((writing)) the form of a record, setting forth the action
so taken, shall be ((signed by all)) executed by a majority of the
members or committee of members entitled to vote with respect to the
subject matter thereof((, or all of the directors, as the case may
be)). Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a
((unanimous)) majority vote, and may be stated as such in any articles
or document filed with the secretary of state under this chapter.
(2) Any action required by this chapter to be taken at a meeting of
the directors of a corporation, or any action which may be taken at a
meeting of the directors, may be taken without a meeting if a consent
in the form of a record, setting forth the action so taken, shall be
executed by all of the directors entitled to vote with respect to the
subject matter thereof, or all of the directors, as the case may be.
Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote
and may be stated as such in any articles or document filed with the
secretary of state under this chapter.

--- END ---