BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.110 and 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 918 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. After June 30, 1995, municipal corporations providing
emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter
18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other
emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of
the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary
may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees
would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when
the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in section 3 of this act, fees charged shall
be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the department for the
licensure of the activity or class of activities and may include costs
of necessary inspection.
(3) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.250 and 1996 c 191 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of
each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. The
secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the
fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of
administering that program and the patient safety fee established in
section 3 of this act. All such fees shall be fixed by rule adopted by
the secretary in accordance with the provisions of the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall increase the licensing fee established
under RCW 43.70.110 for health care professionals and facilities
designated in subsection (2) of this section by one percent of the
amount of the applicable annual licensing fee. Proceeds of the patient
safety fee must be dedicated to patient safety and medical error
reduction efforts that have been proven to improve the quality of care
provided by health care professionals and facilities.
(2) Health care professionals and facilities subject to the one
percent patient safety fee include:
(a) Health care professionals licensed under Title 18 RCW; and
(b) Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, and ambulatory diagnostic,
treatment, or surgical facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(3) Patient safety fee proceeds shall be administered by the
department of health, in consultation with established patient safety
coalitions. Proceeds will be distributed in the form of grants, loans,
or other appropriate arrangements to support strategies that have been
proven to reduce medical errors and enhance patient safety. In
developing criteria, for the award of grants, loans, or other funding
arrangements under this section, the department shall rely upon
evidence-based practices to improve patient safety that have been
identified and recommended by governmental and private organizations,
including but not limited to:
(a) The federal agency for health care quality and research;
(b) The federal institute of medicine; and
(c) The joint commission on accreditation of health care
organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) One percent of the present value of the settlement or verdict
in any action for damages based upon injuries resulting from health
care shall be deducted from the settlement or verdict as a patient
safety fee. Proceeds of the patient safety fee will be distributed by
the department of health in the form of grants, loans, or other
appropriate arrangements to support strategies that have been proven to
reduce medical errors and enhance patient safety as provided in section
3 of this act.
(2) Patient safety fees shall be transmitted to the secretary of
the department of health for deposit into the patient safety account
established in section 6 of this act.
(3) The supreme court shall by rule adopt procedures to implement
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary may solicit and accept grants or other funds from
public and private sources to support patient safety and medical error
reduction efforts under RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250 and sections 3 and
4 of this act. Any grants or funds received may be used to enhance
these activities as long as program standards established by the
secretary are maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The patient safety account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from the fees created in section 3 of this act
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for the purposes of RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250 and
sections 3 through 5 of this act. Only the secretary or the
secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

--- END ---