BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there has been an
increase in studies showing a correlation between exposure to violent
video and computer games and various forms of hostile and antisocial
behavior. The entertainment software industry's ratings and content
descriptors of video and computer games reflect that some video and
computer games are suitable only for adults due to graphic depictions
of sex and/or violence. Furthermore, some video and computer games
focus on violence specifically against public law enforcement officers
such as police and fire fighters. The legislature encourages retailers
and parents to use the rating system.
In addition, the legislature finds there is a compelling interest
to curb hostile and antisocial behavior in Washington's youth and to
foster respect for public law enforcement officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.91 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who sells, rents, or permits to be sold or rented, any
video or computer game he or she knows to be a violent video or
computer game to any minor has committed a class 1 civil infraction as
provided in RCW 7.80.120.
(2) "Minor" means a person under seventeen years of age.
(3) "Person" means a retailer engaged in the business of selling or
renting video or computer games and who is subject to the tax on
retailers under RCW 82.04.250, including any individual, partnership,
corporation, or association.
(4) "Violent video or computer game" means a video or computer game
that contains realistic or photographic-like depictions of aggressive
conflict in which the player kills, injures, or otherwise causes
physical harm to a human form in the game who is depicted, by dress or
other recognizable symbols, as a public law enforcement officer.
(5) Every person shall, in each place of his or her business, post
a sign that contains the following message in type that is at least
seventy-two points in size:

THIS BUSINESS WILL NOT SELL, RENT, OR PROVIDE IN ANY OTHER WAY A
VIOLENT VIDEO OR COMPUTER GAME TO ANY PERSON UNDER SEVENTEEN YEARS OF
AGE. NO PERSON WHO CANNOT PROVE HE OR SHE IS AT LEAST SEVENTEEN YEARS
OF AGE MAY BE SOLD, RENTED, OR PROVIDED A VIOLENT VIDEO OR COMPUTER
GAME. RCW 9.91.--- (section 2 of this act).

The sign shall be posted at the location where the sale or rental
transaction occurs, and in such a way as to be readily visible to any
individual who is buying or renting a video or computer game.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.80.120 and 1997 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a civil infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty.
(a) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 1 civil
infraction shall be two hundred fifty dollars, not including statutory
assessments, except for an infraction of state law involving tobacco
products as specified in RCW 70.93.060(4) or an infraction of state law
involving violent video or computer games under section 2 of this act,
in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is five hundred
dollars;
(b) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 2 civil
infraction shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars, not including
statutory assessments;
(c) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 3 civil
infraction shall be fifty dollars, not including statutory assessments;
and
(d) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 4 civil
infraction shall be twenty-five dollars, not including statutory
assessments.
(2) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule the conditions under
which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines for civil
infractions.
(3) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this
chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at
that time the court may grant an extension of the period in which the
penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time
established for payment, the court may proceed to collect the penalty
in the same manner as other civil judgments and may notify the
prosecuting authority of the failure to pay.
(4) The court may also order a person found to have committed a
civil infraction to make restitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The office of superintendent of public
instruction shall convene a task force to address the findings of the
legislature as stated in section 1 of this act and to help meet the
goals of the curbing of hostile and antisocial behavior of Washington
minors and increased respect for public law enforcement officers.
(2) The task force shall consist of: (a) A representative of the
office of superintendent of public instruction, who shall chair the
task force; (b) two representatives of developers of violent video or
computer games; (c) two representatives of businesses who sell or rent
violent video or computer games; (d) a representative of a statewide
organization whose membership includes parents and teachers; (e) a
representative of a student organization with experience in violence
awareness and reduction; (f) a representative of the prosecuting
attorneys of the state; (g) two members of the public who have
experience with issues and research associated with violent video
games; and (h) a representative of the department of health. The
superintendent shall appoint the members of the task force, except the
secretary of health shall appoint the representative from the
department.
(3) The task force shall consider possible strategies and options
designed to reduce access by minors to violent video and computer games
that are for sale or rent by any person. The strategies shall include
education for developers of the games, parents, persons, law
enforcement, and educators. The task force shall review existing
efforts by developers and persons to rate violent video and computer
games and how those efforts may be improved.
(4) The members of the task force shall serve without compensation
and the office of superintendent of public instruction shall accomplish
its duties under this section within existing resources. The task
force and the office of superintendent of public instruction shall not
accept funding for task force purposes from groups or persons with a
financial interest in the development, production, sale, or rental of
violent video or computer games.
(5) The task force shall prepare and submit a report and
recommendations to the governor and the legislature not later than
December 31, 2004.
(6) For purposes of this section, the terms "violent video and
computer games" and "person" have the same meaning as defined in
section 2 of this act.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2004.

--- END ---