BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2003 c . . . (ESHB 1163) s 305 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $565,300,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,434,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,374,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,940,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,258,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,279,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $613,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,596,835,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $157,374,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
$192,940,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation,
$13,258,000 of the motor vehicle account--local appropriation, and
$50,279,000 of the special category C account--state appropriation are
provided solely to implement the activities and projects included in
the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - Current Law report
as transmitted to LEAP on April 27, 2003.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$78,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation. The motor
vehicle account--state appropriation includes $18,038,000 in unexpended
proceeds from bond sales authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for mobility and
economic initiative improvement projects.
(3) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes $567,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state
appropriation includes $46,300,000 in unexpended proceeds from the
January 2003 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project.
(4) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
$44,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.812. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available in the special category C account in lieu of
bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(5) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
report transmitted to LEAP on ((April 27)) May 21, 2003.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$280,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by Senate
Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(7) $11,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the environmental impact statement on the SR 520
Evergreen floating bridge.
(8) $250,000 of the transportation 2003 account (Nickel Account)--state appropriation and an equal amount from the city of Seattle are
provided solely for an analysis of the impacts that an expansion of the
SR 520 Evergreen floating bridge will have on the streets of North
Capitol Hill, Roanoke Park, and Montlake. An advisory committee with
two members each from Portage Bay/Roanoke Park Community Council,
Montlake Community Council, and the North Capitol Hill community
organization along with the secretary of transportation is established.
The seven-member committee shall hire and oversee the contract with a
transportation consulting organization to: (a) Perform an analysis of
such impacts; and (b) design a traffic and circulation plan that
mitigates the adverse consequences of such impacts. If the city of
Seattle does not agree to provide $250,000 by January 1, 2004, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9)(a) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for a study to provide the legislature with
information regarding the feasibility of pursuing a Washington commerce
corridor. The department shall retain outside experts to conduct the
study. The study must include the following conditions:
(i) The Washington commerce corridor must be a north-south corridor
starting in the vicinity of Lewis county and extending northerly to the
vicinity of the Canadian border. The corridor must be situated east of
state route number 405 and west of the Cascades. The corridor may
include any of the following features:
(A) Ability to carry long-haul freight;
(B) Ability to provide for passenger auto travel;
(C) Freight rail;
(D) Passenger rail;
(E) Public utilities; and
(F) Other ancillary facilities as may be desired to maximize use of
the corridor;
(ii) The Washington commerce corridor must be developed, financed,
designed, constructed, and operated by private sector consortiums; and
(iii) The Washington commerce corridor must be subject to a joint
permitting process involving federal, state, and local agencies with
jurisdiction.
(b) The legislative transportation committee shall form a working
group to work with the department and the outside consultant on the
study.
(10) $8,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided for the SR 522, University of Washington-Bothell campus
access project. This amount will cover approximately one-half of the
construction costs.
(11) The transportation permit efficiency and accountability
committee (TPEAC) shall select from the project list under this
subsection ten projects that have not yet secured state permits. TPEAC
shall select projects from both urban and rural areas representing a
wide variety of locations within the state. These projects shall be
designated "Department of Transportation Permit Drafting Pilot
Projects" and shall become a part of the work plan of TPEAC required
under section 2(1)(b), chapter 8 (ESB 5279), Laws of 2003.
(12) Of the amounts appropriated in this section and section 306 of
this act, no more than $124,000 is provided for increased project costs
due to the enactment of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5457.
(((14))) (13) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal
funds may be transferred from program Z to program I to replace those
federal funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2004.

Sec. 2 2003 c . . . (ESHB 1163) s 306 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,909,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $457,467,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,666,000
Multimodal Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Multimodal Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,247,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $661,289,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $178,909,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
$457,467,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation,
$12,666,000 of the motor vehicle account--local appropriation,
$6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation, and $4,247,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement the
activities and projects included in the Legislative 2003 Transportation
Project List - Current Law report transmitted to LEAP on April 27,
2003.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$2,850,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW
47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes.
(3) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$77,700,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(4) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
report transmitted to LEAP on ((April 27)) May 21, 2003.
(5) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(6) Of the amounts appropriated in this section and section 305 of
this act, no more than $124,000 is provided for increased project costs
due to the enactment of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5457.
(((8))) (7) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds
may be transferred from program Z to program P to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2004.

Sec. 3 2003 c . . . (ESHB 1163) s 308 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,066,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,400,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,381,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,749,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,596,000

The appropriations in this section are provided for improving the
Washington state ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal
construction and improvements. The appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $11,772,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Senate Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) $129,066,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--state appropriation and $34,400,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--federal appropriation are provided solely for
capital projects as listed in the Legislative 2003 Transportation
Project List - Current Law as transmitted to the LEAP on April 27,
2003.
(3) $17,521,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel
account)--state appropriation is provided solely for capital projects
as listed in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
as transmitted to the LEAP on ((April 27)) May 21, 2003.
(4) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes $45,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major
and minor improvements, and long lead time materials acquisition for
the Washington state ferries. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the motor vehicle
account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.
(5) The Washington state ferries shall consult with the United
States Coast Guard regarding operational and design standards required
to meet Safety of Life at Sea requirements, in an effort to determine
the most efficient and cost-effective vessel design that meets these
requirements.

Sec. 4 2003 c . . . (ESHB 1163) s 309 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,530,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,499,000
Washington Fruit Express Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,299,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $30,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Senate Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) $5,530,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation, $9,499,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal appropriation, $500,000 of the Washington fruit express
account--state appropriation, and $770,000 of the essential rail
assistance account--state appropriation are provided solely for capital
projects as listed in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List
- Current Law as transmitted to the LEAP on April 27, 2003.
(3) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is to be placed in reserve status by the office of
financial management to be held until the department identifies the
location for a new transload facility at either Wenatchee or Quincy.
The funds are to be released upon determination of a location and
approval by the office of financial management.
(4) $30,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for capital projects as listed in the
Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law as transmitted
to the LEAP on ((April 27)) May 21, 2003.
(5) If federal block grant funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the legislative
transportation committee prior to spending the funds on additional
projects.
(6) If the department issues a call for projects, applications must
be received by the department by November 1, 2003, and November 1,
2004.

Sec. 5 2003 c . . . (ESHB 1163) s 310 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,425,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,726,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,960,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
Local Projects report transmitted to LEAP on ((April 27)) May 21, 2003.
(2) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be
transferred from programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department may not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission. The
department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2004.
(3) $7,576,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to fund the first
phase of a multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to
dredge the Columbia River. If dredge material is disposed of in the
ocean, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
subsection unless agreement on ocean disposal sites has been reached
that protects the state's commercial crab fishery. The amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse unless the state of Oregon appropriates
a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the project.
(4) $1,156,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
reappropriated and provided solely for additional small city pavement
preservation program grants, to be administered by the department's
highways and local programs division. The department shall review all
projects receiving grant awards under this program at least
semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory
progress. Any project that has been awarded small city pavement
preservation program grant funds, but does not report activity on the
project within one year of grant award, should be reviewed by the
department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The
department must promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. The
department shall expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified
projects when funds become available either because grant awards have
been rescinded for lack of sufficient project activity or because
completed projects returned excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(5) $4,010,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
reappropriated and provided solely for additional traffic and
pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The highways and local
programs division within the department of transportation shall
administer this program. The department shall review all projects
receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to
determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any
project that has been awarded traffic and pedestrian safety improvement
grant funds, but does not report activity on the project within one
year of grant award should be reviewed by the department to determine
whether the grant should be terminated. The department must promptly
close out grants when projects have been completed, and identify where
unused grant funds remain because actual project costs were lower than
estimated in the grant award. The department shall expeditiously
extend new grant awards to qualified projects when funds become
available either because grant awards have been rescinded for lack of
sufficient project activity or because completed projects returned
excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$20,452,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843.
(7) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $6,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Senate Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---