BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an authority has a reimbursement agreement with a private
utility provider for the costs associated with the relocation of
utility facilities impacted by the construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement of a regional transportation system, the authority shall
make available substantially similar terms and conditions to all
similarly impacted utilities.
(2) Beginning December 31, 2009, if utility facilities must be
relocated as a result of the construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement of a rail fixed guideway system as defined in RCW
81.104.015, the costs of the relocation must be included in the costs
of the system and paid by the authority. However, any additional costs
associated with the upgrade of any existing utility facility that the
utility elects to undertake must be paid by the utility.
(3) A utility may at its option agree to assume the relocation
costs in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The authority shall consult with each affected utility on the
engineering, design, and route selection of the system to minimize cost
and disruption of services related to the relocation of utility
facilities. If there is a dispute over the relocation costs, the costs
will be submitted to an independent auditor agreed to by the parties.
The auditor will determine if the costs were accurate and the auditor's
decision will be final. The cost of the auditor must be paid by the
party requesting the audit.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Utility facilities" include cable television, gas, electric,
and telecommunications facilities; and
(b) "Relocation" includes removal, adjustment, protection,
restoration, and replacement.

--- END ---