BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.200.080 and 1999 c 372 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of ecology shall, in addition to the powers and duties
otherwise imposed by law, have the following special powers and duties:
(1) To fulfill the responsibilities of the state under the lease
between the state of Washington and the federal government executed
September 10, 1964, covering one thousand acres of land lying within
the Hanford reservation near Richland, Washington. The department of
ecology may sublease to private or public entities all or a portion of
the land for specific purposes or activities which are determined,
after public hearing, to be in agreement with the terms of the lease
and in the best interests of the citizens of the state consistent with
any criteria that may be developed as a requirement by the legislature;
(2) To assume the responsibilities of the state under the perpetual
care agreement between the state of Washington and the federal
government executed July 29, 1965 and the sublease between the state of
Washington and the site operator of the Hanford low-level radioactive
waste disposal facility. In order to finance perpetual surveillance
and maintenance under the agreement and ensure site closure under the
sublease, the department of ecology shall impose and collect fees from
parties holding radioactive materials for waste management purposes.
The fees shall be established by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW
and shall be an amount determined by the department of ecology to be
necessary to defray the estimated liability of the state. Such fees
shall reflect equity between the disposal facilities of this and other
states. A site closure account and a perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account is hereby created in the state treasury. The site
closure account shall be exclusively available to reimburse, to the
extent that moneys are available in the account, the site operator for
its costs plus a reasonable profit as agreed by the operator and the
state, or to reimburse the state licensing agency and any agencies
under contract to the state licensing agency for their costs in final
closure and decommissioning of the Hanford low-level radioactive waste
disposal facility. If a balance remains in the account after
satisfactory performance of closure and decommissioning, this balance
shall be transferred to the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account. The perpetual surveillance and maintenance account shall be
used exclusively by the state to meet post-closure surveillance and
maintenance costs, or for otherwise satisfying surveillance and
maintenance obligations. Appropriations are required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the site closure account
and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account. All moneys,
including earnings from the investment of balances in the site closure
and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, less the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund, pursuant to RCW
43.08.190 accruing under the authority of this section shall be
directed to the site closure account until December 31, 1992.
Thereafter receipts including earnings from the investment of balances
in the site closure and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, less the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund,
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 shall be directed to the site closure account
and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account as specified by
the department. Additional moneys specifically appropriated by the
legislature or received from any public or private source may be placed
in the site closure account and the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account. During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer up to thirteen million eight hundred thousand
dollars from the site closure account to the general fund;
(3)(a) Subject to the conditions in (b) of this subsection, on July
1, 2008, and each July 1st thereafter, the treasurer shall transfer
from the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account to the site
closure account the sum of nine hundred sixty-six thousand dollars.
The nine hundred sixty-six thousand dollars transferred on July 1,
2009, and thereafter shall be adjusted to a level equal to the
percentage increase in the United States implicit price deflator for
personal consumption. The last transfer under this section shall occur
on July 1, 2033.
(b) The transfer in (a) of this subsection shall occur only if
written agreement is reached between the state department of ecology
and the United States department of energy pursuant to section 6 of the
perpetual care agreement dated July 29, 1965, between the United States
atomic energy commission and the state of Washington. If agreement
cannot be reached between the state department of ecology and the
United States department of energy by June 1, 2008, the treasurer shall
transfer the funds from the general fund to the site closure account
according to the schedule in (a) of this subsection.
(c) If for any reason the Hanford low level radioactive waste
disposal facility is closed to further disposal operations during or
after the 2003-2005 biennium and before 2033, then the amount remaining
to be repaid from the 2003-2005 transfer of thirteen million eight
hundred thousand dollars from the site closure account shall be
transferred by the treasurer from the general fund to the site closure
account to fund the closure and decommissioning of the facility. The
treasurer shall transfer to the site closure account in full the amount
remaining to be repaid upon written notice from the secretary of health
that the department of health has authorized closure or that disposal
operations have ceased. The treasurer shall complete the transfer
within sixty days of written notice from the secretary of health.
(d) To the extent that money in the site closure account together
with the amount of money identified for repayment to the site closure
account, pursuant to (a) through (c) of this subsection, equals or
exceeds the cost estimate approved by the department of health for
closure and decommissioning of the facility, the money in the site
closure account together with the amount of money identified for
repayment to the site closure account shall constitute adequate
financial assurance for purposes of the department of health financial
assurance requirements.
(4) To assure maintenance of such insurance coverage by state
licensees, lessees, or sublessees as will adequately, in the opinion of
the director, protect the citizens of the state against nuclear
accidents or incidents that may occur on privately or state-controlled
nuclear facilities;
(((4))) (5) To institute a user permit system and issue site use
permits, consistent with regulatory practices, for generators,
packagers, or brokers using the Hanford low-level radioactive waste
disposal facility. The costs of administering the user permit system
shall be borne by the applicants for site use permits. The site use
permit fee shall be set at a level that is sufficient to fund
completely the executive and legislative participation in activities
related to the Northwest Interstate Compact on Low-Level Radioactive
Waste Management;
(((5))) (6) To make application for or otherwise pursue any federal
funds to which the state may be eligible, through the federal resource
conservation and recovery act or any other federal programs, for the
management, treatment or disposal, and any remedial actions, of wastes
that are both radioactive and hazardous at all Hanford low-level
radioactive waste disposal facilities; and
(((6))) (7) To develop contingency plans for duties and options for
the department and other state agencies related to the Hanford low-level radioactive waste disposal facility based on various projections
of annual levels of waste disposal. These plans shall include an
analysis of expected revenue to the state in various taxes and funds
related to low-level radioactive waste disposal and the resulting
implications that any increase or decrease in revenue may have on state
agency duties or responsibilities. The plans shall be updated
annually.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.98.098 and 1992 c 61 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making the determination of the appropriate level of
financial assurance, the secretary shall consider: (a) The report
prepared by the department of ecology pursuant to RCW 43.200.200; (b)
the potential cost of decontamination, treatment, disposal,
decommissioning, and cleanup of facilities or equipment; (c) federal
cleanup and decommissioning requirements; and (d) the legal defense
cost, if any, that might be paid from the required financial assurance.
(2) The secretary may establish different levels of required
financial assurance for various classes of permit or license holders.
(3) The secretary shall establish by rule the instruments or mecha-
nisms by which a person may demonstrate financial assurance as required
by RCW 70.98.095.
(4) To the extent that money in the site closure account together
with the amount of money identified for repayment to the site closure
account pursuant to RCW 43.200.080 equals or exceeds the cost estimate
approved by the department of health for closure and decommissioning of
the Hanford low-level radioactive waste disposal facility, the money in
the site closure account together with the amount of money identified
for repayment to the site closure account shall constitute adequate
financial assurance for purposes of the department of health financial
assurance requirements under RCW 70.98.095.

--- END ---