BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that prescription
drugs are an effective and important part of efforts to maintain and
improve the health of Washington state residents. However, their
increased cost and utilization is straining the resources of many state
health care programs, and is particularly hard on low-income elderly
people who lack insurance coverage for such drugs. Furthermore,
inappropriate use of prescription drugs can result in unnecessary
expenditures and lead to serious health consequences. It is therefore
the intent of the legislature to support the establishment by the state
of an evidence-based prescription drug program that identifies
preferred drugs, develop programs to provide prescription drugs at an
affordable price to those in need, and increase public awareness
regarding their safe and cost-effective use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated specifically for this
purpose, and subject to any conditions placed on appropriations made
for this purpose, the department shall design a medicaid prescription
drug assistance program. Neither the benefits of, nor eligibility for,
the program is considered to be an entitlement.
(2) The department shall request any federal waiver necessary to
implement this program. Consistent with federal waiver conditions, the
department may charge enrollment fees, premiums, or point-of-service
cost-sharing to program enrollees.
(3) Eligibility for this program is limited to persons:
(a) Who are eligible for medicare or age sixty-five and older;
(b) Whose family income does not exceed two hundred percent of the
federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services;
(c) Who lack insurance that provides prescription drug coverage;
and
(d) Who are not otherwise eligible under Title XIX of the federal
social security act.
(4) The department shall use a cost-effective prescription drug
benefit design. Consistent with federal waiver conditions, this
benefit design may be different than the benefit design offered under
the medical assistance program. The benefit design may include a
deductible benefit that provides coverage when enrollees incur higher
prescription drug costs as defined by the department. The department
also may offer more than one benefit design.
(5) The department shall limit enrollment of persons who qualify
for the program so as to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations
for this program or to assure necessary compliance with federal waiver
budget neutrality requirements. The department may not reduce existing
medical assistance program eligibility or benefits to assure compliance
with federal waiver budget neutrality requirements.
(6) Premiums paid by medicaid enrollees not in the medicaid
prescription drug assistance program may not be used to finance the
medicaid prescription drug assistance program.
(7) This program will be terminated within twelve months after
implementation of a prescription drug benefit under Title XVIII of the
federal social security act.
(8) The department shall provide recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by November 15,
2003, on financing options available to support the medicaid
prescription drug assistance program. In recommending financing
options, the department shall explore every opportunity to maximize
federal funding to support the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In negotiating price discounts with prescription drug
manufacturers for state purchased health care programs, the health care
authority shall also negotiate such discounts for any Washington
resident:
(a) Whose family income does not exceed three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services;
(b) Whose existing prescription drug need is not covered by
insurance; and
(c) Who is: (i) At least fifty years old; or (ii) between the ages
of nineteen and forty-nine and is otherwise eligible for benefits under
Title II of the social security act, federal old age, survivors, and
disability insurance benefits.
(2)(a) An attestation, which shall be submitted to the
administrator, from an individual that the individual's family income
does not exceed three hundred percent of the federal poverty level is
sufficient to satisfy the eligibility requirement of subsection (1)(a)
of this section.
(b) Any person willfully making a false statement in order to
qualify for discounts under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
Notice of such shall be included on the program enrollment form.
(3) The administrator shall charge participants in this program an
annual enrollment fee sufficient to offset the cost of program
administration.
(4) Any rebate or discount provided by a pharmaceutical
manufacturer and made available to individuals under this section shall
not be at the expense of retail pharmacies. This does not prohibit
participating state agencies from using discounted pharmacy
reimbursements for services or ingredients provided by the pharmacies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The consolidated prescription drug purchasing account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All fees collected under section
3(3) of this act shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the purposes of section 3 of this
act. Only the administrator or the administrator's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 69.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any pharmacist filling a prescription under a state purchased
health care program as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) shall substitute,
where identified, a preferred drug for any nonpreferred drug in a given
therapeutic class, unless the endorsing practitioner has indicated on
the prescription that the nonpreferred drug must be dispensed as
written, or the prescription is for a refill of an antipsychotic,
antidepressant, chemotherapy, antiretroviral, or immunosuppressive
drug, in which case the pharmacist shall dispense the prescribed
nonpreferred drug.
(2) When a substitution is made under subsection (1) of this
section, the dispensing pharmacist shall notify the prescribing
practitioner of the specific drug and dose dispensed.

Sec. 6 RCW 69.41.150 and 1979 c 110 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A practitioner who authorizes a prescribed drug shall not be
liable for any side effects or adverse reactions caused by the manner
or method by which a substituted drug product is selected or dispensed.
(2) A pharmacist who substitutes an equivalent drug product
pursuant to RCW 69.41.100 through 69.41.180 as now or hereafter amended
assumes no greater liability for selecting the dispensed drug product
than would be incurred in filling a prescription for a drug product
prescribed by its established name.
(3) A pharmacist who substitutes a preferred drug for a
nonpreferred drug pursuant to section 5 of this act assumes no greater
liability for substituting the preferred drug than would be incurred in
filling a prescription for the preferred drug when prescribed by name.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrator shall establish and advertise a pharmacy
connection program through which health care providers and members of
the public can obtain information about manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance programs. The administrator shall ensure
that the program has staff available who can assist persons in
procuring free or discounted medications from manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance programs by:
(a) Determining whether an assistance program is offered for the
needed drug or drugs;
(b) Evaluating the likelihood of a person obtaining drugs from an
assistance program under the guidelines formulated;
(c) Assisting persons with the application and enrollment in an
assistance program;
(d) Coordinating and assisting physicians and others authorized to
prescribe medications with communications, including applications, made
on behalf of a person to a participating manufacturer to obtain
approval of the person in an assistance program; and
(e) Working with participating manufacturers to simplify the system
whereby eligible persons access drug assistance programs, including
development of a single application form and uniform enrollment
process.
(2) Notice regarding the pharmacy connection program shall
initially target senior citizens, but the program shall be available to
anyone, and shall include a toll-free telephone number, available
during regular business hours, that may be used to obtain information.
(3) The administrator may apply for and accept grants or gifts and
may enter into interagency agreements or contracts with other state
agencies or private organizations to assist with the implementation of
this program including, but not limited to, contracts, gifts, or grants
from pharmaceutical manufacturers to assist with the direct costs of
the program.
(4) The administrator shall notify pharmaceutical companies doing
business in Washington of the pharmacy connection program. Any
pharmaceutical company that does business in this state and that offers
a pharmaceutical assistance program shall notify the administrator of
the existence of the program, the drugs covered by the program, and all
information necessary to apply for assistance under the program.
(5) For purposes of this section, "manufacturer-sponsored
prescription drug assistance program" means a program offered by a
pharmaceutical company through which the company provides a drug or
drugs to eligible persons at no charge or at a reduced cost. The term
does not include the provision of a drug as part of a clinical trial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Each of the state's area agencies on aging shall implement a
program intended to inform and train persons sixty-five years of age
and older in the safe and appropriate use of prescription and
nonprescription medications. To further this purpose, the department
shall award development grants averaging up to twenty-five thousand
dollars to each of the agencies upon a showing that:
(1) The agency has the ability to effectively administer such a
program, including an understanding of the relevant issues and
appropriate outreach and follow-up;
(2) The agency can bring resources to the program in addition to
those funded by the grant; and
(3) The program will be a collaborative effort between the agency
and other health care programs and providers in the location to be
served, including doctors, pharmacists, and long-term care providers.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.14.050 and 1986 c 303 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each agency ((listed in RCW 70.14.010)) administering a state
purchased health care program as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) shall
((individually or)), in cooperation with other agencies, take any
necessary actions to control costs without reducing the quality of care
when reimbursing for or purchasing drugs. To accomplish this purpose,
((each agency shall investigate the feasibility of and)) participating
agencies may establish ((a)) an evidence-based prescription drug
((formulary designating which drugs may be paid for through their
health care programs. For purposes of this section, a drug formulary
means a list of drugs, either inclusive or exclusive, that defines
which drugs are eligible for reimbursement by the agency)) program.
(2) In developing the evidence-based prescription drug
((formulary)) program authorized by this section, agencies:
(a) Shall prohibit reimbursement for drugs that are determined to
be ineffective by the United States food and drug administration;
(b) Shall adopt rules in order to ensure that less expensive
generic drugs will be substituted for brand name drugs in those
instances where the quality of care is not diminished;
(c) Where possible, may authorize reimbursement for drugs only in
economical quantities;
(d) May limit the prices paid for drugs by such means as negotiated
discounts from pharmaceutical manufacturers, central purchasing, volume
contracting, or setting maximum prices to be paid;
(e) Shall consider the approval of drugs with lower abuse potential
in substitution for drugs with significant abuse potential; ((and))
(f) May take other necessary measures to control costs of drugs
without reducing the quality of care; and
(g) Shall adopt rules governing practitioner endorsement and use of
any list developed as part of the program authorized by this section.
(3) Agencies ((may)) shall provide for reasonable exceptions,
consistent with section 5 of this act, to ((the drug formulary
required)) any list developed as part of the program authorized by this
section.
(4) Agencies ((may)) shall establish ((medical advisory committees,
or utilize committees already established, to assist)) an independent
pharmacy and therapeutics committee to evaluate the effectiveness of
prescription drugs in the development of the ((drug formulary
required)) program authorized by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The authority may adopt rules to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 By January 1, 2005, the administrator of
the health care authority and the secretary of the department of social
and health services shall submit to the governor and the legislature a
progress report regarding the implementation of the programs created in
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.131
RCW to read as follows:
The discount program under section 3 of this act shall be
terminated June 30, 2010, as provided in section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 43.131
RCW to read as follows:
Section 3 of this act, as now existing or hereafter amended, is
repealed effective June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---