BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2003 c 360 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $565,300,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,434,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,374,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,940,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,258,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,279,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $613,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,596,835,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $157,374,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
$192,940,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation,
$13,258,000 of the motor vehicle account--local appropriation, and
$50,279,000 of the special category C account--state appropriation are
provided solely to implement the activities and projects included in
the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - Current Law report
as transmitted to LEAP on April 27, 2003.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$78,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation. The motor
vehicle account--state appropriation includes $18,038,000 in unexpended
proceeds from bond sales authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for mobility and
economic initiative improvement projects.
(3) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes $567,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state
appropriation includes $46,300,000 in unexpended proceeds from the
January 2003 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project.
(4) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
$44,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.812. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available in the special category C account in lieu of
bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(5) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
report transmitted to LEAP on April 27, 2003. However, if the
transportation commission determines that the safety needs at the
US2/97 Peshastin East - Interchange may be met with a design of lesser
cost, then the savings from the US2/97 Peshastin East - Interchange
project may be applied to the SR28/East End of the George Sellar Bridge
project. If the funds to the SR28/East End of the George Sellar Bridge
project under this subsection are not sufficient to complete the
project, then the department of transportation shall solicit additional
funds from local and federal sources and may not proceed with the
construction of the project until funding to complete the project is
identified.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$280,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by Senate
Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(7) $11,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the environmental impact statement on the SR 520
Evergreen floating bridge.
(8) $250,000 of the transportation 2003 account (Nickel Account)--state appropriation and an equal amount from the city of Seattle are
provided solely for an analysis of the impacts that an expansion of the
SR 520 Evergreen floating bridge will have on the streets of North
Capitol Hill, Roanoke Park, and Montlake. An advisory committee with
two members each from Portage Bay/Roanoke Park Community Council,
Montlake Community Council, and the North Capitol Hill community
organization along with the secretary of transportation is established.
The seven-member committee shall hire and oversee the contract with a
transportation consulting organization to: (a) Perform an analysis of
such impacts; and (b) design a traffic and circulation plan that
mitigates the adverse consequences of such impacts. If the city of
Seattle does not agree to provide $250,000 by January 1, 2004, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9)(a) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for a study to provide the legislature with
information regarding the feasibility of pursuing a Washington commerce
corridor. The department shall retain outside experts to conduct the
study. The study must include the following conditions:
(i) The Washington commerce corridor must be a north-south corridor
starting in the vicinity of Lewis county and extending northerly to the
vicinity of the Canadian border. The corridor must be situated east of
state route number 405 and west of the Cascades. The corridor may
include any of the following features:
(A) Ability to carry long-haul freight;
(B) Ability to provide for passenger auto travel;
(C) Freight rail;
(D) Passenger rail;
(E) Public utilities; and
(F) Other ancillary facilities as may be desired to maximize use of
the corridor;
(ii) The Washington commerce corridor must be developed, financed,
designed, constructed, and operated by private sector consortiums; and
(iii) The Washington commerce corridor must be subject to a joint
permitting process involving federal, state, and local agencies with
jurisdiction.
(b) The legislative transportation committee shall form a working
group to work with the department and the outside consultant on the
study.
(10) $8,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided for the SR 522, University of Washington-Bothell campus
access project. This amount will cover approximately one-half of the
construction costs.
(11) The transportation permit efficiency and accountability
committee (TPEAC) shall select from the project list under this
subsection ten projects that have not yet secured state permits. TPEAC
shall select projects from both urban and rural areas representing a
wide variety of locations within the state. These projects shall be
designated "Department of Transportation Permit Drafting Pilot
Projects" and shall become a part of the work plan of TPEAC required
under section 2(1)(b), chapter 8 (ESB 5279), Laws of 2003.
(12) Of the amounts appropriated in this section and section 306 of
this act, no more than $124,000 is provided for increased project costs
due to the enactment of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5457.
(((14))) (13) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal
funds may be transferred from program Z to program I to replace those
federal funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2004.

--- END ---