BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.52.001 and 1961 c 13 s 47.52.001 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Unrestricted access to and from public highways has resulted in
congestion and peril for the traveler. It has caused undue slowing of
all traffic in many areas. The investment of the public in highway
facilities has been impaired and highway facilities costing vast sums
of money will have to be relocated and reconstructed.
(2) Personal wireless service is a critical part of the state's
infrastructure. The rapid deployment of personal wireless service
facilities is critical to ensure public safety, network access, quality
of service, and rural economic development.
(3) It is, therefore, the declared policy of this state to limit
access to the highway facilities of this state in the interest of
highway safety and for the preservation of the investment of the public
in such facilities, and to assure that the use of rights of way of
limited access facilities accommodate the deployment of personal
wireless service facilities consistent with these interests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Personal wireless service is a critical part of the state's
infrastructure. The rapid deployment of personal wireless service
facilities is critical to ensure public safety, network access, quality
of service, and rural economic development.
It is the declared policy of this state to assure that the use of
rights of way of state highways accommodate the deployment of personal
wireless service facilities consistent with highway safety and the
preservation of the public investment in state highway facilities.

--- END ---