BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state auditor is appropriated one
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, from the
general fund, for the 2003-2005 biennium to conduct a limited number of
performance audits of any state agency, board, commission, bureau,
division, or institution. The state auditor shall report to the
legislature the findings of all performance audits conducted under this
act.

--- END ---