BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The sum of eleven million five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the money
credited to the account of this state in the unemployment trust fund
pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as amended, to the
employment security department for the payment of expenses of
administration related to the implementation of 2ESB 6097.

--- END ---