BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.08.002 and 2002 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Amateur" means a person who ((engages in athletic activities
as a pastime and not as a professional)) has never received nor
competed for any purse or other article of value, either for expenses
of training or for participating in an event, other than a prize of
fifty dollars in value or less.
(2) "Boxing" means ((a contest in)) the sport of attack and defense
which uses the contestants ((exchange blows with their)) fists and
where the contestants compete with the intent not to injure or disable
an opponent, but to win by decision, knockout, or technical knockout,
but does not include professional wrestling.
(3) "Chiropractor" means a person licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW
as a doctor of chiropractic or under the laws of any jurisdiction in
which that person resides.
(4) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing or
the director's designee.
(6) "Event" includes, but is not limited to, a boxing, wrestling,
or martial arts contest, sparring, fisticuffs, match, show, or
exhibition.
(7) "Event physician" means the physician licensed under RCW
67.08.100 and who is responsible for the activities described in RCW
67.08.090.
(8) "Face value" means the dollar value of a ticket or order, which
value must reflect the dollar amount that the customer is required to
pay or, for a complimentary ticket, would have been required to pay to
purchase a ticket with equivalent seating priority, in order to view
the event.
(9) "Gross receipts" means the amount received from the face value
of all tickets sold and complimentary tickets redeemed.
(10) "Kickboxing" means a type of boxing in which blows are
delivered with the ((hand)) fist and any part of the leg below the hip,
including the foot and where the contestants compete with the intent
not to injure or disable an opponent, but to win by decision, knockout,
or technical knockout.
(11) "Martial arts" means a type of boxing including sumo, judo,
karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, pankration, muay thai, or other forms of
full-contact martial arts or self-defense conducted on a full-contact
basis where weapons are not used and the participants utilize kicks,
punches, blows, or other techniques with the intent not to injure or
disable an opponent, but to defeat an opponent or win by decision,
knockout, technical knockout, or submission.
(12) "No holds barred fighting," also known as "frontier fighting"
and "extreme fighting," means a contest, exhibition, or match between
contestants where any part of the contestant's body may be used as a
weapon or any means of fighting may be used with the specific purpose
to intentionally injure the other contestant in such a manner that they
may not defend themselves and a winner is declared. Rules may or may
not be used.
(13) "Combative fighting," also known as "toughman fighting,"
"toughwoman fighting," "badman fighting," and "so you think you're
tough," means a contest, exhibition, or match between contestants who
use their fists, with or without gloves, or their feet, or both, and
which allows contestants that are not trained in the sport to compete
and the object is to defeat an opponent or to win by decision,
knockout, or technical knockout.
(14) "Physician" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57,
18.36A, or 18.71 RCW as a physician or a person holding an osteopathic
or allopathic physician license under the laws of any jurisdiction in
which the person resides.
(((13))) (15) "Professional" means a person who has received or
competed for ((money)) any purse or other articles of value greater
than fifty dollars, either for the expenses of training or for
participating in an event.
(((14))) (16) "Promoter" means a person, and includes any officer,
director, employee, or stockholder of a corporate promoter, who
produces, arranges, stages, holds, or gives an event in this state
involving a professional boxing, martial arts, or wrestling event, or
shows or causes to be shown in this state a closed circuit telecast of
a match involving a professional participant whether or not the
telecast originates in this state.
(((15))) (17) "Wrestling exhibition" or "wrestling show" means a
form of sports entertainment in which the participants display their
skills in a physical struggle against each other in the ring and either
the outcome may be predetermined or the participants do not necessarily
strive to win, or both.
(18) "Amateur event" means an event in which all the participants
are "amateurs" and which is registered and sanctioned by:
(a) United States Amateur Boxing, Inc.;
(b) Washington Interscholastic Activities Association;
(c) National Collegiate Athletic Association;
(d) Amateur Athletic Union;
(e) Golden Gloves of America;
(f) United Full Contact Federation;
(g) Any similar organization recognized by the department as
exclusively or primarily dedicated to advancing the sport of amateur
boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts, as those sports are defined in
this section; or
(h) Local affiliate of any organization identified in this
subsection.
(19) "Elimination tournament" means any contest in which
contestants compete in a series of matches until not more than one
contestant remains in any weight category. The term does not include
any event that complies with the provisions of RCW 67.08.015(2) (a) or
(b).

Sec. 2 RCW 67.08.015 and 2002 c 86 s 306 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the interest of ensuring the safety and welfare of the
participants, the department shall have power and it shall be its duty
to direct, supervise, and control all boxing, martial arts, and
wrestling events conducted within this state and an event may not be
held in this state except in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter. The department may, in its discretion, issue and for cause,
which includes concern for the safety and welfare of the participants,
take any of the actions specified in RCW 18.235.110 against a license
to promote, conduct, or hold boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or
wrestling events where an admission fee is charged by any person, club,
corporation, organization, association, or fraternal society.
(2) All boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or wrestling events that:
(a) Are conducted by any common school, college, or university,
whether public or private, or by the official student association
thereof, whether on or off the school, college, or university grounds,
where all the participating contestants are bona fide students enrolled
in any common school, college, or university, within or without this
state; or
(b) Are entirely amateur events as defined in RCW 67.08.002(18) and
promoted on a nonprofit basis or for charitable purposes;
are not subject to the licensing provisions of this chapter. A boxing,
martial arts, kickboxing, or wrestling event may not be conducted
within the state except under a license issued in accordance with this
chapter and the rules of the department except as provided in this
section.
(3) The director shall prohibit events unless all of the
contestants are ((either)) licensed or otherwise exempt from licensure
as provided under this chapter ((or trained by an amateur or
professional sanctioning body recognized by the department)).
(4) No amateur or professional no holds barred fighting or
combative fighting type of contest, exhibition, match, or similar type
of event, nor any elimination tournament, may be held in this state.
Any person promoting such an event is guilty of a class C felony.
Additionally, the director may apply to a superior court for an
injunction against any and all promoters of a contest, and may request
that the court seize all money and assets relating to the competition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---