BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.100.020 and 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 302 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A public facilities district shall be governed by a board of
directors consisting of five or seven members as provided in this
section. If the largest city in the county has a population that is at
least forty percent of the total county population, the board of
directors of the public facilities district shall consist of five
members selected as follows: (a) Two members appointed by the county
legislative authority to serve for four-year staggered terms; (b) two
members appointed by the city council of the largest city in the county
to serve for four-year staggered terms; and (c) one person to serve for
a four-year term who is selected by the other directors. If the
largest city in the county has a population of less than forty percent
of the total county population, the county legislative authority shall
establish in the resolution creating the public facilities district
whether the board of directors of the public facilities district has
either five or seven members, and the county legislative authority
shall appoint the members of the board of directors to reflect the
interests of cities and towns in the county, as well as the
unincorporated area of the county. However, if the county has a
population of one million or more, the largest city in the county has
a population of less than forty percent of the total county population,
and the county operates under a county charter, which provides for an
elected county executive, three members shall be appointed by the
governor and the remaining members shall be appointed by the county
executive subject to confirmation by the county legislative authority.
Of the members appointed by the governor, the speaker of the house of
representatives and the majority leader of the senate shall each
recommend to the governor a person to be appointed to the board.
(2) At least one member on the board of directors shall be
representative of the lodging industry in the public facilities
district before the public facilities district imposes the excise tax
under RCW 36.100.040.
(3) Members of the board of directors shall serve four-year terms
of office, except that two of the initial five board members or three
of the initial seven board members shall serve two-year terms of
office.
(4) A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment was made and the person appointed to fill a vacancy shall
serve for the remainder of the unexpired term of the office for the
position to which he or she was appointed. However, the appointing
authority may approve a leave of absence for any appointment and
temporarily fill such a position for the term of the approved leave of
absence. No approved leave of absence extends any term of office.
(5) A director appointed by the governor may be removed from office
by the governor. Any other director may be removed from office by
action of at least two-thirds of the members of the legislative
authority which made the appointment.

--- END ---