BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 15.28 RCW
to read as follows:
If any section, subsection, sentence, clause, or part of this
chapter is for any reason held to be invalid or unconstitutional, the
judicial decision does not affect the remainder of the chapter and its
application to other persons or circumstances. The legislature
declares that each section, subsection, sentence, clause, and part of
this chapter was enacted with the intent that if any portion of this
chapter is severed, the remainder of the chapter is capable of
accomplishing its legislative purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 15.44 RCW
to read as follows:
If any section, subsection, sentence, clause, or part of this
chapter is for any reason held to be invalid or unconstitutional, the
judicial decision does not affect the remainder of the chapter and its
application to other persons or circumstances. The legislature
declares that each section, subsection, sentence, clause, and part of
this chapter was enacted with the intent that if any portion of this
chapter is severed, the remainder of the chapter is capable of
accomplishing its legislative purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 15.66 RCW
to read as follows:
If any section, subsection, sentence, clause, or part of this
chapter is for any reason held to be invalid or unconstitutional, the
judicial decision does not affect the remainder of the chapter and its
application to other persons or circumstances. The legislature
declares that each section, subsection, sentence, clause, and part of
this chapter was enacted with the intent that if any portion of this
chapter is severed, the remainder of the chapter is capable of
accomplishing its legislative purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---