BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 17.21.020 and 2002 c 122 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agricultural commodity" means any plant or part of a plant, or
animal, or animal product, produced by a person (including farmers,
ranchers, vineyardists, plant propagators, Christmas tree growers,
aquaculturists, floriculturists, orchardists, foresters, or other
comparable persons) primarily for sale, consumption, propagation, or
other use by people or animals.
(2) "Agricultural land" means land on which an agricultural
commodity is produced or land that is in a government-recognized
conservation reserve program. This definition does not apply to
private gardens where agricultural commodities are produced for
personal consumption.
(3) "Antimicrobial pesticide" means a pesticide that is used for
the control of microbial pests, including but not limited to viruses,
bacteria, algae, and protozoa, and is intended for use as a
disinfectant or sanitizer.
(4) "Apparatus" means any type of ground, water, or aerial
equipment, device, or contrivance using motorized, mechanical, or
pressurized power and used to apply any pesticide on land and anything
that may be growing, habitating, or stored on or in such land, but
shall not include any pressurized handsized household device used to
apply any pesticide, or any equipment, device, or contrivance of which
the person who is applying the pesticide is the source of power or
energy in making such pesticide application, or any other small
equipment, device, or contrivance that is transported in a piece of
equipment licensed under this chapter as an apparatus.
(5) "Arthropod" means any invertebrate animal that belongs to the
phylum arthropoda, which in addition to insects, includes allied
classes whose members are wingless and usually have more than six legs;
for example, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(6) "Certified applicator" means any individual who is licensed as
a commercial pesticide applicator, commercial pesticide operator,
public operator, private-commercial applicator, demonstration and
research applicator, ((or certified)) private applicator, limited
private applicator, rancher private applicator, or any other individual
who is certified by the director to use or supervise the use of any
pesticide which is classified by the EPA or the director as a
restricted use pesticide.
(7) "Commercial pesticide applicator" means any person who engages
in the business of applying pesticides to the land of another.
(8) "Commercial pesticide operator" means any employee of a
commercial pesticide applicator who uses or supervises the use of any
pesticide and who is required to be licensed under provisions of this
chapter.
(9) "Defoliant" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to cause the leaves or foliage to drop from a plant with or
without causing abscission.
(10) "Department" means the Washington state department of
agriculture.
(11) "Desiccant" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to artificially accelerate the drying of plant tissues.
(12) "Device" means any instrument or contrivance intended to trap,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate pests, but not including equipment
used for the application of pesticides when sold separately from the
pesticides.
(13) "Direct supervision" by certified private applicators shall
mean that the designated restricted use pesticide shall be applied for
purposes of producing any agricultural commodity on land owned or
rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer, by a competent
person acting under the instructions and control of a certified private
applicator who is available if and when needed, even though such
certified private applicator is not physically present at the time and
place the pesticide is applied. The certified private applicator shall
have direct management responsibility and familiarity of the pesticide,
manner of application, pest, and land to which the pesticide is being
applied. Direct supervision by all other certified applicators means
direct on-the-job supervision and shall require that the certified
applicator be physically present at the application site and that the
person making the application be in voice and visual contact with the
certified applicator at all times during the application. However,
direct supervision for forest application does not require constant
voice and visual contact when general use pesticides are applied using
nonapparatus type equipment, the certified applicator is physically
present and readily available in the immediate application area, and
the certified applicator directly observes pesticide mixing and
batching. Direct supervision of an aerial apparatus means the pilot of
the aircraft must be appropriately certified.
(14) "Director" means the director of the department or a duly
authorized representative.
(15) "Engage in business" means any application of pesticides by
any person upon lands or crops of another.
(16) "EPA" means the United States environmental protection agency.
(17) "EPA restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide classified
for restricted use by the administrator, EPA.
(18) "FIFRA" means the federal insecticide, fungicide and
rodenticide act as amended (61 Stat. 163, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).
(19) "Forest application" means the application of pesticides to
agricultural land used to grow trees for the commercial production of
wood or wood fiber for products such as dimensional lumber, shakes,
plywood, poles, posts, pilings, particle board, hardboard, oriented
strand board, pulp, paper, cardboard, or other similar products.
(20) "Fumigant" means any pesticide product or combination of
products that is a vapor or gas or forms a vapor or gas on application
and whose method of pesticidal action is through the gaseous state.
(21) "Fungi" means all nonchlorophyll-bearing thallophytes (all
nonchlorophyll-bearing plants of lower order than mosses and
liverworts); for example, rusts, smuts, mildews, molds, and yeasts,
except those on or in a living person or other animals.
(22) "Fungicide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any fungi.
(23) "Herbicide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any weed or other
higher plant.
(24) "Immediate service call" means a landscape application to
satisfy an emergency customer request for service, or a treatment to
control a pest to landscape plants.
(25) "Insect" means any small invertebrate animal, in any life
stage, whose adult form is segmented and which generally belongs to the
class insecta, comprised of six-legged, usually winged forms, as, for
example, beetles, bugs, bees, and flies. The term insect shall also
apply to other allied classes of arthropods whose members are wingless
and usually have more than six legs, for example, spiders, mites,
ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(26) "Insecticide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any insect.
(27) "Land" means all land and water areas, including airspace and
all plants, animals, structures, buildings, devices, and contrivances,
appurtenant to or situated on, fixed or mobile, including any used for
transportation.
(28) "Landscape application" means an application of any EPA
registered pesticide to any exterior landscape area around residential
property, commercial properties such as apartments or shopping centers,
parks, golf courses, schools including nursery schools and licensed day
cares, or cemeteries or similar areas. This definition shall not apply
to: (a) Applications made by ((certified)) private applicators,
limited private applicators, or rancher private applicators; (b)
mosquito abatement, gypsy moth eradication, or similar wide-area pest
control programs sponsored by governmental entities; and (c) commercial
pesticide applicators making structural applications.
(29) "Limited private applicator" means a certified applicator who
uses or is in direct supervision, as defined for private applicators in
this section, of the use of any herbicide classified by the EPA or the
director as a restricted use pesticide, for the sole purpose of
controlling weeds on nonproduction agricultural land owned or rented by
the applicator or the applicator's employer. Limited private
applicators may also use restricted use pesticides on timber areas,
excluding aquatic sites, to control weeds designated for mandatory
control under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10 RCW and state and county
regulations adopted under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10 RCW. A
limited private applicator may apply restricted use herbicides to the
types of land described in this subsection of another person if applied
without compensation other than trading of personal services between
the applicator and the other person. This license is only valid when
making applications in counties of Washington located east of the crest
of the Cascade mountains.
(30) "Limited production agricultural land" means land used to grow
hay and grain crops that are consumed by the livestock on the farm
where produced. No more than ten percent of the hay and grain crops
grown on limited production agricultural land may be sold each crop
year. Limited production agricultural land does not include aquatic
sites.
(31) "Nematocide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate nematodes.
(((30))) (32) "Nematode" means any invertebrate animal of the
phylum nemathelminthes and class nematoda, that is, unsegmented round
worms with elongated, fusiform, or saclike bodies covered with cuticle,
and inhabiting soil, water, plants or plant parts. Nematodes may also
be called nemas or eelworms.
(((31))) (33) "Nonproduction agricultural land" means pastures,
rangeland, fencerows, and areas around farm buildings but not aquatic
sites.
(34) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, or organized group of persons whether or not incorporated.
(((32))) (35) "Pest" means, but is not limited to, any insect,
rodent, nematode, snail, slug, weed, and any form of plant or animal
life or virus, except virus, bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in
a living person or other animal or in or on processed food or beverages
or pharmaceuticals, which is normally considered to be a pest, or which
the director may declare to be a pest.
(((33))) (36) "Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:
(a) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate any pest;
(b) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as
a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant; and
(c) Any spray adjuvant((, such as a wetting agent, spreading agent,
deposit builder, adhesive, emulsifying agent, deflocculating agent,
water modifier, or similar agent with or without toxic properties of
its own intended to be used with any pesticide as an aid to the
application or effect thereof, and sold in a package or container
separate from that of the pesticide with which it is to be used)) as
defined in RCW 15.58.030.
(((34))) (37) "Pesticide advisory board" means the pesticide
advisory board as provided for in this chapter.
(((35))) (38) "Plant regulator" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended through physiological action, to accelerate or
retard the rate of growth or maturation, or to otherwise alter the
behavior of ornamental or crop plants or their produce, but shall not
include substances insofar as they are intended to be used as plant
nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant inoculants, or
soil amendments.
(((36))) (39) "Private applicator" means a certified applicator who
uses or is in direct supervision of the use of any pesticide classified
by the EPA or the director as a restricted use pesticide, for the
purposes of producing any agricultural commodity and for any associated
noncrop application on land owned or rented by the applicator or the
applicator's employer or if applied without compensation other than
trading of personal services between producers of agricultural
commodities on the land of another person.
(((37))) (40) "Private-commercial applicator" means a certified
applicator who uses or supervises the use of any pesticide classified
by the EPA or the director as a restricted use pesticide for purposes
other than the production of any agricultural commodity on lands owned
or rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer.
(((38))) (41) "Rancher private applicator" means a certified
applicator who uses or is in direct supervision, as defined for private
applicators in this section, of the use of any herbicide or any
rodenticide classified by the EPA or the director as a restricted use
pesticide for the purpose of controlling weeds and pest animals on
nonproduction agricultural land and limited production agricultural
land owned or rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer.
Rancher private applicators may also use restricted use pesticides on
timber areas, excluding aquatic sites, to control weeds designated for
mandatory control under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10 RCW and state
and county regulations adopted under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10
RCW. A rancher private applicator may apply restricted use herbicides
and rodenticides to the types of land described in this subsection of
another person if applied without compensation other than trading of
personal services between the applicator and the other person. This
license is only valid when making applications in counties of
Washington located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(42) "Residential property" includes property less than one acre in
size zoned as residential by a city, town, or county, but does not
include property zoned as agricultural or agricultural homesites.
(((39))) (43) "Restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or
device which, when used as directed or in accordance with a widespread
and commonly recognized practice, the director determines, subsequent
to a hearing, requires additional restrictions for that use to prevent
unreasonable adverse effects on the environment including people,
lands, beneficial insects, animals, crops, and wildlife, other than
pests.
(((40))) (44) "Rodenticide" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate rodents, or
any other vertebrate animal which the director may declare by rule to
be a pest.
(((41))) (45) "School facility" means any facility used for
licensed day care center purposes or for the purposes of a public
kindergarten or public elementary or secondary school. School facility
includes the buildings or structures, playgrounds, landscape areas,
athletic fields, school vehicles, or any other area of school property.
(((42))) (46) "Snails or slugs" include all harmful mollusks.
(((43))) (47) "Unreasonable adverse effects on the environment"
means any unreasonable risk to people or the environment taking into
account the economic, social, and environmental costs and benefits of
the use of any pesticide, or as otherwise determined by the director.
(((44))) (48) "Weed" means any plant which grows where it is not
wanted.

Sec. 2 RCW 17.21.126 and 1997 c 242 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any person to act as a private
((pesticide)) applicator, limited private applicator, or rancher
private applicator without first complying with requirements determined
by the director as necessary to prevent unreasonable adverse effects on
the environment, including injury to the pesticide applicator or other
persons, for each specific pesticide use.
(1) Certification standards to determine the individual's
competency with respect to the use and handling of the pesticide or
class of pesticides for which the private ((pesticide)) applicator,
limited private applicator, or rancher private applicator is certified
shall be relative to hazards of the particular type of application,
class of pesticides, or handling procedure. In determining these
standards the director shall take into consideration standards of the
EPA and is authorized to adopt these standards by rule.
(2) Application for a private ((pesticide)) applicator, limited
private applicator, or rancher private applicator license shall be
accompanied by a fee ((of twenty-five dollars)) established by the
director by rule. Individuals with a valid certified applicator
license, pest control consultant license, or dealer manager license who
qualify in the appropriate statewide or agricultural license categories
are exempt from the private applicator, limited private applicator, or
rancher private applicator fee requirements. However, licensed public
pesticide operators, otherwise exempted from the public pesticide
operator license fee requirement, are not also exempted from the
((private pesticide applicator)) fee requirements under this
subsection.

Sec. 3 RCW 17.21.128 and 1994 c 283 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may renew any certification or license issued
under authority of this chapter subject to the recertification
standards identified in subsection (2) of this section or an
examination requiring new knowledge that may be required to apply
pesticides.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, all
individuals licensed under this chapter shall meet the recertification
standards identified in (a) or (b) of this subsection, every five
years, in order to qualify for continuing licensure.
(a) Licensed pesticide applicators may qualify for continued
licensure through accumulation of recertification credits.
(i) Private ((pesticide)) applicators shall accumulate a minimum of
twenty department-approved credits every five years with no more than
eight credits allowed per year;
(ii) Limited private applicators shall accumulate a minimum of
eight department-approved credits every five years. All credits must
be applicable to the control of weeds with at least one-half of the
credits directly related to weed control and the remaining credits in
topic areas indirectly related to weed control, such as the safe and
legal use of pesticides;
(iii) Rancher private applicators shall accumulate a minimum of
twelve department-approved credits every five years;
(iv) All other license types established under this chapter shall
accumulate a minimum of forty department-approved credits every five
years with no more than fifteen credits allowed per year.
(b) Certified pesticide applicators may qualify for continued
licensure through meeting the examination requirements necessary to
become licensed in those areas in which the licensee operates.
(3) At the termination of a licensee's five-year recertification
period, the director may waive the requirements identified in
subsection (2) of this section if the licensee can demonstrate that he
or she is meeting comparable recertification standards through another
state or jurisdiction or through a federal environmental protection
agency approved government agency plan.

Sec. 4 RCW 17.21.132 and 1997 c 242 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person applying for a license or certification authorized under
the provisions of this chapter shall file an application on a form
prescribed by the director.
(1) The application shall state the license or certification and
the classification(s) for which the applicant is applying and the
method in which the pesticides are to be applied.
(2) For all classes of licenses except private applicator, limited
private applicator, and rancher private applicator, all applicants
shall be at least eighteen years of age on the date that the
application is made. Applicants for a private ((pesticide))
applicator, limited private applicator, or rancher private applicator
license shall be at least sixteen years of age on the date that the
application is made.
(3) Application for a license to apply pesticides shall be
accompanied by the required fee. No license may be issued until the
required fee has been received by the department.
(4) Each classification of license issued under this chapter
((shall)) except the limited private applicator and the rancher private
applicator expires annually on a date set by rule by the director.
Limited and rancher private applicator licenses expire on the fifth
December 31st after issuance. Renewal applications shall be filed on
or before the applicable expiration date.

Sec. 5 RCW 17.21.140 and 1991 c 109 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the application for renewal of any license provided for in
this chapter is not filed on or prior to the expiration date of the
license under this chapter or as set by rule by the director, a penalty
of twenty-five dollars for the commercial pesticide applicator's
license and the rancher private applicator license, and a penalty
equivalent to the license fee for any other license, shall be assessed
and added to the original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before
the renewal license ((shall be)) is issued((: PROVIDED, That such)).
However, the penalty ((shall)) does not apply if the applicant
furnishes an affidavit certifying that he or she has not acted as a
licensee subsequent to the expiration of the license.
(2) Any license for which a timely renewal application has been
made, all other requirements have been met, and the proper fee paid,
continues in full force and effect until the director notifies the
applicant that the license has been renewed or the application has been
denied.

Sec. 6 RCW 15.58.030 and 2003 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the words and phrases defined in this
section shall have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Active ingredient" means any ingredient which will prevent,
destroy, repel, control, or mitigate pests, or which will act as a
plant regulator, defoliant, desiccant, or spray adjuvant.
(2) "Antidote" means the most practical immediate treatment in case
of poisoning and includes first aid treatment.
(3) "Arthropod" means any invertebrate animal that belongs to the
phylum arthropoda, which in addition to insects, includes allied
classes whose members are wingless and usually have more than six legs;
for example, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(4) "Complete wood destroying organism inspection" means inspection
for the purpose of determining evidence of infestation, damage, or
conducive conditions as part of the transfer, exchange, or refinancing
of any structure in Washington state. Complete wood destroying
organism inspections include any wood destroying organism inspection
that is conducted as the result of telephone solicitation by an
inspection, pest control, or other business, even if the inspection
would fall within the definition of a specific wood destroying organism
inspection.
(5) "Defoliant" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to cause the leaves or foliage to drop from a plant with or
without causing abscission.
(6) "Department" means the Washington state department of
agriculture.
(7) "Desiccant" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to artificially accelerate the drying of plant tissues.
(8) "Device" means any instrument or contrivance intended to trap,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate pests, or to destroy, control,
repel or mitigate fungi, nematodes, or such other pests, as may be
designated by the director, but not including equipment used for the
application of pesticides when sold separately from the pesticides.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department or a duly
authorized representative.
(10) "Distribute" means to offer for sale, hold for sale, sell,
barter, or supply pesticides in this state.
(11) "EPA" means the United States environmental protection agency.
(12) "EPA restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide with
restricted uses as classified for restricted use by the administrator,
EPA.
(13) "FIFRA" means the federal insecticide, fungicide, and
rodenticide act as amended (61 Stat. 163, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).
(14) "Fungi" means all nonchlorophyll-bearing thallophytes (all
nonchlorophyll-bearing plants of a lower order than mosses and
liverworts); for example, rusts, smuts, mildews, molds, yeasts, and
bacteria, except those on or in living persons or other animals.
(15) "Fungicide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any fungi.
(16) "Herbicide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any weed.
(17) "Inert ingredient" means an ingredient which is not an active
ingredient.
(18) "Ingredient statement" means a statement of the name and
percentage of each active ingredient together with the total percentage
of the inert ingredients in the pesticide, and when the pesticide
contains arsenic in any form, the ingredient statement shall also
include percentages of total and water soluble arsenic, each calculated
as elemental arsenic. In the case of a spray adjuvant, the ingredient
statement ((need contain only the names of the principal functioning
agents and the total percentage of the constituents ineffective as
spray adjuvants. If more than three functioning agents are present,
only the three principal ones need by named)) must be consistent with
the labeling requirements adopted by rule.
(19) "Insect" means any of the numerous small invertebrate animals
whose bodies are more or less obviously segmented, and which for the
most part belong to the class insecta, comprising six-legged, usually
winged forms, for example, beetles, bugs, bees, flies, and to other
allied classes of arthropods whose members are wingless and usually
have more than six legs, for example, spiders, mites, ticks,
centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(20) "Insecticide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any insects which may
be present in any environment whatsoever.
(21) "Inspection control number" means a number obtained from the
department that is recorded on wood destroying organism inspection
reports issued by a structural pest inspector in conjunction with the
transfer, exchange, or refinancing of any structure.
(22) "Label" means the written, printed, or graphic matter on, or
attached to, the pesticide, device, or immediate container, and the
outside container or wrapper of the retail package.
(23) "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, or
graphic matter:
(a) Upon the pesticide, device, or any of its containers or
wrappers;
(b) Accompanying the pesticide, or referring to it in any other
media used to disseminate information to the public; and
(c) To which reference is made on the label or in literature
accompanying or referring to the pesticide or device except when
accurate nonmisleading reference is made to current official
publications of the department, United States departments of
agriculture; interior; education; health and human services; state
agricultural colleges; and other similar federal or state institutions
or agencies authorized by law to conduct research in the field of
pesticides.
(24) "Land" means all land and water areas, including airspace and
all plants, animals, structures, buildings, devices and contrivances,
appurtenant thereto or situated thereon, fixed or mobile, including any
used for transportation.
(25) "Master license system" means the mechanism established by
chapter 19.02 RCW by which master licenses, endorsed for individual
state-issued licenses, are issued and renewed using a master
application and a master license expiration date common to each
renewable license endorsement.
(26) "Nematocide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate nematodes.
(27) "Nematode" means any invertebrate animal of the phylum
nemathelminthes and class nematoda, that is, unsegmented round worms
with elongated, fusiform, or saclike bodies covered with cuticle, and
inhabiting soil, water, plants or plant parts, may also be called nemas
or eelworms.
(28) "Person" means any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, or organized group of persons whether or not incorporated.
(29) "Pest" means, but is not limited to, any insect, rodent,
nematode, snail, slug, weed and any form of plant or animal life or
virus, except virus on or in a living person or other animal, which is
normally considered to be a pest or which the director may declare to
be a pest.
(30) "Pest control consultant" means any individual who sells or
offers for sale at other than a licensed pesticide dealer outlet or
location where they are employed, or who offers or supplies technical
advice or makes recommendations to the user of:
(a) Highly toxic pesticides, as determined under RCW 15.58.040;
(b) EPA restricted use pesticides or restricted use pesticides
which are restricted by rule to distribution by licensed pesticide
dealers only; or
(c) Any other pesticide except those pesticides which are labeled
and intended for home and garden use only.
(31) "Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:
(a) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate any insect, rodent, snail, slug,
fungus, weed, and any other form of plant or animal life or virus,
except virus on or in a living person or other animal which is normally
considered to be a pest or which the director may declare to be a pest;
(b) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as
a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant; and
(c) Any spray adjuvant.
(32) "Pesticide advisory board" means the pesticide advisory board
as provided for in the Washington pesticide application act.
(33) "Pesticide dealer" means any person who distributes any of the
following pesticides:
(a) Highly toxic pesticides, as determined under RCW 15.58.040;
(b) EPA restricted use pesticides or restricted use pesticides
which are restricted by rule to distribution by licensed pesticide
dealers only; or
(c) Any other pesticide except those pesticides which are labeled
and intended for home and garden use only.
(34) "Pesticide dealer manager" means the owner or other individual
supervising pesticide distribution at one outlet holding a pesticide
dealer license.
(35) "Plant regulator" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended through physiological action, to accelerate or retard the rate
of growth or maturation, or to otherwise alter the behavior of
ornamental or crop plants or their produce, but shall not include
substances insofar as they are intended to be used as plant nutrients,
trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant inoculants, or soil
amendments.
(36) "Registrant" means the person registering any pesticide under
the provisions of this chapter.
(37) "Restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or device
which, when used as directed or in accordance with a widespread and
commonly recognized practice, the director determines, subsequent to a
hearing, requires additional restrictions for that use to prevent
unreasonable adverse effects on the environment including people,
lands, beneficial insects, animals, crops, and wildlife, other than
pests.
(38) "Rodenticide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate rodents, or any other
vertebrate animal which the director may declare by rule to be a pest.
(39) "Specific wood destroying organism inspection" means an
inspection of a structure for purposes of identifying or verifying
evidence of an infestation of wood destroying organisms prior to pest
management activities.
(40) "Spray adjuvant" means any ((wetting agent, spreading agent,
deposit builder, adhesive, emulsifying agent, deflocculating agent,
water modifier, or similar agent with or without toxic properties of
its own,)) product intended to be used with ((any other)) a pesticide
as an aid to the application or to the effect of the pesticide, and
which is in a package or container separate from ((that of)) the
pesticide ((with which it is to be used)). Spray adjuvant includes,
but is not limited to, acidifiers, compatibility agents, crop oil
concentrates, defoaming agents, drift control agents, modified
vegetable oil concentrates, nonionic surfactants, organosilicone
surfactants, stickers, and water conditioning agents. Spray adjuvant
does not include products that are only intended to mark the location
where a pesticide is applied.
(41) "Special local needs registration" means a registration issued
by the director pursuant to provisions of section 24(c) of FIFRA.
(42) "Structural pest inspector" means any individual who performs
the service of conducting a complete wood destroying organism
inspection or a specific wood destroying organism inspection.
(43) "Unreasonable adverse effects on the environment" means any
unreasonable risk to people or the environment taking into account the
economic, social, and environmental costs and benefits of the use of
any pesticide, or as otherwise determined by the director.
(44) "Weed" means any plant which grows where not wanted.
(45) "Wood destroying organism" means insects or fungi that
consume, excavate, develop in, or otherwise modify the integrity of
wood or wood products. Wood destroying organism includes, but is not
limited to, carpenter ants, moisture ants, subterranean termites,
dampwood termites, beetles in the family Anobiidae, and wood decay
fungi (wood rot).
(46) "Wood destroying organism inspection report" means any written
document that reports or comments on the presence or absence of wood
destroying organisms, their damage, and/or conducive conditions leading
to the establishment of such organisms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect January 1, 2005.

--- END ---