BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.57 RCW
to read as follows:
The director may adopt rules to establish a system of animal
identification to support the agriculture industry in meeting federal
requirements. However, any requirements of an animal identification
system established under this section for country of origin labeling
purposes shall be substantially consistent with and shall not exceed
the requirements established by the United States department of
agriculture. The director, in consultation with the livestock
identification advisory board under RCW 16.57.015, may cooperate with
and enter into agreements with other states and agencies of federal
government to carry out such a system and to promote consistency of
regulation.

--- END ---