BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
In lieu of the license tab fees provided in RCW 46.16.0621, private
use single-axle trailers of two thousand pounds scale weight or less
may be licensed upon the payment of a license fee in the sum of fifteen
dollars, but only if the trailer is operated upon public highways. The
license fee must be collected annually for each registration year or
fraction of a registration year. This reduced license fee applies only
to trailers operated for personal use of the owners, and not trailers
held for rental to the public or used in any commercial or business
endeavor. The fee from this section must be deposited in the state
patrol highway account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is effective with registration fees
that are due or will become due October 1, 2004, and thereafter.

--- END ---