BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to improve the
safety of the public and the victims of domestic violence by requiring
all law enforcement agencies in Washington state to develop and
implement a domestic violence policy and by requiring all peace
officers to be educated and trained in the matter of domestic violence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2004, the Washington state criminal justice
training commission, the Washington state patrol, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and organizations
representing state and local law enforcement officers shall develop a
written model policy on domestic violence.
(2) By June 1, 2005, every state, county, and municipal law
enforcement agency shall adopt and implement a written domestic
violence policy. The policy adopted may, but need not, be the model
policy developed under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) By June 30, 2006, every full-time peace officer employed by a
state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency shall have received
domestic violence training. Every new full-time peace officer employed
by a state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency after June 30,
2006, also shall receive, within six months of employment, domestic
violence training.

--- END ---