BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature in
enacting this 2004 act to reaffirm the original goals of the 1997 act
which first provided distressed counties with the local option sales
and use tax contained in RCW 82.14.370. The local option tax is now
available to all rural counties and the continuing legislative goal for
RCW 82.14.370 is to promote the creation, attraction, expansion, and
retention of businesses and provide for family wage jobs.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.370 and 2002 c 184 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a rural county may impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is
in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
county. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.08 percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax, except that for rural counties with population
densities between sixty and one hundred persons per square mile, the
rate shall not exceed 0.04 percent before January 1, 2000.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(3)(a) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used ((for
the purpose of financing)) to finance public facilities serving
economic development purposes in rural counties. The public facility
must be listed as an item in the officially adopted county overall
economic development plan, or the economic development section of the
county's comprehensive plan, or the comprehensive plan of a city or
town located within the county for those counties planning under RCW
36.70A.040. For those counties that do not have an adopted overall
economic development plan and do not plan under the growth management
act, the public facility must be listed in the county's capital
facilities plan or the capital facilities plan of a city or town
located within the county.
(b) In implementing this section, the county shall consult with
cities, towns, and port districts located within the county and the
associate development organization serving the county to ensure that
the expenditure meets the goals of this act and the requirements of (a)
of this subsection. Each county collecting money under this section
shall report to the office of the state auditor, no later than October
1st of each year, a list of new projects from the prior fiscal year,
showing that the county has used the funds for those projects
consistent with the goals of this act and the requirements of (a) of
this subsection. Any projects financed prior to the effective date of
this act from the proceeds of obligations to which the tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section has been pledged shall not be
deemed to be new projects under this subsection.
(c) For the purposes of this section, (i) "public facilities" means
bridges, roads, domestic and industrial water facilities, sanitary
sewer facilities, earth stabilization, storm sewer facilities,
railroad, electricity, natural gas, buildings, structures,
telecommunications infrastructure, transportation infrastructure, or
commercial infrastructure, and port facilities in the state of
Washington; and (ii) "economic development purposes" means those
purposes which facilitate the creation or retention of businesses and
jobs in a county.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998.
No tax may be collected under this section by a county more than
twenty-five years after the date that a tax is first imposed under this
section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county
with a population density of less than one hundred persons per square
mile or a county smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles as
determined by the office of financial management and published each
year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

--- END ---