BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No insurer shall require that a motor vehicle be repaired at a
specific motor vehicle repair or auto glass dealer.
(2)(a) No insurer shall suggest or recommend that a motor vehicle
be repaired at a specific motor vehicle repair or auto glass dealer
unless either of the following applies:
(i) A referral is expressly requested by the claimant; or
(ii) The claimant has been informed in writing of the right to
select the motor vehicle repair or auto glass dealer.
(b) If the recommendation is accepted by the claimant, the insurer
shall cause the damaged motor vehicle to be restored to its condition
prior to the loss at no additional cost to the claimant other than as
stated in the policy or as is otherwise allowed by law. If the
recommendation of a motor vehicle repair dealer is done orally, and if
the oral recommendation is accepted by the claimant, the insurer shall
provide the information contained in this section, as noted in the
statement below, to the claimant at the time the recommendation is
made. The insurer shall send the written notice within five calendar
days from the oral recommendation. The written notice shall include
the following statement plainly printed in no less than 10-point type:

"WE ARE PROHIBITED BY LAW FROM REQUIRING THAT REPAIRS BE DONE AT A
SPECIFIC MOTOR VEHICLE REPAIR OR AUTO GLASS DEALER. YOU ARE ENTITLED
TO SELECT THE AUTOBODY REPAIR OR AUTO GLASS SHOP TO REPAIR DAMAGE
COVERED BY US. WE HAVE RECOMMENDED A MOTOR VEHICLE REPAIR OR AUTO
GLASS DEALER THAT WILL REPAIR YOUR DAMAGED VEHICLE. IF YOU AGREE TO
USE OUR RECOMMENDED MOTOR VEHICLE REPAIR OR AUTO GLASS DEALER, WE WILL
CAUSE THE DAMAGED MOTOR VEHICLE TO BE RESTORED TO ITS CONDITION PRIOR
TO THE LOSS AT NO ADDITIONAL COST TO YOU OTHER THAN AS STATED IN THE
INSURANCE POLICY OR AS OTHERWISE ALLOWED BY LAW. IF YOU EXPERIENCE A
PROBLEM WITH THE REPAIR OF YOUR MOTOR VEHICLE, PLEASE CONTACT US
IMMEDIATELY FOR ASSISTANCE."

(3) Except as provided in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section
after the claimant has chosen a motor vehicle repair or auto glass
dealer, the insurer shall not suggest or recommend that the claimant
select a different motor vehicle repair or auto glass dealer.
(4) An insurer that, by the insurance contract, suggests or
recommends that a motor vehicle be repaired at a particular motor
vehicle repair or auto glass dealer shall also do both of the
following:
(a) Prominently disclose the contractual provision in writing to
the insured at the time the insurance is applied for and at the time
the claim is acknowledged by the insurer; and
(b) If the claimant elects to have the vehicle repaired at the shop
of his or her choice, the insurer shall not limit or discount the
reasonable repair costs based on charges that would have been incurred
had the vehicle been repaired by the insurer's chosen shop.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "claimant" means a first-party claimant or insured, or a third-party claimant who asserts a
right of recovery for automotive repairs under an insurance policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state autobody and glass repair consumer bill of rights act.

--- END ---