BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) If an agreement has not been reached on
a new employment contract following a reasonable period of negotiations
and mediation, but in no event later than August 1st of any year in
which the previous employment contract will expire, an interest
arbitration panel shall be created to resolve the dispute.
(2) By August 1st, each party shall name one person to serve as its
arbitrator on the arbitration panel. The two members so appointed
shall meet within three days following the appointment of the later
appointed member to attempt to choose a third member to act as the
neutral chairman of the arbitration panel. Upon the failure of the
arbitrators to select a neutral chairman within three days, the two
appointed members shall use one of the two following options in the
appointment of the third member, who shall act as chairman of the
panel: (a) By mutual consent, the two appointed members may jointly
request the commission, and the commission shall appoint a third member
within two days of such request. Costs of each party's appointee shall
be borne by each party respectively; other costs of the arbitration
proceedings shall be borne by the commission; or (b) either party may
apply to the commission, the federal mediation and conciliation
service, or the American Arbitration Association to provide a list of
five qualified arbitrators from which the neutral chairman shall be
chosen. Each party shall pay the fees and expenses of its arbitrator,
and the fees and expenses of the neutral chairman shall be shared
equally between the parties.
(3) The issues for determination by the arbitration panel shall be
limited to the issues certified by the executive director of the
commission.
(4) Once the members of the arbitration panel are determined, the
panel shall promptly establish a date, time, and place for a hearing
and shall provide reasonable notice thereof to the parties to the
dispute.
(5) The hearing shall take place by August 15th. The hearing shall
be informal, and each party shall have the opportunity to present
evidence and make argument. No member of the arbitration panel may
present the case for a party to the proceedings. The rules of evidence
prevailing in judicial proceedings may be considered, but are not
binding. Any oral testimony or documentary evidence or other data
deemed relevant by the chairman of the arbitration panel may be
received in evidence. The proceedings shall be recorded.
(6) The arbitration panel has the power to administer oaths,
require the attendance of witnesses, and require the production of such
books, papers, contracts, agreements, and documents as may be deemed by
the panel to be material to a just determination of the issues in
dispute. If any person refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the
arbitration panel, or refuses to be sworn or to make an affirmation to
testify, or any witness, party, or attorney for a party is guilty of
any contempt while in attendance at any hearing held hereunder, the
arbitration panel may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court in
the county where the labor dispute exists, and the court has
jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order. Any failure to obey the
order may be punished by the court as a contempt.
(7) The hearing conducted by the arbitration panel shall be
concluded by August 22nd.
(8) The neutral chairman shall consult with the other members of
the arbitration panel, and, by September 1st, the neutral chairman
shall make written findings of fact and a written determination of the
issues in dispute, based on the evidence presented.
(9) A copy of the written findings of fact and a determination of
the dispute shall be served on the commission, on each of the other
members of the arbitration panel, and on each of the parties to the
dispute.
(10) The written determination shall be final and binding upon both
parties, subject to review by the superior court upon the application
of either party within seven days solely upon the question of whether
the decision of the panel was arbitrary or capricious.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 An interest arbitration panel created
pursuant to section 1 of this act, in the performance of its duties
under sections 1 through 7 of this act, exercises a state function and
is, for the purposes of sections 1 through 7 of this act, a state
agency. Chapter 34.05 RCW does not apply to proceedings before an
interest arbitration panel under sections 1 through 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In making its determination, the
arbitration panel shall take into consideration the following factors
as standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c) Comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of like personnel of like employers within the
state of Washington;
(d) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through (c) of
this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings; and
(e) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under (a)
through (d) of this subsection, that are normally or traditionally
taken into consideration in the determination of wages, hours, and
conditions of employment.
(2) The arbitration panel is bound by the statutory limitations for
salaries and compensation provided in RCW 28A.400.200 and 41.59.930.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 During the pendency of the proceedings
before the arbitration panel, existing wages, hours, and other
conditions of employment shall not be changed by action of either party
without the consent of the other but a party may so consent without
prejudice to his or her rights or position under sections 1 through 7
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If the representative of either or both the
teachers and other certificated instructional staff and the school
district refuse to submit to the mediation and arbitration procedures
set forth in chapter 41.56 RCW, the parties, or the commission on its
own motion, may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court for the
county in which the labor dispute exists and such court shall have
jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order. A failure to obey such
order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof. A decision
of the arbitration panel shall be final and binding on the parties, and
may be enforced at the instance of either party, the arbitration panel
or the commission in the superior court for the county where the
dispute arose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Nothing in sections 1 through 7 of this act
may be construed to require the state to pay, directly or indirectly,
any increased salary or compensation resulting from the determination
of the arbitration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The provisions of sections 1 through 6 of
this act are intended to be additional to other remedies and shall be
liberally construed to accomplish their purpose. If any provision of
sections 1 through 6 of this act conflicts with any other statute,
rule, or policy of any school district, the provisions of sections 1
through 6 of this act shall control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 41.59 RCW.

--- END ---