BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The fish and wildlife commission, in
cooperation and collaboration with the county legislative authorities
of Ferry, Stevens, Pend Oreille, Chelan, and Okanogan counties, shall
adopt rules to establish a three-year pilot program, beginning
September 2004, within select game management units of these counties,
to pursue or kill cougars with the aid of dogs. A pursuit season and
a kill season with the aid of dogs must be established through the fish
and wildlife commission's rule-making process, utilizing local
dangerous wildlife task teams comprised of the two collaborating
authorities. The two collaborating authorities shall also develop a
more effective and accurate dangerous wildlife reporting system to
ensure a timely response. The pilot program's primary goals are to
provide for public safety, to protect property, and to assess cougar
populations.

--- END ---