BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may not proceed with the total maximum daily
load process for Moses Lake until it has (a) made all reasonable
efforts to provide the information requested by the Moses Lake advisory
committee and (b) allowed the advisory committee sufficient time to
distribute and analyze the information so that the advisory committee
report accurately reflects the current condition of the lake, water,
and adjacent uplands.
(2) For purposes of this section, "proceed with the total maximum
daily load process" means: (a) Declaring Moses Lake to be an impaired
water body for purposes of listing the water body under the provisions
of section 303(d) of the federal clean water act; (b) completing a
public process related to establishing one or more total maximum daily
loads for Moses Lake; (c) including Moses Lake on any lists of impaired
water bodies to be submitted to the United States environmental
protection agency; and (d) proceeding with the development, completion,
or distribution of a summary implementation strategy for Moses Lake or
receiving waters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---