BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 21.35.005 and 2003 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Beneficiary form" means a registration of a security that
indicates the present owner of the security and the intention of the
owner regarding the person who will become the owner of the security
upon the death of the owner, referred to as a "beneficiary."
(2) "Devisee" means any person designated in a will to receive a
disposition of real or personal property.
(3) "Heirs" means those persons, including the surviving spouse,
who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the
property of a decedent.
(4) "Person" means an individual, a corporation, an organization,
or other legal entity.
(5) "Personal representative" includes executor, administrator,
successor personal representative, special administrator, and persons
who perform substantially the same function under the law governing
their status.
(6) "Property" includes both real and personal property or any
interest therein and means anything that may be the subject of
ownership.
(7) "Register," including its derivatives, means to issue a
certificate showing the ownership of a certificated security or, in the
case of an uncertificated security, to initiate or transfer an account
showing ownership of securities.
(8) "Registering entity" means a person who originates or transfers
a security title by registration, and includes a broker maintaining
security accounts for customers and a transfer agent or other person
acting for or as an issuer of securities.
(9) "Security" means a share, participation, or other interest in
property, in a business, or in an obligation of an enterprise or other
issuer, and includes a certificated security, an uncertificated
security, and a security account.
(10) "Security account" means (a) a reinvestment account associated
with a security; a securities account with a broker; a cash balance in
a brokerage account; or cash, cash equivalents, interest, earnings, or
dividends earned or declared on a security in an account, a
reinvestment account, or a brokerage account, whether or not credited
to the account before the owner's death; (b) an agency account
including, without limitation, an investment management account,
investment advisory account, or custody account with a trust company or
a trust division of a bank with trust powers, including the securities
in the account; a cash balance in the account; and cash, cash
equivalents, interest, earnings, or dividends earned or declared on a
security in the account, whether or not credited to the account before
the owner's death; or (c) a cash balance or other property held for or
due to the owner of a security as a replacement for or product of an
account security, whether or not credited to the account before the
owner's death.
(11) "State" includes any state of the United States, the District
of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory or
possession subject to the legislative authority of the United States.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.40.020 and 1999 c 42 s 601 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a personal
representative may give notice to the creditors of the decedent, ((as
directed)) in substantially the form set forth in RCW 11.40.030,
announcing the personal representative's appointment and requiring that
persons having claims against the decedent present their claims within
the time specified in RCW 11.40.051 or be forever barred as to claims
against the decedent's probate and nonprobate assets. If notice is
given:
(a) The personal representative shall first file the original of
the notice with the court;
(b) The personal representative shall then cause the notice to be
published once each week for three successive weeks in a legal
newspaper in the county in which the estate is being administered((,
and if the decedent was a Washington resident, in the county of the
decedent's residence at the time of death, if different));
(c) The personal representative may, at any time during the probate
proceeding, give actual notice to creditors who become known to the
personal representative by serving the notice on the creditor or
mailing the notice to the creditor at the creditor's last known
address, by regular first class mail, postage prepaid; and
(d) The personal representative shall also mail a copy of the
notice, including the decedent's social security number, to the state
of Washington department of social and health services office of
financial recovery.
The personal representative shall file with the court proof by
affidavit of the giving and publication of the notice.
(2) If the decedent was a resident of the state of Washington at
the time of death and probate proceedings are commenced in a county
other than the county of the decedent's residence, then in addition to
the requirements under subsection (1) of this section, the personal
representative shall cause the notice to creditors in substantially the
form set forth in RCW 11.40.030 to be published once each week for
three successive weeks in a legal newspaper in the county of the
decedent's residence and shall file the notice ((to the creditors of
the decedent as directed in RCW 11.40.030 must be filed)) with the
superior court of the county of the decedent's residence.

Sec. 3 RCW 11.40.030 and 1997 c 252 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notice under RCW 11.40.020 must contain the following elements in
substantially the following form:

The personal representative named below has been appointed as
personal representative of this estate. Any person having a claim
against the decedent must, before the time the claim would be barred by
any otherwise applicable statute of limitations, present the claim in
the manner as provided in RCW 11.40.070 by serving on or mailing to the
personal representative or the personal representative's attorney at
the address stated below a copy of the claim and filing the original of
the claim with the court in which the probate proceedings were
commenced. The claim must be presented within the later of: (1)
Thirty days after the personal representative served or mailed the
notice to the creditor as provided under RCW 11.40.020(((3))) (1)(c);
or (2) four months after the date of first publication of the notice.
If the claim is not presented within this time frame, the claim is
forever barred, except as otherwise provided in RCW 11.40.051 and
11.40.060. This bar is effective as to claims against both the
decedent's probate and nonprobate assets.

Date of First
Publication:

Personal Representative:

Attorney for the Personal Representative:
Address for Mailing or Service:
Court of probate proceedings and cause number:

Sec. 4 RCW 11.40.051 and 1997 c 252 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whether or not notice is provided under RCW 11.40.020, a person
having a claim against the decedent is forever barred from making a
claim or commencing an action against the decedent, if the claim or
action is not already barred by an otherwise applicable statute of
limitations, unless the creditor presents the claim in the manner
provided in RCW 11.40.070 within the following time limitations:
(a) If the personal representative provided notice under RCW
11.40.020(1) ((and (2))) (a) and (b) and the creditor was given actual
notice as provided in RCW 11.40.020(((3))) (1)(c), the creditor must
present the claim within the later of: (i) Thirty days after the
personal representative's service or mailing of notice to the creditor;
and (ii) four months after the date of first publication of the notice;
(b) If the personal representative provided notice under RCW
11.40.020(1) ((and (2))) (a) and (b) and the creditor was not given
actual notice as provided in RCW 11.40.020(((3))) (1)(c):
(i) If the creditor was not reasonably ascertainable, as defined in
RCW 11.40.040, the creditor must present the claim within four months
after the date of first publication of notice;
(ii) If the creditor was reasonably ascertainable, as defined in
RCW 11.40.040, the creditor must present the claim within twenty-four
months after the decedent's date of death; and
(c) If notice was not provided under this chapter or chapter 11.42
RCW, the creditor must present the claim within twenty-four months
after the decedent's date of death.
(2) An otherwise applicable statute of limitations applies without
regard to the tolling provisions of RCW 4.16.190.
(3) This bar is effective as to claims against both the decedent's
probate and nonprobate assets.

Sec. 5 RCW 11.40.070 and 1997 c 252 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The claimant, the claimant's attorney, or the claimant's agent
shall sign the claim and include in the claim the following
information:
(a) The name and address of the claimant;
(b) The name, address, if different from that of the claimant, and
nature of authority of an agent signing the claim on behalf of the
claimant;
(c) A statement of the facts or circumstances constituting the
basis of the claim;
(d) The amount of the claim; and
(e) If the claim is secured, unliquidated, contingent, or not yet
due, the nature of the security, the nature of the uncertainty, or the
date when it will become due.
Failure to describe correctly the information in (c), (d), or (e)
of this subsection, if the failure is not substantially misleading,
does not invalidate the claim.
(2) A claim does not need to be supported by affidavit.
(3) A claim must be presented within the time limits set forth in
RCW 11.40.051 by: (a) Serving on or mailing to, by regular first class
mail, the personal representative or the personal representative's
attorney a copy of the signed claim; and (b) filing the original of the
signed claim with the court in which probate proceedings were
commenced. A claim is deemed presented upon the later of the date of
postmark or service on the personal representative, or the personal
representative's attorney, and filing with the court.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if a
claimant makes a written demand for payment within the time limits set
forth in RCW 11.40.051, the personal representative may waive formal
defects and elect to treat the demand as a claim properly filed under
this chapter if: (a) The claim was due; (b) the amount paid is the
amount of indebtedness over and above all payments and offsets; (c) the
estate is solvent; and (d) the payment is made in good faith. Nothing
in this chapter limits application of the doctrines of waiver,
estoppel, or detrimental claims or any other equitable principle.

Sec. 6 RCW 11.42.020 and 1997 c 252 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The notice agent may give nonprobate notice to the creditors of
the decedent if:
(a) As of the date of the filing of the notice to creditors with
the court, the notice agent has no knowledge of another person acting
as notice agent or of the appointment of a personal representative in
the decedent's estate in the state of Washington; and
(b) According to the records of the court as are available on the
date of the filing of the notice to creditors, no cause number
regarding the decedent has been issued to any other notice agent and no
personal representative of the decedent's estate had been appointed.
(2) The notice agent must give notice to the creditors of the
decedent, ((as directed)) in substantially the form set forth in RCW
11.42.030, announcing that the notice agent has elected to give
nonprobate notice to creditors and requiring that persons having claims
against the decedent present their claims within the time specified in
RCW 11.42.050 or be forever barred as to claims against the decedent's
probate and nonprobate assets.
(a) The notice agent shall first file the original of the notice
with the court.
(b) The notice agent shall then cause the notice to be published
once each week for three successive weeks in a legal newspaper in the
notice county.
(c) The notice agent may at any time give actual notice to
creditors who become known to the notice agent by serving the notice on
the creditor or mailing the notice to the creditor at the creditor's
last known address, by regular first class mail, postage prepaid.
(d) The notice agent shall also mail a copy of the notice,
including the decedent's social security number, to the state of
Washington department of social and health services' office of
financial recovery.
(e) If the decedent was a resident of the state of Washington at
the time of death and the notice agent's declaration and oath were
filed in a county other than the county of the decedent's residence,
then in addition to the requirements in this section, the notice agent
shall cause the notice to creditors in substantially the form set forth
in RCW 11.42.030 to be published once each week for three successive
weeks in a legal newspaper in the county of the decedent's residence
and shall file the notice with the superior court of the county of the
decedent's residence.
The notice agent shall file with the court proof by affidavit of
the giving and publication of the notice.

Sec. 7 RCW 11.42.030 and 1997 c 252 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notice under RCW 11.42.020 must contain the following elements in
substantially the following form:

The notice agent named below has elected to give notice to
creditors of the above-named decedent. As of the date of the filing of
a copy of this notice with the court, the notice agent has no knowledge
of any other person acting as notice agent or of the appointment of a
personal representative of the decedent's estate in the state of
Washington. According to the records of the court as are available on
the date of the filing of this notice with the court, a cause number
regarding the decedent has not been issued to any other notice agent
and a personal representative of the decedent's estate has not been
appointed.
Any person having a claim against the decedent must, before the
time the claim would be barred by any otherwise applicable statute of
limitations, present the claim in the manner as provided in RCW
11.42.070 by serving on or mailing to the notice agent or the notice
agent's attorney at the address stated below a copy of the claim and
filing the original of the claim with the court in which the notice
agent's declaration and oath were filed. The claim must be presented
within the later of: (1) Thirty days after the notice agent served or
mailed the notice to the creditor as provided under RCW
11.42.020(2)(c); or (2) four months after the date of first publication
of the notice. If the claim is not presented within this time frame,
the claim is forever barred, except as otherwise provided in RCW
11.42.050 and 11.42.060. This bar is effective as to claims against
both the decedent's probate and nonprobate assets.

Date of First
Publication:

The notice agent declares under penalty of perjury under the laws
of the state of Washington on , [year] , at
[city] , [state] that the foregoing is true and
correct.

Notice Agent:

Attorney for the Notice Agent:
Address for Mailing or Service:
Court of Notice Agent's oath and declaration and cause number:

Sec. 8 RCW 11.42.070 and 1997 c 252 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The claimant, the claimant's attorney, or the claimant's agent
shall sign the claim and include in the claim the following
information:
(a) The name and address of the claimant;
(b) The name, address, if different from that of the claimant, and
nature of authority of an agent signing the claim on behalf of the
claimant;
(c) A statement of the facts or circumstances constituting the
basis of the claim;
(d) The amount of the claim; and
(e) If the claim is secured, unliquidated, contingent, or not yet
due, the nature of the security, the nature of the uncertainty, or the
date when it will become due.
Failure to describe correctly the information in (c), (d), or (e)
of this subsection, if the failure is not substantially misleading,
does not invalidate the claim.
(2) A claim does not need to be supported by affidavit.
(3) A claim must be presented within the time limits set forth in
RCW 11.42.050 by: (a) Serving on or mailing to, by regular first class
mail, the notice agent or the notice agent's attorney a copy of the
signed claim; and (b) filing the original of the signed claim with the
court in which the notice agent's declaration and oath were filed. A
claim is deemed presented upon the later of the date of postmark or
service on the notice agent, or the notice agent's attorney, and filing
with the court.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if a
claimant makes a written demand for payment within the time limits set
forth in RCW 11.42.050, the notice agent may waive formal defects and
elect to treat the demand as a claim properly filed under this chapter
if: (a) The claim was due; (b) the amount paid was the amount of
indebtedness over and above all payments and offsets; (c) the estate is
solvent; and (d) the payment is made in good faith. Nothing in this
chapter limits application of the doctrines of waiver, estoppel, or
detrimental claims or any other equitable principle.

Sec. 9 RCW 11.98.039 and 1999 c 42 s 618 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where a vacancy occurs in the office of the trustee and there
is a successor trustee who is willing to serve as trustee and (a) is
named in the governing instrument as successor trustee or (b) has been
selected to serve as successor trustee under the procedure established
in the governing instrument for the selection of a successor trustee,
the outgoing trustee, or any other interested party, shall give notice
of such vacancy, whether arising because of the trustee's resignation
or because of any other reason, and of the successor trustee's
agreement to serve as trustee, to all adult income beneficiaries of the
trust and to all known and identifiable adults for whom the income of
the trust is being accumulated. If there are no such adults, no notice
need be given. The successor trustee named in the governing instrument
or selected pursuant to the procedure therefor established in the
governing instrument shall be entitled to act as trustee except for
good cause or disqualification. The successor trustee shall serve as
of the effective date of the discharge of the predecessor trustee as
provided in RCW 11.98.041.
(2) Where a vacancy exists or occurs in the office of the trustee
and there is no successor trustee who is named in the governing
instrument or who has been selected to serve as successor trustee under
the procedure established in the governing instrument for the selection
of a successor trustee, and who is willing to serve as trustee, the
beneficiaries and the then-acting trustee, if any, of a trust may agree
to a nonjudicial change of the trustee under RCW 11.96A.220. The
trustee, or any beneficiary if there is no then-acting trustee, shall
give written notice of the proposed change in trustee to every
beneficiary or special representative, and to the trustor if alive.
The notice shall: (a) State the name and mailing address of the
trustee or the beneficiary giving the notice; (b) include a copy of the
governing instrument; (c) state the name and mailing address of the
successor trustee; and (d) include a copy of the proposed successor
trustee's agreement to serve as trustee. The notice shall advise the
recipient of the right to petition for a judicial appointment or change
in trustee as provided in subsection (((3))) (4) of this section. The
notice shall include a form on which consent or objection to the
proposed change in trustee may be indicated. The successor trustee
shall serve as of the effective date of the discharge of the
predecessor trustee as provided in RCW 11.98.041 or, in circumstances
where there is no predecessor trustee, as of the effective date of the
trustee's appointment.
(3) When there is a desire to name one or more co-trustee to serve
with the existing trustee, the trustor, if alive, the beneficiaries,
and the then acting trustee of a trust may agree to the nonjudicial
addition of one or more co-trustees under RCW 11.96A.220. The trustor,
the trustee, or any beneficiary shall give written notice of the
proposed addition of one or more co-trustees to the trustor, if alive,
to every beneficiary, to any trustee, and to any special
representative. The notice shall: (a) State the name and mailing
address of the party giving notice, and their relationship to the
trust, whether as trustor, trustee, or beneficiary; (b) include a copy
of the governing instrument; (c) state the name and mailing address of
a co-trustee being appointed; and (d) include a copy of a proposed
successor co-trustee's agreement to serve as co-trustee. The notice
shall include a form on which consent or objection to the proposed
addition of a co-trustee may be indicated. An additional co-trustee
shall serve as of the effective date of the co-trustee's appointment.
(4) Any beneficiary of a trust, the trustor, if alive, or the
trustee may petition the superior court having jurisdiction for the
appointment or change of a trustee or co-trustee under the procedures
provided in RCW 11.96A.080 through 11.96A.200: (a) Whenever the office
of trustee becomes vacant; (b) upon filing of a petition of resignation
by a trustee; (c) upon the giving of notice of the change in trustee or
the addition of one or more co-trustees as referred to in subsections
(1) ((or (2))) through (3) of this section; or (d) for any other
reasonable cause.
(((4))) (5) For purposes of this subsection, the term fiduciary
includes both trustee and personal representative.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in the governing instrument, a
successor fiduciary, absent actual knowledge of a breach of fiduciary
duty: (i) Is not liable for any act or omission of a predecessor
fiduciary and is not obligated to inquire into the validity or
propriety of any such act or omission; (ii) is authorized to accept as
conclusively accurate any accounting or statement of assets tendered to
the successor fiduciary by a predecessor fiduciary; and (iii) is
authorized to receipt only for assets actually delivered and has no
duty to make further inquiry as to undisclosed assets of the trust or
estate.
(b) Nothing in this section relieves a successor fiduciary from
liability for retaining improper investments, nor does this section in
any way bar the successor fiduciary, trust beneficiaries, or other
party in interest from bringing an action against a predecessor
fiduciary arising out of the acts or omissions of the predecessor
fiduciary, nor does it relieve the successor fiduciary of liability for
its own acts or omissions except as specifically stated or authorized
in this section.

--- END ---