BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 11.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person who has custody or control of any original will and who
has not received knowledge of the death of the testator may deliver the
will for filing under seal to any court having jurisdiction. The
testator may withdraw the original will so filed upon proper
identification. Any other person, including an attorney in fact or
guardian of the testator, may withdraw the original will so filed only
upon court order after showing of good cause. Upon request and
presentation of a certified copy of the testator's death certificate,
the clerk shall unseal the file. This section does not preclude filing
a will not under seal and does not alter any duty of a person having
knowledge of the testator's death to file the will.

--- END ---