BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.160.020 and 1985 c 236 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Smoke" or "smoking" means the carrying or smoking of any kind
of lighted pipe, cigar, cigarette, or any other lighted smoking
equipment.
(2) "Public place" means that portion of any building, including a
thirty-five foot radius around the building, or vehicle used by and
open to the public, regardless of whether the building or vehicle is
owned in whole or in part by private persons or entities, the state of
Washington, or other public entity, and regardless of whether a fee is
charged for admission.
Public places include, but are not limited to: Elevators, public
conveyances or transportation facilities, museums, concert halls,
theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls, indoor sports arenas,
hospitals, nursing homes, health care facilities or clinics, enclosed
shopping centers, retail stores, retail service establishments,
financial institutions, educational facilities, ticket areas, public
hearing facilities, state legislative chambers and immediately adjacent
hallways, public restrooms, libraries, restaurants, waiting areas,
lobbies, and reception areas. A public place does not include a
private residence. This chapter is not intended to restrict smoking in
private facilities which are occasionally open to the public except
upon the occasions when the facility is open to the public.
(3) "Restaurant" means any building, structure, or area used,
maintained, or advertised as, or held out to the public to be, an
enclosure where meals are made available to be consumed on the
premises, for consideration of payment.

--- END ---