BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.04.035 and 2001 c 294 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a board of accountancy for the state of
Washington to be known as the Washington state board of accountancy.
Effective June 30, 2001, the board shall consist of nine members
appointed by the governor. Members of the board shall include six
persons who have been licensed in this state continuously for the
previous ten years. Three members shall be public members qualified to
judge whether the qualifications, activities, and professional practice
of those regulated under this chapter conform with standards to protect
the public interest, including one public member qualified to represent
the interests of clients of individuals and firms licensed under this
chapter.
(2) The members of the board shall be appointed by the governor to
a term of three years. Vacancies occurring during a term shall be
filled by appointment for the unexpired term. Upon the expiration of
a member's term of office, the member shall continue to serve until a
successor has been appointed and has assumed office. The governor
shall remove from the board any member whose license to practice has
been revoked or suspended and may, after hearing, remove any member of
the board for neglect of duty or other just cause. No person who has
served ((two)) three successive complete terms is eligible for
reappointment. Appointment to fill an unexpired term is not considered
a complete term. In order to stagger their terms, of the two new
appointments made to the board upon June 11, 1992, the first appointed
member shall serve a term of two years initially.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.04.105 and 2001 c 294 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A license to practice public accounting shall be granted by the
board to any person:
(a) Who is of good character. Good character, for purposes of this
section, means lack of a history of dishonest or felonious acts. The
board may refuse to grant a license on the ground of failure to satisfy
this requirement only if there is a substantial connection between the
lack of good character of the applicant and the professional and
ethical responsibilities of a licensee and if the finding by the board
of lack of good character is supported by a preponderance of evidence.
When an applicant is found to be unqualified for a license because of
a lack of good character, the board shall furnish the applicant a
statement containing the findings of the board and a notice of the
applicant's right of appeal;
(b) Who has met the educational standards established by rule as
the board determines to be appropriate;
(c) Who has passed an examination;
(d) Who has had one year of experience which is gained:
(i) Through the use of accounting, issuing reports on financial
statements, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, tax advisory,
or consulting skills;
(ii) While employed in government, industry, academia, or public
practice; and
(iii) Meeting the competency requirements in a manner as determined
by the board to be appropriate and established by board rule; and
(e) Who has paid appropriate fees as established by rule by the
board.
(2) The examination described in subsection (1)(c) of this section
shall test the applicant's knowledge of the subjects of accounting and
auditing, and other related fields the board may specify by rule. The
time for holding the examination is fixed by the board and may be
changed from time to time. The board shall prescribe by rule the
methods of applying for and taking the examination, including methods
for grading examinations and determining a passing grade required of an
applicant for a license. The board shall to the extent possible see to
it that the grading of the examination, and the passing grades, are
uniform with those applicable to all other states. The board may make
use of all or a part of the uniform certified public accountant
examination and advisory grading service of the American Institute of
Certified Public Accountants and may contract with third parties to
perform administrative services with respect to the examination as the
board deems appropriate to assist it in performing its duties under
this chapter. The board shall establish by rule provisions for
transitioning to a new examination structure or to a new media for
administering the examination.
(3) The board shall charge each applicant an examination fee for
the initial examination or for reexamination. The applicable fee shall
be paid by the person at the time he or she applies for examination,
reexamination, or evaluation of educational qualifications. Fees for
examination, reexamination, or evaluation of educational qualifications
shall be determined by the board under chapter 18.04 RCW. There is
established in the state treasury an account to be known as the
certified public accountants' account. All fees received from
candidates to take any or all sections of the certified public
accountant examination shall be used only for costs related to the
examination.
(4) Persons who on June 30, 2001, held valid certificates
previously issued under this chapter shall be deemed to be certificate
holders, subject to the following:
(a) Certificate holders may, prior to June 30, ((2004)) 2006,
petition the board to become licensees by documenting to the board that
they have gained one year of experience through the use of accounting,
issuing reports on financial statements, management advisory, financial
advisory, tax, tax advisory, or consulting skills, without regard to
the eight-year limitation set forth in (b) of this subsection, while
employed in government, industry, academia, or public practice.
(b) Certificate holders who do not petition to become licensees
prior to June 30, ((2004)) 2006, may after that date petition the board
to become licensees by documenting to the board that they have one year
of experience acquired within eight years prior to applying for a
license through the use of accounting, issuing reports on financial
statements, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, tax advisory,
or consulting skills in government, industry, academia, or public
practice.
(c) Certificate holders who petition the board pursuant to (a) or
(b) of this subsection must also meet competency requirements in a
manner as determined by the board to be appropriate and established by
board rule.
(d) Any certificate holder petitioning the board pursuant to (a) or
(b) of this subsection to become a licensee must submit to the board
satisfactory proof of having completed an accumulation of one hundred
twenty hours of CPE during the thirty-six months preceding the date of
filing the petition.
(e) Any certificate holder petitioning the board pursuant to (a) or
(b) of this subsection to become a licensee must pay the appropriate
fees established by rule by the board.
(5) Certificate holders shall comply with the prohibition against
the practice of public accounting in RCW 18.04.345.
(6) Persons who on June 30, 2001, held valid certificates
previously issued under this chapter are deemed to hold inactive
certificates, subject to renewal as inactive certificates, until they
have petitioned the board to become licensees and have met the
requirements of subsection (4) of this section. No individual who did
not hold a valid certificate before July 1, 2001, is eligible to obtain
an inactive certificate.
(7) Persons deemed to hold inactive certificates under subsection
(6) of this section shall comply with the prohibition against the
practice of public accounting in subsection (8)(b) of this section and
RCW 18.04.345, but are not required to display the term inactive as
part of their title, as required by subsection (8)(a) of this section
until renewal. Certificates renewed to any persons after June 30,
2001, are inactive certificates and the inactive certificate holders
are subject to the requirements of subsection (8) of this section.
(8) Persons holding an inactive certificate:
(a) Must use or attach the term "inactive" whenever using the title
CPA or certified public accountant or referring to the certificate, and
print the word "inactive" immediately following the title, whenever the
title is printed on a business card, letterhead, or any other document,
including documents published or transmitted through electronic media,
in the same font and font size as the title; and
(b) Are prohibited from practicing public accounting.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.04.180 and 2001 c 294 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a license to a holder of a
certificate/valid license issued by another state that entitles the
holder to practice public accountancy, provided that:
(a) Such state makes similar provision to grant reciprocity to a
holder of a valid certificate or license in this state;
(b) The applicant meets the CPE requirements of RCW 18.04.215(5);
(c) The applicant meets the good character requirements of RCW
18.04.105(1)(a); and
(d) The applicant passed the examination required for issuance of
his or her certificate or license with grades that would have been
passing grades at that time in this state and meets all current
requirements in this state for issuance of a license at the time
application is made; or at the time of the issuance of the applicant's
license in the other state, met all the requirements then applicable in
this state; or has three years of experience within the five years
immediately preceding application or had five years of experience
within the ten years immediately preceding application in the practice
of public accountancy that meets the requirements prescribed by the
board.
(2) The board may accept NASBA's designation of the applicant as
substantially equivalent to national standards as meeting the
requirement of subsection (1)(d) of this section.
(3) A licensee who has been granted a license under the reciprocity
provisions of this section shall notify the board within thirty days if
the license or certificate issued in the other jurisdiction has lapsed
or if the status of the license or certificate issued in the other
jurisdiction becomes otherwise invalid.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.04.295 and 2003 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall have the power to: Revoke, suspend, or refuse to
issue, renew, or reinstate a license or certificate; impose a fine in
an amount not to exceed thirty thousand dollars plus the board's
investigative and legal costs in bringing charges against a certified
public accountant, a certificate holder, a licensee, a licensed firm,
an applicant, a non-CPA violating the provisions of RCW 18.04.345, or
a nonlicensee holding an ownership interest in a licensed firm; may
impose full restitution to injured parties; may impose conditions
precedent to renewal of a certificate or a license; or may prohibit a
nonlicensee from holding an ownership interest in a licensed firm, for
any of the following causes:
(1) Fraud or deceit in obtaining a license, or in any filings with
the board;
(2) Dishonesty, fraud, or negligence while representing oneself as
a nonlicensee owner holding an ownership interest in a licensed firm,
a licensee, or a certificate holder;
(3) A violation of any provision of this chapter;
(4) A violation of a rule of professional conduct promulgated by
the board under the authority granted by this chapter;
(5) Conviction of a crime or an act constituting a crime under:
(a) The laws of this state;
(b) The laws of another state, and which, if committed within this
state, would have constituted a crime under the laws of this state; or
(c) Federal law;
(6) Cancellation, revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the
authority to practice as a certified public accountant by any other
state for any cause other than failure to pay a fee or to meet the
requirements of CPE in the other state;
(7) Suspension or revocation of the right to practice matters
relating to public accounting before any state or federal agency;
For purposes of subsections (6) and (7) of this section, a
certified copy of such revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew
shall be prima facie evidence;
(8) Failure to maintain compliance with the requirements for
issuance, renewal, or reinstatement of a certificate or license, or to
report changes to the board;
(9) Failure to cooperate with the board by:
(a) Failure to furnish any papers or documents requested or ordered
by the board;
(b) Failure to furnish in writing a full and complete explanation
covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the board or
the inquiry of the board;
(c) Failure to respond to subpoenas issued by the board, whether or
not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding;
(10) Failure by a nonlicensee owner of a licensed firm to comply
with the requirements of this chapter or board rule; and
(11) Failure to comply with an order of the board.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.04.370 and 2003 c 290 s 5 and 2003 c 53 s 120 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be
guilty of a crime, as follows:
(a) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty
of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be subject to a
fine of not more than thirty thousand dollars, or to imprisonment for
not more than six months, or to both such fine and imprisonment.
(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection, any person who uses a
professional title intended to deceive the public, in violation of RCW
18.04.345, having previously entered into a stipulated agreement and
order of assurance with the board, is guilty of a class C felony, and
upon conviction thereof, is subject to a fine of not more than thirty
thousand dollars, or to imprisonment for not more than two years, or to
both such fine and imprisonment.
(c) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection, any person whose
license or certificate was suspended or revoked by the board and who
uses the CPA professional title intending to deceive the public, in
violation of RCW 18.04.345, having previously entered into a stipulated
agreement and order of assurance with the board, is guilty of a class
C felony, and upon conviction thereof, is subject to a fine of not more
than thirty thousand dollars, or to imprisonment for not more than two
years, or to both fine and imprisonment.
(2) With the exception of first time violations of RCW 18.04.345,
subject to subsection (3) of this section whenever the board has reason
to believe that any person is violating the provisions of this chapter
it shall certify the facts to the prosecuting attorney of the county in
which such person resides or may be apprehended and the prosecuting
attorney shall cause appropriate proceedings to be brought against such
person.
(3) The board may elect to enter into a stipulated agreement and
orders of assurance with persons in violation of RCW 18.04.345 who have
not previously been found to have violated the provisions of this
chapter. The board may order full restitution to injured parties as a
condition of a stipulated agreement and order of assurance.
(4) Nothing herein contained shall be held to in any way affect the
power of the courts to grant injunctive or other relief as above
provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1,
2004.

--- END ---