BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.80.010 and 2001 c 237 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following definitions apply throughout this chapter, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alternate" means an individual: (a) Who is appointed by the
county legislative authority or authorities under RCW 90.80.050(3); (b)
who is trained under the requirements of RCW 90.80.040; and (c) who,
while serving as a replacement for an absent or recused commissioner:
(i) May serve and vote as a commissioner; (ii) is subject to any
requirement applicable to a commissioner; and (iii) counts toward a
quorum.
(2) "Board" means a water conservancy board created under this
chapter.
(((2))) (3) "Commissioner" means an individual who is appointed by
the county legislative authority or authorities as a member of a water
conservancy board under RCW 90.80.050(1), or an alternate appointed
under RCW 90.80.050(3) while serving as a replacement for an absent or
recused commissioner.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((4))) (5) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology.
(((5))) (6) "Record of decision" means the conclusion reached by a
water conservancy board regarding an application for a transfer filed
with the board.
(((6))) (7) "Transfer" means a transfer, change, amendment, or
other alteration of a part or all of a water right authorized under RCW
90.03.380, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.80.035 and 2001 c 237 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a county is the only county having lands comprising a water
resource inventory area as defined in chapter 173-500 WAC, the county
may elect to establish a water conservancy board for the water resource
inventory area, rather than for the entire county.
(2) Counties having lands within a water resource inventory area
may jointly petition the department for establishment of a water
conservancy board for the water resource inventory area. Counties may
jointly petition the department to establish boards serving multiple
counties or one or more water resource inventory areas. For any of
these multicounty options, the counties must reach their joint
determination on the decision to file the petition, on the proposed
bylaws, and on other matters relating to the establishment and
operation of the board in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter and chapter 39.34 RCW, the interlocal cooperation act. Each
county must meet the requirements of RCW 90.80.020(2). The counties
must jointly determine the sufficiency of a petition under RCW
90.80.020(3) and each county legislative authority must hold a hearing
in its county.
(3) If establishment of a multicounty water conservancy board under
any of the options provided in subsection (2) of this section is
approved by the department, the counties must jointly appoint the board
commissioners and jointly appoint members to fill vacancies as they
occur, and may jointly appoint alternates in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter and chapter 39.34 RCW.
(4) A board established for more than one county or for one or more
water resource inventory areas has the same powers as other boards
established under this chapter. The board has no jurisdiction outside
the boundaries of the water resource inventory area or areas or the
county or counties, as applicable, for which it has been established,
except as provided in this chapter.
(5) The counties establishing a board for a multiple county area
must designate a lead county for purposes of providing a single point
of contact for communications with the department. The lead county
shall forward the information required in RCW 90.80.030(1) for each
county.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.80.050 and 2001 c 237 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A water conservancy board constitutes a public body corporate
and politic and a separate unit of local government in the state. Each
board shall consist of three commissioners appointed by the county
legislative authority or authorities as applicable for six-year terms.
The county legislative authority or authorities shall stagger the
initial appointment of commissioners so that the first commissioners
who are appointed shall serve terms of two, four, and six years,
respectively, from the date of their appointment. The county
legislative authority or authorities may appoint two additional
commissioners, for a total of five. If the county or counties elect to
appoint five commissioners, the initial terms of the additional
commissioners shall be for three and five-year terms respectively. All
vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term.
(2) The county legislative authority or authorities shall consider,
but are not limited in appointing, nominations to the board by people
or entities petitioning or requesting the creation of the board. The
county legislative authority or authorities shall ensure that at least
one commissioner is an individual water right holder who diverts or
withdraws water for use within the area served by the board. The
county legislative authority or authorities must appoint one person who
is not a water right holder. If the county legislative authority or
authorities choose not to appoint five commissioners, and as of May 10,
2001, there is no commissioner on an existing board who is not a water
right holder, the county or counties are not required to appoint a new
commissioner until the first vacancy occurs. In making appointments to
the board, the county legislative authority or authorities shall choose
from among persons who are residents of the county or counties or a
county that is contiguous to the county that the water conservancy
board is to serve.
(3) The county legislative authority or authorities may appoint up
to two alternates to serve in a reserve capacity as replacements for
absent or recused commissioners, and while serving in that capacity an
alternate may serve for all or any portion of a meeting of the board.
Alternates do not hold an appointed commissioner position on a board as
set forth under subsection (1) of this section. An alternate shall be
appointed to serve a six-year term.
(4) No commissioner may participate in a record of decision of a
board until he or she has successfully completed the necessary training
required under RCW 90.80.040. Commissioners shall serve without
compensation, but are entitled to reimbursement for necessary travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and costs
incident to receiving training.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.80.070 and 2001 c 237 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person proposing a transfer of a water right may elect to
file an application with a water conservancy board, if a board has been
established for the geographic area where the water is or would be
diverted, withdrawn, or used. If the person has already filed an
application with the department, the person may request that the
department convey the application to the conservancy board with
jurisdiction and the department must promptly forward the application.
A board is not required to process an application filed with the board.
If a board decides that it will not process an application, it must
return the application to the applicant and must inform the applicant
that the application may be filed with the department. An application
to the board for a transfer shall be made on a form provided by the
department. A board may require an applicant to submit within a
reasonable time additional information as may be required by the board
in order to review and act upon the application. At a minimum, the
application shall include information sufficient to establish to the
board's satisfaction that a right to the quantity of water being
transferred exists, and a description of any applicable limitations on
the right to use water, including the point of diversion or withdrawal,
place of use, source of supply, purpose of use, quantity of use
permitted, time of use, period of use, and the place of storage.
(2) The applicant for any proposed water right transfer may apply
to a board for a record of decision on a transfer if the water proposed
to be transferred is currently diverted, withdrawn, or used within the
geographic area in which the board has jurisdiction, or would be
diverted, withdrawn, or used within the geographic area in which the
board has jurisdiction if the transfer is approved. In the case of a
proposed water right transfer in which the water is currently diverted
or withdrawn or would be diverted or withdrawn outside the geographic
boundaries of the county or the water resource inventory area where the
use is proposed to be made, the board shall hold a public hearing in
the county of the diversion or withdrawal or proposed diversion or
withdrawal. The board shall provide for prominent publication of
notice of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation published
in the county in which the hearing is to be held for the purpose of
affording an opportunity for interested persons to comment upon the
application. If an application is for a transfer of water out of the
water resource inventory area that is the source of the water, the
board shall consult with the department regarding the application.
(3) After an application for a transfer is filed with the board,
the board shall publish notice of the application and send notice to
state agencies in accordance with the requirements of RCW 90.03.280.
In addition, the board shall send notice of the application to any
Indian tribe with reservation lands that would be, but for RCW
90.80.055(2), within the area in which the board has jurisdiction. The
board shall also provide notice of the application to any Indian tribe
that has requested that it be notified of applications. Any person may
submit comments and other information to the board regarding the
application. The comments and information may be submitted in writing
or verbally at any public meeting of the board to discuss or decide on
the application. The comments must be considered by the board in
making its record of decision.
(4) If a majority of the board determines that the application is
complete, and that the transfer is in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.390, or 90.44.100, the board must issue a record of decision
approving the transfer, subject to review by the director. In making
its record of decision, the board must consider among other things
whether the proposed transfer can be made without detriment or injury
to existing water rights, including rights established for instream
flows. The board must include in its record of decision any conditions
that are deemed necessary for the transfer to qualify for approval
under the applicable laws of the state. The basis for the record of
decision of the board must be documented in a report of examination.
The board's proposed approval must clearly state that the applicant is
not permitted to proceed to effect the proposed transfer until a final
decision is made by the director. In making its record of decision,
the board must consider among other things whether the proposed
transfer can be made without detriment or injury to existing water
rights, including rights established for instream flows.
(5) If a majority of the board determines that the application
cannot be approved under the applicable laws of the state of
Washington, the board must make a record of decision denying the
application together with its report of examination documenting its
record of decision. The board's record of decision is subject to
review by the director under RCW 90.80.080.
(6) When alternates appointed under the provisions of RCW
90.80.050(3) are serving as commissioners on a board, a majority vote
of the board must include at least one commissioner appointed under the
provisions of RCW 90.80.050(1).
(7) An alternate when serving as a commissioner in the review of an
application before the board shall:
(a) Review the written record before the board and any exhibits
provided for the review or provided at the hearing if a hearing was
held;
(b) Review any audio or video recordings made of the proceedings on
the application; and
(c) Conduct a site visit if a site visit by other commissioners
acting on the application has been previously conducted.
(8) An alternate serving as a commissioner shall be guided by the
conflict of interest standards applicable to all commissioners under
RCW 90.80.120. The board shall provide notice of an alternate sitting
as a commissioner to the applicant and other participants in
proceedings before the board in a timely manner to provide sufficient
time for any challenges for conflict of interest to be made prior to
the board's decision on the application.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.80.120 and 2001 c 237 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A commissioner of a water conservancy board shall not engage in
any act which is in conflict with the proper discharge of the official
duties of a commissioner. A commissioner is deemed to have a conflict
of interest if he or she:
(a) Has an ownership interest in a water right subject to an
application for approval before the board;
(b) Receives or has a financial interest in an application
submitted to the board or a project, development, or venture related to
the approval of the application; or
(c) Solicits, accepts, or seeks anything of economic value as a
gift, gratuity, or favor from any person, firm, or corporation involved
in the application.
(2) In the event of a recusal of an appointed commissioner, an
alternate may serve as a commissioner on a board and may act upon the
official board business for which the conflict of interest exists.
(3) The department shall return a record of decision to a
conservancy board without action where the department determines that
any member of a board has violated subsection (1) of this section.
(a) If a person seeking to rely on this section to disqualify a
commissioner knows of the basis for disqualification before the time
the board issues a record of decision, the person must request the
board to have the commissioner recuse himself or herself from further
involvement in processing the application, or be barred from later
raising that challenge.
(b) If the commissioner does not recuse himself or herself or if
the person becomes aware of the basis for disqualification after the
board issues a record of decision but within the time period under RCW
90.80.080(3) for filing objections with the department, the person must
raise the challenge with the department. If the department determines
that the commissioner should be disqualified under this section, the
director must remand the record of decision to the board for
reconsideration and resubmission of a record of decision. The
disqualified commissioner shall not participate in any further board
review of the application. The department's decision on whether to
remand a record of decision under this section may only be appealed at
the same time and in the same manner as an appeal of the department's
decision to affirm, modify, or reverse the record of decision after
remand.
(c) If the person becomes aware of the basis for disqualification
after the time for filing objections with the department, the person
may raise the challenge in an appeal of the department's final decision
under RCW 90.80.090.

--- END ---