BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.80.380 and 1985 c 370 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The board shall establish advisory committees composed of members
representing faculty, administrators, students, regents and trustees,
and staff of the public institutions, the superintendent of public
instruction, and the independent institutions.)) (1) The board shall
establish an advisory council consisting of: The superintendent of
public instruction; a representative of the two-year system of the
state board for community and technical colleges appointed by the state
board for community and technical colleges; one representative of the
research universities appointed by the president of the University of
Washington and the president of Washington State University; a
representative of the regional universities and The Evergreen State
College appointed through a process developed by the council of
presidents; a representative of the faculty for the four-year
institutions appointed by the council of faculty representatives; a
representative of the proprietary schools appointed by the federation
of private career schools and colleges; a representative of the
independent colleges appointed by the independent colleges of
Washington; and a faculty member in the community and technical college
system appointed by the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(2) The members of the advisory council shall each service a two-year term except for the superintendent of public instruction, whose
term is concurrent with his or her term of office.
(3) The board shall meet with the advisory council at least
quarterly and shall seek advice from the council regarding the board's
discharge of its statutory responsibilities.

--- END ---