BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 24.06 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to any other rights and powers granted under this
chapter, any mutual or miscellaneous corporation that was organized
under this chapter prior to the effective date of this section and
conducts its business on a cooperative basis is entitled, by means of
an express election contained in its articles of incorporation or
bylaws, to avail itself of part or all of the additional rights and
powers granted to cooperative associations under RCW 23.86.105(1),
23.86.160, and 23.86.170, and, if the corporation is a consumer
cooperative, under RCW 23.86.030 (1) and (2).

--- END ---