BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the use of
renewable energy resources generated from local sources such as solar
and wind power benefit our state by reducing the load on the state's
electric energy grid, by providing nonpolluting sources of electricity
generation, and by the creation of jobs for local industries that
develop and sell renewable energy products and technologies.
The legislature finds that Washington state has become a national
and international leader in the technologies related to the solar
electric markets. The state can support these industries by providing
incentives for the purchase of locally made renewable energy products.
Locally made renewable technologies benefit and protect the state's
environment. The legislature also finds that the state's economy can
be enhanced through the creation of incentives to develop additional
renewable energy industries in the state.
The legislature intends to provide incentives for the greater use
of locally created renewable energy technologies, support and retain
existing local industries, and create new opportunities for renewable
energy industries to develop in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Customer-generated electricity" means the electricity that is
generated from a renewable energy system located on an individual's,
businesses', or local government's real property. A system located on
a leasehold interest does not qualify under this definition.
"Customer-generated electricity" does not include electricity generated
by a light and power business or a gas distribution business.
(2) "Gas distribution business" has the same meaning as described
in RCW 82.16.010.
(3) "Light and power business" has the same meaning as described in
RCW 82.16.010.
(4) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(5) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system or a wind
generator used for producing electricity.
(6) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(7) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert direct
current to alternating current in a photovoltaic cell system.
(8) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The renewable energy incentive account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) Until June 30, 2013, one and three-quarters percent of the
money collected under RCW 82.16.020(1), on light and power businesses
and gas distribution businesses, shall be deposited into the account
created in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Only the director of the department of revenue or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
(4) The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(5) Expenditures from the account may not exceed the balance in the
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Any individual, business, or local
governmental entity, not in the light and power business or in the gas
distribution business, may apply to the department of revenue, each
fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2004, for an investment cost recovery
incentive for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated electricity
renewable energy system installed on its property. No incentive may be
paid for kilowatt-hours generated prior to July 1, 2004.
(2)(a) Prior to submitting the application for the incentive
allowed under this section, the applicant shall submit to the
department of revenue and to the climate and rural energy development
center at the Washington State University, established under RCW
28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner prescribed by the
department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) A solar inverter and solar module manufactured in Washington
state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue shall advise the applicant in writing whether the
renewable energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section.
The department may consult with the climate and rural energy
development center to determine eligibility for the incentive.
Certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c) By August 1st of each year application for the incentive shall
be made to the department of revenue by certification in a form and
manner prescribed by the department that includes, but is not limited
to, the following information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the letter from the department of revenue stating
that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives under
this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(d) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
department shall notify the applicant in writing whether the incentive
payment will be authorized or denied. The department may consult with
the climate and rural energy development center to determine
eligibility for the incentive payment. Incentive certifications and
the information contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW
82.32.330(3)(m). The department shall authorize the payment of the
incentive from the renewable energy incentive account within seven days
of the issuance of a letter approving the incentive.
(e)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments shall keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records shall be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the department of revenue. If upon examination of any
records or from other information obtained by the department it appears
that an incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct
amount of incentive payable, the department shall assess against the
person for the amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct
amount of incentive payable and shall add thereto interest on the
amount.
(ii) The department shall notify the person by mail of the amount
due and the amount shall be paid within thirty days from the date of
the notice, or within such further time as the department may provide.
Payments received shall be deposited into the renewable energy
incentive account.
(iii) For the purposes of this section, the rate of interest to be
charged to the person shall be an average of the federal short-term
rate as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d) plus two percentage points.
The rate set for each new year shall be computed by taking an
arithmetical average to the nearest percentage point of the federal
short-term rate, compounded annually. That average shall be calculated
using the rates from four months: January, April, and July of the
calendar year immediately preceding the new year, and October of the
previous preceding year.
(iv) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the department shall authorize
additional payment. The department shall notify the person by mail of
the additional incentive to be paid and the amount shall be paid within
thirty days from the date of the notice.
(v) No adjustment to the amount of incentive paid may be made by
the department more than four years after the close of the tax year.
(vi) For any amounts that may be due the state the collection
procedures of chapter 82.32 RCW apply.
(f) The brief adjudicative proceeding procedures of RCW 34.05.482
through 34.05.494 apply to agency actions under this section.
(3) The investment cost recovery incentive shall be paid at the
following rate unless requests exceed the amount contained in the
renewable energy incentive fund:
(a) Forty-eight cents per kilowatt-hour for systems with solar
inverters and solar modules manufactured in Washington state;
(b) Twenty-five cents per kilowatt-hour for systems using wind
generators powered by blades manufactured in Washington state;
(c) Thirty-seven cents per kilowatt-hour for systems with a solar
inverter or solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(d) Twenty cents per kilowatt-hour for solar or wind equipment
manufactured outside of Washington state.
(4) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for an incentive payment that exceeds four thousand
five hundred dollars per year.
(5) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive exceed
the amount of funds available in the renewable energy incentive
account, the incentive amounts will be reduced proportionately.
(6) The climate and rural energy development center at Washington
State University energy program shall be reimbursed by the department
of revenue five percent of annual funds allocated to the fund, to apply
toward the administrative and educational expenses related to this
program. The center will establish guidelines and standards for
technologies that are identified as Washington manufactured and
therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(7) The department of revenue shall retain one percent of each
incentive payment to apply toward the administrative expenses related
to this program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---