BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the welfare of
the people of the state of Washington is positively impacted through
the encouragement and expansion of key growth industries in the state.
The legislature further finds that targeting tax incentives to focus on
key growth industries is an important strategy to enhance the state's
business climate.
A recent report by the Washington State University energy program
recognized the solar electric industry as one of the state's important
growth industries. It is of great concern that businesses in this
industry have been increasingly expanding and relocating their
operations elsewhere. The report indicates that additional incentives
for the solar electric industry are needed in recognition of the unique
forces and issues involved in business decisions in this industry.
Therefore, the legislature intends to enact comprehensive tax
incentives for the solar electric industry that address activities of
the manufacture of these products and to encourage these industries to
locate in counties with high unemployment. Tax incentives for the
solar electric industry are important in both retention and expansion
of existing business and attraction of new businesses, all of which
will strengthen this growth industry within our state, will create
jobs, and will bring many indirect benefits to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by section 3 of this act does not apply to any
person who manufactures solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules, if located in a county with an annual average unemployment
rate of greater than twelve percent in the calendar year prior to the
effective date of this act, as determined by the commissioner of the
employment security department.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(b) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(c) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules, the
amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent. For the purposes of this section, "solar energy system" has
the same meaning as contained in section 2 of this act.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing of new
buildings used for the manufacture of solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules into a solar energy system located in a county
with an annual average unemployment rate of greater than twelve percent
in the calendar year prior to the effective date of this act, as
determined by the commissioner of the employment security department,
or to sales of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as
an ingredient or component of such buildings during the course of the
constructing. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(2) To be eligible under this section the business owner must meet
the following requirements for an eight-year period, such period
beginning the day the new building commences commercial production, or
a portion of tax otherwise due shall be immediately due and payable
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The business owner must maintain at least seventy-five percent
of full employment at the new building for which the exemption under
this section is claimed.
(b) Before commencing commercial production at a new facility the
business owner must meet with the department to review projected
employment levels in the new buildings. The department, using
information provided by the taxpayer, shall make a determination of the
number of full-time positions that would be filled at full employment.
This number shall be used throughout the eight-year period to determine
whether any tax is to be repaid. This information is not subject to
the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to
the public upon request.
(c) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person
is subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A person
taking the exemption under this section must report as required under
section 8 of this act.
(3) If the employment requirement is not met for any one calendar
year, one-eighth of the exempt sales and use taxes shall be due and
payable by April 1st of the following year. The department shall
assess interest to the date the tax was imposed, but not penalties, on
the taxes for which the person is not eligible.
(4) The exemption applies to new buildings, or parts of buildings,
that are used exclusively in the manufacture of solar energy systems
using photovoltaic modules into a solar energy system located in a
county with an annual average unemployment rate of greater than twelve
percent in the calendar year prior to the effective date of this act,
as determined by the commissioner of the employment security
department, including the storage of raw materials and finished
product.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Commencement of commercial production" is deemed to have
occurred when the equipment and process qualifications in the new
building are completed and production for sale has begun; and
(b) "Full employment" is the number of positions required for full
capacity production at the new building.
(c) "Solar energy system" has the same meaning as provided in
section 2 of this act.
(6) No exemption may be taken after June 30, 2013, however all of
the eligibility criteria and limitations are applicable to any
exemptions claimed before that date.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of new buildings used for the manufacture of
solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules into a solar energy
system located in a county with an annual average unemployment rate of
greater than twelve percent in the calendar year prior to the effective
date of this act, as determined by the commissioner of the employment
security department during the course of constructing such buildings or
to labor and services rendered in respect to installing, during the
course of constructing, building fixtures not otherwise eligible for
the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565(2)(b).
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
section 4 of this act apply to this section.
(3) No exemption may be taken after June 30, 2013, however all of
the eligibility criteria and limitations are applicable to any
exemptions claimed before that date.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under section 3 of this act
for persons engaged in the business of manufacturing solar energy
systems using photovoltaic modules into a solar energy system located
in a county with an annual average unemployment rate of greater than
twelve percent in the calendar year prior to the effective date of this
act, as determined by the commissioner of the employment security
department. For the purposes of this section "solar energy system" has
the same meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.
(2)(a) The credit under this section shall equal three thousand
dollars for each full-time employment position used in manufacturing
process that takes place in a new building exempt from sales and use
tax under sections 4 and 5 of this act. A credit is earned for the
calendar year a person fills a position. Additionally a credit is
earned for each year the position is maintained over the subsequent
consecutive years, up to eight years. Those positions that are not
filled for the entire year are eligible for fifty percent of the credit
if filled less than six months, and the entire credit if filled more
than six months.
(b) To qualify for the credit, the manufacturing activity of the
person must be conducted at a new building that qualifies for the
exemption from sales and use tax under sections 4 and 5 of this act.
(3) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person is
subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In no case
may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried over to be
credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(4) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed shall be immediately due. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be retroactive to the date the tax credit was taken, and shall
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(5) A person taking the credit under this section must report under
section 8 of this act.
(6) Credits may be taken after July 1, 2004, for those buildings at
which commercial production began before June 30, 2013, subject to all
of the eligibility criteria and limitations of this section.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Machinery and equipment exempt under RCW 82.08.02565 or
82.12.02565 used in the manufacture of solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules into a solar energy system located in a county
with an annual average unemployment rate of greater than twelve percent
in the calendar year prior to the effective date of this act, as
determined by the commissioner of the employment security department at
a building exempt from sales and use tax and in compliance with the
employment requirement under sections 4 and 5 of this act are exempt
from taxation under this chapter. "Solar energy system" has the same
meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.
(2) A person seeking this exemption must make application to the
county assessor, on forms prescribed by the department.
(3) A person receiving an exemption under this section must report
in the manner prescribed in section 8 of this act.
(4) This section is effective for taxes levied for collection one
year after the effective date of this act and thereafter.
(5) This section expires December 31, 2013, for taxes levied for
collection in the following year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under section 3 of this act or
who claims an exemption or credit under section 2 or 4 through 7 of
this act, shall make an annual report to the department detailing
employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits
per job at the manufacturing site. The report shall not include names
of employees. The report shall also detail employment by the total
number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions. The first
report filed under this subsection shall include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the twelve-month period immediately before
first use of a preferential tax rate under section 3 of this act, or
tax exemption or credit under section 2 or 4 through 7 of this act.
The report is due by March 31st following any year in which a
preferential tax rate under section 3 of this act is used, or tax
exemption or credit under section 2 or 4 through 7 of this act is
taken. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection the department shall declare the amount of taxes exempted or
credited for that year to be immediately due and payable. Excise taxes
payable under this subsection are subject to interest, as provided
under this chapter. This information is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(3) By November 1, 2009, and November 1, 2012, the joint
legislative audit and review committee, in consultation with the
department, shall report to the legislature on the effectiveness of
chapter . . ., Laws of 2004 (this act) in regard to keeping Washington
competitive. The report shall measure the effect of chapter . . .,
Laws of 2004 (this act) on job retention, net jobs created for
Washington residents, company growth, diversification of the state's
economy, and other factors as the committees select. The reports shall
include a discussion of principles to apply in evaluating whether the
legislature should reenact any or all of the tax preferences in chapter
. . ., Laws of 2004 (this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---