BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.28.010 and 2002 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or person
financially interested, directly or indirectly, in such business;
whether resident or nonresident, shall have any financial interest,
direct or indirect, in any licensed retail business, unless the retail
business is owned by a corporation in which a manufacturer or importer
has no direct stock ownership and there are no interlocking officers
and directors, the retail license is held by a corporation that is not
owned directly or indirectly by a manufacturer or importer, the sales
of liquor are incidental to the primary activity of operating the
property as a hotel, alcoholic beverages produced by the manufacturer
or importer or their subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed
premises, and the board reviews the ownership and proposed method of
operation of all involved entities and determines that there will not
be an unacceptable level of control or undue influence over the
operation or the retail licensee; nor shall any manufacturer, importer,
or distributor own any of the property upon which such licensed persons
conduct their business; nor shall any such licensed person, under any
arrangement whatsoever, conduct his or her business upon property in
which any manufacturer, importer, or distributor has any interest
unless title to that property is owned by a corporation in which a
manufacturer has no direct stock ownership and there are no
interlocking officers or directors, the retail license is held by a
corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by the
manufacturer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the primary
activity of operating the property either as a hotel or as an
amphitheater offering live musical and similar live entertainment
activities to the public, alcoholic beverages produced by the
manufacturer or any of its subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed
premises, and the board reviews the ownership and proposed method of
operation of all involved entities and determines that there will not
be an unacceptable level of control or undue influence over the
operation of the retail licensee. Except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, no manufacturer, importer, or distributor shall
advance moneys or moneys' worth to a licensed person under an
arrangement, nor shall such licensed person receive, under an
arrangement, an advance of moneys or moneys' worth. "Person" as used
in this section only shall not include those state or federally
chartered banks, state or federally chartered savings and loan
associations, state or federally chartered mutual savings banks, or
institutional investors which are not controlled directly or indirectly
by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor as long as the bank,
savings and loan association, or institutional investor does not
influence or attempt to influence the purchasing practices of the
retailer with respect to alcoholic beverages. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, no manufacturer, importer, or distributor
shall be eligible to receive or hold a retail license under this title,
nor shall such manufacturer, importer, or distributor sell at retail
any liquor as herein defined. A corporation granted an exemption under
this subsection may use debt instruments issued in connection with
financing construction or operations of its facilities.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed domestic
brewery or microbrewery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to
chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on
the brewery premises and nothing in this section shall prohibit a
domestic winery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter
66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the
winery premises. Such beer and wine so sold at retail shall be subject
to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to reporting
and bonding requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted by the
board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is not
produced by the brewery or winery shall be purchased from a licensed
beer or wine distributor.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed distiller,
domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or a lessee of a
licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery, from being
licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant pursuant to chapter
66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling liquor at a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant premises on the property on which the primary
manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on contiguous property
owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted by the
board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed retail
business from having a direct or indirect financial interest in a
manufacturer, or a manufacturer from having a direct or indirect
financial interest in a licensed retail business, as long as the
licensed retail business does not sell any liquor manufactured,
directly or indirectly, by the manufacturer.
(2) Financial interest, direct or indirect, as used in this
section, shall include any interest, whether by stock ownership,
mortgage, lien, or through interlocking directors, or otherwise.
Pursuant to rules promulgated by the board in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW manufacturers, distributors, and importers may perform, and
retailers may accept the service of building, rotating and restocking
case displays and stock room inventories; rotating and rearranging can
and bottle displays of their own products; provide point of sale
material and brand signs; price case goods of their own brands; and
perform such similar normal business services as the board may by
regulation prescribe.
(3)(a) This section does not prohibit a manufacturer, importer, or
distributor from providing services to a special occasion licensee for:
(i) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising,
(ii) advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer or
wine tasting exhibition or judging event, or (iii) a special occasion
licensee from receiving any such services as may be provided by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit a retail licensee, or any person financially interested,
directly or indirectly, in such a retail licensee from having a
financial interest, direct or indirect, in a business which provides,
for a compensation commensurate in value to the services provided,
bottling, canning or other services to a manufacturer, so long as the
retail licensee or person interested therein has no direct financial
interest in or control of said manufacturer.
(b) A person holding contractual rights to payment from selling a
liquor distributor's business and transferring the license shall not be
deemed to have a financial interest under this section if the person
(i) lacks any ownership in or control of the distributor, (ii) is not
employed by the distributor, and (iii) does not influence or attempt to
influence liquor purchases by retail liquor licensees from the
distributor.
(c) The board shall adopt such rules as are deemed necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this
section in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW.
(4) A license issued under RCW 66.24.395 does not constitute a
retail license for the purposes of this section.
(5) A public house license issued under RCW 66.24.580 does not
violate the provisions of this section as to a retailer having an
interest directly or indirectly in a liquor-licensed manufacturer.

--- END ---