BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.037 and 2000 c 107 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may acquire by gift, easement, purchase, lease,
or condemnation lands, buildings, water rights, rights of way, or other
necessary property, and construct and maintain necessary facilities for
purposes consistent with this title. The commission may authorize the
director to acquire property under this section, but the power of
condemnation may only be exercised by the director when an
appropriation has been made by the legislature for the acquisition of
a specific property, except to clear title and acquire access rights of
way.
(2) For any acquisition of property for the purpose of habitat
enhancement or preservation, the commission must make publicly
available the following information:
(a) The purpose of site acquisition, including a list of species
targeted to benefit from the acquisition;
(b) A site habitat assessment that includes existing habitat types
and species presence;
(c) An evaluation of the habitat value of the site in relation to
other habitat within the watershed;
(d) The anticipated benefits to target species of site habitat
preservation or enhancement; and
(e) The proposed public use of the property after acquisition.
(3) The commission may sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions
upon real or personal property under the control of the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.85.130 and 2000 c 107 s 102 and 2000 c 15 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The salmon recovery funding board shall develop procedures and
criteria for allocation of funds for salmon habitat projects and salmon
recovery activities on a statewide basis to address the highest
priorities for salmon habitat protection and restoration. To the
extent practicable the board shall adopt an annual allocation of
funding. The allocation should address both protection and restoration
of habitat, and should recognize the varying needs in each area of the
state on an equitable basis. The board has the discretion to partially
fund, or to fund in phases, salmon habitat projects. The board may
annually establish a maximum amount of funding available for any
individual project, subject to available funding. No projects required
solely as a mitigation or a condition of permitting are eligible for
funding.
(2)(a) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall give preference to projects that:
(i) Are based upon the limiting factors analysis identified under
RCW 77.85.060;
(ii) Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery based upon the
stock status information contained in the department of fish and
wildlife salmonid stock inventory (SASSI), the salmon and steelhead
habitat inventory and assessment project (SSHIAP), and any comparable
science-based assessment when available;
(iii) Will benefit listed species and other fish species; and
(iv) Will preserve high quality salmonid habitat.
(b) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall also give consideration to projects that:
(i) Are the most cost-effective;
(ii) Have the greatest matched or in-kind funding; and
(iii) Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of
project implementation.
(3) The board must evaluate the following information for any
proposed project that includes land acquisition:
(a) The purpose of site acquisition, including a list of salmon
species targeted to benefit from the acquisition;
(b) A site habitat assessment that includes existing habitat types
and salmon presence;
(c) An evaluation of the habitat value of the site in relation to
other habitat within the watershed;
(d) The anticipated benefits to target species of site habitat
preservation or enhancement; and
(e) The proposed public use of the property after acquisition.
(4) The board may reject, but not add, projects from a habitat
project list submitted by a lead entity for funding.
(((4))) (5) For fiscal year 2000, the board may authorize the
interagency review team to evaluate, rank, and make funding decisions
for categories of projects or activities or from funding sources
provided for categories of projects or activities. In delegating such
authority the board shall consider the review team's staff resources,
procedures, and technical capacity to meet the purposes and objectives
of this chapter. The board shall maintain general oversight of the
team's exercise of such authority.
(((5))) (6) The board shall seek the guidance of the technical
review team to ensure that scientific principles and information are
incorporated into the allocation standards and into proposed projects
and activities. If the technical review team determines that a habitat
project list complies with the critical pathways methodology under RCW
77.85.060, it shall provide substantial weight to the list's project
priorities when making determinations among applications for funding of
projects within the area covered by the list.
(((6))) (7) The board shall establish criteria for determining when
block grants may be made to a lead entity or other recognized regional
recovery entity consistent with one or more habitat project lists
developed for that region. Where a lead entity has been established
pursuant to RCW 77.85.050, the board may provide grants to the lead
entity to assist in carrying out lead entity functions under this
chapter, subject to available funding. The board shall determine an
equitable minimum amount of funds for each region, and shall distribute
the remainder of funds on a competitive basis.
(((7))) (8) The board may waive or modify portions of the
allocation procedures and standards adopted under this section in the
award of grants or loans to conform to legislative appropriations
directing an alternative award procedure or when the funds to be
awarded are from federal or other sources requiring other allocation
procedures or standards as a condition of the board's receipt of the
funds. The board shall develop an integrated process to manage the
allocation of funding from federal and state sources to minimize delays
in the award of funding while recognizing the differences in state and
legislative appropriation timing.
(((8))) (9) The board may award a grant or loan for a salmon
recovery project on private or public land when the landowner has a
legal obligation under local, state, or federal law to perform the
project, when expedited action provides a clear benefit to salmon
recovery, and there will be harm to salmon recovery if the project is
delayed. For purposes of this subsection, a legal obligation does not
include a project required solely as a mitigation or a condition of
permitting.
(((9))) (10) The board may condition a grant or loan to include the
requirement that property may only be transferred to a federal agency
if the agency that will acquire the property agrees to comply with all
terms of the grant or loan to which the project sponsor was obligated.
Property acquired or improved by a project sponsor may be conveyed to
a federal agency, but only if the agency agrees to comply with all
terms of the grant or loan to which the project sponsor was obligated.

--- END ---