BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The courts having concluded that citizens
have a reasonable expectation under Article I, section 7 of the
Washington state Constitution that their vehicles will not be remotely
tracked without authority of law, the legislature adopts this law to
specifically authorize law enforcement's use of tracking equipment in
or on vehicles or other objects. The legislature intends this law to
be governed by and interpreted in light of all general principles and
doctrines of search law, including exceptions to the warrant
requirement, as now or hereafter applicable in this state.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.79.015 and 2003 c 53 s 94 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any such magistrate, when satisfied that there is ((reasonable))
probable cause, may also, upon like ((complaint)) application made on
oath, issue search warrant in the following cases, to wit:
(1) To search for and seize any counterfeit or spurious coin, or
forged instruments, or tools, machines or materials, prepared or
provided for making either of them.
(2) To search for and seize any gaming apparatus used or kept, and
to be used in any unlawful gaming house, or in any building, apartment
or place, resorted to for the purpose of unlawful gaming.
(3) To search for and seize any evidence material to the
investigation or prosecution of any homicide or any felony: PROVIDED,
That if the evidence is sought to be secured from any radio or
television station or from any regularly published newspaper, magazine
or wire service, or from any employee of such station, wire service or
publication, the evidence shall be secured only through a subpoena
duces tecum unless: (a) There is probable cause to believe that the
person or persons in possession of the evidence may be involved in the
crime under investigation; or (b) there is probable cause to believe
that the evidence sought to be seized will be destroyed or hidden if
subpoena duces tecum procedures are followed. As used in this
subsection, "person or persons" includes both natural and judicial
persons.
(4) To search for and seize any instrument, apparatus, or device
used to obtain telephone or telegraph service in violation of RCW
9.26A.110 or 9.26A.115.
(5)(a) To install tracking equipment in or on any object within ten
days; to maintain, use, and monitor that tracking equipment for periods
not longer than thirty days; and to remove that equipment after
authority to monitor ends, PROVIDED, That the application describes the
object into or onto which the equipment is to be installed, and that
probable cause exists to believe that use of the equipment will lead to
evidence of a crime, contraband, fruits of crime, things criminally
possessed, weapons, other things by means of which a crime has been
committed, is being committed, or reasonably appears about to be
committed, or will lead to learning the location of a person who is
unlawfully restrained or reasonably believed to be a victim in a
criminal investigation, or for whose arrest there is probable cause.
Warrant authority under this section shall state the time period or
number of days the use of the equipment is authorized.
(b) Tracking equipment may be installed, maintained, and monitored
for up to forty-eight hours without a warrant if exigent circumstances
exist at the time the equipment is installed.
(c) A magistrate of a municipal or district court may issue a
warrant to install tracking equipment only within the magistrate's
jurisdiction. The tracking equipment may be maintained, used, and
monitored anywhere within this state.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Tracking equipment" includes all electronic or mechanical
devices, whether using radio frequency, global positioning, or other
technology, used to determine the location, status, movement, and/or
direction of travel of the object into or onto which the equipment is
placed without direct visual observation of the object.
(ii) "Maintain" includes all activity necessary to monitor, repair,
or assure continued operability of tracking equipment.
(iii) "Monitor" includes all forms of detecting, obtaining, and
recording information from the operation of tracking equipment and all
information regarding the status and condition of the tracking
equipment, except those that involve direct observation of the tracking
equipment or the object into or onto which the tracking equipment is
installed.
(6) A warrant issued under this section must be supported by an
affidavit, a document as provided in RCW 9A.72.085, or sworn testimony
establishing the grounds for issuing the warrant. The sworn testimony
may be an electronically recorded telephonic statement or a combination
of written material and an electronically recorded telephonic
statement. The recording or a duplication of the recording shall be a
part of the court record and shall be transcribed if requested by a
party if there is a challenge to the validity of the warrant or if
ordered by the court. The evidence in support of the finding of
probable cause shall be preserved and shall be subject to
constitutional limitations for such determinations and may be hearsay
in whole or in part. If the court finds that probable cause for the
issuance of a warrant under this section exists, it shall issue a
warrant or direct an individual whom it authorizes for such purpose to
affix the court's signature to a warrant authorizing any peace officer
to conduct the authorized search.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.79.020 and Code 1881 s 969 are each amended to read
as follows:
A search warrant authorized by this chapter may be issued by the
court upon request of a peace officer or a prosecuting attorney. All
such warrants shall be directed to the sheriff of the county, or his
deputy, or to any ((constable)) peace officer of the county, commanding
such officer:
(1) In the case of warrants to seize property or persons, to search
the house or place where the stolen property or other things for which
he is required to search are believed to be concealed, which place and
property, or things to be searched for shall be designated and
described in the warrant, and to bring such stolen property or other
things, when found, and the person in whose possession the same shall
be found, before the magistrate who shall issue the warrant, or before
some other magistrate or court having cognizance of the case; or
(2) In the case of warrants for tracking equipment, to install the
equipment into or onto the object to be tracked; to maintain, service,
and monitor the equipment; and upon conclusion of warrant authority to
remove the equipment and report the results of use of the equipment to
the magistrate who issued the warrant, or to some other magistrate or
court having cognizance of the case. This report supersedes and
replaces any reporting requirement under CrR 2.3(d) and CrRLJ 2.3(d) as
currently written or hereafter amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---