BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.06.092 and 1981 c 338 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any gubernatorial appointee subject to senate confirmation
shall continue to serve only until rejected by a vote of the senate or
until the conclusion of the second regularly scheduled legislative
session after his or her appointment unless ((rejected)) confirmed by
a vote of the senate. An appointee who is rejected by a vote of the
senate shall not be reappointed to the same position for a period of
one year from termination of service.
(2) Any person appointed by the governor to fill the unexpired term
of an appointment subject to senate confirmation must also be confirmed
by the senate.

--- END ---