BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Education is the most important function of Washington state
and is essential to the economic health, cultural diversity, civic
vitality, and political well-being of the state and the nation;
(2) There is significant evidence that citizens benefit by having
an opportunity to access the education and training that will allow
them to grow personally and professionally, address their future
economic needs and those of their families, and to contribute to the
healthy future of not only themselves and their families but also to
the community at large;
(3) Research supports that children's chances to succeed in school
increase if they participate in high quality preschool and early
childhood education programs;
(4) Our public schools, through education reform, are expected to
prepare an evergrowing number of high school graduates for entry into
postsecondary education or the increasingly competitive work
environment. Improving K-12 education will also reduce the need for
remedial education at our colleges and universities;
(5) The state will need to provide higher education opportunities
for at least a projected thirty-three thousand six hundred more
citizens by the year 2010 just to maintain current postsecondary
participation rates;
(6) A growing number of citizens affected by the fluctuations in
the economic climate and shifts in employment opportunities enter and
reenter the state's educational institutions to prepare for
participation in the rapidly changing workplace;
(7) Washington's citizens would be better served through access to
high quality education without institutional or organizational barriers
to ensure smooth progress through all levels of education they desire;
and
(8) Washington does not have a seamless education system nor does
it have a system of coordinated education planning. Collaboration and
coordination among all sectors of education including but not limited
to prekindergarten, the K-12 system, the community and technical
college system, the four-year college and universities, and the
independent colleges and private career schools is essential to develop
an educated citizenry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The senate committees on education and
higher education and the house of representatives committees on
education and higher education shall work collaboratively to study and
make recommendations on creating a master plan for education from
prekindergarten through university. The work of the committees will be
to develop recommendations to the legislature on developing a plan to
support students' needs, focusing on the organization and management of
delivery systems, to achieve the goal of eliminating barriers to a
seamless education. The recommendations will address but not be
limited to issues of access, achievement, accountability,
affordability, and quality of our schools and institutions of higher
education. In developing the recommendations, the committees shall
involve interested parties including but not limited to: Educators
including staff, faculty, administration, and governing board members,
from both the public and private sector; regional and national public
policy groups and state organizations; advocacy groups; researchers;
business and labor leaders; community leaders; parents; and students.
An interim report shall be completed by December 1, 2004. The final
report shall be completed by December 1, 2005, if needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislative work group shall use
legislative facilities and staff from senate committee services and the
office of program research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires December 31, 2005.

--- END ---