BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.148.005 and 1990 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Final regulations adopted by the United States environmental
protection agency (EPA) require owners and operators of underground
petroleum storage tanks to demonstrate financial responsibility for
accidental releases of petroleum as a precondition to continued
ownership and operation of such tanks;
(b) Financial responsibility is demonstrated through the purchase
of pollution liability insurance or an acceptable alternative such as
coverage under a state financial responsibility program, in the amount
of at least five hundred thousand dollars per occurrence and one
million dollars annual aggregate depending upon the nature, use, and
number of tanks owned or operated;
(c) Many owners and operators of underground petroleum storage
tanks cannot purchase pollution liability insurance either because
private insurance is unavailable at any price or because owners and
operators cannot meet the rigid underwriting standards of existing
insurers, nor can many owners and operators meet the strict regulatory
standards imposed for alternatives to the purchase of insurance; and
(d) Without a state financial responsibility program for owners and
operators of underground petroleum storage tanks, many tank owners and
operators will be forced to discontinue the ownership and operation of
these tanks.
(2) The purpose of this chapter is to create a state financial
responsibility program meeting EPA standards for owners and operators
of underground petroleum storage tanks in a manner that:
(a) Minimizes state involvement in pollution liability claims
management and insurance administration;
(b) Protects the state of Washington from unwanted and
unanticipated liability for accidental release claims;
(c) Creates incentives for private insurers to provide needed
liability insurance; and
(d) Parallels generally accepted principles of insurance and risk
management.
To that end, this chapter establishes a ((temporary)) program to
provide pollution liability reinsurance at a price that will encourage
a private insurance company or risk retention group to sell pollution
liability insurance in accordance with the requirements of this chapter
to owners and operators of underground petroleum storage tanks, thereby
allowing the owners and operators to comply with the financial
responsibility regulations of the EPA.
(3) It is not the intent of this chapter to permit owners and
operators of underground petroleum storage tanks to obtain pollution
liability insurance without regard to the quality or condition of their
storage tanks or without regard to the risk management practices of
tank owners and operators, nor is it the intent of this chapter to
provide coverage or funding for past or existing petroleum releases.
Further, it is the intent of the legislature that the program follow
generally accepted insurance underwriting and actuarial principles and
to deviate from those principles only to the extent necessary and
within the tax revenue limits provided, to make pollution liability
insurance reasonably affordable and available to owners and operators
who meet the requirements of this chapter, particularly to those owners
and operators whose underground storage tanks meet a vital economic
need within the affected community.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.148.020 and 1999 c 73 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The pollution liability insurance program trust account is
established in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds
appropriated for this chapter and all premiums collected for
reinsurance shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter
including payment of costs of administering the pollution liability
insurance and underground storage tank community assistance programs.
Expenditures for payment of administrative and operating costs of the
agency are subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW
and may be made only after appropriation by statute. No appropriation
is required for other expenditures from the account.
(2) Each calendar quarter, the director shall report to the
insurance commissioner the loss and surplus reserves required for the
calendar quarter. The director shall notify the department of revenue
of this amount by the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter.
(3) ((Each calendar quarter the director shall determine the amount
of reserves necessary to fund commitments made to provide financial
assistance under RCW 70.148.130 to the extent that the financial
assistance reserves do not jeopardize the operations and liabilities of
the pollution liability insurance program. The director shall notify
the department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of each
calendar quarter. The director may immediately establish an initial
financial assistance reserve of five million dollars from available
revenues. The director may not expend more than fifteen million
dollars for the financial assistance program.
(4))) This section expires June 1, ((2001 [2007])) 2007.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.149.010 and 1995 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a ((temporary))
regulatory program to assist owners and operators of heating oil tanks.
The legislature finds that it is in the best interests of all citizens
for heating oil tanks to be operated safely and for tank leaks or
spills to be dealt with expeditiously. The legislature further finds
that it is necessary to protect tank owners from the financial hardship
related to damaged heating oil tanks. The problem is especially acute
because owners and operators of heating oil tanks used for space
heating have been unable to obtain pollution liability insurance or
insurance has been unaffordable.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.149.040 and 1997 c 8 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall:
(1) Design a program for providing pollution liability insurance
for heating oil tanks that provides up to sixty thousand dollars per
occurrence coverage and aggregate limits, and protects the state of
Washington from unwanted or unanticipated liability for accidental
release claims;
(2) Administer, implement, and enforce the provisions of this
chapter. To assist in administration of the program, the director is
authorized to appoint up to two employees who are exempt from the civil
service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, and who shall serve at the pleasure of
the director;
(3) Administer the heating oil pollution liability trust account,
as established under RCW 70.149.070;
(4) Employ and discharge, at his or her discretion, agents,
attorneys, consultants, companies, organizations, and employees as
deemed necessary, and to prescribe their duties and powers, and fix
their compensation;
(5) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the provisions of this chapter;
(6) Design and from time to time revise a reinsurance contract
providing coverage to an insurer or insurers meeting the requirements
of this chapter. The director is authorized to provide reinsurance
through the pollution liability insurance program trust account;
(7) Solicit bids from insurers and select an insurer to provide
pollution liability insurance for third-party bodily injury and
property damage, and corrective action to owners and operators of
heating oil tanks;
(8) Register, and design a means of accounting for, operating
heating oil tanks;
(9) Implement a program to provide advice and technical assistance
to owners and operators of active and abandoned heating oil tanks if
contamination from an active or abandoned heating oil tank is
suspected. Advice and assistance regarding administrative and
technical requirements may include observation of testing or site
assessment and review of the results of reports. If the director finds
that contamination is not present or that the contamination is
apparently minor and not a threat to human health or the environment,
the director may provide written opinions and conclusions on the
results of the investigation to owners and operators of active and
abandoned heating oil tanks. The agency is authorized to collect, from
persons requesting advice and assistance, the costs incurred by the
agency in providing such advice and assistance. The costs may include
travel costs and expenses associated with review of reports and
preparation of written opinions and conclusions. Funds from cost
reimbursement must be deposited in the heating oil pollution liability
trust account. The state of Washington, the pollution liability
insurance agency, and its officers and employees are immune from all
liability, and no cause of action arises from any act or omission in
providing, or failing to provide, such advice, opinion, conclusion, or
assistance; ((and))
(10) Establish a public information program to provide information
regarding liability, technical, and environmental requirements
associated with active and abandoned heating oil tanks;
(11) Monitor agency expenditures and seek to minimize costs and
maximize benefits to ensure responsible financial stewardship;
(12) Create an advisory committee of stakeholders to advise the
director on all aspects of program operations and fees authorized by
this chapter. The committee should meet at least quarterly, or more
frequently at the discretion of the director; and
(13) If necessary, adopt appropriate user fees to supplement
program funding.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.149.070 and 1997 c 8 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The heating oil pollution liability trust account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the pollution
liability insurance fee collected under RCW 70.149.080 and reinsurance
premiums shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the purposes set out under this chapter.
Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
Any residue in the account shall be transferred at the end of the
((biennium)) calendar year to the pollution liability insurance program
trust account.
(2) Money in the account may be used by the director for the
following purposes:
(a) Corrective action costs;
(b) Third-party liability claims;
(c) Costs associated with claims administration;
(d) Purchase of an insurance policy to cover all registered heating
oil tanks, and reinsurance of the policy; and
(e) Administrative expenses of the program, including personnel,
equipment, supplies, and providing advice and technical assistance.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.149.080 and 1995 c 20 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A pollution liability insurance fee of ((six-tenths of one)) up
to one and two-tenths cents per gallon of heating oil purchased within
the state shall be imposed on every special fuel dealer, as the term is
defined in chapter 82.38 RCW, making sales of heating oil to a user or
consumer.
(2) The pollution liability insurance fee shall be remitted by the
special fuel dealer to the department of licensing ((with payment of
the special fuel dealer tax)).
(3) The fee proceeds shall be used for the specific regulatory
purposes of this chapter.
(4) The fee imposed by this section shall not apply to heating oil
exported or sold for export from the state.

--- END ---