BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that Washington state currently derives
many benefits from its renewable energy and energy efficiency sectors.
These sectors are an important source of employment and income for a
significant number of Washington residents, currently generating close
to one billion dollars in annual revenue and employing over three
thousand eight hundred people. Equally important, energy efficiency
and renewable energy businesses add to the region's quality of life by
employing technologies that can reduce some of the harmful effects of
the reliance on fossil fuels. Washington state possesses all the
necessary elements to do much more to develop these sectors and to
become a national leader in the research, development, manufacturing,
and marketing of clean energy technologies and services. The state's
work force is highly educated; the state's higher education
institutions are supportive of clean energy research and cooperate
closely with the private sector in developing and deploying new energy
technologies; there are numerous enterprises already located in the
state that are engaged in clean energy research and development; and
the state's citizens, utilities, and governmental sectors at all levels
are committed to diversifying the state's energy sources and increasing
energy efficiency.
(2) It is therefore declared to be the policy of the state that its
public agencies and institutions of higher learning maximize their
efforts collectively and cooperatively with the private sector to
establish the state as a leader in clean energy research, development,
manufacturing, and marketing. To this end, all state agencies are
directed to employ their existing authorities and responsibilities to:
(a) Work with local organizations and energy companies to
facilitate the development and implementation of workable renewable
energy and energy efficiency projects;
(b) Actively promote policies that support energy efficiency and
renewable energy development;
(c) Encourage utilities and customer groups to invest in new
renewables and products and services that promote energy efficiency;
and
(d) Assist in the development of stronger markets for renewables
and products and services that promote energy efficiency.
(3) For the purposes of this section and section 2 of this act and
for RCW 28B.20.285 and 28B.20.287, energy efficiency shall include the
application of digital technologies to the generation, delivery, and
use of power.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington technology center, through its northwest energy
technology collaborative, shall provide a forum for public and private
collaborative initiatives to promote renewable energy and energy
efficiency sectors in Washington state and the Pacific Northwest. The
center shall seek to integrate the initiatives of the northwest energy
technology collaborative into existing state programs and initiatives,
including grant programs administered by the center, and energy
efficiency business development projects and energy assistance programs
of the department of community, trade, and economic development.
(2) The center, through its northwest energy technology
collaborative, shall develop and implement a strategic plan for public
and private collaboration in renewable energy and energy efficiency
business development. The center, together with the department, shall
prepare an initial draft of a statewide strategic plan and circulate it
widely among businesses and individuals in these sectors for review and
comment. The center shall also organize a summit of public and private
sector interests to further developments of the proposed strategic
plan. The plan shall address, among other things, the role that public
sector policies, programs, and expenditures may play in promoting these
economic sectors, including subjects such as work force development,
education, tax incentives, economic development assistance, public
sector energy purchases, public sector construction standards,
transportation, and land use regulation and zoning. The strategic plan
shall include recommendations for legislative and administrative policy
changes and for legislative appropriations. The plan shall also
recommend proposals for capital and operating investments in public
higher education facilities, proposals for creating and strengthening
public and private partnerships, and proposals for federal financial
assistance and expenditures for research and development programs in
Washington state. The finalized strategic plan shall be provided to
the governor and to the appropriate committees of the senate and house
of representatives by January 1, 2005.
(3) The strategic plan required by subsection (2) of this section
may be incorporated into the center's five-year strategic plan required
by RCW 28B.20.289(3)(f).

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.20.285 and 2003 c 403 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
A Washington technology center is created to be a collaborative
effort between the state's universities, private industry, and
government. The technology center shall be headquartered at the
University of Washington. The mission of the technology center shall
be to perform and commercialize research on a statewide basis that
benefits the intermediate and long-term economic vitality of the state
of Washington, and to develop and strengthen university-industry
relationships through the conduct of research that is primarily of
interest to Washington-based companies or state economic development
programs. The technology center shall:
(1) Perform and/or facilitate research supportive of state science
and technology objectives, particularly as they relate to state
industries;
(2) Provide leading edge collaborative research and technology
transfer opportunities primarily to state industries;
(3) Provide substantial opportunities for training undergraduate
and graduate students through direct involvement in research and
industry interactions;
(4) Emphasize and develop nonstate support of the technology
center's research activities;
(5) Administer the investing in innovation grants program;
(6) Through its northwest energy technology collaborative, carry
out the activities required by section 2 of this act; and
(((6))) (7) Provide a forum for effective interaction between the
state's technology-based industries and its academic research
institutions through promotion of faculty collaboration with industry,
particularly within the state.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.20.287 and 1992 c 142 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28B.20.285 and 28B.20.289 through
28B.20.295.
(1) "Technology center" means the Washington technology center,
including the affiliated staff, faculty, facilities, and research
centers operated by the technology center.
(2) "Board" means the board of directors of the Washington
technology center.
(3) "High technology" or "technology" includes but is not limited
to the modernization, miniaturization, integration, and computerization
of electronic, hydraulic, pneumatic, laser, mechanical, robotics,
nuclear, chemical, telecommunication, and other technological
applications to enhance productivity in areas including but not limited
to manufacturing, communications, medicine, bioengineering, renewable
energy and energy efficiency, and commerce.

--- END ---