BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) By June 30, 2005, the department of
natural resources shall transfer from trust status: (a) Certain
agricultural college trust lands and scientific school trust lands, as
determined on June 30, 2004, by Washington State University, with a
value of not less than sixty percent of the appropriation in section 5
of this act; (b) certain university trust lands, as determined on June
30, 2004, by the University of Washington, with a value of not less
than twenty percent of the appropriation in section 5 of this act; and
(c) certain normal school trust lands, as determined on June 30, 2004,
by Eastern Washington University, Central Washington University,
Western Washington University, and The Evergreen State College, with a
value of not less than twenty percent of the appropriation in section
5 of this act. Lands transferred from trust status are to be managed
as public land by the department pursuant to section 3 of this act.
(2) Lands and resources transferred under this section shall be
appraised and transferred at fair market value. The value of the land
and resources transferred shall be deposited by the department of
natural resources to the appropriate permanent fund in the same manner
as revenues from other trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the
resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040.
(3) All reasonable costs incurred by the department of natural
resources to implement this section may be paid out of the
appropriation in section 5 of this act. Authorized costs include the
actual cost of appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys,
and other similar costs.
(4) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department of natural resources shall execute and record a real
property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the
purposes identified in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.02 RCW
to read as follows:
Any normal school lands, agricultural college lands, scientific
school lands or university lands that are transferred from trust
status, and for which the trust is fully compensated for the fair
market value of the lands, shall be managed as other state lands
pursuant to section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Land purchased, transferred, or otherwise acquired by gift or
exchange under section 2 of this act shall be managed in perpetuity and
in the same manner as state lands for sustainable commercial forestry
and multiple use of lands consistent with RCW 79.10.120.
(2) The land is reserved from sale, except that the timber and
other products on the land may be sold, or the land may be leased in
the same manner and for the same purposes as authorized for state
granted lands if the department finds the sale or lease to be in the
best interest of the state and approves the terms and conditions of the
sale or lease.
(3) The land exchange and acquisition powers provided in RCW
79.17.020 may be used by the department to reposition land.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.64.110 and 2003 c 334 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any moneys derived from the lease of state forest lands or from the
sale of valuable materials, oils, gases, coal, minerals, or fossils
from those lands, must be distributed as follows:
(1) State forest lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040 or by
exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040:
(a) The expense incurred by the state for administration,
reforestation, and protection, not to exceed twenty-five percent, which
rate of percentage shall be determined by the board, must be returned
to the forest development account in the state general fund.
(b) Any balance remaining must be paid to the county in which the
land is located to be paid, distributed, and prorated, except as
otherwise provided in this section, to the various funds in the same
manner as general taxes are paid and distributed during the year of
payment.
(c) Any balance remaining, paid to a county with a population of
less than sixteen thousand, must first be applied to the reduction of
any indebtedness existing in the current expense fund of the county
during the year of payment.
(d) With regard to moneys remaining under this subsection (1),
within seven working days of receipt of these moneys, the department
shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed to
the counties. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the
counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each
payment date.
(2) State forest lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010 or by
exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010, except as provided
in RCW 79.64.120:
(a) Fifty percent shall be placed in the forest development
account.
(b) Fifty percent shall be prorated and distributed to the state
general fund, to be dedicated for the benefit of the public schools,
and the county in which the land is located according to the relative
proportions of tax levies of all taxing districts in the county. The
portion to be distributed to the state general fund shall be based on
the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065 and the levy rate for
any maintenance and operation special school levies. With regard to
the portion to be distributed to the counties, the department shall
certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be distributed within
seven working days of receipt of the money. The state treasurer shall
distribute funds to the counties four times per month, with no more
than ten days between each payment date. The money distributed to the
county must be paid, distributed, and prorated to the various other
funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid and distributed
during the year of payment.
(3) State forest lands acquired through section 3 of this act:
(a) Twenty-five percent shall be placed in the forest development
account; and
(b) Seventy-five percent shall be distributed to the state general
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of one hundred million dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the
Gardner-Evans higher education construction account to the department
of natural resources for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, solely
for the purposes of section 1 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.14H.110 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 18 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
The Gardner-Evans higher education construction account is created
in the state treasury. Proceeds from the bonds issued under RCW
28B.14H.020 shall be deposited in the account. The account shall be
used for purposes of RCW 28B.14H.020 and transferring from trust status
certain trust lands granted to the state for the benefit of
institutions of higher education. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation.

--- END ---