BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that the law enforcement memorial
license plate has been reviewed by the special license plate review
board as specified in chapter 196, Laws of 2003, and was found to fully
comply with all provisions of chapter 196, Laws of 2003.
(2) The department shall issue a special license plate displaying
a symbol, approved by the special license plate review board, honoring
law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty. The
special license plate may be used in lieu of regular or personalized
license plates for vehicles required to display one or two vehicle
license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW,
upon the terms and conditions established by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
"Law enforcement memorial license plates" means license plates
issued under section 1 of this act that display a symbol honoring law
enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a fee for each type of special
license plates issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as
existing before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in
an amount calculated to offset the cost of production of the special
license plates and the administration of this program. Until December
31, 1997, the fee shall not exceed thirty-five dollars, but effective
with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998, the
department may adjust the fee to no more than forty dollars. This fee
is in addition to all other fees required to register and license the
vehicle for which the plates have been requested. All such additional
special license plate fees collected by the department shall be
deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle fund.
(2) Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes
required to be paid upon application, registration, and renewal
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct
an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(3) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 1998, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
collegiate license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars.
The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be
remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the
funds to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in
RCW 28B.10.890.
(4) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 1999, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate
license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under
this subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by
it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the
state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report. The state
treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate collegiate license
plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.
(5) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
special baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be distributed to
a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium, as
defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(6) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 1999, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special
baseball stadium license plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be distributed
to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and interest
payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball stadium,
as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.
(7) Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on
January 1, 2005, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid
upon application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a
"law enforcement memorial" license plate shall pay an initial fee of
forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with
a proper identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the
state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account
until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for
the cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under section 4 of this act.
(8) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January
1, 2006, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
renewal of a motor vehicle registration, the holder of a "law
enforcement memorial" license plate shall, upon application, pay a fee
of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with
a proper identifying detailed report. Pursuant to RCW 46.16.755, the
state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor vehicle account
until the department determines that the state has been reimbursed for
the cost of implementing the law enforcement memorial special license
plate. Upon the determination by the department that the state has
been reimbursed, the treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the law
enforcement memorial account established under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The law enforcement memorial account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. Upon the department's determination that the
state has been reimbursed for the cost of implementing the law
enforcement memorial special license plate, all receipts, except as
provided in RCW 46.16.313 (7) and (8), from law enforcement memorial
license plates must be deposited into the account. Only the director
of the department of licensing or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(2) Funds in the account must be disbursed subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Pursuant to the requirements set out in RCW 46.16.765 the
department must contract with a qualified nonprofit organization to
provide support and assistance to survivors and families of law
enforcement officers in Washington killed in the line of duty and to
organize, finance, fund, construct, utilize, and maintain a memorial on
the state capitol grounds to honor those fallen officers.
(b) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified nonprofit
organization" means a not-for-profit corporation incorporated and
operating exclusively in Washington that has received a determination
of tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code. The organization must have been established for the
express purposes of providing support and assistance to the survivors
and families of law enforcement officers in Washington killed in the
line of duty and to organize, finance, fund, construct, utilize, and
maintain a memorial on the state capitol grounds to honor those fallen
officers.
(c) The qualified nonprofit must meet all requirements set out in
RCW 46.16.765.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates under section 1 of this act or RCW 46.16.301 as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, sells,
trades, or otherwise transfers or releases ownership of the vehicle
upon which the special license plate or plates have been displayed, he
or she shall immediately report the transfer of such plate or plates to
an acquired vehicle or vehicle eligible for such plates pursuant to
departmental rule, or he or she shall surrender such plates to the
department immediately if such surrender is required by departmental
rule. If a person applies for a transfer of the plate or plates to
another eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of five dollars shall be
charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such transfer fees
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to surrender the
plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

--- END ---