BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
After initial vehicle registration, motor vehicles operated solely
within a national recreation area that is not accessible by a state
highway are exempt from the annual registration renewal fee under RCW
46.16.0621.

--- END ---