BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the state's
paramount duty to provide a basic education to all students residing in
Washington. The legislature further recognizes that uninterrupted
service of educational employees is vital to the welfare of the state,
and that such uninterrupted service must be ensured. The legislature
acknowledges that the state's courts have long considered strikes by
public employees, including teachers, to be unlawful, and in order to
ensure that no student is denied his or her constitutional right to a
basic education, the legislature affirms that strikes by public
employees are unlawful.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.59.020 and 1989 c 11 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) The term "employee organization" means any organization, union,
association, agency, committee, council, or group of any kind in which
employees participate, and which exists for the purpose, in whole or in
part, of collective bargaining with employers.
(2) The term "collective bargaining" or "bargaining" means the
performance of the mutual obligation of the representatives of the
employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at
reasonable times in light of the time limitations of the budget-making
process, and to bargain in good faith in an effort to reach agreement
with respect to the wages, hours, and terms and conditions of
employment: PROVIDED, That prior law, practice or interpretation shall
be neither restrictive, expansive, nor determinative with respect to
the scope of bargaining. A written contract incorporating any
agreements reached shall be executed if requested by either party. The
obligation to bargain does not compel either party to agree to a
proposal or to make a concession.
In the event of a dispute between an employer and an exclusive
bargaining representative over the matters that are terms and
conditions of employment, the commission shall decide which item(s) are
mandatory subjects for bargaining and which item(s) are nonmandatory.
(3) The term "commission" means the public employment relations
commission established by RCW 41.58.010.
(4) The terms "employee" and "educational employee" means any
certificated employee of a school district, except:
(a) The chief executive officer of the employer.
(b) The chief administrative officers of the employer, which shall
mean the superintendent of the district, deputy superintendents,
administrative assistants to the superintendent, assistant
superintendents, and business manager. Title variation from all
positions enumerated in this subsection (b) may be appealed to the
commission for determination of inclusion in, or exclusion from, the
term "educational employee".
(c) Confidential employees, which shall mean:
(i) Any person who participates directly on behalf of an employer
in the formulation of labor relations policy, the preparation for or
conduct of collective bargaining, or the administration of collective
bargaining agreements, except that the role of such person is not
merely routine or clerical in nature but calls for the consistent
exercise of independent judgment; and
(ii) Any person who assists and acts in a confidential capacity to
such person.
(d) Unless included within a bargaining unit pursuant to RCW
41.59.080, any supervisor, which means any employee having authority,
in the interest of an employer, to hire, assign, promote, transfer,
layoff, recall, suspend, discipline, or discharge other employees, or
to adjust their grievances, or to recommend effectively such action, if
in connection with the foregoing the exercise of such authority is not
merely routine or clerical in nature but calls for the consistent
exercise of independent judgment, and shall not include any persons
solely by reason of their membership on a faculty tenure or other
governance committee or body. The term "supervisor" shall include only
those employees who perform a preponderance of the above-specified acts
of authority.
(e) Unless included within a bargaining unit pursuant to RCW
41.59.080, principals and assistant principals in school districts.
(5) The term "employer" means any school district.
(6) The term "exclusive bargaining representative" means any
employee organization which has:
(a) Been selected or designated pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter as the representative of the employees in an appropriate
collective bargaining unit; or
(b) Prior to January 1, 1976, been recognized under a predecessor
statute as the representative of the employees in an appropriate
collective bargaining or negotiations unit.
(7) The term "person" means one or more individuals, organizations,
unions, associations, partnerships, corporations, boards, committees,
commissions, agencies, or other entities, or their representatives.
(8) The term "nonsupervisory employee" means all educational
employees other than principals, assistant principals and supervisors.
(9) "Strike" means a concerted work stoppage or slowdown by one or
more educational employees in a school district for all or part of a
regularly scheduled school day for the purpose of inducing,
influencing, or coercing a change in conditions, compensation, rights,
privileges, or obligations of employment of educational employees.
(10) "Lockout" means the refusal of the employer school district,
in connection with a labor dispute, to permit its educational employees
to commence or continue the full performance of their normal duties and
services as educational employees.
(11) "Labor dispute" means a controversy concerning terms or
conditions of employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for an employee or an employee organization,
directly or indirectly, to induce, instigate, encourage, authorize,
ratify, or participate in a strike.
(2) It is unlawful for an employer to conduct a lockout.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
The attorney general must petition the superior court for the
county in which the labor dispute exists to enjoin a strike or lockout
that occurs or is threatened to occur on any days of the school
calendar. The injunction shall be filed on behalf of the students who
are being harmed because they are being denied an education as a result
of the labor dispute. The court shall grant a temporary injunction
under this section if the attorney general demonstrates any potential
harm to students.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.59.120 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((Either an employer or an exclusive bargaining representative
may declare that an impasse has been reached between them in collective
bargaining and may request the commission to)) Beginning with contracts
for the 2004-05 school year, negotiations between an employer and the
exclusive bargaining representative of a unit of employees under this
chapter must commence by May 1st in the year in which the collective
bargaining agreement has expired or will expire. If by June 30th, an
agreement has not yet been reached, the commission must appoint a
mediator for the purpose of assisting ((them)) the employer and the
exclusive bargaining representative in reconciling their differences
and resolving the controversy on terms which are mutually acceptable.
((If the commission determines that its assistance is needed, not later
than five days after the receipt of a request therefor, it)) The
commission shall appoint a mediator in accordance with rules and
regulations for such appointment prescribed by the commission. The
mediator shall meet with the parties or their representatives, or both,
forthwith, either jointly or separately, and shall take such other
steps as he may deem appropriate in order to persuade the parties to
resolve their differences and effect a mutually acceptable agreement.
The mediator, without the consent of both parties, shall not make
findings of fact or recommend terms of settlement. The services of the
mediator, including, if any, per diem expenses, shall be provided by
the commission without cost to the parties. ((Nothing in this
subsection (1) shall be construed to prevent the parties from mutually
agreeing upon their own mediation procedure, and in the event of such
agreement, the commission shall not appoint its own mediator unless
failure to do so would be inconsistent with the effectuation of the
purposes and policy of this chapter.))
(2) If the mediator is unable to effect settlement of the
controversy within ten days after his or her appointment, ((either
party, by written notification to the other, may request that their
differences be submitted to fact-finding with recommendations, except
that the time for mediation may be extended by mutual agreement between
the parties. Within five days after receipt of the aforesaid written
request for fact-finding,)) the parties shall select a person to serve
as fact-finder and obtain a commitment from that person to serve. If
they are unable to agree upon a fact-finder or to obtain such a
commitment within ((that time, either party may request)) five days,
the commission ((to)) shall designate a fact-finder. The commission,
within five days after receipt of such request, shall designate a fact-finder in accordance with rules and regulations for such designation
prescribed by the commission. The fact-finder so designated shall not
be the same person who was appointed mediator pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section without the consent of both parties.
The fact-finder, within five days after his appointment, shall meet
with the parties or their representatives, or both, either jointly or
separately, and make inquiries and investigations, hold hearings, and
take such other steps as he may deem appropriate. For the purpose of
such hearings, investigations and inquiries, the fact-finder shall have
the power to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of
witnesses and the production of evidence. If the dispute is not
settled ((within ten days after his appointment,)) by July 30th, the
fact-finder shall make findings of fact and recommend terms of
settlement ((within thirty days after his appointment)), which
recommendations shall be advisory only.
(3) Such recommendations, together with the findings of fact, shall
be submitted in writing to the parties and the commission privately
before they are made public. ((Either)) If the dispute is not settled,
the commission((, the fact-finder, the employer, or the exclusive
bargaining representative may)) shall make such findings and
recommendations public ((if the dispute is not settled within five days
after their receipt from the fact-finder)) at a public hearing to be
held on or before August 10th.
(4) The costs for the services of the fact-finder, including, if
any, per diem expenses and actual and necessary travel and subsistence
expenses, and any other incurred costs, shall be borne by the
commission without cost to the parties.
(5) ((Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an
employer and an exclusive bargaining representative from agreeing to
substitute, at their own expense, their own procedure for resolving
impasses in collective bargaining for that provided in this section or
from agreeing to utilize for the purposes of this section any other
governmental or other agency or person in lieu of the commission.
(6))) Any fact-finder designated by an employer and an exclusive
representative or the commission for the purposes of this section shall
be deemed an agent of the state.
(6) If the parties have not reached agreement by June 30th for the
coming school year, until the dispute is resolved, the parties must
participate in mediation, fact-finding, negotiation, or related
activities at least daily.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---