BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the policyholders
of United States longshore and harbor workers' compensation act
insurers are not protected from the insolvency and liquidation of these
insurers. The legislature further finds that it is in the best
interest of the citizens of this state to provide a mechanism to
protect the policyholders from the insolvency of their insurer.
The insurance commissioner shall create a committee to determine
the best method to provide protection to longshore and harbor workers'
compensation act insurance policyholders and employees. The committee
shall be known as the longshore and harbor workers' compensation act
insurance guarantee committee. The committee shall be chaired by the
insurance commissioner who shall appoint a member representing each of
the following: Labor, the United States longshore and harbor workers'
compensation act assigned risk plan, a marine employer, a solvent
United States longshore and harbor workers' compensation act insurer,
a director of the Washington insurance guaranty association, an agent
or broker actively placing risks with a United States longshore and
harbor workers' compensation act insurance carrier, and the department
of labor and industries as an ex officio member. The committee shall
be staffed by the office of the insurance commissioner and meet at the
call of the insurance commissioner.
The committee shall make written recommendations to the legislature
before December 1, 2004.

--- END ---