BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the inspection,
reinspection, and complaint investigation process for licensed boarding
homes and nursing homes should facilitate open and candid communication
between licensors, providers, and residents or their legal
representatives. The legislature further finds such communication and
quality assurance efforts will promote compliance with regulations by
providers and achieve the goal of providing high quality of care to
citizens residing in licensed boarding homes and nursing homes, and may
reduce property and liability insurance premium costs for such
facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.20.125 and 2003 c 231 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Inspections, including reinspections, complaint investigations,
and inspections under RCW 74.39A.050, must be outcome based and
responsive to resident complaints and based on a clear set of health,
quality of care, and safety standards that are easily understandable
and have been made available to facilities. This includes that when
conducting licensing inspections, reinspections, complaint
investigations, and inspections under RCW 74.39A.050, the department
shall interview an appropriate percentage of residents, family members,
and advocates in addition to interviewing appropriate staff. The
department must give the administrator or the administrator's designee
a written statement of deficiencies identifying any violations of
statute or regulation, including any subsection of the statute or
regulation, if any, the facts that determine the violation, and the
impact or the potential impact or outcome, if any, of the violation
that the department found during an inspection, reinspection, or
complaint investigation.
(2) During the on-site licensing inspection process, including
complaint and reinspections, the department personnel conducting the
inspection or investigation shall schedule a daily communication
meeting with the facility administrator or their designee, to the
fullest extent reasonably possible, during any inspection that lasts
more than one day, and provide periodic reports, at least daily, of
potential problems to the facility administrator or a designee, and the
facility administrator or designee shall be given the earliest possible
opportunity to provide information related to these concerns for
consideration by the licensors. At the conclusion of the inspection or
investigation, the licensors shall hold an exit conference whenever
possible to conduct a face-to-face review of all possible problems
found during the inspection. Failure to hold daily communications or
an exit conference is not grounds for nullifying or voiding any
citation, statement of deficiencies, or enforcement remedies imposed by
the department. The facility shall have the opportunity to submit
additional or supplemental information related to the concerns
discussed at the time of the exit conference for consideration by the
licensors. If the department obtains additional information that may
substantially alter the preliminary conclusions or issues identified
during the exit conference, the department shall attempt to notify the
facility administrator or their designee of the additional issues or
amended conclusions, and provide the facility administrator or their
designee the earliest possible opportunity to respond to the additional
information to be considered by the licensors.
(3) Prompt and specific enforcement remedies shall also be
implemented without delay, consistent with RCW 18.20.190, for
facilities found to have delivered care or failed to deliver care
resulting in problems that are serious, recurring, or uncorrected, or
that create a hazard that is causing or likely to cause death or
serious harm to one or more residents. These enforcement remedies may
also include, when appropriate, reasonable conditions on a license. In
the selection of remedies, the safety, health, and well-being of
residents shall be of paramount importance.
(((3))) (4) To the extent funding is available, the licensee,
administrator, and their staff should be screened through background
checks in a uniform and timely manner to ensure that they do not have
a criminal history that would disqualify them from working with
vulnerable adults. Employees may be provisionally hired pending the
results of the background check if they have been given three positive
references.
(((4))) (5) No licensee, administrator, or staff, or prospective
licensee, administrator, or staff, with a stipulated finding of fact,
conclusion of law, and agreed order, or finding of fact, conclusion of
law, or final order issued by a disciplining authority, a court of law,
or entered into the state registry finding him or her guilty of abuse,
neglect, exploitation, or abandonment of a minor or a vulnerable adult
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW shall be employed in the care of and
have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.39A.050 and 2000 c 121 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department's system of quality improvement for long-term care
services shall use the following principles, consistent with applicable
federal laws and regulations:
(1) The system shall be client-centered and promote privacy,
independence, dignity, choice, and a home or home-like environment for
consumers consistent with chapter 392, Laws of 1997.
(2) The goal of the system is continuous quality improvement with
the focus on consumer satisfaction and outcomes for consumers. Except
as provided in RCW 18.20.125, this includes that when conducting
licensing inspections, the department shall interview an appropriate
percentage of residents, family members, resident managers, and
advocates in addition to interviewing providers and staff.
(3) Providers should be supported in their efforts to improve
quality and address identified problems initially through training,
consultation, technical assistance, and case management.
(4) The emphasis should be on problem prevention both in monitoring
and in screening potential providers of service.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 18.20.125, monitoring should be
outcome based and responsive to consumer complaints and a clear set of
health, quality of care, and safety standards that are easily
understandable and have been made available to providers.
(6) Prompt and specific enforcement remedies shall also be
implemented without delay, pursuant to RCW 74.39A.080, RCW 70.128.160,
chapter 18.51 RCW, or chapter 74.42 RCW, for providers found to have
delivered care or failed to deliver care resulting in problems that are
serious, recurring, or uncorrected, or that create a hazard that is
causing or likely to cause death or serious harm to one or more
residents. These enforcement remedies may also include, when
appropriate, reasonable conditions on a contract or license. In the
selection of remedies, the safety, health, and well-being of residents
shall be of paramount importance.
(7) To the extent funding is available, all long-term care staff
directly responsible for the care, supervision, or treatment of
vulnerable persons should be screened through background checks in a
uniform and timely manner to ensure that they do not have a criminal
history that would disqualify them from working with vulnerable
persons. Whenever a state conviction record check is required by state
law, persons may be employed or engaged as volunteers or independent
contractors on a conditional basis according to law and rules adopted
by the department.
(8) No provider or staff, or prospective provider or staff, with a
stipulated finding of fact, conclusion of law, an agreed order, or
finding of fact, conclusion of law, or final order issued by a
disciplining authority, a court of law, or entered into a state
registry finding him or her guilty of abuse, neglect, exploitation, or
abandonment of a minor or a vulnerable adult as defined in chapter
74.34 RCW shall be employed in the care of and have unsupervised access
to vulnerable adults.
(9) The department shall establish, by rule, a state registry which
contains identifying information about personal care aides identified
under this chapter who have substantiated findings of abuse, neglect,
financial exploitation, or abandonment of a vulnerable adult as defined
in RCW 74.34.020. The rule must include disclosure, disposition of
findings, notification, findings of fact, appeal rights, and fair
hearing requirements. The department shall disclose, upon request,
substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or
abandonment to any person so requesting this information.
(10) The department shall by rule develop training requirements for
individual providers and home care agency providers. Effective March
1, 2002, individual providers and home care agency providers must
satisfactorily complete department-approved orientation, basic
training, and continuing education within the time period specified by
the department in rule. The department shall adopt rules by March 1,
2002, for the implementation of this section based on the
recommendations of the community long-term care training and education
steering committee established in RCW 74.39A.190. The department shall
deny payment to an individual provider or a home care provider who does
not complete the training requirements within the time limit specified
by the department by rule.
(11) In an effort to improve access to training and education and
reduce costs, especially for rural communities, the coordinated system
of long-term care training and education must include the use of
innovative types of learning strategies such as internet resources,
videotapes, and distance learning using satellite technology
coordinated through community colleges or other entities, as defined by
the department.
(12) The department shall create an approval system by March 1,
2002, for those seeking to conduct department-approved training. In
the rule-making process, the department shall adopt rules based on the
recommendations of the community long-term care training and education
steering committee established in RCW 74.39A.190.
(13) The department shall establish, by rule, training, background
checks, and other quality assurance requirements for personal aides who
provide in-home services funded by medicaid personal care as described
in RCW 74.09.520, community options program entry system waiver
services as described in RCW 74.39A.030, or chore services as described
in RCW 74.39A.110 that are equivalent to requirements for individual
providers.
(14) Under existing funds the department shall establish internally
a quality improvement standards committee to monitor the development of
standards and to suggest modifications.
(15) Within existing funds, the department shall design, develop,
and implement a long-term care training program that is flexible,
relevant, and qualifies towards the requirements for a nursing
assistant certificate as established under chapter 18.88A RCW. This
subsection does not require completion of the nursing assistant
certificate training program by providers or their staff. The long-term care teaching curriculum must consist of a fundamental module, or
modules, and a range of other available relevant training modules that
provide the caregiver with appropriate options that assist in meeting
the resident's care needs. Some of the training modules may include,
but are not limited to, specific training on the special care needs of
persons with developmental disabilities, dementia, mental illness, and
the care needs of the elderly. No less than one training module must
be dedicated to workplace violence prevention. The nursing care
quality assurance commission shall work together with the department to
develop the curriculum modules. The nursing care quality assurance
commission shall direct the nursing assistant training programs to
accept some or all of the skills and competencies from the curriculum
modules towards meeting the requirements for a nursing assistant
certificate as defined in chapter 18.88A RCW. A process may be
developed to test persons completing modules from a caregiver's class
to verify that they have the transferable skills and competencies for
entry into a nursing assistant training program. The department may
review whether facilities can develop their own related long-term care
training programs. The department may develop a review process for
determining what previous experience and training may be used to waive
some or all of the mandatory training. The department of social and
health services and the nursing care quality assurance commission shall
work together to develop an implementation plan by December 12, 1998.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To ensure the proper delivery of services and the maintenance
and improvement in quality of care through self-review, each nursing
home must maintain a quality assurance committee that, at a minimum,
includes:
(a) The director of nursing services;
(b) A physician designated by the facility; and
(c) Three other members from the staff of the nursing home.
(2) When established, the quality assurance committee shall meet at
least quarterly to identify issues that may adversely affect quality of
care and services to residents and to develop and implement plans of
action to correct identified quality concerns or deficiencies in the
quality of care provided to residents.
(3) To promote quality of care through self-review without the fear
of reprisal, and to enhance the objectivity of the review process, the
department shall not require, and the long-term care ombudsman program
shall not request, disclosure of any quality assurance committee
records or reports, unless the disclosure is related to the committee's
compliance with this section, if:
(a) The records or reports are not maintained pursuant to statutory
or regulatory mandate; and
(b) The records or reports are created for and collected and
maintained by the committee.
(4) The department may request only information related to the
quality assurance committee that may be necessary to determine whether
a nursing home has a quality assurance committee and that it is
operating in compliance with this section.
(5) Good faith attempts by the committee to identify and correct
quality deficiencies shall not be used as a basis for imposing
sanctions.
(6) If the nursing home offers the department documents generated
by, or for, the quality assurance committee as evidence of compliance
with nursing home requirements, the documents are not protected as
quality assurance committee documents when in the possession of the
department.
(7) Any records that are created for and collected and maintained
by the quality assurance committee shall not be discoverable or
admitted into evidence in a civil action brought against a nursing
home.
(8) Notwithstanding any records created for the quality assurance
committee, the facility shall fully set forth in the resident's
records, available to the resident, the department, and others as
permitted by law, the facts concerning any incident of injury or loss
to the resident, the steps taken by the facility to address the
resident's needs, and the resident outcome.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To ensure the proper delivery of services and the maintenance
and improvement in quality of care through self-review, any boarding
home licensed under this chapter may maintain a quality assurance
committee that, at a minimum, includes:
(a) A licensed registered nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW;
(b) The administrator; and
(c) Three other members from the staff of the boarding home.
(2) When established, the quality assurance committee shall meet at
least quarterly to identify issues that may adversely affect quality of
care and services to residents and to develop and implement plans of
action to correct identified quality concerns or deficiencies in the
quality of care provided to residents.
(3) To promote quality of care through self-review without the fear
of reprisal, and to enhance the objectivity of the review process, the
department shall not require, and the long-term care ombudsman program
shall not request, disclosure of any quality assurance committee
records or reports, unless the disclosure is related to the committee's
compliance with this section, if:
(a) The records or reports are not maintained pursuant to statutory
or regulatory mandate; and
(b) The records or reports are created for and collected and
maintained by the committee.
(4) If the boarding home refuses to release records or reports that
would otherwise be protected under this section, the department may
then request only that information that is necessary to determine
whether the boarding home has a quality assurance committee and to
determine that it is operating in compliance with this section.
(5) Good faith attempts by the committee to identify and correct
quality deficiencies shall not be used as a basis for sanctions.
(6) Any records that are created for and collected and maintained
by the quality assurance committee shall not be discoverable or
admitted into evidence in a civil action brought against a boarding
home.
(7) Notwithstanding any records created for the quality assurance
committee, the facility shall fully set forth in the resident's
records, available to the resident, the department, and others as
permitted by law, the facts concerning any incident of injury or loss
to the resident, the steps taken by the facility to address the
resident's needs, and the resident outcome.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.20.110 and 2003 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall make or cause to be made, at least every
eighteen months with an annual average of fifteen months, an inspection
and investigation of all boarding homes. However, the department may
delay an inspection to twenty-four months if the boarding home has had
three consecutive inspections with no written notice of violations and
has received no written notice of violations resulting from complaint
investigation during that same time period. The department may at
anytime make an unannounced inspection of a licensed home to assure
that the licensee is in compliance with this chapter and the rules
adopted under this chapter. Every inspection shall focus primarily on
actual or potential resident outcomes, and may include an inspection of
every part of the premises and an examination of all records (((other
than financial records))), methods of administration, the general and
special dietary, and the stores and methods of supply; however, the
department shall not have access to financial records or to other
records or reports pursuant to section 4 of this act. Financial
records of the boarding home may be examined when the department has
reasonable cause to believe that financial obligations related to
resident care or services will not be met, such as a complaint that
staff wages or utility costs have not been paid, or when necessary for
the department to investigate alleged financial exploitation of a
resident. Following such an inspection or inspections, written notice
of any violation of this law or the rules adopted hereunder shall be
given to the applicant or licensee and the department. The department
may prescribe by rule that any licensee or applicant desiring to make
specified types of alterations or additions to its facilities or to
construct new facilities shall, before commencing such alteration,
addition, or new construction, submit plans and specifications therefor
to the agencies responsible for plan reviews for preliminary inspection
and approval or recommendations with respect to compliance with the
rules and standards herein authorized.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
If during an inspection or reinspection by the department, a
boarding home corrects a violation or deficiency that either the
boarding home or the department discovers, the licensor or complaint
investigator shall not include in the facility report the violation or
deficiency if the violation or deficiency:
(1) Is corrected to the satisfaction of the department prior to the
exit conference;
(2) Is not recurring; and
(3) Did not pose a significant risk of harm or actual harm to a
resident.
For the purposes of this section, "recurring" means that the
violation or deficiency was found under the same regulation or statute
in one of the two most recent preceding inspections or reinspections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---