BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to aid law
enforcement authorities in combating crime through the rapid
identification of all persons who require medical treatment as a result
of a criminal act and to assist in the rapid identification of human
remains.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.02.010 and 2002 c 318 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Audit" means an assessment, evaluation, determination, or
investigation of a health care provider by a person not employed by or
affiliated with the provider to determine compliance with:
(a) Statutory, regulatory, fiscal, medical, or scientific
standards;
(b) A private or public program of payments to a health care
provider; or
(c) Requirements for licensing, accreditation, or certification.
(2) "Directory information" means information disclosing the
presence, and for the purpose of identification, the name, residence,
sex, and the general health condition of a particular patient who is a
patient in a health care facility or who is currently receiving
emergency health care in a health care facility.
(3) "Federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities" means an
officer or employee of any agency or authority of the United States, a
state, a territory, a political subdivision of a state or territory, or
an Indian tribe, who is empowered by law to:
(a) Investigate or conduct an official inquiry into a potential
violation of law; or
(b) Prosecute or otherwise conduct a criminal, civil, or
administrative proceeding arising from an alleged violation of law.
(4) "General health condition" means the patient's health status
described in terms of "critical," "poor," "fair," "good," "excellent,"
or terms denoting similar conditions.
(((4))) (5) "Health care" means any care, service, or procedure
provided by a health care provider:
(a) To diagnose, treat, or maintain a patient's physical or mental
condition; or
(b) That affects the structure or any function of the human body.
(((5))) (6) "Health care facility" means a hospital, clinic,
nursing home, laboratory, office, or similar place where a health care
provider provides health care to patients.
(((6))) (7) "Health care information" means any information,
whether oral or recorded in any form or medium, that identifies or can
readily be associated with the identity of a patient and directly
relates to the patient's health care, including a patient's
deoxyribonucleic acid and identified sequence of chemical base pairs.
The term includes any record of disclosures of health care information.
(((7))) (8) "Health care provider" means a person who is licensed,
certified, registered, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state
to provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice
of a profession.
(((8))) (9) "Institutional review board" means any board,
committee, or other group formally designated by an institution, or
authorized under federal or state law, to review, approve the
initiation of, or conduct periodic review of research programs to
assure the protection of the rights and welfare of human research
subjects.
(((9))) (10) "Maintain," as related to health care information,
means to hold, possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that
information.
(((10))) (11) "Patient" means an individual who receives or has
received health care. The term includes a deceased individual who has
received health care.
(((11))) (12) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture,
government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(((12))) (13) "Reasonable fee" means the charges for duplicating or
searching the record, but shall not exceed sixty-five cents per page
for the first thirty pages and fifty cents per page for all other
pages. In addition, a clerical fee for searching and handling may be
charged not to exceed fifteen dollars. These amounts shall be adjusted
biennially in accordance with changes in the consumer price index, all
consumers, for Seattle-Tacoma metropolitan statistical area as
determined by the secretary of health. However, where editing of
records by a health care provider is required by statute and is done by
the provider personally, the fee may be the usual and customary charge
for a basic office visit.
(((13))) (14) "Third-party payor" means an insurer regulated under
Title 48 RCW authorized to transact business in this state or other
jurisdiction, including a health care service contractor, and health
maintenance organization; or an employee welfare benefit plan; or a
state or federal health benefit program.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.02.050 and 1998 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A health care provider may disclose health care information
about a patient without the patient's authorization to the extent a
recipient needs to know the information, if the disclosure is:
(a) To a person who the provider reasonably believes is providing
health care to the patient;
(b) To any other person who requires health care information for
health care education, or to provide planning, quality assurance, peer
review, or administrative, legal, financial, or actuarial services to
the health care provider; or for assisting the health care provider in
the delivery of health care and the health care provider reasonably
believes that the person:
(i) Will not use or disclose the health care information for any
other purpose; and
(ii) Will take appropriate steps to protect the health care
information;
(c) To any other health care provider reasonably believed to have
previously provided health care to the patient, to the extent necessary
to provide health care to the patient, unless the patient has
instructed the health care provider in writing not to make the
disclosure;
(d) To any person if the health care provider reasonably believes
that disclosure will avoid or minimize an imminent danger to the health
or safety of the patient or any other individual, however there is no
obligation under this chapter on the part of the provider to so
disclose;
(e) Oral, and made to immediate family members of the patient, or
any other individual with whom the patient is known to have a close
personal relationship, if made in accordance with good medical or other
professional practice, unless the patient has instructed the health
care provider in writing not to make the disclosure;
(f) To a health care provider who is the successor in interest to
the health care provider maintaining the health care information;
(g) For use in a research project that an institutional review
board has determined:
(i) Is of sufficient importance to outweigh the intrusion into the
privacy of the patient that would result from the disclosure;
(ii) Is impracticable without the use or disclosure of the health
care information in individually identifiable form;
(iii) Contains reasonable safeguards to protect the information
from redisclosure;
(iv) Contains reasonable safeguards to protect against identifying,
directly or indirectly, any patient in any report of the research
project; and
(v) Contains procedures to remove or destroy at the earliest
opportunity, consistent with the purposes of the project, information
that would enable the patient to be identified, unless an institutional
review board authorizes retention of identifying information for
purposes of another research project;
(h) To a person who obtains information for purposes of an audit,
if that person agrees in writing to:
(i) Remove or destroy, at the earliest opportunity consistent with
the purpose of the audit, information that would enable the patient to
be identified; and
(ii) Not to disclose the information further, except to accomplish
the audit or report unlawful or improper conduct involving fraud in
payment for health care by a health care provider or patient, or other
unlawful conduct by the health care provider;
(i) To an official of a penal or other custodial institution in
which the patient is detained;
(j) To provide directory information, unless the patient has
instructed the health care provider not to make the disclosure((;
(k) In the case of a hospital or health care provider to provide,
in cases reported by fire, police, sheriff, or other public authority,
name, residence, sex, age, occupation, condition, diagnosis, or extent
and location of injuries as determined by a physician, and whether the
patient was conscious when admitted)).
(2) A health care provider shall disclose health care information
about a patient without the patient's authorization if the disclosure
is:
(a) To federal, state, or local public health authorities, to the
extent the health care provider is required by law to report health
care information; when needed to determine compliance with state or
federal licensure, certification or registration rules or laws; or when
needed to protect the public health;
(b) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities to the
extent the health care provider is required by law;
(c) To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities, upon
receipt of a written or oral request, in any cases in which the patient
is being treated or has been treated for a bullet wound, gunshot wound,
powder burn, or other injury arising from or caused by the discharge of
a firearm, or an injury caused by a knife, ice pick, or any other sharp
or pointed instrument which federal, state, or local law enforcement
authorities reasonably believe to have been intentionally inflicted
upon a person, or any other injury, including blunt force injury, that
federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities reasonably believe
resulted from a criminal act, the following information, if known:
(i) The name of the patient;
(ii) The patient's residence;
(iii) The patient's sex;
(iv) The patient's age;
(v) The patient's condition;
(vi) The patient's diagnosis, or extent and location of injuries as
determined by a health care provider;
(vii) Whether the patient was conscious when admitted;
(viii) The name of the health care provider making the
determination in (c)(v), (vi), and (vii) of this subsection (2);
(ix) Whether the patient has been transferred to another facility;
and
(x) The patient's discharge time and date;
(d) To county coroners and medical examiners for the investigations
of deaths;
(((d))) (e) Pursuant to compulsory process in accordance with RCW
70.02.060.
(3) All state or local agencies obtaining patient health care
information pursuant to this section shall adopt rules establishing
their record acquisition, retention, and security policies that are
consistent with this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 68.50.320 and 2001 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a person reported missing has not been found within thirty
days of the report, the sheriff, chief of police, county coroner or
county medical examiner, or other law enforcement authority initiating
and conducting the investigation for the missing person shall ask the
missing person's family or next of kin to give written consent to
contact the dentist or dentists of the missing person and request the
person's dental records.
The missing person's dentist or dentists shall provide diagnostic
quality copies of the missing person's dental records or original
dental records to the sheriff, chief of police, county coroner or
county medical examiner, or other law enforcement authority, when
presented with the written consent from the missing person's family or
next of kin or with a statement from the sheriff, chief of police,
county coroner or county medical examiner, or other law enforcement
authority that the missing person's family or next of kin could not be
located in the exercise of due diligence or that the missing person's
family or next of kin refuses to consent to the release of the missing
person's dental records and there is reason to believe that the missing
person's family or next of kin may have been involved in the missing
person's disappearance.
When a person reported missing has not been found within thirty
days, the sheriff, chief of police, or other law enforcement authority
initiating and conducting the investigation for the missing person
shall confer with the county coroner or medical examiner prior to the
preparation of a missing person's report. After conferring with the
coroner or medical examiner, the sheriff, chief of police, or other law
enforcement authority shall submit a missing person's report and the
dental records received under this section to the dental identification
system of the state patrol identification, child abuse, vulnerable
adult abuse, and criminal history section on forms supplied by the
state patrol for such purpose.
When a person reported missing has been found, the sheriff, chief
of police, coroner or medical examiner, or other law enforcement
authority shall report such information to the state patrol.
The dental identification system shall maintain a file of
information regarding persons reported to it as missing. The file
shall contain the information referred to in this section and such
other information as the state patrol finds relevant to assist in the
location of a missing person.
The files of the dental identification system shall, upon request,
be made available to law enforcement agencies attempting to locate
missing persons.

--- END ---