BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the projects authorized in RCW 39.10.051, three
second class school districts may each use the design-build procedure
for a demonstration project valued between five million dollars and
twelve million dollars for the purpose of constructing an integrated
kindergarten through grade twelve single structure school building.
The project must receive approval from the school district project
review board established under RCW 39.10.115.
(2) Second class school districts shall give weight to proposers'
experience working on projects valued between five million dollars and
twelve million dollars in the evaluation process for the selection of
a design-build firm for demonstration projects authorized in subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) All contracts authorized under this section must be entered
into before July 1, 2007.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall notify all
second class school districts when contracts for three demonstration
projects under this section have been entered into.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2007.

--- END ---