BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An electronic mail service provider shall, upon request by the
customer, employ the use of filtering software to block the
transmission of commercial electronic mail messages to that customer.
(2) No electronic mail service provider may be held liable for any
action taken in good faith to block the receipt through its service of
any commercial electronic mail.
(3) An electronic mail service provider who fails to comply with
the requirements of this chapter shall be liable to the customer for
any actual damages sustained by the person as a result of the failure.
Nothing in this section limits any cause of action or remedy available
under chapter 19.86 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.190.010 and 2003 c 137 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assist the transmission" means actions taken by a person to
provide substantial assistance or support which enables any person to
formulate, compose, send, originate, initiate, or transmit a commercial
electronic mail message or a commercial electronic text message when
the person providing the assistance knows or consciously avoids knowing
that the initiator of the commercial electronic mail message or the
commercial electronic text message is engaged, or intends to engage, in
any practice that violates the consumer protection act.
(2) "Commercial electronic mail message" means an electronic mail
message sent for the purpose of promoting real property, goods, or
services for sale or lease. It does not mean an electronic mail
message to which an interactive computer service provider has attached
an advertisement in exchange for free use of an electronic mail
account, when the sender has agreed to such an arrangement.
(3) "Commercial electronic text message" means an electronic text
message sent to promote real property, goods, or services for sale or
lease.
(4) "Electronic mail address" means a destination, commonly
expressed as a string of characters, to which electronic mail may be
sent or delivered.
(5) "Electronic text message" means a text message sent to a
cellular telephone or pager equipped with short message service or any
similar capability, whether the message is initiated as a short message
service message or as an electronic mail message.
(6) "Initiate the transmission" refers to the action by the
original sender of an electronic mail message or an electronic text
message, not to the action by any intervening interactive computer
service or wireless network that may handle or retransmit the message,
unless such intervening interactive computer service assists in the
transmission of an electronic mail message when it knows, or
consciously avoids knowing, that the person initiating the transmission
is engaged, or intends to engage, in any act or practice that violates
the consumer protection act.
(7) "Interactive computer service" means any information service,
system, or access software provider that provides or enables computer
access by multiple users to a computer server, including specifically
a service or system that provides access to the internet and such
systems operated or services offered by libraries or educational
institutions.
(8) "Internet domain name" refers to a globally unique,
hierarchical reference to an internet host or service, assigned through
centralized internet naming authorities, comprising a series of
character strings separated by periods, with the right-most string
specifying the top of the hierarchy.
(9) "Person" means a person, corporation, partnership, or
association.
(10) "Filtering software" means any software program used by an
electronic mail service provider and designed to block the receipt or
transmission of unsolicited bulk commercial electronic mail messages.
(11) "Electronic mail service provider" means any business or
organization that provides registered users the ability to send or
receive electronic mail and is an intermediary in sending or receiving
electronic mail.

--- END ---