BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2004, no board or official of a school district
shall enter into any agreement, including collective bargaining
agreements, or engage in any activity that has the effect of
suppressing information about misconduct of a present or former
employee or of expunging information about that misconduct from the
personnel records of any former or present employee of the school
district. Any provisions of a contract or agreement entered into after
July 1, 2004, that is contrary to this section is void and
unenforceable and may not be withheld from disclosure by the entry of
any administrative or court order. This section does not restrict the
expungement from a personnel file of information about alleged
misconduct that has not been substantiated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---