BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.410.095 and 1992 c 159 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction may initiate and
conduct investigations as may be reasonably necessary to establish the
existence of any alleged violations of or noncompliance with this
chapter or any rules adopted under it. This authority includes the
ability to initiate an investigation based on a written complaint of a
parent or community member filed under the provisions of section 2 of
this act. For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under
this chapter, the superintendent or any officer designated by the
superintendent may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena
witnesses and compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the
production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements,
or other documents or records that the superintendent deems relevant
and material to the inquiry.
(2) Investigations conducted by the superintendent of public
instruction concerning alleged sexual misconduct towards a child shall
be completed within one year of the initiation of the investigation or
within thirty days of the completion of all proceedings, including
court proceedings, resulting from an investigation conducted by law
enforcement or child protective services if there is such an
investigation. The superintendent of public instruction may take, for
reasonable cause, additional time for completion of the investigation
after informing the victim, the individual being investigated, and the
school district that employs the individual being investigated of the
reasons additional time is needed and the amount of additional time
needed. Written notification must be provided to each of the parties
who must be informed. The sole remedy for a failure to complete an
investigation of sexual misconduct within the time allowed by this
subsection is a civil penalty of fifty dollars per day for each day
beyond the allowed time.
(3) If any person fails to obey a subpoena or obeys a subpoena but
refuses to give evidence, any court of competent jurisdiction, upon
application by the superintendent, may issue to that person an order
requiring him or her to appear before the court and to show cause why
he or she should not be compelled to obey the subpoena, and give
evidence material to the matter under investigation. The failure to
obey an order of the court may be punishable as contempt.
(4) Once an investigation has been initiated by the superintendent
of public instruction, the investigation shall be completed regardless
of whether the individual being investigated has resigned his or her
position or allowed his or her teaching certificate to lapse.
(5) An investigation into sexual or physical abuse of a student by
a school employee shall only be initiated by the superintendent of
public instruction after the superintendent of public instruction
verifies that the incident has been reported to the proper law
enforcement agency or the department of social and health services as
required under RCW 26.44.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
A parent or community member may file a complaint directly with the
superintendent of public instruction alleging that a certificated
school employee is not of good moral character or personal fitness or
has committed an act of unprofessional conduct if:
(1) He or she has already filed a written complaint with the
educational service district superintendent concerning that employee;
(2) The educational service district superintendent has determined
that no investigation is to be conducted and has not forwarded the
complaint on to the superintendent of public instruction for
investigation; and
(3) The written complaint states the grounds and factual basis upon
which the parent or community member believes an investigation should
be conducted.

--- END ---