BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Most public-use airports have large tracts of open, unimproved
land that are desirable for added margins of safety and noise
mitigation. These areas can present potential hazards to aviation
because they often attract wildlife. Wildlife use of areas within an
airport's approach or departure airspace, aircraft movement areas,
loading ramps, or aircraft parking areas may cause safety hazards
resulting from collisions between wildlife and aircraft;
(b) A 2003 memorandum of agreement between the federal aviation
administration and several federal agencies reports that wildlife-aircraft strikes are the second leading cause of aviation-related
fatalities worldwide and that during the 1990s, wildlife-aircraft
strikes damaged four thousand five hundred civilian United States'
aircraft, destroyed nineteen aircraft, killed six people, and caused an
estimated four billion dollars worth of damage and associated losses;
and
(c) New public-use airport development projects may result in
unavoidable impacts to storm water runoff or wetlands that require
mitigation. Storm water and wetland mitigation that attracts or
sustains hazardous wildlife on or near public-use airports can
significantly increase the potential for wildlife-aircraft collisions.
(2) The legislature intends that regulatory decisions by the
departments of ecology and fish and wildlife regarding storm water and
wetland mitigation resulting from public-use airport development
projects should, to the maximum extent allowable under federal and
state law, be compatible with safe airport operations.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.74.020 and 1997 c 424 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Project proponents may use a mitigation plan to propose
compensatory mitigation within a watershed. A mitigation plan shall:
(a) Contain provisions that guarantee the long-term viability of
the created, restored, enhanced, or preserved habitat, including
assurances for protecting any essential biological functions and values
defined in the mitigation plan;
(b) Contain provisions for long-term monitoring of any created,
restored, or enhanced mitigation site; ((and))
(c) Be consistent with the local comprehensive land use plan and
any other applicable planning process in effect for the development
area, such as an adopted subbasin or watershed plan; and
(d) For infrastructure development involving public-use airports,
be consistent with the federal aviation administration's recommended
land use practices related to compatibility with safe airport
operations.
(2) The departments of ecology and fish and wildlife may not limit
the scope of options in a mitigation plan to areas on or near the
project site, or to habitat types of the same type as contained on the
project site. The departments of ecology and fish and wildlife shall
fully review and give due consideration to compensatory mitigation
proposals that improve the overall biological functions and values of
the watershed or bay and accommodate the mitigation needs of
infrastructure development. The mitigation needs of infrastructure
development involving public-use airports include the need for
compatibility with safe airport operations.
The departments of ecology and fish and wildlife are not required
to grant approval to a mitigation plan that the departments find does
not provide equal or better biological functions and values within the
watershed or bay.
(3) When making a permit or other regulatory decision under the
guidance of this chapter relating to the infrastructure development
needs of public-use airports, the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife shall consider the compatibility of the permit condition or
regulatory decision with the aircraft and airport operational safety
requirements of the federal aviation administration. The departments
of ecology and fish and wildlife may not require an airport operating
under the authority of chapter 14.08 RCW to engage in land uses that
are incompatible with the federal aviation administration's recommended
land use practices relating to aircraft and airport operational safety.
(4) When making a permit or other regulatory decision under the
guidance of this chapter, the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife shall consider whether the mitigation plan provides equal or
better biological functions and values, compared to the existing
conditions, for the target resources or species identified in the
mitigation plan. This consideration shall be based upon the following
factors:
(a) The relative value of the mitigation for the target resources,
in terms of the quality and quantity of biological functions and values
provided;
(b) The compatibility of the proposal with the intent of broader
resource management and habitat management objectives and plans, such
as existing resource management plans, watershed plans, critical areas
ordinances, and shoreline master programs;
(c) The ability of the mitigation to address scarce functions or
values within a watershed;
(d) The benefits of the proposal to broader watershed landscape,
including the benefits of connecting various habitat units or providing
population-limiting habitats or functions for target species;
(e) The benefits of early implementation of habitat mitigation for
projects that provide compensatory mitigation in advance of the
project's planned impacts; and
(f) The significance of any negative impacts to nontarget species
or resources.
(((4))) (5) A mitigation plan may be approved through a memorandum
of agreement between the project proponent and either the department of
ecology or the department of fish and wildlife, or both.

--- END ---