BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.400 and 1965 ex.s. c 155 s 54 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) No person shall drive a vehicle on a highway at a speed greater
than is reasonable and prudent under the conditions and having regard
to the actual and potential hazards then existing. In every event
speed shall be so controlled as may be necessary to avoid colliding
with any person, vehicle or other conveyance on or entering the highway
in compliance with legal requirements and the duty of all persons to
use due care.
(2)(a) Except when a special hazard exists that requires lower
speed for compliance with subsection (1) of this section, the limits
specified in this section or established as hereinafter authorized
shall be maximum lawful speeds, and no person shall drive a vehicle on
a highway at a speed in excess of such maximum limits.
(((a))) (i) Twenty-five miles per hour on city and town streets;
(((b))) (ii) Fifty miles per hour on county roads;
(((c))) (iii) Sixty miles per hour on state highways.
(b) The maximum speed limits set forth in this section may be
altered as authorized in RCW 46.61.405, 46.61.410, and 46.61.415.
(3) Notwithstanding RCW 46.61.410, the secretary of transportation
shall set a reasonable and safe maximum speed limit on state highways,
located in the urban growth area of an unincorporated area of a county,
that recognizes urban density in close proximity to the state highway.
The secretary may not set a maximum speed limit that exceeds the limits
provided in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(4) The driver of every vehicle shall, consistent with the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, drive at an appropriate
reduced speed when approaching and crossing an intersection or railway
grade crossing, when approaching and going around a curve, when
approaching a hill crest, when traveling upon any narrow or winding
roadway, and when special hazard exists with respect to pedestrians or
other traffic or by reason of weather or highway conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---