BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.28 RCW
to read as follows:
A county designated as the lead agency for the construction of a
transportation project that fails to meet specific milestones or
perform the duties required of it as a lead agency within a reasonable
time from the applicable dates established in the original agreement
governing the project shall forfeit its lead agency status and shall
remit any funds previously provided to it for the project to the
department. Agreements between the department and a lead agency must
include specific milestones or performance measures that are tied to
appropriate timelines. This section does not apply if the forfeiture
is inconsistent with any federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition for the allocation of federal funds to the state or the
county.

--- END ---