BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.190.010 and 2003 c 137 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assist the transmission" means actions taken by a person to
provide substantial assistance or support which enables any person to
formulate, compose, send, originate, initiate, or transmit a commercial
electronic mail message or a commercial electronic text message when
the person providing the assistance knows or consciously avoids knowing
that the initiator of the commercial electronic mail message or the
commercial electronic text message is engaged, or intends to engage, in
any practice that violates the consumer protection act.
(2) "Commercial electronic mail message" means an electronic mail
message sent for the purpose of promoting real property, goods, or
services for sale or lease. It does not mean an electronic mail
message to which an interactive computer service provider has attached
an advertisement in exchange for free use of an electronic mail
account, when the sender has agreed to such an arrangement.
(3) "Commercial electronic text message" means an electronic text
message sent to promote real property, goods, or services for sale or
lease.
(4) "Direct consent" means that the recipient has expressly
consented to receive electronic mail from the sender, either in
response to a clear and conspicuous request to consent or at the
recipient's own initiative.
(5) "Electronic mail" or "e-mail" means an electronic message that
is sent to an electronic mail address and transmitted between two or
more telecommunications devices, computers, or electronic devices
capable of receiving electronic messages, whether or not the message is
converted to hard copy format after receipt or is viewed upon
transmission or stored for later retrieval. "Electronic mail" or
"e-mail" includes electronic messages that are transmitted through a
local, regional, or global computer network.
(6) "Electronic mail address" means a destination, commonly
expressed as a string of characters, to which electronic mail may be
sent or delivered.
(((5))) (7) "Electronic text message" means a text message sent to
a cellular telephone or pager equipped with short message service or
any similar capability, whether the message is initiated as a short
message service message or as an electronic mail message.
(((6))) (8) "Initiate" means to transmit or cause to be transmitted
a commercial electronic mail message or assist in the transmission of
a commercial electronic mail message by providing electronic mail
addresses where the electronic mail message may be sent, but does not
include the routine transmission of commercial electronic mail through
the network or system of a telecommunications utility or interactive
service provider through its network or system.
(9) "Initiate the transmission" refers to the action by the
original sender of an electronic mail message or an electronic text
message, not to the action by any intervening interactive computer
service or wireless network that may handle or retransmit the message,
unless such intervening interactive computer service assists in the
transmission of an electronic mail message when it knows, or
consciously avoids knowing, that the person initiating the transmission
is engaged, or intends to engage, in any act or practice that violates
the consumer protection act.
(((7))) (10) "Interactive computer service" means any information
service, system, or access software provider that provides or enables
computer access by multiple users to a computer server, including
specifically a service or system that provides access to the internet
and such systems operated or services offered by libraries or
educational institutions.
(((8))) (11) "Internet domain name" refers to a globally unique,
hierarchical reference to an internet host or service, assigned through
centralized internet naming authorities, comprising a series of
character strings separated by periods, with the right-most string
specifying the top of the hierarchy.
(((9))) (12) "Person" means a person, corporation, partnership, or
association.
(13) "Preexisting or current business relationship," as used in
connection with the sending of a commercial electronic mail message,
means that the recipient has made an inquiry and has provided his or
her electronic mail address, or had made an application, purchase, or
transaction, with or without consideration, regarding products or
services offered by the sender.
Commercial electronic mail sent pursuant to the exemption provided
for a preexisting or current business relationship shall provide the
recipient of the commercial electronic mail with the ability to "opt-out" from receiving further commercial electronic mail by calling a
toll-free telephone number or by sending an "unsubscribe" electronic
mail message to the sender offering the products or services in the
commercial electronic mail message. This opt-out provision does not
apply to recipients who are receiving free electronic mail service with
regard to commercial electronic mail messages sent by the interactive
computer service.
(14) "Recipient" means the addressee of an unsolicited commercial
electronic mail message. If an addressee of an unsolicited commercial
electronic mail message has one or more electronic mail addresses to
which unsolicited commercial electronic mail is sent, the addressee
shall be deemed to be a separate recipient for each electronic mail
address to which the electronic mail is sent.
(15) "Unsolicited commercial electronic mail message" means
commercial electronic mail sent to a recipient who meets both of the
following criteria:
(a) The recipient has not provided direct consent to receive
commercial electronic mail from the sender;
(b) The recipient does not have a preexisting or current business
relationship, as defined in this section, with the sender promoting the
lease, sale, rental, gift offer, or other disposition of any property,
goods, services, or extension of credit.
(16) "Washington electronic mail address" or "Washington e-mail
address" means any of the following:
(a) An electronic mail address furnished by an interactive service
provider that sends bills for furnishing and maintaining that
electronic mail address to a mailing address in this state.
(b) An electronic mail address furnished to a resident of this
state.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.190.020 and 1999 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may initiate the transmission, conspire with another
to initiate the transmission, or assist the transmission, of ((a)) an
unsolicited commercial electronic mail message from a computer located
in Washington or to an electronic mail address that the sender knows,
or has reason to know, is held by a Washington resident that:
(a) Uses a third party's internet domain name without permission of
the third party, or otherwise misrepresents or obscures any information
in identifying the point of origin or the transmission path of ((a)) an
unsolicited commercial electronic mail message; ((or))
(b) Contains false or misleading information in the subject line;
or
(c) Has a subject line that a person knows would be likely to
mislead a recipient, acting reasonably under the circumstances, about
a material fact regarding the contents or subject matter of the
message.
(2) For purposes of this section, a person knows that the intended
recipient of ((a)) an unsolicited commercial electronic mail message is
a Washington resident if that information is available, upon request,
from the registrant of the internet domain name contained in the
recipient's electronic mail address.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.190.030 and 1999 c 289 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a violation of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86
RCW, to conspire with another person to initiate the transmission or to
initiate the transmission of ((a)) an unsolicited commercial electronic
mail message that:
(a) Uses a third party's internet domain name without permission of
the third party, or otherwise misrepresents or obscures any information
in identifying the point of origin or the transmission path of ((a)) an
unsolicited commercial electronic mail message; ((or))
(b) Contains false or misleading information in the subject line;
or
(c) Has a subject line that a person knows would be likely to
mislead a recipient, acting reasonably under the circumstances, about
a material fact regarding the contents or subject matter of the
message.
(2) It is a violation of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86
RCW, to assist in the transmission of ((a)) an unsolicited commercial
electronic mail message, when the person providing the assistance
knows, or consciously avoids knowing, that the initiator of the
unsolicited commercial electronic mail message is engaged, or intends
to engage, in any act or practice that violates the consumer protection
act.
(3) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
chapter are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.190.040 and 2003 c 137 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other remedies provided by this section or
by any other provisions of law, the recipient of unsolicited commercial
electronic mail transmitted in violation of this section or an
interactive computer service may bring an action against a person that
violates any provision of this section to recover damages.
(a) Damages to the recipient of ((a)) an unsolicited commercial
electronic mail message ((or a commercial electronic text message))
sent in violation of this chapter are ((five hundred)) one thousand
dollars, up to one million dollars per incident, or actual damages,
whichever is greater.
(((2))) (b) Damages to an interactive computer service resulting
from a violation of this chapter are one thousand dollars, or actual
damages, whichever is greater.
(c) Damages to the recipient of a commercial electronic text
message sent in violation of this chapter are five hundred dollars, or
actual damages, whichever is greater.
(d) The recipient or an interactive computer service, if the
prevailing plaintiff, may also recover reasonable attorneys' fees and
costs.
(2) If the court finds that the defendant established and
implemented, with due care, practices and procedures reasonably
designed to effectively prevent unsolicited commercial electronic mail
that are in violation of this section, the court shall reduce the
damages recoverable under subsection (1) of this section to a maximum
of one hundred dollars for each unsolicited commercial electronic mail,
or a maximum of one hundred thousand dollars per incident.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a person may not
do any of the following:
(a) Initiate or advertise in unsolicited commercial electronic mail
from Washington or advertise in unsolicited electronic mail sent from
Washington;
(b) Initiate or advertise in unsolicited commercial electronic mail
to a Washington electronic mail address, or advertise in unsolicited
commercial electronic mail sent to a Washington electronic mail
address.
(2) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision
of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity
shall not affect any other provision or application that can be given
effect without the invalid provision or application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to collect electronic mail
addresses posted on the internet if the purpose of the collection is
for the electronic mail addresses to be used to do either of the
following:
(a) Initiate or advertise in unsolicited commercial electronic mail
from Washington, or advertise in unsolicited commercial electronic mail
sent from Washington;
(b) Initiate or advertise in unsolicited commercial electronic mail
to a Washington electronic mail address, or advertise in unsolicited
commercial electronic mail sent to a Washington electronic mail
address.
(2) It is unlawful for any person to use an electronic mail address
obtained by using automated means based on a combination of names,
letters, or numbers to do either of the following:
(a) Initiate or advertise in unsolicited commercial electronic mail
from Washington, or advertise in an unsolicited commercial electronic
mail sent from Washington;
(b) Initiate or advertise in unsolicited commercial electronic mail
to a Washington electronic mail address, or advertise in an unsolicited
commercial electronic mail sent to a Washington electronic mail
address.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to use scripts or other automated
means to register for multiple electronic mail accounts from which to
do, or to enable another person to do, either of the following:
(a) Initiate or advertise in unsolicited commercial electronic mail
from Washington, or advertise in an unsolicited commercial electronic
mail sent from Washington;
(b) Initiate or advertise in unsolicited commercial electronic mail
to a Washington electronic mail address, or advertise in an unsolicited
commercial electronic mail sent to a Washington electronic mail
address.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 19.190 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, the following words have the
following meanings:
(a) "Electronic mail advertisement" means any electronic mail
message, the principal purpose of which is to promote, directly or
indirectly, the sale or other distribution of goods or services to the
recipient.
(b) "Unsolicited electronic mail advertisement" means any
electronic mail advertisement that meets both of the following
requirements:
(i) It is addressed to a recipient with whom the initiator does not
have an existing business or personal relationship.
(ii) It is not sent at the request of or with the express consent
of the recipient.
(c) "Initiation" of an unsolicited electronic mail advertisement
refers to the action by the initial sender of the electronic mail
advertisement. It does not refer to the actions of any intervening
electronic mail service provider that may handle or retransmit the
electronic message.
(d) "Registered user" means any individual, corporation, or other
entity that maintains an electronic mail address with an electronic
mail service provider.
(2) No registered user of an interactive computer service shall use
or cause to be used that service's equipment located in this state in
violation of that electronic mail service's policy prohibiting or
restricting the use of its service or equipment for the initiation of
unsolicited electronic mail advertisements.
(3) No individual, corporation, or other entity shall use or cause
to be used, by initiating an unsolicited electronic mail advertisement,
an interactive computer service located in this state in violation of
that service's policy prohibiting or restricting the use of its
equipment to deliver unsolicited electronic mail advertisements to its
registered users.
(4) An interactive computer service shall not be required to create
a policy prohibiting or restricting the use of its equipment for the
initiation or delivery of unsolicited electronic mail advertisements.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict
the rights of an interactive computer service under section 230(c)(1)
of Title 47 of the United States Code, or any decision of an
interactive computer service to permit or to restrict access to or use
of its system, or any exercise of its editorial function.
(6)(a) In addition to any other action available under law, any
interactive computer service whose policy on unsolicited electronic
mail advertisements is violated as provided in this section may bring
a civil action to recover the actual monetary loss suffered by that
service by reason of that violation, or damages of fifty dollars for
each electronic mail message initiated or delivered in violation of
this section, up to a maximum of twenty-five thousand dollars per day,
whichever amount is greater.
(b) In any action brought pursuant to (a) of this subsection, the
court may award reasonable attorneys' fees to a prevailing party.
(c)(i) In any action brought pursuant to (a) of this subsection,
the interactive computer service shall be required to establish as an
element of its cause of action that prior to the alleged violation, the
defendant had actual notice of both of the following:
(A) The interactive computer service's policy on unsolicited
electronic mail advertising;
(B) The fact that the defendant's unsolicited electronic mail
advertisements would use or cause to be used the interactive computer
service's equipment located in this state.
(ii) In this regard, the legislature finds that with rapid advances
in internet technology, and electronic mail technology in particular,
interactive computer services are already experimenting with embedding
policy statements directly into the software running on the computers
used to provide electronic mail services in a manner that displays the
policy statements every time an electronic mail delivery is requested.
While the state of the technology does not support such a finding at
present, the legislature believes that, in a given case at some future
date, a showing that notice was supplied via electronic means between
the sending and receiving computers could be held to constitute actual
notice to the sender for purposes of this subsection (6)(c)(ii).
(d)(i) An interactive computer service who has brought an action
against a party for a violation subject to RCW 19.190.030 or 19.190.040
shall not bring an action against that party under this section for the
same unsolicited commercial electronic mail advertisement.
(ii) An interactive computer service who has brought an action
against a party for a violation of this section shall not bring an
action against that party under RCW 19.190.030 or 19.190.040 for the
same unsolicited commercial electronic mail advertisement.
(7) A cause of action that is in existence before the effective
date of this act shall not be affected by this act, but shall instead
be governed by the law that was in effect at the time the cause of
action arose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---