BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.60.040 and 2003 c 53 s 78 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal impersonation in the first
degree if the person:
(a) Assumes a false identity and does an act in his or her assumed
character with intent to defraud another or for any other unlawful
purpose; or
(b) Pretends to be a representative of some person or organization
or a public servant and does an act in his or her pretended capacity
with intent to defraud another or for any other unlawful purpose.
(2) Criminal impersonation in the first degree is a ((gross
misdemeanor)) class C felony.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.60.045 and 2003 c 53 s 79 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal impersonation in the second
degree if the person:
(a) Claims to be a law enforcement officer or creates an impression
that he or she is a law enforcement officer; and
(b) Under circumstances not amounting to criminal impersonation in
the first degree, does an act with intent to convey the impression that
he or she is acting in an official capacity and a reasonable person
would believe the person is a law enforcement officer.
(2) Criminal impersonation in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---