BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Signal preemption device" means a device that is capable of
altering the normal operation of a traffic control signal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Signal preemption devices shall not be installed or used on or
with any vehicle other than an emergency vehicle authorized by the
state patrol, a publicly owned law enforcement or emergency vehicle, a
department of transportation, city, or county maintenance vehicle, or
a public transit vehicle.
(2) It is unlawful to do any of the following:
(a) Possess a signal preemption device except as authorized in
subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Use a signal preemption device except as authorized in
subsection (4) of this section;
(c) Sell a signal preemption device to a person other than a person
described in subsection (4) of this section;
(d) Purchase a signal preemption device for use other than a duty
as described in subsection (4) of this section.
(3)(a) A person who violates subsection (2)(a) of this section is
guilty of a misdemeanor unless (c) of this subsection applies.
(b) A person who violates subsection (2)(b), (c), or (d) of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor unless (c) of this subsection
applies.
(c)(i) A person who violates subsection (2) of this section, which
violation results in a traffic accident, is guilty of a class C felony.
(ii) A person who violates subsection (2) of this section, which
violation results in substantial bodily harm as defined in RCW
9A.04.110, is guilty of a class B felony.
(iii) A person who violates subsection (2) of this section, which
violation results in the death of another, is guilty of a class B
felony.
(4) This section does not apply to any of the following:
(a) A law enforcement agency and law enforcement personnel in the
course of providing law enforcement services;
(b) A fire station or a fire fighter in the course of providing
fire prevention or fire extinguishing services;
(c) An emergency medical service or ambulance in the course of
providing emergency medical transportation or ambulance services;
(d) An operator, passenger, or owner of an authorized emergency
vehicle in the course of his or her emergency duties;
(e) Department of transportation, city, or county maintenance
personnel while performing maintenance;
(f) Public transit personnel in the performance of their duties.
However, public transit personnel operating a signal preemption device
shall have second degree priority to law enforcement personnel, fire
fighters, emergency medical personnel, and other authorized emergency
vehicle personnel, when simultaneously approaching the same traffic
control signal;
(g) A mail or package delivery service or employee or agent of a
mail or package delivery service in the course of shipping or
delivering a signal preemption device;
(h) An employee or agent of a signal preemption device manufacturer
or retailer in the course of his or her employment in providing,
selling, manufacturing, or transporting a signal preemption device to
an individual or agency described in this subsection.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.37.190 and 1993 c 401 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every authorized emergency vehicle shall, in addition to any
other equipment and distinctive marking required by this chapter, be
equipped with at least one lamp capable of displaying a red light
visible from at least five hundred feet in normal sunlight and a siren
capable of giving an audible signal.
(2) Every school bus and private carrier bus shall, in addition to
any other equipment and distinctive markings required by this chapter,
be equipped with a "stop" signal upon a background not less than
fourteen by eighteen inches displaying the word "stop" in letters of
distinctly contrasting colors not less than eight inches high, and
shall further be equipped with signal lamps mounted as high and as
widely spaced laterally as practicable, which shall be capable of
displaying to the front two alternately flashing red lights located at
the same level and to the rear two alternately flashing red lights
located at the same level and these lights shall have sufficient
intensity to be visible at five hundred feet in normal sunlight.
(3) Vehicles operated by public agencies whose law enforcement
duties include the authority to stop and detain motor vehicles on the
public highways of the state may be equipped with a siren and lights of
a color and type designated by the state patrol for that purpose. The
state patrol may prohibit the use of these sirens and lights on
vehicles other than the vehicles described in this subsection.
(4) The lights described in this section shall not be mounted nor
used on any vehicle other than a school bus, a private carrier bus, or
an authorized emergency or law enforcement vehicle. ((Optical strobe
light devices shall not be installed or used on any vehicle other than
an emergency vehicle authorized by the state patrol, a publicly owned
law enforcement or emergency vehicle, a department of transportation,
city, or county maintenance vehicle, or a public transit vehicle.
(a) An "optical strobe light device" used by emergency vehicles
means a strobe light device which emits an optical signal at a specific
frequency to a traffic control light enabling the emergency vehicle in
which the strobe light device is used to obtain the right of way at
intersections.
(b) An "optical strobe light device" used by department of
transportation, city, or county maintenance vehicles means a strobe
light device that emits an optical signal at a specific frequency to a
traffic control light enabling the department of transportation
maintenance vehicle in which the strobe light device is used to perform
maintenance tests.
(c) An "optical strobe light device" used by public transit
vehicles means a strobe light device that emits an optical signal at a
specific frequency to a traffic control light enabling the public
transit vehicle in which the strobe light device is used to accelerate
the cycle of the traffic control light. For the purposes of this
section, "public transit vehicle" means vehicles, owned by a
governmental entity, with a seating capacity for twenty-five or more
persons and used to provide mass transportation. Public transit
vehicles operating an optical strobe light will have second degree
priority to emergency vehicles when simultaneously approaching the same
traffic control light.))
(5) The use of the signal equipment described ((herein)) in this
section and section 2 of this act, except the ((optical strobe light))
signal preemption devices used by public transit vehicles and
department of transportation, city, or county maintenance vehicles that
are not used in conjunction with emergency equipment, shall impose upon
drivers of other vehicles the obligation to yield right of way and stop
as prescribed in RCW 46.61.210, 46.61.370, and 46.61.350.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2003 c 335 s 5, 2003 c 283 s 33, 2003 c
267 s 3, 2003 c 250 s 14, 2003 c 119 s 8, 2003 c 53 s 56, and 2003 c 52
s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Signal Preemption Device, Use
causing death (section 2(3)(c)(iii)
of this act)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Signal Preemption Device, Use
causing substantial bodily harm
(section 2(3)(c)(ii) of this act)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 5 RCW 46.63.020 and 2003 c 33 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and
registration and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed
or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to initial registration of motor
vehicles;
(7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a
vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(22) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale, distribution, or
installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(23) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(24) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(25) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(26) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(27) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen,
and appraisers;
(28) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(29) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(30) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(31) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or fire fighters;
(32) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or
cooperate with an officer;
(33) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(34) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;
(35) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(36) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(37) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one
driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(38) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;
(39) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(40) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;
(41) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway
workers;
(42) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;
(43) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended
vehicle with the motor running;
(44) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;
(45) Section 2 of this act relating to signal preemption devices;
(46) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt
to cancel a traffic citation;
(((46))) (47) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((47))) (48) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic
offenders;
(((48))) (49) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to
obtain a refund;
(((49))) (50) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle
business practices, except where that chapter provides for the
assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((50))) (51) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((51))) (52) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((52))) (53) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((53))) (54) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((54))) (55) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((55))) (56) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((56))) (57) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((57))) (58) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---