BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is credited against the tax imposed under this chapter,
twenty-five percent of the value donated for the provision in this
state of low-cost housing to low-income buyers. The donation must be
made to a nonprofit organization that devotes a majority of its
resources to the development, rehabilitation, or preservation of
affordable housing. The department shall make available to prospective
donors a list of nonprofit organizations that qualify as nonprofit
organizations devoting a majority of their resources to housing
construction.
(2) For the purpose of this section "affordable housing" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 43.185A.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
construction materials or charges made for labor and services used in
the construction of a unit of low-cost housing, but only if the buyer
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department by rule.
(2) In making rules to implement this section the department shall
require that the tax shall be immediately due and payable together with
interest and penalties if the unit of low-cost housing being
constructed is not sold to a low-income buyer by the seller who has
claimed the exemption.
(3) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Low-cost housing" means housing that has a listed sales price
of no more than two-thirds the median sales price for homes in the
county where the housing is located, adjusted annually.
(b) "Low-income buyer" means a buyer who has an income of no more
than eighty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household
size, for the county where the house is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of
construction materials or labor and services used in the construction
of a unit of low-cost housing, but only if the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department by rule.
(2) In making rules to implement this section the department shall
require that the tax shall be immediately due and payable together with
interest and penalties if the unit of low-cost housing being
constructed is not sold to a low-income buyer by the seller who has
claimed the exemption.
(3) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Low-cost housing" means housing that has a listed sales price
of no more than two-thirds the median sales price for homes in the
county where the housing is located, adjusted annually.
(b) "Low-income buyer" means a buyer who has an income of no more
than eighty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household
size, for the county where the house is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tax imposed under this chapter does not apply to sales of
low-cost housing to low-income buyers.
(2) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Low-cost housing" means housing that has a listed sales price
of no more than two-thirds the median sales price for homes in the
county where the housing is located, adjusted annually.
(b) "Low-income buyer" means a buyer who has an income of no more
than eighty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household
size, for the county where the house is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tax imposed under this chapter does not apply to sales of
low-cost housing to low-income buyers.
(2) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Low-cost housing" means housing that has a listed sales price
of no more than two-thirds the median sales price for homes in the
county where the housing is located, adjusted annually.
(b) "Low-income buyer" means a buyer who has an income of no more
than eighty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household
size, for the county where the house is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---