BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.60.030 and 1997 c 271 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to be free from discrimination because of race,
creed, color, national origin, sex, genetic information, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of
a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person is
recognized as and declared to be a civil right. This right shall
include, but not be limited to:
(a) The right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination;
(b) The right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations,
advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement;
(c) The right to engage in real estate transactions without
discrimination, including discrimination against families with
children;
(d) The right to engage in credit transactions without
discrimination;
(e) The right to engage in insurance transactions or transactions
with health maintenance organizations without discrimination:
PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300,
48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice for the
purposes of this subparagraph; and
(f) The right to engage in commerce free from any discriminatory
boycotts or blacklists. Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for
purposes of this section shall be defined as the formation or execution
of any express or implied agreement, understanding, policy or
contractual arrangement for economic benefit between any persons which
is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United States and
which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly or
covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to
restrict, condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude
any person or persons from any business relationship on the basis of
race, color, creed, religion, sex, the presence of any sensory, mental,
or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service
animal by a disabled person, or national origin or lawful business
relationship: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That nothing herein contained shall
prohibit the use of boycotts as authorized by law pertaining to labor
disputes and unfair labor practices.
(2) Any person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in
violation of this chapter shall have a civil action in a court of
competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations, or to recover the
actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together with the cost
of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other appropriate
remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights Act
of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988
(42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).
(3) Except for any unfair practice committed by an employer against
an employee or a prospective employee, or any unfair practice in a real
estate transaction which is the basis for relief specified in the
amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained in chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any
unfair practice prohibited by this chapter which is committed in the
course of trade or commerce as defined in the Consumer Protection Act,
chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying that chapter, a
matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in relation to
the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.040 and 1997 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal
representatives, trustees and receivers, or any group of persons; it
includes any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, agent, or employee,
whether one or more natural persons; and further includes any political
or civil subdivisions of the state and any agency or instrumentality of
the state or of any political or civil subdivision thereof;
(2) "Commission" means the Washington state human rights
commission;
(3) "Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an
employer, directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more persons,
and does not include any religious or sectarian organization not
organized for private profit;
(4) "Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or
her parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any
person;
(5) "Genetic information" is information about inherited
characteristics which can be derived from a DNA-based or other
laboratory test, family history, or medical examination.
(6) "Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for
the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning
grievances or terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual
aid or protection in connection with employment;
(((6))) (7) "Employment agency" includes any person undertaking
with or without compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place
employees for an employer;
(((7))) (8) "Marital status" means the legal status of being
married, single, separated, divorced, or widowed;
(((8))) (9) "National origin" includes "ancestry";
(((9))) (10) "Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any
service, commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold on,
or by, any establishment to the public, and the admission of any person
to accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place
of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, without acts
directly or indirectly causing persons of any particular race, creed,
color, sex, national origin, or with any sensory, mental, or physical
disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person, to be treated as not welcome, accepted, desired, or
solicited;
(((10))) (11) "Any place of public resort, accommodation,
assemblage, or amusement" includes, but is not limited to, any place,
licensed or unlicensed, kept for gain, hire, or reward, or where
charges are made for admission, service, occupancy, or use of any
property or facilities, whether conducted for the entertainment,
housing, or lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit, use, or
accommodation of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the
burial or other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods,
merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of
personal services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land,
water, or in the air, including the stations and terminals thereof and
the garaging of vehicles, or where food or beverages of any kind are
sold for consumption on the premises, or where public amusement,
entertainment, sports, or recreation of any kind is offered with or
without charge, or where medical service or care is made available, or
where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for amusement,
recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators, and
public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more
tenants, or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library
or educational institution, or schools of special instruction, or
nursery schools, or day care centers or children's camps: PROVIDED,
That nothing contained in this definition shall be construed to include
or apply to any institute, bona fide club, or place of accommodation,
which is by its nature distinctly private, including fraternal
organizations, though where public use is permitted that use shall be
covered by this chapter; nor shall anything contained in this
definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium, crematory,
mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide religious
or sectarian institution;
(((11))) (12) "Real property" includes buildings, structures,
dwellings, real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real
estate cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and
incorporeal, or any interest therein;
(((12))) (13) "Real estate transaction" includes the sale,
appraisal, brokering, exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real
property, transacting or applying for a real estate loan, or the
provision of brokerage services;
(((13))) (14) "Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion
thereof that is occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as,
a residence by one or more families, and any vacant land that is
offered for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of
any such building, structure, or portion thereof;
(((14))) (15) "Sex" means gender;
(((15))) (16) "Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims
to have been injured by an unfair practice in a real estate
transaction; or (b) believes that he or she will be injured by an
unfair practice in a real estate transaction that is about to occur;
(((16))) (17) "Complainant" means the person who files a complaint
in a real estate transaction;
(((17))) (18) "Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint
or amended complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate
transaction;
(((18))) (19) "Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end
credit transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment
transaction, credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for
personal or for business purposes, in which a service, finance, or
interest charge is imposed, or which provides for repayment in
scheduled payments, when such credit is extended in the regular course
of any trade or commerce, including but not limited to transactions by
banks, savings and loan associations or other financial lending
institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a merchant or
mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business permits
or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom
may be deferred;
(((19))) (20) "Families with children status" means one or more
individuals who have not attained the age of eighteen years being
domiciled with a parent or another person having legal custody of such
individual or individuals, or with the designee of such parent or other
person having such legal custody, with the written permission of such
parent or other person. Families with children status also applies to
any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal
custody of any individual who has not attained the age of eighteen
years;
(((20))) (21) "Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or
more elevators; and (b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units;
(((21))) (22) "Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces,
parts, components, or elements of a building, including individual
dwelling units and the public and common use areas of a building;
(((22))) (23) "Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the
purpose of guiding blind persons or a dog that is trained for the
purpose of assisting hearing impaired persons;
(((23))) (24) "Service animal" means an animal that is trained for
the purpose of assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory,
mental, or physical disability.

--- END ---