BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A well-trained construction trades work
force is critical to the ability of the state of Washington to
construct public works. Studies of the state's work force highlight
population trends that, without a concerted effort to offset them, will
lead to an inadequate supply of skilled workers in the construction
industry. State government regularly constructs public works. The
efficient and economical construction of public works projects will be
harmed if there is not an ample supply of trained construction workers.
Apprenticeship training programs are particularly effective in
providing training and experience to individuals seeking to enter or
advance in the work force. By providing for apprenticeship utilization
on public works projects, state government can create opportunities for
training and experience that will help assure that a trained work force
will be available in sufficient numbers in the future for the
construction of public works.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this section and sections 1 and 3 of this act unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Apprentice" means an apprentice enrolled in a state-approved
apprenticeship training program.
(2) "Apprentice utilization requirement" means the requirement that
the appropriate percentage of labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(3) "Labor hours" means the total hours of workers receiving an
hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the public works
project. "Labor hours" includes hours performed by workers employed by
the contractor and all subcontractors working on the project. "Labor
hours" does not include hours worked by foremen, superintendents,
owners, and workers who are not subject to prevailing wage
requirements.
(4) "State-approved apprenticeship training program" means an
apprenticeship training program approved by the Washington state
apprenticeship council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) From January 1, 2004, and thereafter,
for all public works estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all
specifications shall require that no less than fifteen percent of the
labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(2) Awarding agency directors may adjust the requirements of this
section for a specific project for the following reasons:
(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in
specific geographic areas;
(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor
hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of
apprentice participation;
(c) Participating contractors have demonstrated a good faith effort
to comply with the requirements of this act; or
(d) Other criteria the awarding agency director deems appropriate,
which are subject to review by the office of the governor.
(3) This section applies only to public works contracts awarded by
the state. However, this section does not apply to contracts awarded
by state agencies headed by a separately elected public official or the
department of transportation.
(4)(a) The department of general administration must provide
information and technical assistance to affected agencies and collect
the following data from affected agencies for each project covered by
this section:
(i) The name of each apprentice and apprentice registration number;
(ii) The name of each project;
(iii) The dollar value of each project;
(iv) The date of the contractor's notice to proceed;
(v) The number of apprentices and labor hours worked by them,
categorized by trade or craft;
(vi) The number of journey level workers and labor hours worked by
them, categorized by trade or craft; and
(vii) The number, type, and rationale for the exceptions granted
under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The department of labor and industries shall assist the
department of general administration in providing information and
technical assistance.
(5) At the request of the senate commerce and trade committee, the
house of representatives commerce and labor committee, or their
successor committees, and the governor, the department of general
administration and the department of labor and industries shall
compile and summarize the agency data and provide a joint report. The
report shall include recommendations on modifications or improvements
to the apprentice utilization program and information on skill
shortages in each trade or craft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 39.04 RCW.

--- END ---