BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "health care provider" has the same
meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.
(2) An insurer may not retroactively deny, adjust, or seek
recoupment or refund of a paid claim for health care expenses submitted
by a health care provider for any reason, other than fraud or
coordination of benefits, after the expiration of one year from the
date that the initial claim was paid. Retroactive denials,
adjustments, recoupments, or refunds based on coordination of benefits
are governed by subsection (3) of this section. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law or contract to the contrary, if an insurer
retroactively denies, adjusts, or seeks recoupment or refund of a paid
claim, the health care provider has an additional period of six months
from the date that the notice required by subsection (4) of this
section was received within which to file either a revised claim or a
request for reconsideration with additional medical records or
information.
(3) An insurer may not retroactively deny, adjust, or seek
recoupment or refund of a paid claim submitted by a health care
provider for reasons related to coordination of benefits with another
insurer or entity responsible for payment of the claim after the
expiration of eighteen months from the date that the original claim was
paid. If the insurer retroactively denies, adjusts, or seeks
recoupment or refund of a paid claim based on coordination of benefits,
the insurer must provide the health care provider with notice
specifying the reason for the denial, adjustment, recoupment, or
refund, and provide the name and address of the entity acknowledging
responsibility for payment of the denied claim. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law or contract to the contrary, if an insurer
retroactively denies reimbursement for services as a result of
coordination of benefits with another insurer, the health care provider
has an additional six months from the date that the health care
provider received the notice specified in this subsection to submit a
claim for reimbursement for the service to the insurer, health service
corporation, health benefit plan, medical assistance program,
government health benefit program, or other entity responsible for
payment for the services provided.
(4) An insurer that retroactively denies, adjusts, or seeks
recoupment or refund of a paid claim submitted by a health care
provider must give the health care provider notice specifying the
reason for the action taken. Any retroactive denials, adjustments, or
requests for recoupment or refund of previous payments that are based
upon medical necessity determinations, level of service determinations,
coding errors, or billing irregularities must be reconciled to specific
claims. A health care provider who disputes or contests the basis for
the retroactive denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment or refund
on all or any portion of a claim must notify the insurer within thirty
days after the provider receives the notice that the retroactive
denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment or refund for overpayment
is disputed or contested. If the health care provider disputes or
contests the retroactive denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment
or refund, then any disputed or contested overpayment is not subject to
recoupment, refunds, or adjustment by the insurer until all the appeals
procedures, hearings, or other remedies available to the health care
provider have been finally decided in favor of the insurer.
(5) The requirements of this section may not be waived between the
health care provider and an insurer. This section does not prevent or
preclude an insurer from recovering in a court of law from a
subscriber, enrollee, or beneficiary any amounts paid to a health care
provider for benefits to which the subscriber, enrollee, or beneficiary
was not entitled under the terms and conditions of the contract of
insurance or the coverage agreement if the insurer is barred from
seeking a retroactive denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment or
refund from the health care provider under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "health care provider" has the same
meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.
(2) An insurer may not retroactively deny, adjust, or seek
recoupment or refund of a paid claim for health care expenses submitted
by a health care provider for any reason, other than fraud or
coordination of benefits, after the expiration of one year from the
date that the initial claim was paid. Retroactive denials,
adjustments, recoupments, or refunds based on coordination of benefits
are governed by subsection (3) of this section. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law or contract to the contrary, if an insurer
retroactively denies, adjusts, or seeks recoupment or refund of a paid
claim, the health care provider has an additional period of six months
from the date that the notice required by subsection (4) of this
section was received within which to file either a revised claim or a
request for reconsideration with additional medical records or
information.
(3) An insurer may not retroactively deny, adjust, or seek
recoupment or refund of a paid claim submitted by a health care
provider for reasons related to coordination of benefits with another
insurer or entity responsible for payment of the claim after the
expiration of eighteen months from the date that the original claim was
paid. If the insurer retroactively denies, adjusts, or seeks
recoupment or refund of a paid claim based on coordination of benefits,
the insurer must provide the health care provider with notice
specifying the reason for the denial, adjustment, recoupment, or
refund, and provide the name and address of the entity acknowledging
responsibility for payment of the denied claim. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law or contract to the contrary, if an insurer
retroactively denies reimbursement for services as a result of
coordination of benefits with another insurer, the health care provider
has an additional six months from the date that the health care
provider received the notice specified in this subsection to submit a
claim for reimbursement for the service to the insurer, health service
corporation, health benefit plan, medical assistance program,
government health benefit program, or other entity responsible for
payment for the services provided.
(4) An insurer that retroactively denies, adjusts, or seeks
recoupment or refund of a paid claim submitted by a health care
provider must give the health care provider notice specifying the
reason for the action taken. Any retroactive denials, adjustments, or
requests for recoupment or refund of previous payments that are based
upon medical necessity determinations, level of service determinations,
coding errors, or billing irregularities must be reconciled to specific
claims. A health care provider who disputes or contests the basis for
the retroactive denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment or refund
on all or any portion of a claim must notify the insurer within thirty
days after the provider receives the notice that the retroactive
denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment or refund for overpayment
is disputed or contested. If the health care provider disputes or
contests the retroactive denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment
or refund, then any disputed or contested overpayment is not subject to
recoupment, refunds, or adjustment by the insurer until all the appeals
procedures, hearings, or other remedies available to the health care
provider have been finally decided in favor of the insurer.
(5) The requirements of this section may not be waived between the
health care provider and an insurer. This section does not prevent or
preclude an insurer from recovering in a court of law from a
subscriber, enrollee, or beneficiary any amounts paid to a health care
provider for benefits to which the subscriber, enrollee, or beneficiary
was not entitled under the terms and conditions of the contract of
insurance or the coverage agreement if the insurer is barred from
seeking a retroactive denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment or
refund from the health care provider under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "health care provider" has the same
meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.
(2) A health care service contractor may not retroactively deny,
adjust, or seek recoupment or refund of a paid claim for health care
expenses submitted by a health care provider for any reason, other than
fraud or coordination of benefits, after the expiration of one year
from the date that the initial claim was paid. Retroactive denials,
adjustments, recoupments, or refunds based on coordination of benefits
are governed by subsection (3) of this section. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law or contract to the contrary, if a health care
service contractor retroactively denies, adjusts, or seeks recoupment
or refund of a paid claim, the health care provider has an additional
period of six months from the date that the notice required by
subsection (4) of this section was received within which to file either
a revised claim or a request for reconsideration with additional
medical records or information.
(3) A health care service contractor may not retroactively deny,
adjust, or seek recoupment or refund of a paid claim submitted by a
health care provider for reasons related to coordination of benefits
with another insurer or entity responsible for payment of the claim
after the expiration of eighteen months from the date that the original
claim was paid. If the health care service contractor retroactively
denies, adjusts, or seeks recoupment or refund of a paid claim based on
coordination of benefits, the health care service contractor must
provide the health care provider with notice specifying the reason for
the denial, adjustment, recoupment, or refund, and provide the name and
address of the entity acknowledging responsibility for payment of the
denied claim. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or contract
to the contrary, if a health care service contractor retroactively
denies reimbursement for services as a result of coordination of
benefits with another insurer, the health care provider has an
additional six months from the date that the health care provider
received the notice specified in this subsection to submit a claim for
reimbursement for the service to the insurer, health service
corporation, health benefit plan, medical assistance program,
government health benefit program, or other entity responsible for
payment for the services provided.
(4) A health care service contractor that retroactively denies,
adjusts, or seeks recoupment or refund of a paid claim submitted by a
health care provider must give the health care provider notice
specifying the reason for the action taken. Any retroactive denials,
adjustments, or requests for recoupment or refund of previous payments
that are based upon medical necessity determinations, level of service
determinations, coding errors, or billing irregularities must be
reconciled to specific claims. A health care provider who disputes or
contests the basis for the retroactive denial, adjustment, or request
for recoupment or refund on all or any portion of a claim must notify
the health care service contractor within thirty days after the
provider receives the notice that the retroactive denial, adjustment,
or request for recoupment or refund for overpayment is disputed or
contested. If the health care provider disputes or contests the
retroactive denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment or refund,
then any disputed or contested overpayment is not subject to
recoupment, refunds, or adjustment by the health care service
contractor until all the appeals procedures, hearings, or other
remedies available to the health care provider have been finally
decided in favor of the health care service contractor.
(5) The requirements of this section may not be waived between the
health care provider and a health care service contractor. This
section does not prevent or preclude a health care service contractor
from recovering in a court of law from a subscriber, enrollee, or
beneficiary any amounts paid to a health care provider for benefits to
which the subscriber, enrollee, or beneficiary was not entitled under
the terms and conditions of the contract of insurance or the coverage
agreement if the health care service contractor is barred from seeking
a retroactive denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment or refund
from the health care provider under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "health care provider" has the same
meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.
(2) A health maintenance organization may not retroactively deny,
adjust, or seek recoupment or refund of a paid claim for health care
expenses submitted by a health care provider for any reason, other than
fraud or coordination of benefits, after the expiration of one year
from the date that the initial claim was paid. Retroactive denials,
adjustments, recoupments, or refunds based on coordination of benefits
are governed by subsection (3) of this section. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law or contract to the contrary, if a health
maintenance organization retroactively denies, adjusts, or seeks
recoupment or refund of a paid claim, the health care provider has an
additional period of six months from the date that the notice required
by subsection (4) of this section was received within which to file
either a revised claim or a request for reconsideration with additional
medical records or information.
(3) A health maintenance organization may not retroactively deny,
adjust, or seek recoupment or refund of a paid claim submitted by a
health care provider for reasons related to coordination of benefits
with another insurer or entity responsible for payment of the claim
after the expiration of eighteen months from the date that the original
claim was paid. If the health maintenance organization retroactively
denies, adjusts, or seeks recoupment or refund of a paid claim based on
coordination of benefits, the health maintenance organization must
provide the health care provider with notice specifying the reason for
the denial, adjustment, recoupment, or refund, and provide the name and
address of the entity acknowledging responsibility for payment of the
denied claim. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or contract
to the contrary, if a health maintenance organization retroactively
denies reimbursement for services as a result of coordination of
benefits with another insurer, the health care provider has an
additional six months from the date that the health care provider
received the notice specified in this subsection to submit a claim for
reimbursement for the service to the insurer, health service
corporation, health benefit plan, medical assistance program,
government health benefit program, or other entity responsible for
payment for the services provided.
(4) A health maintenance organization that retroactively denies,
adjusts, or seeks recoupment or refund of a paid claim submitted by a
health care provider must give the health care provider notice
specifying the reason for the action taken. Any retroactive denials,
adjustments, or requests for recoupment or refund of previous payments
that are based upon medical necessity determinations, level of service
determinations, coding errors, or billing irregularities must be
reconciled to specific claims. A health care provider who disputes or
contests the basis for the retroactive denial, adjustment, or request
for recoupment or refund on all or any portion of a claim must notify
the health maintenance organization within thirty days after the
provider receives the notice that the retroactive denial, adjustment,
or request for recoupment or refund for overpayment is disputed or
contested. If the health care provider disputes or contests the
retroactive denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment or refund,
then any disputed or contested overpayment is not subject to
recoupment, refunds, or adjustment by the health maintenance
organization until all the appeals procedures, hearings, or other
remedies available to the health care provider have been finally
decided in favor of the health maintenance organization.
(5) The requirements of this section may not be waived between the
health care provider and a health maintenance organization. This
section does not prevent or preclude a health maintenance organization
from recovering in a court of law from a subscriber, enrollee, or
beneficiary any amounts paid to a health care provider for benefits to
which the subscriber, enrollee, or beneficiary was not entitled under
the terms and conditions of the contract of insurance or the coverage
agreement if the health maintenance organization is barred from seeking
a retroactive denial, adjustment, or request for recoupment or refund
from the health care provider under this section.

--- END ---