BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state of
Washington is endowed with a richness of federally granted state trust
lands given to our state at its creation. This endowment provides a
perpetual source of revenue set aside in trust to support education and
public facilities. These state trust lands, as well as state forest
lands, may also provide for other public benefits. These may include
economic, environmental, or social benefits, including public
recreation, that arise coincidentally with ownership of a large public
land base. Further, the legislature has established that it is the
policy of the state to secure for present and future generations the
benefits of a system of natural areas and conservation areas providing
for a variety of public purposes including scientific research,
ecological protection, outstanding scenery, and low-impact public
recreation.
The legislature further finds that use and enjoyment of these lands
for recreation and conservation purposes is extensive and growing; that
the quality of recreational experience, safety of the public,
maintenance of the trails and facilities, and protection of the lands
from environmental damage may be in jeopardy; and that funding to
support these recreation and natural area purposes has been steadily
declining in both real and per user terms.
The legislature further finds that the land endowment concept is
relevant today; that substantial revenue can be perpetually earned from
sustainable management of these lands and resources; and that the
creation of a new land trust, modeled on this durable concept and
managed for the public to produce revenue, is a viable and prudent
approach for generating financial support for maintenance of natural
areas and for managing recreation use on all state lands, state forest
lands, and other uplands managed by the department.
Therefore, it is the intent of this act to establish the legacy
trust for recreation and conservation, for the sole purpose of
generating a stable, long-term revenue source to support recreational
access and use on state lands and state forest lands, and maintenance
and protection of designated natural areas and conservation areas, and,
where consistent with this purpose, to help retain working commercial
forest land in the legacy trust as a vital component of Washington
state's landscape.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Conservation areas" has the same meaning as "natural resources
conservation area" as defined in RCW 79.71.030.
(2) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(3) "Legacy trust" means the legacy trust for recreation and
conservation created in section 3 of this act.
(4) "Natural areas" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
79.70.020.
(5) "State lands" and "state forest lands" have the same meaning as
elsewhere in this title, as provided in RCW 79.02.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legacy trust for recreation and
conservation is created as a trust. The legacy trust is composed of
lands, and improvements thereon, suitable for sustainable commercial
natural resource management or other commercial management. The legacy
trust must be managed in trust to provide financial support for the
management of public recreational access and use on state lands, state
forest lands, and other uplands managed by the department, as well as
management and protection of areas created under chapters 79.70 and
79.71 RCW and managed by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department is authorized to acquire,
by purchase, gift, donation, grant, transfer, or other means, except
eminent domain, fee interest or partial interest in lands or other real
property suitable for management as part of the legacy trust, or lands
or other real property whose acquisition can benefit the legacy trust;
however, no private lands primarily suitable for commercial agriculture
may be purchased for the legacy trust.
(2) The department is authorized to receive funds for purposes of
establishing the legacy trust from grants, gifts, bequests, or loans,
whether public or private, as well as from legislative appropriation.
All of the funds must be placed in the legacy and park land trust
revolving fund created in RCW 43.30.385.
(3) All acquisitions of real property for the legacy trust must be
approved by the board of natural resources. Prior to approving
acquisitions involving urban property, the board shall seek advice from
the land bank technical advisory committee established in RCW
79.19.070.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.30.385 and 2003 c 334 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legacy and park land trust revolving fund is to be utilized by
the department for the exclusive purpose of acquiring real property,
including all reasonable costs associated with these acquisitions, in
order to assemble the land base for the legacy trust for recreation and
conservation created in section 3 of this act, or as a replacement for
the property transferred to the state parks and recreation commission,
as directed by the legislature in order to maintain the land base of
the affected trusts or under RCW 79.22.060. Proceeds received under
section 4 of this act, or from transfers of real property to the state
parks and recreation commission, or other proceeds identified from
transfers of real property as directed by the legislature shall be
deposited in this fund. Disbursement from the legacy and park land
trust revolving fund to acquire ((replacement)) real property shall be
on the authorization of the department. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, the legacy and park land
trust revolving fund is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of
obligations from the fund.

Sec. 6 RCW 79.19.070 and 1984 c 222 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a land bank technical advisory committee,
consisting of three members. Membership shall consist of: One member
qualified by experience and training in matters pertaining to land use
planning and real estate appointed by the commissioner of public lands,
one member qualified by experience and training in public trust matters
appointed by the superintendent of public instruction, and one member
qualified by experience and training in financial matters appointed by
the state treasurer.
(2) The technical advisory committee shall provide professional
advice and counsel to the board of natural resources regarding land
bank sales, purchases, ((and)) exchanges involving urban property, and
regarding acquisitions involving urban property for the legacy trust
for recreation and conservation created in section 3 of this act.
(3) Members of the technical advisory committee shall be appointed
for five-year terms and shall serve until a successor is appointed. In
the case of a vacancy the vacancy shall be filled by the appointing
authority. The initial term of the appointee of the commissioner shall
expire in three years. The initial term of the appointee of the
superintendent shall expire in four years. The initial term of the
appointee of the treasurer shall expire in five years. All terms
expire December 31st.
(4) Members of the technical advisory committee shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The state attorney general, as
representative of the public and particularly those individuals who may
be benefited from the legacy trust, has the exclusive authority to
enforce the rights of the public to secure the proper administration of
the legacy trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department shall manage the legacy
trust in the same manner as state lands. The valuable materials
thereon may be sold or the land may be leased in the same manner and
for the same purposes as is authorized for state lands, if the
department finds such sale or lease to be in the best interests of the
legacy trust and approves the terms and conditions thereof.
(2) The department may exchange or directly transfer real property
held in the legacy trust in the same manner and for the same purposes
as state lands under chapter 79.02 RCW or RCW 79.17.010(1). Legacy
trust lands, once acquired, may be sold for any lawful purpose and in
any parcel size with the approval of the board of natural resources.
Sales must be at public auction, and no land may be sold for less than
its appraised value. Any funds received as part of such an exchange,
transfer, or sale, after deduction for reasonable costs associated with
these transactions, must be placed in the legacy and park land trust
revolving fund created in RCW 43.30.385 and used to acquire replacement
real property for the legacy trust.
(3) Nothing in this section prevents the department from acquiring
real property subject to encumbrances, if the board of natural
resources finds that this is in the best interests of the legacy trust.
Nothing in this section prevents the department from placing or
accepting restrictions on the deeds of lands acquired for the legacy
trust, when consistent with the purpose of the legacy trust, so as to
perpetuate sustainable commercial forest management on lands
susceptible to conversion to nonforestry uses, or to conform to the
terms of a donation of lands or funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The legacy trust land management account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from up to twenty-five
percent of the revenue derived from management of real property held in
the legacy trust, as determined by the board of natural resources, must
be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for the purposes of carrying out the management activities of the
department on legacy trust lands, and for reimbursement, along with
interest, of any expenditures made from the resource management cost
account or the forest development account, for purposes of the legacy
trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The legacy recreation and conservation
trust account is created in the state treasury. All moneys received
from the management of real property held in the legacy trust, less the
money deposited in the legacy trust land management account created in
section 9 of this act, must be deposited into the account. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for the support and management of
recreation on state lands, state forest lands, and other uplands
managed by the department, under chapter 79.10 RCW, management of
natural areas, and conservation areas under chapters 79.70 and 79.71
RCW, consistent with the plans developed under section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Prior to a legislative session in which the
department first requests an appropriation from the legacy recreation
and conservation trust account created in section 10 of this act, the
department shall develop a six-year expenditure strategy to guide
requested appropriations from the account. The expenditure strategy
must be developed so as to achieve the purpose of this chapter. The
expenditure strategy must identify and prioritize expenditures
including, but not limited to: (1) Operation and maintenance and
capital upgrade, repair, replacement, restoration, and new construction
of facilities, trails, and access for dispersed recreation activities;
(2) maintenance and stewardship of natural areas and conservation areas
including, but not limited to, environmental restoration, weed control,
facilities upgrade, repair, replacement, and new construction; and (3)
public education, volunteer support, and law enforcement. Expenditures
from the legacy recreation and conservation trust account may not be
used to offset expenditures necessary to cover the costs of road system
management attributable solely to the generation of revenue from state
lands. However, expenditures may be made for road improvements
necessary for public safety or for continuation of public access to
state lands for recreational purposes. The department shall update the
expenditure strategy at least every two years. The department may
establish ad hoc review committees to assist in the development of the
expenditure strategy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 No later than September 1st of any
even-numbered year, the department shall submit to the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and senate and to the office
of financial management the current six-year expenditure strategy
prepared under section 11 of this act in support of its biennial
appropriation request from the legacy recreation and conservation trust
account created in section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 4, 7 through 12, and 14
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---