BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 89.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that conserved water from the developed
portions of the federal Columbia basin project can provide an immediate
source of surface water to offset a limited portion of ground water
depletions within the undeveloped portions of the federal project
extending the availability of ground water for domestic, municipal,
industrial, and agricultural uses. The department of ecology has
adopted rules establishing ground water management subareas within the
federal Columbia basin project. A primary purpose of some of the rules
was to manage ground water depletions that are occurring as a result of
the department's decision to allow continued deep well agricultural
irrigation in anticipation that development of the federal Columbia
basin project would continue at its historic pace and that project
water would replace ground water and recharge the depleted aquifer.
(2) The legislature also finds that recent studies have documented
water conservation in areas served by project irrigation districts as
a result of distribution system lining and piping and use of more
efficient conveyance system technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 89.12 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that the department of ecology
enter into agreements with the United States and Columbia basin project
irrigation districts regarding the allocation of water conserved from
within areas currently served by project waters to deep well irrigated
lands within the federal Columbia basin project and for other
authorized project beneficial uses. The department may provide the
irrigation districts data identifying areas with the most serious
ground water depletions. The irrigation districts shall consider and
may rely on the department's data and recommendations in making
allocation decisions to offset ground water withdrawals consistent with
the operational constraints of the distribution system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall issue a superseding water right permit or
certificate for a ground water right where the source of water is an
aquifer for which the department adopts rules establishing a ground
water management subarea and water from the federal Columbia basin
project is delivered for use by a person who holds such a ground water
right. The superseding water right permit or certificate shall
designate that portion of the ground water right that is replaced by
water from the federal Columbia basin project as a standby or reserve
right that may be used when water delivered by the federal project is
curtailed or otherwise not available. The period of curtailment or
unavailability shall be deemed a low flow period under RCW
90.14.140(2)(b). The total number of acres irrigated by the person
under the ground water right and through the use of water delivered
from the federal project must not exceed the quantity of water used and
number of acres irrigated under the person's water right permit or
certificate for the use of water from the aquifer.

--- END ---