BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.505 and 2000 c 5 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Health carriers and insurers shall adopt policies and
procedures that conform administrative, business, and operational
practices to protect an enrollee's right to privacy or right to
confidential health care services granted under state or federal laws.
(2) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section
after considering relevant standards adopted by national managed care
accreditation organizations and the national association of insurance
commissioners, and after considering the effect of those standards on
the ability of carriers to undertake enrollee care management and
disease management programs.
(3) Rules adopted by the commissioner may require that a carrier
provide notice of its privacy policies and practices to each subscriber
only upon enrollment or within sixty days of any material change to the
policy, and to any enrollee only upon request of the enrollee.

--- END ---