BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2000 c 5 s 19 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
((This act)) RCW 48.43.500 through 48.43.550 applies to: Health
plans as defined in RCW 48.43.005 offered, renewed, or issued by a
carrier; medical assistance provided under RCW 74.09.522, excluding
requirements set forth in RCW 48.43.535; the basic health plan offered
under chapter 70.47 RCW; and health benefits provided under chapter
41.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) RCW 48.43.500 through 48.43.550
constitute a subchapter under the heading of "health care patient bill
of rights compliance."
(2) 2000 c 5 s 19 (uncodified) and section 1 of this act are added
to chapter 48.43 RCW under the subchapter heading "health care patient
bill of rights compliance."

Sec. 3 RCW 48.43.545 and 2000 c 5 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health carrier shall adhere to the accepted standard of
care for health care providers under chapter 7.70 RCW when arranging
for the provision of medically necessary health care services to its
enrollees. A health carrier shall be liable for any and all harm
proximately caused by its failure to follow that standard of care when
the failure resulted in the denial, delay, or modification of the
health care service recommended for, or furnished to, an enrollee.
(b) A health carrier is also liable for damages under (a) of this
subsection for harm to an enrollee proximately caused by health care
treatment decisions that result from a failure to follow the accepted
standard of care made by its:
(i) Employees;
(ii) Agents; or
(iii) Ostensible agents who are acting on its behalf and over whom
it has the right to exercise influence or control or has actually
exercised influence or control.
(2) The provisions of this section may not be waived, shifted, or
modified by contract or agreement and responsibility for the provisions
shall be a duty that cannot be delegated. Any effort to waive, modify,
delegate, or shift liability for a breach of the duty established by
this section, through a contract for indemnification or otherwise, is
invalid.
(3) This section does not create any new cause of action, or
eliminate any presently existing cause of action, with respect to
health care providers and health care facilities that are included in
and subject to the provisions of chapter 7.70 RCW.
(4) It is a defense to any action or liability asserted under this
section against a health carrier that:
(a) The health care service in question is not a benefit provided
under the plan or the service is subject to limitations under the plan
that have been exhausted;
(b) Neither the health carrier, nor any employee, agent, or
ostensible agent for whose conduct the health carrier is liable under
subsection (1)(b) of this section, controlled, influenced, or
participated in the health care decision; or
(c) The health carrier did not deny or unreasonably delay payment
for treatment prescribed or recommended by a participating health care
provider for the enrollee.
(5) This section does not create any liability on the part of an
employer, an employer group purchasing organization that purchases
coverage or assumes risk on behalf of its employers, or a governmental
agency that purchases coverage on behalf of individuals and families.
The governmental entity established to offer and provide health
insurance to public employees, public retirees, and their covered
dependents under RCW 41.05.140 is subject to liability under this
section.
(6) Nothing in any law of this state prohibiting a health carrier
from practicing medicine or being licensed to practice medicine may be
asserted as a defense by the health carrier in an action brought
against it under this section.
(7)(a) A person may not maintain a cause of action under this
section against a health carrier unless:
(i) The affected enrollee has suffered substantial harm. As used
in this subsection, "substantial harm" means loss of life, loss or
significant impairment of limb, bodily or cognitive function,
significant disfigurement, or severe or chronic physical pain; and
(ii) The affected enrollee or the enrollee's representative has
exercised the opportunity established in RCW 48.43.535 to seek
independent review of the health care treatment decision, or the
opportunity for an adjudicative proceeding if the enrollee is receiving
medical assistance under RCW 74.09.522.
(b) This subsection (7) does not prohibit an enrollee from pursuing
other appropriate remedies, including injunctive relief, a declaratory
judgment, or other relief available under law, if its requirements
place the enrollee's health in serious jeopardy.
(8) In an action against a health carrier, a finding that a health
care provider is an employee, agent, or ostensible agent of such a
health carrier shall not be based solely on proof that the person's
name appears in a listing of approved physicians or health care
providers made available to enrollees under a health plan.
(9) Any action under this section shall be commenced within three
years of the completion of the independent review process.
(10) This section does not apply to workers' compensation insurance
under Title 51 RCW.

--- END ---