BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consumer reporting agencies may not include mere inquiries to
an insurer regarding the terms and conditions of an insured consumer's
real property insurance coverage to the agency's data base. Business
data bases used for comprehensive loss underwriting exchange purposes,
and relied upon by insurers for underwriting decisions, may only
contain information regarding actual claim history.
(2) All rights of inspection and correction, and other remedies
available under this chapter, apply to consumers of real property
insurance, in regard to data and reports or credit scores maintained by
consumer reporting agencies.

--- END ---