BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that first-time home
buyers in Washington state have been priced out of the housing market
in many counties. The legislature finds that many organizations,
including local governments, have recognized the affordable housing
crisis for first-time home buyers. The legislature finds that, for
example, as reported in King county's benchmark growth report, "buying
a first home remains extremely difficult for those under one hundred
twenty percent of median income." The legislature further finds that
growth management regulations contribute to the high cost of housing in
many Washington counties, and that loosening land use regulations will
reduce housing prices. The legislature finds that numerous studies
have determined that growth management restrictions increase the cost
of housing.
The legislature intends to make housing more affordable for first-time home buyers in counties where housing is currently not affordable
for first-time home buyers. The legislature intends to do this by
allowing single-family detached residential development to be placed
outside of urban growth boundaries at density levels currently
prohibited under the prevailing interpretation of the growth management
act. These single-family detached homes could be placed outside of
urban growth boundaries in counties where the first-time buyer housing
affordability index demonstrates that housing is not affordable for
first-time home buyers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, "first-time buyer housing
affordability index" means the index determined by the Washington
center for real estate research that measures the ability of a typical
renter household to afford the purchase of a typical starter home by
assuming: (a) The household will purchase a home priced at eighty-five
percent of area median with a ten percent down payment; (b) the home
mortgage loan is for a term of thirty years at the prevailing average
fixed rate of interest; (c) the potential first-time home buyer earns
seventy percent of the area median household income and twenty-five
percent of household income can be used for principal and interest
payments.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, a first-time buyer housing
affordability index of: (a) One hundred indicates that a household of
the defined income can afford a home of the defined price; (b) less
than one hundred indicates that a household of the defined income
cannot afford a home of the defined price without spending more than
twenty-five percent of their income on mortgage payments; and (c)
greater than one hundred indicates that a household of the defined
income can afford a home of the defined price while spending less than
twenty-five percent of their income on mortgage payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In any county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in which the
first-time buyer housing affordability index, as defined by section 2
of this act, and as determined by the Washington center for real estate
research at Washington State University, is less than one hundred for
three quarters in any given year, for the following two years the
county may permit single-family detached residential development of any
density outside the urban growth area designated according to RCW
36.70A.110. For purposes of this chapter, single-family detached
residential development authorized according to this section shall not
be considered urban growth located outside of an urban growth area.
Services provided to single-family detached residential development
permitted under this section shall not be considered urban services
located outside of an urban growth area.
(b) Any county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 implementing (a) of
this subsection may:
(i) Change its comprehensive plan and development regulations after
the determination in (a) of this subsection has been made by the
Washington center for real estate research to provide new locations for
or increased density of single-family detached residential development
as provided for in (a) of this subsection; or
(ii) Incorporate sections in its comprehensive plan and enact
development regulations that provide new locations for or increased
density of single-family detached residential development which are
contingent upon a determination under (a) of this subsection that the
first-time buyer housing affordability index was less than one hundred
for three quarters in any given year. In the event that the county
chooses to enact sections of its comprehensive plan and development
regulations, the county may provide that these sections and regulations
take effect January 1st of any year following the determination by the
Washington center for real estate research.
(2) The year-long period measured by the Washington center for real
estate research under subsection (1) of this section shall begin and
end in the third quarter of the calendar year. The time period for
which the ability to permit single-family residential development under
subsection (1) of this section shall begin January 1st of the year
following the determination by the Washington center for real estate
research.

--- END ---