BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Eligible regulated real property is exempt from taxation from
the state tax levy. Eligible regulated real property means real
property for which the land value has been reduced by ten percent or
more after November 20, 2002, as a result of regulation under a
shoreline master program adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW or under an
amendment to or new comprehensive plan or development regulations
adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW. The exemption continues until the
cumulative tax savings due to the exemption equals or exceeds the
reduction in value.
(2) A claim for exemption shall be made and filed on or before
March 31st with the county assessor. The claim for exemption must be
filed within two years of the adoption of the regulation. To establish
the value reduction, the property owner may petition the county
assessor under RCW 84.40.039. The value reduction shall be determined
with reference to the value on January 1st of the year in which the
regulation under subsection (1) of this section is adopted.
(3) When a value reduction is established by the assessor, the
owner may petition the county board of equalization for a change in the
value reduction within thirty days of being notified of the assessor's
valuation.
(4) The assessor shall either approve or deny the exemption and
notify the property owner in writing by August 1st. The property owner
may appeal the assessor's determination under the provisions of RCW
84.48.010.
(5) The levy for the state in any year shall be reduced as
necessary to prevent exemptions under this section from resulting in a
higher tax rate than would have occurred in the absence of the
exemptions under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2005 and thereafter.

--- END ---