BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that first-time home
buyers in Washington state have been priced out of the housing market
in many counties. The legislature finds that many organizations,
including local governments, have recognized the affordable housing
crisis for first-time home buyers. The legislature finds that, for
example, as reported in King county's benchmark growth report, "buying
a first home remains extremely difficult for those under one hundred
twenty percent of median income."
The legislature further finds that the state sales tax on
construction labor and services contributes to the high cost of housing
in many Washington counties, and that eliminating this tax will reduce
housing prices. The legislature also recognizes that the Washington
state tax structure study committee suggested that exempting
construction labor from the state sales tax would improve economic
vitality and harmonize Washington's sales tax provisions with other
nearby states.
The legislature intends to make housing more affordable for first-time home buyers in counties where housing is currently not affordable
for first-time home buyers. The legislature intends to do this by
eliminating the state sales tax on construction labor and services in
counties where the first-time buyer housing affordability index
demonstrates that housing is not affordable for first-time home buyers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to clearing
land, moving earth, site preparation, or constructing, repairing,
renovating, expanding, or improving of new or existing buildings,
structures, or other facilities under, upon, or above real property
for qualifying residential construction within qualifying counties for
two calendar years beginning January 1st following the department's
determination that a county is a qualifying county.
(2) The exemption under this section only applies to the state
portion of the sales tax.
(3) The seller shall retain any documentation the department deems
necessary for the proper administration of this section.
(4) If the department determines that the seller improperly
exempted a sale of labor or services under this section, a fifteen-percent penalty shall apply to taxes owed to the department as well as
interest and penalties under chapter 82.32 RCW.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Qualifying county" means a county for which the first-time
buyer housing affordability index is less than one hundred for three of
four quarters in any given year, as determined by the Washington center
for real estate research at Washington State University. The index
year shall begin July 1st and end June 30th of each year.
(b) "Qualifying residential construction" means the construction of
residential property where the residential property will be listed for
sale for less than the county average sales price for homes.
(c)(i) "First-time buyer housing affordability index" means the
index maintained by the Washington center for real estate research at
Washington State University that calculates whether a person who earns
seventy percent of the area median household income can make principal
and interest payments equal to twenty-five percent of household income
on a home priced at eighty-five percent of the county median sales
price for homes, if the person made a ten percent down payment and has
a mortgage with a term of thirty years at the prevailing average fixed
rate of interest;
(ii) The first-time buyer housing affordability index shall be
scaled so that a score of one hundred means that a potential first-time homebuyer with an income of seventy percent of the area median
household income who purchases a home priced at eighty-five percent of
the county median sales price for homes, using a ten percent
downpayment and a thirty-year mortgage at the prevailing average fixed
rate of interest will pay twenty-five percent of household income for
principal and interest. A score of less than one hundred indicates
that this buyer cannot afford this home without paying more than
twenty-five percent of household income.

--- END ---