BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon making a determination that an individual or licensee has
violated a commission rule, the board of stewards may assess a fine,
suspend or revoke a person's license, or any combination of these
penalties. The commission must adopt by rule standard penalties for a
rules violation. All fines collected must be deposited in the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, created
in section 4 of this act, and used as authorized in RCW 67.16.105(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners'
bonus fund account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts collected by the commission under RCW 67.16.102(1) must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only as authorized in RCW 67.16.102. Only the secretary of the
commission or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington horse racing commission operating account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts collected by the
commission under RCW 67.16.105(2) must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for operating expenses
of the commission. Investment earnings from the account must be
distributed to the Washington horse racing commission class C purse
fund account, created in section 4 of this act, pursuant to RCW
43.79A.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
RCW 67.16.105(3) must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for the purposes provided in RCW
67.16.105(3). Only the secretary of the commission or the secretary's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 5 RCW 67.16.010 and 1991 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context otherwise requires, words and phrases as used
herein shall mean:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" shall mean the Washington horse racing commission,
hereinafter created.
(2) "Parimutuel machine" shall mean and include both machines at
the track and machines at the satellite locations, that record
parimutuel bets and compute the payoff.
(3) "Person" shall mean and include individuals, firms,
corporations and associations.
(4) "Race meet" shall mean and include any exhibition of
thoroughbred, quarter horse, paint horse, appaloosa horse racing,
arabian horse racing, or standard bred harness horse racing, where the
parimutuel system is used.
((Singular shall include the plural, and the plural shall include
the singular; and words importing one gender shall be regarded as
including all other genders.))

Sec. 6 RCW 67.16.102 and 2001 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of chapter 67.16 RCW to the
contrary the licensee shall withhold and shall pay daily to the
commission, in addition to the percentages authorized by RCW 67.16.105,
one percent of the gross receipts of all parimutuel machines at each
race meet which sums shall, at the end of each meet, be paid by the
commission to the licensed owners of those horses finishing first,
second, third and fourth Washington bred only at each meet from which
the additional one percent is derived in accordance with an equitable
distribution formula to be promulgated by the commission prior to the
commencement of each race meet: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section
shall apply to race meets which are nonprofit in nature, are of ten
days or less, and have an average daily handle of less than one hundred
twenty thousand dollars((: PROVIDED, That)).
(2) The additional one percent ((of the gross receipts of all
parimutuel machines at each race meet and the amount retained by the
commission as specified in RCW 67.16.100(1))) specified in subsection
(1) of this section shall be deposited ((daily in a time deposit)) by
the commission ((and)) in the Washington horse racing commission
Washington bred owners' bonus fund account created in section 2 of this
act. The interest derived ((therefrom)) from this account shall be
distributed annually on an equal basis to those race courses at which
independent race meets are held which are nonprofit in nature and are
of ten days or less((: PROVIDED, That)). Prior to receiving a payment
under this ((section)) subsection any new race course shall meet the
qualifications set forth in this section for a period of two years((:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That said)). All funds distributed ((funds)) under
this subsection shall be used for the purpose of maintaining and
upgrading the respective racing courses and equine quartering areas of
said nonprofit meets.
(3) The commission shall not permit the licensees to take into
consideration the benefits derived from this section in establishing
purses.
(((2))) (4) The commission is authorized to pay at the end of the
calendar year one-half of the one percent collected from a new licensee
under subsection (1) of this section for reimbursement of capital
construction of that new licensee's new race track for a period of
fifteen years. This reimbursement does not include interest earned on
that one-half of one percent and such interest shall continue to be
collected and disbursed as provided in RCW 67.16.101 and subsection (1)
of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 67.16.105 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Licensees of race meets that are nonprofit in nature and are of
ten days or less shall be exempt from payment of a parimutuel tax.
(2) Licensees that do not fall under subsection (1) of this section
shall withhold and pay to the commission daily for each authorized day
of parimutuel wagering the following applicable percentage of all daily
gross receipts from its in-state parimutuel machines:
(a) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are more than fifty million dollars in the previous calendar year, the
licensee shall withhold and pay to the commission daily 1.30 percent of
the daily gross receipts; and
(b) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are fifty million dollars or less in the previous calendar year, the
licensee shall withhold and pay to the commission daily 1.803 percent
of the daily gross receipts.
(3) In addition to those amounts in subsection (2) of this section,
a licensee shall forward one-tenth of one percent of the daily gross
receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines to the commission for
payment to those nonprofit race meets as set forth in RCW 67.16.130 and
subsection (1) of this section, but said percentage shall not be
charged against the licensee. Payments to nonprofit race meets under
this subsection shall be distributed on a pro rata per-race-day basis
and used only for purses at race tracks that have been operating under
RCW 67.16.130 and subsection (1) of this section for the five
consecutive years immediately preceding the year of payment. The
commission shall transfer funds generated under subsection (2) of this
section equal to the difference between:
(a)(i) Funds collected under this subsection (3);
(ii) Interest earned from the Washington horse racing commission
operating account created in section 3 of this act; and
(iii) Fines imposed by the board of stewards in a calendar year;
and
(b) Three hundred thousand dollars((,));
and distribute that amount under this subsection (3).
(4) Beginning July 1, 1999, at the conclusion of each authorized
race meet, the commission shall calculate the mathematical average
daily gross receipts of parimutuel wagering that is conducted only at
the physical location of the live race meet at those race meets of
licensees with gross receipts of all their in-state parimutuel machines
of more than fifty million dollars. Such calculation shall include
only the gross parimutuel receipts from wagering occurring on live
racing dates, including live racing receipts and receipts derived from
one simulcast race card that is conducted only at the physical location
of the live racing meet, which, for the purposes of this subsection, is
"the handle." If the calculation exceeds eight hundred eighty-six
thousand dollars, the licensee shall within ten days of receipt of
written notification by the commission forward to the commission a sum
equal to the product obtained by multiplying 0.6 percent by the handle.
Sums collected by the commission under this subsection shall be
forwarded on the next business day following receipt thereof to the
state treasurer to be deposited in the fair fund created in RCW
15.76.115.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2003 c 403 s 9, 2003 c 313 s 10, 2003
c 191 s 7, 2003 c 148 s 15, 2003 c 92 s 8, and 2003 c 19 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism
promotion account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural
rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the
youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the
sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's trust fund, ((and))
the investing in innovation account, the Washington horse racing
commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the Washington
horse racing commission class C purse fund account, and the Washington
horse racing commission operating account (earnings from the Washington
horse racing commission operating account must be credited to the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account).
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---