BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.23A.010 and 1989 c 383 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Petroleum product" means plant condensate, lubricating oil,
gasoline, aviation fuel, kerosene, diesel motor fuel, benzol, fuel oil,
residual oil, ((liquefied or liquefiable gases such as butane, ethane,
and propane,)) and every other product derived from the refining of
crude oil, but the term does not include crude oil or liquefiable
gases.
(2) "Possession" means the control of a petroleum product located
within this state and includes both actual and constructive possession.
"Actual possession" occurs when the person with control has physical
possession. "Constructive possession" occurs when the person with
control does not have physical possession. "Control" means the power
to sell or use a petroleum product or to authorize the sale or use by
another.
(3) "Previously taxed petroleum product" means a petroleum product
in respect to which a tax has been paid under this chapter and that has
not been remanufactured or reprocessed in any manner (other than mere
repackaging or recycling for beneficial reuse) since the tax was paid.
(4) "Wholesale value" means fair market wholesale value, determined
as nearly as possible according to the wholesale selling price at the
place of use of similar products of like quality and character, in
accordance with rules of the department.
(5) Except for terms defined in this section, the definitions in
chapters 82.04, 82.08, and 82.12 RCW apply to this chapter.

--- END ---