BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that significant
opportunities exist on state-owned lands to generate revenue to benefit
land management. Both the state parks and recreation commission and
the department of fish and wildlife hold undeveloped lands that could
be managed for resource use without impairing the purposes for which
the lands are held. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to
require the department of fish and wildlife and the state parks and
recreation commission to evaluate and expand revenue-generating
activities on state-owned lands.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.210 and 2000 c 107 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall maintain and manage real or personal
property owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the
construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the
property. The director may adopt rules for the operation and
maintenance of the property.
(2) The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease,
convey, or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the
control of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber,
gravel, sand, and other materials or products from real property held
by the department, and to sell or lease the department's real or
personal property or grant concessions or rights of way for roads or
utilities in the property. Net proceeds from all resource management
activities must be deposited in the state wildlife fund for the
purposes of department land management. Oil and gas resources owned by
the state which lie below lands owned, leased, or held by the
department shall be offered for lease by the commissioner of public
lands pursuant to chapter 79.14 RCW with the proceeds being deposited
in the state wildlife fund: PROVIDED, That the commissioner of public
lands shall condition such leases at the request of the department to
protect wildlife and its habitat.
(3) By December 1, 2004, and at least every five years thereafter,
the department must evaluate the opportunities and develop a plan for
revenue generation from department lands through the resource
management activities identified in subsection (2) of this section.
Any resource management activities must be consistent with the purposes
of this title. The department may contract with the department of
natural resources or a private contractor for the evaluation and
subsequent resource management activities.
(4) If the commission determines that real or personal property
held by the department cannot be used advantageously by the department,
the director may dispose of that property if it is in the public
interest.
(5) If the state acquired real property with use limited to
specific purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of
the property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be
sold to the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice
of the auction shall be published at least once a week for two
successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the
county where the property is located at least twenty days prior to
sale.
(6) Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the state
wildlife fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.035 and 1999 c 249 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission shall:
(a) Manage timber and land under its jurisdiction to maintain and
enhance aesthetic and recreational values;
(b) Apply modern conservation practices to maintain and enhance
aesthetic, recreational, and ecological resources; ((and))
(c) Enhance revenue generation through timber harvest when harvest
is consistent with this section and the purposes identified in RCW
79A.05.305; and
(d) Designate and preserve certain forest areas throughout the
state as natural forests or natural areas for interpretation, study,
and preservation purposes.
(2) Trees may be removed from state parks:
(a) When hazardous to persons, property, or facilities;
(b) As part of a park maintenance or development project, or
conservation practice;
(c) As part of a road or utility easement; ((or))
(d) To generate revenue for state park purposes when consistent
with RCW 79A.05.305; or
(e) When damaged by a catastrophic forest event.
(3) Tree removal under subsection (2) of this section shall be done
by commission personnel((, unless the personnel lack necessary
expertise)) or through a contract with the department of natural
resources or a professional forester. Except in emergencies and when
feasible, significant trees shall be removed only after they have been
marked or appraised by a professional forester. The removal of
significant trees from a natural forest may take place only after a
public hearing has been held, except in emergencies.
(4) When feasible, felled timber shall be left on the ground for
natural purposes or used for park purposes including, but not limited
to, building projects, trail mulching, and firewood. In natural forest
areas, first consideration shall be given to leaving timber on the
ground for natural purposes.
(5) The commission may issue permits to individuals under RCW
4.24.210 and 79A.05.090 for the removal of wood debris from state parks
for personal firewood use.
(6) Only timber that qualifies for cutting or removal under
subsection (2) of this section may be sold. Timber shall be sold only
when surplus to the needs of the park.
(7) Net revenue derived from timber sales shall be deposited in the
state parks renewal and stewardship account created in RCW 79A.05.215.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 1, 2004, and at least every five years thereafter, the
commission must evaluate the opportunities and develop a plan for
revenue generation from commission lands through the resource
management activities identified in RCW 79A.05.035 and 79A.05.070(7).
Any resource management activities must be consistent with the purposes
identified in RCW 79A.05.305. Net revenue derived from resource
management activities on park lands must be deposited in the state
parks renewal and stewardship account to be used for park maintenance
and improvements. The commission may contract with the department of
natural resources or a private contractor for the evaluation and
subsequent resource management activities.

--- END ---