BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that local governments
need a dedicated source of revenue to augment other sources of funding
for criminal justice programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.02 RCW
to read as follows:
Any forested normal school lands, agricultural college lands,
scientific school lands or university lands that are transferred from
trust status, and for which the trust is fully compensated for the fair
market value of the lands, shall be transferred in equal value to
common school lands and the criminal justice lands and managed as other
state trust lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Forest land purchased, transferred, or otherwise acquired by
gift or exchange under section 2 of this act for purposes of supporting
criminal justice programs shall be known as the criminal justice lands
and shall be managed in perpetuity and in the same manner as state
lands for sustainable commercial forestry and multiple use of lands
consistent with RCW 79.10.120. The lands will provide a source of
revenue for local government criminal justice programs.
(2) The land known as the criminal justice lands is reserved from
sale, except that the timber and other products on the land may be
sold, or the land may be leased in the same manner and for the same
purposes as authorized for state granted lands if the department finds
the sale or lease to be in the best interest of local government
criminal justice activities and approves the terms and conditions of
the sale or lease.
(3) The land exchange and acquisition powers provided in RCW
79.17.020 may be used by the department to reposition land within the
criminal justice lands.
(4) Of the revenue generated from these lands, not less than sixty
percent shall be deposited in the county criminal justice assistance
account, created in RCW 82.14.310, and not less than fifteen percent
shall be deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, created in RCW 82.14.320. Up to twenty-five percent of the
revenue from these lands, as determined by the board, will be deposited
in the forest development account to reimburse the forest development
account for expenditures from the account for management of these
lands.

--- END ---