BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Hospitals shall have in place policies to assure that, when
appropriate, information about unanticipated outcomes is provided to
patients or their families or any surrogate decision makers identified
pursuant to RCW 7.70.065. Notifications of unanticipated outcomes
under this section do not constitute an acknowledgement or admission of
liability, nor can the fact of notification or the content disclosed be
introduced as evidence in a civil action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Beginning January 1, 2005, the department
shall, during the annual survey of a hospital, ensure that the policy
required in section 1 of this act is in place.

--- END ---