BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that financial
illiteracy is at an unacceptable level, and that the average high
school student lacks even a basic knowledge of personal finance. In
addition, the legislature recognizes the damaging effects of not
properly preparing youth for the financial realities of modern life,
including bankruptcy, poor retirement planning, mounting debt, and a
lower standard of living for Washington families.
The legislature finds that the purpose of the state's system of
public education is to help students acquire the skills and knowledge
they will need to be productive and responsible 21st century citizens.
The legislature further finds that responsible citizenship includes an
ability to make wise financial decisions. To help students acquire the
essential skills and knowledge needed for 21st century citizenship, the
state has adopted four learning goals and defined the basic gateway
skills students need in reading, writing, mathematics, and science. It
is in the process of defining the essential academic learning
requirements and grade level expectations for social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness. The legislature further finds that financial
literacy could easily be included in coursework and projects that
assist students in achieving the four learning goals, including
learning goal four - understanding the importance of work and how
performance, effort, and decisions directly affect future
opportunities.
The legislature intends to assist school districts in their efforts
to ensure that students are financially literate through creating a set
of financial literacy learning guidelines, providing information on
instructional materials that help students meet the learning
guidelines, data collection, and creating a public-private partnership
to help provide instructional tools and professional development to
school districts that wish to increase the financial literacy of their
students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislative ad hoc committee on
financial literacy is established composed of members representing the
legislature, the governor, the superintendent of public instruction,
the department of financial institutions, the financial institutions
and credit industries, school directors, school principals and
administrators, educators, including career and technical educators,
and higher education. Four members of the senate, two from each major
caucus of the committees on education and financial services, insurance
and housing, shall be appointed by the president of the senate. Four
members of the house of representatives, two from each major caucus of
the committees on education and financial institutions and insurance,
shall be selected by the speaker of the house of representatives. The
other committee members shall be selected by their applicable agencies
or associations, or, in the case of the financial institutions and
credit industries, by appointment of two members by the governor.
(2) Staff support for the committee shall be provided by senate
committee services, the office of program research, and the
public-private partnership. Technical and logistical support may be
provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and
the organizations selecting committee members.
(3) The members of the committee shall be appointed by July 1,
2004.
(4) Legislative members of the ad hoc committee shall receive per
diem and travel under RCW 44.04.120.
(5) Travel and other expenses of nonlegislative members of the ad
hoc committee shall be provided by the agency, association, or
organization that appointed the member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislative ad hoc committee on
financial literacy shall:
(1) By September 30, 2004, adopt a definition of financial literacy
that is aligned with the essential academic learning requirements;
(2) By September 30, 2005, develop a set of recommended financial
literacy learning guidelines that may be used in elementary, middle,
and high schools by interested school districts. The guidelines shall
include measurable student outcomes;
(3) By November 30, 2005, recommend a structure and set of
operating principles for a public-private partnership to work with
interested school districts to assist the districts in selecting or
developing financial literacy instructional materials and providing
professional development on the learning guidelines;
(4) By July 15, 2006, subject to funding, select school districts
in which to pilot the financial literacy learning guidelines,
instructional materials, and professional development;
(5) Collect and analyze available information on the costs and
benefits to individual students and society of ensuring that students
are financially literate by the time they graduate from high school;
(6) Recommend outcome measures or other demonstrations that schools
and communities may use to determine whether students are financially
literate;
(7) Recommend a system that could be used to follow the educational
opportunities a district's student has to become financially literate
as the student progresses from elementary school, to middle school, and
to high school; and
(8) Provide annual reports to the education committees of the house
of representatives and senate, and, by November 15, 2008, provide a
report to the governor, the legislature, the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board of education, and education stakeholder
groups, on the results of work of the ad hoc committee and of the
pilots.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to available funding, the superintendent of public
instruction shall make available to school districts the learning
guidelines, instructional materials, and other relevant information
provided by the legislative ad hoc committee on financial literacy
under sections 2 and 3 of this act and those provided by the public-private partnership created under section 3 of this act.
(2) Each school district is encouraged to provide its students with
an opportunity to master the financial literacy learning guidelines
developed under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislative ad hoc committee on
financial literacy shall establish a series of pilots to assist
interested school districts in the implementation of financial literacy
instructional programs. The purpose of the pilots is to determine the
best methods of equipping students with the knowledge and skills they
need, before they become self-supporting, to make critical decisions
regarding their personal finances. The components of personal
financial literacy covered in the pilot program shall include, at a
minimum, consumer financial education, personal finance, and personal
credit. The pilots shall include an evaluation that describes and
monitors the measurable outcomes expected from participating students,
in accordance with the definitions and outcomes developed under section
3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The Washington financial literacy education partnership account is
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. The purpose of
the account is to provide financial literacy educational opportunities
for students and financial literacy professional development
opportunities for the teachers providing those educational
opportunities. Revenues to the account may include gifts from the
private sector, federal funds, and any appropriations made by the
legislature or other sources. Grants and their administration shall be
paid from the account. Only the superintendent of public instruction
or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The legislative ad hoc committee on
financial literacy expires on June 30, 2009.

--- END ---