BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Questions have been raised about the intent
of the legislature in cross referencing RCW 71.05.050 without further
clarification in RCW 71.32.140. The legislature finds that because RCW
71.05.050 pertains to a variety of rights as well as the procedures for
detaining a voluntary patient for evaluation for civil commitment, and
the legislature intended only to address the right of release upon
request, there is ambiguity as to whether an incapacitated person
admitted pursuant to his or her mental health advance directive and
seeking release can be held for evaluation for civil commitment under
chapter 71.05 RCW. The legislature therefore intends to clarify the
ambiguity without making any change to its intended policy as laid out
in chapter 71.32 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.32.140 and 2003 c 283 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A principal who:
(a) Chose not to be able to revoke his or her directive during any
period of incapacity;
(b) Consented to voluntary admission to inpatient mental health
treatment, or authorized an agent to consent on the principal's behalf;
and
(c) At the time of admission to inpatient treatment, refuses to be
admitted,
may only be admitted into inpatient mental health treatment under
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A principal may only be admitted to inpatient mental health
treatment under his or her directive if, prior to admission, a
physician member of the treating facility's professional staff:
(a) Evaluates the principal's mental condition, including a review
of reasonably available psychiatric and psychological history,
diagnosis, and treatment needs, and determines, in conjunction with
another health care provider or mental health professional, that the
principal is incapacitated;
(b) Obtains the informed consent of the agent, if any, designated
in the directive;
(c) Makes a written determination that the principal needs an
inpatient evaluation or is in need of inpatient treatment and that the
evaluation or treatment cannot be accomplished in a less restrictive
setting; and
(d) Documents in the principal's medical record a summary of the
physician's findings and recommendations for treatment or evaluation.
(3) In the event the admitting physician is not a psychiatrist, the
principal shall receive a complete psychological assessment by a mental
health professional within twenty-four hours of admission to determine
the continued need for inpatient evaluation or treatment.
(4)(a) If it is determined that the principal has capacity, then
the principal may only be admitted to, or remain in, inpatient
treatment if he or she consents at the time or is detained under the
involuntary treatment provisions of chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or 71.34
RCW.
(b) If a principal who is determined by two health care providers
or one mental health professional and one health care provider to be
incapacitated continues to refuse inpatient treatment, the principal
may immediately seek injunctive relief for release from the facility.
(5) If, at the end of the period of time that the principal or the
principal's agent, if any, has consented to voluntary inpatient
treatment, but no more than fourteen days after admission, the
principal has not regained capacity or has regained capacity but
refuses to consent to remain for additional treatment, the principal
must be released during reasonable daylight hours, unless detained
under chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or 71.34 RCW.
(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any principal
who is voluntarily admitted to inpatient mental health treatment under
this chapter shall have all the rights provided to individuals who are
voluntarily admitted to inpatient treatment under chapter 71.05, 71.34,
or 72.23 RCW.
(b) Notwithstanding RCW 71.05.050 regarding consent to inpatient
treatment for a specified length of time, the choices an incapacitated
principal expressed in his or her directive shall control, provided,
however, that a principal who takes action demonstrating a desire to be
discharged, in addition to making statements requesting to be
discharged, shall be discharged, and no principal shall be restrained
in any way in order to prevent his or her discharge. Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to prevent detention and evaluation for
civil commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW.
(7) Consent to inpatient admission in a directive is effective only
while the professional person, health care provider, and health care
facility are in substantial compliance with the material provisions of
the directive related to inpatient treatment.

--- END ---