BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The farmers market nutrition program promotes health, prevents
obesity, and encourages the development of good eating habits by
enabling low-income women to purchase locally grown fresh fruit and
vegetables for themselves and their young children. Women and children
in fourteen counties of the state are presently able to participate in
the program.
(2) Farmers markets and agencies administering the federal women,
infants, and children nutrition program in many additional counties
have expressed interest in offering this nutrition option for low-income women and children in their local areas, but have been denied
the opportunity to participate because state funds have not been
available for program expansion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 During fiscal year 2005, one hundred
thousand dollars from the general fund--state and two hundred thirty-three thousand dollars from the general fund--federal are appropriated
to the department of health to expand the farmers market nutrition
program into areas of the state in which agencies administering the
federal women, infants, and children nutrition program do not presently
receive state matching funds to participate in the program. The first
priority for program expansion shall be to areas of the state that have
demonstrated need for and commitment to the program by raising local
contributions to meet federal matching fund requirements.

--- END ---