BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES--OPERATING
Sec. 101 2003 c 360 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($352,000))
$362,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--INITIATIVE MEASURE NO. 776
COSTS
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with refunds resulting from Pierce County et al. v. State of
Washington et al. (Supreme Court Case No. 73607-3), upholding the
Initiative Measure No. 776 reduction of gross vehicle weight fees.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--OPERATING
Sec. 201 2003 c 360 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $769,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,927,000))
$1,936,000
County Arterial Preservation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $719,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,415,000))
$3,424,000

Sec. 202 2003 c 360 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,611,000))
$1,614,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,620,000))
$1,623,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,231,000))
$3,237,000

Sec. 203 2003 c 360 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($272,000))
$278,000

Sec. 204 2003 c 360 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($807,000))
$814,000

Sec. 205 2003 c 360 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($616,000))
$625,000

Sec. 206 2003 c 360 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($171,269,000))
$172,802,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,167,000))
$6,957,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
Highway Safety Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($177,611,000))
$180,157,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies are authorized to use state
patrol vehicles for the purposes of that employment, subject to
guidelines adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The
Washington state patrol shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle
at the prevailing state employee rate for mileage and hours of usage,
subject to guidelines developed by the chief of the Washington state
patrol. The patrol shall report to the house of representatives and
senate transportation committees by December 31, 2004, on the use of
agency vehicles by officers engaging in the off-duty employment
specified in this subsection. The report shall include an analysis
that compares cost reimbursement and cost-impacts, including increased
vehicle mileage, maintenance costs, and indirect impacts, associated
with the private use of patrol vehicles.
(2) $2,075,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation in this section is provided solely for the addition of
thirteen troopers to those permanently assigned to vessel and terminal
security. The Washington state patrol shall continue to provide the
enhanced services levels established after September 11, 2001.
(3) In addition to the user fees, the patrol shall transfer into
the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account created
under section 1501 of this act, no more than the amount of appropriated
state patrol highway account and general fund funding necessary to
cover the costs for the patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol
highway account and general fund--state funds shall be transferred
proportionately in accordance with a cost allocation that
differentiates between highway traffic enforcement services and general
policing purposes.
(4) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31 of
each year.

Sec. 207 2003 c 360 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,993,000))
$71,113,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
Highway Safety Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,283,000))
$72,445,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Under the direction of the legislative auditor, the patrol
shall update the pursuit vehicle life-cycle cost model developed in the
1998 Washington state patrol performance audit (JLARC Report 99-4).
The patrol shall utilize the updated model as a basis for determining
maintenance and other cost impacts resulting from the increase to
pursuit vehicle mileage above 110 thousand miles in the 2003-05
biennium. The patrol shall submit a report, that includes identified
cost impacts, to the transportation committees of the senate and house
of representatives by December 31, 2003.
(2) The Washington state patrol shall assign two full-time
detectives to work solely to investigate incidents of identity fraud,
drivers' license fraud, and identity theft. The detectives shall work
cooperatively with the department of licensing's driver's special
investigation unit.

Sec. 208 2003 c 360 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING(( -- MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES))
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,000))
$65,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,000))
$2,810,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,000))
$723,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,286,000))
$106,258,000
Highway Safety Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $324,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,623,000))
$68,220,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,372,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($107,000))
$4,336,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,185,000))
$184,708,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature detailing the progress made in
transitioning off of the Unisys system by December 1, 2003, and each
December 1 thereafter.
(2) $144,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5435 or Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1592.
(3) If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6063 is not enacted by June 30,
2003, $1,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
shall lapse.
(4) $81,000 of the DOL services account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1036.
(5) $178,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for two temporary collision processing FTEs to
eliminate the backlog of collision reports. The department shall
report, informally, to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees quarterly, beginning October 1, 2003, on the
progress made in eliminating the backlog.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 2003 c 360 s 211 (uncodified), 2003 c 360
s 212 (uncodified), and 2003 c 360 s 213 (uncodified) are repealed.

Sec. 210 2003 c 360 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM
C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,661,000))
$58,091,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,163,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,583,000))
$6,383,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,770,000))
$70,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $715,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to retain an external consultant to provide an
assessment of the department's review of current major information
technology systems and planning for system and application
modernization. The legislative transportation committee shall approve
the statement of work before the consultant is hired. The consultant
shall also work with the department to prepare an application
modernization strategy and preliminary project plan.
The department and the consultant shall work with the office of
financial management and the department of information services to
ensure that (a) the department's current and future system development
is consistent with the overall direction of other key state systems;
and (b) when possible, common statewide information systems are used or
developed to encourage coordination and integration of information used
by the department and other state agencies and to avoid duplication.
The department shall provide a report on its proposed application
modernization plan to the transportation committees of the legislature
by June 30, 2004.
(2)(a) $2,963,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $2,963,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of a new revenue collection system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card), at the Washington state ferries. By December 1st of each
year, an annual update must be provided to the legislative
transportation committee concerning the status of implementing and
completing this project.
(b) (($400,000)) $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
the smart card program. (($200,000 of)) This amount must be held in
allotment reserve until a smart card report is delivered to the
legislative transportation committee indicating that an agreement on
which technology will be used throughout the state of Washington for
the smart card program has been reached among smart card participants.
(3) The department shall contract with the department of
information services to conduct a survey that identifies possible
opportunities and benefits associated with siting and use of technology
and wireless facilities located on state right of way authorized by RCW
47.60.140. The department shall submit a report regarding the survey
to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2004.

Sec. 211 2003 c 360 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS
AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,048,000))
$31,068,000

Sec. 212 2003 c 360 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,107,000))
$5,355,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($650,000))
$2,150,000
Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and Education
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($282,000))
$160,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,039,000))
$7,665,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (($1,381,000)) $1,129,000 of the
aeronautics account--state appropriation is provided solely for
additional preservation grants to airports. (($122,000 of the aircraft
search and rescue safety and education account--state appropriation is
provided for additional search and rescue and safety and education
activities.)) If Senate Bill No. 6056 is not enacted by June 30, 2003,
the amount((s)) provided shall lapse.

Sec. 213 2003 c 360 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,010,000))
$49,056,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,410,000))
$49,456,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $14,310,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the staffing, activities, and overhead of the
department's environmental affairs office. This funding is provided in
lieu of funding provided in sections 305 and 306 of this act.
(2) $3,100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the staffing and activities of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee.
(3) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely for the
purposes of providing contract services to the association of
Washington cities and Washington state association of counties to
implement section 2(3)(c), (5), and (6), chapter 8 (ESB 5279), Laws of
2003 for activities of the transportation permit efficiency and
accountability committee.

Sec. 214 2003 c 360 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($283,350,000))
$283,672,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,253,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($289,029,000))
$289,351,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account--private/local
appropriation.
(4) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
allow for a continuation of the level of service targets included in
the 2001-03 biennium. In delivering the program, the department should
concentrate on the following areas:
(a) Meeting or exceeding the target for structural bridge repair on
a statewide basis;
(b) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level;
(c) Reducing the number of activities delivered in the "d" level of
service by increasing the resources directed to those activities on a
statewide and region basis; and
(d) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.

Sec. 215 2003 c 360 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,869,000))
$38,924,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,994,000))
$39,049,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $8,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation may be expended for the incident response program,
including the service patrols. The department and the Washington state
patrol shall continue to consult and coordinate with private sector
partners, such as towing companies, media, auto, insurance and trucking
associations, and the legislative transportation committees to ensure
that limited state resources are used most effectively. No funds shall
be used to purchase tow trucks.
(2) $4,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give
priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or
provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost
enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis.
(3) At a frequency determined by the department, the interstate-5
variable message signs shall display a message advising slower traffic
to keep right.

Sec. 216 2003 c 360 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,852,000))
$24,888,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $636,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,554,000))
$27,590,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $627,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5248. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5248 is not enacted by June 30,
2003, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The agency
may transfer between programs funds provided in this subsection.
(2) The department shall transfer at no cost to the Washington
state patrol the title to the Walla Walla colocation facility.

Sec. 217 2003 c 360 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA,
AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,064,000))
$30,105,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,814,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,021,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,899,000))
$47,940,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a study of regional congestion relief solutions for
Puget Sound, Spokane, and Vancouver. The study must include proposals
to alleviate congestion consistent with population and land use
expectations under the growth management act, and must include
measurement of all modes of transportation.
(2) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for additional assistance to support regional
transportation planning organizations and long-range transportation
planning efforts.
(3) $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the costs of the regional transportation investment
district (RTID) election and department of transportation project
oversight. These funds are provided as a loan to the RTID and shall be
repaid to the state motor vehicle account within one year following the
certification of the election results related to the RTID.
(4) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department to support the
processing and analysis of the backlog of city and county collision
reports.
(5) The department shall contribute to the report required in
section 208(1) of this act in the form of an analysis of the cost
impacts incurred by the department as the result of the policy
implemented in section 208(1) of this act. The analysis shall contrast
overtime costs charged by the patrol prior to July 1, 2003, with
contract costs for similar services after July 1, 2003.
(6) $60,000 of the distribution under RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) is provided solely to the department for the Washington
strategic freight transportation analysis.

Sec. 218 2003 c 360 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,082,000))
$60,561,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $50,799,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the liabilities attributable to the department of
transportation. The office of financial management must provide a
detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on
December 31st and June 30th of each year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DIVISION OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . (($989,000))
$848,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . (($823,000))
$819,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED
MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,850,000))
$2,673,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,252,000))
$2,786,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS
AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,799,000
(f) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,846,000
(g) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . (($523,000))
$538,000
(h) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF MINORITY
AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . $252,000

Sec. 219 2003 c 360 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,457,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,186,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for nonprofit
providers of transportation for persons with special transportation
needs. $14,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for transit
agencies to transport persons with special transportation needs.
Moneys shall be to provide additional service only and may not be used
to supplant current funding. Grants shall only be used by nonprofit
providers and transit agencies for capital and operating costs directly
associated with adding additional service. Grants for nonprofit
providers shall be based on need, including the availability of other
providers of service in the area, efforts to coordinate trips among
providers and riders, and the cost effectiveness of trips provided.
Grants for transit agencies shall be prorated based on the amount
expended for demand response service and route deviated service in
calendar year 2001 as reported in the "Summary of Public Transportation
- 2001" published by the department of transportation. No transit
agency may receive more than thirty percent of these distributions.
(2) $1,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to implement section 9 of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2228.
(3) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2001 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(4) $4,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for public
transit agencies. The grant program will cover capital costs only; no
operating costs are eligible for funding under this grant program.
Only grants that add vanpools are eligible, no supplanting of transit
funds currently funding vanpools is allowed. Additional criteria for
selecting grants will include leveraging funds other than state funds.
(5) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided to the city of Seattle for the Seattle
streetcar project on South Lake Union.
(6) Benton county has reached a statutory population threshold that
now requires its development and participation in commute trip
reduction programs and planning. Within existing appropriation levels,
the department of transportation is directed to make available $100,000
to support Benton county in the development of its commute trip
reduction program and planning. In addition, the transportation demand
management office should provide technical assistance and resources
appropriate to assist Benton county in this regard.

Sec. 220 2003 c 360 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($309,580,000))
$311,506,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,120,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($314,700,000))
$316,626,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of
(($34,701,000)) $35,348,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2003-2005
biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted
amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the actual cost
exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental
appropriation.
(2) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2003-2005 biennium may not exceed $207,757,000 plus a dollar
amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management, that is
equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general government
employees in excess of (($495.30)) $504.89 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2004 and (($567.67)) $583.79 a month
annualized per eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of
eligible marine employees for fiscal year 2005, a dollar amount as
prescribed by the office of financial management for costs associated
with pension amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by
the office of financial management for salary increases during the
2003-2005 biennium. For the purposes of this section, the expenditures
for compensation paid to ferry employees shall be limited to salaries
and wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of financial
management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under objects
of expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).
The prescribed salary increase or decrease dollar amount that shall
be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used
to increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 2003, and
thereafter, as established in the 2003-2005 general fund operating
budget.
(3) $4,234,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $800,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations
account--state appropriation are provided solely for operating costs
associated with the Vashon to Seattle passenger-only ferry. The
Washington state ferries will develop a plan to increase passenger-only
farebox recovery to at least forty percent by July 1, 2003, with an
additional goal of eighty percent, through increased fares, lower
operation costs, and other cost-saving measures as appropriate. In
order to implement the plan, ferry system management is authorized to
negotiate changes in work hours (requirements for split shift work),
but only with respect to operating passenger-only ferry service, to be
included in a collective bargaining agreement in effect during the
2003-05 biennium that differs from provisions regarding work hours in
the prior collective bargaining agreement. The department must report
to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1,
2003.
(4) $866,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations
account--state appropriation are provided solely for operating costs
associated with the Bremerton to Seattle passenger-only ferry service
for thirteen weeks.
(5) The department shall study the potential for private or public
partners, including but not limited to King county, to provide
passenger-only ferry service from Vashon to Seattle. The department
shall report to the legislative transportation committees by December
31, 2003.
(6) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(7) When augmenting the existing ferry fleet, the department of
transportation ferry capital program shall explore cost-effective
options to include the leasing of ferries from private-sector
organizations.
(8) The Washington state ferries shall work with the department of
general administration, office of state procurement to improve the
existing fuel procurement process and solicit, identify, and evaluate,
purchasing alternatives to reduce the overall cost of fuel and mitigate
the impact of market fluctuations and pressure on both short- and long-term fuel costs. Consideration shall include, but not be limited to,
long-term fuel contracts, partnering with other public entities, and
possibilities for fuel storage in evaluating strategies and options.
The department shall report back to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2003, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for managing fuel purchases and costs.
(9) The department must provide a separate accounting of passenger-only ferry service costs and auto ferry service costs, and must provide
periodic reporting to the legislature on the financial status of both
passenger-only and auto ferry service in Washington state.
(10) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement a new revenue collection
system, including the integration of the regional fare coordination
system (smart card). Each December, annual updates are to be provided
to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning the
status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(11) The Washington state ferries shall evaluate the benefits and
costs of selling the depreciation rights to ferries purchased by the
state in the future through sale and lease-back agreements, as
permitted under RCW 47.60.010. The department is authorized to issue
a request for proposal to solicit proposals from potential buyers. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2004, on the options, strategies, and
recommendations for sale/lease-back agreements on existing ferry boats
as well as future ferry boat purchases.

Sec. 221 2003 c 360 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,057,000))
$7,067,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,569,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,626,000))
$9,636,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $75,000 of the total appropriation is provided in
accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) to fund the state's
share of the 2004 Washington marine cargo forecast study. Public port
districts, acting through their association, must provide funding to
cover the remaining cost of the forecast.
(2) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) solely to
fund a study of the threats posed by flooding to the state and other
infrastructure near the Interstate 5 crossing of the Skagit River.
This funding is contingent on the receipt of federal matching funds.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
Sec. 301 2003 c 360 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,205,000))
$2,705,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $625,000 of the state patrol highway
account appropriation is provided solely for the patrol's share of the
Shelton area water and sewer regional plan. However, this amount is
contingent on general fund--state funding of the Washington corrections
center's portion of the Shelton area water and sewer regional plan. If
general fund--state funding is not provided, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 302 2003 c 360 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $565,300,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,434,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($157,374,000))
$156,705,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,940,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,258,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,279,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($613,300,000))
$603,992,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,596,835,000))
$1,586,858,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($157,374,000)) $156,705,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation, $192,940,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation, $13,258,000 of the motor vehicle account--local
appropriation, and $50,279,000 of the special category C account--state
appropriation are provided solely to implement the activities and
projects included in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List
- Current Law report as transmitted to LEAP on April 27, 2003.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
(($78,000,000)) $93,615,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation. The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
(($18,038,000)) $17,380,000 in unexpended proceeds from bond sales
authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for mobility and economic initiative
improvement projects.
(3) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes $567,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state
appropriation includes (($46,300,000)) $36,992,000 in unexpended
proceeds from the January 2003 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.843
for the Tacoma Narrows bridge project.
(4) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
$44,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.812. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available in the special category C account in lieu of
bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(5) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
report transmitted to LEAP on April 27, 2003.
(6) The ((motor vehicle account)) transportation 2003 account
(nickel account)--state appropriation includes $280,000,000 in proceeds
from the sale of bonds authorized by Senate Bill No. 6062. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.
(7) $11,000,000 of the ((motor vehicle account)) transportation
2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation is provided solely
for the environmental impact statement on the SR 520 Evergreen floating
bridge.
(8) $250,000 of the transportation 2003 account (Nickel Account)--state appropriation and an equal amount from the city of Seattle are
provided solely for an analysis of the impacts that an expansion of the
SR 520 Evergreen floating bridge will have on the streets of North
Capitol Hill, Roanoke Park, and Montlake. An advisory committee with
two members each from Portage Bay/Roanoke Park Community Council,
Montlake Community Council, and the North Capitol Hill community
organization along with the secretary of transportation is established.
The seven-member committee shall hire and oversee the contract with a
transportation consulting organization to: (a) Perform an analysis of
such impacts; and (b) design a traffic and circulation plan that
mitigates the adverse consequences of such impacts. If the city of
Seattle does not agree to provide $250,000 by January 1, 2004, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9)(a) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for a study to provide the legislature with
information regarding the feasibility of pursuing a Washington commerce
corridor. The department shall retain outside experts to conduct the
study. The study must include the following conditions:
(i) The Washington commerce corridor must be a north-south corridor
starting in the vicinity of Lewis county and extending northerly to the
vicinity of the Canadian border. The corridor must be situated east of
state route number 405 and west of the Cascades. The corridor may
include any of the following features:
(A) Ability to carry long-haul freight;
(B) Ability to provide for passenger auto travel;
(C) Freight rail;
(D) Passenger rail;
(E) Public utilities; and
(F) Other ancillary facilities as may be desired to maximize use of
the corridor;
(ii) The Washington commerce corridor must be developed, financed,
designed, constructed, and operated by private sector consortiums; and
(iii) The Washington commerce corridor must be subject to a joint
permitting process involving federal, state, and local agencies with
jurisdiction.
(b) The legislative transportation committee shall form a working
group to work with the department and the outside consultant on the
study.
(10) $8,000,000 of the ((motor vehicle account)) transportation
2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation is provided for the
SR 522, University of Washington-Bothell campus access project. This
amount ((will cover approximately one-half of the)) may be used for
design or construction costs.
(11) The transportation permit efficiency and accountability
committee (TPEAC) shall select from the project list under ((this))
subsection (5) of this section ten projects that have not yet secured
state permits. TPEAC shall select projects from both urban and rural
areas representing a wide variety of locations within the state. These
projects shall be designated "Department of Transportation Permit
Drafting Pilot Projects" and shall become a part of the work plan of
TPEAC required under section 2(1)(b), chapter 8 (ESB 5279), Laws of
2003.
(12) Of the amounts appropriated in this section and section 306 of
this act, no more than $124,000 is provided for increased project costs
due to the enactment of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5457.
(((14))) (13) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal
funds may be transferred from program Z to program I to replace those
federal funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $186,399,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $454,787,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,666,000
Multimodal Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,690,000
Puyallup Tribal Settlement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,706,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $668,248,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $186,399,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
$454,787,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation,
$12,666,000 of the motor vehicle account--local appropriation, and
$1,690,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation are provided solely to implement the activities and
projects included in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List -Current Law report transmitted to LEAP on April 27, 2003.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$3,066,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW
47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes. The motor vehicle
account--state appropriation includes $338,000 in unexpended proceeds
from the January 2003 bond sale authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and
47.10.762 for emergency purposes.
(3) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$77,700,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(4) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
report transmitted to LEAP on April 27, 2003.
(5) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(6) Of the amounts appropriated in this section and section 305 of
this act, no more than $124,000 is provided for increased project costs
due to the enactment of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5457.
(7) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to program P to replace those federal funds
in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be transferred
between federal programs. Fund transfers authorized under this
subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 506 (uncodified) and
2003 c 360 s 306 (uncodified) are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,688,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,510,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,198,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts provided in this section are provided solely to
implement the activities and projects included in the Legislative 2003
Transportation Project List - Current Law report transmitted to LEAP on
April 27, 2003.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$9,408,000 for state matching funds for federally selected competitive
grant or congressional earmark projects other than the commercial
vehicle information systems and network. These moneys shall be placed
into reserve status until such time as federal funds are secured that
require a state match.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 507 (uncodified) and
2003 c 360 s 307 (uncodified) are each repealed.

Sec. 307 2003 c 360 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,066,000))
$110,451,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,400,000))
$53,015,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,381,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,749,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,596,000

The appropriations in this section are provided for improving the
Washington state ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal
construction and improvements. The appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $11,772,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Senate Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) (($129,066,000)) $110,451,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--state appropriation ((and $34,400,000)),
$53,015,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--federal
appropriation, and $1,609,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation are provided solely for capital projects
as listed in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - Current
Law as transmitted to the LEAP on April 27, 2003.
(3) (($17,521,000)) $5,749,000 of the transportation 2003 account
(nickel account)--state appropriation ((is)) and $11,772,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation are provided
solely for capital projects as listed in the Legislative 2003
Transportation Project List - New Law as transmitted to the LEAP on
April 27, 2003.
(4) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes (($45,000,000)) $29,385,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and terminal
acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead time materials
acquisition for the Washington state ferries. The transportation
commission may authorize the use of current revenues available to the
motor vehicle account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the
state appropriation.
(5) The Washington state ferries shall consult with the United
States Coast Guard regarding operational and design standards required
to meet Safety of Life at Sea requirements, in an effort to determine
the most efficient and cost-effective vessel design that meets these
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,530,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,499,000
Washington Fruit Express Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,299,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $30,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Senate Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) $4,530,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation, $9,499,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal appropriation, $500,000 of the Washington fruit express
account--state appropriation, and $770,000 of the essential rail
assistance account--state appropriation are provided solely for capital
projects as listed in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List
- Current Law as transmitted to the LEAP on April 27, 2003.
(3) $1,230,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $770,000 of the essential rail assistance account--state appropriation are to be placed in reserve status by the office of
financial management to be held until the department identifies the
location for a new transload facility at either Wenatchee or Quincy.
The funds are to be released upon determination of a location and
approval by the office of financial management.
(4) $30,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for capital projects as listed in the
Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law as transmitted
to the LEAP on April 27, 2003.
(5) If federal block grant funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the legislative
transportation committee prior to spending the funds on additional
projects.
(6) If the department issues a call for projects, applications must
be received by the department by November 1, 2003, and November 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 508 (uncodified) and
2003 c 360 s 309 (uncodified) are each repealed.

Sec. 310 2003 c 360 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,425,000))
$21,826,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,726,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,960,000))
$38,361,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the projects and activities as
indicated in the Legislative 2003 Transportation Project List - New Law
Local Projects report transmitted to LEAP on April 27, 2003.
(2) ((To manage some projects more efficiently,)) $1,000,000 of the
motor vehicle account--federal appropriation is provided solely for
managing some projects more efficiently. Federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be
transferred from programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department may not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission. The
department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2004.
(3) $7,576,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to fund the first
phase of a multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to
dredge the Columbia River. If dredge material is disposed of in the
ocean, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
subsection unless agreement on ocean disposal sites has been reached
that protects the state's commercial crab fishery. The amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse unless the state of Oregon appropriates
a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the project.
(4) (($1,156,000)) $647,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for additional
small city pavement preservation program grants, to be administered by
the department's highways and local programs division. The department
shall review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at
least semiannually to determine whether the projects are making
satisfactory progress. Any project that has been awarded small city
pavement preservation program grant funds, but does not report activity
on the project within one year of grant award, should be reviewed by
the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated.
The department must promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. The
department shall expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified
projects when funds become available either because grant awards have
been rescinded for lack of sufficient project activity or because
completed projects returned excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(5) (($4,010,000)) $3,156,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for additional
traffic and pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The highways
and local programs division within the department of transportation
shall administer this program. The department shall review all
projects receiving grant awards under this program at least
semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory
progress. Any project that has been awarded traffic and pedestrian
safety improvement grant funds, but does not report activity on the
project within one year of grant award should be reviewed by the
department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The
department must promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. The
department shall expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified
projects when funds become available either because grant awards have
been rescinded for lack of sufficient project activity or because
completed projects returned excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
(($20,452,000)) $15,317,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843.
(7) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $6,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Senate Bill No. 6062. The transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
The appropriations provided in sections 302(5), 303(4), 307(3),
308(4), and 310(1) of this act are provided solely to implement the
activities and projects included in the Legislative 2003 Transportation
Project List - New Law report transmitted to LEAP on April 27, 2003.
Changes to specific projects may be made under the following conditions
and limitations:
(1) No projects may be removed from the 2003 Transportation Project
List - New Law. Projects may be added to implement and detail the
Highway Improvement Statewide Guardrail Retrofit and Statewide Bridge
Rail Retrofit projects and for the Washington state ferries
construction project Catch Up Preservation.
(2) The department of transportation may adjust the schedules of
listed projects to ensure efficient project delivery, achieve necessary
milestones, and take advantage of partnership or other financial
opportunities that may arise. The transportation commission must
approve any project schedule changes. These schedule adjustments shall
not impact the overall financial plan in a way that reduces the overall
amount of planned expenditures or delays any project beyond the ten-year plan.
(3) The department of transportation may adjust the expenditure
plan of listed projects to ensure efficient project delivery, achieve
necessary milestones, and take advantage of partnership or other
financial opportunities that may arise. The transportation commission
must approve any project expenditure plan changes. These expenditure
plan adjustments shall not impact the overall financial plan in a way
that reduces the overall amount of planned expenditures or delays any
project beyond the ten-year plan.
(4) Every calendar quarter, the department of transportation will
provide to the office of financial management, house of representatives
transportation committee, and the senate highways and transportation
committee a report detailing any changes to the project list and the
reasons for the changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
The appropriations provided in sections 302(1), 303(1), 305(1),
307(2), 308(2) of this act and 2003 c 360 s 304(1) are provided solely
to implement the activities and projects included in the Legislative
2003 Transportation Project List - Current Law report transmitted to
LEAP on April 27, 2003. Changes to specific projects may be made under
the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of transportation may adjust the schedules of
listed projects to ensure efficient project delivery, achieve necessary
milestones, and take advantage of partnership or other financial
opportunities that may arise. The transportation commission must
approve any project schedule changes. These schedule adjustments shall
not impact the overall financial plan in a way that reduces the overall
amount of planned expenditures or delays any project beyond the ten-year plan.
(2) The department of transportation may adjust the expenditure
plan of listed projects to ensure efficient project delivery, achieve
necessary milestones, and take advantage of partnership or other
financial opportunities that may arise. The transportation commission
must approve any project expenditure plan changes. These expenditure
plan adjustments shall not impact the overall financial plan in a way
that reduces the overall amount of planned expenditures or delays any
project beyond the ten-year plan.
(3) Every calendar quarter, the department of transportation will
provide to the office of financial management, house of representatives
transportation committee, and the senate highways and transportation
committee a report detailing any changes to the project list and the
reasons for the changes.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 401 2003 c 360 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT
TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($258,971,000))
$250,000,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,131,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,340,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,721,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,876,000))
$5,254,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($331,000))
$338,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $358,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,100,000))
$2,117,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($350,068,000))
$342,499,000

Sec. 402 2003 c 360 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL
AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,293,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000))
$21,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,228,000))
$2,244,000

Sec. 403 2003 c 360 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND
REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$567,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound capital construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$29,385,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
(($45,000,000)) $29,385,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for
vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long
lead-time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

Sec. 404 2003 c 360 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to
cities and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($441,359,000))
$439,518,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For license permit and fee distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,652,000))
$13,119,000

Sec. 405 2003 c 360 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
(1) State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($465,152,000))
$685,695,000
(3) Highway Safety Account -- State
Appropriation: For transfer to the motor
vehicle account -- state . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

The state treasurer shall perform the transfers from the state
patrol highway account and the highway safety account to the motor
vehicle account on a quarterly basis.

Sec. 406 2003 c 360 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,757,000
(2) RV Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account -- State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,954,000
(3) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,287,000))
$61,287,000
(4) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to Puget Sound
Capital Construction Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
(5) Transportation Equipment Fund--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(6) Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section up to the level provided, on an
as-needed basis.
(b) The department of transportation shall transfer funds in
subsection (4) of this section up to the amount identified, provided
that a minimum balance of $5,000,000 is retained in the Puget Sound
ferry operations account.
(c) The amount identified in subsection (4) of this section may not
include any revenues collected as passenger fares.

Sec. 407 2003 c 360 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--TRANSFERS
State Patrol Highway Account: For transfer to the
department of retirement systems expense account:
For the administrative expenses of the ((judicial))
Washington state patrol retirement system . . . . . . . . . . . . (($223,304))
$290,000

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to 2003 c 360
(uncodified) to read as follows:
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES. The use of hybrid motor
vehicles reduces air contaminants, greenhouse gas emissions and
reliance on imported sources of petroleum. To foster the use of hybrid
motor vehicles, beginning July 1, 2004, before the purchase or lease of
a motor vehicle, state agencies should first consider the feasibility
of hybrid motor vehicles. State agencies should strive to purchase or
lease a hybrid motor vehicle when the use of such a vehicle is
consistent with and can accomplish the agency's mission and when the
purchase is financially reasonable. The financial assessment should
include savings accruing from reduced fuel purchases over the life of
the vehicle. Agencies shall report on their purchases of hybrid
vehicles in their biennial sustainability plans as required under
executive order 02-03.

PROVISIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY--PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q--CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
INITIATIVE MEASURE NO. 776 COSTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 31, 32
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
--- END ---