BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the best
interests of Washington's children that parents, school districts, and
the public in general have access to information regarding each school
employee's prior disciplinary action. The legislature recognizes that
this information is currently available via public disclosure requests
but finds that there is a need to make this information more easily
available. It is the intent of the legislature to provide parents,
school districts, and the public with additional tools to ensure a safe
learning environment for Washington's children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall post on its web site
a list of school employees who have had any disciplinary action taken
against them and the grounds for the disciplinary action. The list
shall be updated annually at a minimum and shall be available to the
public. For the purposes of this section, disciplinary action includes
private or public reprimand, suspension, stayed suspension, or
revocation of a license. A disciplinary action shall not be posted on
the web site if an appeal is still pending. A voluntary surrender of
a license or a voluntary termination of employment during an
investigation or a disciplinary action shall be posted on the web site
as such.

--- END ---