BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.600.200 and 1990 c 33 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each school district board of directors is hereby granted and
shall exercise the authority to control, supervise and regulate the
conduct of interschool athletic activities and other interschool
extracurricular activities of an athletic, cultural, social or
recreational nature for students of the district. A board of directors
may delegate control, supervision and regulation of any such activity
to the Washington Interscholastic Activities Association or any other
voluntary nonprofit entity and compensate such entity for services
provided, subject to the following conditions:
(((1))) (a) The voluntary nonprofit entity shall submit an annual
report to the state board of education of student appeal
determinations, assets, and financial receipts and disbursements at
such time and in such detail as the state board shall establish by
rule;
(((2))) (b) The voluntary nonprofit entity shall not discriminate
in connection with employment or membership upon its governing board,
or otherwise in connection with any function it performs, on the basis
of race, creed, national origin, sex or marital status;
(((3))) (c) Any rules and policies applied by the voluntary
nonprofit entity which govern student participation in any interschool
activity shall be written and subject to the annual review and approval
of the state board of education at such time as it shall establish;
(((4))) (d) All amendments and repeals of such rules and policies
shall be subject to the review and approval of the state board; and
(((5))) (e) Such rules and policies shall provide for notice of the
reasons and a fair opportunity to contest such reasons prior to a final
determination to reject a student's request to participate in or to
continue in an interschool activity. Any such decision shall be
considered a decision of the school district conducting the activity in
which the student seeks to participate or was participating and may be
appealed pursuant to RCW 28A.645.010 through 28A.645.030.
(2) The Washington interscholastic activities association or other
voluntary nonprofit entity to which the school district board of
directors has delegated control under subsection (1) of this section
may create and maintain a web site that is accessible to the public
that lists coaches who have had any disciplinary action taken against
them by a school district or the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the grounds for the disciplinary action.
(3) Each school district shall provide the Washington
interscholastic activities association or other voluntary nonprofit
entity chosen under subsection (1) of this section information on an
annual basis of any disciplinary action taken against a coach employed
by the school district.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "disciplinary action"
includes private or public reprimand, suspension, stayed suspension, or
revocation of a license. A disciplinary action shall not be posted on
the web site if an appeal is still pending. A voluntary surrender of
a license or a voluntary termination of employment during an
investigation or a disciplinary action shall be posted on the web site
as such.

--- END ---