BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A school employee who has witnessed or has reasonable cause to
believe that a student has suffered abuse or neglect by any person,
including other school personnel, shall cause a report to be made to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and
health services as required under RCW 26.44.030.
(2) School employees shall receive training regarding their
reporting obligations under state law in their orientation training
when hired and then every three years. The training required under
this subsection shall take place within existing training programs and
related resources.

--- END ---