BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the existing
federal and state regulatory framework for wetland mitigation is an
important tool used to offset impacts to aquatic resources.
(2) The legislature further finds that national and state studies
have shown that additional measures are needed to ensure the long-term
success of compensatory mitigation sites. Because impacts to aquatic
resources often take place on state-owned aquatic lands, the department
should implement new strategies to ensure that individual compensatory
mitigation sites and mitigation bank sites on state-owned aquatic lands
are properly planned for and permanently protected.
(3) The legislature further finds that establishing mitigation
banks on state-owned aquatic lands and securing funding for permanent
management of compensatory mitigation sites and mitigation bank sites
will improve the environmental success of compensatory mitigation
through appropriate site selection, long-term management, and
consolidation of multiple small mitigation sites into larger,
comprehensive mitigation sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) "Compensatory mitigation" means the
process of restoring, creating, enhancing, or preserving uplands,
wetlands, or other aquatic resources for the purposes of compensating
for unavoidable adverse impacts that remain after all appropriate and
practicable avoidance and minimization has been achieved.
"Compensatory mitigation" includes mitigation that:
(a) Occurs at the same time as, or in advance of, a project's
planned environmental impacts;
(b) Is located in a site either on, near, or distant from the
project's impacts; and
(c) Provides either the same or different biological functions and
values as the functions and values impacted by the project.
(2) "Compensatory mitigation site" means a geographic location
where compensatory mitigation takes place.
(3) "Credit" means a unit of trade representing the increase in the
ecological value of the site, as measured by acreage, functions, and/or
values, or by some other assessment method.
(4) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(5) "In-lieu compensatory mitigation" means payment to a natural
resource management entity for the purpose of conducting compensatory
mitigation for project impacts.
(6) "Mitigation" means the sequential process of avoiding impacts,
minimizing impacts, and compensating for remaining unavoidable impacts.
(7) "Mitigation bank" is a public or private business venture that
restores, creates, enhances, or, in exceptional circumstances,
preserves natural resources for the purpose of providing compensatory
mitigation in advance of authorized impacts to similar resources.
(8) "Mitigation bank site" means a geographic location where a
mitigation bank undertakes restoration, creation, enhancement, and
preservation activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department may accept money, from public
or private entities, for the purpose of creating an endowment that
generates funds used for the long-term monitoring, maintenance, and
management of compensatory mitigation sites and mitigation bank sites,
as defined by the regulatory framework and the department, located on
state-owned aquatic lands. The amount of money necessary to establish
an endowment to cover the costs of long-term monitoring, maintenance,
and management must be determined prior to the department assuming
management responsibility for each site. The amount of money necessary
to establish an endowment is based on the specific conditions of the
compensatory mitigation site and the long-term management plan for the
site, as approved by state or federal regulators. These moneys must be
deposited into the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation endowment
account established in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department is authorized to sell
mitigation bank credits from a department mitigation bank on
state-owned aquatic lands, upon approval by appropriate federal or
state regulatory agencies, or both. The department shall sell the
credits for no less than market value. Market value for mitigation
bank credits sold by the department must be determined using current
market or appraisal techniques, as appropriate.
Revenue from the sale of mitigation bank credits generated by a
department mitigation bank on state-owned aquatic lands must be
deposited into the aquatic lands compensatory mitigation endowment
account established in section 5 of this act. All moneys received by
the department from the sale of mitigation bank credits from a
mitigation site on state-owned aquatic lands in excess of the long-term
management endowment for that site must be deposited according to RCW
79.90.245 and 79.64.040, and paid to towns according to RCW 79.92.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The aquatic lands compensatory mitigation
endowment account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from moneys received by the department for the purpose of
creating long-term management endowments must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the sole
purpose of generating revenues for conducting the long-term monitoring,
maintenance, and management of compensatory mitigation sites and
mitigation bank sites on state-owned aquatic lands. The moneys in the
account must be pooled and invested for the benefit of all compensatory
mitigation sites and mitigation bank sites that have been established
under this chapter. The account must be administered by the state
investment board. The principal of the account is irreducible.
Disbursements of the interest and investment earnings, less the
allocations to the state investment board expense account under RCW
43.33A.160, from the account must be made to the aquatic lands
compensatory mitigation management account, created in section 6 of
this act, upon authorization of the commissioner of public lands, and
the director of the state investment board. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The aquatic lands compensatory mitigation
management account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from interest and investment earnings from the aquatic
lands compensatory mitigation endowment account created in section 5 of
this act and in-lieu compensation payments for completing compensatory
mitigation projects on state-owned aquatic lands must be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used solely by the
department for the purpose of developing in-lieu compensatory
mitigation and performing long-term monitoring, maintenance, and
management of compensatory mitigation sites and mitigation bank sites
on state-owned aquatic lands. The moneys in the account shall be
pooled and expended for the benefit of all compensatory mitigation
sites and mitigation bank sites established under this chapter. Only
the commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2003 c 403 s 9, 2003 c 313 s 10, 2003
c 191 s 7, 2003 c 148 s 15, 2003 c 92 s 8, and 2003 c 19 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism
promotion account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural
rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the
youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the
sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's trust fund, and the
((investing in innovation)) aquatic lands compensatory mitigation
management account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

--- END ---