BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
people and organizations hold different beliefs about whether certain
health care services are morally acceptable. It is the public policy
of the state to respect and protect the right of conscience of all
persons who refuse to obtain, receive, or accept, or who are engaged
in, the delivery of, arrangement for, or payment of health care
services and medical care whether acting individually, corporately, or
in association with other persons; and to prohibit all forms of
discrimination, disqualification, coercion, disability, or imposition
of liability upon such persons or entities by reason of their refusing
to act contrary to their conscience or conscientious convictions in
refusing to obtain, receive, accept, deliver, pay for, or arrange for
the payment of health care services and medical care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this section and sections 3 through 18 of this act unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Health care" means any phase of patient care, including but
not limited to: Testing; diagnosis; prognosis; ancillary research;
instructions; family planning, counseling, referrals, or any other
advice in connection with the use or procurement of contraceptives and
sterilization or abortion procedures; medication; or surgery or other
care or treatment rendered by a physician or physicians, nurses,
paraprofessionals, or health care facility, intended for the physical,
emotional, and mental well-being of persons.
(2) "Physician" means any person who is licensed by the state of
Washington under chapter 18.71 RCW.
(3) "Health care personnel" means any nurse, nurses' aide, medical
school student, professional, paraprofessional, or any other person who
furnishes, or assists in the furnishing of, health care services.
(4) "Health care facility" means any public or private hospital,
clinic, center, medical school, medical training institution,
laboratory or diagnostic facility, physician's office, infirmary,
dispensary, ambulatory surgical treatment center, or other institution
or location wherein health care services are provided to any person,
including physician organizations and associations, networks, joint
ventures, and all other combinations of those organizations.
(5) "Conscience" means a sincerely held set of moral convictions
arising from belief in and relation to God, or which, though not so
derived, arises from a place in the life of its possessor parallel to
that filled by God among adherents to religious faiths.
(6) "Health care payer" means a health maintenance organization,
insurance company, management services organization, or any other
entity that pays for or arranges for the payment of any health care or
medical care service, procedure, or product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No physician or health care personnel shall
be civilly or criminally liable to any person, estate, public or
private entity, or public official by reason of his or her refusal to
perform, assist, counsel, suggest, recommend, refer, or participate in
any way in any particular form of health care service that is contrary
to the conscience of such physician or health care personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 It is unlawful for any person, public or
private institution, or public official to discriminate against any
person in any manner, including but not limited to, licensing, hiring,
promotion, transfer, staff appointment, hospital, managed care entity,
or any other privileges, because of such person's conscientious refusal
to receive, obtain, accept, perform, assist, counsel, suggest,
recommend, refer, or participate in any way in any particular form of
health care services contrary to his or her conscience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Nothing in this chapter relieves a
physician from any duty, that may exist under any laws concerning
current standards, normal medical practices, and procedures to inform
his or her patient of the patient's condition, prognosis, and risks.
However, such physician is under no duty to perform, assist, counsel,
suggest, recommend, refer, or participate in any way in any form of
medical practice or health care service that is contrary to his or her
conscience.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to relieve a
physician or other health care personnel from obligations under the law
of providing emergency medical care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 It is unlawful for any public or private
employer, entity, agency, institution, official, or person, including
but not limited to, a medical, nursing, or other medical training
institution, to deny admission because of, to place any reference in
its application form concerning, to orally question about, to impose
any burdens in terms or conditions of employment on, or to otherwise
discriminate against, any applicant, in terms of employment, admission
to, or participation in any programs for which the applicant is
eligible, or to discriminate in relation thereto, in any other manner,
on account of the applicant's refusal to receive, obtain, accept,
perform, counsel, suggest, recommend, refer, assist, or participate in
any way in any forms of health care services contrary to his or her
conscience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 It is unlawful for any public official,
guardian, agency, institution, or entity to deny any form of aid,
assistance, or benefits, or to condition the reception in any way of
any form of aid, assistance, or benefits, or in any other manner to
coerce, disqualify, or discriminate against any person otherwise
entitled to such aid, assistance, or benefits, because that person
refuses to obtain, receive, accept, perform, assist, counsel, suggest,
recommend, refer, or participate in any way in any form of health care
services contrary to his or her conscience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) No person, association, or corporation
that owns, operates, supervises, or manages a health care facility
shall be civilly or criminally liable to any person, estate, or public
or private entity by reason of refusal of the health care facility to
permit or provide any particular form of health care service that
violates the facility's conscience as documented in its ethical
guidelines, mission statement, constitution, bylaws, articles of
incorporation, regulations, or other governing documents.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed so as to relieve a
physician or other health care personnel from obligations under the law
of providing emergency medical care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 It is unlawful for any person, public or
private institution, or public official to discriminate against any
person, association, or corporation attempting to establish a new
health care facility or operating an existing health care facility, in
any manner, including but not limited to, denial, deprivation or
disqualification in licensing, granting of authorizations, aids,
assistance, benefits, medical staff, or any other privileges, and
granting authorization to expand, improve, or create any health care
facility, by reason of the refusal of such person, association, or
corporation planning, proposing, or operating a health care facility,
to permit or perform any particular form of health care service that
violates the health care facility's conscience as documented in its
existing or proposed ethical guidelines, mission statement,
constitution, bylaws, articles of incorporation, regulations, or other
governing documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 It is unlawful for any public official,
agency, institution, or entity to deny any form of aid, assistance,
grants, or benefits; or in any other manner to coerce, disqualify, or
discriminate against any person, association, or corporation attempting
to establish a new health care facility or operating an existing health
care facility that otherwise would be entitled to the aid, assistance,
grant, or benefit because the existing or proposed health care facility
refuses to perform, assist, counsel, suggest, recommend, refer, or
participate in any way in any form of health care services contrary to
the health care facility's conscience as documented in its existing or
proposed ethical guidelines, mission statement, constitution, bylaws,
articles of incorporation, regulations, or other governing documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 No health care payer and no person,
association, or corporation that owns, operates, supervises, or manages
a health care payer shall be civilly or criminally liable to any
person, estate, or public or private entity by reason of refusal of the
health care payer to pay for or arrange for the payment of any
particular form of health care services that violate the health care
payer's conscience as documented in its ethical guidelines, mission
statement, constitution, bylaws, articles of incorporation,
regulations, or other governing documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 It is unlawful for any person, public or
private institution, or public official to discriminate against any
person, association, or corporation: (1) Attempting to establish a new
health care payer; or (2) operating an existing health care payer, in
any manner, including but not limited to: Denial, deprivation, or
disqualification in licensing; granting of authorizations, aids,
assistance, benefits, or any other privileges; and granting
authorization to expand, improve, or create any health care payer,
because the person, association, or corporation planning, proposing, or
operating a health care payer refuses to pay for or arrange for the
payment of any particular form of health care services that violates
the health care payer's conscience as documented in the existing or
proposed ethical guidelines, mission statement, constitution, bylaws,
articles of incorporation, regulations, or other governing documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 It is unlawful for any public official,
agency, institution, or entity to deny any form of aid, assistance,
grants, or benefits; or in any other manner to coerce, disqualify, or
discriminate against any person, association, or corporation attempting
to establish a new health care payer or operating an existing health
care payer that otherwise would be entitled to the aid, assistance,
grant, or benefit because the existing or proposed health care payer
refuses to pay for, arrange for the payment of, or participate in any
way in any form of health care services contrary to the health care
payer's conscience as documented in its existing or proposed ethical
guidelines, mission statement, constitution, bylaws, articles of
incorporation, regulations, or other governing documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Any person, association, corporation,
entity, or health care facility injured by any public or private
person, association, agency, entity, or corporation by reason of any
action prohibited by this chapter may commence a suit therefor, and
shall recover treble damages, including pain and suffering, sustained
by such person, association, corporation, entity, or health care
facility, the costs of the suit, and reasonable attorneys' fees; but in
no case shall recovery be less than two thousand five hundred dollars
for each violation in addition to costs of the suit and reasonable
attorneys' fees. These damage remedies shall be cumulative, and not
exclusive of other remedies afforded under any other state or federal
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If an insurer provides any insurance
coverage, services, or benefits to any employer or individual, the
insurer may elect but may not be required to provide the employer or
individual contraception or abortion related coverage, services, or
benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If an employer provides any insurance
coverage, services, or benefits for any employee or any dependent of
any employee by paying the costs or premiums in whole or in part for
such coverage, services, or benefits or by participating in negotiating
the terms of such coverage, services, or benefits, the employer may
elect but may not be required to provide the employee contraception or
abortion related coverage, services, or benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If an employer provides disability
coverage, services, or benefits, including sick leave plans or
temporary disability benefit plans, for any employee by paying the
costs or premiums in whole or in part for such coverage, services, or
benefits or by participating in negotiating the terms of such coverage,
services, or benefits, the employer may elect but may not be required
to provide the employee such coverage, services, or benefits for any
illness or disability caused or contributed to by any contraception or
abortion related services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
as excusing any person, public or private institution, or public
official from liability for refusal to permit or provide a particular
form of health care service if:
(1) The person, public or private institution, or public official
has entered into a contract specifically to provide that particular
form of health care service; or
(2) The person, public or private institution, or public official
has accepted federal or state funds for the sole purpose of, and
specifically conditioned upon, permitting or providing that particular
form of health care service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 18 of this act are each
added to chapter 9.02 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, morals, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---