BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are several
counties in the state that are characterized by very high levels of
unemployment and poverty. The legislature further finds that economic
stagnation is the primary cause of this high unemployment rate and
poverty; that the stagnation is often intensified by burdensome and
conflicting regulatory programs that prevent communities from being
economically competitive in the statewide, national, and global
economies; and that natural resource agencies, including the
departments of ecology and fish and wildlife, continue to develop and
adopt state rules, guidelines, permit conditions, and policies that
substantially differ from those that have already been adopted by
federal agencies.
For these reasons, the legislature intends to ensure that state
natural resource agencies, when acting in counties characterized by
very high levels of unemployment, do not exceed existing federal
requirements or policies when implementing programs for which federal
requirements or policies exist. The legislature declares that this
limited policy serves the vital public purpose of facilitating
employment opportunities and reducing poverty in distressed areas of
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
Regulatory activities undertaken by the department in counties in
which the commissioner of the employment security department finds that
the county unemployment rate is eight percent or more may not exceed
the standards required by federal law, regulations, or guidelines that
are applicable to the same activity or subject matter. Regulatory
activities covered by this section are those implementing a federal law
or regulation either delegated to the state or specifically required by
state law to be implemented by the department including: Issuing any
permit, condition, order, guideline, or policy or interpretive
statement; adopting any rule; or entering into any agreement or
contract to implement such regulatory actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Regulatory activities undertaken by the department in counties in
which the commissioner of the employment security department finds that
the county unemployment rate is eight percent or more may not exceed
the standards required by federal law, regulations, or guidelines that
are applicable to the same activity or subject matter. Regulatory
activities covered by this section are those implementing a federal law
or regulation either delegated to the state or specifically required by
state law to be implemented by the department including: Issuing any
permit, condition, order, guideline, or policy or interpretive
statement; adopting any rule; or entering into any agreement or
contract to implement such regulatory actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---