BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.020 and 2003 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Boarding home" means any home or other institution, however
named, which is advertised, announced, or maintained for the express or
implied purpose of providing ((board and)) housing and assuming general
responsibility for the safety and well-being of the residents,
consistent with RCW 18.20.280, and may also provide domiciliary care,
consistent with this act, to seven or more residents after July 1,
2000. However, a boarding home that is licensed ((to provide board and
domiciliary care to)) for three to six residents prior to or on July 1,
2000, may maintain its boarding home license as long as it is
continually licensed as a boarding home. "Boarding home" shall not
include facilities certified as group training homes pursuant to RCW
71A.22.040, nor any home, institution or section thereof which is
otherwise licensed and regulated under the provisions of state law
providing specifically for the licensing and regulation of such home,
institution or section thereof. Nor shall it include any independent
senior housing, independent living units in continuing care retirement
communities, or other similar living situations including those
subsidized by the department of housing and urban development.
(2) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal
successor thereof.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(4) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(5) "Resident's representative" means a person designated by a
competent resident in writing to act in the resident's behalf and to
receive information from the boarding home if a legal representative
has not been appointed. The resident's representative may not be an
employee of the boarding home.
(6) "Domiciliary care" means: Assistance with activities of daily
living provided by the boarding home either directly or indirectly; or
((assuming general responsibility for the safety and well-being of the
resident)) health support services, if provided directly or indirectly
by the boarding home; or intermittent nursing services, if provided
directly or indirectly by the boarding home. (("Domiciliary care" does
not include general observation or preadmission assessment for the
purposes of transitioning to a licensed care setting.
(6))) (7) "General responsibility for the safety and well-being of
the resident" means the provision of the following: Meals; nutritious
snacks; laundry; emergency assistance; activities; housekeeping
services; monitoring of the resident; arranging health care
appointments with outside health care providers; coordinating health
care services with outside health care providers; assisting the
resident to obtain and maintain glasses, hearing aids, dentures, canes,
crutches, walkers, wheelchairs, and assistive communication devices;
observation of resident for changes in overall functioning; responding
appropriately when there are observable or reported changes in the
resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning; and medication
assistance as permitted under RCW 69.41.085 and as defined in RCW
69.41.010.
(8) "General responsibility for the safety and well-being of the
resident" does not include: (a) Emergency assistance provided on an
intermittent or nonroutine basis to any nonresident individual; ((or))
(b) systems or methods employed by independent senior housing,
independent living units in continuing care retirement communities, or
other similar living situations to monitor the well-being of
nonresident individuals; (c) blood pressure checks for nonresident
individuals; (d) nurse consultation services provided at the request of
a nonresident individual to determine whether referral to an outside
health care provider is recommended; (e) making health care
appointments at the request of nonresident individuals; (f) reminding
nonresident individuals of scheduled outside health care appointments;
(g) periodic observation or preadmission assessment for the purposes of
transitioning to a licensed care setting; or (h) services customarily
provided under landlord tenant agreements governed by the residential
landlord-tenant act, chapter 59.18 RCW. ((Such services do not include
care or supervision.)) The preceding services that may be provided to
a nonresident individual may not include continual care or supervision
without a boarding home license.
(((7))) (9) "Legal representative" means a person or persons
identified in RCW 7.70.065 who may act on behalf of the resident
pursuant to the scope of their legal authority. The legal
representative shall not be an employee of the boarding home.
(10) "Nonresident individual" means a person who resides in
independent senior housing, independent living units in continuing care
retirement communities, or in other similar living environments or in
a boarding home and does not receive the services listed in subsection
(8) of this section under general responsibility for the safety and
well-being of the resident, or domiciliary care as defined in this
chapter directly or indirectly by the facility.
(11) "Resident" means an individual who((: Lives in a boarding
home, including those receiving respite care;)) is not related by blood
or marriage to the operator of the boarding home((;)), and by reason of
age or disability, chooses to reside in the boarding home and receives
the services listed under general responsibilities for the safety and
well-being of the resident and may receive domiciliary care or respite
care provided ((either)) directly or indirectly by the boarding home
and may receive hospice care through an outside provider when arranged
by the resident or the resident's legal representative.
(12) "Resident applicant" means an individual who has completed and
signed an application for admission to a licensed boarding home.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A boarding home licensed under this chapter may provide
domiciliary care services as defined in this chapter and shall disclose
the level and scope of the care and services that it chooses to
provide.
(2) The boarding home licensee shall disclose to the department,
residents, the residents' legal representative if available, and if
not, the residents' representative if available, and to interested
consumers upon request, using the form developed and provided by the
department or one that is substantially similar. The form that the
department develops shall be standardized, reasonable in length, and
easy to read. The boarding home's disclosure statement must also
indicate whether it permits the resident or the resident's legal
representative to independently arrange for outside services under
section 10 of this act.
(3) If the boarding home licensee decreases the level or scope of
services that it chooses to provide, the licensee shall provide a
minimum of thirty days' notice to the department, residents, the
residents' legal representative if available, and if not, the
residents' representative if available, before the effective date of
the decrease in the level or scope of care or services provided. If
the boarding home licensee increases the level or scope of services
that it chooses to provide, the licensee shall promptly provide notice
to the department, residents, the residents' legal representative if
available, and if not, the residents' representative if available, and
shall indicate the date on which the increase in the level or scope of
care or services is effective.
(4) Notwithstanding RCW 70.129.110(3)(a), the disclosure of any
services or care that a boarding home licensee offers to provide may
include exceptions to allow the licensee to, on a limited basis, meet
the needs of residents pending discharge. Providing care or services
to one or more residents on a limited basis, pending discharge, shall
not be construed to mean that the licensee can or will reasonably
accommodate other residents' similar needs throughout their boarding
home stay. The licensee must otherwise reasonably accommodate a
resident's needs when the resident's needs are within the scope and
level of care or services that the licensee has disclosed. Reasonable
accommodation of resident needs is not required when the accommodation
fundamentally alters the nature or character of the scope or level of
care or services provided by the licensee or when the accommodation
would create an undue financial hardship to the licensee.
(5) Even though the boarding home licensee may disclose that it can
provide certain care or services to residents, resident applicants, the
residents' legal representative if one exists, and if not, the
residents' representative, the licensee may deny admission to a
resident applicant or to discharge any resident when the licensee
determines that the needs of the resident applicant or the resident
cannot be met based upon the cumulative need for care or services of
all residents or the medical complexity of the resident or the resident
applicant.
(6) Notwithstanding RCW 70.129.110 (1)(a) and (4)(a), the licensee
shall provide notice of discharge to a resident as soon as reasonably
practicable and may immediately discharge a resident when the licensee
determines that it can no longer meet the residents' needs or when the
resident requires care or services that are beyond those that the
licensee disclosed at the time the resident was admitted, or as the
disclosure of care and services may be amended thereafter. However, if
the resident or resident's legal representative has independently
arranged for outside services under section 10 of this act discharge of
the resident will be as permitted by the licensee. The licensee and
the resident otherwise retain all other rights of transfer and
discharge under RCW 70.129.110. The department shall, at the request
of the licensee, secure an alternative placement for a medicaid
resident.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A boarding home licensee may choose to provide minimal,
substantial, or total assistance in all of the following activities of
daily living including the following:
(a) Bathing:
(i) Minimal assistance. Oversight of the bathing activity or
reminding is provided. Assistance or supervision is not provided but
occasional reminding is provided. Standby assistance to aid in getting
into or out of the tub or shower is provided.
(ii) Substantial assistance. Significant assistance with part of
the bathing activity, for example, to lather, wash and/or rinse the
resident's hair or body is provided. Physical assistance into a tub or
shower is provided.
(iii) Total assistance. Caregivers provide a complete bath.
(b) Dressing:
(i) Minimal assistance. Clothing is laid out. Reminding or
occasional supervision is provided.
(ii) Substantial assistance. Some physical assistance in dressing
or undressing is provided frequently or most of the time.
(iii) Total assistance. Caregivers do all dressing and undressing.
(c) Eating:
(i) Minimal assistance. Assistance cutting or preparing food or
beverages for consumption is provided.
(ii) Substantial assistance. Standby assistance for occasional
gagging, choking, or swallowing difficulties is provided. Reminding or
assistance with adaptive feeding equipment is provided.
(iii) Total assistance. Caregivers feed some or all food.
(d) Personal Hygiene:
(i) Minimal assistance. Occasional reminding or supervision is
provided. Personal grooming items are set out. Occasional assistance
with both personal hygiene and grooming is provided.
(ii) Substantial assistance. Regular assistance is provided.
(iii) Total assistance. Caregivers provide all personal hygiene
and grooming.
(e) Transferring:
(i) Minimal assistance. Occasional verbal cuing or standby
assistance for transfers is provided.
(ii) Substantial assistance. Occasional light touch to guide or
steady in transferring is provided.
(iii) Total assistance. Physical assistance with some or all
transfers is provided.
(f) Toileting:
(i) Minimal assistance. Reminding to toilet or to change a
protective garment is provided.
(ii) Substantial assistance. Occasional assistance with parts of
the toileting tasks is provided.
(iii) Total assistance. Physical assistance to use the toilet on
a scheduled toileting or incontinence program is provided. Management
of a closed drainage system for a catheter or sheath is provided.
(g) Ambulation and Mobility:
(i) Minimal assistance. Occasional verbal cuing is provided.
(ii) Substantial assistance. Occasional standby assistance or
light touch assistance to guide or steady during ambulation or mobility
is provided.
(iii) Total assistance. Physical assistance of a caregiver is
required for mobility.
(2) Boarding homes are not required to provide assistance with
activities of daily living. When a boarding home licensee selects the
level of assistance that will be provided to residents, minimal,
substantial, or total, the level of assistance selected shall apply to
all activities of daily living, for example, if the licensee chooses to
provide substantial assistance, then substantial assistance must be
available to assist residents with bathing, dressing, eating, personal
hygiene, transferring, toileting, and ambulation and mobility.
However, the activities of daily living assistance provided to a
resident shall be consistent with RCW 18.20.280.
(3) The licensee shall clarify, through the disclosure form, any
limitations, additional services, or conditions that may apply under
this section.
(4) In providing assistance with activities of daily living, the
boarding home shall observe the resident for changes in overall
functioning and respond appropriately when there are observable or
reported changes in the resident's physical, mental, or emotional
functioning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Boarding homes are not required to provide any health support
services. The boarding home licensee may choose to provide any of the
following health support services:
(a) Blood glucose testing;
(b) Low sodium diets;
(c) General diabetic diets;
(d) Puree diets;
(e) Mechanical soft foods;
(f) Calorie controlled diabetic diets;
(g) Directing or redirecting behaviors; and
(h) Supervising behaviors.
(2) The licensee shall clarify on the disclosure form any
limitations, additional services, or conditions that may apply under
this section.
(3) In providing health support services, the boarding home shall
observe the resident for changes in overall functioning and respond
appropriately when there are observable or reported changes in the
resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Boarding homes are not required to provide intermittent nursing
services. The boarding home licensee may choose to provide any of the
following intermittent nursing services through appropriately licensed
and credentialed staff, and the licensee shall clarify, through
disclosure, any limitations, additional services, or conditions:
(a) Assistance with treatments;
(b) Medication administration;
(c) Administration of health care treatments;
(d) Blood glucose monitoring;
(e) Ostomy care; and
(f) Tube feeding.
(2) The licensee shall clarify on the disclosure form any
limitations, additional services, or conditions that may apply under
this section.
(3) In providing intermittent nursing services, the boarding home
shall observe the resident for changes in overall functioning and
respond appropriately when there are observable or reported changes in
the resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning.
(4) The boarding home may provide intermittent nursing services to
the extent permitted by RCW 18.20.160.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A boarding home licensee may permit a resident's family member
to administer medications or treatments or to provide medication or
treatment assistance to the resident. The licensee shall disclose to
the department, residents, the residents' legal representative if
available, and if not, the resident's representative if available, and
to interested consumers upon request, information describing whether
the licensee permits such family administration or assistance and, if
so, the extent of limitations or conditions thereof.
(2) If a boarding home licensee permits a resident's family member
to administer medications or treatments or to provide medication or
treatment assistance, the licensee shall request that the family member
submit to the licensee a written medication or treatment plan. At a
minimum, the written medication or treatment plan shall identify:
(a) By name, the family member who will administer the medication
or treatment or provide assistance therewith;
(b) The medication or treatment administration or assistance that
the family member will provide consistent with subsection (1) of this
section. This will be referred to as the primary plan;
(c) An alternate plan that will meet the resident's medication or
treatment needs if the family member is unable to fulfill his or her
duties as specified in the primary plan; and
(d) An emergency contact person and telephone number if the
boarding home licensee observes changes in the resident's overall
functioning or condition that may relate to the medication or treatment
plan.
(3) The boarding home licensee may require that the primary or
alternate medication or treatment plan include other information in
addition to that specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The medication or treatment plan shall be signed and dated by
the resident, if able, the resident's family member, and the boarding
home licensee.
(5) The boarding home may through policy or procedure require the
resident's family member to immediately notify the boarding home
licensee of any change in the primary or alternate medication or
treatment plan.
(6) When a boarding home licensee permits residents' family members
to assist with or administer medications or treatments, the licensee's
duty of care, and any negligence that may be attributed thereto, shall
include: Observation of the resident for changes in overall
functioning consistent with RCW 18.20.280; notification to the person
or persons identified in RCW 70.129.030 when there are changes in the
resident's condition or when the boarding home is aware that both the
primary and alternate plan are not implemented; and appropriately
responding to obtain needed assistance when there are observable or
reported changes in the resident's physical or mental functioning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The boarding home licensee shall conduct a preadmission
assessment for each resident applicant. The preadmission assessment
shall include the following information:
(a) Medical history;
(b) Necessary and contraindicated medications;
(c) A licensed medical or health professional's diagnosis, unless
the individual objects for religious reasons;
(d) Significant known behaviors or symptoms that may cause concern
or require special care;
(e) Mental illness diagnosis, except where protected by
confidentiality laws;
(f) Level of personal care needs;
(g) Activities and service preferences; and
(h) Preferences regarding other issues important to the resident
applicant, such as food and daily routine.
(2) The boarding home licensee shall complete the preadmission
assessment before admission unless there is an emergency. If there is
an emergency admission, the preadmission assessment shall be completed
within five days of the date of admission. For purposes of this
section, "emergency" includes, but is not limited to: Evening,
weekend, or Friday afternoon admissions if the resident applicant would
otherwise need to remain in a licensed hospital, nursing facility,
adult family home, an unsafe home environment, or be without adequate
and safe housing.
(3) The boarding home licensee shall complete an initial resident
service plan upon move-in to identify the resident's immediate needs
and to provide direction to staff and caregivers relating to the
resident's immediate needs. The initial resident service plan shall be
based upon any information, under subsection (1) of this section, that
can be obtained upon move-in.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The boarding home licensee shall within fourteen days of the
resident's date of move-in, unless extended by the department for good
cause, and thereafter at least annually, complete a full reassessment
addressing the following:
(a) The individual's recent medical history, including, but not
limited to: A health professional's diagnosis, unless the resident
objects for religious reasons; chronic, current, and potential skin
conditions; known allergies to foods or medications; or other
considerations for providing care or services;
(b) Current necessary and contraindicated medications and
treatments for the individual, including:
(i) Any prescribed medications and over-the-counter medications
that are commonly taken by the individual, and that the individual is
able to independently self-administer or safely and accurately direct
others to administer to him or her;
(ii) Any prescribed medications and over-the-counter medications
that are commonly taken by the individual and that the individual is
able to self-administer when he or she has the assistance of a
resident-care staff person; and
(iii) Any prescribed medications and over-the-counter medications
that are commonly taken by the individual and that the individual is
not able to self-administer;
(c) The individual's nursing needs when the individual requires the
services of a nurse on the boarding home premises;
(d) The individual's sensory abilities, including vision and
hearing;
(e) The individual's communication abilities, including modes of
expression, ability to make himself or herself understood, and ability
to understand others;
(f) Significant known behaviors or symptoms of the individual
causing concern or requiring special care, including: History of
substance abuse; history of harming self, others, or property, or other
conditions that may require behavioral intervention strategies; the
individual's ability to leave the boarding home unsupervised; and other
safety considerations that may pose a danger to the individual or
others, such as use of medical devices or the individual's ability to
smoke unsupervised, if smoking is permitted in the boarding home;
(g) The individual's special needs, by evaluating available
information, or selecting and using an appropriate tool to determine
the presence of symptoms consistent with, and implications for care and
services of: Mental illness, or needs for psychological or mental
health services, except where protected by confidentiality laws;
developmental disability; dementia; or other conditions affecting
cognition, such as traumatic brain injury;
(h) The individual's level of personal care needs, including:
Ability to perform activities of daily living; medication management
ability, including the individual's ability to obtain and appropriately
use over-the-counter medications; and how the individual will obtain
prescribed medications for use in the boarding home;
(i) The individual's activities, typical daily routines, habits,
and service preferences;
(j) The individual's personal identity and lifestyle, to the extent
the individual is willing to share the information, and the manner in
which they are expressed, including preferences regarding food,
community contacts, hobbies, spiritual preferences, or other sources of
pleasure and comfort; and
(k) Who has decision-making authority for the individual,
including: The presence of any advance directive, or other legal
document that will establish a substitute decision maker in the future;
the presence of any legal document that establishes a current
substitute decision maker; and the scope of decision-making authority
of any substitute decision maker.
(2) Complete a limited assessment of a resident's change of
condition when the resident's negotiated service agreement no longer
addresses the resident's current needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The boarding home licensee shall complete a negotiated service
agreement using the preadmission assessment, initial resident service
plan, and full reassessment information obtained under sections 7 and
8 of this act. The licensee shall include the resident and, unless the
resident objects, the resident's legal representative if available, or
the resident's representative, in the development of the negotiated
service agreement. If the resident is a medicaid client, the
department's case manager shall also be involved.
(2) The negotiated service agreement shall be completed or updated:
(a) Within thirty days of the date of move-in;
(b) As necessary following the annual full assessment of the
resident; and
(c) Whenever the resident's negotiated service agreement no longer
adequately addresses the resident's current needs and preferences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The boarding home licensee may permit the resident, or the
resident's legal representative, to independently arrange for or
contract with a person or a home health, hospice, or home care agency
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, to provide care and services to the
resident, consistent with RCW 18.20.260.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 12, 2005, the department shall report on the payment
system for licensed boarding homes to the chairs of the senate and
house of representatives health care committees. The department shall
include in the report findings regarding the average costs of providing
care and services for the nonmetropolitan statistical areas,
metropolitan statistical areas, and King county to determine whether
the rates of payment within the designated areas are, on average,
reasonably related to the identified average costs. The cost data is
exempt from disclosure as provided in section 17 of this act. The
purpose of this cost-to-rate comparison study is to assess any cost
impacts that may be attributed to the implementation of new boarding
home rules occurring between September 1, 2004, and June 30, 2005. If
the department adopts new boarding home rules after June 30, 2005, the
report to the chairs of the senate and house of representatives health
care committees will instead be due by December 12, 2006.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.20.160 and 1985 c 297 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person operating a boarding home licensed under this chapter
shall admit to or retain in the boarding home any aged person requiring
nursing or medical care of a type provided by institutions licensed
under chapters 18.51, 70.41 or 71.12 RCW, except that when registered
nurses are available, and upon a doctor's order that a supervised
medication service is needed, it may be provided. Supervised
medication services, as defined by the department and consistent with
chapters 69.41 and 18.79 RCW, may include an approved program of self-medication or self-directed medication. Such medication service shall
be provided only to ((boarders)) residents who otherwise meet all
requirements for residency in a boarding home. No boarding home shall
admit or retain a person who requires the frequent presence and
frequent evaluation of a registered nurse, excluding persons who are
receiving hospice care or persons who have a short-term illness that is
expected to be resolved within fourteen days.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.20.290 and 2003 c 231 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When a boarding home contracts with the department to provide
adult residential care services, enhanced adult residential care
services, or assisted living services under chapter 74.39A RCW, the
boarding home must hold a medicaid eligible resident's room or unit
when short-term care is needed in a nursing home or hospital, the
resident is likely to return to the boarding home, and payment is made
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The medicaid resident's bed or unit shall be held for up to
twenty days. The per day bed or unit hold compensation amount shall be
seventy percent of the daily rate paid for the first seven days the bed
or unit is held for the resident who needs short-term nursing home care
or hospitalization. The rate for the eighth through the twentieth day
a bed is held shall be established in rule, but shall be no lower than
ten dollars per day the bed or unit is held.
(3) The boarding home may seek third-party payment to hold a bed or
unit for twenty-one days or longer. The third-party payment shall not
exceed ((eighty-five percent of)) the ((average)) medicaid daily rate
paid to the facility for the resident. If third-party payment is not
available, the medicaid resident may return to the first available and
appropriate bed or unit, if the resident continues to meet the
admission criteria under this chapter.
(4) The department shall monitor the use and impact of the policy
established under this section and shall report its findings to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31, 2005.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2006.

Sec. 14 RCW 74.39A.009 and 1997 c 392 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult family home" means a home licensed under chapter 70.128
RCW.
(2) "Adult residential care" means services provided by a boarding
home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a contract
with the department under RCW 74.39A.020 to provide personal care
services.
(3) "Assisted living services" means services provided by a
boarding home that has a contract with the department under RCW
74.39A.010 to provide personal care services, intermittent nursing
services, and medication administration services, and the resident is
housed in a private apartment-like unit.
(4) "Boarding home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW.
(5) "Cost-effective care" means care provided in a setting of an
individual's choice that is necessary to promote the most appropriate
level of physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being consistent with
client choice, in an environment that is appropriate to the care and
safety needs of the individual, and such care cannot be provided at a
lower cost in any other setting. But this in no way precludes an
individual from choosing a different residential setting to achieve his
or her desired quality of life.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Enhanced adult residential care" means services provided by a
boarding home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a
contract with the department under RCW 74.39A.010 to provide personal
care services, intermittent nursing services, and medication
administration services.
(8) "Functionally disabled person" is synonymous with chronic
functionally disabled and means a person who because of a recognized
chronic physical or mental condition or disease, including chemical
dependency, is impaired to the extent of being dependent upon others
for direct care, support, supervision, or monitoring to perform
activities of daily living. "Activities of daily living", in this
context, means self-care abilities related to personal care such as
bathing, eating, using the toilet, dressing, and transfer.
Instrumental activities of daily living may also be used to assess a
person's functional abilities as they are related to the mental
capacity to perform activities in the home and the community such as
cooking, shopping, house cleaning, doing laundry, working, and managing
personal finances.
(9) "Home and community services" means adult family homes, in-home
services, and other services administered or provided by contract by
the department directly or through contract with area agencies on aging
or similar services provided by facilities and agencies licensed by the
department.
(10) "Long-term care" is synonymous with chronic care and means
care and supports delivered indefinitely, intermittently, or over a
sustained time to persons of any age disabled by chronic mental or
physical illness, disease, chemical dependency, or a medical condition
that is permanent, not reversible or curable, or is long-lasting and
severely limits their mental or physical capacity for self-care. The
use of this definition is not intended to expand the scope of services,
care, or assistance by any individuals, groups, residential care
settings, or professions unless otherwise expressed by law.
(11) "Nursing home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW.
(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(13) "Tribally licensed boarding home" means a boarding home
licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe which home provides
services similar to boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 74.39A.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) To the extent of available funding, the department of social
and health services may contract for adult residential care ((and
enhanced adult residential care)).
(2) The department shall, by rule, develop terms and conditions for
facilities that contract with the department for adult residential care
((and enhanced adult residential care)) to establish:
(a) Facility service standards consistent with the principles in
RCW 74.39A.050 and consistent with chapter 70.129 RCW; and
(b) Training requirements for providers and their staff.
(3) The department shall, by rule, provide that services in adult
residential care ((and enhanced adult residential care)) facilities:
(a) Recognize individual needs, privacy, and autonomy;
(b) Include personal care ((and limited nursing services)) and
other services that promote independence and self-sufficiency and aging
in place;
(c) Are directed first to those persons most likely, in the absence
of adult residential care ((and enhanced adult residential care))
services, to need hospital, nursing facility, or other out-of-home
placement; and
(d) Are provided in compliance with applicable facility and
professional licensing laws and rules.
(4) When a facility contracts with the department for adult
residential care ((and enhanced adult residential care)), only services
and facility standards that are provided to or in behalf of the adult
residential care ((or the enhanced adult residential care)) client
shall be subject to the adult residential care ((or enhanced adult
residential care)) rules.
(5) To the extent of available funding, the department may also
contract under this section with a tribally licensed boarding home for
the provision of services of the same nature as the services provided
by adult residential care facilities. The provisions of subsections
(2)(a) and (b) and (3)(a) through (d) of this section apply to such a
contract.

Sec. 16 RCW 70.129.110 and 1997 c 392 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The facility must permit each resident to remain in the
facility, and not transfer or discharge the resident from the facility
unless:
(a) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the transfer or
discharge is necessary for the resident's welfare and the resident's
needs cannot be met in the facility;
(b) The safety of individuals in the facility is endangered;
(c) The health of individuals in the facility would otherwise be
endangered;
(d) The resident has failed to make the required payment for his or
her stay; or
(e) The facility ceases to operate.
(2) All long-term care facilities shall fully disclose to potential
residents or their legal representative the service capabilities of the
facility prior to admission to the facility. If the care needs of the
applicant who is medicaid eligible are in excess of the facility's
service capabilities, the department shall identify other care settings
or residential care options consistent with federal law.
(3) Before a long-term care facility transfers or discharges a
resident, the facility must:
(a) First attempt through reasonable accommodations to avoid the
transfer or discharge, unless agreed to by the resident and except as
provided in section 2 of this act;
(b) Notify the resident and representative and make a reasonable
effort to notify, if known, an interested family member of the transfer
or discharge and the reasons for the move in writing and in a language
and manner they understand;
(c) Record the reasons in the resident's record; and
(d) Include in the notice the items described in subsection (5) of
this section.
(4)(a) Except when specified in this subsection and as provided in
section 2 of this act, the notice of transfer or discharge required
under subsection (3) of this section must be made by the facility at
least thirty days before the resident is transferred or discharged.
(b) Notice may be made as soon as practicable before transfer or
discharge when:
(i) The safety of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(ii) The health of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(iii) An immediate transfer or discharge is required by the
resident's urgent medical needs; or
(iv) A resident has not resided in the facility for thirty days.
(5) The written notice specified in subsection (3) of this section
must include the following:
(a) The reason for transfer or discharge;
(b) The effective date of transfer or discharge;
(c) The location to which the resident is transferred or
discharged;
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of the state long-term
care ombudsman;
(e) For residents with developmental disabilities, the mailing
address and telephone number of the agency responsible for the
protection and advocacy of developmentally disabled individuals
established under part C of the developmental disabilities assistance
and bill of rights act; and
(f) For residents who are mentally ill, the mailing address and
telephone number of the agency responsible for the protection and
advocacy of mentally ill individuals established under the protection
and advocacy for mentally ill individuals act.
(6) A facility must provide sufficient preparation and orientation
to residents to ensure safe and orderly transfer or discharge from the
facility.
(7) A resident discharged in violation of this section has the
right to be readmitted immediately upon the first availability of a
gender-appropriate bed in the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Data collected by the department of social and health services for
the reports required by section 11 of this act and section 8, chapter
231, Laws of 2003, except as compiled in the aggregate and reported to
the senate and house of representatives, is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except that sections 2 through 5, 8, 9, and 16 of this act
take effect September 1, 2004.

--- END ---