BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A supplemental capital budget is hereby
adopted making changes to existing appropriations and making new
appropriations which, subject to the provisions set forth in this act,
the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as
shall be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital purposes for the
biennium ending June 30, 2005, out of the several funds specified in
this act.

PART 1
CORRECTIONS TO 2003-2005 CAPITAL BUDGET
Sec. 101 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE
Capital Budget Studies (04-1-950)

(1) The ((appropriations)) appropriation in this section ((are)) is
provided solely for capital studies, projects, and tasks pursuant to
sections 923 and 924 of this act.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is from 2001 2nd sp.s. c 8
s 149 for the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $164,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $664,000

Sec. 102 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (88-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $558,000
((Rural Washington Loan Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,739,295
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,297,295))
Appropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,542,969

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,353,072))
$2,549,398
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,650,367

Sec. 103 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (RWLF) (04-4-009)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Rural Washington Loan Account--((Federal)) State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,581,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,132,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,613,000

Sec. 104 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts (04-4-007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.63A.750. The following projects are eligible for
funding:

Projects Location Recommendation

Artspace (Tashiro Kaplan) Seattle $300,000

Broadway center Tacoma $400,000

Children's museum Everett $200,000

Columbia city gallery Seattle $110,000

Cornish College Seattle $700,000

Friends of Gladish Pullman $37,000

Historic cooper school Seattle $32,000

Lincoln theatre Mt. Vernon $110,000

Olympic theatre arts Sequim $265,000

Orcas sculpture park Eastsound $15,000

Pacific Northwest ballet Bellevue $268,000

Pratt fine arts center Seattle $700,000

Richland players theatre Richland $51,000

S'Klallam longhouse Kingston $200,000

Seattle art museum Seattle $700,000

Squaxin Island museum Shelton $100,000

Vashon allied arts Vashon $80,000

Velocity dance center Seattle $35,000

Western Washington center for the arts Port Orchard $165,000

((World kite museum Long Beach $32,000))

TOTAL (($4,500,000))
$4,468,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,500,000))
$4,468,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,500,000))
$20,468,000

Sec. 105 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (CERB) (04-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: ((The)) A maximum of twenty-five percent
of the appropriation in this section ((is provided solely for loans to
local governments)) may be used for grants.

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,491,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,718,769
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,209,769

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (00-2-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding from the state public works trust
fund shall be matched with new federal sources to improve the quality
of drinking water in the state, and shall be used solely for projects
that achieve the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,983,356

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,716,644
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Heritage Park (2001-H-004)

Reappropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,869

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,559,774
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . 0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 14,830,643

Sec. 108 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 159 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Transportation Building Preservation (((98-1-008))) (02-1-008)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,001,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,964,065
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,090,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,055,065

Sec. 109 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 169 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services (04-2-014)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section shall be used to provide
project management services to state agencies as required by RCW
43.19.450 that are essential and mandated activities defined as core
services and are included in the engineering and architectural
services' responsibilities and task list for general public works
projects of normal complexity. The general public works projects
included are all those financed by the state capital budget for the
biennium ending June 30, 2005, with individual total project values up
to $20 million.
(2) The department may negotiate agreements with agencies for
additional fees to manage projects financed by financial contracts,
other alternative financing, projects with a total value greater than
$20 million, or for the nonstate funded portion of projects with mixed
funding sources.
(3) The department shall review each community and technical
college request and the requests of other client agencies for funding
any project over $2.5 million for inclusion in the 2004 supplemental
capital budget and the 2005-07 capital budget to ensure that the amount
requested by the agency is appropriate for predesign, design, and
construction, depending on the phase of the project being requested.
The department shall pay particular attention: (a) That the budgeted
amount requested is at an appropriate level for the various components
that make up the cost of the project such as project management; and
(b) that standard measurements such as cost per square foot are
reasonable. The department shall also assist the office of financial
management with review of other agency projects as requested.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,009,000))
$6,959,000
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,513,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,437,000))
$974,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,586,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$41,308,400
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,586,000))
$50,894,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Legal Offender Unit (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,330,537
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,580,537

Sec. 111 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 234 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (04-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation is provided solely for
an interagency agreement with the department of community, trade, and
economic development to make, in cooperation with the public works
board, loans to local governments and public water systems for projects
and activities to protect and improve the state's drinking water
facilities and resources.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,122,000))
$46,222,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,122,000))
$46,222,000

Sec. 112 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 313 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (04-4-007)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $7,547,044 of the water quality account appropriation is
provided for the extended grant payment to Metro/King county.
(2) Up to $10,000,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is provided for the extended grant payment to
Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(3) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for water quality facility grants for
communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department shall
give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with
water quality regulations; (b) projects for which design work has been
completed; and (c) projects with a local match from reasonable water
quality rates and charges.
(4) (($1,500,000 of the state building construction--state
appropriation is provided solely for water conveyance facilities to
implement the 1996 memorandum of agreement regarding utilization of
Skagit river basin water resources for in-stream and out-of-stream
purposes.
(5))) $4,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the city of Duvall for
construction of a sewage treatment plant.
(((6))) (5) $1,000,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Klickitat wastewater
treatment project.
(((7))) (6) The remaining appropriation in this section is provided
for statewide water quality implementation and planning grants and
loans. The department shall give priority consideration to projects
located in basins with critical or depressed salmonid stocks.
(((8))) (7) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(8) $1,000,000 of the appropriations is to assist the city of
Enumclaw with waste water treatment upgrades to address phosphorus
loading in the White river.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,452,000))
$29,952,000
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,948,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,400,000))
$45,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($246,400,000))
$245,900,000

Sec. 113 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 312 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (02-4-007) and (86-2-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the conditions and
limitations of section 315, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess.
(2) The reappropriation for project number 86-2-007 is $793,214 for
the public works assistance account and $4,600,505 for the water
quality account. The remainder, $13,702,946 for the water quality
account, is for project number 02-4-007.

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,214
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,210,510))
$18,303,451
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,096,665

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($115,983,563))
$117,890,622
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($136,194,073))
$136,987,287

Sec. 114 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 317 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Expansion (02-2-006)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,472,891))
$1,374,553
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($693,353))
$651,208
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,166,244))
$2,025,761

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,417,196))
$2,562,128
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $568,804
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,986,000))
$3,130,932

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($527,756))
$668,239
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,680,000))
$5,824,932

Sec. 115 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 340 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Iron Horse Trail (04-2-016)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the commission shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(2) The commission shall submit a study of potential user fees that
could support maintenance, operation, and capital renewal costs of the
agency's three cross-state trails. This study must be submitted to the
office of financial management by June 30, 2004.))
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The commission shall submit a study of
potential user fees that could support maintenance, operation, and
capital renewal costs of the commission's three cross-state trails.
This study must be submitted to the office of financial management by
June 30, 2004.

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State))
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,500

Sec. 116 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 367 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Salmon Recovery (00-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The agency shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2003,
on the reason for funds in this section not being expended.
(2) $974,000 of this 2004 amendment is for a fund balance
adjustment.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,263,219
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,076,017))
$8,457,819
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,339,236))
$43,721,038

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,566,576))
$55,210,774
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($101,569,389))
$98,931,812

Sec. 117 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 369 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (SRFB) (04-4-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($23,187,500 of the appropriation is provided for grants for
restoration projects.)) At least one-half of the total actual
expenditures provided in this section shall be for restoration
projects. Total actual expenditures shall mean the sum of the state
building construction account--state appropriation and the actual
federal grant awards received for the purposes of this section.
(2) The remainder of the appropriation is provided solely for
grants for other salmon recovery efforts. These grants shall include
a grant to any regional recovery board established in the Revised Code
of Washington and may include grants for additional restoration
projects.
(3) By December 1, 2003, the salmon recovery funding board shall
provide a report to the house of representatives capital budget
committee and the senate ways and means committee that enumerates board
expenditures for salmon recovery projects and activities. The report
shall include a list of each project that has been approved for funding
by the board, and each project that was submitted on a lead entity
habitat project schedule and not funded by the board. Each list shall
include the project, project description, project sponsor, status of
the project including expenditures to date and completion date, and
matching funds that were available for the project. The report shall
also include a list and description of all other activities funded by
the board including consulting contracts, lead entity and regional
recovery board contracts, a description of each of these activities,
and the timeline for their completion.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,375,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000

Sec. 118 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 354 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (04-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided for the approved list of projects
in LEAP capital document No. 2003-45, as developed on June 4, 2003, and
LEAP capital document No. 2004-17, as developed on February 25, 2004.
In addition to the annual project progress reporting requirement of RCW
43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly project progress
reports with the office of financial management.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that any moneys remaining
unexpended shall be reappropriated in the 2005-07 biennium, but no
reappropriations shall be made in subsequent biennia.
(3) The department of natural resources shall manage lands acquired
through project No. 02-1090, "Bone river and Niawiakum river natural
area preserves," as natural resources conservation areas under chapter
79.71 RCW.

Appropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,500,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,000,000

Sec. 119 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 394 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Job Creation and Infrastructure Projects (03-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation shall support the projects as listed in
section 212, chapter 238, Laws of 2002.
(2) The legislature does not intend to reappropriate amounts not
expended by June 30, 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($970,000))
$1,285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,070,000))
$1,755,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000

Sec. 120 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 397 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Population and Habitat Protection (04-1-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((1))) $400,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for upland wildlife habitat.
(((2) $500,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to maintain existing mitigation agreements in the Snake
river region for upland habitat and additional agreements with
landowners.))

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,830,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,700,000))
$1,200,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,430,000))
$9,930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,430,000))
$9,930,000

Sec. 121 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works (02-2-001) and (00-2-011)

Reappropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $256,230
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $482,466
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $455,575
Agricultural College Trust Management Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,950
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,263,221

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,006,779
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,270,000

Sec. 122 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Seattle Toxicology Lab (((00-2-009))) (00-2-008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,059,864
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,655,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,514,864

Sec. 123 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 743 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Humanities/General Education
Complex (00-2-679)

Reappropriation:
((Education Construction Account--State))
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,092,690
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,350,248

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $812,310
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,255,248

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Leadbetter Point Restoration (04-1-026)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,933

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $886,067
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $994,000

Sec. 125 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 678 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
CWU/Des Moines Higher Education Center (02-2-101)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,500,000))
$2,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,438,000
((Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State)) Gardner-Evans Higher Education
Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,962,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,575,000))
$10,275,000

Sec. 126 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 738 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Highline Community College: Higher Ed Center/Childcare (00-2-678)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $985,949
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,654,000))
$11,692,000
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,898,000))
$6,860,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,552,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,359,051
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,897,000

(End of part)

PART 2
CAPITAL PROJECTS/PROGRAMS
Sec. 201 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Account (04-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Expenditures of the appropriation shall comply with RCW
70.119A.170.
(2)(a) The state building construction account appropriation is
provided solely to provide assistance to counties, cities, and special
purpose districts to identify, acquire, and rehabilitate public water
systems that have water quality problems or have been allowed to
deteriorate to a point where public health is an issue. Eligibility is
confined to applicants that already own at least one group A public
water system and that demonstrate a track record of sound drinking
water utility management. Funds may be used for: Planning, design,
and other preconstruction activities; system acquisition; and capital
construction costs.
(b) The state building construction account appropriation must be
jointly administered by the department of health, the public works
board, and the department of community, trade, and economic development
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program as an
administrative model. In order to expedite the use of these funds and
minimize administration costs, this appropriation must be administered
by guidance, rather than rule. Projects must generally be prioritized
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program criteria.
All financing provided through this program must be in the form of
grants that must partially cover project costs. The maximum grant to
any eligible entity may not exceed twenty-five percent of the funds
allocated to this appropriation.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,500,000))
$12,700,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,500,000))
$16,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,900,000))
$49,100,000

Sec. 202 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Lewis and Clark Confluence Project (04-2-954)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section shall
meet the requirements of section 151(1) of this act.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Port of Walla Walla Land Acquisition (2004-4-961)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Capital Budget and Facilities Management Enhancement (05-2-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The purpose of this appropriation is to
implement the recommendations of the higher education facilities
preservation study and other related budget and financial management
system improvements. These improvements should also be applicable to
nonhigher education institutions.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Charitable, Educational, Reformatory, and Penal
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building: Rehabilitation and Capital Addition
(2001-1-008)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,400,000 of the state building
construction account--state appropriation is provided for the costs of
equipping the Legislative building for technology infrastructure,
including computer wiring closets, audio and video connections, and
wireless computer capabilities.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Capitol Historic District Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,450,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,450,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,031,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,281,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Cherberg Building: Rehabilitation (2002-1-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is for the purpose of
furthering the John A. Cherberg building rehabilitation project,
including but not limited to the following: Project final design and
initial phase of reconstruction; purchase and remodel of the two
modular buildings currently owned by the Legislative building
rehabilitation project; and remodel of a portion of the Joel M.
Pritchard building for use as swing space during reconstruction.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $695,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,429,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,124,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington Corrections Center for Women: Sewer Connection Fee
(05-2-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Water system Plans (05-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000

Sec. 209 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 267 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (04-1-021)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$3,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
3,750,000

Sec. 210 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 273 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Master Planning (04-4-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the department to
contract for master planning services.
(2) The department shall incorporate the integration of operating
and capital in the scope of work and master planning effort to include
a minimum six-year planning horizon.
(3) The master plan shall include an analysis of forecasted
offender population growth, gender, custody level, population and
medical needs, infrastructure needs, and a system-wide view of facility
needs. Alternatives should be generated that include the management of
excess capacity, such as rental beds, regional jails, and other options
to add capacity to the existing system at the same or a lower cost than
new construction of prison beds and eventual operating costs. These
alternatives shall include an exploration of using other state
facilities that are currently being reviewed as part of a master
planning process.
(4) The plan shall consider strategies to integrate capital and
operating planning and improve efficiencies in both areas.
(((6))) (5) The department shall not deduct any portion of this
amount for administrative costs related to new staffing.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Sec. 211 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants to Locals for Cleanup and Prevention (04-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $8,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant
to the port of Ridgefield to continue clean-up actions on port-owned
property.
(2) $1,200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to assist
the city of Spokane with a brownfield clean-up at the "Summit
Properties."
(3) $1,800,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, of the
appropriation is provided solely for a grant to Klickitat county for
removal and disposal or recycling of vehicle tires. The grant shall
include conditions that require Klickitat county to contract for the
vehicle tire removal following a competitive bidding process. No funds
from the grant may be expended for any remediation activities other
than vehicle tire removal, disposal, and recycling.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$48,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$48,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
Agency Omnibus Minor Works (2004-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Conveyance Infrastructure Projects (04-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the state and local improvement revolving
account--state appropriation is provided solely for water conveyance
facilities to implement the 1996 memorandum of agreement regarding
utilization of Skagit river basin water resources for in-stream and
out-of-stream purposes.
(2) $300,000 of the state and local improvement revolving account--state is provided solely for the Bertrand watershed improvement
district to address unpermitted water use and environmental compliance
and fund early action planning, feasibility studies, and construction
of early action projects.
(3) $1,600,000 of the state and local improvement revolving
account--state is provided solely for the Middle Fork Nooksack river
water diversion system.
(4) First priority for funding from the remaining appropriation
shall be the following projects: Piping and the removal of two
irrigation diversions from Parke creek; piping in the upper Yakima
river; piping for Bull canal; piping for the Buena irrigation district;
piping for the Lowden number 2 and number 7 ditch; and piping for the
Quincy-Columbia Basin irrigation district.
(5) $50,000 of the state and local improvement revolving account--state is provided solely for the Ahtanam creek watershed restoration
and Pine Hollow reservoir.

Appropriation:
State and Local Improvement Revolving
Account (Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (04-4-004)

Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,705,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,230,000

Sec. 215 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (01-H-010)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation and reappropriation are provided solely to
provide grants to conservation districts to assist the agricultural
community to implement water conservation measures and irrigation
efficiencies in the 16 critical basins. A conservation district
receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the
water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency
will be placed as a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights
program to enhance instream flows. The proportion of saved water
placed in the trust water rights program must be equal to the
percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or
irrigation efficiency. The percentage of the public investment may not
exceed 85 percent of the total cost of the conservation measure or
irrigation efficiency. In awarding grants, a conservation district
shall give first priority to family farms.
(2) By February 1, ((2003)) 2004, the state conservation commission
shall submit a progress report to the appropriate standing committees
of the legislature on: (a) The amount of public funds expended from
this section; and (b) the location and amount of water placed in the
trust water rights program pursuant to this section.
(3) $344,000 of the water quality account reappropriation is
provided for water leases or projects in the Yakima river basin for
aquifer recharge necessary to allow the use of drought wells to meet
essential irrigation needs. Essential irrigation needs is defined as
eighty percent of the water a farmer would ordinarily receive from the
irrigation district, less the water that is actually delivered and
regardless of crops grown.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,650,000
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,117,000))
$2,148,708
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,767,000))
$4,798,708

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
State and Local Improvement Revolving
Account (Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,233,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$10,531,708

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Quad City Water Right Mitigation (04-2-003)

Appropriation:
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000

Sec. 217 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 315 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Program (04-4-002)

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,663,333))
$68,254,224
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,466,666
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($111,129,999))
$112,720,890

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $462,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($573,129,999))
$574,720,890

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Unforeseen Needs - Special Federal and Local Projects (04-2-024)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
General Fund--Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Sec. 219 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 356 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation Program (FARR) (04-4-006)

Appropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,000))
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,000))
$250,000

Sec. 220 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 379 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (00-2-004 and 04-4-004)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is for project number 00-2-004. The appropriation is for project number 04-4-004.
(2) The total cumulative dollar value of state conservation reserve
enhancement program grant obligations incurred by the conservation
commission and conservation districts shall not exceed $20,000,000, as
provided in the conservation reserve enhancement program agreement
between the United States department of agriculture, commodity credit
corporation, and the state of Washington executed on October 19, 1998,
and subsequent amendments.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$4,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$8,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program - Loans (05-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The conservation assistance revolving
account appropriation is provided solely for loans under the
conservation reserve enhancement program.

Appropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Sec. 222 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 389 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Facility, Infrastructure, Lands, and Access Condition Improvement
(04-1-003)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $301,000 of the state building construction account
appropriation is provided solely for improvements at the Centralia game
farm, to include: (1) $175,000 for a brooder barn to replace numerous
houses; (2) $50,000 to replace flight pens; and (3) $76,000 to replace
to the roofs on several buildings.
(2) $100,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for fishing and hunting access
improvements in Snohomish county, preferably the Snohomish county
diking district number 6. The department is directed to take all
appropriate and necessary steps to rename a portion of Snohomish county
diking district number 6 as "William E. O'Neil Jr. wildlife area." The
department shall consult with the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation to determine the feasibility of universal access for hunting
at this site or at other locations in Snohomish county. These funds
are to be used solely for fishing and hunting access purposes,
including signage, permanent structures, and improvements to existing
access features. The department is directed to work with interested
parties to accomplish the foregoing objectives, and to provide a report
to the legislature by December 31, 2004, regarding these provisions.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,875,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,475,000

Sec. 223 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 390 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Opportunity Improvements (04-2-006)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,050,000))
$2,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,050,000))
$2,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Asparagus Commission Assistance (04-4-950)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Sec. 225 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 412 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Community and Technical College Trust Land Acquisition (04-2-014)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Forest Reserve
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($96,000))
$365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($96,000))
$365,000

Sec. 226 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 426 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Small Timber Landowner Program (04-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$4,000,000

Sec. 227 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Common School Construction Account Deposits

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($13,500,000)) $27,000,000 in fiscal year 2004 and $13,500,000
in fiscal year 2005 of the education savings account appropriation
shall be deposited in the common school construction account.
(2) $67,415,000 of the education construction account appropriation
shall be deposited in the common school construction account.

Appropriation:
Education Savings Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,000,000))
$40,500,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,415,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,415,000))
$107,915,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,415,000))
$107,915,000

Sec. 228 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
State Bonds for Common School Construction (04-4-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit in the common school construction account.

Appropriation:
State Building ((and)) Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($118,050,000))
$109,050,000

Sec. 229 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
School Construction Assistance Grants (04-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For state assistance grants for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced
by fifty percent.
(2) $2,000,000 from this appropriation is provided for skills
centers capital improvements. Skills centers shall submit a budget
plan to the state board of education and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature for proposed expenditures and the
proposed expenditures shall conform with state board of education rules
and procedures for reimbursement of capital items. Funds not expended
by June 30, 2005, shall lapse.
(3) $32,868,105 of this appropriation is provided solely to
increase the area cost allowance by $15.00 per square foot for grades
K-12 for fiscal year 2004 and an additional $4.49 per square foot for
grades K-12 for fiscal year 2005.
(4) The appropriation in this section includes the amounts
deposited in the common school construction account under section 603
of this act.
(5) $4,000,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for design
and construction of additional space at the new market vocational
skills center.
(6) Beginning in their 2005-07 capital budget submittal to the
governor, the state board of education, in consultation with the
Washington state skills centers, shall develop and submit a prioritized
list of capital preservation, equipment with long life-cycles, and
space expansion and improvement projects. The list shall be developed
based on, but not limited to, the following factors: Projected
enrollment growth; local school district participation and financial
support; changes in the business and industry needs in the state; and
efficiency in program delivery and operations.
(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, in addition to
the projects authorized in RCW 39.10.051, during the 2003-05 biennium,
three second class school districts may each use the design-build
procedure for a demonstration project valued between five million
dollars and twelve million dollars for the purpose of constructing an
integrated kindergarten through grade twelve single structure school
building. The project must receive approval from the school district
project review board established under RCW 39.10.115. Second class
school districts shall give weight to proposers' experience working on
projects valued between five million dollars and twelve million dollars
in the evaluation process for the selection of a design-build firm for
demonstration projects authorized in this subsection. The
superintendent of public instruction shall notify all second class
school districts when contracts for three demonstration projects under
this section have been entered into.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($399,768,513))
$403,768,513

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,258,456,614))
$1,858,456,614
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,258,225,127))
$2,262,225,127

Sec. 230 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Kennedy, Dry, and Irwin Buildings Preservation (04-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amounts appropriated in this section
may be expended on predesign, design, and construction costs associated
with the replacement of the Kennedy building.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 231 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Infectious Disease Laboratory Facilities (05-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Allotment for this appropriation is
contingent on the commitment of at least four million dollars in
matching federal funds for this facility.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Sec. 232 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 633 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Campus Communications Infrastructure (04-1-011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,000,000))
$18,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 233 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Guthrie Hall Psychology Facilities Renovation (05-2-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Allotment for this appropriation is
contingent on the commitment of at least three million dollars in
matching federal funds for this facility.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 234 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane Riverpoint - Academic Center Building: New Facility
(00-2-906)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 235 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Wastewater Reclamation Project: Infrastructure
(04-2-082)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: By June 30, 2004, Washington State
University and the city of Pullman shall submit a report to the office
of financial management and standing capital budget committees of the
house of representatives and the senate that: (1) Summarizes the
strategy for completion of future phases of this project and identifies
all other state, federal, local, and private funding sources including
grants and loans; (2) summarizes the phasing and costs for this project
and future phases; and (3) identifies water conservation measures to be
enacted by Washington State University and the city of Pullman.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,063,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,713,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 236 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - WSUnet Infrastructure (04-2-074)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,420,400
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,420,400

Sec. 237 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 659 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Senior Hall Renovation (00-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($730,000))
$681,116
Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000))
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,120,012

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($581,000))
$629,884
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,480,315))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,791,315))
$15,431,012

NEW SECTION. Sec. 238 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preservation - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (04-1-025)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0

TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 239 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preservation - Infrastructure (04-1-027)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0

TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 240 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Bond Hall Renovation/Asbestos Abatement (04-1-080)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

Sec. 241 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Communications Facility (98-2-053)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
not be used for vehicles, laptop computers, small printers, disposable
items, or other items with a useful life of less than one year.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,500,000))
$13,888,908
Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,973,400))
$18,584,492
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,393,400))
$36,393,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 242 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Cheney Cowles Museum: Addition and Remodel (98-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 243 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell/Cascadia Community College - SR 522 Offramp (2002-2-014)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,390,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Total . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 244 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Cascadia Community College: UW Bothell/Cascadia Phase 2B Offramp
(2002-2-999)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,390,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Total . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 245 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Classroom Improvements (2005-1-850)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Total . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 246 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
CWU/Wenatchee Higher Education Center (2004-2-030)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is to
fund Central Washington University's portion of a shared center and
student service addition to Van Tassell center on the Wenatchee Valley
Community College campus that replaces the space currently leased by
Central Washington University.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Total . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 247 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Wenatchee Community College: Anderson Hall and Portable
Replacement (2005-1-852)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is solely for the design of a building to
house allied health programs, replacing Anderson hall, and
consolidating programs and staff from other locations. The
appropriation does not include the design, renovation, or demolition of
related space to be vacated.
(2) Prior to allotment for design, the state board for community
and technical colleges shall submit a predesign document to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees identifying
and outlining the project or projects, scope, schedule, and preliminary
cost estimates for capital projects related to the replacement of
Anderson hall.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,618,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,337,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 248 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Falls: Business and Social Science Building (2005-1-853)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is solely for the design of a two-story
building housing social science and business divisions to replace
buildings 3, 4, and 14 which are not cost effective to renovate.
(2) Prior to allotment for design, the state board for community
and technical colleges shall submit a predesign document to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees identifying
and outlining the project or projects, scope, schedule, and preliminary
cost estimates for capital projects related to the replacement of the
existing buildings.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 249 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
South Seattle: Training Facility (2005-1-854)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is solely for the design of a single shop and
classroom training facility to replace eight wood frame structures.
(2) Prior to allotment for design, the state board for community
and technical colleges shall submit a predesign document to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees identifying
and outlining the project or projects, scope, schedule, and preliminary
cost estimates for capital projects related to the replacement of the
portables.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $722,000

Sec. 250 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 786 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Welding/Auto Collision Replacement
(04-1-213)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,481,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,357,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,357,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,838,000

Sec. 251 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 798 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Everett Community College: ((Renovation)) Replacement - Monte
Cristo Hall (04-1-305)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000

Sec. 252 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Replacement - Instructional Building
(04-1-204)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,263,300
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,471,749

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,371,700))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,635,000))
$20,735,049

Sec. 253 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 695 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Lab II 3rd Floor - Chemistry Labs Remodel (04-2-007)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$1,400,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Sec. 254 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 784 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Replacement Science and Technology Building
(04-1-208)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of this appropriation is to conduct a predesign
study of alternatives and design for a potential replacement of
existing science lab facilities.
(2) The predesign shall be consistent with the college's adopted
strategic and master plans and additionally address projected
enrollment demands, operating budget impacts, reuse or disposition of
existing facilities, and options for reduction of parking needs.
(3) Prior to allotment for design, the state board for community
and technical colleges shall submit a predesign document to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees identifying
and outlining the project or projects, scope, schedule, and preliminary
cost estimates for the project.

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,800
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,134,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,216,800

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,752,500))
$9,618,500
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,835,300

Sec. 255 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 787 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lower Columbia College: Instructional/Fine Arts Building
Replacement (04-1-214)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is solely for the land acquisition for and
design of a multiple use fine arts building.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit major project reports to the office of financial management with
copies to the legislative fiscal committees in accordance with the
established procedures for major project reports.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,827,799
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,327,799

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,645,515))
$. . . . . .
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,473,314))
$. . . . . .

NEW SECTION. Sec. 256 A new section is added to 2003 1st sp.s.
c 26 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE
(SIRTI)
Emergency Repairs (05-1-850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
make concrete repairs.

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $290,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $290,000

Sec. 257 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 795 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Renovation - "T" Building (04-1-307)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The Gardner-Evans higher education
construction account--state appropriation is provided solely to
establish the nursing program portion of this project on the Richland
campus of Columbia Basin College. The Gardner-Evans higher education
construction account--state appropriation is contingent upon receipt of
nonstate matching funds of $2,000,000 by June 30, 2004.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,058,500
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,058,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,058,500))
$12,058,500

Sec. 258 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 628 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Emergency Power Expansion - Phase II (04-1-024)

((Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000))
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,448,000))
$3,148,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,948,000))
$6,648,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,813,164))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,161,164))
$6,648,000

(End of part)

PART 3
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 A new section is added to chapter 89.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The conservation assistance revolving account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. The account shall be administered by
the conservation commission. Moneys from the account may only be spent
after appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
principal and interest from the repayment of any loans granted under
this section, and any other moneys appropriated to the account by the
legislature. Expenditures from the account may be used to make loans
to landowners for projects enrolled in the conservation reserve
enhancement program.
(2) In order to aid the financing of conservation reserve
enhancement program projects, the conservation commission, through the
conservation districts, may make interest-free loans to conservation
reserve enhancement program enrollees from the conservation assistance
revolving account. The conservation commission may require such terms
and conditions as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section. Loans to landowners shall be for costs associated with the
installation of conservation improvements eligible for and secured by
federal farm service agency practice incentive payment reimbursement.
Loans under this program promote critical habitat protection and
restoration by bridging the financing gap between project
implementation and federal funding. The conservation commission shall
give loan preferences to those projects expected to generate the
greatest environmental benefits and that occur in basins with critical
or depressed salmonid stocks. Money received from landowners in loan
repayments made under this section shall be paid into the conservation
assistance revolving account for uses consistent with this section.

Sec. 902 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 905 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
(1) To ensure that minor works appropriations are carried out in
accordance with legislative intent, funds appropriated in this act
shall not be allotted until project lists are on file at the office of
financial management and the office of financial management has
formally approved the lists. Proposed revisions to the lists must be
filed with and approved by the office of financial management before
funds may be expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects valued between $25,000 and $1 million each
that are of a similar nature and can generally be completed within two
years of the appropriation with the funding provided. Minor works
categories include (i) health, safety, and code requirements; (ii)
facility preservation; (iii) infrastructure preservation; and (iv)
program improvement or expansion. Improvements for accessibility in
compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in
any of the above minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor
works list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating
equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by
the office of financial management; software not dedicated to control
of a specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition;
or to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act.
(3) The office of financial management shall forward copies of
these project lists and revised lists to the house of representatives
capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee. No
expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into for minor works
appropriations until the office of financial management has approved
the allotment of the funds to be expended. ((The office of financial
management shall encourage state agencies to incorporate accessibility
planning and improvements into the normal and customary capital
program.))

Sec. 903 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 907 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL
CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into financial contracts,
paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for
the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
(1) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for an amount approved by the office of financial management
for costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to lease develop or lease purchase a state office
building of 150,000 to 200,000 square feet on state-owned property in
Tumwater according to the terms of the agreement with the Port of
Olympia when the property was acquired or within the preferred
development/leasing areas in Thurston county. The building shall be
constructed and financed so that agency occupancy costs will not exceed
comparable private market rental rates. The comparable general office
space rate shall be calculated based on the three latest Thurston
county leases of new space of at least 100,000 rentable square feet
adjusted for inflation as determined by the department of general
administration. The department of general administration shall
coordinate with potential state agency tenants whose current lease
expire near the time of occupancy so that buyout of current leases do
not add to state expense. The office of financial management shall
certify to the state treasurer: (a) The project description and dollar
amount; and (b) that all requirements of this subsection (1) have been
met.
(2) Department of veterans affairs: Enter into a financing
contract in an amount not to exceed $1,441,500 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build and equip
a kitchen in existing shell space at the Spokane veterans home and
provide space for displaced functions.
(3) Department of corrections:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $400,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a waste transfer station and purchase a garbage truck at
the McNeil Island corrections center.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,588,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a transportation services warehouse and offices for
correctional industries.
(c) Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,536,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct additions to the food factory and warehouses at the Airway
Heights corrections center for correctional industries.
(4) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellevue Community
College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase North Center campus.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Big Bend Community
College for up to $6,500,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an international
conference and training center and dining services center building.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark Community
College for up to $9,839,464 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a bookstore,
meeting rooms, student lounge, and study space.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $7,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Kent
Station higher education center.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Seattle Central
Community College for up to $1,300,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for land acquisition
and development of parking facilities.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Seattle Central
Community College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an above-ground parking garage.
(((f))) (g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South
Puget Sound Community College for up to $660,000 plus financing
expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct
parking and stormwater mitigation facilities.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community
College for up to $725,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $2,175,100 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and
construct a building for professional-technical instruction.
(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $504,400 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land and
buildings at the Clarkston center.
(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College/Ft.
Steilacoom for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an addition to the
college health and wellness center.
(l) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce
College/Puyallup for up to $8,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student
gym and fitness center.
(m) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin
College for up to $8,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the medical
technology and science education addition to the T-Building renovation
and establish the Washington institute of science education (WISE).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 A new section is added to chapter 39.33
RCW to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department of
general administration is authorized to sell the property and attendant
parking lot located at 1058 Capitol Way, Olympia, Washington, for fair
market value, to a nonprofit organization that produces gavel-to-gavel
television coverage of state government deliberations and other events
of statewide significance.

Sec. 905 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 915 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governor, through the office of financial management, may
authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital
project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of
such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is
insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of
any facility beyond that intended by the legislature in making the
appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital
appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that
are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur
between projects to local government agencies except where the grants
are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such
transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that
govern the grants.
(2) For purposes of this section, the governor may find that an
amount is in excess of the amount required for the completion of a
project only if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget
document is substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or
(b) bids have been let on a project and it appears to a substantial
certainty that the project as defined in the notes to the budget
document can be completed within the biennium for less than the amount
appropriated in this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the legislature intends that
each project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the
governor's budget document, unless it clearly appears from the
legislative history that the legislature intended to define the scope
of a project in a different way.
(4) Transfers of funds to an agency's infrastructure savings
appropriation are subject to review and approval by the office of
financial management. Expenditures from an infrastructure savings
appropriation are limited to projects that have a primary purpose to
correct infrastructure deficiencies or conditions that: (a) Adversely
affect the ability to utilize the infrastructure for its current
programmatic use; (b) reduce the life expectancy of the infrastructure;
or (c) increase the operating costs of the infrastructure for its
current programmatic use. Eligible infrastructure projects may include
structures and surface improvements, site amenities, utility systems
outside building footprints and natural environmental changes or
requirements as part of an environmental regulation, a declaration of
emergency for an infrastructure issue in conformance with RCW
43.88.250, or infrastructure planning as part of a facility master
plan.
(5) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.
(6) This section does not apply to sections 506 through 508,
chapter 26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.

Sec. 906 RCW 43.82.010 and 1997 c 117 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of general administration, on behalf of the agency
involved, shall purchase, lease, lease purchase, rent, or otherwise
acquire all real estate, improved or unimproved, as may be required by
elected state officials, institutions, departments, commissions,
boards, and other state agencies, or federal agencies where joint state
and federal activities are undertaken and may grant easements and
transfer, exchange, sell, lease, or sublease all or part of any surplus
real estate for those state agencies which do not otherwise have the
specific authority to dispose of real estate. This section does not
transfer financial liability for the acquired property to the
department of general administration.
(2) Except for real estate occupied by federal agencies, the
director shall determine the location, size, and design of any real
estate or improvements thereon acquired or held pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section. Facilities acquired or held pursuant to this
chapter, and any improvements thereon, shall conform to standards
adopted by the director and approved by the office of financial
management governing facility efficiency unless a specific exemption
from such standards is provided by the director of general
administration. The director of general administration shall report to
the office of financial management annually on any exemptions granted
pursuant to this subsection.
(3) The director of general administration may fix the terms and
conditions of each lease entered into under this chapter, except that
no lease shall extend greater than twenty years in duration. The
director of general administration may enter into a long-term lease
greater than ten years in duration upon a determination by the director
of the office of financial management that the long-term lease provides
a more favorable rate than would otherwise be available, it appears to
a substantial certainty that the facility is necessary for use by the
state for the full length of the lease term, and the facility meets the
standards adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The
director of general administration may enter into a long-term lease
greater than ten years in duration if an analysis shows that the life-cycle cost of leasing the facility is less than the life-cycle cost of
purchasing or constructing a facility in lieu of leasing the facility.
For the 2003-05 biennium, any lease entered into after the effective
date of this section with a term of ten years or less shall not contain
a nonappropriation clause.
(4) Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on
behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or
security for the payment of securities offered for sale through a
public offering. Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease
for or on behalf of any state agency may be used or referred to as
collateral or security for the payment of securities offered for sale
through a private placement without the prior written approval of the
state treasurer. However, this limitation shall not prevent a lessor
from assigning or encumbering its interest in a lease as security for
the repayment of a promissory note provided that the transaction would
otherwise be an exempt transaction under RCW 21.20.320. The state
treasurer shall adopt rules that establish the criteria under which any
such approval may be granted. In establishing such criteria the state
treasurer shall give primary consideration to the protection of the
state's credit rating and the integrity of the state's debt management
program. If it appears to the state treasurer that any lease has been
used or referred to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted
under this subsection, then he or she may recommend that the governor
cause such lease to be terminated. The department of general
administration shall promptly notify the state treasurer whenever it
may appear to the department that any lease has been used or referred
to in violation of this subsection or rules adopted under this
subsection.
(5) It is the policy of the state to encourage the colocation and
consolidation of state services into single or adjacent facilities,
whenever appropriate, to improve public service delivery, minimize
duplication of facilities, increase efficiency of operations, and
promote sound growth management planning.
(6) The director of general administration shall provide
coordinated long-range planning services to identify and evaluate
opportunities for colocating and consolidating state facilities. Upon
the renewal of any lease, the inception of a new lease, or the purchase
of a facility, the director of general administration shall determine
whether an opportunity exists for colocating the agency or agencies in
a single facility with other agencies located in the same geographic
area. If a colocation opportunity exists, the director of general
administration shall consult with the affected state agencies and the
office of financial management to evaluate the impact colocation would
have on the cost and delivery of agency programs, including whether
program delivery would be enhanced due to the centralization of
services. The director of general administration, in consultation with
the office of financial management, shall develop procedures for
implementing colocation and consolidation of state facilities.
(7) The director of general administration is authorized to
purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire improved or unimproved real
estate as owner or lessee and to lease or sublet all or a part of such
real estate to state or federal agencies. The director of general
administration shall charge each using agency its proportionate rental
which shall include an amount sufficient to pay all costs, including,
but not limited to, those for utilities, janitorial and accounting
services, and sufficient to provide for contingencies; which shall not
exceed five percent of the average annual rental, to meet unforeseen
expenses incident to management of the real estate.
(8) If the director of general administration determines that it is
necessary or advisable to undertake any work, construction, alteration,
repair, or improvement on any real estate acquired pursuant to
subsection (1) or (7) of this section, the director shall cause plans
and specifications thereof and an estimate of the cost of such work to
be made and filed in his or her office and the state agency benefiting
thereby is hereby authorized to pay for such work out of any available
funds: PROVIDED, That the cost of executing such work shall not exceed
the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars. Work, construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement in excess of twenty-five thousand
dollars, other than that done by the owner of the property if other
than the state, shall be performed in accordance with the public works
law of this state.
(9) In order to obtain maximum utilization of space, the director
of general administration shall make space utilization studies, and
shall establish standards for use of space by state agencies. Such
studies shall include the identification of opportunities for
colocation and consolidation of state agency office and support
facilities.
(10) The director of general administration may construct new
buildings on, or improve existing facilities, and furnish and equip,
all real estate under his or her management. Prior to the construction
of new buildings or major improvements to existing facilities or
acquisition of facilities using a lease purchase contract, the director
of general administration shall conduct an evaluation of the facility
design and budget using life-cycle cost analysis, value-engineering,
and other techniques to maximize the long-term effectiveness and
efficiency of the facility or improvement.
(11) All conveyances and contracts to purchase, lease, rent,
transfer, exchange, or sell real estate and to grant and accept
easements shall be approved as to form by the attorney general, signed
by the director of general administration or the director's designee,
and recorded with the county auditor of the county in which the
property is located.
(12) The director of general administration may delegate any or all
of the functions specified in this section to any agency upon such
terms and conditions as the director deems advisable.
(13) This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate
by:
(a) The state college and universities for research or experimental
purposes;
(b) The state liquor control board for liquor stores and
warehouses; and
(c) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of transportation, and the state parks and
recreation commission for purposes other than the leasing of offices,
warehouses, and real estate for similar purposes.
(14) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary,
the department of general administration may negotiate ground leases
for public lands on which property is to be acquired under a financing
contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW under terms approved by the
state finance committee.

Sec. 907 RCW 43.99E.025 and 1991 c 3 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The proceeds from the sale of the bonds deposited in the state and
local improvements revolving account -- water supply facilities of the
general fund under the terms of this chapter shall be divided into two
shares as follows:
(1) Seventy-five million dollars, or so much thereof as may be
required, shall be used for domestic, municipal, and industrial water
supply facilities; and
(2) Fifty million dollars, or so much thereof as may be required,
shall be used for water supply facilities for agricultural use alone or
in combination with fishery, recreational, or other beneficial uses of
water; for the 2003-05 biennium, proceeds may also be used for water
conveyance projects.
The share of seventy-five million dollars shall be administered by
the department of health and the share of fifty million dollars shall
be administered by the department of ecology, subject to legislative
appropriation. The administering departments may use or permit the use
of any funds derived from the sale of bonds authorized under this
chapter to accomplish the purpose for the issuance of the bonds by
direct expenditures and by grants or loans to public bodies, including
grants to public bodies as matching funds in any case where federal,
local, or other funds are made available on a matching basis for
improvements within the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 908 RCW 70.146.030 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 934 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390,
principal and interest from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant
to this chapter, and any other moneys appropriated to the account by
the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, 2003, to June 30, 2005, moneys in the account may be used to process
applications received by the department that seek to make changes to or
transfer existing water rights for water related mitigation or
settlements, and for grants and technical assistance to public bodies
for watershed planning under chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three
percent of the moneys deposited in the account may be used by the
department to pay for the administration of the grant and loan program
authorized by this chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31 of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 16, 37, 40
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 15, 16, 39, 40, 44
COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2, 18
CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 7, 23, 24, 25
FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 13, 30
HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 11, 28
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 14, 31
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE (SIRTI) . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 10, 15, 27
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 34, 39, 40, 46
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
--- END ---