BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.703 and 1985 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It ((shall be)) is in the public purpose for, and all cities and
towns are authorized to, engage in economic development programs. To
carry out the programs, any city or town is authorized to transfer or
loan to any other city, town, county, or port district, with or without
consideration, any funds, real or personal property, property
interests, or services. In addition, cities and towns may contract
with ((nonprofit corporations)) public and private entities in
furtherance of this and other acts relating to economic development.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.01.085 and 1985 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It ((shall be)) is in the public purpose for, and all counties are
authorized to, engage in economic development programs. To carry out
these programs, any county is authorized to transfer or loan to any
other county, city, town, or port district, with or without
consideration, any funds, real or personal property, property
interests, or services. In addition, counties may contract with
((nonprofit corporations)) public and private entities in furtherance
of this and other acts relating to economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city or town may, upon the request of and pursuant to an
interlocal agreement with a port district, jointly exercise with that
port district any powers of the port district with respect to economic
development programs or projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county may, upon the request of and pursuant to an interlocal
agreement with a port district, jointly exercise with that port
district any powers of the port district with respect to economic
development programs or projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The powers granted by this act supplement
those previously authorized by law. Nothing in this act limits any
other authority of cities, towns, and counties. All prior actions
consistent with the provisions of this act are validated.

--- END ---