BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that language used in reference to
individuals with disabilities shapes and reflects society's attitudes
towards people with disabilities. Many of the terms currently used
diminish the humanity and natural condition of having a disability.
Certain terms are demeaning and create an invisible barrier to
inclusion as equal community members. The legislature finds it
necessary to clarify preferred language for new and revised laws by
requiring the use of terminology that puts the person before the
disability.
(2)(a) The code reviser is directed to avoid all references to:
Disabled, developmentally disabled, mentally disabled, mentally ill,
mentally retarded, handicapped, cripple, and crippled, in any new
statute, memorial, or resolution, and to change such references in any
existing statute, memorial, or resolution as sections including these
references are otherwise amended by law.
(b) The code reviser is directed to replace terms referenced in (a)
of this subsection as appropriate with the following revised
terminology: "Individuals with disabilities," "individuals with
developmental disabilities," "individuals with mental illness," and
"individuals with mental retardation."
(3) No statute, memorial, or resolution is invalid because it does
not comply with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All agency orders creating new rules, or amending existing
rules, shall be formulated in accordance with the requirements of
section 1 of this act regarding the use of respectful language.
(2) No agency rule is invalid because it does not comply with this
section.

--- END ---