BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislature finds that the 1999
public and tribal lands inventory provides a base of information
necessary to develop a statewide strategy for acquisition of lands for
recreation and habitat preservation and enhancement. However,
additional information on recent acquisitions is necessary to determine
the extent of recent acquisitions, how they were funded, and whether
those acquisitions are compatible with a statewide strategy or more
narrowly in pursuit of the goals of single agencies.
(b) The legislature further finds that land acquisition decisions
have long-term implications, often in perpetuity, and that some
acquisitions occur outside the control and oversight of the
legislature.
(c) The legislature intends to establish a statewide strategy for
acquisition and disposal of lands for recreation and habitat
preservation and enhancement, and to clarify authority for centralized,
interagency control over implementation of that strategy.
(2) The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall submit
a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature and to the governor by June 30, 2005. The report shall
include an inventory of recent habitat and recreational land
acquisitions and a recommended statewide strategy for future
acquisitions.
(a) The inventory shall include habitat and recreational land
acquisitions and disposals since 1980 by state agencies. For the
purpose of this inventory, "land acquisition" means fee simple
acquisition or less than a fee simple interest if that interest is for
more than fifty years. Land acquisitions by state agencies include
those funded by state agencies but owned by local governments. The
inventory shall:
(i) Include information about land acquisitions and disposals that
involved land trading or swapping between public and private entities,
and land acquisitions that were gifts;
(ii) Specify principal use of the acquired parcels and other data
compatible with the 1999 inventory;
(iii) Specify the agency or local government acquiring or disposing
of the property, the costs of the land acquisition or receipts from the
disposal, the funding sources, and whether the land acquisition was
funded under a legislative appropriation, an unanticipated receipt,
and/or exchange of land parcels; and
(iv) Include any additional information local governments may
provide to the inventory about habitat and recreational land
acquisitions by land trusts, conservancies, port districts, public
utility districts, and other parties that result in the property's
change to a tax exempt status.
(b) The recommended statewide strategy must specify whether all
land acquisitions and disposals of recreational and habitat lands by
state agencies, regardless of fund source, should comply with the
priorities and policies of chapter 79A.15 RCW and, if not, what
priorities and policies should apply. The recommended statewide
strategy must:
(i) Ensure that land acquisition and disposal decisions are based
on a determination of need for recreational and habitat lands compared
to existing public lands serving those purposes in various areas of the
state;
(ii) Specify how to provide a central, interagency point of control
to ensure that land acquisitions by state agencies, including land
acquisitions funded through unanticipated receipts, comply with
statewide priorities and policies;
(iii) Examine ways to compensate local governments by spreading
statewide the impact of lost tax revenues from acquisitions of private
property for habitat and recreation. The strategy shall consider the
benefits and costs of providing payments in lieu of taxes on certain
kinds of land acquisitions, in certain counties or statewide, as lump-sum payments or periodic payments, and how such payments might be
calculated; and
(iv) Consider options for a no net gain policy in counties with
large portions of existing public habitat and recreational land.

--- END ---