BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.660.010 and 2001 c 158 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a statewide partnership grant program to
provide new high-quality alternative routes to residency teacher
certification. To the extent funds are appropriated for this specific
purpose, funds provided under this partnership grant program shall be
used solely for school districts, or consortia of school districts, to
partner with state-approved higher education teacher preparation
programs to provide one or more of ((three)) four alternative route
programs in RCW 28A.660.040, with routes one, two, and three aimed at
recruiting candidates to teaching in subject matter shortage areas and
areas with shortages due to geographic location. Districts, or
consortia of districts, may also include their educational service
districts in their partnership grant program. ((Partnership programs
receiving grants may enroll candidates as early as January 2002.))

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.660.020 and 2003 c 410 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each district or consortia of school districts applying for the
alternative route certification program shall submit a proposal to the
Washington professional educator standards board specifying:
(a) The route or routes the partnership program intends to offer
and a detailed description of how the routes will be structured and
operated by the partnership;
(b) The number of candidates that will be enrolled per route;
(c) An identification, indication of commitment, and description of
the role of approved teacher preparation programs that are partnering
with the district or consortia of districts;
(d) An assurance of district provision of adequate training for
mentor teachers either through participation in a state mentor training
academy or district-provided training that meets state-established
mentor-training standards specific to the mentoring of alternative
route candidates;
(e) An assurance that significant time will be provided for mentor
teachers to spend with the alternative route teacher candidates
throughout the internship. Partnerships must provide each candidate
with intensive classroom mentoring until such time as the candidate
demonstrates the competency necessary to manage the classroom with less
intensive supervision and guidance from a mentor;
(f) A description of the rigorous screening process for applicants
to alternative route programs, including entry requirements specific to
each route, as provided in RCW 28A.660.040; and
(g) The design and use of a teacher development plan for each
candidate. The plan shall specify the alternative route coursework and
training required of each candidate and shall be developed by comparing
the candidate's prior experience and coursework with the state's new
performance-based standards for residency certification and adjusting
any requirements accordingly. The plan may include the following
components:
(i) A minimum of one-half of a school year, and an additional
significant amount of time if necessary, of intensive mentorship,
starting with full-time mentoring and progressing to increasingly less
intensive monitoring and assistance as the intern demonstrates the
skills necessary to take over the classroom with less intensive
support. For route one and two candidates, before the supervision is
diminished, the mentor of the teacher candidate at the school and the
supervisor of the teacher candidate from the higher education teacher
preparation program must both agree that the teacher candidate is ready
to manage the classroom with less intensive supervision. For route
three and four candidates, the mentor of the teacher candidate shall
make the decision;
(ii) Identification of performance indicators based on the
knowledge and skills standards required for residency certification by
the state board of education;
(iii) Identification of benchmarks that will indicate when the
standard is met for all performance indicators;
(iv) A description of strategies for assessing candidate
performance on the benchmarks;
(v) Identification of one or more tools to be used to assess a
candidate's performance once the candidate has been in the classroom
for about one-half of a school year; and
(vi) A description of the criteria that would result in residency
certification after about one-half of a school year but before the end
of the program.
(2) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose,
districts may apply for program funds to pay stipends to trained mentor
teachers of interns during the mentored internship. The per intern
amount of mentor stipend shall not exceed five hundred dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.660.030 and 2003 c 410 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board, with support from
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall select
school districts and consortia of school districts to receive
partnership grants from funds appropriated by the legislature for this
purpose. Factors to be considered in selecting proposals include, but
are not limited to:
(a) For routes one, two, and three, the degree to which the
district, or consortia of districts in partnership, are currently
experiencing teacher shortages;
(b)(i) For routes one, two, three, and four, the degree to which
the proposal addresses criteria specified in RCW 28A.660.020 and is in
keeping with specifications of program routes in RCW 28A.660.040;
(((c))) (ii) The cost-effectiveness of the proposed program; and
(((d))) (iii) Any demonstrated district and in-kind contributions
to the program.
(2) Selection of proposals shall also take into consideration the
need to ensure an adequate number of candidates for each type of route
in order to evaluate their success.
(3) Funds appropriated for the partnership grant program in this
chapter shall be administered by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.660.040 and 2001 c 158 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Partnership grants funded under this chapter shall operate one to
((three)) four specific route programs. Successful completion of the
program shall make a candidate eligible for residency teacher
certification. For route one and two candidates, the mentor of the
teacher candidate at the school and the supervisor of the teacher
candidate from the higher education teacher preparation program must
both agree that the teacher candidate has successfully completed the
program. For route three and four candidates, the mentor of the
teacher candidate shall make the determination that the candidate has
successfully completed the program.
(1) Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate route one
programs shall enroll currently employed classified instructional
employees with transferable associate degrees seeking residency teacher
certification with endorsements in special education, bilingual
education, or English as a second language. It is anticipated that
candidates enrolled in this route will complete both their
baccalaureate degree and requirements for residency certification in
two years or less, including a mentored internship to be completed in
the final year. In addition, partnership programs shall uphold entry
requirements for candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
three years of successful student interaction and leadership as a
classified instructional employee;
(b) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam, when
available; and
(c) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers.
(2) Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate route two
programs shall enroll currently employed classified staff with
baccalaureate degrees seeking residency teacher certification in
subject matter shortage areas and areas with shortages due to
geographic location. Candidates enrolled in this route must complete
a mentored internship complemented by flexibly scheduled training and
coursework offered at a local site, such as a school or educational
service district, or online or via video-conference over the K-20
network, in collaboration with the partnership program's higher
education partner. In addition, partnership grant programs shall
uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
three years of successful student interaction and leadership as
classified staff;
(b) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's college or university grade
point average may be considered as a selection factor;
(c) Successful completion of the content test, once the state
content test is available;
(d) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(e) Successful passage of the statewide basic skills exam, when
available.
(3) Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate route three
programs shall enroll individuals with baccalaureate degrees, who are
not employed in the district at the time of application((, or who hold
emergency substitute certificates)). When selecting candidates for
certification through route three, districts shall give priority to
individuals who are seeking residency teacher certification in subject
matter shortage areas or shortages due to geographic locations. For
route three only, the districts may include additional candidates in
nonshortage subject areas if the candidates are seeking endorsements
with a secondary grade level designation as defined by rule by the
state board of education. The districts shall disclose to candidates
in nonshortage subject areas available information on the demand in
those subject areas. Cohorts of candidates for this route shall attend
an intensive summer teaching academy, followed by a full year employed
by a district in a mentored internship, followed, if necessary, by a
second summer teaching academy. In addition, partnership programs
shall uphold entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) Five years' experience in the work force;
(b) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's grade point average may be
considered as a selection factor;
(c) Successful completion of the content test, once the state
content test is available;
(d) External validation of qualifications, including demonstrated
successful experience with students or children, such as references
[reference] letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(e) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(f) Successful passage of statewide basic skills exams, when
available.
(4) Partnership grant programs seeking funds to operate route four
programs shall enroll individuals with baccalaureate degrees, who are
employed in the district at the time of application, or who hold
conditional teaching certificates or emergency substitute certificates.
Cohorts of candidates for this route shall attend an intensive summer
teaching academy, followed by a full year employed by a district in a
mentored internship. In addition, partnership programs shall uphold
entry requirements for candidates that include:
(a) Five years' experience in the work force;
(b) A baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited institution
of higher education. The individual's grade point average may be
considered as a selection factor;
(c) Successful completion of the content test, once the state
content test is available;
(d) External validation of qualifications, including demonstrated
successful experience with students or children, such as reference
letters and letters of support from previous employers;
(e) Meeting the age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements adopted by rule for teachers; and
(f) Successful passage of statewide basic skills exams, when
available.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.660.901 and 2001 c 158 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington state institute for public policy shall submit
to the education and fiscal committees of the legislature, the
governor, the state board of education, and the Washington professional
educator standards board, an interim evaluation of partnership grant
programs funded under this chapter by December 1, 2002, and a final
evaluation by December 1, 2004. If specific funding for the purposes
of this section, referencing this section and this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus
appropriations act, this section is null and void.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 28A.660.900 (Expiration of chapter) and
2001 c 158 s 7 are each repealed.

--- END ---