BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.020 and 2003 c 295 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Council" means the pension funding council created in RCW
41.45.100.
(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems.
(3) "Law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
plan 1" and "law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2" means the benefits and funding provisions under chapter
41.26 RCW.
(4) "Public employees' retirement system plan 1," "public
employees' retirement system plan 2," and "public employees' retirement
system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding provisions under chapter
41.40 RCW.
(5) "Teachers' retirement system plan 1," "teachers' retirement
system plan 2," and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean the
benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.
(6) "School employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school
employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding
provisions under chapter 41.35 RCW.
(7) "Washington state patrol retirement system" means the
retirement benefits provided under chapter 43.43 RCW.
(8) "Unfunded liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability of a retirement system.
(9) "Actuary" or "state actuary" means the state actuary employed
under chapter 44.44 RCW.
(10) "State retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed
in RCW 41.50.030.
(11) "Classified employee" means a member of the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.35.010.
(12) "Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system as
defined in RCW 41.32.010(15).
(13) "Select committee" means the select committee on pension
policy created in RCW 41.04.276.
(14) "Actuarial value of assets" means the value of pension plan
investments and other property used by the actuary for the purpose of
an actuarial valuation.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.45.035 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 11 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2001, the following long-term economic
assumptions shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW
41.45.030:
(a) The growth in inflation assumption shall be 3.5 percent;
(b) The growth in salaries assumption, exclusive of merit or
longevity increases, shall be 4.5 percent;
(c) The investment rate of return assumption shall be 8 percent;
and
(d) The growth in system membership assumption shall be 1.25
percent for the public employees' retirement system, the school
employees' retirement system, and the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system. The assumption shall be .90 percent
for the teachers' retirement system.
(2)(a) Beginning with actuarial studies done after July 1, 2003,
changes to plan asset values that vary from the long-term investment
rate of return assumption shall be recognized in the actuarial value of
assets over a period that varies up to eight years depending on the
magnitude of the deviation of each year's investment rate of return
relative to the long-term rate of return assumption. Beginning with
actuarial studies performed after July 1, 2004, the actuarial value of
assets shall not be greater than one hundred thirty percent of the
market value of assets as of the valuation date or less than seventy
percent of the market value of assets as of the valuation date.
Beginning April 1, 2004, the council, by affirmative vote of four
councilmembers, may adopt changes to this asset value smoothing
technique. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.
(b) The state actuary shall periodically review the appropriateness
of the asset smoothing method in this section and recommend changes to
the legislature as necessary.

--- END ---