BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 2" to read as follows:
(1) A member eligible to retire under RCW 41.40.630 (2) or (3) may,
at the time of filing a written application for retirement with the
department, apply to the department to buy down the early retirement
reduction amounts with the department.
(2) A member may buy down all or part of the amount required to
fully offset the reduction in benefits that the member is subject to in
computing the member's retirement allowance under RCW 41.40.630 (2) or
(3), as applicable.
(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member buying
down the early retirement reduction amounts under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that the
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the federal internal revenue code and the regulations
adopted by the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the
department may condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from
another plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the
department to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for
the tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal tax
law.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.630 and 2000 c 247 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service
credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant
to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially
reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.
(4) The actuarial reduction provided for in subsection (2) of this
section and the three percent per year reduction provided for in
subsection (3) of this section shall be adjusted for any buydown of
those amounts under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
(1) A member eligible to retire under RCW 41.40.820 (2) or (3) may,
at the time of filing a written application for retirement with the
department, apply to the department to buy down the early retirement
reduction amounts with the department.
(2) A member may buy down all or part of the amount required to
fully offset the reduction in benefits that the member is subject to in
computing the member's retirement allowance under RCW 41.40.820 (2) or
(3), as applicable
(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member buying-down the early retirement reduction amounts under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that the
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the federal internal revenue code and the regulations
adopted by the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the
department may condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from
another plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the
department to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for
the tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal tax
law.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.40.820 and 2000 c 247 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five
and who has:
(a) Completed ten service credit years; or
(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
credit months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(c) Completed five service credit years by the transfer payment
date specified in RCW 41.40.795, under the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795;
shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age
fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.
(4) The actuarial reduction provided for in subsection (2) of this
section and the three percent per year reduction provided for in
subsection (3) of this section shall be adjusted for any buydown of
those amounts under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 2" to read as follows:
(1) A member eligible to retire under RCW 41.35.420 (2) or (3) may,
at the time of filing a written application for retirement with the
department, apply to the department to buy down the early retirement
reduction amounts with the department.
(2) A member may buy down all or part of the amount required to
fully offset the reduction in benefits that the member is subject to in
computing the member's retirement allowance under RCW 41.35.420 (2) or
(3), as applicable.
(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member buying
down the early retirement reduction amounts under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that the
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the federal internal revenue code and the regulations
adopted by the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the
department may condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from
another plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the
department to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for
the tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal tax
law.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.35.420 and 2000 c 247 s 905 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service
credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.35.400.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant
to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially
reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.
(4) The actuarial reduction provided for in subsection (2) of this
section and the three percent per year reduction provided for in
subsection (3) of this section shall be adjusted for any buydown of
those amounts under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
(1) A member eligible to retire under RCW 41.35.680 (2) or (3) may,
at the time of filing a written application for retirement with the
department, apply to the department to buy down the early retirement
reduction amounts with the department.
(2) A member may buy down all or part of the amount required to
fully offset the reduction in benefits that the member is subject to in
computing the member's retirement allowance under RCW 41.35.680 (2) or
(3), as applicable.
(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member buying
down the early retirement reduction amounts under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that the
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the federal internal revenue code and the regulations
adopted by the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the
department may condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from
another plan on the receipt of information necessary to enable the
department to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for
the tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal tax
law.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.35.680 and 2000 c 247 s 906 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five
and who has:
(a) Completed ten service credit years; or
(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
credit months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(c) Completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, under
the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and who transferred to
plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510;
shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age
fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at
least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of
age sixty-five.
(4) The actuarial reduction provided for in subsection (2) of this
section and the three percent per year reduction provided for in
subsection (3) of this section shall be adjusted for any buydown of
those amounts under section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---