BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.295 and 2003 c 294 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For members commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, except as
provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested member who has not
completed at least ten years of service dies, the amount of the
accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the
retirement system at the time of such member's death, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the member shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there be
no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the
member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing to
such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such
spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no
such surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.
(2) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or
eligible child or children shall elect to receive either:
(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW
43.43.260, actuarially reduced, except under subsection (4) of this
section, by the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and actuarially adjusted to
reflect a joint and one hundred percent survivor option under RCW
43.43.278 and if the member was not eligible for normal retirement at
the date of death a further reduction from age fifty-five or when the
member could have attained twenty-five years of service, whichever is
less; if a surviving spouse who is receiving a retirement allowance
dies leaving a child or children of the member under the age of
majority, then such child or children shall continue to receive an
allowance in an amount equal to that which was being received by the
surviving spouse, share and share alike, until such child or children
reach the age of majority; if there is no surviving spouse eligible to
receive an allowance at the time of the member's death, such member's
child or children under the age of majority shall receive an allowance
share and share alike calculated under this section making the
assumption that the ages of the spouse and member were equal at the
time of the member's death; or
(b)(i) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670; or
(ii) If the member dies, one hundred fifty percent of the member's
accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an
obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670. Any accumulated contributions
attributable to restorations made under RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be
refunded at one hundred percent.
(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies, and is not survived by a
spouse or an eligible child, then the accumulated contributions
standing to the member's credit, less any amount identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid:
(a) To an estate, a person or persons, trust, or organization as
the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed
and filed with the department; or
(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(4) The retirement allowance of a member who is killed in the
course of employment, as determined by the director of the department
of labor and industries, is not subject to an actuarial reduction.

--- END ---