BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that criminal history
record information background checks for employment purposes are
rapidly increasing in Washington state. While the demand for criminal
history record information background checks is growing, the existing
criminal history record information background check data transmission
infrastructure and processes are not adequate to keep pace with the
growing demand. Furthermore, employers are concerned with the current
system's ability to quickly secure results. Without adequate data
transmission infrastructure and processes to encourage efficient
criminal history record information background checks and to receive
results quickly, a public safety risk is created. This is especially
true when new or prospective employees will be working with children.
The legislature has learned that some states have recently
developed comprehensive criminal history record information background
check programs. These programs focus on making criminal history record
information background checks easily accessible to employers and
prospective employees and have eliminated long response times. It is
the intent of this act to study advances with criminal history record
information background check programs in other states and determine
what is needed to implement similar programs in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) In consultation with the Washington
State Patrol and employers and nonprofit corporations who request
background information on employees or volunteers, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall conduct a study on
criminal history record information background checks. The study shall
focus on how Washington state can reduce delays in the criminal history
record information background check processing time and how Washington
state can make criminal history record information background checks
more accessible and efficient.
(2) The study shall include, but is not limited to:
(a) A review and analysis of the criminal history record
information background check programs in states that have recently
implemented or are soon to implement comprehensive criminal history
record information background check programs.
(b) Recommendations on how a comprehensive criminal history record
information background check program should be designed in Washington
state, and how much a comprehensive program would cost to implement in
Washington state.
(c) A review of how a comprehensive criminal history record
information background check program could be paid for in Washington
state, which includes a determination on whether the program could be
funded solely by user fees.
(d) A review of the benefits and obstacles of implementing a
criminal history record information background check program created by
the national child protection act of 1993. The national child
protection act of 1993 increases the availability of criminal history
record information background checks for employers who have employees
or volunteers who work with children, elderly persons, or persons with
disabilities.
(e) Upon completion of the review in (d) of this subsection,
recommendations on how Washington state can make criminal history
record information background checks, as authorized under the national
child protection act of 1993, available to Washington state employers.
(3) The findings and recommendations from the study shall be
presented to the legislature no later than December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2004, from the general fund to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---