BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any incarcerated adult or juvenile that is serving a jail or
prison sentence for any criminal offense constituting a felony or gross
misdemeanor shall be palmprinted anytime prior to release from
incarceration. An agency required to collect palmprints is authorized
to charge the incarcerated adult or juvenile a fee of not more than ten
dollars to record and maintain palmprint records.
(2) City, county, or state correctional institutions are not
required to comply with this section if the incarcerated offender's
palmprints are already recorded with the Washington state patrol, or
any local Washington state law enforcement agency. City or county
correctional institutions are not required to comply with this section
if the incarcerated adult or juvenile is being held in the city or
county correctional institution pending transport to the department of
corrections or the department of social and health services.
(3) Palmprints collected under this section may be transmitted to
the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol is not
required to accept palmprints collected under this section until it has
created rules regarding the acceptance of palmprints and has the
resources to utilize the palmprints as part of its automated
fingerprint imaging system.

--- END ---