BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.717 and 2002 c 181 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Until July 1, ((2004)) 2006, a city or town may not impose any new
taxes or fees specific to internet service providers. A city or town
may tax internet service providers under generally applicable business
taxes or fees, at a rate not to exceed the rate applied to a general
service classification. For the purposes of this section, "internet
service" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.297.

--- END ---