BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.225.010 and 2001 c 251 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Advanced social work" means the application of social work
theory and methods including emotional and biopsychosocial assessment,
psychotherapy under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical
social worker, case management, consultation, advocacy, counseling, and
community organization.
(2) "Applicant" means a person who completes the required
application, pays the required fee, is at least eighteen years of age,
and meets any background check requirements and uniform disciplinary
act requirements.
(3) "Committee" means the Washington state mental health
counselors, marriage and family therapists, ((and)) social workers, and
vocational and rehabilitation counselors advisory committee.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Disciplining authority" means the department.
(6) "Independent clinical social work" means the diagnosis and
treatment of emotional and mental disorders based on knowledge of human
development, the causation and treatment of psychopathology,
psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social work practice as
defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include but are
not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples,
families, groups, or organizations.
(7) "Marriage and family therapy" means the diagnosis and treatment
of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive, affective, or
behavioral, within the context of relationships, including marriage and
family systems. Marriage and family therapy involves the professional
application of psychotherapeutic and family systems theories and
techniques in the delivery of services to individuals, couples, and
families for the purpose of treating such diagnosed nervous and mental
disorders. The practice of marriage and family therapy means the
rendering of professional marriage and family therapy services to
individuals, couples, and families, singly or in groups, whether such
services are offered directly to the general public or through
organizations, either public or private, for a fee, monetary or
otherwise.
(8) "Licensed professional counselors doing vocational/career
evaluations and rehabilitation counseling" means the application of
rehabilitation counseling and vocational/career evaluations.
Rehabilitation counseling practice is a systematic process which
assists persons with physical, mental, developmental, cognitive, and
emotional disabilities to achieve their personal, career, and
independent living goals in the most integrated setting possible
through the application of the counseling process. The counseling
process involves communication, goal setting, and beneficial growth or
change through self-advocacy, psychological, vocational, social, and
behavioral interventions. The specific techniques and modalities
utilized within rehabilitation counseling process and career counseling
may include, but are not limited to, assessment and appraisal of
individuals, including the selecting, administering, scoring, and
interpreting of individual and group aptitude, ability, achievement,
interest, and personality tests; diagnosis and treatment planning for
mental, emotional, and behavioral conditions and psycho-social
adjustment; vocational/career counseling; case management; program
evaluation; and job analysis, job development placement services, labor
market surveys, interventions to remove barriers and make
accommodations in employment, environmental, and attitudinal areas.
Vocational/career evaluation means the practice of evaluation that
includes coordinating medical and physical limits, work history,
education, and transferable knowledge skills and abilities into the
determination of employability and suitability of a person for any
occupation, and training analysis. It involves the application of
personal interviews; psychological testing and measurement by
individual or group assessment for ability and attitudes, achievement,
vocational interests, personality, and behavioral adjustment; job
analysis, job classification and pay, job placement, and job or labor
market surveys, and forensic testimony.
(9) "Mental health counseling" means the application of principles
of human development, learning theory, psychotherapy, group dynamics,
and etiology of mental illness and dysfunctional behavior to
individuals, couples, families, groups, and organizations, for the
purpose of treatment of mental disorders and promoting optimal mental
health and functionality. Mental health counseling also includes, but
is not limited to, the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental
and emotional disorders, as well as the application of a wellness model
of mental health.
(((9))) (10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.225.020 and 2001 c 251 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person must not represent himself or herself as a licensed
advanced social worker, licensed independent clinical social worker,
licensed mental health counselor, ((or)) licensed marriage and family
therapist, or licensed professional counselor doing vocational/career
evaluations and rehabilitation counseling without being licensed by the
department.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.225.030 and 2001 c 251 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of marriage and family therapy, mental health
counseling, ((or)) social work, or licensed professional counselors
doing vocational/career evaluations and rehabilitation counseling by an
individual otherwise regulated under this title and performing services
within the authorized scope of practice;
(2) The practice of marriage and family therapy, mental health
counseling, ((or)) social work, or licensed professional counselors
doing vocational/career evaluations and rehabilitation counseling by an
individual employed by the government of the United States or state of
Washington while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the
laws of the United States or state of Washington;
(3) The practice of marriage and family therapy, mental health
counseling, ((or)) social work, or licensed professional counselors
doing vocational/career evaluations and rehabilitation counseling by a
person who is a regular student in an educational program based on
recognized national standards and approved by the secretary, and whose
performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction
or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision of
the instructor;
(4) The practice of marriage and family therapy, mental health
counseling, ((or)) social work, or licensed professional counselors
doing vocational/career evaluations and rehabilitation counseling under
the auspices of a religious denomination, church, or religious
organization.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.225.060 and 2001 c 251 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state mental health counselors, marriage and family
therapists, ((and)) social workers, and vocational and rehabilitation
counselors advisory committee is established.
(1) The committee shall be comprised of ((nine)) eleven members.
Two members shall be licensed mental health counselors. Two members
shall be licensed marriage and family therapists. Two members shall be
licensed professional counselors doing vocational/career evaluations
and rehabilitation counseling. One member shall be a licensed
independent clinical social worker, and one member shall be a licensed
advanced social worker. Three members must be consumers and represent
the public at large and may not be licensed mental health care
providers.
(2) Three members shall be appointed for a term of one year,
((three)) four members shall be appointed for a term of two years, and
((three)) four members shall be appointed for a term of three years.
Subsequent members shall be appointed for terms of three years. A
person must not serve as a member for more than two consecutive terms.
One new licensed professional counselor doing vocational/career
evaluations and rehabilitation counseling shall be appointed for two
years and the other counselor for three years, and then they shall be
for three-year terms.
(3)(a) Each member must be a resident of the state of Washington.
(b) Each member must not hold an office in a professional
association for mental health, social work, ((or)) marriage and family
therapy, or licensed professional counselors doing vocational/career
evaluations and rehabilitation counseling and must not be employed by
the state of Washington.
(c) Each professional member must have been actively engaged as a
mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, ((or)) social
worker, or licensed professional counselors doing vocational/career
evaluations and rehabilitation counseling for five years immediately
preceding appointment.
(d) The consumer members must represent the general public and be
unaffiliated directly or indirectly with the professions licensed under
this chapter.
(4) The secretary shall appoint the committee members.
(5) Committee members are immune from suit in an action, civil or
criminal, based on the department's disciplinary proceedings or other
official acts performed in good faith.
(6) Committee members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.240, including travel expenses in carrying out his or her
authorized duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) The committee shall elect a chair and vice-chair.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.225.070 and 2001 c 251 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of health may seek the advice and assistance of the
advisory committee in administering this chapter, including, but not
limited to:
(1) Advice and recommendations regarding the establishment or
implementation of rules related to the administration of this chapter;
(2) Advice, recommendations, and consultation regarding case
disposition guidelines and priorities related to unprofessional conduct
cases regarding licensed mental health counselors, licensed clinical
social workers, licensed advanced social workers, ((and)) licensed
marriage and family therapists, and licensed professional counselors
doing vocational/career evaluations and rehabilitation counseling;
(3) Assistance and consultation of individual committee members as
needed in the review, analysis, and disposition of reports of
unprofessional conduct and consumer complaints;
(4) Assistance and recommendations to enhance consumer education;
and
(5) Assistance and recommendations regarding any continuing
education and continuing competency programs administered under the
provisions of ((the [this])) this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.225.090 and 2003 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a license to any applicant who
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the applicant
meets the following education and experience requirements for the
applicant's practice area.
(a) Licensed social work classifications:
(i) Licensed advanced social worker:
(A) Graduation from a master's or doctorate social work educational
program accredited by the council on social work education and approved
by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of three thousand two
hundred hours with ninety hours of supervision by a licensed
independent clinical social worker or a licensed advanced social worker
who has been licensed or certified for at least two years. Of those
hours, fifty hours must include direct supervision by a licensed
advanced social worker or licensed independent clinical social worker;
the other forty hours may be with an equally qualified licensed mental
health practitioner. Forty hours must be in one-to-one supervision and
fifty hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group supervision.
Distance supervision is limited to forty supervision hours. Eight
hundred hours must be in direct client contact; and
(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(ii) Licensed independent clinical social worker:
(A) Graduation from a master's or doctorate level social work
educational program accredited by the council on social work education
and approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized
standards;
(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of four thousand hours
of experience, of which one thousand hours must be direct client
contact, over a three-year period supervised by a licensed independent
clinical social worker who has been licensed or certified for at least
five years and who has had at least one year of experience in
supervising the clinical social work practice of others, with
supervision of at least one hundred thirty hours by a licensed mental
health practitioner. Of the total supervision, seventy hours must be
with an independent clinical social worker meeting the qualifications
under this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C); the other sixty hours may be with
an equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner. Sixty hours
must be in one-to-one supervision and seventy hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group supervision. Distance supervision is limited
to sixty supervision hours; and
(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(b) Licensed mental health counselor:
(i) Graduation from a master's or doctoral level educational
program in mental health counseling or a related discipline from a
college or university approved by the secretary based upon nationally
recognized standards;
(ii) Successful completion of an approved examination;
(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of thirty-six months
full-time counseling or three thousand hours of postgraduate mental
health counseling under the supervision of a qualified licensed mental
health counselor in an approved setting. The three thousand hours of
required experience includes a minimum of one hundred hours spent in
immediate supervision with the qualified licensed mental health
counselor, and includes a minimum of one thousand two hundred hours of
direct counseling with individuals, couples, families, or groups; and
(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(c) Licensed marriage and family therapist:
(i) Graduation from a master's degree or doctoral degree
educational program in marriage and family therapy or graduation from
an educational program in an allied field equivalent to a master's
degree or doctoral degree in marriage and family therapy approved by
the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(ii) Successful passage of an approved examination;
(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of two calendar years
of full-time marriage and family therapy. Of the total supervision,
one hundred hours must be with a licensed marriage and family therapist
with at least five years' clinical experience; the other one hundred
hours may be with an equally qualified licensed mental health
practitioner. Total experience requirements include:
(A) A minimum of three thousand hours of experience, one thousand
hours of which must be direct client contact; at least five hundred
hours must be gained in diagnosing and treating couples and families;
plus
(B) At least two hundred hours of qualified supervision with a
supervisor. At least one hundred of the two hundred hours must be one-on-one supervision, and the remaining hours may be in one-on-one or
group supervision.
Applicants who have completed a master's program accredited by the
commission on accreditation for marriage and family therapy education
of the American association for marriage and family therapy may be
credited with five hundred hours of direct client contact and one
hundred hours of formal meetings with an approved supervisor; and
(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements of
thirty-six hours, with six in professional ethics.
(d)(i) Licensed professional counselors doing vocational/career
evaluations and rehabilitation counseling:
(A) Graduation from a master's degree or doctoral degree
educational program in rehabilitation counseling, educational
psychology, counseling, or psychology, or graduation from an
educational program in an allied field equivalent to a master's degree
or doctoral degree approved by the secretary based upon nationally
recognized standards;
(B) Successful completion of an approved examination; such as the
certified rehabilitation counselor exam or the American board of
vocational experts exam, or equivalent exam at a score level acceptable
to the board; and
(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement.
The experience requirement consists of a minimum of three years of
full-time work experience, or its pro-rated part-time equivalent, in
rehabilitation counseling or vocational/career evaluation work. One
year of the work experience must be supervised by a certified
rehabilitation counselor (CRC), or an American board of vocational
experts (ABVE) diplomate or fellow, or a person licensed under this
professional license.
(ii) For grandparenting purposes: Any person who, on the effective
date of this act, or within two years after, possesses current
recertification as a certified rehabilitation counselor; an American
board of vocational experts, diplomate or fellow; a certified
disability management specialist; or is a nationally certified career
counselor from the specialty board of the national board of certified
counselors will be accepted as qualified under this chapter by
education, work experience, and examination. Additionally, anyone who
has been employed as a vocational rehabilitation counselor for this
state, either as a contractor or an employee, for five years full time,
or its pro-rated part-time equivalent, and has a bachelor's degree
acceptable to the board, will be considered eligible by education and
work experience to take an examination acceptable to the board.
(2) The department shall establish by rule what constitutes
adequate proof of meeting the criteria.
(3) In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds for
denial of a license or issuance of a conditional license under chapter
18.130 RCW.

--- END ---