BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.150 and 1987 c 202 s 105 are each amended to read
as follows:
Jurors shall receive for each day's attendance, besides mileage at
the rate determined under RCW 43.03.060, the following ((compensation))
expense payments:
(1) Grand jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no
case less than ten dollars;
(2) Petit jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no
case less than ten dollars;
(3) Coroner's jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in
no case less than ten dollars;
(4) District court jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but
in no case less than ten dollars:
PROVIDED, That a person excused from jury service at his or her own
request shall be allowed not more than a per diem and such mileage, if
any, as to the court shall seem just and equitable under all
circumstances: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state shall fully reimburse
the county in which trial is held for all jury fees and witness fees
related to criminal cases which result from incidents occurring within
an adult or juvenile correctional institution: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the ((compensation paid)) expense payments paid to jurors shall be
determined by the county legislative authority and shall be uniformly
applied within the county.

--- END ---