BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95.510 and 1989 c 431 s 92 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied a ((one)) three dollar per tire fee on the
retail sale of new replacement vehicle tires ((for a period of five
years, beginning October 1, 1989)). The fee imposed in this section
shall be paid by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect
from the buyer the full amount of the fee. The fee collected from the
buyer by the seller, less the ten percent amount retained by the seller
as provided in ((RCW 70.95.535)) subsection (3) of this section, shall
be paid to the department of revenue in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.
All other applicable provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full force
and application with respect to the fee imposed under this section.
The department of revenue shall administer this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "new replacement vehicle
tires" means tires that are newly manufactured for vehicle purposes and
used tires available for resale, but does not include retreaded vehicle
tires.
(3) Every person engaged in making retail sales of new replacement
vehicle tires in this state shall retain ten percent of the collected
three dollar fee. The money retained may be used for costs associated
with the proper management of the waste vehicle tires by the retailer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
The vehicle tire recycling account is created within the state
treasury. Funds collected under RCW 70.95.510 shall be deposited in
the vehicle tire recycling account. Expenditures from the account may
occur only after appropriation by the legislature. The department of
revenue shall deduct two percent from the funds collected under RCW
70.95.510 for the purpose of administering and collecting the fee from
new replacement tire retailers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
Funds in the vehicle tire recycling account shall be expended for
the sole purpose of ensuring waste tires, as defined in RCW 70.95.550,
are recycled in an environmentally responsible way. The department of
ecology shall administer funds in the account by awarding competitive
grants to recyclers of tires and licensed waste tire transporters who
transport waste tires from a collection point to a recycling plant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 70.95.530 (Vehicle tire recycling account -- Use) and 1988 c
250 s 1 & 1985 c 345 s 7;
(2) RCW 70.95.535 (Disposition of fee) and 1989 c 431 s 93; and
(3) RCW 70.95.540 (Cooperation with department to aid tire
recycling) and 1985 c 345 s 9.

--- END ---