BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.220.020 and 1990 c 33 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following words and phrases whenever used in chapter 28A.220
RCW shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Superintendent" or "state superintendent" ((shall)) means the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) "Traffic safety education course" ((shall)) means (a) an
accredited course of instruction in traffic safety education ((which
shall)) that consists of two phases, classroom instruction, and
laboratory experience, or (b) a course of instruction approved by the
department of licensing under RCW 46.82.280(1). "Laboratory
experience" ((shall)) must include on-street, driving range, or
simulator experience or some combination thereof. Each phase ((shall))
must meet basic course requirements ((which shall be)) established by
the superintendent of public instruction, and each part of ((said)) the
course ((shall)) must be taught by a qualified teacher of traffic
safety education. Any portions of the course may be taught after
regular school hours or on Saturdays as well as on regular school days
or as a summer school course, at the option of the local school
districts.
(3) "Qualified teacher of traffic safety education" ((shall)) means
an instructor certificated under ((the provisions of)) chapter 28A.410
RCW and certificated by the superintendent of public instruction to
teach either the classroom phase or the laboratory phase of the traffic
safety education course, or both, under ((regulations promulgated))
rules adopted by the superintendent((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the
laboratory experience phase of the traffic safety education course may
be taught by instructors certificated under rules ((promulgated))
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction, exclusive of any
requirement that the instructor be certificated under ((the provisions
of)) chapter 28A.410 RCW. Professional instructors certificated under
((the provisions of)) chapter 46.82 RCW, and participating in this
program, ((shall be)) are subject to reasonable qualification
requirements jointly adopted by the superintendent of public
instruction and the director of licensing. "Qualified teacher of
traffic safety education" also means a person administering an approved
course under subsection (2)(b) of this section to his or her own child,
if the person is providing home-based instruction in compliance with
RCW 28A.225.010(4).
(4) "Realistic level of effort" means the classroom and laboratory
student learning experiences considered acceptable to the
superintendent of public instruction that must be satisfactorily
accomplished by the student in order to successfully complete the
traffic safety education course.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.82.280 and 1986 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section ((shall)) apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Driver training school" means (a) a commercial driver training
school engaged in the business of giving instruction, for a fee, in the
operation of automobiles, or (b) a commercially available driver
training course developed for home-based education that has been
approved by the director.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing of
the state of Washington.
(3) "Advisory committee" means the driving instructors' advisory
committee as created in this chapter.
(4) "Fraudulent practices" means any conduct or representation on
the part of a licensee under this chapter tending to induce anyone to
believe, or to give the impression, that a license to operate a motor
vehicle or any other license granted by the director may be obtained by
any means other than those prescribed by law, or furnishing or
obtaining the same by illegal or improper means, or requesting,
accepting, or collecting money for such purposes.
(5) "Instructor" means any person employed by a driver training
school to instruct persons in the operation of automobiles or a person
meeting the qualifications of RCW 28A.220.020(3).
(6) "Place of business" means a designated location at which the
business of a driver training school is transacted and its records are
kept.
(7) "Person" means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership,
or association.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.82.290 and 1979 ex.s. c 51 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director ((shall be)) is responsible for the administration
and enforcement of the law pertaining to driver training schools as set
forth in this chapter.
(2) The director ((is authorized to)) may adopt and enforce such
reasonable rules as may be consistent with and necessary to carry out
this chapter.
(3) The director may review and approve driver training courses
designed for use in home-based instruction under RCW 46.82.280.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.82.300 and 2002 c 195 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall be assisted in the duties and
responsibilities of this chapter by the driver instructors' advisory
committee, consisting of five members. Members of the advisory
committee shall be appointed by the director for two-year terms and
shall consist of a representative of the driver training schools, a
representative of the driving instructors (who shall not be from the
same school as the school member), a representative of the
superintendent of public instruction, a representative of the
department of licensing, and a representative from the Washington state
traffic safety commission. Members shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A member who
is receiving a salary from the state shall not receive compensation
other than travel expenses incurred in such service.
(2) The advisory committee shall meet at least semiannually and
shall have additional meetings as may be called by the director. The
director or the director's representative shall attend all meetings of
the advisory committee and shall serve as chairman.
(3) Duties of the advisory committee shall be to:
(a) Advise and confer with the director or the director's
representative on matters pertaining to the establishment of rules
necessary to carry out this chapter;
(b) Review violations of this chapter and to recommend to the
director appropriate enforcement or disciplinary action as provided in
this chapter;
(c) Review and update when necessary a curriculum consisting of a
list of items of knowledge and the processes of driving a motor vehicle
specifying the minimum requirements adjudged necessary in teaching a
proper and adequate course of driver education;
(d) Review and update instructor certification standards to be
consistent with RCW 46.82.330 and take into consideration those
standards required to be met by traffic safety education teachers under
RCW 28A.220.020(3); ((and))
(e) Prepare the examination for a driver instructor's certificate
and review examination results at least once each calendar year for the
purpose of updating and revising examination standards; and
(f) Review and recommended home-based programs of instruction for
driver training to be administered under RCW 28A.220.020.

--- END ---