BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may adopt general permits for activities if the
department determines that the activities are similar in nature, will
cause only minimal adverse impacts on fish life when performed
separately, and will have only a minimal cumulative impact on fish
life.
(2) "General permit," as it is used in this chapter, means a
hydraulic project approval that covers multiple projects within a
defined geographic area, in lieu of a standard permit being issued to
each applicant under RCW 77.55.100 or 77.55.110.
(3) The general permit must include the following:
(a) A precise description of the activities covered by the permit;
(b) The conditions to protect fish life;
(c) The time, manner, locations, and methods an applicant must
follow to receive coverage under the permit;
(d) The geographic scope of the permit;
(e) The method to obtain coverage under the general permit, which
may include an abbreviated application process; and
(f) Any requirements for reporting at project completion.
(4) Notice of any proposed adoption of a general permit and a
request for public comment must be published in the Washington State
Register, in a newspaper of general circulation in the geographic area
covered by the general permit, and on the department's web site. The
department must provide at least thirty days after the notice is
published before the general permit is finalized. The department may
provide an additional period for public comment and public hearings if
required by the complexity of the permit and degree of public interest.
(5) Any person aggrieved by the adoption of a general permit under
this section may appeal the decision according to the provisions of
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) To obtain coverage under a general permit, an applicant must
provide notice to the department, in the time and manner defined in the
general permit. The department must approve or deny the application
for coverage.
(7) A person aggrieved by the decision to approve or deny coverage
under a general permit for an individual project may appeal the
decision under the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. The appeal may
only be based on whether the individual project fits within the scope
of the general permit.
(8) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to
implement this section. The department may adopt a general permit as
a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW if the department determines rule making
is required to address the complexity of the general permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If any person or government agency fails to follow the
requirements of obtaining coverage under a general permit under section
1 of this act or fails to carry out any of the requirements or
conditions of a general permit issued under section 1 of this act, the
department may issue an order to that person or government agency. The
order may require the person or government agency to stop work on any
or all of the activities subject to the general permit, to correct or
to restore the nonconforming site, or to both stop work and to correct
or to restore the nonconforming site. Within twenty days of service of
such an order or as provided by rule of the department extending such
time, the person may file a written petition with the department
appealing the order, and this petition shall be treated as an
application for an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. In
the event of an appeal, a person or government agency may seek interim
relief from an order under this section as provided in chapter 34.05
RCW.
(2) The department may adopt rules to designate that certain
violations of the terms or conditions of a general permit under section
1 of this act are an infraction to be punished as provided by RCW
77.15.160. Application of the remedy provided in subsection (1) of
this section does not preclude any punishment under RCW 77.15.160.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.55.100 and 2003 c 391 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event that any person or government agency desires to
construct any form of hydraulic project or perform other work that will
use, divert, obstruct, or change the natural flow or bed of any of the
salt or fresh waters of the state, such person or government agency
shall, before commencing construction or work thereon and to ensure the
proper protection of fish life, secure the approval of the department
as to the adequacy of the means proposed for the protection of fish
life. This approval shall not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably
conditioned.
(2)(a) The department shall grant or deny approval of a standard
permit within forty-five calendar days of the receipt of a complete
application and notice of compliance with any applicable requirements
of the state environmental policy act, made in the manner prescribed in
this section. The permit must contain provisions allowing for minor
modifications to the plans and specifications without requiring
reissuance of the permit.
(b) The applicant may document receipt of application by filing in
person or by registered mail. A complete application for approval
shall contain general plans for the overall project, complete plans and
specifications of the proposed construction or work within the mean
higher high water line in salt water or within the ordinary high water
line in fresh water, and complete plans and specifications for the
proper protection of fish life.
(c) The department may accept a complete, written application as
provided in (b) of this subsection for a standard permit for a project
with multiple job sites, or within a defined geographic area.
(d) The forty-five day requirement shall be suspended if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the application, the
applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field
evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site ((is)) or sites are physically inaccessible for
inspection; or
(iii) The applicant requests delay. Immediately upon determination
that the forty-five day period is suspended, the department shall
notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the delay.
(((d))) (e) For purposes of this section, "standard permit" means
a written permit issued by the department when the conditions under
subsections (3) and (5)(b) of this section are not met. Standard
permits may be issued for single or multiple job sites, or for work
within a defined geographic area.
(3)(a) The department may issue an expedited written permit in
those instances where normal permit processing would result in
significant hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the
environment. In cases of imminent danger, the department shall issue
an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to repair existing
structures, move obstructions, restore banks, protect property, or
protect fish resources. Expedited permit requests require a complete
written application as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section
and shall be issued within fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a
complete written application. Approval of an expedited permit is valid
for up to sixty days from the date of issuance.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "imminent danger" means a
threat by weather, water flow, or other natural conditions that is
likely to occur within sixty days of a request for a permit
application.
(c) The department may not require the provisions of the state
environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition
of issuing a permit under this subsection.
(d) The department or the county legislative authority may
determine if an imminent danger exists. The county legislative
authority shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines
that an imminent danger exists.
(4) Approval of a standard permit is valid for a period of up to
five years from date of issuance. The permittee must demonstrate
substantial progress on construction of that portion of the project
relating to the approval within two years of the date of issuance. If
the department denies approval, the department shall provide the
applicant, in writing, a statement of the specific reasons why and how
the proposed project would adversely affect fish life. Protection of
fish life shall be the only ground upon which approval may be denied or
conditioned. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to any denial of project
approval, conditional approval, or requirements for project
modification upon which approval may be contingent.
(5)(a) In case of an emergency arising from weather or stream flow
conditions or other natural conditions, the department, through its
authorized representatives, shall issue immediately, upon request, oral
approval for removing any obstructions, repairing existing structures,
restoring stream banks, or to protect property threatened by the stream
or a change in the stream flow without the necessity of obtaining a
written approval prior to commencing work. Conditions of an oral
approval to protect fish life shall be established by the department
and reduced to writing within thirty days and complied with as provided
for in this section. Oral approval shall be granted immediately, upon
request, for a stream crossing during an emergency situation.
(b) For purposes of this section and RCW 77.55.110, "emergency"
means an immediate threat to life, the public, property, or of
environmental degradation.
(c) The department or the county legislative authority may declare
and continue an emergency when one or more of the criteria under (b) of
this subsection are met. The county legislative authority shall
immediately notify the department if it declares an emergency under
this subsection.
(6) The department shall, at the request of a county, develop five-year maintenance approval agreements, consistent with comprehensive
flood control management plans adopted under the authority of RCW
86.12.200, or other watershed plan approved by a county legislative
authority, to allow for work on public and private property for bank
stabilization, bridge repair, removal of sand bars and debris, channel
maintenance, and other flood damage repair and reduction activity under
agreed-upon conditions and times without obtaining permits for specific
projects.
(7) This section shall not apply to the construction of any form of
hydraulic project or other work which diverts water for agricultural
irrigation or stock watering purposes authorized under or recognized as
being valid by the state's water codes, or when such hydraulic project
or other work is associated with streambank stabilization to protect
farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020. These
irrigation or stock watering diversion and streambank stabilization
projects shall be governed by RCW 77.55.110.
A landscape management plan approved by the department and the
department of natural resources under RCW 76.09.350(2), shall serve as
a hydraulic project approval for the life of the plan if fish are
selected as one of the public resources for coverage under such a plan.
(8) For the purposes of this section and RCW 77.55.110, "bed" means
the land below the ordinary high water lines of state waters. This
definition does not include irrigation ditches, canals, storm water
run-off devices, or other artificial watercourses except where they
exist in a natural watercourse that has been altered by man.
(9) The phrase "to construct any form of hydraulic project or
perform other work" does not include the act of driving across an
established ford. Driving across streams or on wetted stream beds at
areas other than established fords requires approval. Work within the
ordinary high water line of state waters to construct or repair a ford
or crossing requires approval.
(10) The department shall not require a fishway on a tide gate,
flood gate, or other associated man-made agricultural drainage
facilities as a condition of a hydraulic project approval if such
fishway was not originally installed as part of an agricultural
drainage system existing on or before May 20, 2003.
(11) Any condition requiring a self-regulating tide gate to achieve
fish passage in an existing hydraulic project approval under this
section may not be enforced.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.58.030 and 2003 c 321 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
following definitions and concepts apply:
(1) Administration:
(a) "Department" means the department of ecology;
(b) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology;
(c) "Local government" means any county, incorporated city, or town
which contains within its boundaries any lands or waters subject to
this chapter;
(d) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, organization, cooperative, public or municipal
corporation, or agency of the state or local governmental unit however
designated;
(e) "Hearing board" means the shoreline hearings board established
by this chapter.
(2) Geographical:
(a) "Extreme low tide" means the lowest line on the land reached by
a receding tide;
(b) "Ordinary high water mark" on all lakes, streams, and tidal
water is that mark that will be found by examining the bed and banks
and ascertaining where the presence and action of waters are so common
and usual, and so long continued in all ordinary years, as to mark upon
the soil a character distinct from that of the abutting upland, in
respect to vegetation as that condition exists on June 1, 1971, as it
may naturally change thereafter, or as it may change thereafter in
accordance with permits issued by a local government or the department:
PROVIDED, That in any area where the ordinary high water mark cannot be
found, the ordinary high water mark adjoining salt water shall be the
line of mean higher high tide and the ordinary high water mark
adjoining fresh water shall be the line of mean high water;
(c) "Shorelines of the state" are the total of all "shorelines" and
"shorelines of statewide significance" within the state;
(d) "Shorelines" means all of the water areas of the state,
including reservoirs, and their associated shorelands, together with
the lands underlying them; except (i) shorelines of statewide
significance; (ii) shorelines on segments of streams upstream of a
point where the mean annual flow is twenty cubic feet per second or
less and the wetlands associated with such upstream segments; and (iii)
shorelines on lakes less than twenty acres in size and wetlands
associated with such small lakes;
(e) "Shorelines of statewide significance" means the following
shorelines of the state:
(i) The area between the ordinary high water mark and the western
boundary of the state from Cape Disappointment on the south to Cape
Flattery on the north, including harbors, bays, estuaries, and inlets;
(ii) Those areas of Puget Sound and adjacent salt waters and the
Strait of Juan de Fuca between the ordinary high water mark and the
line of extreme low tide as follows:
(A) Nisqually Delta -- from DeWolf Bight to Tatsolo Point,
(B) Birch Bay -- from Point Whitehorn to Birch Point,
(C) Hood Canal -- from Tala Point to Foulweather Bluff,
(D) Skagit Bay and adjacent area -- from Brown Point to Yokeko Point,
and
(E) Padilla Bay -- from March Point to William Point;
(iii) Those areas of Puget Sound and the Strait of Juan de Fuca and
adjacent salt waters north to the Canadian line and lying seaward from
the line of extreme low tide;
(iv) Those lakes, whether natural, artificial, or a combination
thereof, with a surface acreage of one thousand acres or more measured
at the ordinary high water mark;
(v) Those natural rivers or segments thereof as follows:
(A) Any west of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the mean annual flow is measured at one thousand cubic feet
per second or more,
(B) Any east of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the annual flow is measured at two hundred cubic feet per
second or more, or those portions of rivers east of the crest of the
Cascade range downstream from the first three hundred square miles of
drainage area, whichever is longer;
(vi) Those shorelands associated with (i), (ii), (iv), and (v) of
this subsection (2)(e);
(f) "Shorelands" or "shoreland areas" means those lands extending
landward for two hundred feet in all directions as measured on a
horizontal plane from the ordinary high water mark; floodways and
contiguous floodplain areas landward two hundred feet from such
floodways; and all wetlands and river deltas associated with the
streams, lakes, and tidal waters which are subject to the provisions of
this chapter; the same to be designated as to location by the
department of ecology.
(i) Any county or city may determine that portion of a one-hundred-year-flood plain to be included in its master program as long as such
portion includes, as a minimum, the floodway and the adjacent land
extending landward two hundred feet therefrom.
(ii) Any city or county may also include in its master program land
necessary for buffers for critical areas, as defined in chapter 36.70A
RCW, that occur within shorelines of the state, provided that forest
practices regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, except conversions to
nonforest land use, on lands subject to the provisions of this
subsection (2)(f)(ii) are not subject to additional regulations under
this chapter;
(g) "Floodway" means those portions of the area of a river valley
lying streamward from the outer limits of a watercourse upon which
flood waters are carried during periods of flooding that occur with
reasonable regularity, although not necessarily annually, said floodway
being identified, under normal condition, by changes in surface soil
conditions or changes in types or quality of vegetative ground cover
condition. The floodway shall not include those lands that can
reasonably be expected to be protected from flood waters by flood
control devices maintained by or maintained under license from the
federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of the state;
(h) "Wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by
surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration sufficient to
support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence
of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions.
Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas.
Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and
drainage ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities,
wastewater treatment facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities,
or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally
created as a result of the construction of a road, street, or highway.
Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland areas to mitigate the conversion of wetlands.
(3) Procedural terms:
(a) "Guidelines" means those standards adopted to implement the
policy of this chapter for regulation of use of the shorelines of the
state prior to adoption of master programs. Such standards shall also
provide criteria to local governments and the department in developing
master programs;
(b) "Master program" shall mean the comprehensive use plan for a
described area, and the use regulations together with maps, diagrams,
charts, or other descriptive material and text, a statement of desired
goals, and standards developed in accordance with the policies
enunciated in RCW 90.58.020;
(c) "State master program" is the cumulative total of all master
programs approved or adopted by the department of ecology;
(d) "Development" means a use consisting of the construction or
exterior alteration of structures; dredging; drilling; dumping;
filling; removal of any sand, gravel, or minerals; bulkheading; driving
of piling; placing of obstructions; or any project of a permanent or
temporary nature which interferes with the normal public use of the
surface of the waters overlying lands subject to this chapter at any
state of water level;
(e) "Substantial development" shall mean any development of which
the total cost or fair market value exceeds five thousand dollars, or
any development which materially interferes with the normal public use
of the water or shorelines of the state. The dollar threshold
established in this subsection (3)(e) must be adjusted for inflation by
the office of financial management every five years, beginning July 1,
2007, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time
period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that
year's annual average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area,
for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the
bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect. The following shall not be considered
substantial developments for the purpose of this chapter:
(i) Normal maintenance or repair of existing structures or
developments, including damage by accident, fire, or elements;
(ii) Construction of the normal protective bulkhead common to
single family residences;
(iii) Emergency construction necessary to protect property from
damage by the elements;
(iv) Construction and practices normal or necessary for farming,
irrigation, and ranching activities, including agricultural service
roads and utilities on shorelands, and the construction and maintenance
of irrigation structures including but not limited to head gates,
pumping facilities, and irrigation channels. A feedlot of any size,
all processing plants, other activities of a commercial nature,
alteration of the contour of the shorelands by leveling or filling
other than that which results from normal cultivation, shall not be
considered normal or necessary farming or ranching activities. A
feedlot shall be an enclosure or facility used or capable of being used
for feeding livestock hay, grain, silage, or other livestock feed, but
shall not include land for growing crops or vegetation for livestock
feeding and/or grazing, nor shall it include normal livestock wintering
operations;
(v) Construction or modification of navigational aids such as
channel markers and anchor buoys;
(vi) Construction on shorelands by an owner, lessee, or contract
purchaser of a single family residence for his own use or for the use
of his or her family, which residence does not exceed a height of
thirty-five feet above average grade level and which meets all
requirements of the state agency or local government having
jurisdiction thereof, other than requirements imposed pursuant to this
chapter;
(vii) Construction of a dock, including a community dock, designed
for pleasure craft only, for the private noncommercial use of the
owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of single and multiple family
residences. This exception applies if either: (A) In salt waters, the
fair market value of the dock does not exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars; or (B) in fresh waters, the fair market value of the dock does
not exceed ten thousand dollars, but if subsequent construction having
a fair market value exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars occurs
within five years of completion of the prior construction, the
subsequent construction shall be considered a substantial development
for the purpose of this chapter;
(viii) Operation, maintenance, or construction of canals,
waterways, drains, reservoirs, or other facilities that now exist or
are hereafter created or developed as a part of an irrigation system
for the primary purpose of making use of system waters, including
return flow and artificially stored ground water for the irrigation of
lands;
(ix) The marking of property lines or corners on state owned lands,
when such marking does not significantly interfere with normal public
use of the surface of the water;
(x) Operation and maintenance of any system of dikes, ditches,
drains, or other facilities existing on September 8, 1975, which were
created, developed, or utilized primarily as a part of an agricultural
drainage or diking system;
(xi) Site exploration and investigation activities that are
prerequisite to preparation of an application for development
authorization under this chapter, if:
(A) The activity does not interfere with the normal public use of
the surface waters;
(B) The activity will have no significant adverse impact on the
environment including, but not limited to, fish, wildlife, fish or
wildlife habitat, water quality, and aesthetic values;
(C) The activity does not involve the installation of a structure,
and upon completion of the activity the vegetation and land
configuration of the site are restored to conditions existing before
the activity;
(D) A private entity seeking development authorization under this
section first posts a performance bond or provides other evidence of
financial responsibility to the local jurisdiction to ensure that the
site is restored to preexisting conditions; and
(E) The activity is not subject to the permit requirements of RCW
90.58.550;
(xii) The process of removing or controlling an aquatic noxious
weed, as defined in RCW 17.26.020, through the use of an herbicide or
other treatment methods applicable to weed control that are recommended
by a final environmental impact statement published by the department
of agriculture or the department jointly with other state agencies
under chapter 43.21C RCW;
(f) "General permit" means a permit that covers multiple projects
within a defined geographic area, in lieu of a substantial development
permit being issued to each applicant under RCW 90.58.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A local government may adopt general permits for any activities
subject to the requirements for a substantial development permit under
RCW 90.58.140 if the local government determines that the activities
are similar in nature, will cause only minimal adverse impacts on
shorelines when performed separately, will have only a minimal
cumulative impact on shorelines, and are consistent with the local
master program.
(2) The general permit must include the following:
(a) A precise description of the activities covered by the permit;
(b) The conditions and practices an applicant must follow to
receive coverage under the permit;
(c) The geographic scope of the permit;
(d) The method to obtain coverage under the permit, which may
include an abbreviated application process; and
(e) Any requirements for reporting at project completion.
(3) Notice of any proposed general permit and a request for public
comment must be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
geographic area covered by the general permit, or in any other manner
deemed appropriate by the local government. The local government must
provide at least thirty days after the notice is published before the
general permit is finalized. The local government may provide an
additional period for public comment and public hearings if required by
the complexity of the permit and degree of public interest.
(4) Any person aggrieved by the adoption of a general permit under
this section may appeal the general permit to the shorelines hearings
board according to the procedures in RCW 90.58.180. Coverage under the
general permit for individual projects is not subject to appeal.
(5) To obtain coverage under a general permit, an applicant must
provide notice to the local government and to the public, in the time
and manner defined in the general permit. The local government may
approve or deny the application for coverage.
(6) A person aggrieved by the decision to approve or deny coverage
under a general permit for an individual project may appeal the
decision to the shorelines hearings board according to the procedures
in RCW 90.58.180. The appeal may only be based on whether the
individual project fits within the scope of the general permit.

--- END ---