BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.061 and 2002 c 249 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each applicant for an electrical contractor's license, other
than an individual, shall designate a supervisory employee or member of
the firm to take the required master electrician's or administrator's
examination. ((Effective July 1, 1987,)) A supervisory employee
designated as the electrical contractor's master electrician or
administrator shall be a full-time supervisory employee. This person
shall be designated as master electrician or administrator under the
license. No person may concurrently qualify as master electrician or
administrator for more than one contractor. If the relationship of the
master electrician or administrator with the electrical contractor is
terminated, the contractor's license is void within ninety days unless
another master electrician or administrator is qualified by the board.
However, if the master electrician or administrator dies or is
otherwise incapacitated, the contractor's license is void within one
hundred eighty days unless another master electrician or administrator
is qualified by the board. The contractor must notify the department
in writing within ten days if the master electrician's or
administrator's relationship with the contractor terminates due to the
master electrician's or administrator's death or incapacitation.
(2) The department must issue an administrator's certificate to all
applicants who have passed the examination as provided in RCW 19.28.051
and this section, and who have complied with the rules adopted under
this chapter, or who qualify to obtain an administrator's certificate
without examination under subsection (3) of this section. The
administrator's certificate must bear the date of issuance, expires on
the holder's birthday, and is nontransferable. The certificate must be
renewed every three years, upon application, on or before the holder's
birthday.
(a) If the certificate holder demonstrates to the department that
he or she has satisfactorily completed an annual eight-hour continuing
education course, the certificate may be renewed by appropriate
application without examination unless the certificate has been
revoked, suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the
expiration date.
(b) The contents and requirements for satisfactory completion of
the continuing education course must be determined by the director and
approved by the board.
(c) The department must accept proof of a certificate holder's
satisfactory completion of a continuing education course offered in
another state as meeting the requirements for maintaining a current
Washington state certificate if the department is satisfied the course
is comparable in nature to that required in Washington state for
maintaining a current certificate.
(3) Before December 1, 2004, a person who provides evidence in a
form prescribed by the department affirming that he or she has worked
in the HVAC/refrigeration specialty for a minimum of eight thousand
hours may obtain a HVAC/refrigeration specialty electrical
administrator certificate of competency without examination.
(4) A fee must be assessed for each administrator's certificate and
for each renewal. An individual holding more than one administrator's
certificate under this chapter is not required to pay fees for more
than one certificate. The department must set the fees by rule for
issuance and renewal of a certificate. The fees must cover, but not
exceed, the costs of issuing the certificates and of administering and
enforcing the administrator certification requirements of this chapter.
(((4))) (5) The department may deny an application for an
administrator's certificate for up to two years if the applicant's
previous administrator's certificate has been revoked for a serious
violation and all appeals concerning the revocation have been
exhausted. For the purposes of this section only, a serious violation
is a violation that presents imminent danger to the public. The
certificate may be renewed for a three-year period without examination
by appropriate application unless the certificate has been revoked,
suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the expiration date.
If the certificate is not renewed before the expiration date, the
individual shall pay twice the usual fee. A person may take the
administrator's examination as many times as necessary to pass without
limit.
(((5))) (6) The designated master electrician or administrator
shall:
(a) Be a member of the firm or a supervisory employee and shall be
available during working hours to carry out the duties of an
administrator under this section;
(b) Ensure that all electrical work complies with the electrical
installation laws and rules of the state;
(c) Ensure that the proper electrical safety procedures are used;
(d) Ensure that all electrical labels, permits, and licenses
required to perform electrical work are used;
(e) See that corrective notices issued by an inspecting authority
are complied with; and
(f) Notify the department in writing within ten days if the master
electrician or administrator terminates the relationship with the
electrical contractor.
(((6))) (7) The department shall not by rule change the
administrator's duties under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.28.191 and 2003 c 399 s 601 and 2003 c 211 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application, the department shall review
the application and determine whether the applicant is eligible to take
an examination for the master journeyman electrician, journeyman
electrician, master specialty electrician, or specialty electrician
certificate of competency.
(a) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid
journeyman electrician certificate of competency in effect for the
previous four years and a valid general administrator's certificate may
apply for a master journeyman electrician certificate of competency
without examination.
(b) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid
specialty electrician certificate of competency, in the specialty
applied for, for the previous two years and a valid specialty
administrator's certificate, in the specialty applied for, may apply
for a master specialty electrician certificate of competency without
examination.
(c) Before December 1, 2004, a person who provides evidence in a
form prescribed by the department affirming that he or she has worked
in the HVAC/refrigeration specialty for a minimum of four thousand
hours may obtain a HVAC/refrigeration specialty electrician certificate
of competency without examination.
(d) Before December 1, 2003, the following persons may obtain an
equipment repair specialty electrician certificate of competency
without examination:
(i) A person who has successfully completed an apprenticeship
program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the machinist trade; and
(ii) A person who provides evidence in a form prescribed by the
department affirming that: (A) He or she was employed as of April 1,
2003, by a factory-authorized equipment dealer or service company; and
(B) he or she has worked in equipment repair for a minimum of four
thousand hours.
(((d))) (e) To be eligible to take the examination for a master
journeyman electrician certificate of competency the applicant must
have possessed a valid journeyman electrician certificate of competency
for four years.
(((e))) (f) To be eligible to take the examination for a master
specialty electrician certificate of competency the applicant must have
possessed a valid specialty electrician certificate of competency, in
the specialty applied for, for two years.
(((f))) (g) To be eligible to take the examination for a journeyman
certificate of competency the applicant must have:
(i) Worked in the electrical construction trade for a minimum of
eight thousand hours, of which four thousand hours shall be in
industrial or commercial electrical installation under the supervision
of a master journeyman electrician or journeyman electrician and not
more than a total of four thousand hours in all specialties under the
supervision of a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician,
master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty,
or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty.
Speciality electricians with less than a four thousand hour work
experience requirement cannot credit the time required to obtain that
specialty towards qualifying to become a journeyman electrician; or
(ii) Successfully completed an apprenticeship program approved
under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade.
(((g))) (h) To be eligible to take the examination for a specialty
electrician certificate of competency the applicant must have:
(i) Worked in the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(a)), pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(b)(i)), sign (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(c)), limited
energy (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(e)(i)), nonresidential
maintenance (as specified in WAC 296-46A-930(2)(f)(i)), or other new
nonresidential specialties as determined by the department in rule
under the supervision of a master journeyman electrician, journeyman
electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty for a minimum of four thousand hours; or
(ii) Worked in the appliance repair specialty as determined by the
department in rule, restricted nonresidential maintenance as determined
by the department in rule, the equipment repair specialty as determined
by the department in rule, or a specialty other than the designated
specialties in (((g))) (h)(i) of this subsection for a minimum of the
initial ninety days, or longer if set by rule by the department. The
restricted nonresidential maintenance specialty is limited to a maximum
of 277 volts and 20 amperes for lighting branch circuits and/or a
maximum of 250 volts and 60 amperes for other circuits, but excludes
the replacement or repair of circuit breakers. The initial period must
be spent under one hundred percent supervision of a master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty. After this initial period, a
person may take the specialty examination. If the person passes the
examination, the person may work unsupervised for the balance of the
minimum hours required for certification. A person may not be
certified as a specialty electrician in the appliance repair specialty
or in a specialty other than the designated specialities in (((g)))
(h)(i) of this subsection, however, until the person has worked a
minimum of two thousand hours in that specialty, or longer if set by
rule by the department; or
(iii) Successfully completed an approved apprenticeship program
under chapter 49.04 RCW for the applicant's specialty in the electrical
construction trade.
(((h))) (i) Any applicant for a journeyman electrician certificate
of competency who has successfully completed a two-year program in the
electrical construction trade at public community or technical
colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited technical or trade
schools licensed by the work force training and education coordinating
board under chapter 28C.10 RCW may substitute up to two years of the
technical or trade school program for two years of work experience
under a master journeyman electrician or journeyman electrician. The
applicant shall obtain the additional two years of work experience
required in industrial or commercial electrical installation prior to
the beginning, or after the completion, of the technical school
program. Any applicant who has received training in the electrical
construction trade in the armed service of the United States may be
eligible to apply armed service work experience towards qualification
to take the examination for the journeyman electrician certificate of
competency.
(((i))) (j) An applicant for a specialty electrician certificate of
competency who, after January 1, 2000, has successfully completed a
two-year program in the electrical construction trade at a public
community or technical college, or a not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade school licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may
substitute up to one year of the technical or trade school program for
one year of work experience under a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty. Any applicant who has received training in
the electrical construction trade in the armed services of the United
States may be eligible to apply armed service work experience towards
qualification to take the examination for an appropriate specialty
electrician certificate of competency.
(((j))) (k) The department must determine whether hours of training
and experience in the armed services or school program are in the
electrical construction trade and appropriate as a substitute for hours
of work experience. The department must use the following criteria for
evaluating the equivalence of classroom electrical training programs
and work in the electrical construction trade:
(i) A two-year electrical training program must consist of three
thousand or more hours.
(ii) In a two-year electrical training program, a minimum of two
thousand four hundred hours of student/instructor contact time must be
technical electrical instruction directly related to the scope of work
of the electrical specialty. Student/instructor contact time includes
lecture and in-school lab.
(iii) The department may not allow credit for a program that
accepts more than one thousand hours transferred from another school's
program.
(iv) Electrical specialty training school programs of less than two
years will have all of the above student/instructor contact time hours
proportionately reduced. Such programs may not apply to more than
fifty percent of the work experience required to attain certification.
(v) Electrical training programs of less than two years may not be
credited towards qualification for journeyman electrician unless the
training program is used to gain qualification for a four thousand hour
electrical specialty.
(((k))) (l) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.
(2) The department shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules, the department shall consult with the board.
Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the
examination, the department shall so notify the applicant, indicating
the time and place for taking the examination.
(3) No noncertified individual may work unsupervised more than one
year beyond the date when the trainee would be eligible to test for a
certificate of competency if working on a full-time basis after
original application for the trainee certificate. For the purposes of
this section, full-time basis means two thousand hours.

--- END ---