BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature continues to recognize the
need to ensure that all members of our community are protected from
discriminatory treatment on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, or
national origin. The legislature also acknowledges that there is a
large body of academic studies that demonstrates a substantial
educational benefit in maintaining a diverse student population in our
universities and colleges. The presence of a diverse learning
environment helps students acquire the skills needed to live and work
successfully in our increasingly diverse society. The United States
supreme court and the Washington supreme court have recognized the
benefits of such educational diversity in a student body as a
compelling state interest as long as the means employed to promote
diversity are within narrowly tailored guidelines that ensure that
individuals are not unduly impacted. In light of this recognition, it
is the intent of the legislature to give universities and colleges some
flexibility in considering race, color, ethnicity, or national origin
as positive factors in their admission and transfer policies to promote
diversity by enrolling meaningful numbers of students from groups that
would not otherwise be so represented. To ensure the highest quality
of education is provided at our universities and colleges, they must
have the ability to engage in a holistic review of each applicant that
includes all the positive qualities and experiences that an applicant
possesses. It is not the intent of the legislature to allow any form
of quota or set aside system to be implemented by a university or
college to insulate an applicant from comparison with all other
candidates solely because of his or her racial status.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.400 and 1999 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The state shall not discriminate against, or grant preferential
treatment to, any individual or group on the basis of race, sex, color,
ethnicity, or national origin in the operation of public employment,
public education, or public contracting.
(2) This section applies only to action taken after December 3,
1998.
(3) This section does not affect any law or governmental action
that does not discriminate against, or grant preferential treatment to,
any individual or group on the basis of race, sex, color, ethnicity, or
national origin.
(4) This section does not affect any otherwise lawful
classification that:
(a) Is based on sex and is necessary for sexual privacy or medical
or psychological treatment; or
(b) Is necessary for undercover law enforcement or for film, video,
audio, or theatrical casting; or
(c) Provides for separate athletic teams for each sex.
(5) This section does not invalidate any court order or consent
decree that is in force as of December 3, 1998.
(6) This section does not prohibit action that must be taken to
establish or maintain eligibility for any federal program, if
ineligibility would result in a loss of federal funds to the state.
(7) This section does not prohibit a public college, university, or
community college from considering race, color, ethnicity, or national
origin in its admission or transfer policies for the purpose of
promoting diversity at the campus if the policy meets the following
minimum requirements:
(a) No admission slots may be set aside on the basis of race,
color, ethnicity, or national origin nor shall any person be given
separate consideration based solely on race, color, ethnicity, or
national origin;
(b) All qualified applicants shall be given individual
consideration in which all qualities and experiences that may be
valuable contributions to student body diversity are considered;
(c) Race, color, ethnicity, or national origin shall not be given
a predetermined numerical value or weight in the admissions process;
(d) The policy shall establish criteria for evaluating whether the
consideration of race, color, ethnicity, or national origin is still
necessary to promote diversity and shall include provisions for
periodic reviews; and
(e) There must be a process established for periodically exploring
workable race-neutral alternatives to considering race, color,
ethnicity, or national origin to achieve the diversity the college or
university is seeking, without compromising academic quality.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "state" includes, but is not
necessarily limited to, the state itself, any city, county, public
college or university, community college, school district, special
district, or other political subdivision or governmental
instrumentality of or within the state.
(((8))) (9) The remedies available for violations of this section
shall be the same, regardless of the injured party's race, sex, color,
ethnicity, or national origin, as are otherwise available for
violations of Washington antidiscrimination law.
(((9))) (10) This section shall be self-executing. If any part or
parts of this section are found to be in conflict with federal law, the
United States Constitution, or the Washington state Constitution, the
section shall be implemented to the maximum extent that federal law,
the United States Constitution, and the Washington state Constitution
permit. Any provision held invalid shall be severable from the
remaining portions of this section.

--- END ---