BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to end double
taxation of attorneys' fees obtained through judgments and settlements,
whether paid by the client from the recovery or by the defendant
pursuant to a statute or a contract. Through this legislation,
Washington law clearly recognizes that attorneys have a property
interest in their clients' cases so that the attorney's fee portion of
an award or settlement may be taxed only once and against the attorney
who actually receives the fee. This statute should be liberally
construed to effectuate its purpose. This act is curative and
remedial, and intended to ensure that Washington residents do not incur
double taxation on attorneys' fees received in litigation and owed to
their attorneys. Thus, except for RCW 60.40.010(4), the statute is
intended to apply retroactively.

Sec. 2 RCW 60.40.010 and Code 1881 s 3286 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An attorney has a lien for his or her compensation, whether
specially agreed upon or implied, as hereinafter provided:
(((1))) (a) Upon the papers of ((his)) the client, which have come
into ((his)) the attorney's possession in the course of his or her
professional employment;
(((2))) (b) Upon money in ((his)) the attorney's hands belonging to
((his)) the client;
(((3))) (c) Upon money in the hands of the adverse party in an
action or proceeding, in which the attorney was employed, from the time
of giving notice of the lien to that party;
(((4))) (d) Upon an action, including one pursued by arbitration or
mediation, and its proceeds after the commencement thereof to the
extent of the value of any services performed by the attorney in the
action, or if the services were rendered under a special agreement, for
the sum due under such agreement; and
(e) Upon a judgment to the extent of the value of any services
performed by ((him)) the attorney in the action, or if the services
were rendered under a special agreement, for the sum due under such
agreement, from the time of filing notice of such lien or claim with
the clerk of the court in which such judgment is entered, which notice
must be filed with the papers in the action in which such judgment was
rendered, and an entry made in the execution docket, showing name of
claimant, amount claimed and date of filing notice.
(2) Attorneys have the same right and power over actions to enforce
their liens under subsection (1)(d) of this section and over judgments
to enforce their liens under subsection (1)(e) of this section as their
clients have for the amount due thereon to them.
(3) The lien created by subsection (1)(d) of this section upon an
action and proceeds and the lien created by subsection (1)(e) of this
section upon a judgment for money is superior to all other liens.
(4) The lien created by subsection (1)(d) of this section is not
affected by settlement between the parties to the action until the lien
of the attorney for fees based thereon is satisfied in full.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "proceeds" means any monetary
sum received in the action. Once proceeds come into the possession of
a client, such as through payment by an opposing party or another
person or by distribution from the attorney's trust account or registry
of the court, the term "proceeds" is limited to identifiable cash
proceeds determined in accordance with RCW 62A.9A-315(b)(2). The
attorney's lien continues in such identifiable cash proceeds, subject
to the rights of a secured party under RCW 62A.9A-327 or a transferee
under RCW 62A.9A-332.
(6) Child support liens are exempt from this section.

--- END ---