BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Hospitals shall post copies of a notice advising of the
whistleblower protections afforded in RCW 43.70.075 for reporting
concerns about improper quality of care provided by health care
professionals, in conspicuous places on its premises where notices to
affected employees are usually posted. The form of the notice shall be
approved by the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.160 and 2001 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon a finding, after hearing, that a license holder or applicant
has committed unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with
reasonable skill and safety due to a physical or mental condition, the
disciplining authority may consider the imposition of sanctions, taking
into account the arguments of the proceeding participants, including
other charges or sanctions, and issue an order providing for one or any
combination of the following:
(1) Revocation of the license;
(2) Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;
(3) Restriction or limitation of the practice;
(4) Requiring the satisfactory completion of a specific program of
remedial education or treatment;
(5) The monitoring of the practice by a supervisor approved by the
disciplining authority;
(6) Censure or reprimand;
(7) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period
of time;
(8) Payment of a fine for each violation of this chapter, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per violation. Funds received shall be
placed in the health professions account;
(9) Denial of the license request;
(10) Corrective action;
(11) Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer;
(12) A surrender of the practitioner's license in lieu of other
sanctions, which must be reported to the federal data bank.
Any of the actions under this section may be totally or partly
stayed by the disciplining authority. In determining what action is
appropriate, the disciplining authority must first consider what
sanctions are necessary to protect or compensate the public. Only
after such provisions have been made may the disciplining authority
consider and include in the order requirements designed to rehabilitate
the license holder or applicant. All costs associated with compliance
with orders issued under this section are the obligation of the license
holder or applicant.
The licensee or applicant may enter into a stipulated disposition
of charges that includes one or more of the sanctions of this section,
but only after a statement of charges has been issued and the licensee
has been afforded the opportunity for a hearing and has elected on the
record to forego such a hearing. The stipulation shall either contain
one or more specific findings of unprofessional conduct or inability to
practice, or a statement by the licensee acknowledging that evidence is
sufficient to justify one or more specified findings of unprofessional
conduct or inability to practice. The stipulation entered into
pursuant to this subsection shall be considered formal disciplinary
action for all purposes.

--- END ---