BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recent state and
federal case law requires clarification of state statutes with regard
to competency evaluations and involuntary medication ordered in the
context of competency restoration.
The legislature finds that the court in Born v. Thompson, 117 Wn.
App. 57 (2003) interpreted the term "nonfatal injuries" in a manner
that conflicts with the stated intent of the legislature to: "(1)
Clarify that it is the nature of a person's current conduct, current
mental condition, history, and likelihood of committing future acts
that pose a threat to public safety or himself or herself, rather than
simple categorization of offenses, that should determine treatment
procedures and level; ... and (3) provide additional opportunities for
mental health treatment for persons whose conduct threatens himself or
herself or threatens public safety and has led to contact with the
criminal justice system" as stated in section 1, chapter 297, Laws of
1998. Consequently, the legislature intends to clarify that it
intended "nonfatal injuries" to be interpreted in a manner consistent
with the purposes of the competency restoration statutes.
The legislature also finds that the decision in Sell v. United
States, ___U.S. ____ (2003), requires a determination whether a
particular criminal offense is "serious" in the context of competency
restoration and the state's duty to protect the public. The
legislature further finds that, in order to adequately protect the
public and in order to provide additional opportunities for mental
health treatment for persons whose conduct threatens themselves or
threatens public safety and has led to contact with the criminal
justice system in the state, the determination of those criminal
offenses that are "serious" offenses must be made consistently
throughout the state. In order to facilitate this consistency, the
legislature intends to determine those offenses that are serious in
every case as well as the standards by which other offenses may be
determined to be serious. The legislature also intends to clarify that
a court may, to the extent permitted by federal law and required by the
Sell decision, inquire into the civil commitment status of a defendant
and may be told, if known.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.77.010 and 2000 c 94 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Admission" means acceptance based on medical necessity, of a
person as a patient.
(2) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less-restrictive setting.
(3) "Conditional release" means modification of a court-ordered
commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.
(4) "County designated mental health professional" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.
(5) A "criminally insane" person means any person who has been
acquitted of a crime charged by reason of insanity, and thereupon found
to be a substantial danger to other persons or to present a substantial
likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or
security unless kept under further control by the court or other
persons or institutions.
(6) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(7) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person, under the provisions of this chapter, pending evaluation.
(8) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who
has specialized training and three years of experience in directly
treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is
a psychiatrist or psychologist, or a social worker, and such other
developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules
adopted by the secretary.
(9) "Developmental disability" means the condition as defined in
RCW 71A.10.020(3).
(10) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical
authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be
amended by court order.
(11) "Furlough" means an authorized leave of absence for a resident
of a state institution operated by the department designated for the
custody, care, and treatment of the criminally insane, consistent with
an order of conditional release from the court under this chapter,
without any requirement that the resident be accompanied by, or be in
the custody of, any law enforcement or institutional staff, while on
such unescorted leave.
(12) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by
program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life
skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall
be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the individual being assisted as manifested by prior
charged criminal conduct.
(13) "History of one or more violent acts" means violent acts
committed during: (a) The ten-year period of time prior to the filing
of criminal charges; plus (b) the amount of time equal to time spent
during the ten-year period in a mental health facility or in
confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.
(14) "Incompetency" means a person lacks the capacity to understand
the nature of the proceedings against him or her or to assist in his or
her own defense as a result of mental disease or defect.
(15) "Indigent" means any person who is financially unable to
obtain counsel or other necessary expert or professional services
without causing substantial hardship to the person or his or her
family.
(16) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a
team, for an individual with developmental disabilities, which shall
state:
(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged
criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;
(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes
of habilitation;
(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation
program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;
(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve
those intermediate and long-range goals;
(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;
(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due
consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to
less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual release, and
a projected possible date for release; and
(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person
and possible future types of residences.
(17) "Professional person" means:
(a) A psychiatrist licensed as a physician and surgeon in this
state who has, in addition, completed three years of graduate training
in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association
or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to
be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology or the
American osteopathic board of neurology and psychiatry;
(b) A psychologist licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter
18.83 RCW; or
(c) A social worker with a master's or further advanced degree from
an accredited school of social work or a degree deemed equivalent under
rules adopted by the secretary.
(18) "Release" means legal termination of the court-ordered
commitment under the provisions of this chapter.
(19) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services or his or her designee.
(20) "Treatment" means any currently standardized medical or mental
health procedure including medication.
(21) "Violent act" means behavior that: (a)(i) Resulted in; (ii)
if completed as intended would have resulted in; or (iii) was
threatened to be carried out by a person who had the intent and
opportunity to carry out the threat and would have resulted in,
homicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to property; or (b)
recklessly creates an immediate risk of serious physical injury to
another person. As used in this subsection, "nonfatal injuries" means
physical pain or injury, illness, or an impairment of physical
condition. "Nonfatal injuries" shall be construed to be consistent
with the definition of "bodily injury," as defined in RCW 9A.04.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of determining whether a court may authorize
involuntary medication for the purpose of competency restoration
pursuant to RCW 10.77.090, a pending charge involving any one or more
of the following crimes is a serious offense per se in the context of
competency restoration:
(a) Any violent offense, sex offense, serious traffic offense, and
most serious offense, as those terms are defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Any offense, except nonfelony counterfeiting offenses, included
in crimes against persons in RCW 9.94A.411;
(c) Any offense contained in chapter 9.41 RCW (firearms and
dangerous weapons);
(d) Any offense listed as domestic violence in RCW 10.99.020;
(e) Any offense listed as a harassment offense in chapter 9A.46
RCW;
(f) Any violation of chapter 69.50 RCW that is a class B felony; or
(g) Any city or county ordinance or statute that is equivalent to
an offense referenced in this subsection.
(2)(a) In a particular case, a court may determine that a pending
charge not otherwise defined as serious by state or federal law or by
a city or county ordinance is, nevertheless, a serious offense within
the context of competency restoration treatment when the conduct in the
charged offense falls within the standards established in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) To determine that the particular case is a serious offense
within the context of competency restoration, the court must consider
the following factors and determine that one or more of the following
factors creates a situation in which the offense is serious:
(i) The charge includes an allegation that the defendant actually
inflicted bodily or emotional harm on another person or that the
defendant created a reasonable apprehension of bodily or emotional harm
to another;
(ii) The extent of the impact of the alleged offense on the basic
human need for security of the citizens within the jurisdiction;
(iii) The number and nature of related charges pending against the
defendant;
(iv) The length of potential confinement if the defendant is
convicted; and
(v) The number of potential and actual victims or persons impacted
by the defendant's alleged acts.
(3)(a) Any city or county may, by ordinance, determine that
nonfelony offenses not otherwise defined as serious by state or federal
law are nonetheless "serious offenses" within the context of competency
restoration treatment when the offense falls within the standards
established in (b) of this subsection.
(b) The city or county must consider the following factors and
determine that one or more of the following factors creates a situation
in which the offense is serious:
(i) The offense includes an element that the defendant actually
inflicted bodily or emotional harm on another person or that the
defendant created a reasonable apprehension of bodily or emotional harm
to another person;
(ii) The extent of the impact of the offense on the basic human
need for security of the citizens within the jurisdiction;
(iii) The length of potential confinement applicable to the
offense; and
(iv) The number of potential and actual victims or persons impacted
by the defendant's alleged acts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
When the court must make a determination whether to order
involuntary medications for the purpose of competency restoration or
for maintenance of competency, the court shall inquire, and shall be
told, and to the extent that the prosecutor or defense attorney is
aware, whether the defendant is the subject of a pending civil
commitment proceeding or has been ordered into involuntary treatment
pursuant to a civil commitment proceeding.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.05.390 and 2000 c 94 s 9, 2000 c 75 s 6, and 2000
c 74 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in this section, the fact of admission and all
information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course
of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services at public or private agencies shall be confidential.
Information and records may be disclosed only:
(1) In communications between qualified professional persons to
meet the requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services or
appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings.
The consent of the patient, or his or her guardian, shall be obtained
before information or records may be disclosed by a professional person
employed by a facility unless provided to a professional person: (a)
Employed by the facility; (b) who has medical responsibility for the
patient's care; (c) who is a county designated mental health
professional; (d) who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(e) who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where the
person is confined; or (f) who is providing evaluation, treatment, or
follow-up services under chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient
and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the
disclosure is made by a facility providing outpatient services to the
operator of a care facility in which the patient resides.
(3) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian,
designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or
if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such
designation.
(4) To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or for
a claim to be made on behalf of a recipient for aid, insurance, or
medical assistance to which he or she may be entitled.
(5) For either program evaluation or research, or both: PROVIDED,
That the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the evaluation or
research, or both. Such rules shall include, but need not be limited
to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers must sign an
oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any
information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research
regarding persons who have received services such that the person who
received such services is identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(6)(a) To the courts as necessary to the administration of this
chapter or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter
10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any
evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order
entered under this chapter.
(b) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter
10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for
the purpose of competency restoration.
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(7) To law enforcement officers, public health officers, or
personnel of the department of corrections or the indeterminate
sentence review board for persons who are the subject of the records
and who are committed to the custody of the department of corrections
or indeterminate sentence review board which information or records are
necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office. Except
for dissemination of information released pursuant to RCW 71.05.425 and
4.24.550, regarding persons committed under this chapter under RCW
71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(2)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the extent of information that may be
released is limited as follows:
(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, the
fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address shall
be disclosed upon request; and
(b) The law enforcement and public health officers or personnel of
the department of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board
shall be obligated to keep such information confidential in accordance
with this chapter; and
(c) Additional information shall be disclosed only after giving
notice to said person and his or her counsel and upon a showing of
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that such information is
necessary and that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality
are and will be maintained. However, in the event the said person has
escaped from custody, said notice prior to disclosure is not necessary
and that the facility from which the person escaped shall include an
evaluation as to whether the person is of danger to persons or property
and has a propensity toward violence.
(8) To the attorney of the detained person.
(9) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2) and
71.05.340(1)(b) and 71.05.335. The prosecutor shall be provided access
to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis,
medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue
of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in
the best interest of the committed person or others. Information shall
be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the
person's counsel.
(10) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when
the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency,
whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have
been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a
representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure shall be made
by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or
his or her designee and shall include the dates of commitment,
admission, discharge, or release, authorized or unauthorized absence
from the agency's facility, and only such other information that is
pertinent to the threat or harassment. The decision to disclose or not
shall not result in civil liability for the agency or its employees so
long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross
negligence.
(11) To appropriate law enforcement agencies, upon request, all
necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent
situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public.
The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for
the mental health service provider or its employees so long as the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.
(12) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes
described in that section.
(13) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information
about a particular person who is committed to the department under RCW
71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(2)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.
(14) To a patient's next of kin, guardian, or conservator, if any,
in the event of death, as provided in RCW 71.05.400.
(15) To the department of health for the purposes of determining
compliance with state or federal licensure, certification, or
registration rules or laws. However, the information and records
obtained under this subsection are exempt from public inspection and
copying pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW.
The fact of admission, as well as all records, files, evidence,
findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained pursuant
to this chapter shall not be admissible as evidence in any legal
proceeding outside this chapter without the written consent of the
person who was the subject of the proceeding except in a subsequent
criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3)
or 71.05.320(2)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to chapter
10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial or in a civil commitment
proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW. The records and files
maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter shall be
confidential and available subsequent to such proceedings only to the
person who was the subject of the proceeding or his or her attorney.
In addition, the court may order the subsequent release or use of such
records or files only upon good cause shown if the court finds that
appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and will be
maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department of social and health services
shall study and identify in its budget request to the office of
financial management the need, options, and plans to address the
increasing need for capacity in the forensic units of the state
hospitals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---