BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Before proposing a new rule or amending an existing rule that meets
the definition of a significant legislative rule under RCW 34.05.328,
a state agency shall adopt a finding of necessity demonstrating that
the new or amended rule is necessary to implement a new legislative or
federal directive, or is required to fully implement the intent of an
existing state or federal law. The process includes the following
steps:
(1) The state agency shall identify the legislation or federal law
that enables or directs the agency to adopt or to amend the applicable
rule.
(2) The state agency shall analyze and clearly define how and why
the proposed new or amended rule is required to achieve the intent of
the enabling legislation. The state agency shall propose conclusions
of law stating the authority of the agency to adopt or amend the
applicable rule.
(3) The state agency shall propose findings of fact based upon an
analysis of the best available science or best available information.
The findings must support a conclusion that the new or amended rule
requirements are supported by science or reputable information.
(4) The state agency shall propose findings of fact that
demonstrate that the proposed new or amended rule is the least
burdensome and most cost-effective alternative to effectuate the
enabling legislation or federal law. The agency shall provide a cost-benefit analysis report.
(5) The state agency shall file a notice of intent to adopt a
finding of necessity with the code reviser for publication in the state
register, establish a public comment period of thirty to sixty days
after publication, and conduct at least four public hearings around the
state, equally divided as to east and west, to take public testimony
regarding the proposed conclusions of law, findings of fact, the agency
director's proposed agency action, and the adoption of the finding of
necessity.
(6) Adoption of a finding of necessity and supporting conclusions
of law and findings of fact are required before filing the notice of
intent to adopt or amend a rule with the office of the code reviser
under RCW 34.05.320.
(7) The action of adopting a finding of necessity may be appealed
to the superior court of Thurston county or of the county of residence
of the appellant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Agencies shall file proposed findings of necessity under section 1
of this act by June 1st of each year. The final findings of necessity
must be filed by September 15th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
A finding by a superior court that the state agency failed to
comply with the process for adoption of a finding of necessity under
section 1 of this act renders a finding of necessity and a significant
legislative rule adopted under it null and void.

--- END ---