BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.97.040 and 1979 ex.s. c 36 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
No criminal justice agency shall disseminate criminal history
record information pertaining to an arrest, detention, indictment,
information, or other formal criminal charge made after December 31,
1977, unless the record disseminated states the disposition of such
charge to the extent dispositions have been made at the time of the
request for the information: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if a disposition
occurring within ten days immediately preceding the dissemination has
not been reported to the agency disseminating the criminal history
record information, or if information has been received by the agency
within the seventy-two hours immediately preceding the dissemination,
that information shall not be required to be included in the
dissemination: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if in the course of an
investigation it becomes apparent that the suspect is a physician
licensed by this state, the criminal justice agency conducting the
investigation shall provide the department of health with criminal
history record information of the physician pertaining to an arrest,
detention, indictment, information, or other formal criminal charge
related to a violation of chapter 9A.32, 9A.44, 9A.60, or 69.50 RCW:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That when another criminal justice agency requests
criminal history record information, the disseminating agency may
disseminate specific facts and incidents which are within its direct
knowledge without furnishing disposition data as otherwise required by
this section, unless the disseminating agency has received such
disposition data from either: (1) the state patrol, or (2) the court
or other criminal justice agency required to furnish disposition data
pursuant to RCW 10.97.045.
No criminal justice agency shall disseminate criminal history
record information which shall include information concerning a felony
or gross misdemeanor without first making inquiry of the identification
section of the Washington state patrol for the purpose of obtaining the
most current and complete information available, unless one or more of
the following circumstances exists:
(1) The information to be disseminated is needed for a purpose in
the administration of criminal justice for which time is of the essence
and the identification section is technically or physically incapable
of responding within the required time;
(2) The full information requested and to be disseminated relates
to specific facts or incidents which are within the direct knowledge of
the agency which disseminates the information;
(3) The full information requested and to be disseminated is
contained in a criminal history record information summary received
from the identification section by the agency which is to make the
dissemination not more than thirty days preceding the dissemination to
be made;
(4) The statute, executive order, court rule, or court order
pursuant to which the information is to be disseminated refers solely
to information in the files of the agency which makes the
dissemination;
(5) The information requested and to be disseminated is for the
express purpose of research, evaluative, or statistical activities to
be based upon information maintained in the files of the agency or
agencies from which the information is directly sought; or
(6) A person who is the subject of the record requests the
information and the agency complies with the requirements in RCW
10.97.080 as now or hereafter amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.97 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 10.97.040, criminal justice agencies shall,
within thirty days of the action, provide criminal history record
information of physicians pertaining to an arrest, detention,
indictment, information, or other formal criminal charge, to the
department of health related to violations of chapters 9A.32, 9A.44,
9A.60, and 69.50 RCW.

--- END ---