BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.510 and 2000 c 247 s 1001 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested
member who has not completed at least ten years of service dies, the
amount of the accumulated contributions standing to such member's
credit in the retirement system at the time of such member's death,
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW
41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If
there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time
of the member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing
to such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such
spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no
such surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.
(2) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or
eligible child or children shall elect to receive either:
(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.26.430, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and
actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred percent
survivor option under RCW 41.26.460 and if the member was not eligible
for normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as
described in RCW 41.26.430; if a surviving spouse who is receiving a
retirement allowance dies leaving a child or children of the member
under the age of majority, then such child or children shall continue
to receive an allowance in an amount equal to that which was being
received by the surviving spouse, share and share alike, until such
child or children reach the age of majority; if there is no surviving
spouse eligible to receive an allowance at the time of the member's
death, such member's child or children under the age of majority shall
receive an allowance share and share alike calculated as herein
provided making the assumption that the ages of the spouse and member
were equal at the time of the member's death; or
(b)(i) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670; or
(ii) If the member dies on or after July 25, 1993, one hundred
fifty percent of the member's accumulated contributions, less any
amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670. Any
accumulated contributions attributable to restorations made under RCW
41.50.165(2) shall be refunded at one hundred percent.
(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies after October 1, 1977, and
is not survived by a spouse or an eligible child, then the accumulated
contributions standing to the member's credit, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid:
(a) To an estate, a person or persons, trust, or organization as
the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed
and filed with the department; or
(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(4) The retirement allowance of a member who is killed in the
course of employment, as determined by the director of the department
of labor and industries, is not subject to an actuarial reduction. The
member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.26.420.

--- END ---