BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall identify factors to be considered in
selecting the appropriate remedy to apply to a nursing home that has
not complied with the licensing requirements under this chapter or
chapter 74.42 RCW. In identifying the factors to be used in selecting
an appropriate remedy, the department shall use a scope and severity
method and assign the cited deficiencies to the appropriate category
based on the scope and severity of a deficiency.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Scope of a deficiency" means the frequency, incidence, or
extent of the occurrence of the deficiency.
(ii) "Severity of a deficiency" means the seriousness of the
deficiency and may include consideration of actual or potential harm to
the resident and the impact of the actual or potential harm on the
resident.
(c) The scope and severity factors identified by the department
shall not exceed the federal factors for determining scope and severity
of deficiencies cited under 1919(h) and 1819(h) of the federal social
security act and 42 C.F.R. 488.404, as existing on January 1, 2004.
(2) Based on the determination of the scope and severity of the
deficiency citation, the department shall apply penalties to the
nursing home, as specified in RCW 18.51.060. The remedies applied by
the department shall not exceed the federal requirements for selecting
remedies under 1919(h) and 1819(h) of the federal social security act
and 42 C.F.R. 488.408, as existing on January 1, 2004, except that the
department may use stop placement of new admissions as a remedy.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.42.310 and 1980 c 184 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A facility shall have sufficient personnel to supervise the
residents, direct self-help dining skills, and to insure that each
resident receives enough food.
(2) Nursing homes may implement a paid feeding assistant program to
the full degree permitted by federal regulation, 42 C.F.R. 483, as it
exists on the effective date of this act, and the department shall
approve training requirements for feeding assistants consistent with
what is required under federal regulation. Training for feeding
assistants shall not exceed eight hours, and the department shall
approve training curricula and programs designed by associations
representing nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW. Feeding
assistants shall work under the supervision of licensed nurses, with
their competency to be determined by those nurses without testing.
(3) A facility shall provide table service for all residents,
including residents in wheelchairs, who are capable and willing to eat
at tables.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---