BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that a
professionally managed and regulated trapping program is consistent
with the state's obligations to manage all natural resources in trust
for the common good of all citizens.
(2) The legislature further finds that it is in the interest of all
of the citizens of Washington to ensure that all trapping is done in
accordance with sound scientific wildlife management principles using
humane methods as set forth in this act. It is the legislature's
intent that the state trapping program be administered using sound
science by the department of fish and wildlife, and that the primary
emphasis of this program addresses animal problems as defined in RCW
77.08.010.
(3) The legislature further finds that the current furbearer
management program, utilizing only nonlethal trapping techniques, is
not an effective method of regulating predator and aquatic mammal
species. It is the intent of the legislature to amend the current
furbearer management program.
(4) The legislature further finds that humane, regulated trapping
practices used to control animals contribute positively to the well-being of the state of Washington, to public health and welfare by
assisting to control the spread of animal-borne disease, and to the
protection of private and public property from damage resulting from
uncontrolled animal populations.
(5) The legislature further finds that the sale, trade, or barter
of wild animal pelts is consistent with the legislature's intent not to
waste a valuable wildlife resource.
(6) It is the policy of the state of Washington to minimize the use
of indiscriminate or painful traps and to use all traps humanely. When
lethal trapping methods are used, such methods must be used in the most
humane way that accomplishes the goal of reducing animal problems. All
persons trapping wild animals and wild birds in the state shall use all
practicable means necessary to avoid the capture of a nontargeted
animal.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.08.010 and 2003 c 387 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title or rules adopted under this title, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.
(2) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.
(3) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.
(4) "Person" means and includes an individual; a corporation; a
public or private entity or organization; a local, state, or federal
agency; all business organizations, including corporations and
partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals acting with a
common purpose whether acting in an individual, representative, or
official capacity.
(5) "Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed and
commissioned by the director, with authority to enforce this title and
rules adopted pursuant to this title, and other statutes as prescribed
by the legislature. Fish and wildlife officer includes a person
commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a wildlife agent or a fisheries
patrol officer.
(6) "Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned
officer of a municipal, county, state, or federal agency having as its
primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general, while the
officer is in the appropriate jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish
and wildlife officer" includes special agents of the national marine
fisheries service, state parks commissioned officers, United States
fish and wildlife special agents, department of natural resources
enforcement officers, and United States forest service officers, while
the agents and officers are within their respective jurisdictions.
(7) "To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure,
capture, or harass a wild animal or wild bird.
(8) "To trap" and its derivatives means a method of hunting using
devices to capture wild animals or wild birds.
(9) "To fish," "to harvest," and "to take," and their derivatives
means an effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch a fish or shellfish.
(10) "Open season" means those times, manners of taking, and places
or waters established by rule of the commission for the lawful hunting,
fishing, taking, or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish,
food fish, or shellfish that conform to the special restrictions or
physical descriptions established by rule of the commission or that
have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest, or
possess by rule of the commission. "Open season" includes the first
and last days of the established time.
(11) "Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and places
or waters other than those established by rule of the commission as an
open season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or
shellfish that do not conform to the special restrictions or physical
descriptions established by rule of the commission as an open season or
that have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest,
or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.
(12) "Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some or all
species of wild animals or wild birds is prohibited.
(13) "Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or
other body of water, where fishing or harvesting is prohibited.
(14) "Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild
animals and wild birds is prohibited.
(15) "Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game
birds, or game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by
a person, as specified by rule of the commission for a particular
period of time, or as to size, sex, or species.
(16) "Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but is not
limited to mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and
invertebrates. The term "wildlife" does not include feral domestic
mammals, old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order
Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish, and marine invertebrates classified
as food fish or shellfish by the director. The term "wildlife"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of wildlife
members.
(17) "Wild animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state ((and the species Rana
catesbeiana (bullfrog))). The term "wild animal" does not include
feral domestic mammals or old world rats and mice of the family Muridae
of the order Rodentia.
(18) "Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state.
(19) "Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the
commission that shall not be hunted or fished.
(20) "Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the
commission as seriously threatened with extinction.
(21) "Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted
except as authorized by the commission.
(22) "Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall not be
trapped except as authorized by the commission.
(23) "Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except
as authorized by the commission.
(24) "Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted
throughout the year as authorized by the commission.
(25) "Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the animal
kingdom not native to Washington and designated as dangerous to the
environment or wildlife of the state.
(26) "Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held or raised
for commercial purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not
include publicly owned facilities.
(27) "Person of disability" means a permanently disabled person who
is not ambulatory without the assistance of a wheelchair, crutches, or
similar devices.
(28) "Fish" includes all species classified as game fish or food
fish by statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently
classified as food fish or game fish if such species exist in state
waters. The term "fish" includes all stages of development and the
bodily parts of fish species.
(29) "Raffle" means an activity in which tickets bearing an
individual number are sold for not more than twenty-five dollars each
and in which a permit or permits are awarded to hunt or for access to
hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the basis of a drawing from
the tickets by the person or persons conducting the raffle.
(30) "Youth" means a person fifteen years old for fishing and under
sixteen years old for hunting.
(31) "Senior" means a person seventy years old or older.
(32) "License year" means the period of time for which a
recreational license is valid. The license year begins April 1st, and
ends March 31st.
(33) "Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of river mouths.
(34) "Freshwater" means all waters not defined as saltwater
including, but not limited to, rivers upstream of the river mouth,
lakes, ponds, and reservoirs.
(35) "State waters" means all marine waters and fresh waters within
ordinary high water lines and within the territorial boundaries of the
state.
(36) "Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific Ocean
outside the territorial boundaries of the state, including the marine
waters of other states and countries.
(37) "Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those waters
of the Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state
boundary.
(38) "Resident" means a person who has maintained a permanent place
of abode within the state for at least ninety days immediately
preceding an application for a license, has established by formal
evidence an intent to continue residing within the state, and who is
not licensed to hunt or fish as a resident in another state.
(39) "Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the
qualifications of a resident.
(40) "Shellfish" means those species of marine and freshwater
invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not be taken
except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term "shellfish"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of shellfish
species.
(41) "Commercial" means related to or connected with buying,
selling, or bartering.
(42) "To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or preserving
fish, wildlife, or shellfish.
(43) "Personal use" means for the private use of the individual
taking the fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.
(44) "Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable
of being held in hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line
operated without rod or reel.
(45) "Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species
of fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical
area.
(46) "Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a license
limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.
(47) "Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are
dependent upon the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in
either an attached or free floating form, and includes but is not
limited to marine aquatic plants in the classes Chlorophyta,
Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.
(48) "Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or
engaging in sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or
deleterious exotic wildlife.
(49) "Invasive species" means a plant species or a nonnative animal
species that either:
(a) Causes or may cause displacement of, or otherwise threatens,
native species in their natural communities;
(b) Threatens or may threaten natural resources or their use in the
state;
(c) Causes or may cause economic damage to commercial or
recreational activities that are dependent upon state waters; or
(d) Threatens or harms human health.
(50) "Prohibited aquatic animal species" means an invasive species
of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a prohibited aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(51) "Regulated aquatic animal species" means a potentially
invasive species of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a
regulated aquatic animal species by the commission.
(52) "Unregulated aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has been classified as an unregulated aquatic animal
species by the commission.
(53) "Unlisted aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has not been classified as a prohibited aquatic animal
species, a regulated aquatic animal species, or an unregulated aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(54) "Aquatic plant species" means an emergent, submersed,
partially submersed, free-floating, or floating-leaving plant species
that grows in or near a body of water or wetland.
(55) "Retail-eligible species" means commercially harvested salmon,
crab, and sturgeon.
(56) "Body-gripping trap" means a trap that grips the body or a
body part of a wild animal or wild bird, including, but not limited to,
foothold trap, neck or body snare, or foot snare, but does not include
nets.
(57) "Animal problem" means damage, injury, or reasonable threat of
damage or injury, caused by wild animals or wild birds to public or
private property or resources, livestock or other domestic animals, or
human health or safety.
(58) "Trapping permit" means a permit issued by the director or
designee for the following purposes: (a) To capture wild animals with
a nonbody-gripping trap for the purpose of meeting a wildlife
management objective; (b) to use body-gripping or nonbody-gripping
traps to prevent damage or injury, or a threat of damage or injury to:
(i) Public or private property or resources; (ii) livestock or other
domestic animals; (iii) agricultural, timber, or horticultural
resources; or (c) to use body-gripping or nonbody-gripping traps to
protect human health or safety.
(59) "Nuisance wildlife control operator" means a person licensed
by the department to trap nuisance or problem wildlife on the property
of another for a fee or other consideration.
(60) "Nuisance wildlife species" means those species, which, if
causing an animal problem, may be trapped without a license or a
trapping permit, and is limited to the following animals: Columbian
ground squirrels, Eastern grey squirrels, gophers, mice, moles,
mountain beaver, opossum, and rats. Nuisance wildlife species does not
include species listed as threatened and endangered by the state.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.194 and 2001 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) It is unlawful to ((use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed
leghold trap, neck snare, or other)) trap wild animals or wild birds,
other than nuisance wildlife species, using body-gripping traps ((to
capture any mammal for recreation or commerce in fur)) except by
nuisance wildlife control operators and trappers licensed by the
department under RCW 77.65.450 when operating under a trapping permit
issued by the department, by persons operating under a scientific
collector permit, by persons operating under a falconry permit, or by
landowners and their agents under the provisions of RCW 77.36.030.
(2) It is unlawful to knowingly buy, sell, barter, or otherwise
exchange, or offer to buy, sell, barter, or otherwise exchange ((the
raw fur of a mammal or a mammal that has been trapped in this state
with a steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap,
whether or not pursuant to permit.
(3) It is unlawful to use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed
leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap to capture any animal,
except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of a Conibear trap in
water, a padded leghold trap, or a nonstrangling type foot snare with
a special permit granted by [the] director under (a) through (d) of
this subsection. Issuance of the special permits shall be governed by
rules adopted by the department and in accordance with the requirements
of this section. Every person granted a special permit to use a trap
or device listed in this subsection shall check the trap or device at
least every twenty-four hours.
(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the director, in consultation
with the department of social and health services or the United States
department of health and human services from granting a permit to use
traps listed in this subsection for the purpose of protecting people
from threats to their health and safety.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to use traps listed in this subsection to a person who
applies for such a permit in writing, and who establishes that there
exists on a property an animal problem that has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by the use of nonlethal control tools, including but
not limited to guard animals, electric fencing, or box and cage traps,
or if such nonlethal means cannot be reasonably applied. Upon making
a finding in writing that the animal problem has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by nonlethal control tools or if the tools cannot be
reasonably applied, the director may authorize the use, setting,
placing, or maintenance of the traps for a period not to exceed thirty
days.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to department employees or agents to use traps listed in
this subsection where the use of the traps is the only practical means
of protecting threatened or endangered species as designated under RCW
77.08.010.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from issuing a
permit to use traps listed in this subsection, excluding Conibear
traps, for the conduct of legitimate wildlife research.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the United States fish and
wildlife service, its employees or agents, from using a trap listed in
subsection (4) of this section where the fish and wildlife service
determines, in consultation with the director, that the use of such
traps is necessary to protect species listed as threatened or
endangered under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
1531 et seq.))) a wild animal or any part thereof, including the pelt,
taken in violation of subsection (1) of this section. To prevent
wastage, nothing in this section prohibits the sale, barter, or trade
of a wild animal part taken under a trapping permit, or the donation of
a lawfully taken wild animal or wild animal parts for scientific
research or public health training. It is unlawful to sell, offer to
sell, barter, or trade a trapped wild animal or wild animal part, other
than nuisance wildlife species, not taken under a trapping permit.
(3) A violation of subsections (1) and (2) of this section
involving the use of unlawful body-gripping traps or the unlawful sale
of wild animals or wild animal parts is a gross misdemeanor.
(4) Federal wildlife agencies and their employees and agents, while
acting lawfully within the scope of their authority, are not subject to
the provisions of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.15.194 and 2003 c 53 s 374 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful to ((use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed
leghold trap, neck snare, or other)) trap wild animals or wild birds,
other than nuisance wildlife species, using body-gripping traps ((to
capture any mammal for recreation or commerce in fur)) except by
nuisance wildlife control operators and trappers licensed by the
department under RCW 77.65.450 when operating under a trapping permit
issued by the department, by persons operating under a scientific
collector permit, by persons operating under a falconry permit, or by
landowners and their agents under the provisions of RCW 77.36.030.
(2) It is unlawful to knowingly buy, sell, barter, or otherwise
exchange, or offer to buy, sell, barter, or otherwise exchange ((the
raw fur of a mammal or a mammal that has been trapped in this state
with a steel-jawed leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap,
whether or not pursuant to permit.
(3) It is unlawful to use or authorize the use of any steel-jawed
leghold trap or any other body-gripping trap to capture any animal,
except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits the use of a Conibear trap in
water, a padded leghold trap, or a nonstrangling type foot snare with
a special permit granted by the director under (a) through (d) of this
subsection. Issuance of the special permits shall be governed by rules
adopted by the department and in accordance with the requirements of
this section. Every person granted a special permit to use a trap or
device listed in this subsection shall check the trap or device at
least every twenty-four hours.
(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the director, in consultation
with the department of social and health services or the United States
department of health and human services from granting a permit to use
traps listed in this subsection for the purpose of protecting people
from threats to their health and safety.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to use traps listed in this subsection to a person who
applies for such a permit in writing, and who establishes that there
exists on a property an animal problem that has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by the use of nonlethal control tools, including but
not limited to guard animals, electric fencing, or box and cage traps,
or if such nonlethal means cannot be reasonably applied. Upon making
a finding in writing that the animal problem has not been and cannot be
reasonably abated by nonlethal control tools or if the tools cannot be
reasonably applied, the director may authorize the use, setting,
placing, or maintenance of the traps for a period not to exceed thirty
days.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from granting a
special permit to department employees or agents to use traps listed in
this subsection where the use of the traps is the only practical means
of protecting threatened or endangered species as designated under RCW
77.08.010.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the director from issuing a
permit to use traps listed in this subsection, excluding Conibear
traps, for the conduct of legitimate wildlife research.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the United States fish and
wildlife service, its employees or agents, from using a trap listed in
subsection (4) of this section where the fish and wildlife service
determines, in consultation with the director, that the use of such
traps is necessary to protect species listed as threatened or
endangered under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
1531 et seq.).
(6) A person violating this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor)) a wild animal or any part thereof, including the pelt,
taken in violation of subsection (1) of this section. To prevent
wastage, nothing in this section prohibits the sale, barter, or trade
of a wild animal part taken under a trapping permit, or the donation of
a lawfully taken wild animal or wild animal parts for scientific
research or public health training. It is unlawful to sell, offer to
sell, barter, or trade a trapped wild animal or wild animal part, other
than nuisance wildlife species, not taken under a trapping permit.
(3) A violation of subsections (1) and (2) of this section
involving the use of unlawful body-gripping traps or the unlawful sale
of wild animals or wild animal parts is a gross misdemeanor.
(4) Federal wildlife agencies and their employees and agents, while
acting lawfully within the scope of their authority, are not subject to
the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the duty of every person operating a trap capable of taking
a wild animal or wild bird to ensure that all trapping is done
humanely. To ensure that this goal is met, all trappers must abide by
the following:
(1) It is unlawful to take wild animals and wild birds, other than
raptors, from the wild and hold such live wild animals and wild birds
unless the holding, transporting, or releasing of the wild animals or
wild birds is provided for in a trapping permit, scientific collector
permit, or falconry permit. A violation of this subsection is a
misdemeanor.
(2) All trapped nuisance wildlife species and wild animals and
birds other than nuisance wildlife species, if not permitted to be
released, must be humanely dispatched. Wild animals and wild birds
required to be dispatched must be immediately dispatched, except that
licensed trappers and nuisance wildlife control operators may transport
trapped wildlife species off-site for the purpose of dispatching the
wild animals and birds. It is unlawful for licensed trappers or
nuisance wildlife control operators to transport or hold live wild
animals or wild birds removed from the trapping site except for removal
to the site where they will be immediately dispatched. A violation of
this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(3) Wildlife unintentionally trapped must, if possible, be released
unharmed immediately upon discovery. A violation of this subsection is
a misdemeanor.
(4) No trapping permit issued to alleviate an animal problem allows
for the lethal take of more than one nontargeted animal for each
targeted animal, or allow a total take greater than the number of
permitted animals. It is unlawful for any licensed trapper or nuisance
wildlife control operator operating under a trapping permit who
lethally takes the equivalent of one nontargeted animal for each
targeted animal to fail to immediately cease trapping and report the
incidental take to the department. A violation of this subsection is
a misdemeanor.
(5)(a) It is unlawful for a trapper or nuisance wildlife control
operator to fail to complete and submit to the department an accurate
annual report of catch postmarked on or before January 31st of the year
following the reporting year. The report must be submitted to the
department regardless of trapping success, and indicate the number,
general location, and species of all animals captured, except nuisance
wildlife species, including those animals captured that were not part
of an animal problem. The report must also include details for
domestic pets captured in traps, the circumstances for each specific
incident, and whether the domestic pet was injured or released
unharmed. Trappers and nuisance wildlife control operators who fail to
submit their report of catch shall, in addition to the penalties
provided for in RCW 77.15.280, have their privileges suspended for one
year. It is the responsibility of each trapper and nuisance wildlife
control operator to obtain and submit a report of trapping results on
forms provided by the department.
(b) The department shall maintain and analyze all catch reports
received under (a) of this subsection. Data collected on catch reports
must be presented to the appropriate legislative committees by November
30th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall adopt appropriate rules regarding the types of
traps and bait for use in capturing wild animals and wild birds to
ensure the humane treatment of captured animals. In adopting these
rules, the commission may take into consideration the effectiveness of
various trap sizes, approved best management practices, and the
habitats in which the traps may be used. These rules must address the
time intervals during which specific traps must be checked and animals
removed. These rules may not allow for the use of traps with teeth or
serrated edges or a neck or body snare attached to a spring pole or any
spring pole type device.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.65.450 and 1991 sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A state trapping license ((allows)) or a nuisance wildlife
control operator license is required before the holder ((to)) traps
((fur-bearing)) wild animals ((throughout the state; however, a)) other
than nuisance wildlife species or wild birds other than raptors taken
under a falconry permit, except for trapping done under a scientific
collector's permit.
(2) A state trapping license, alone, allows the holder to trap wild
animals and wild birds, but does not allow sale, trade, or barter of
such animals or animal parts, and does not allow the holder to act as
a nuisance wildlife control operator. The fee for this license is
thirty-six dollars for residents sixteen years of age or older, fifteen
dollars for residents under sixteen years of age, and one hundred
eighty dollars for nonresidents. In order to sell, offer for sale,
trade, or barter trapped wild animals other than nuisance wildlife
species, wild birds, or a body part of a trapped wild animal other than
a nuisance wildlife species or wild bird, a licensed trapper must also
have a trapping permit issued by the department.
(3) A nuisance wildlife control operator license allows the holder
to trap wild animals and wild birds on the property of another for a
fee or other consideration. The fee for this license is two hundred
fifty dollars. In order to sell, offer for sale, trade, or barter
trapped wild animals other than nuisance wildlife species, wild birds,
or a body part of a trapped wild animal other than a nuisance wildlife
species or wild bird, a licensed nuisance wildlife control operator
must also have a trapping permit issued by the department.
(4) Licensed trapper or nuisance wildlife control officer may not
place traps on private property without permission of the owner,
lessee, or tenant where the land is improved and apparently used, or
where the land is fenced or enclosed in a manner designed to exclude
intruders or to indicate a property boundary line, or where notice is
given by posting in a conspicuous manner. ((A state trapping license
is void on April 1st following the date of issuance. The fee for this
license is thirty-six dollars for residents sixteen years of age or
older, fifteen dollars for residents under sixteen years of age, and
one hundred eighty dollars for nonresidents.))

Sec. 8 RCW 77.65.460 and 1987 c 506 s 82 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All persons purchasing a state trapping license or a nuisance
wildlife control operator license ((for the first time)) after January
1, 2005, shall ((present certification of completion of)) complete a
course of instruction in safe, humane, and proper trapping techniques
or pass an examination to establish that the applicant has the
requisite knowledge. Nuisance wildlife control operators and state
licensed trappers who have been active in state-regulated trapping
since November 2000 are exempt from the provisions of this subsection.
(2) The director shall establish a program for training persons in
trapping techniques and responsibilities in urban, suburban, and rural
settings, including the use of trapping devices designed to painlessly
capture or instantly kill. The director shall cooperate with
((national and state animal, humane)) recognized Washington state based
animal shelters, wildlife rehabilitation centers, and similar entities
providing animal care and rehabilitation services, hunter education,
and Washington state based trapping organizations in the development
and instruction of ((a curriculum)) trapping techniques. Upon
successful completion of the course, trainees shall receive a trapper's
training certificate signed by an authorized instructor. This
certificate is evidence of compliance with this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.32.545 and 1998 c 190 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
A property owner, lessee, or tenant may remove a trap placed on the
owner's, lessee's, or tenant's posted or fenced property by a trapper
or nuisance wildlife control operator.
Trappers and nuisance wildlife control operators shall attach to
the chain of their traps or devices a legible metal tag with either the
department identification number of the trapper or nuisance wildlife
control operator or the name and address of the trapper or nuisance
wildlife control operator in English letters not less than one-eighth
inch in height.
When a property owner, lessee, or tenant presents a trapper or
nuisance wildlife control operator identification number to the
department for a trap found upon the property of the owner, lessee, or
tenant and requests identification of the trapper or nuisance wildlife
control operator, the department shall provide the requestor with the
name and address of the trapper or nuisance wildlife control operator.
Prior to disclosure of the trapper's or nuisance wildlife control
operator's name and address, the department shall obtain the name and
address of the requesting individual in writing and after disclosing
the trapper's or nuisance wildlife control operator's name and address
to the requesting individual, the requesting individual's name and
address shall be disclosed in writing to the trapper or nuisance
wildlife control operator whose name and address was disclosed.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.15.198 and 2001 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who violates RCW 77.15.194 or 77.15.196 is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor. In addition to appropriate criminal penalties, the
director shall revoke the trapping or nuisance wildlife control
operator license of any person convicted of a repeat violation of RCW
77.15.194 or 77.15.196. The director shall not issue the violator a
trapping or nuisance wildlife control operator license for a period of
five years following the revocation. ((Following a subsequent
conviction for a violation of RCW 77.15.194 or 77.15.196 by the same
person, the director shall not issue a trapping license to the person
at any time.)) A person may not be granted a new trapping or nuisance
wildlife control operator license following a revocation under this
section unless that person completes the education program outlined in
RCW 77.65.460 not more than one year before a new license is granted.

Sec. 11 RCW 77.15.198 and 2003 c 53 s 376 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to appropriate criminal penalties, the director shall
revoke the trapping or nuisance wildlife control operator license of
any person convicted of a repeat violation of RCW 77.15.194 or
77.15.196. The director shall not issue the violator a trapping or
nuisance wildlife control operator license for a period of five years
following the revocation. ((Following a subsequent conviction for a
violation of RCW 77.15.194 or 77.15.196 by the same person, the
director shall not issue a trapping license to the person at any
time.)) A person may not be granted a new trapping or nuisance
wildlife control operator license following a revocation under this
section unless that person completes the education program outlined in
RCW 77.65.460 not more than one year before a new license is granted.

Sec. 12 RCW 77.36.030 and 1996 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the following limitations and conditions, the owner,
the owner's immediate family member, the owner's documented employee,
or a tenant of real property may trap or kill on that property, without
the licenses or trapping permit required under RCW ((77.32.010))
77.65.450 or authorization from the director under RCW 77.12.240, wild
animals or wild birds that are damaging private property, crops,
livestock, domestic animals, or fowl or are a threat to human health
and safety:
(a) Nuisance wildlife species may be trapped or taken without
restriction;
(b) Wildlife other than nuisance wildlife species may be trapped
with a body-gripping trap only under permit issued by the department;
(c) Threatened or endangered species shall not be hunted, trapped,
or killed;
(((b))) (d) Except in an emergency situation, ((deer, elk,)) big
game and protected wildlife shall not be killed without a permit issued
and conditioned by the ((director or the director's designee))
department. In an emergency, the department may give verbal permission
followed by written permission to trap or kill any ((deer, elk,)) big
game or protected wildlife that is damaging private property, crops,
domestic animals, or fowl; ((and
(c))) (e) On privately owned cattle ranching lands, the land owner
or lessee may declare an emergency only when the department has not
responded within forty-eight hours after having been contacted by the
land owner or lessee regarding damage caused by wild animals or wild
birds. In such an emergency, the owner or lessee may trap or kill any
((deer, elk,)) big game or other protected wildlife that is causing the
damage but ((deer and elk)) big game may only be killed if such lands
were open to public hunting during the previous hunting season, or the
closure to public hunting was coordinated with the department to
protect property and livestock; and
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, any
landowner may kill wild animals or wild birds, except threatened or
endangered species, that are immediately threatening or attacking
domestic animals or livestock on that landowner's property, and any
person may kill wild animals or wild birds that pose an immediate
threat to human health or safety.
(2) Except for coyotes and ((Columbian ground squirrels)) nuisance
wildlife species, wildlife trapped or killed under this section remain
the property of the state, and the person trapping or killing the
wildlife shall notify the department immediately. The department shall
instruct the reporting party how to dispose of wildlife so taken within
three days of receiving such a notification ((and)) in a manner
determined by the director to be in the best interest of the state.

Sec. 13 RCW 77.15.190 and 1999 c 258 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful trapping if the person:
(a) Sets out traps that are capable of taking wild animals((, game
animals, or furbearing mammals)) or wild birds and does not possess all
licenses, tags, or permits required under this title;
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding
seasons, bag or possession limits, closed areas including game
reserves, closed times, or any other rule governing the trapping of
wild animals; or
(c) Fails to identify the owner of the traps or devices by neither
(i) attaching a metal tag with the owner's department-assigned
identification number or the name and address of the trapper legibly
written in numbers or letters not less than one-eighth inch in height
nor (ii) inscribing into the metal of the trap such number or name and
address.
(2) Unlawful trapping is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 RCW 77.15.192 (Definitions) and 2001 c 1 s
2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Sections 3 and 10 of this act expire
July 1, 2004.
(2) Sections 4 and 11 of this act take effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Except for sections 4 and 11 of this act,
this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---