BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in some instances
defendants who have been restored to competency subject to a valid
court order and returned to a local correctional facility to await
trial decompensate to the point of incompetency between the time of
their return to incarceration and their trial date. The legislature
also finds that repeated mental decompensation is detrimental to the
health and welfare of all persons and often causes overall degeneration
in the person's mental condition. The legislature further finds that
the court's authority to order a defendant held at a state hospital or
in an appropriate less restrictive treatment setting to maintain the
defendant's competency to stand trial has been brought into question.
The legislature therefore finds that this combination of circumstances
impairs the state's ability to adequately protect the public because
it: (1) Prevents the state from determining the guilt or innocence of
defendants in a court of law; (2) results in a situation in which
guilty defendants cannot be held accountable for their actions; and (3)
may result in a situation in which persons whose competency was
restored and lost present a larger risk to public safety. The
legislature, therefore, intends to remedy this situation by clarifying
that the court has the authority to order felony defendants held at the
state hospital or in an appropriate less restrictive treatment setting
and establishing standards for a court to make this order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the court has ordered competency restoration for a
defendant, the court may, subject to the provisions of subsection (2)
of this section, order the defendant held at the state hospital or in
an appropriate less restrictive alternative pending trial or during
breaks for longer than forty-eight hours that occur during the trial.
(2) In order to order a defendant held at the state hospital, the
defendant must be charged with a felony offense and the court must find
that:
(a) Continued treatment is medically appropriate and necessary to
maintain the defendant's competency to stand trial;
(b) The defendant is likely to decompensate into incompetency if
held in a correctional facility; and
(c) No setting less restrictive than the one ordered is
appropriate.
(3) In determining whether a less restrictive setting is
appropriate, the court shall consider both whether the setting is
medically appropriate and whether it provides an appropriate level of
security.

--- END ---