BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A kindergarten through grade twelve public or private school
administrator, teacher, or school employee, unless they are a qualified
medical professional, may not recommend to a parent or legal guardian
of a student that the student seek a prescription for a medication that
is prescribed with the intent of affecting or altering the thought
processes, mood, or behavior of the student.
(2) Nothing in this section:
(a) Prohibits a kindergarten through grade twelve public or private
school administrator, teacher, counselor, or nurse from communicating
with a parent or legal guardian of a student concerning the behavior of
the student at school; or
(b) Relieves a school district of the duty to identify, locate, and
evaluate students with disabilities.

--- END ---