BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2003 c 379 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department performs a risk assessment pursuant to RCW
9.94A.500, or to determine a person's conditions of supervision, the
risk assessment shall classify the offender or probationer into one of
at least four risk categories.
(2) The department shall supervise every offender sentenced to a
term of community custody, community placement, or community
supervision and every misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor probationer
ordered to probation under the supervision of the department pursuant
to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210:
(a) Whose risk assessment places that offender or probationer in
one of the two highest risk categories; or
(b) Regardless of the offender's or probationer's risk category if:
(i) The offender's or probationer's current conviction is for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(ii) The offender or probationer has a prior conviction for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) The conditions of the offender's community custody, community
placement, or community supervision or the probationer's supervision
include chemical dependency treatment;
(iv) The offender was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650 or 9.94A.670;
or
(v) The offender is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW
9.94A.745.
(3) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody, community placement,
or community supervision or any probationer unless the offender or
probationer is one for whom supervision is required under subsection
(2) of this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.92.060 and 1996 c 298 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person is convicted of any crime except murder,
burglary in the first degree, arson in the first degree, robbery, rape
of a child, or rape, the superior court may, in its discretion, at the
time of imposing sentence upon such person, direct that such sentence
be stayed and suspended until otherwise ordered by the superior court,
and that the sentenced person be placed under the charge of a community
corrections officer employed by the department of corrections, or if
the county elects to assume responsibility for the supervision of all
superior court misdemeanant probationers a probation officer employed
or contracted for by the county, upon such terms as the superior court
may determine.
(2) As a condition to suspension of sentence, the superior court
shall require the payment of the penalty assessment required by RCW
7.68.035. In addition, the superior court may require the convicted
person to make such monetary payments, on such terms as the superior
court deems appropriate under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a)
To comply with any order of the court for the payment of family
support; (b) to make restitution to any person or persons who may have
suffered loss or damage by reason of the commission of the crime in
question or when the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or
fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the
offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or
offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to
pay any fine imposed and not suspended and the court or other costs
incurred in the prosecution of the case, including reimbursement of the
state for costs of extradition if return to this state by extradition
was required; and (d) to contribute to a county or interlocal drug
fund.
(3) As a condition of the suspended sentence, the superior court
may order the probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or
such officer as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the
probation to follow the instructions of the secretary. If the county
legislative authority has elected to assume responsibility for the
supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers within its
jurisdiction, the superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report
to a probation officer employed or contracted for by the county. In
cases where a superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in
one county, but resides within another county, there must be provisions
for the probationer to report to the agency having supervision
responsibility for the probationer's county of residence.
(4) If restitution to the victim has been ordered under subsection
(2)(b) of this section and the superior court has ordered supervision,
the officer supervising the probationer shall make a reasonable effort
to ascertain whether restitution has been made as ordered. If the
superior court has ordered supervision and restitution has not been
made, the officer shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the
terms of the suspended sentence not less than three months prior to the
termination of the suspended sentence.
(5) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 apply to sentences imposed
under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.95.204 and 1996 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a superior court places a defendant convicted of a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor on probation and orders supervision
under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, the department of corrections has
initial responsibility for supervision of that defendant.
(2) A county legislative authority may assume responsibility for
the supervision of all defendants within its jurisdiction who have been
convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor and sentenced to
probation by a superior court. The assumption of responsibility shall
be made by contract with the department of corrections on a biennial
basis.
(3) If a county assumes supervision responsibility, the county
shall supervise all superior court misdemeanant probationers within
that county for the duration of the biennium, as set forth in the
contract with the department of corrections.
(4) A contract between a county legislative authority and the
department of corrections for the transfer of supervision
responsibility must include, at a minimum, the following provisions:
(a) The county's agreement to supervise all misdemeanant
probationers who are sentenced by a superior court within that county
and who reside within that county;
(b) A reciprocal agreement regarding the supervision of superior
court misdemeanant probationers sentenced in one county but who reside
in another county;
(c) The county's agreement to comply with the minimum standards for
classification and supervision of offenders as required under RCW
9.95.206;
(d) The amount of funds available from the department of
corrections to the county for supervision of superior court
misdemeanant probationers, calculated according to a formula
established by the department of corrections;
(e) A method for the payment of funds by the department of
corrections to the county;
(f) The county's agreement that any funds received by the county
under the contract will be expended only to cover costs of supervision
of superior court misdemeanant probationers;
(g) The county's agreement to account to the department of
corrections for the expenditure of all funds received under the
contract and to submit to audits for compliance with the supervision
standards and financial requirements of this section;
(h) Provisions regarding rights and remedies in the event of a
possible breach of contract or default by either party; and
(i) Provisions allowing for voluntary termination of the contract
by either party, with good cause, after sixty days' written notice.
(5) If the contract between the county and the department of
corrections is terminated for any reason, the department of corrections
shall reassume responsibility for supervision of superior court
misdemeanant probationers within that county. In such an event, the
department of corrections retains any and all rights and remedies
available by law and under the contract.
(6) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, community corrections officers, and volunteers who assist
community corrections officers are not liable for any harm caused by
the actions of a superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under
the supervision of a county. A county, its probation department and
employees, probation officers, and volunteers who assist probation
officers are not liable for any harm caused by the actions of a
superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under the supervision of
the department of corrections. This subsection applies regardless of
whether the supervising entity is in compliance with the standards of
supervision at the time of the misdemeanant probationer's actions.
(7) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, community corrections officers, any county under contract
with the department of corrections pursuant to this section and its
employees, probation officers, and volunteers who assist community
corrections officers and probation officers in the superior court
misdemeanant probation program are not liable for civil damages
resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of superior court
misdemeanant probation activities unless the act or omission
constitutes gross negligence. For purposes of this section,
"volunteers" is defined according to RCW 51.12.035.
(8) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 apply to sentences imposed
under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.95.210 and 1996 c 298 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In granting probation, the superior court may suspend the
imposition or the execution of the sentence and may direct that the
suspension may continue upon such conditions and for such time as it
shall designate, not exceeding the maximum term of sentence or two
years, whichever is longer.
(2) In the order granting probation and as a condition thereof, the
superior court may in its discretion imprison the defendant in the
county jail for a period not exceeding one year and may fine the
defendant any sum not exceeding the statutory limit for the offense
committed, and court costs. As a condition of probation, the superior
court shall require the payment of the penalty assessment required by
RCW 7.68.035. The superior court may also require the defendant to
make such monetary payments, on such terms as it deems appropriate
under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a) To comply with any
order of the court for the payment of family support; (b) to make
restitution to any person or persons who may have suffered loss or
damage by reason of the commission of the crime in question or when the
offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees
with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to
pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not
prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to pay such fine as may be
imposed and court costs, including reimbursement of the state for costs
of extradition if return to this state by extradition was required; (d)
following consideration of the financial condition of the person
subject to possible electronic monitoring, to pay for the costs of
electronic monitoring if that monitoring was required by the court as
a condition of release from custody or as a condition of probation; (e)
to contribute to a county or interlocal drug fund; and (f) to make
restitution to a public agency for the costs of an emergency response
under RCW 38.52.430, and may require bonds for the faithful observance
of any and all conditions imposed in the probation.
(3) The superior court shall order restitution in all cases where
the victim is entitled to benefits under the crime victims'
compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the superior court does not
order restitution and the victim of the crime has been determined to be
entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, the
department of labor and industries, as administrator of the crime
victims' compensation program, may petition the superior court within
one year of imposition of the sentence for entry of a restitution
order. Upon receipt of a petition from the department of labor and
industries, the superior court shall hold a restitution hearing and
shall enter a restitution order.
(4) In granting probation, the superior court may order the
probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or such officer
as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the probation to
follow the instructions of the secretary. If the county legislative
authority has elected to assume responsibility for the supervision of
superior court misdemeanant probationers within its jurisdiction, the
superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report to a probation
officer employed or contracted for by the county. In cases where a
superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one county, but
resides within another county, there must be provisions for the
probationer to report to the agency having supervision responsibility
for the probationer's county of residence.
(5) If the probationer has been ordered to make restitution and the
superior court has ordered supervision, the officer supervising the
probationer shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain whether
restitution has been made. If the superior court has ordered
supervision and restitution has not been made as ordered, the officer
shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the terms of probation
not less than three months prior to the termination of the probation
period. The secretary of corrections will promulgate rules and
regulations for the conduct of the person during the term of probation.
For defendants found guilty in district court, like functions as the
secretary performs in regard to probation may be performed by probation
officers employed for that purpose by the county legislative authority
of the county wherein the court is located.
(6) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 apply to sentences imposed
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---