BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.39A.030 and 2002 c 3 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To the extent of available funding, the department shall expand
cost-effective options for home and community services for consumers
for whom the state participates in the cost of their care.
(2) In expanding home and community services, the department shall:
(a) Take full advantage of federal funding available under Title XVIII
and Title XIX of the federal social security act, including home
health, adult day care, waiver options, and state plan services; and
(b) be authorized to use funds available under its community options
program entry system waiver granted under section 1915(c) of the
federal social security act to expand the availability of in-home,
adult residential care, adult family homes, enhanced adult residential
care, and assisted living services. By June 30, 1997, the department
shall undertake to reduce the nursing home medicaid census by at least
one thousand six hundred by assisting individuals who would otherwise
require nursing facility services to obtain services of their choice,
including assisted living services, enhanced adult residential care,
and other home and community services. If a resident, or his or her
legal representative, objects to a discharge decision initiated by the
department, the resident shall not be discharged if the resident has
been assessed and determined to require nursing facility services. In
contracting with nursing homes and boarding homes for enhanced adult
residential care placements, the department shall not require, by
contract or through other means, structural modifications to existing
building construction.
(3)(a) The department shall by rule establish payment rates for
home and community services that support the provision of cost-effective care. In the event of any conflict between any such rule and
a collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW 74.39A.270 and
74.39A.300, the collective bargaining agreement prevails.
(b) The department may authorize an enhanced adult residential care
rate for nursing homes that temporarily or permanently convert their
bed use for the purpose of providing enhanced adult residential care
under chapter 70.38 RCW, when the department determines that payment of
an enhanced rate is cost-effective and necessary to foster expansion of
contracted enhanced adult residential care services. As an incentive
for nursing homes to permanently convert a portion of its nursing home
bed capacity for the purpose of providing enhanced adult residential
care, the department may authorize a supplemental add-on to the
enhanced adult residential care rate.
(c) The department may authorize a supplemental assisted living
services rate for up to four years for facilities that convert from
nursing home use and do not retain rights to the converted nursing home
beds under chapter 70.38 RCW, if the department determines that payment
of a supplemental rate is cost-effective and necessary to foster
expansion of contracted assisted living services.
(4) The department shall provide base payment for adult residential
care and enhanced adult residential care that shall be no less than a
weighted average rate of fifty-three dollars and seventy-four cents per
resident, per day. The department shall provide base payment for
assisted living services that shall be no less than a weighted average
rate of fifty-nine dollars and fifty-eight cents per resident, per day.
To the extent of available funding, payments shall include the
following additional components:
(a) A payment add-on that addresses the cost of workers'
compensation insurance premiums assessed by the department of labor and
industries under chapter 51.16 RCW, based upon the proportionate share
of such cost allocable to medicaid care as determined by dividing the
contracting facility's number of medicaid client days into the
facility's aggregate workers' compensation insurance premium cost; and
(b) A payment add-on that addresses the cost of liability
insurance, based upon the proportionate share of such cost allocable to
medicaid care as determined by dividing the contracting facility's
number of medicaid client days into the facility's liability insurance
premium cost. In assessing such cost, the department may use a survey
method.
(5) The department shall establish an appeals process whereby
boarding homes contracting with the department to provide adult
residential care, enhanced adult residential care, and assisted living
services may appeal a client assessment by the department that serves
as a basis for payment.
(6) The department shall, based upon assessments and within
existing funds, pay dementia pilot project rates of not less than
ninety dollars and thirty-four cents per day in metropolitan
statistical areas, and eighty-five dollars and twenty-three cents per
resident day in nonmetropolitan statistical areas, on behalf of up to
two hundred persons with Alzheimer's disease or related dementias who
would otherwise qualify for placement in nursing facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
This section recognizes the significant financial commitment made
by providers to construct new or remodeled housing for the state's
elderly who receive medicaid contracted assisted living services in
boarding homes. Boarding home providers who had submitted new
construction plans, or plans to remodel an existing boarding home to
the department of health, construction review, before June 30, 2002,
shall, on the effective date of this act, receive a capital rate add-on
if:
(1) The boarding home provider was receiving a capital rate add-on
payment before June 30, 2002; and
(2) The boarding home was built or remodeled to provide the
following:
(a) Private apartment-like units;
(b) A kitchen area equipped with a refrigerator, a microwave oven
or stovetop, and a counter or table for food preparation. In a new
facility, a kitchen area must also be equipped with a sink and counter
area, and storage space for utensils and supplies;
(c) A lockable entry door;
(d) A separate private bathroom, including a sink, toilet, and
shower or bathtub. In a new facility, a minimum of fifty percent of
the bathrooms shall be wheelchair accessible and have a roll-in shower;
(e) In a remodeled facility, an individual unit shall have a
minimum of one hundred eighty square feet including counters, closets,
and built-ins, excluding the bathroom. In a new facility, an
individual unit shall have a minimum of two hundred twenty square feet
including counters, closets, and built-ins, excluding the bathroom;
(f) A living area shall be wired for telephone service and, where
geographically possible, wired for television service;
(g) In a new facility, the contractor shall provide a private
accessible mailbox; and
(h) A home-like smoke-free common area or areas with sufficient
space for socialization designed to meet resident needs.
The capital rate add-on payment made under this section shall be at
least equal to the rate amount received before implementation of the
capital rate add-on reduction in funding resulting from chapter 371,
Laws of 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
medicaid payment fairness act for licensed boarding home care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---