BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 9.94A.517, 9.94A.518, and 9.94A.525(12) apply retroactively to
crimes committed before, on, and after July 1, 2003, except where
retroactive application would result in increased punishment in
violation of Article I, section 23 of the Washington state
Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to offenders who, on or after the
effective date of this act, are serving terms of confinement within the
standard range under RCW 9.94A.510, or longer than terms within the
standard range due to enhancements under RCW 9.94A.533 (3), (4), (5),
or (6), or under RCW 9.94A.660, for offenses listed in RCW 9.94A.518.
The legislature intends that such offenders shall be released from
confinement as promptly as practicable through the procedure
established by this section.
(2) For each offender sentenced within the standard range who is in
the custody of the department, the department shall calculate the term
of confinement that corresponds to the same relative point within the
standard range under RCW 9.94A.517 that the term imposed by the court
occupied within the standard range under RCW 9.94A.510, so that the
newly calculated term corresponds to the originally imposed term as a
percentage of the interval between the top and bottom of the applicable
range.
(3) For each offender sentenced to a longer term of confinement
than one within the standard range due to an enhancement under RCW
9.94A.533 (3), (4), (5), or (6), the department shall calculate the
portion of the term attributable to the standard range in the same
manner as under subsection (2) of this section, and add the duration of
the enhancement as imposed by the court.
(4) For each offender sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660 who is in the
custody of the department, the department shall calculate the term of
confinement based on one-half of the midpoint of the applicable
standard range under RCW 9.94A.517.
(5) For each offender sentenced within the standard range who is in
the custody of a local correctional facility, the local correctional
facility shall calculate the term of confinement that corresponds to
the same relative point within the standard range under RCW 9.94A.517
that the term imposed by the court occupied within the standard range
under RCW 9.94A.510, so that the newly calculated term corresponds to
the originally imposed term as a percentage of the interval between the
top and bottom of the applicable range.
(6) If the new calculation under this section results in a term of
confinement of twelve months or less for an offender who is in the
custody of the department under the imposed sentence, the offender
shall serve the remainder of the newly calculated term in the custody
of the department.
(7) The department or the local correctional facility shall
redetermine release dates for offenders whose newly calculated terms of
confinement are less than the terms originally imposed by the court,
and shall release the offenders accordingly. For offenders whose newly
calculated terms of confinement are the same as or greater than the
terms originally imposed by the court, the new calculation shall have
no effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---