BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that regular physical
activity is essential to maintaining good health and reducing the rates
of chronic disease. The legislature further finds that providing
opportunities for walking, biking, and other regular forms of exercise
is best accomplished through collaboration between the private sector
and local, state, and institutional policymakers. This collaboration
can build communities where people find it easy and safe to be
physically active. It is the intent of the legislature to promote
policy and planning efforts that increase access to inexpensive or free
opportunities for regular exercise in all communities around the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.38.015 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 601 are each
amended to read as follows:
It is declared to be the public policy of this state:
(1) That health planning to promote, maintain, and assure the
health of all citizens in the state, to provide accessible health
services, health manpower, health facilities, and other resources while
controlling excessive increases in costs, and to recognize prevention
as a high priority in health programs, is essential to the health,
safety, and welfare of the people of the state. Health planning should
be responsive to changing health and social needs and conditions.
Involvement in health planning from both consumers and providers
throughout the state should be encouraged;
(2) That the development of health services and resources,
including the construction, modernization, and conversion of health
facilities, should be accomplished in a planned, orderly fashion,
consistent with identified priorities and without unnecessary
duplication or fragmentation;
(3) That the development and maintenance of adequate health care
information, statistics and projections of need for health facilities
and services is essential to effective health planning and resources
development;
(4) That the development of nonregulatory approaches to health care
cost containment should be considered, including the strengthening of
price competition; ((and))
(5) That health planning should be concerned with public health and
health care financing, access, and quality, recognizing their close
interrelationship and emphasizing cost control of health services,
including cost-effectiveness and cost-benefit analysis; and
(6) That health planning should be concerned with building and
supporting healthy environments that make it easier for Washington
residents to be physically active.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.20.050 and 1993 c 492 s 489 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of health shall provide a forum for the
development of public health policy in Washington state. It is
authorized to recommend to the secretary means for obtaining
appropriate citizen and professional involvement in all public health
policy formulation and other matters related to the powers and duties
of the department. It is further empowered to hold hearings and
explore ways to improve the health status of the citizenry.
(a) At least every five years, the state board shall convene
regional forums to gather citizen input on public health issues.
(b) Every two years, in coordination with the development of the
state biennial budget, the state board shall prepare the state public
health report that outlines the health priorities of the ensuing
biennium. The report shall:
(i) Consider the citizen input gathered at the forums;
(ii) Be developed with the assistance of local health departments;
(iii) Be based on the best available information collected and
reviewed according to RCW 43.70.050 and recommendations from the
council;
(iv) Be developed with the input of state health care agencies. At
least the following directors of state agencies shall provide timely
recommendations to the state board on suggested health priorities for
the ensuing biennium: The secretary of social and health services, the
health care authority administrator, the insurance commissioner, the
superintendent of public instruction, the director of labor and
industries, the director of ecology, and the director of agriculture;
(v) Be used by state health care agency administrators in preparing
proposed agency budgets and executive request legislation;
(vi) Be submitted by the state board to the governor by January 1
of each even-numbered year for adoption by the governor. The governor,
no later than March 1 of that year, shall approve, modify, or
disapprove the state public health report.
(c) In fulfilling its responsibilities under this subsection, the
state board may create ad hoc committees or other such committees of
limited duration as necessary.
(2) In order to protect public health, the state board of health
shall:
(a) Adopt rules necessary to assure safe and reliable public
drinking water and to protect the public health. Such rules shall
establish requirements regarding:
(i) The design and construction of public water system facilities,
including proper sizing of pipes and storage for the number and type of
customers;
(ii) Drinking water quality standards, monitoring requirements, and
laboratory certification requirements;
(iii) Public water system management and reporting requirements;
(iv) Public water system planning and emergency response
requirements;
(v) Public water system operation and maintenance requirements;
(vi) Water quality, reliability, and management of existing but
inadequate public water systems; and
(vii) Quality standards for the source or supply, or both source
and supply, of water for bottled water plants((.));
(b) Adopt rules and standards for prevention, control, and
abatement of health hazards and nuisances related to the disposal of
wastes, solid and liquid, including but not limited to sewage, garbage,
refuse, and other environmental contaminants; adopt standards and
procedures governing the design, construction, and operation of sewage,
garbage, refuse and other solid waste collection, treatment, and
disposal facilities;
(c) Adopt rules controlling public health related to environmental
conditions including but not limited to heating, lighting, ventilation,
sanitary facilities, cleanliness and space in all types of public
facilities including but not limited to food service establishments,
schools, institutions, recreational facilities and transient
accommodations and in places of work;
(d) Adopt rules for the imposition and use of isolation and
quarantine;
(e) Adopt rules for the prevention and control of infectious and
noninfectious diseases, including food and vector borne illness, and
rules governing the receipt and conveyance of remains of deceased
persons, and such other sanitary matters as admit of and may best be
controlled by universal rule; ((and))
(f) Adopt rules for accessing existing data bases for the purposes
of performing health related research; and
(g) Adopt rules for the prevention and control of obesity,
including setting nutrition and physical activity standards aimed at
reducing the proportion of citizens who are obese.
(3) The state board may delegate any of its rule-adopting authority
to the secretary and rescind such delegated authority.
(4) All local boards of health, health authorities and officials,
officers of state institutions, police officers, sheriffs, constables,
and all other officers and employees of the state, or any county, city,
or township thereof, shall enforce all rules adopted by the state board
of health. In the event of failure or refusal on the part of any
member of such boards or any other official or person mentioned in this
section to so act, he shall be subject to a fine of not less than fifty
dollars, upon first conviction, and not less than one hundred dollars
upon second conviction.
(5) The state board may advise the secretary on health policy
issues pertaining to the department of health and the state.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.070 and 2003 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps,
and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards
used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an
internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted
and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.
Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for
each of the following:
(1) A land use element designating the proposed general
distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where
appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce,
industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation airports, public
utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use
element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall
provide for protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used
for public water supplies. Wherever possible, the land use element
shall utilize urban planning approaches that promote physical activity.
Where applicable, the land use element shall review drainage, flooding,
and storm water run-off in the area and nearby jurisdictions and
provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those
discharges that pollute waters of the state, including Puget Sound or
waters entering Puget Sound.
(2) A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of
established residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory
and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies
the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth; (b)
includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of
housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient
land for housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing,
multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and
(d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community.
(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An
inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities,
showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a
forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the
proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital
facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to
reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital
facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and
recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan
element.
(4) A utilities element consisting of the general location,
proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities,
including, but not limited to, electrical lines, telecommunication
lines, and natural gas lines.
(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element
including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture,
forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to
the rural element:
(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because
circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of
rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances,
but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element
harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural
development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural
element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential
public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the
permitted densities and uses. In order to achieve a variety of rural
densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density
transfer, design guidelines, conservation easements, and other
innovative techniques that will accommodate appropriate rural densities
and uses that are not characterized by urban growth and that are
consistent with rural character.
(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall
include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural
character of the area, as established by the county, by:
(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;
(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the
surrounding rural area;
(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;
(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and
surface water and ground water resources; and
(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural,
forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to
the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise
specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may
allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including
necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited
area as follows:
(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or
redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or
mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development,
villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.
A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use area
shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this subsection, but
shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and (iii) of this
subsection. An industrial area or an industrial use within a mixed-use
area or an industrial area under this subsection (5)(d)(i) is not
required to be principally designed to serve the existing and projected
rural population;
(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new
development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including
commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that
rely on a rural location and setting, but that do not include new
residential development. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is
not required to be principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population. Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist
use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;
(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing
isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage
industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and
nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural
residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale
businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the
rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(14). Rural counties may also allow new
small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied by an
existing business as long as the new small-scale business conforms to
the rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(14). Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated
nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does not
permit low-density sprawl;
(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the
existing areas or uses of more intensive rural development, as
appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such
existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the logical outer
boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new pattern of
low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary
delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also
include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection.
The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of
more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer
boundary the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the
character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B)
physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and
land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular
boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public
services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;
(v) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or
existing use is one that was in existence:
(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to
plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;
(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW
36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions
of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or
(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the
county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that
is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040(5).
(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit
in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned
resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and
36.70A.365.
(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent
with, the land use element and incorporates policy and infrastructure
changes that promote nonmotorized transit.
(a) The transportation element shall include the following
subelements:
(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;
(ii) Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation
facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist the department
of transportation in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to
plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;
(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:
(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation
facilities and services, including transit alignments and general
aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and
travel levels as a basis for future planning. This inventory must
include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdiction boundaries;
(B) Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and
transit routes to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system.
These standards should be regionally coordinated;
(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service
standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW,
to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting
level of service standards for state highways in the local
comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to
evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between
the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the department of transportation's six-year investment program. The
concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to
transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except
for counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the
mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these island counties,
state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting the
concurrency requirements in (b) of this subsection;
(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance
locally owned transportation facilities or services that are below an
established level of service standard;
(E) Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the
adopted land use plan to provide information on the location, timing,
and capacity needs of future growth;
(F) Identification of state and local system needs to meet current
and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation
facilities must be consistent with the statewide multimodal
transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;
(iv) Finance, including:
(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against
probable funding resources;
(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the
comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the
basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW
35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795
for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should
be coordinated with the six-year improvement program developed by the
department of transportation as required by RCW 47.05.030;
(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a
discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use
assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service
standards will be met;
(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment
of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on
the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;
(vi) Demand-management strategies.
(b) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions
required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local
jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit
development approval if the development causes the level of service on
a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the standards
adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless
transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies
may include increased public transportation service, ride sharing
programs, demand management, and other transportation systems
management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6)
"concurrent with the development" shall mean that improvements or
strategies are in place at the time of development, or that a financial
commitment is in place to complete the improvements or strategies
within six years.
(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6),
and the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW
36.81.121 for counties, RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation
systems, and RCW 47.05.030 for the state, must be consistent.
(7) An economic development element establishing local goals,
policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality
and a high quality of life. The element shall include: (a) A summary
of the local economy such as population, employment, payroll, sectors,
businesses, sales, and other information as appropriate; (b) a summary
of the strengths and weaknesses of the local economy defined as the
commercial and industrial sectors and supporting factors such as land
use, transportation, utilities, education, work force, housing, and
natural/cultural resources; and (c) an identification of policies,
programs, and projects to foster economic growth and development and to
address future needs. A city that has chosen to be a residential
community is exempt from the economic development element requirement
of this subsection.
(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is
consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to
park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a)
Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period;
(b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; and (c) an
evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide
regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.
(9) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after
January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update
provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new
or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to
cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and
distributed by the state at least two years before local government
must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.81.121 and 1997 c 188 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At any time before adoption of the budget, the legislative
authority of each county, after one or more public hearings thereon,
shall prepare and adopt a comprehensive transportation program for the
ensuing six calendar years. If the county has adopted a comprehensive
plan pursuant to chapter 35.63 or 36.70 RCW, the inherent authority of
a charter county derived from its charter, or chapter 36.70A RCW, the
program shall be consistent with this comprehensive plan.
The program shall include proposed road and bridge construction
work and other transportation facilities and programs deemed
appropriate, and for those counties operating ferries shall also
include a separate section showing proposed capital expenditures for
ferries, docks, and related facilities. The program shall incorporate
transportation policy and infrastructure changes that promote
nonmotorized transit. Copies of the program shall be filed with the
county road administration board and with the state secretary of
transportation not more than thirty days after its adoption by the
legislative authority. The purpose of this section is to assure that
each county shall perpetually have available advanced plans looking to
the future for not less than six years as a guide in carrying out a
coordinated transportation program. The program may at any time be
revised by a majority of the legislative authority but only after a
public hearing thereon.
(2) Each six-year transportation program forwarded to the secretary
in compliance with subsection (1) of this section shall contain
information as to how a county will expend its moneys, including funds
made available pursuant to chapter 47.30 RCW, for nonmotorized
transportation purposes.
(3) Each six-year transportation program forwarded to the secretary
in compliance with subsection (1) of this section shall contain
information as to how a county shall act to preserve railroad right-of-way in the event the railroad ceases to operate in the county's
jurisdiction.
(4) The six-year plan for each county shall specifically set forth
those projects and programs of regional significance for inclusion in
the transportation improvement program within that region.

Sec. 6 RCW 35.77.010 and 1994 c 179 s 1 and 1994 c 158 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of each city and town, pursuant to one or
more public hearings thereon, shall prepare and adopt a comprehensive
transportation program for the ensuing six calendar years. If the city
or town has adopted a comprehensive plan pursuant to chapter 35.63 or
35A.63 RCW, the inherent authority of a first class city derived from
its charter, or chapter 36.70A RCW, the program shall be consistent
with this comprehensive plan. The program shall incorporate
transportation policy and infrastructure changes that promote
nonmotorized transit.
The program shall be filed with the secretary of transportation not
more than thirty days after its adoption. Annually thereafter the
legislative body of each city and town shall review the work
accomplished under the program and determine current city
transportation needs. Based on these findings each such legislative
body shall prepare and after public hearings thereon adopt a revised
and extended comprehensive transportation program before July 1st of
each year, and each one-year extension and revision shall be filed with
the secretary of transportation not more than thirty days after its
adoption. The purpose of this section is to assure that each city and
town shall perpetually have available advanced plans looking to the
future for not less than six years as a guide in carrying out a
coordinated transportation program. The program may at any time be
revised by a majority of the legislative body of a city or town, but
only after a public hearing.
The six-year plan for each city or town shall specifically set
forth those projects and programs of regional significance for
inclusion in the transportation improvement program within that region.
(2) Each six-year transportation program forwarded to the secretary
in compliance with subsection (1) of this section shall contain
information as to how a city or town will expend its moneys, including
funds made available pursuant to chapter 47.30 RCW, for nonmotorized
transportation purposes.
(3) Each six-year transportation program forwarded to the secretary
in compliance with subsection (1) of this section shall contain
information as to how a city or town shall act to preserve railroad
right-of-way in the event the railroad ceases to operate in the city's
or town's jurisdiction.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.17.250 and 1999 c 164 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a state agency is considering awarding grants or loans
for a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to finance
public facilities, it shall consider whether the county, city, or town
requesting the grant or loan has adopted a comprehensive plan and
development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(2) When reviewing competing requests from counties, cities, or
towns planning under RCW 36.70A.040, a state agency considering
awarding grants or loans for public facilities shall accord additional
preference to those counties, cities, or towns that have adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by RCW
36.70A.040. For the purposes of the preference accorded in this
section, a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 is
deemed to have satisfied the requirements for adopting a comprehensive
plan and development regulations specified in RCW 36.70A.040 if the
county, city, or town:
(a) Adopts or has adopted a comprehensive plan and development
regulations within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040;
(b) Adopts or has adopted a comprehensive plan and development
regulations before submitting a request for a grant or loan if the
county, city, or town failed to adopt a comprehensive plan and/or
development regulations within the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040; or
(c) Demonstrates substantial progress toward adopting a
comprehensive plan or development regulations within the time periods
specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town that is more than
six months out of compliance with the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040 shall not be deemed to demonstrate substantial progress for
purposes of this section.
(3) The preference specified in subsection (2) of this section
applies only to competing requests for grants or loans from counties,
cities, or towns planning under RCW 36.70A.040. A request from a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be accorded
no additional preference based on subsection (2) of this section over
a request from a county, city, or town not planning under RCW
36.70A.040.
(4) When reviewing competing requests from counties, cities, or
towns planning under RCW 36.70A.040, a state agency considering
awarding grants or loans for public facilities shall also accord
additional preference to those counties, cities, or towns that have:
(a) Developed model policies to increase access to public
facilities for physical activity;
(b) Utilized urban planning approaches that promote physical
activity;
(c) Incorporated transportation policy and infrastructure changes
to promote nonmotorized transit; and
(d) Enhanced safety and perceived safety to improve community
access walking and biking.
(5) Whenever a state agency is considering awarding grants or loans
for public facilities to a special district requesting funding for a
proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040, it shall consider whether the county, city, or town in
whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is located has
adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by
RCW 36.70A.040 and shall apply the preference specified in subsection
(2) of this section and restricted in subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 79A.05.030 and 1999 c 249 s 302, 1999 c 155 s 1, and
1999 c 59 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks
and parkways acquired or set aside by the state for park or parkway
purposes.
(2) Adopt policies, and adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining
to the use, care, and administration of state parks and parkways. The
commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted in a
conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but
failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any
prosecution for the violation thereof.
(3) Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under
such rules as shall be adopted.
(4) Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify
parks and parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and
comfort stations and build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways
through or on parks and parkways.
(5) Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways, upon
such rentals, fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such
terms, in no event longer than fifty years, and upon such conditions as
shall be approved by the commission: PROVIDED, That leases exceeding
a twenty-year term shall require a unanimous vote of the commission:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if, during the term of any concession or lease,
it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best
interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the
concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of
such concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station
leases shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085, only:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the rates of such concessions or leases shall be
renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession shall be granted
which will prevent the public from having free access to the scenic
attractions of any park or parkway.
(6) Employ such assistance as it deems necessary. Commission
expenses relating to its use of volunteer assistance shall be limited
to premiums or assessments for the insurance of volunteers by the
department of labor and industries, compensation of staff who assist
volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized volunteer
projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to
volunteer recognition. The commission, at its discretion, may waive
commission fees otherwise applicable to volunteers. The commission
shall not use volunteers to replace or supplant classified positions.
The use of volunteers may not lead to the elimination of any employees
or permanent positions in the bargaining unit.
(7) By majority vote of its authorized membership select and
purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for and in
the name of the state such tracts of land, including shore and tide
lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper. If the
commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it
may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title
thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by
the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights of way
for state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this
subsection shall be valid only if:
(a) The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar;
and
(b) Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from
(i) funds appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for
undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission
to be in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which they
were appropriated; and
(c) The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of
the option does not exceed the appraised value of the property.
(8) Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this
state, in any matter pertaining to the acquisition, development,
redevelopment, renovation, care, control, or supervision of any park or
parkway, and enter into contracts in writing to that end. All parks or
parkways, to which the state contributed or in whose care, control, or
supervision the state participated pursuant to the provisions of this
section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.
(9) Adopt policies that increase the number of people who have
access to free or low-cost recreational opportunities for physical
activity, including noncompetitive physical activity.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.300.040 and 1999 c 348 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
powers and duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:
(1) To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public
schools of the state;
(2) To report to the governor and the legislature such information
and data as may be required for the management and improvement of the
schools;
(3) To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of
study, rules for the government of the common schools, and such other
material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the duties
of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws
relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to
educational service district superintendents;
(4) To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties
as superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending
educational meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, of consulting
educational service district superintendents or other school officials;
(5) To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the
Washington state common school code, copies of which shall be provided
in such numbers as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction at no cost to those public agencies within the common
school system and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of
publication and distribution per volume to all other public and
nonpublic agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A
and 28C RCW, rules related to the common schools, and such other matter
as the state superintendent or the state board of education shall
determine. Proceeds of the sale of such code shall be transmitted to
the public printer who shall credit the state superintendent's account
within the state printing plant revolving fund by a like amount;
(6) To act as ex officio member and the chief executive officer of
the state board of education;
(7) To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to
the superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or
districts of the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers
filed in the superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official
acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the superintendent
and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so
certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;
(8) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of
the president, manager, or principal of every educational institution
in this state, a report as required by the superintendent of public
instruction; and it is the duty of every president, manager or
principal, to complete and return such forms within such time as the
superintendent of public instruction shall direct;
(9) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers
receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state;
(10) To issue certificates as provided by law;
(11) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the
state, all books and papers pertaining to the business of the
superintendent's office, and to keep and preserve in the
superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as well as a
record of the meetings of the state board of education;
(12) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to
decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent
in writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that
may be submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal
from the decision of any educational service district superintendent;
and the superintendent shall publish his or her rulings and decisions
from time to time for the information of school officials and teachers;
and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(13) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the
superintendent's official duties;
(14) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the
superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents
and papers of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or
which may have been received by the superintendent's for the use of the
superintendent's office;
(15) To administer family services and programs to promote the
state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025;
(16) To promote the adoption of school-based curricula and policies
that provide quality, daily physical education for all students, and to
encourage policies that provide all students with opportunities for
physical activity outside of formal physical education classes;
(17) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.320.015 and 1992 c 141 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of each school district may exercise the
following:
(a) The broad discretionary power to determine and adopt written
policies not in conflict with other law that provide for the
development and implementation of programs, activities, services, or
practices that the board determines will:
(i) Promote the education and daily physical activity of
kindergarten through twelfth grade students in the public schools; or
(ii) Promote the effective, efficient, or safe management and
operation of the school district;
(b) Such powers as are expressly authorized by law; and
(c) Such powers as are necessarily or fairly implied in the powers
expressly authorized by law.
(2) Before adopting a policy under subsection (1)(a) of this
section, the school district board of directors shall comply with the
notice requirements of the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW,
and shall in addition include in that notice a statement that sets
forth or reasonably describes the proposed policy. The board of
directors shall provide a reasonable opportunity for public written and
oral comment and consideration of the comment by the board of
directors.

--- END ---