BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The superintendent of public instruction
shall convene a technology in education task force to develop
recommendations about the use of technology and recommendations about
funding technology in the schools after conducting a study. The study
shall focus on the application of technology in grades three through
twelve. The study shall be completed by November 1, 2004, and the
recommendations shall be submitted to the education and fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate. The study
shall include but not be limited to:
(a) The technology currently available in schools and school
districts. Technology includes but is not limited to computers, local
area networks, and access to electronic media on the internet;
(b) Methods school districts are using currently to fund technology
and recommendations for the future;
(c) Plans to update the technology including any replacement
schedules;
(d) Training in the use of technology;
(e) Integration of technology into the curriculum;
(f) The different uses of technology in upper elementary grades,
middle school, and high school; and
(g) Applications of technology in schools in other states and how
that technology is funded.
(2) The technology in education task force shall consist of the
following voting members or their designees: One member from each
major caucus of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;
one member from each major caucus of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; the
superintendent of public instruction; the chair of the information
services board; one representative of the community and technical
colleges, appointed by the state board for community and technical
colleges; one educational service district superintendent, one school
district superintendent, one principal, one teacher, three
representatives of the computer or digital technology industry, and
three members of the general public, each appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction; and two representatives appointed
by the higher education coordinating board. The superintendent of
public instruction, or the superintendent's designee, shall chair the
task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of ninety-two thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2005, from the general fund to the superintendent
of public instruction to carry out the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---