BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.0491 and 1999 c 311 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Qualifying project" means a project designed to achieve job
creation or business retention, to add or upgrade nonelectrical
infrastructure, to add or upgrade health and safety facilities, to
accomplish energy and water use efficiency improvements, including
renewable energy development, or to add or upgrade emergency services
in any designated qualifying rural area.
(b) "Qualifying rural area" means:
(i) A rural county, which on the date that a contribution is made
to an electric utility rural economic development revolving fund is a
county with a population density of less than one hundred persons per
square mile as determined by the office of financial management ((and
published each year by the department for the period July 1st to June
30th)); or
(ii) Any geographic area in the state that receives electricity
from a light and power business with twelve thousand or fewer customers
((and with fewer than twenty-six meters per mile of distribution line
as determined and published by the department of revenue effective July
1st of each year. The department shall use current data provided by
the electricity industry)).
(c) "Electric utility rural economic development revolving fund"
means a fund devoted exclusively to funding qualifying projects in
qualifying rural areas.
(d) "Local board" is (i) a board of directors with at least, but
not limited to, three members representing local businesses and
community groups who have been appointed by the sponsoring electric
utility to oversee and direct the activities of the electric utility
rural economic development revolving fund; or (ii) a board of directors
of an existing associate development organization serving the
qualifying rural area who have been designated by the sponsoring
electrical utility to oversee and direct the activities of the electric
utility rural economic development revolving fund.
(2) A light and power business ((with fewer than twenty-six active
meters per mile of distribution line in any geographic area in the
state)) shall be allowed a credit against taxes due under this chapter
in an amount equal to fifty percent of contributions made in any
((calendar)) fiscal year directly to an electric utility rural economic
development revolving fund. The credit shall be taken in a form and
manner as required by the department. The credit under this section
shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars per ((calendar)) fiscal
year per light and power business. The credit may not exceed the tax
that would otherwise be due under this chapter. Refunds shall not be
granted in the place of credits. Expenditures not used to earn a
credit in one ((calendar)) fiscal year may not be used to earn a credit
in subsequent years except that this limitation does not apply to
expenditures made between January 1, 2004, and March 31, 2004, which
expenditures may be used to earn a credit through December 30, 2004.
(3) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires
((December 31, 2005)) June 30, 2011.
(4) To qualify for the credit in subsection (2) of this section,
the light and power business shall establish, or have a local board
establish with the business's contribution, an electric utility rural
economic development revolving fund which is governed by a local board
whose members shall reside in the qualifying rural area served by the
light and power business. Expenditures from the electric utility rural
economic development revolving fund shall be made solely on qualifying
projects, and the local board shall have authority to determine all
criteria and conditions for the expenditure of funds from the electric
utility rural economic development (([revolving])) revolving fund, and
for the terms and conditions of repayment.
(5) Any funds repaid to the electric utility rural economic
development (([revolving])) revolving fund by recipients shall be made
available for additional qualifying projects.
(6) If at any time the electric utility rural economic development
(([revolving])) revolving fund is dissolved, any moneys claimed as a
tax credit under this section shall either be granted to a qualifying
project or refunded to the state within two years of termination.
(7) The total amount of credits that may be used in any fiscal year
shall not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars in any fiscal
year. The department shall allow the use of earned credits on a first-come, first-served basis. Unused earned credits may be carried over to
subsequent years.
(8) The following provisions apply to expenditures made under
subsection (2) of this section between January 1, 2004, and March 31,
2004:
(a) Credits earned from these expenditures are not considered in
computing the statewide limitation in subsection (7) of this section
for the period July 1, 2004, through December 31, 2004; and
(b) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, the credit allowed
under this section for light and power businesses making these
expenditures is limited to thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---