BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.48.200 and 2003 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Debts due the state or a county or city for the overpayment of
wages to ((state)) their respective employees may be recovered by the
employer by deductions from subsequent wage payments as provided in RCW
49.48.210, or by civil action. If the overpayment is recovered by
deduction from the employee's subsequent wages, each deduction shall
not exceed: (a) Five percent of the employee's disposable earnings in
a pay period other than the final pay period; or (b) the amount still
outstanding from the employee's disposable earnings in the final pay
period. The deductions from wages shall continue until the overpayment
is fully recouped.
(2) Nothing in chapter 77, Laws of 2003 prevents: (a) An employee
from making payments in excess of the amount specified in subsection
(1)(a) of this section to an employer; or (b) an employer and employee
from agreeing to a different overpayment amount than that specified in
the notice in RCW 49.48.210(1) or to a method other than a deduction
from wages for repayment of the overpayment amount.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.48.210 and 2003 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When an employer determines that an employee was overpaid
wages, the employer shall provide written notice to the employee. The
notice shall include the amount of the overpayment, the basis for the
claim, a demand for payment within twenty calendar days of the date on
which the employee received the notice, and the rights of the employee
under this section.
(2) The notice may be served upon the employee in the manner
prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action, or be mailed
by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the employee at his or
her last known address.
(3) Within twenty calendar days after receiving the notice from the
employer that an overpayment has occurred, the employee may request, in
writing, that the employer review its finding that an overpayment has
occurred. The employee may choose to have the review conducted through
written submission of information challenging the overpayment or
through a face-to-face meeting with the employer. If the request is
not made within the twenty-day period as provided in this subsection,
the employee may not further challenge the overpayment and has no right
to further agency review, an adjudicative proceeding, or judicial
review.
(4) Upon receipt of an employee's written request for review of the
overpayment, the employer shall review the employee's challenge to the
overpayment. Upon completion of the review, the employer shall notify
the employee in writing of the employer's decision regarding the
employee's challenge. The notification must be sent by certified mail,
return receipt requested, to the employee at his or her last known
address.
(5) If the employee is dissatisfied with the employer's decision
regarding the employee's challenge to the overpayment, the employee may
request an adjudicative proceeding governed by the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The employee's application for an
adjudicative proceeding must be in writing, state the basis for
contesting the overpayment notice, and include a copy of the employer's
notice of overpayment. The application must be served on and received
by the employer within twenty-eight calendar days of the employee's
receipt of the employer's decision following review of the employee's
challenge. Notwithstanding RCW 34.05.413(3), agencies may not vary the
requirements of this subsection (5) by rule or otherwise. The employee
must serve the employer by certified mail, return receipt requested.
(6) If the employee does not request an adjudicative proceeding
within the twenty-eight-day period, the amount of the overpayment
provided in the notice shall be deemed final and the employer may
proceed to recoup the overpayment as provided in this section and RCW
49.48.200.
(7) Where an adjudicative proceeding has been requested, the
presiding or reviewing officer shall determine the amount, if any, of
the overpayment received by the employee.
(8) If the employee fails to attend or participate in the
adjudicative proceeding, upon a showing of valid service, the presiding
or reviewing officer may enter an administrative order declaring the
amount claimed in the notice sent to the employee after the employer's
review of the employee's challenge to the overpayment to be assessed
against the employee and subject to collection action by the ((state))
employer as provided in RCW 49.48.200.
(9) Failure to make an application for a review by the employer as
provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section or an adjudicative
proceeding within twenty-eight calendar days of the date of receiving
notice of the employer's decision after review of the overpayment shall
result in the establishment of a final debt against the employee in the
amount asserted by the employer, which debt shall be collected as
provided in RCW 49.48.200.
(10) As used in chapter 77, Laws of 2003:
(a) "Employer" means the state of Washington or a political
subdivision or municipal corporation contained therein and any of its
agencies, institutions, boards, or commissions; and
(b) "Overpayment" means a payment of wages for a pay period that is
greater than the amount earned for a pay period.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.04.230 and 2002 c 61 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any official of the state or a county or city authorized to
disburse funds in payment of salaries and wages of public officers or
employees is authorized, upon written request of the officer or
employee, to deduct from the salaries or wages of the officers or
employees, the amount or amounts of subscription payments, premiums,
contributions, or continuation thereof, for payment of the following:
(1) Credit union deductions: PROVIDED, That twenty-five or more
employees of a single state agency or a total of one hundred or more
state employees of several agencies have authorized such a deduction
for payment to the same credit union. An agency may, in its own
discretion, establish a minimum participation requirement of fewer than
twenty-five employees.
(2) Parking fee deductions: PROVIDED, That payment is made for
parking facilities furnished by the agency or by the department of
general administration.
(3) U.S. savings bond deductions: PROVIDED, That a person within
the particular agency shall be appointed to act as trustee. The
trustee will receive all contributions; purchase and deliver all bond
certificates; and keep such records and furnish such bond or security
as will render full accountability for all bond contributions.
(4) Board, lodging or uniform deductions when such board, lodging
and uniforms are furnished by the state, or deductions for academic
tuitions or fees or scholarship contributions payable to the employing
institution.
(5) Dues and other fees deductions: PROVIDED, That the deduction
is for payment of membership dues to any professional organization
formed primarily for public employees or college and university
professors: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That twenty-five or more employees
of a single state agency, or a total of one hundred or more state
employees of several agencies have authorized such a deduction for
payment to the same professional organization.
(6) Labor or employee organization dues may be deducted in the
event that a payroll deduction is not provided under a collective
bargaining agreement under the provisions of RCW 41.06.150: PROVIDED,
That twenty-five or more officers or employees of a single agency, or
a total of one hundred or more officers or employees of several
agencies have authorized such a deduction for payment to the same labor
or employee organization: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That labor or employee
organizations with five hundred or more members in state government may
have payroll deduction for employee benefit programs.
(7) Insurance contributions to the authority for payment of
premiums under contracts authorized by the state health care authority.
However, enrollment or assignment by the state health care authority to
participate in a health care benefit plan, as required by RCW
41.05.065(5), shall authorize a payroll deduction of premium
contributions without a written consent under the terms and conditions
established by the public employees' benefits board.
(8) Deductions to a bank, savings bank, or savings and loan
association if (a) the bank, savings bank, or savings and loan
association is authorized to do business in this state; and (b) twenty-five or more employees of a single agency, or fewer, if a lesser number
is established by such agency, or a total of one hundred or more state
employees of several agencies have authorized a deduction for payment
to the same bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association.
Deductions from salaries and wages of public officers and employees
other than those enumerated in this section or by other law, may be
authorized by the director of financial management for purposes clearly
related to state employment or goals and objectives of the agency and
for plans authorized by the state health care authority.
(9) Contributions to the Washington state combined fund drive.
The authority to make deductions from the salaries and wages of
public officers and employees as provided for in this section shall be
in addition to such other authority as may be provided by law:
PROVIDED, That the state or any department, division, or separate
agency of the state shall not be liable to any insurance carrier or
contractor for the failure to make or transmit any such deduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---