BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A member of the Washington national guard or any other military
reserve component who is a student at a postsecondary education
institution and who is ordered for a period exceeding thirty days to
either active state service, as defined in RCW 38.04.010, or to federal
active military service has the following rights:
(a) With regard to courses in which the person is enrolled, the
person may:
(i) Withdraw from one or more courses for which tuition and fees
have been paid that are attributable to the courses. The tuition and
fees must be credited to the person's account at the postsecondary
institution. Any refunds are subject to the requirements of the state
or federal financial aid programs of origination. In such a case, the
student shall not receive credit for the courses and shall not receive
a failing grade, an incomplete, or other negative annotation on the
student's record, and the student's grade point average shall not be
altered or affected in any manner because of action under this item;
(ii) Be given a grade of incomplete and be allowed to complete the
course upon release from active duty under the postsecondary
institution's standard practice for completion of incompletes; or
(iii) Continue and complete the course for full credit. Class
sessions the student misses due to performance of state or federal
active military service must be counted as excused absences and must
not be used in any way to adversely impact the student's grade or
standing in the class. Any student who selects this option is not,
however, automatically excused from completing assignments due during
the period the student is performing state or federal active military
service. A letter grade or a grade of pass must only be awarded if, in
the opinion of the faculty member teaching the course, the student has
completed sufficient work and has demonstrated sufficient progress
toward meeting course requirements to justify the grade;
(b) To receive a refund of amounts paid for room, board, and fees
attributable to the time period during which the student was serving in
state or federal active military service and did not use the facilities
or services for which the amounts were paid. Any refund of room,
board, and fees is subject to the requirements of the state or federal
financial aid programs of origination; and
(c) If the student chooses to withdraw, the student has the right
to be readmitted and enrolled as a student at the postsecondary
education institution, without penalty or redetermination of admission
eligibility, within one year following release from the state or
federal active military service.
(2) The protections in this section may be invoked as follows:
(a) The person, or an appropriate officer from the military
organization in which the person will be serving, must give written
notice that the person is being, or has been, ordered to qualifying
service; and
(b) Upon written request from the postsecondary institution, the
person shall provide written verification of service.
(3) This section provides minimum protections for students.
Nothing in this section prevents postsecondary institutions from
providing additional options or protections to students who are ordered
to state or federal active military service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---