BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.93.105 and 1999 c 153 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following actions ((shall)) are not ((be)) subject to
((potential)) review by a boundary review board:
(1) Annexations of territory to a water-sewer district pursuant to
RCW 36.94.410 through 36.94.440;
(2) Revisions of city or town boundaries pursuant to RCW 35.21.790
or 35A.21.210;
(3) Adjustments to city or town boundaries pursuant to RCW
35.13.340; ((and))
(4) Adjustments to city and town boundaries pursuant to RCW
35.13.300 through 35.13.330; and
(5) Annexations under the provisions of chapters 35.13 and 35A.14
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings for the annexation of territory pursuant to this
section and section 3 of this act must be commenced as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a city may by a majority vote resolve
to annex unincorporated territory contiguous to the city that is within
the city's urban growth area as designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(2) The resolution must describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the approximate number of voters residing therein, and
set a date for a public hearing on the resolution. Notice of the
hearing must be given by publication of the resolution at least once a
week for three weeks before the date of the hearing, in one or more
newspapers of general circulation within the code city and one or more
newspapers of general circulation within the area to be annexed. The
notice must contain a legal description of the area proposed for
annexation, specify the time and place of hearing, and invite
interested persons to appear and voice approval or disapproval of the
annexation. The notice must also be posted in three public places in
the territory proposed for annexation.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, territory
bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is contiguous to the
city that is also bounded by the same river, lake, or other body of
water.
(4) Following the hearing, the city council or commission must
determine by ordinance whether the area will be annexed. Subject to
RCW 35.02.170, the council may annex all or any portion of the proposed
area, but may not include any property not described in the notice.
Upon passage of the ordinance, a certified copy must be filed with the
board of county commissioners of the county in which the annexed
property is located.
(5) Annexations initiated under this section are subject to the
procedures set forth in chapters 35.13, 35A.14, and 39.34 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.34 RCW
to read as follows:
Before initiating an annexation under this act, a city must enter
into an interlocal agreement with the county that governs annexations
by that city within its urban growth boundary. An annexation
interlocal agreement entered into before the effective date of this
section or a general annexation interlocal agreement entered into
between a city and county that is intended to apply to all annexations
by a city within its urban growth boundary satisfies the requirements
of this section. The interlocal agreement may be, by agreement of the
city and county, supplemented to address issues specific to an
individual annexation if the issues are not addressed in the general
interlocal agreement. The general interlocal annexation agreement must
include the following:
(1) A statement of the goals of the agreement. Goals may include,
but are not limited to: Providing for long-term and short-term
transition of services and staff; joint provision of services;
community involvement; revenue sharing; and debt distribution;
(2) The subject areas and policies and procedures the parties agree
to undertake in annexations. Subject areas may include, but are not
limited to: Roads and traffic impact mitigation; surface and storm
water management; coordination and timing of comprehensive plan and
development regulation updates; parks, trails, recreation, and open
space; public utilities; outstanding bonds and special or improvement
district assessments; transfer of staff, records, and equipment;
annexation procedures; and distribution of debt and revenue sharing for
annexation proposals, code enforcement, inspection services, and
financial and administrative services.
(3) A term of at least five years which may be extended by mutual
agreement of the city and county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 39.34 RCW
to read as follows:
If the city and county do not complete a general interlocal
annexation agreement within one hundred twenty days of its initiation:
(1) The city and county may extend the time in which to reach an
agreement; or
(2) The city or county may invoke mediated negotiation by notice to
the other party. Mediation must begin within thirty days. The city
and county must select a mediator and make available to the mediator
all relevant documents, including their respective proposals for goals
and policies and procedures, by subject area. If the parties fail to
reach agreement through mediation, either party may invoke binding
arbitration by providing notice to the other party. Each party must
select one arbitrator and the initial two arbitrators must select a
third arbitrator. Arbitration must begin within thirty days.

--- END ---