BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the loss of
domestic manufacturing jobs has become a national concern. Washington
state has lost one out of every six manufacturing jobs since July 2000.
The aluminum industry has long been an important component of
Washington state's manufacturing base, providing family-wage jobs often
in rural communities where unemployment rates are very high. The
aluminum industry is electricity intensive and was greatly affected by
the dramatic increase in electricity prices which began in 2000 and
which continues to affect the Washington economy. Before the energy
crisis, aluminum smelters provided about 5,000 direct jobs. Today they
provide fewer than 1,000 direct jobs. For every job lost in that
industry, almost three additional jobs are estimated to be lost
elsewhere in the state's economy. It is the legislature's intent to
preserve and restore family wage jobs by providing tax relief to the
state's aluminum industry.
The electric loads of aluminum smelters provide a unique benefit to
the infrastructure of the electric power system. Under the
transmission tariff of the Bonneville Power Administration, aluminum
smelter loads, whether served with federal or nonfederal power, are
subject to short-term interruptions that allow a higher import
capability on the transmission interconnection between the northwest
and California. These stability reserves allow more power to be
imported in winter months, reducing the need for additional generation
in the northwest, and would be used to prevent a widespread
transmission collapse and blackout if there were a failure in the
transmission interconnection between California and the northwest. It
is the legislature's intent to retain these benefits for the people of
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 82.04.020 and 82.04.220, to read as follows:
(1) "Direct service industrial customer" means the same as in RCW
82.16.0495.
(2) "Aluminum smelter" means the manufacturing facility of any
direct service industrial customer that processes alumina into
aluminum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing aluminum; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the
case of manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the
gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(2) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of aluminum
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the aluminum multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2007.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.240 and 1998 c 312 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person ((except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260 (1),
(2), (4), (5), or (6))) engaging within this state in business as a
manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other
provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax
with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products, including byproducts, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including
byproducts, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact
that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.270 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
Upon every person ((except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260 (5)
or (13), 82.04.298, or 82.04.272)) engaging within this state in the
business of making sales at wholesale, except persons taxable as
wholesalers under other provisions of this chapter; as to such persons
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of such business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.280 and 1998 c 343 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines;
(2) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United
States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular
traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and
including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the
facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or
railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the
responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road,
highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired
or improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except
persons taxable as processors for hire under another section of this
chapter; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse,
but not including the rental of cold storage lockers; (5) representing
and performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an
independent resident managing general agent licensed under the
provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (6) radio and television broadcasting,
excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a
standard deduction based on the national average thereof as annually
reported by the Federal Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof
by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding
that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience
computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the
100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7)
engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of
consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount
of tax on such business shall be equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.04.440 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities which are within the purview
of the provisions of two or more of sections RCW 82.04.230 to
82.04.290, inclusive, shall be taxable under each paragraph applicable
to the activities engaged in.
(2) Persons taxable under section 3(2) of this act, RCW 82.04.250,
82.04.270, or 82.04.260 (4) or (13) with respect to selling products in
this state shall be allowed a credit against those taxes for any (a)
manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of products
so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting taxes paid with respect to
the extracting of products so sold in this state or ingredients of
products so sold in this state. Extracting taxes taken as credit under
subsection (3) of this section may also be taken under this subsection,
if otherwise allowable under this subsection. The amount of the credit
shall not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter with
respect to the sale of those products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, section 3(1) of
this act, or 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (6), or (13) with respect to
extracting or manufacturing products in this state shall be allowed a
credit against those taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to
another state with respect to the sales of the products so extracted or
manufactured in this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect
to the manufacturing of products using ingredients so extracted in this
state, or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing
activities completed in another state for products so manufactured in
this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the extraction or
manufacturing of those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, section 3(1) of this
act, and 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), and (13), and (ii) similar gross
receipts taxes paid to other states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for all property taxes paid during the calendar year on
property owned by a direct service industrial customer and reasonably
necessary for the purposes of an aluminum smelter.
(2) A person taking the credit under this section is subject to all
the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned during one
calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred
in the subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second
year. Credits carried over must be applied to tax liability before new
credits. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(3) Credits may not be claimed under this section for property
taxes levied for collection in 2007 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who is subject to tax under this chapter on gross
income from sales of electricity, natural gas, or manufactured gas made
to an aluminum smelter is eligible for an exemption from the tax in the
form of a credit, if the contract for sale of electricity or gas to the
aluminum smelter specifies that the price charged for the electricity
or gas will be reduced by an amount equal to the credit.
(2) The credit is equal to the gross income from the sale of the
electricity or gas to an aluminum smelter multiplied by the
corresponding rate in effect at the time of the sale under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who has paid tax under RCW 82.08.020 for tangible
personal property used at an aluminum smelter, tangible personal
property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of
buildings or other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and
services rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or
tangible personal property, is eligible for an exemption from the state
share of the tax in the form of a credit, as provided in this section.
A person claiming an exemption must pay the tax and may then take a
credit equal to the state share of retail sales tax paid under RCW
82.08.020. The person shall submit information, in a form and manner
prescribed by the department, specifying the amount of qualifying
purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed and the
amount of exempted tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the
same meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.
(3) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable
events occurring on or after January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who is subject to tax under RCW 82.12.020 for tangible
personal property used at an aluminum smelter, or for tangible personal
property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of
buildings or other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and
services rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or
tangible personal property, is eligible for an exemption from the state
share of the tax in the form of a credit, as provided in this section.
The amount of the credit shall be equal to the state share of use tax
computed to be due under RCW 82.12.020. The person shall submit
information, in a form and manner prescribed by the department,
specifying the amount of qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which
the exemption is claimed and the amount of exempted tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the
same meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.
(3) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable
events occurring on or after January 1, 2007.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.12.022 and 1994 c 124 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every
person in this state a use tax for the privilege of using natural gas
or manufactured gas within this state as a consumer.
(2) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in
effect for the public utility tax on gas distribution businesses under
RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article used" does not include any
amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a gas distribution
business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(7) in transporting the gas subject
to tax under this subsection if those amounts are subject to tax under
that chapter.
(3) The tax levied in this section shall not apply to the use of
natural or manufactured gas delivered to the consumer by other means
than through a pipeline.
(4) The tax levied in this section shall not apply to the use of
natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to the
consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas for
which exemption is sought under this subsection.
(5) The tax levied in this section shall not apply to the use of
natural or manufactured gas by an aluminum smelter as that term is
defined in section 2 of this act before January 1, 2007.
(6) There shall be a credit against the tax levied under this
section in an amount equal to any tax paid by:
(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a
gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by
another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought
under this subsection; or
(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to
the tax imposed by this section was paid to another state with respect
to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.
(((6))) (7) The use tax hereby imposed shall be paid by the
consumer to the department.
(((7))) (8) There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person
who delivered the gas to the consumer to make a quarterly report to the
department. Such report shall contain the volume of gas delivered,
name of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other information as
the department shall require by rule.
(((8))) (9) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW
for the administration and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter
384, Laws of 1989.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who is subject to tax under this chapter on gross
income from sales of electricity, natural gas, or manufactured gas made
to an aluminum smelter is eligible for an exemption from the tax in the
form of a credit, if the contract for sale of electricity or gas to the
aluminum smelter specifies that the price charged for the electricity
or gas will be reduced by an amount equal to the credit.
(2) The credit is equal to the gross income from the sale of the
electricity or gas to an aluminum smelter multiplied by the
corresponding rate in effect at the time of the sale for the public
utility tax under RCW 82.16.020.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the
same meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "smelter tax incentive" means
the preferential tax rate under section 3 of this act, or an exemption
or credit under sections 8 through 11 or 13 of this act or RCW
82.12.022(5).
(2) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information to evaluate whether the stated goals of
legislation were achieved.
(3) The goals of the smelter tax incentives are to retain family
wage jobs in rural areas by:
(a) Enabling the aluminum industry to maintain production of
aluminum at a level that will preserve at least 75 percent of the jobs
that were on the payroll effective January 1, 2004, as adjusted for
employment reductions publicly announced before November 30, 2003; and
(b) Allowing the aluminum industry to continue producing aluminum
in this state through 2006 so that the industry will be positioned to
preserve and create new jobs when the anticipated reduction of energy
costs occurs.
(4)(a) An aluminum smelter receiving the benefit of a smelter tax
incentive shall make an annual report to the department detailing
employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits
per job at the manufacturing site. The report is due by March 31st
following any year in which a tax incentive is claimed or used. The
report shall not include names of employees. The first report filed
under this subsection shall include employment, wage, and benefit
information for the twelve-month period immediately before first use of
a tax incentive. Employment reports shall include data for actual
levels of employment and identification of the number of jobs affected
by any employment reductions that have been publicly announced at the
time of the report.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report, the department shall declare
the amount of taxes exempted or credited, or reduced in the case of the
preferential business and occupation tax rate, for that year to be
immediately due and payable. Excise taxes payable under this
subsection are subject to interest but not penalties, as provided under
this chapter.
(5) By December 1, 2006, the department shall report to the
legislature on the effectiveness of the smelter tax incentives. The
report shall measure the effect of the smelter tax incentives on job
retention for Washington residents and any other factors the department
may select.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---