BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.264 and 1987 c 212 s 1101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section,
a member of the board of directors or an officer of any nonprofit
corporation is not individually liable for any discretionary decision
or failure to make a discretionary decision within his or her official
capacity as director or officer unless the decision or failure to
decide constitutes gross negligence.
(2) A member of the board of directors or an officer of a nonprofit
corporation is not individually liable for the nonprofit's failure to
comply with provisions of the Washington administrative code, unless
such failure to comply constitutes gross negligence.
(3) Nothing in this section shall limit or modify in any manner the
duties or liabilities of a director or officer of a corporation to the
corporation or the corporation's members.

--- END ---