BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.569 and 1990 c 288 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education with a commissioned police
force shall report to the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs or its successor agency, on a monthly basis, crime statistics
for the Washington state uniform crime report, in the format required
by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, or its
successor agency. Institutions of higher education which do not have
commissioned police forces shall report crime statistics through
appropriate local law enforcement agencies.
(2) Each institution of higher education shall publish and
distribute a report which shall be updated annually and which shall
include the crime statistics as reported under subsection (1) of this
section for the most recent three-year period. Upon request, the
institution shall provide the report to every person who submits an
application for admission to ((either a main or branch)) any campus,
and to each new employee at the time of employment. In its
acknowledgement of receipt of the formal application for admission, the
institution shall notify the applicant of the availability of such
information. The information also shall be provided on an annual basis
to all students and employees. Institutions with more than one campus
shall provide the required information on a campus-by-campus basis.
(3) Each institution of higher education shall provide to every new
student and new employee, and upon request to other interested persons,
information which follows the general categories for safety policies
and procedures outlined in this section. Such categories shall, at a
minimum, include campus enrollments, campus nonstudent work force
profile, the number and duties of campus security personnel,
arrangements with state and local police, and policies on controlled
substances. Information for the most recent academic year also shall
include a description of any programs offered by an institution's
student affairs or services department, and by student government
organizations regarding crime prevention and counseling, including a
directory of available services and appropriate telephone numbers and
physical locations of these services. In addition, institutions
maintaining student housing facilities shall include information
detailing security policies and programs.
Institutions with ((a main campus and one or more branch campuses))
more than one campus not including off-campus centers of regional
universities and The Evergreen State College shall provide the
information on a campus-by-campus basis.
In the case of community colleges, colleges shall provide such
information to the main campuses only and shall provide reasonable
alternative information at any off-campus centers and other affiliated
college sites enrolling less than one hundred students.
(4) Each institution shall establish a task force which shall
annually examine campus security and safety issues. The task force
shall review the report published and distributed pursuant to this
section in order to ensure the accuracy and effectiveness of the
report, and make any suggestions for improvement. This task force
shall include representation from the institution's administration,
faculty, staff, recognized student organization, and police or security
organization.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.45.010 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the benefits of higher education should
be more widely available to the citizens of the state of Washington.
The legislature also finds that a citizen's place of residence can
restrict that citizen's access to educational opportunity at the upper
division and graduate level.
Because most of the state-supported baccalaureate universities are
located in areas removed from major metropolitan areas, the legislature
finds that many of the state's citizens, especially those citizens
residing in the central Puget Sound area, the Tri-Cities, Spokane,
Vancouver, and Yakima, have insufficient and inequitable access to
upper-division baccalaureate and graduate education.
This lack of sufficient educational opportunities in urban areas
makes it difficult or impossible for place-bound individuals, who are
unable to relocate, to complete a baccalaureate or graduate degree. It
also exacerbates the difficulty financially needy students have in
attending school, since many of those students need to work, and work
is not always readily available in some communities where the
baccalaureate institutions of higher education are located.
The lack of sufficient educational opportunities in metropolitan
areas also affects the economy of the underserved communities.
Businesses benefit from access to the research and teaching
capabilities of institutions of higher education. The absence of these
institutions from some of the state's major urban centers prevents
beneficial interaction between businesses in these communities and the
state's universities.
The Washington state master plan for higher education, adopted by
the higher education coordinating board, recognizes the need to expand
upper-division and graduate educational opportunities in the state's
large urban centers. The board has also attempted to provide a means
for helping to meet future educational demand through a system of
((branch)) campuses in the state's major urban areas: The University
of Washington Tacoma, the University of Washington Bothell, Washington
State University Vancouver, Washington State University Tri-Cities, and
Washington State University Spokane.
The legislature endorses the assignment of responsibility to serve
these urban centers that the board has made to various institutions of
higher education. The legislature also endorses the creation of
((branch campuses for the University of Washington and Washington State
University)) : The University of Washington Tacoma, the University of
Washington Bothell, Washington State University Vancouver, Washington
State University Tri-Cities, and Washington State University Spokane.
The legislature recognizes that, among their other
responsibilities, the state's comprehensive community colleges share
with the four-year universities and colleges the responsibility of
providing the first two years of a baccalaureate education. It is the
intent of the legislature that the four-year institutions and the
community colleges work as cooperative partners to ensure the
successful and efficient operation of the state's system of higher
education. The legislature further intends that the four-year
institutions work cooperatively with the community colleges to ensure
that ((branch campuses)) the University of Washington Tacoma, the
University of Washington Bothell, Washington State University
Vancouver, Washington State University Tri-Cities, and Washington State
University Spokane are operated as models of a two plus two educational
system.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.45.020 and 1994 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the
expansion of upper-division and graduate educational programs in the
central Puget Sound area under rules or guidelines adopted by the
higher education coordinating board. The University of Washington
shall meet that responsibility through the operation of ((at least two
branch campuses. One branch campus shall be located in the Tacoma
area. Another branch campus shall be collocated with Cascadia
Community College in the Bothell-Woodinville area)) the University of
Washington Tacoma and the University of Washington Bothell.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.45.0201 and 1994 c 217 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that population growth in north King and
south Snohomish counties has created a need to expand higher education
and work force training programs for the people living and working in
those areas. In keeping with the recommendations of the higher
education coordinating board, the legislature intends to help address
those education and training needs through the creation of Cascadia
Community College, expansion of educational opportunities at Lake
Washington Technical College, and support of the University of
Washington(('s branch campus at Bothell-Woodinville)) Bothell. It is
further the intention of the legislature, in keeping with the higher
education coordinating board recommendations, that the Cascadia
Community College and the University of Washington ((branch campus))
Bothell be collocated, and that the new community college and the
University of Washington(('s branch campus)) Bothell work in
partnership to ensure that properly prepared students from community
colleges and other institutions are able to transfer smoothly to the
((branch campus)) University of Washington Bothell.
((The legislature further finds that a governing board for Cascadia
Community College needs to be appointed and confirmed as expeditiously
as possible. The legislature intends to work cooperatively with the
governor to facilitate the appointment and confirmation of trustees for
the college.))

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.45.030 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
Washington State University is responsible for providing upper-division and graduate level higher education programs to the citizens
of the Tri-Cities area, under rules or guidelines adopted by the higher
education coordinating board. Washington State University shall meet
that responsibility through the operation of ((a branch campus in the
Tri-Cities area. The branch campus shall replace and supersede the
Tri-Cities university center. All land, facilities, equipment, and
personnel of the Tri-Cities university center shall be transferred from
the University of Washington to)) Washington State University Tri-Cities.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.45.040 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
Washington State University is responsible for providing upper-division and graduate level higher education programs to the citizens
of the southwest Washington area, under rules or guidelines adopted by
the higher education coordinating board. Washington State University
shall meet that responsibility through the operation of ((a branch
campus in the southwest Washington area)) Washington State University
Vancouver.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.45.050 and 1991 c 205 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Washington State University and Eastern Washington University are
responsible for providing upper-division and graduate level programs to
the citizens of the Spokane area((, under rules or guidelines adopted
by the joint center for higher education)). However, before any degree
is authorized under this section it shall be subject to the review and
approval of the higher education coordinating board. Washington State
University shall meet its responsibility through the operation of ((a
branch campus in the)) Washington State University Spokane ((area)).
Eastern Washington University shall meet its responsibility through the
operation of programs and facilities in Spokane.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.80.450 and 1990 c 288 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall study upper division
baccalaureate educational needs of placebound students, and the
graduate educational needs of teachers, living in areas of the state
not currently served by either existing four-year institutions or
((branch campuses)) the University of Washington Tacoma, the University
of Washington Bothell, Washington State University Vancouver,
Washington State University Tri-Cities, or Washington State University
Spokane. The study shall include recommendations on how the needs
should be addressed, and which institutions should be responsible for
serving specific areas.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.80.510 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
In rules and guidelines adopted for purposes of chapter 7, Laws of
1989 1st ex. sess., the higher education coordinating board shall
ensure a collaborative partnership between the community colleges and
the four-year institutions. The partnership shall be one in which the
community colleges prepare students for transfer to the upper-division
programs of the ((branch campuses)) four-year institutions.

Sec. 10 RCW 34.05.514 and 2001 c 220 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
proceedings for review under this chapter shall be instituted by paying
the fee required under RCW 36.18.020 and filing a petition in the
superior court, at the petitioner's option, for (a) Thurston county,
(b) the county of the petitioner's residence or principal place of
business, or (c) in any county where the property owned by the
petitioner and affected by the contested decision is located.
(2) For proceedings involving institutions of higher education, the
petition shall be filed either in the county in which the principal
office of the institution involved is located or in the county of ((a
branch campus)) the University of Washington Tacoma, the University of
Washington Bothell, Washington State University Vancouver, Washington
State University Tri-Cities, or Washington State University Spokane if
the action involves ((such branch)) one of those institutions.
(3) For proceedings conducted by the pollution control hearings
board pursuant to chapter 43.21B RCW or as otherwise provided in RCW
90.03.210(2) involving decisions of the department of ecology on
applications for changes or transfers of water rights that are the
subject of a general adjudication of water rights that is being
litigated actively under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW, the petition must
be filed with the superior court conducting the adjudication, to be
consolidated by the court with the general adjudication. A party to
the adjudication shall be a party to the appeal under this chapter only
if the party files or is served with a petition for review to the
extent required by this chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.105.820 and 1999 c 285 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The information services board shall prepare a technical plan for
the design and construction of the K-20 telecommunication system. The
board shall ensure that the technical plan adheres to the goals and
objectives established under RCW 43.105.041. The board shall provide
formal project approval and oversight during the development and
implementation of the K-20 telecommunications network. In approving
the plan, the board shall conduct a request for proposal process. The
technical plan shall be developed in phases as follows:
(1) Phase one shall provide a telecommunication backbone connecting
educational service districts, the main campuses of public
baccalaureate institutions, the ((branch campuses of public research
institutions)) University of Washington Tacoma, the University of
Washington Bothell, Washington State University Vancouver, Washington
State University Tri-Cities, and Washington State University Spokane,
and the main campuses of community colleges and technical colleges.
(2) Phase two shall provide for (a) connection to the network by
entities that include, but need not be limited to: School districts,
public higher education off-campus and extension centers, and
((branch)) other campuses of community colleges and technical colleges,
as prioritized by the K-20 telecommunications oversight and policy
committee, or as modified by the board; (b) distance education
facilities and components for entities listed in subsections (1) and
(2) of this section; and (c) connection for independent nonprofit
institutions of higher education, provided that:
(i) The K-20 board and each independent nonprofit institution of
higher education to be connected agree in writing to terms and
conditions of connectivity. The terms and conditions shall ensure,
among other things, that the provision of K-20 services does not
violate Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution and that the
institution shall adhere to network policies; and
(ii) The K-20 board determines that inclusion of the independent
nonprofit institutions of higher education will not significantly
affect the network's eligibility for federal universal service fund
discounts or subsidies.
(3) Subsequent phases may include, but need not be limited to,
connections to public libraries, state and local governments, community
resource centers, and the private sector.

--- END ---