BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.110 and 1984 c 7 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person operating any vehicle or moving any object or conveyance
upon any public highway in this state or upon any bridge or elevated
structure that is a part of any such public highway is liable for all
damages that the public highway, bridge, or elevated structure may
sustain as a result of any illegal operation of the vehicle or the
moving of any such object or conveyance or as a result of the operation
or moving of any vehicle, object, or conveyance weighing in excess of
the legal weight limits allowed by law. This section applies to any
person operating any vehicle or moving any object or contrivance in any
illegal or negligent manner or without a special permit as provided by
law for vehicles, objects, or contrivances that are overweight,
overwidth, overheight, or overlength. Any person operating any vehicle
is liable for any damage to any public highway, bridge, or elevated
structure sustained as the result of any negligent operation thereof.
For purposes of this section, the terms "damage" or "damages" include
reasonable expenses incidental to repairing the damage to the structure
or the cleaning of the accident site including, but not limited to,
engineering costs, contract costs, traffic control activities, and
equipment rental. When the operator is not the owner of the vehicle,
object, or contrivance but is operating or moving it with the express
or implied permission of the owner, the owner and the operator are
jointly and severally liable for any such damage. Such damage to any
state highway or structure may be recovered in a civil action
instituted in the name of the state of Washington by the department of
transportation. Any measure of damage to any public highway determined
by the department of transportation by reason of this section is prima
facie the amount of damage caused thereby and is presumed to be the
amount recoverable in any civil action therefor.

--- END ---