BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.370 and 1997 c 432 s 6 and 1997 c 33 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In addition to any other authority which it may have, the
department of licensing may furnish lists of registered and legal
owners of motor vehicles only for the purposes specified in this
section to:
(1) The manufacturers of motor vehicles, or their authorized
agents, to be used to enable those manufacturers to carry out the
provisions of the National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1966
(15 U.S.C. sec. 1382-1418), including amendments or additions thereto,
respecting safety-related defects in motor vehicles;
(2) Any governmental agency of the United States or Canada, or
political subdivisions thereof, to be used by it or by its authorized
commercial agents or contractors only in connection with the
enforcement of motor vehicle or traffic laws by, or programs related to
traffic safety of, that government agency. Only such parts of the list
as are required for completion of the work required of the agent or
contractor shall be provided to such agent or contractor;
(3) A commercial parking company requiring the names and addresses
of registered owners to notify them of outstanding parking violations.
Subject to the disclosure agreement provisions of RCW 46.12.380 and the
requirements of Executive Order 97-01, the department may provide only
the parts of the list that are required for completion of the work
required of the company;
(4) An authorized agent or contractor of the department, to be used
only in connection with providing motor vehicle excise tax, licensing,
title, and registration information to motor vehicle dealers; ((or))
(5) Any business regularly making loans to other persons to finance
the purchase of motor vehicles, to be used to assist the person
requesting the list to determine ownership of specific vehicles for the
purpose of determining whether or not to provide such financing; or
(6) A company or its agents operating a toll facility under chapter
47.46 RCW or other applicable authority requiring the names, addresses,
and vehicle information of motor vehicle registered owners to identify
toll violators.
((In the event)) If a list of registered and legal owners of motor
vehicles is used for any purpose other than that authorized in this
section, the manufacturer, governmental agency, commercial parking
company, authorized agent, contractor, financial institution, toll
facility operator, or their authorized agents or contractors
responsible for the unauthorized disclosure or use will be denied
further access to such information by the department of licensing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Tolls may be collected by any system that identifies the
correct toll and collects the payment. Systems may include manual cash
collection, electronic toll collection, and photo monitoring systems.
(a) "Electronic toll collection system" means a system of
collecting tolls or charges that is capable of charging the account of
the toll patron the appropriate toll or charge by electronic
transmission from the motor vehicle to the toll collection system,
which information is used to charge the appropriate toll or charge to
the patron's account. The department shall adopt rules that allow
automatic vehicle identification transponders used for electronic toll
collection to be compatible with other electronic payment devices or
transponders from the Washington state ferry system, other public
transportation systems, or other toll collection systems to the extent
that technology permits.
(b) "Photo monitoring system" means a vehicle sensor installed to
work in conjunction with an electronic toll collection system in a toll
facility that automatically produces one or more photographs, one or
more microphotographs, a videotape, or other recorded images of each
vehicle at the time it is used or operated within a toll facility.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to govern toll collection.

--- END ---