BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall design and issue disabled parking emblem
versions of special license plates issued under (a) RCW 46.16.301; (b)
RCW 46.16.305, except those plates issued under RCW 46.16.305 (1) and
(2); (c) RCW 46.16.324; (d) RCW 46.16.745; (e) RCW 73.04.110; (f) RCW
73.04.115; or (g) RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as it existed
before amendment by section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997. The disabled
parking emblem version of the special plate must display the universal
symbol of access that may be used in lieu of the parking placard issued
to persons who qualify for special parking privileges under RCW
46.16.381. The department may not charge an additional fee for the
issuance of the special disabled parking emblem license plate, except
the regular motor vehicle registration fee, the fee associated with the
particular special plate, and any other fees and taxes required to be
paid upon registration of a motor vehicle. The emblem must be
incorporated into the design of the special license plate in a manner
to be determined by the department, and under existing vehicular
licensing procedures and existing laws.
(2) Persons who qualify for special parking privileges under RCW
46.16.381, and who have applied and paid the appropriate fee for any of
the special license plates listed in subsection (1) of this section,
are entitled to receive from the department a special disabled parking
emblem license plate. The special disabled parking emblem license
plate may be used for one vehicle registered in the disabled person's
name. Persons who have been issued the parking privileges or who are
using a vehicle displaying the special disabled parking emblem license
plate may park in places reserved for mobility disabled persons.
(3) The special disabled parking emblem license plate must be
administered in the same manner as the plates issued under RCW
46.16.381.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.381 and 2003 c 371 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall grant special parking privileges to any
person who has a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk
and meets one of the following criteria, as determined by a licensed
physician or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW:
(a) Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest;
(b) Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic,
neurological, or orthopedic condition;
(c) Is so severely disabled, that the person cannot walk without
the use of or assistance from a brace, cane, another person, prosthetic
device, wheelchair, or other assistive device;
(d) Uses portable oxygen;
(e) Is restricted by lung disease to such an extent that forced
expiratory respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry is less than
one liter per second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty
mm/hg on room air at rest;
(f) Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to
the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified as
class III or IV under standards accepted by the American Heart
Association; or
(g) Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to
automobile emissions which limits or impairs the ability to walk. The
personal physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner of the
applicant shall document that the disability is comparable in severity
to the others listed in this subsection.
(2) The applications for disabled parking permits and temporary
disabled parking permits are official state documents. Knowingly
providing false information in conjunction with the application is a
gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. The following
statement must appear on each application form immediately below the
physician's or advanced registered nurse practitioner's signature and
immediately below the applicant's signature: "A disabled parking
permit may be issued only for a medical necessity that severely affects
mobility (RCW 46.16.381). Knowingly providing false information on
this application is a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is up to one year
in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both."
(3) Persons who qualify for special parking privileges are entitled
to receive from the department of licensing a removable windshield
placard bearing the international symbol of access and an individual
serial number, along with a special identification card bearing the
name and date of birth of the person to whom the placard is issued, and
the placard's serial number. The special identification card shall be
issued no later than January 1, 2000, to all persons who are issued
parking placards, including those issued for temporary disabilities,
and special disabled parking license plates. The department shall
design the placard to be displayed when the vehicle is parked by
suspending it from the rearview mirror, or in the absence of a rearview
mirror the card may be displayed on the dashboard of any vehicle used
to transport the disabled person. Instead of regular motor vehicle
license plates, disabled persons are entitled to receive special
license plates under this section or section 1 of this act bearing the
international symbol of access for one vehicle registered in the
disabled person's name. Disabled persons who are not issued the
special license plates are entitled to receive a second special placard
upon submitting a written request to the department. Persons who have
been issued the parking privileges and who are using a vehicle or are
riding in a vehicle displaying the placard or special license plates
((or placard)) issued under this section or section 1 of this act may
park in places reserved for mobility disabled persons. The director
shall adopt rules providing for the issuance of special placards and
license plates to public transportation authorities, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, boarding homes licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW, senior citizen centers, private nonprofit agencies as
defined in chapter 24.03 RCW, and vehicles registered with the
department as cabulances that regularly transport disabled persons who
have been determined eligible for special parking privileges provided
under this section. The director may issue special license plates for
a vehicle registered in the name of the public transportation
authority, nursing home, boarding homes, senior citizen center, private
nonprofit agency, or cabulance service if the vehicle is primarily used
to transport persons with disabilities described in this section.
Public transportation authorities, nursing homes, boarding homes,
senior citizen centers, private nonprofit agencies, and cabulance
services are responsible for insuring that the special placards and
license plates are not used improperly and are responsible for all
fines and penalties for improper use.
(4) Whenever the disabled person transfers or assigns his or her
interest in the vehicle, the special license plates shall be removed
from the motor vehicle. If another vehicle is acquired by the disabled
person and the vehicle owner qualifies for a special plate, the plate
shall be attached to the vehicle, and the director shall be immediately
notified of the transfer of the plate. If another vehicle is not
acquired by the disabled person, the removed plate shall be immediately
surrendered to the director.
(5) The special license plate shall be renewed in the same manner
and at the time required for the renewal of regular motor vehicle
license plates under this chapter. No special license plate may be
issued to a person who is temporarily disabled. A person who has a
condition expected to improve within six months may be issued a
temporary placard for a period not to exceed six months. If the
condition exists after six months a new temporary placard shall be
issued upon receipt of a new certification from the disabled person's
physician. The permanent parking placard and identification card of a
disabled person shall be renewed at least every five years, as required
by the director, by satisfactory proof of the right to continued use of
the privileges. In the event of the permit holder's death, the parking
placard and identification card must be immediately surrendered to the
department. The department shall match and purge its disabled permit
data base with available death record information at least every twelve
months.
(6) Each person who has been issued a permanent disabled parking
permit on or before July 1, 1998, must renew the permit no later than
July 1, 2003, subject to a schedule to be set by the department, or the
permit will expire.
(7) Additional fees shall not be charged for the issuance of the
special placards or the identification cards. No additional fee may be
charged for the issuance of the special license plates except the
regular motor vehicle registration fee and any other fees and taxes
required to be paid upon registration of a motor vehicle.
(8) Any unauthorized use of the special placard, special license
plate issued under this section or section 1 of this act, or
identification card is a traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of
two hundred fifty dollars.
(9) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars for a person to make inaccessible the access
aisle located next to a space reserved for physically disabled persons.
The clerk of the court shall report all violations related to this
subsection to the department.
(10) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars for any person to park a vehicle in a parking
place provided on private property without charge or on public property
reserved for physically disabled persons without a placard or special
license plate ((or placard)) issued under this section or section 1 of
this act. If a person is charged with a violation, the person shall
not be determined to have committed an infraction if the person
produces in court or before the court appearance the placard or special
license plate ((or placard)) issued under this section or section 1 of
this act required under this section. A local jurisdiction providing
nonmetered, on-street parking places reserved for physically disabled
persons may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less than four
hours on the use of these parking places. A local jurisdiction may
impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less than four hours on the
use of nonreserved, on-street parking spaces by vehicles displaying the
special parking placards or special license plates issued under this
section or section 1 of this act. All time restrictions must be
clearly posted.
(11) The penalties imposed under subsections (9) and (10) of this
section shall be used by that local jurisdiction exclusively for law
enforcement. The court may also impose an additional penalty
sufficient to reimburse the local jurisdiction for any costs it may
have incurred in removal and storage of the improperly parked vehicle.
(12) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, it is a
traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars
for any person willfully to obtain a special license plate issued under
this section or section 1 of this act, placard, or identification card
in a manner other than that established under this section.
(13)(a) A law enforcement agency authorized to enforce parking laws
may appoint volunteers, with a limited commission, to issue notices of
infractions for violations of this section or RCW 46.61.581.
Volunteers must be at least twenty-one years of age. The law
enforcement agency appointing volunteers may establish any other
qualifications the agency deems desirable.
(b) An agency appointing volunteers under this section must provide
training to the volunteers before authorizing them to issue notices of
infractions.
(c) A notice of infraction issued by a volunteer appointed under
this subsection has the same force and effect as a notice of infraction
issued by a police officer for the same offense.
(d) A police officer or a volunteer may request a person to show
the person's identification card or special parking placard when
investigating the possibility of a violation of this section. If the
request is refused, the person in charge of the vehicle may be issued
a notice of infraction for a violation of this section.
(14) For second or subsequent violations of this section, in
addition to a monetary fine, the violator must complete a minimum of
forty hours of:
(a) Community restitution for a nonprofit organization that serves
the disabled community or persons having disabling diseases; or
(b) Any other community restitution that may sensitize the violator
to the needs and obstacles faced by persons who have disabilities.
(15) The court may not suspend more than one-half of any fine
imposed under subsection (8), (9), (10), or (12) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.735 and 2003 c 196 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For an organization to qualify for a special license plate
under the special license plate approval program created in RCW
46.16.705 through 46.16.765, the sponsoring organization must submit
documentation in conjunction with the application to the department
that verifies:
(a) That the organization is a nonprofit organization, as defined
in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3). The department may request a copy of an
Internal Revenue Service ruling to verify an organization's nonprofit
status; and
(b) That the organization is located in Washington and has
registered as a charitable organization with the secretary of state's
office as required by law.
(2) For a governmental body to qualify for a special license plate
under the special license plate approval program created in RCW
46.16.705 through 46.16.765, a governmental body must be:
(a) A political subdivision, including but not limited to any
county, city, town, municipal corporation, or special purpose taxing
district that has the express permission of the political subdivision's
executive body to sponsor a special license plate;
(b) A federally recognized tribal government that has received the
approval of the executive body of that government to sponsor a special
license plate;
(c) A state agency that has ((both)) received approval from the
director of the agency or the department head((, and has the express
statutory authority to sponsor a special license plate)); or
(d) A community or technical college that has the express
permission of the college's board of trustees to sponsor a special
license plate.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.755 and 2003 c 196 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Revenues generated from the sale of special license plates
for those sponsoring organizations who used the application process in
RCW 46.16.745(3) must be deposited into the motor vehicle account until
the department determines that the state's implementation costs have
been fully reimbursed. The department shall apply the application fee
required under RCW 46.16.745(3)(a) towards those costs.
(b) When it is determined that the state has been fully reimbursed
the department must notify the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees, the sponsoring organization, and the
treasurer, and commence the distribution of the revenue as otherwise
provided by law.
(2) If reimbursement does not occur within ((the two-year time
frame)) two years from the date the plate is first offered for sale to
the public, the special license plate series must be placed in
probationary status for a period of one year from that date. If the
state is still not fully reimbursed for its implementation costs after
the one-year probation, the plate series must be discontinued
immediately. Special plates issued before discontinuation are valid
until replaced under RCW 46.16.233. ((The state must be reimbursed for
its portion of the implementation costs within two years from the date
the new plate series goes on sale to the public.))
(3) The special license plate applicant trust account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from special license
plate applicants, except the application fee as provided in RCW
46.16.745(3), must be deposited into the account. Only the director of
the department or the director's designee may authorize disbursements
from the account. The account is not subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, nor is an appropriation required
for disbursements.
(4) The department shall provide the special license plate
applicant with a written receipt for the payment.
(5) The department shall maintain a record of each special license
plate applicant trust account deposit, including, but not limited to,
the name and address of each special license plate applicant whose
funds are being deposited, the amount paid, and the date of the
deposit.
(6) After the department receives written notice that the special
license plate applicant's application has been:
(a) Approved by the legislature the director shall request that the
money be transferred to the motor vehicle account;
(b) Denied by the special license plate review board or the
legislature the director shall provide a refund to the applicant within
thirty days; or
(c) Withdrawn by the special license plate applicant the director
shall provide a refund to the applicant within thirty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect
November 1, 2004.

--- END ---