BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tax is imposed on persons engaged in the business of
sampling. The tax shall equal one dollar per sample distributed by the
sampler.
(2) The sampler shall maintain records regarding the number of
tobacco samples distributed to members of the general public.
(3) The department may adopt rules necessary to administer this
section.
(4) The administrative provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to
this section.
(5) The terms "sampler" and "sampling" have the meaning provided in
RCW 70.155.010.
(6) The tobacco sampling enforcement account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the tax imposed in
this section must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the enforcement of the tax provisions of
this section and the enforcement of the sampling provisions of chapter
70.155 RCW. The department of revenue shall only retain the necessary
proceeds to administer the tax provisions of this section and remit all
remaining proceeds to the liquor control board for the enforcement of
the sampling provisions of chapter 70.155 RCW. Only the director of
the department of revenue or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

--- END ---