BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.34.020 and 2003 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity
with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable
person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing,
shelter, or health care.
(2) "Abuse" means the willful action or inaction that inflicts
injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a
vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is
unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse,
and exploitation of a vulnerable adult, which have the following
meanings:
(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual contact,
including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape,
sodomy, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and sexual
harassment. Sexual abuse includes any sexual contact between a staff
person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff
person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a
vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a
program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is
consensual.
(b) "Physical abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily
injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not
limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching,
choking, kicking, shoving, prodding, or the use of chemical restraints
or physical restraints unless the restraints are consistent with
licensing requirements, and includes restraints that are otherwise
being used inappropriately.
(c) "Mental abuse" means any willful action or inaction of mental
or verbal abuse. Mental abuse includes, but is not limited to,
coercion, harassment, inappropriately isolating a vulnerable adult from
family, friends, or regular activity, and verbal assault that includes
ridiculing, intimidating, yelling, or swearing.
(d) "Exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting
undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to
act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or
causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of
another.
(3) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the
vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully
informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the
receipt of services is voluntary.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, boarding homes; chapter 18.51 RCW,
nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36
RCW, soldiers' homes; or chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation
centers; or any other facility licensed by the department.
(6) "Facility designated reporter" means an employee of a facility,
as defined in subsection (5) of this section, designated by the
facility to report to the department incidents as defined in subsection
(8) of this section.
(7) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of
the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult
by any person for any person's profit or advantage.
(((7))) (8) "Incident" means an occurrence of abuse; neglect;
abandonment; misappropriation of resident property; financial
exploitation; or a substantial injury of unknown source, or cause, or
circumstance, involving a resident in a facility.
(9) "Individual provider" means a person under contract with the
department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or
74.39A RCW.
(((8))) (10) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department;
law enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel;
individual provider; an employee of a facility; an operator of a
facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health,
adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, or hospice
agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science
practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.
(((9))) (11) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction
by a person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the
goods and services that maintain physical or mental health of a
vulnerable adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental
harm or pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission that
demonstrates a serious disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as
to constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's
health, welfare, or safety.
(((10))) (12) "Permissive reporter" means any person, employee of
a financial institution, attorney, or volunteer in a facility or
program providing services for vulnerable adults.
(((11))) (13) "Protective services" means any services provided by
the department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable
adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has
been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state
of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to
case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for
medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral
for legal assistance.
(((12))) (14) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable
adult, not living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the
goods and services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or
mental health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the
vulnerable adult's well-being. This definition may include a
vulnerable adult who is receiving services through home health,
hospice, or a home care agency, or an individual provider when the
neglect is not a result of inaction by that agency or individual
provider.
(((13))) (15) "Substantial injury of unknown source" means injuries
greater than superficial that would require more than first aid and may
require close monitoring by nursing or medical staff; or those injuries
occurring in areas not generally vulnerable to trauma, such as injuries
to the back, face, head, neck, chest, breasts, groin, inner thigh,
buttock, genital, or anal area.
(16) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:
(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or
physical inability to care for himself or herself; or
(b) Found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or
(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW
71A.10.020; or
(d) Admitted to any facility; or
(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care
agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW;
or
(f) Receiving services from an individual provider.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.34.035 and 2003 c 230 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When there is reasonable cause to believe that abandonment,
abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect of a vulnerable adult has
occurred, mandated reporters shall immediately report to the
department. However, a mandated reporter who works in a facility shall
report consistent with subsections (2) through (5) of this section.
(2) When there is reason to suspect that sexual assault has
occurred, mandated reporters shall immediately report to the
appropriate law enforcement agency and to the department.
(3) When there is reason to suspect that physical assault has
occurred or there is reasonable cause to believe that an act has caused
fear of imminent harm:
(a) Mandated reporters shall immediately report to the department;
and
(b) Mandated reporters shall immediately report to the appropriate
law enforcement agency, except as provided in subsection (((4))) (8) of
this section.
(4) A mandated reporter who works in a facility shall make a report
to the department when the reporter:
(a) Observes an incident;
(b) Hears the vulnerable adult state that the incident happened;
(c) Hears about an incident from a permissive reporter who has
direct knowledge of the incident; or
(d) hears about an incident from a mandated reporter who has direct
knowledge of the incident but who has not reported as required.
(5) The facility shall designate staff, known as facility
designated reporters, to immediately report to the department any
incident, as defined in this chapter. The facility shall have a
facility designated reporter available twenty-four hours per day. The
facility designated reporter shall make reports on behalf of the
facility, however, if the facility designated reporter also has a
separate obligation under this chapter to make an individual mandated
report, one report satisfies both obligations.
(6) The reporting criteria, described in subsection (1) of this
section, shall apply when determining whether a report under
subsections (4)(b) and (5) of this section must be made to the
department.
(7) Nursing facilities shall also report consistent with federal
requirements.
(8) A mandated reporter is not required to report to a law
enforcement agency, unless requested by the injured vulnerable adult or
his or her legal representative or family member, an incident of
physical assault between vulnerable adults that causes minor bodily
injury and does not require more than basic first aid, unless:
(a) The injury appears on the back, face, head, neck, chest,
breasts, groin, inner thigh, buttock, genital, or anal area;
(b) There is a fracture;
(c) There is a pattern of physical assault between the same
vulnerable adults or involving the same vulnerable adults; or
(d) There is an attempt to choke a vulnerable adult.
(((5))) (9) Permissive reporters may report to the department or a
law enforcement agency when there is reasonable cause to believe that
a vulnerable adult is being or has been abandoned, abused, financially
exploited, or neglected.
(((6))) (10) No facility, as defined by this chapter, agency
licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, or
facility or agency under contract with the department to provide care
for vulnerable adults may develop policies or procedures that interfere
with the reporting requirements of this chapter.
(((7))) (11) Each report, oral or written, must contain as much as
possible of the following information:
(a) The name and address of the person making the report;
(b) The name and address of the vulnerable adult and the name of
the facility or agency providing care for the vulnerable adult;
(c) The name and address of the legal guardian or alternate
decision maker;
(d) The nature and extent of the abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect;
(e) Any history of previous abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect;
(f) The identity of the alleged perpetrator, if known; and
(g) Other information that may be helpful in establishing the
extent of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or the
cause of death of the deceased vulnerable adult.
(((8))) (12) Unless there is a judicial proceeding or the person
consents, the identity of the person making the report under this
section is confidential.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.42.010 and 1997 c 392 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Basic necessities of life" means food, water, shelter,
clothing, and medically necessary health care, including but not
limited to health-related treatment or activities, hygiene, oxygen, and
medication.
(2)(a) "Bodily injury" means physical pain or injury, illness, or
an impairment of physical condition;
(b) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury which involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement, or which causes a temporary
but substantial loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part
or organ, or which causes a fracture of any bodily part;
(c) "Great bodily harm" means bodily injury which creates a high
probability of death, or which causes serious permanent disfigurement,
or which causes a permanent or protracted loss or impairment of the
function of any bodily part or organ.
(3) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age.
(4) "Dependent person" means a person who, because of physical or
mental disability, or because of extreme advanced age, is dependent
upon another person to provide the basic necessities of life. A
resident of a nursing home, as defined in RCW 18.51.010, a resident of
an adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, and a frail elder
or vulnerable adult, as defined in RCW 74.34.020(((8))) (16), is
presumed to be a dependent person for purposes of this chapter.
(5) "Employed" means hired by a dependent person, another person
acting on behalf of a dependent person, or by an organization or
governmental entity, to provide to a dependent person any of the basic
necessities of life. A person may be "employed" regardless of whether
the person is paid for the services or, if paid, regardless of who pays
for the person's services.
(6) "Parent" has its ordinary meaning and also includes a guardian
and the authorized agent of a parent or guardian.
(7) "Abandons" means leaving a child or other dependent person
without the means or ability to obtain one or more of the basic
necessities of life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---