BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any two or more employers in the logging industry may enter
into agreements to form self-insurance groups for the purposes of this
chapter if:
(a) The employers are members of an organization that meets the
following conditions:
(i) The organization has been in existence for at least five years;
(ii) The organization was formed for a purpose other than that of
obtaining workers' compensation coverage under this section;
(iii) The occupations of the employers within the organization are
substantially similar and within the logging industry, taking into
consideration the nature of the services being performed by employees
of the employers;
(iv) The organization permits any employer assigned a risk
classification within the logging industry, as determined by the
director, to join the organization for the purpose of self-insuring, if
the employer meets the membership requirements and follows the rules
established for the self-insurance group; and
(v) The organization permits any of its members who are employers
assigned a risk classification within the logging industry, as
determined by the director, to join the self-insurance group; and
(b) The formation and operation of the group self-insurance program
will improve accident prevention and claim management for the employers
in the group.
(2) A self-insurance group formed under this section shall organize
and operate under rules adopted by the director under RCW 51.14.160.
(3) A self-insurance group under this section is an "employer" for
the purposes of this chapter, except RCW 51.14.077, and may qualify as
a self-insurer if it meets all the other requirements of this chapter.
(4)(a) The group self-insurers' insolvency trust account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the
insolvency assessment under (b) of this subsection shall be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only to
provide for the unsecured benefits paid to the injured employees of
group self-insured employers under this title for insolvent or
defaulting groups of member employers and for the department's
associated administrative costs, including attorneys' fees. Only the
director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
(b) To fund the group self-insurers' insolvency trust account, the
department shall levy an insolvency assessment on a postinsolvency
basis and after the defaulting group's and individual member employers'
security deposit assets and reinsurance have been exhausted. The
department shall impose insolvency assessments on all group self-insurers except school districts, educational service districts,
hospital districts, and hospitals. The department shall adopt rules to
set forth the manner of imposing and collecting assessments to ensure
that group self-insured employers pay into the account in proportion to
their claim costs. The department's rules must provide that self-
insurance groups or member employers who have surrendered their
certification are assessed for a period of a maximum of three calendar
years following the termination date of their certification.
(c) The director shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of
this subsection, including but not limited to: Governing the formation
of the group self-insurers' insolvency trust account for the purpose of
this chapter; governing the organization and operation of the self-insurers' insolvency trust account to assure compliance with this
chapter; requiring adequate accountability of the collection and
disbursement of funds in the group self-insurers' insolvency trust
account; and any other provisions necessary to carry out this chapter.

--- END ---