BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.085 and 1987 c 351 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the original birth certificate, the state
registrar shall issue upon request and upon payment of ((a fee of
twenty-five dollars)) the fee established pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section a birth certificate representing that the birth of the
person named thereon is recorded in the office of the registrar. The
certificate issued under this section shall be in a form consistent
with the need to protect the integrity of vital records but shall be
suitable for display. It may bear the seal of the state printed
thereon and may be signed by the governor. It shall have the same
status as evidence as the original birth certificate.
(2) Of the funds received under subsection (1) of this section, the
amount needed to reimburse the registrar for expenses incurred in
administering this section shall be credited to the state registrar
account. The remainder shall be credited to the children's trust fund
established under RCW 43.121.100.
(3) The fee shall be set by the council established pursuant to RCW
43.121.020, at a level likely to maximize revenues for the children's
trust fund.

--- END ---