BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 20.01.010 and 2003 c 395 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title the terms defined in this section have the
meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Director" means the director of agriculture or a duly
authorized representative.
(2) "Person" means any natural person, firm, partnership, exchange,
association, trustee, receiver, corporation, and any member, officer,
or employee thereof or assignee for the benefit of creditors.
(3) "Agricultural product" means any unprocessed horticultural,
vermicultural and its byproducts, viticultural, berry, poultry, poultry
product, grain, bee, or other agricultural products((, and)).
"Agricultural product" also includes mint or mint oil processed by or
for the producer thereof ((and)), hay and straw baled or prepared for
market in any manner or form and livestock, and agricultural seed,
flower seed, vegetable seed, other crop seed, and seeds, as defined in
chapter 15.49 RCW.
(4) "Producer" means any person engaged in the business of growing
or producing any agricultural product, whether as the owner of the
products, or producing the products for others holding the title
thereof.
(5) "Consignor" means any producer, person, or his agent who sells,
ships, or delivers to any commission merchant, dealer, cash buyer, or
agent, any agricultural product for processing, handling, sale, or
resale.
(6) "Commission merchant" means any person who receives on
consignment for sale or processing and sale from the consignor thereof
any agricultural product for sale on commission on behalf of the
consignor, or who accepts any farm product in trust from the consignor
thereof for the purpose of resale, or who sells or offers for sale on
commission any agricultural product, or who in any way handles for the
account of or as an agent of the consignor thereof, any agricultural
product.
(7) "Dealer" means any person other than a cash buyer, as defined
in subsection (10) of this section, who solicits, contracts for, or
obtains from the consignor thereof for reselling or processing, title,
possession, or control of any agricultural product, or who buys or
agrees to buy any agricultural product from the consignor thereof for
sale or processing and includes any person, other than one who acts
solely as a producer, who retains title in an agricultural product and
delivers it to a producer for further production or increase. For the
purposes of this chapter, the term dealer includes any person who
purchases livestock on behalf of and for the account of another, or who
purchases cattle in another state or country and imports these cattle
into this state for resale.
(8) "Limited dealer" means any person who buys, agrees to buy, or
pays for the production or increase of any agricultural product by
paying to the consignor at the time of obtaining possession or control
of any agricultural product the full agreed price of the agricultural
product and who operates under the alternative bonding provision in RCW
20.01.211.
(9) "Broker" means any person other than a commission merchant,
dealer, or cash buyer who negotiates the purchase or sale of any
agricultural product, but no broker may handle the agricultural
products involved or proceeds of the sale.
(10) "Cash buyer" means any person other than a commission
merchant, dealer, or broker, who obtains from the consignor thereof for
the purpose of resale or processing, title, possession, or control of
any agricultural product or who contracts for the title, possession, or
control of any agricultural product, or who buys or agrees to buy for
resale any agricultural product by paying to the consignor at the time
of obtaining possession or control of any agricultural product the full
agreed price of the agricultural product, in coin or currency, lawful
money of the United States. However, a cashier's check, certified
check, credit card, or bankdraft may be used for the payment. For the
purposes of this subsection, "agricultural product," does not include
hay, grain, straw, or livestock.
(11) "Agent" means any person who, on behalf of any commission
merchant, dealer, broker, or cash buyer, acts as liaison between a
consignor and a principal, or receives, contracts for, or solicits any
agricultural product from the consignor thereof or who negotiates the
consignment or purchase of any agricultural product on behalf of any
commission merchant, dealer, broker, or cash buyer and who transacts
all or a portion of that business at any location other than at the
principal place of business of his employer. With the exception of an
agent for a commission merchant or dealer handling horticultural
products, an agent may operate only in the name of one principal and
only to the account of that principal.
(12) "Retail merchant" means any person operating from a bona fide
or established place of business selling agricultural products twelve
months of each year.
(13) "Fixed or established place of business" for the purpose of
this chapter means any permanent warehouse, building, or structure, at
which necessary and appropriate equipment and fixtures are maintained
for properly handling those agricultural products generally dealt in,
and at which supplies of the agricultural products being usually
transported are stored, offered for sale, sold, delivered, and
generally dealt with in quantities reasonably adequate for and usually
carried for the requirements of such a business, and that is recognized
as a permanent business at such place, and carried on as such in good
faith and not for the purpose of evading this chapter, and where
specifically designated personnel are available to handle transactions
concerning those agricultural products generally dealt in, which
personnel are available during designated and appropriate hours to that
business, and shall not mean a residence, barn, garage, tent, temporary
stand or other temporary quarters, any railway car, or permanent
quarters occupied pursuant to any temporary arrangement.
(14) "Processor" means any person, firm, company, or other
organization that purchases agricultural crops from a consignor and
that cans, freezes, dries, dehydrates, cooks, presses, powders, or
otherwise processes those crops in any manner whatsoever for eventual
resale.
(15) "Pooling contract" means any written agreement whereby a
consignor delivers a horticultural product to a commission merchant
under terms whereby the commission merchant may commingle the
consignor's horticultural products for sale with others similarly
agreeing, which must include all of the following:
(a) A delivery receipt for the consignor that indicates the variety
of horticultural product delivered, the number of containers, or the
weight and tare thereof;
(b) Horticultural products received for handling and sale in the
fresh market shall be accounted for to the consignor with individual
pack-out records that shall include variety, grade, size, and date of
delivery. Individual daily packing summaries shall be available within
forty-eight hours after packing occurs. However, platform inspection
shall be acceptable by mutual contract agreement on small deliveries to
determine variety, grade, size, and date of delivery;
(c) Terms under which the commission merchant may use his judgment
in regard to the sale of the pooled horticultural product;
(d) The charges to be paid by the consignor as filed with the state
of Washington;
(e) A provision that the consignor shall be paid for his pool
contribution when the pool is in the process of being marketed in
direct proportion, not less than eighty percent of his interest less
expenses directly incurred, prior liens, and other advances on the
grower's crop unless otherwise mutually agreed upon between grower and
commission merchant.
(16) "Date of sale" means the date agricultural products are
delivered to the person buying the products.
(17) "Conditioner" means any person, firm, company, or other
organization that receives ((turf, forage, or vegetable)) seeds from a
consignor for drying or cleaning.
(18) "Seed bailment contract" means any contract meeting the
requirements of chapter 15.48 RCW.
(19) "Proprietary seed" means any seed that is protected under the
Federal Plant Variety Protection Act.
(20) "Licensed public weighmaster" means any person, licensed under
the provisions of chapter 15.80 RCW, who weighs, measures, or counts
any commodity or thing and issues therefor a signed certified
statement, ticket, or memorandum of weight, measure, or count upon
which the purchase or sale of any commodity or upon which the basic
charge of payment for services rendered is based.
(21) "Certified weight" means any signed certified statement or
memorandum of weight, measure or count issued by a licensed public
weighmaster in accordance with the provisions of chapter 15.80 RCW.
(22) "Licensee" means any person or business licensed under this
chapter as a commission merchant, dealer, limited dealer, broker, cash
buyer, or agent.
(23) "Seed" means agricultural seed, flower seed, vegetable seed,
other crop seed, and seeds, as defined in chapter 15.49 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 20.01.210 and 1991 c 109 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before the license is issued to any commission merchant or
dealer, or both, the applicant shall execute and deliver to the
director a surety bond executed by the applicant as principal and by a
surety company qualified and authorized to do business in this state as
surety. ((Said)) The bond shall be to the state for the benefit of
qualified consignors of agricultural products in this state. All such
sureties on a bond, as provided ((herein)) in this section, shall be
released and discharged from all liability to the state accruing on
such bond by giving notice to the principal and the director by
certified mail. Upon receipt of such notice the director shall notify
the surety and the principal of the effective date of termination which
shall be thirty days from the receipt of such notice by the director,
but this shall not relieve, release, or discharge the surety from any
liability already accrued or which shall accrue before the expiration
period provided for ((above)) in this subsection.
(2) The bond for a commission merchant or dealer in hay, straw, or
((turf, forage or vegetable)) seed shall be not less than fifteen
thousand dollars. The actual amount of such bond shall be determined
by dividing the annual dollar volume of the licensee's net proceeds or
net payments due consignors by twelve and increasing that amount to the
next multiple of five thousand dollars((, except that the bond amount
for dollar volume arising from proprietary seed bailment contracts
shall be computed as provided in subsection (4) of this section)).
((Such)) The bond for a new commission merchant or dealer in hay,
straw, or ((turf, forage or vegetable)) seed shall be subject to
increase at any time during the licensee's first year of operation
based on the average of business volume for any three months. Except
as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the bond shall be not
less than ten thousand dollars for any other dealer.
(3) The bond for a commission merchant or dealer in livestock shall
be not less than ten thousand dollars. The actual amount of such bond
shall be determined in accordance with the formula set forth in the
packers and stockyard act of 1921 (7 U.S.C. 181), except that a
commission merchant or dealer in livestock shall increase the
commission merchant's or dealer's bond by five thousand dollars for
each agent the commission merchant or dealer has endorsed under RCW
20.01.090. A dealer who also acts as an order buyer for other persons
who are also licensed and bonded under this chapter or under the
packers and stockyards act (7 U.S.C. 181) may subtract that amount of
business from the annual gross volume of purchases reported to the
director in determining the amount of bond coverage that must be
provided and maintained for the purposes of this chapter.
(4) The bond for a commission merchant handling agricultural
products other than livestock, hay, straw, or ((turf, forage or
vegetable)) seed shall not be less than ten thousand dollars. The bond
for a dealer handling agricultural products other than livestock, hay,
straw, or ((turf, forage or vegetable)) seed shall not be less than ten
thousand dollars. The actual amount of such bond shall be determined
by dividing the annual dollar volume of the licensee's net proceeds or
net payments due consignors by fifty-two and increasing that amount to
the next multiple of two thousand dollars. However, bonds above
twenty-six thousand dollars shall be increased to the next multiple of
five thousand dollars.
(5) When the annual dollar volume of any commission merchant or
dealer reaches two million six hundred thousand dollars, the amount of
the bond required above this level shall be on a basis of ten percent
of the amount arrived at by applying the appropriate formula.

Sec. 3 RCW 20.01.465 and 1991 c 109 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the preparation and use of written contracts, it is unlawful
for a commission merchant to include in such contracts a requirement
that a consignor give up all involvement in determining the time the
consignor's agricultural products will be sold. ((This provision))
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to agricultural
products consigned to a commission merchant under a written pooling
agreement.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to seeds
consigned to a commission merchant.

--- END ---