BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the first
amendment to the United States Constitution and Article I, section 11
of the Washington state Constitution guarantee and protect freedom of
religion, including the freedom of an individual to conscientiously
object to certain actions based upon religious beliefs. The
legislature further finds that it is a matter of state concern that
these freedoms be protected to the fullest extent under the law.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.030 and 1997 c 271 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to be free from discrimination because of race,
creed, color, national origin, religious belief, sex, or the presence
of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained
dog guide or service animal by a disabled person is recognized as and
declared to be a civil right. This right shall include, but not be
limited to:
(a) The right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination;
(b) The right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations,
advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement;
(c) The right to engage in real estate transactions without
discrimination, including discrimination against families with
children;
(d) The right to engage in credit transactions without
discrimination;
(e) The right to engage in insurance transactions or transactions
with health maintenance organizations without discrimination:
PROVIDED, That a practice which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300,
48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not constitute an unfair practice for the
purposes of this subparagraph; ((and))
(f) The right to engage in commerce free from any discriminatory
boycotts or blacklists. Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for
purposes of this section shall be defined as the formation or execution
of any express or implied agreement, understanding, policy or
contractual arrangement for economic benefit between any persons which
is not specifically authorized by the laws of the United States and
which is required or imposed, either directly or indirectly, overtly or
covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in order to
restrict, condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to exclude
any person or persons from any business relationship on the basis of
race, color, creed, religion, sex, the presence of any sensory, mental,
or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service
animal by a disabled person, or national origin or lawful business
relationship: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That nothing herein contained shall
prohibit the use of boycotts as authorized by law pertaining to labor
disputes and unfair labor practices; and
(g) The right to conscientious objection to the performance of acts
in contravention of an individual's bona fide doctrinal religious
beliefs.
(2) Any person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in
violation of this chapter shall have a civil action in a court of
competent jurisdiction to enjoin further violations, or to recover the
actual damages sustained by the person, or both, together with the cost
of suit including reasonable attorneys' fees or any other appropriate
remedy authorized by this chapter or the United States Civil Rights Act
of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988
(42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).
(3) Except for any unfair practice committed by an employer against
an employee or a prospective employee, or any unfair practice in a real
estate transaction which is the basis for relief specified in the
amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained in chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any
unfair practice prohibited by this chapter which is committed in the
course of trade or commerce as defined in the Consumer Protection Act,
chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying that chapter, a
matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in relation to
the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.60.180 and 1997 c 271 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is an unfair practice for any employer:
(1) To refuse to hire any person because of age, sex, marital
status, race, creed, color, national origin, or the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog
guide or service animal by a disabled person, unless based upon a bona
fide occupational qualification: PROVIDED, That the prohibition
against discrimination because of such disability shall not apply if
the particular disability prevents the proper performance of the
particular worker involved.
(2) To discharge or bar any person from employment because of age,
sex, marital status, race, creed, color, national origin, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of
a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person.
(3) To discriminate against any person in compensation or in other
terms or conditions of employment because of age, sex, marital status,
race, creed, color, national origin, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a disabled person: PROVIDED, That it shall not be an
unfair practice for an employer to segregate washrooms or locker
facilities on the basis of sex, or to base other terms and conditions
of employment on the sex of employees where the commission by
regulation or ruling in a particular instance has found the employment
practice to be appropriate for the practical realization of equality of
opportunity between the sexes.
(4) To print, or circulate, or cause to be printed or circulated
any statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use any form of
application for employment, or to make any inquiry in connection with
prospective employment, which expresses any limitation, specification,
or discrimination as to age, sex, marital status, race, creed, color,
national origin, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person, or any intent to make any such limitation,
specification, or discrimination, unless based upon a bona fide
occupational qualification: PROVIDED, Nothing contained herein shall
prohibit advertising in a foreign language.
(5) To coerce or attempt to coerce an employee to perform an act in
contravention of the employee's bona fide doctrinal religious beliefs.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.36.080 and 1993 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious harassment if he or she
maliciously and intentionally commits one of the following acts because
of his or her perception of the victim's race, color, religion,
ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, or mental,
physical, or sensory handicap:
(a) Causes physical injury to the victim or another person;
(b) Causes physical damage to or destruction of the property of the
victim or another person; ((or))
(c) Threatens a specific person or group of persons and places that
person, or members of the specific group of persons, in reasonable fear
of harm to person or property. The fear must be a fear that a
reasonable person would have under all the circumstances. For purposes
of this section, a "reasonable person" is a reasonable person who is a
member of the victim's race, color, religion, ancestry, national
origin, gender, or sexual orientation, or who has the same mental,
physical, or sensory handicap as the victim. Words alone do not
constitute malicious harassment unless the context or circumstances
surrounding the words indicate the words are a threat. Threatening
words do not constitute malicious harassment if it is apparent to the
victim that the person does not have the ability to carry out the
threat; or
(d) Uses the judicial process in an attempt to coerce an individual
to act in contravention of the individual's bona fide doctrinal
religious beliefs.
(2) In any prosecution for malicious harassment, unless evidence
exists which explains to the trier of fact's satisfaction that the
person did not intend to threaten the victim or victims, the trier of
fact may infer that the person intended to threaten a specific victim
or group of victims because of the person's perception of the victim's
or victims' race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender,
sexual orientation, or mental, physical, or sensory handicap if the
person commits one of the following acts:
(a) Burns a cross on property of a victim who is or whom the actor
perceives to be of African American heritage; or
(b) Defaces property of a victim who is or whom the actor perceives
to be of Jewish heritage by defacing the property with a swastika.
This subsection only applies to the creation of a reasonable
inference for evidentiary purposes. This subsection does not restrict
the state's ability to prosecute a person under subsection (1) of this
section when the facts of a particular case do not fall within (a) or
(b) of this subsection.
(3) It is not a defense that the accused was mistaken that the
victim was a member of a certain race, color, religion, ancestry,
national origin, gender, or sexual orientation, or had a mental,
physical, or sensory handicap.
(4) Evidence of expressions or associations of the accused may not
be introduced as substantive evidence at trial unless the evidence
specifically relates to the crime charged. Nothing in this chapter
shall affect the rules of evidence governing impeachment of a witness.
(5) Every person who commits another crime during the commission of
a crime under this section may be punished and prosecuted for the other
crime separately.
(6) "Sexual orientation" for the purposes of this section means
heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality.
(7) Malicious harassment is a class C felony.
(8) The penalties provided in this section for malicious harassment
do not preclude the victims from seeking any other remedies otherwise
available under law.
(9) Nothing in this section confers or expands any civil rights or
protections to any group or class identified under this section, beyond
those rights or protections that exist under the federal or state
Constitution or the civil laws of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is to be broadly and liberally
construed to provide an individual with the ability to exercise the
right to religiously based conscientious objection.

--- END ---