BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the importance of
obtaining an education has increased significantly during the past
several decades. For a child to obtain a quality education, it is
important that instruction and assistance be provided to the child at
an early age. Children learn quickly when they are young, and if
instruction is not available they will likely fall behind their peers.
This instruction may be provided by parents in home-school settings, or
through more formal schooling opportunities.
The legislature further finds that while the majority of children
are regularly attending school or are being homeschooled by the age of
six, a small number of children are not. Under current law, children
are not required to attend school until they are eight years of age.
It is the intent of the legislature to lower the age of compulsory
education, and thereby better ensure that children are provided an
education at an early age.
By lowering the age of compulsory attendance, the legislature does
not intend to change the laws governing the provision of home-based
instruction, including changing the age when registration is required,
testing is required, or course offerings are required.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.010 and 1998 c 244 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All parents in this state of any child ((eight)) six years of
age by midnight August 31st and under eighteen years of age shall cause
such child to attend the public school of the district in which the
child resides and such child shall have the responsibility to and
therefore shall attend for the full time when such school may be in
session unless:
(a) The child is attending an approved private school for the same
time or is enrolled in an extension program as provided in RCW
28A.195.010(4);
(b) The child is receiving home-based instruction as provided in
subsection (4) of this section;
(c) The child is attending an education center as provided in
chapter 28A.205 RCW;
(d) The school district superintendent of the district in which the
child resides shall have excused such child from attendance because the
child is physically or mentally unable to attend school, is attending
a residential school operated by the department of social and health
services, is incarcerated in an adult correctional facility, or has
been temporarily excused upon the request of his or her parents for
purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the parent:
PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed
to cause a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational
progress: PROVIDED FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary
absences may be claimed as full time equivalent students to the extent
they would otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and shall not affect school district
compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220; or
(e) The child is sixteen years of age or older and:
(i) The child is regularly and lawfully employed and either the
parent agrees that the child should not be required to attend school or
the child is emancipated in accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;
(ii) The child has already met graduation requirements in
accordance with state board of education rules and regulations; or
(iii) The child has received a certificate of educational
competence under rules and regulations established by the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.190.
(2) A parent for the purpose of this chapter means a parent,
guardian, or person having legal custody of a child.
(3) An approved private school for the purposes of this chapter and
chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be one approved under regulations established
by the state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130.
(4) For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW,
instruction shall be home-based for students eight years of age or
older if it consists of planned and supervised instructional and
related educational activities, including a curriculum and instruction
in the basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics,
language, social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling,
and the development of an appreciation of art and music, provided for
a number of hours equivalent to the total annual program hours per
grade level established for approved private schools under RCW
28A.195.010 and 28A.195.040 and if such activities are:
(a) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only
and are supervised by a certificated person. A certificated person for
purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person
certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW. For purposes of this section,
"supervised by a certificated person" means: The planning by the
certificated person and the parent of objectives consistent with this
subsection; a minimum each month of an average of one contact hour per
week with the child being supervised by the certificated person; and
evaluation of such child's progress by the certificated person. The
number of children supervised by the certificated person shall not
exceed thirty for purposes of this subsection; or
(b) Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only
and who has either earned forty-five college level quarter credit hours
or its equivalent in semester hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a postsecondary institution or a vocational-technical institute; or
(c) Provided by a parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to
provide home-based instruction by the superintendent of the local
school district in which the child resides.
(5) The legislature recognizes that home-based instruction is less
structured and more experiential than the instruction normally provided
in a classroom setting. Therefore, the provisions of subsection (4) of
this section relating to the nature and quantity of instructional and
related educational activities shall be liberally construed.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.200.010 and 1995 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each parent whose child over the age of eight is receiving home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall have the duty to:
(1) File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is
planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction.
The statement shall include the name and age of the child, shall
specify whether a certificated person will be supervising the
instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the
superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the
statement by September 15 of the school year or within two weeks of the
beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the
superintendent of the public school district within which the parent
resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the student
shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district.
Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220;
(2) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments
and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept
relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are
forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child
transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the
superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls
may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and
shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course
level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review
of the child's records; and
(3) Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the
state board of education is administered annually to the child by a
qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's
academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently
working in the field of education. The state board of education shall
not require these children to meet the student learning goals, master
the essential academic learning requirements, to take the assessments,
or to obtain a certificate of mastery pursuant to RCW ((28A.630.885))
28A.655.060. The standardized test administered or the annual academic
progress assessment written shall be made a part of the child's
permanent records. If, as a result of the annual test or assessment,
it is determined that the child is not making reasonable progress
consistent with his or her age or stage of development, the parent
shall make a good faith effort to remedy any deficiency.
Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this section shall
be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend school without
valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who do comply with
the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed to be providing
home-based instruction as set forth in RCW 28A.225.010(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---