BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that significant
changes have been made in federal estate tax laws. The legislature
finds these changes have complicated the administration of Washington
transfer taxes. This act is intended to allow the department of
revenue to more equitably and efficiently administer the transfer taxes
imposed under chapter 83.100 RCW.

PART I
ADDING ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS TO CHAPTER 83.100 RCW
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 83.100
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The following provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full force
and application with respect to the taxes imposed under this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise: RCW 82.32.070(1),
82.32.090 (3) and (6), 82.32.100 (1) and (2), 82.32.105, 82.32.110,
82.32.120, 82.32.130, 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190,
82.32.200, 82.32.210, 82.32.220, 82.32.230, 82.32.235, 82.32.237,
82.32.245, 82.32.265, 82.32.280, 82.32.310, 82.32.320, 82.32.330,
82.32.340, 82.32.380, and 82.32.410.
(2) The periods of limitation contained in RCW 83.100.090,
83.100.130, and section 102 of this act apply in place of any periods
of limitation described in provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW applicable
to this chapter.
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in RCW 83.100.020 have full force and application with respect to
provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW applicable to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 83.100
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If upon examination of any returns or from other information
obtained by the department it appears that a tax or penalty has been
paid less than that properly due, the department shall assess against
the taxpayer such additional amount found to be due and shall add
interest as provided in RCW 83.100.070. The department shall notify
the taxpayer by mail of the additional amount and the additional amount
shall become due and shall be paid within thirty days from the date of
the notice, or within such further time as the department may provide.
(2) No assessment or correction of an assessment for additional
taxes, penalties, or interest due may be made by the department more
than four years after the close of the calendar year in which a return
is due, except upon a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a
material fact by the taxpayer or as provided under subsection (3) or
(4) of this section.
(3) For persons liable for tax under RCW 83.100.120, the period for
assessment or correction of an assessment shall extend an additional
three years beyond the period described in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) Upon a request by the department, a taxpayer may extend the
periods of limitation under subsection (2) or (3) of this section by
executing a written waiver of the periods of limitation. The execution
of the waiver shall also extend the period for making a refund as
provided in RCW 83.100.130.

Sec. 103 RCW 83.100.130 and 1997 c 157 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Whenever)) If, upon receipt of an application by a taxpayer
for a refund or upon an examination of the returns or records of any
person, the department determines that a ((person required to file the
federal return)) taxpayer has, within the periods for assessment under
section 102 of this act, overpaid the tax, penalties, or interest due
under this chapter, the department shall refund the amount of the
overpayment, together with interest at the then existing rate under RCW
83.100.070(1). If the application for refund, with supporting
documents, is filed within four months after an adjustment or final
determination of federal tax liability, the department shall pay
interest until the date the refund is mailed. If the application for
refund, with supporting documents, is filed after four months after the
adjustment or final determination, the department shall pay interest
only until the end of the four-month period.
(2) Interest refunded under this section for periods after January
1, 1997, through December 31, 1998, shall be computed on a daily basis
at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2) less one percentage
point. Interest allowed after December 31, 1998, shall be computed at
the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). Interest shall be
refunded from the date of overpayment until the date the refund is
mailed. The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of
January of each year.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section
and RCW 83.100.090, no refund shall be made for taxes, penalties, or
interest paid more than four years prior to the beginning of the
calendar year in which the refund application is made or an examination
of records is complete.
(4) The execution of a written waiver under section 102 of this act
shall extend the time for making a refund if, prior to the expiration
of the waiver period, an application for refund is made by the taxpayer
or the department discovers a refund is due.
(5) An application for refund shall be on a form prescribed by the
department and shall contain any information and supporting documents
as the department prescribes.

Sec. 104 RCW 83.100.090 and 1988 c 64 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding the expiration of the periods of limitation in
section 102 of this act and RCW 83.100.130:
(1) If ((the person required to file the federal return)) a
taxpayer files an amended federal return, that person shall
((immediately)) file with the department an amended Washington return
with a copy of the amended federal return within one hundred twenty
days of filing the amended federal return. If the amended Washington
return requires payment of an additional tax under this chapter, the
tax shall be paid in accordance with RCW 83.100.060 and interest shall
be paid in accordance with RCW 83.100.070.
(2) Upon any adjustment in, or final determination of, the amount
of federal tax due((,)) or the amount of the decedent's gross estate by
the internal revenue service of the United States, the United States
tax court, or any court of competent jurisdiction, the ((person
required to file the federal return)) taxpayer shall notify the
department in writing within ((sixty days after)) one hundred twenty
days of the adjustment or final determination.
(3) If the department determines the amended return, adjustment, or
final determination requires payment of an additional tax under this
chapter, the department may assess against the taxpayer such additional
amount found to be due within one year of receipt of written notice, or
at any time if the taxpayer fails to provide written notice, as
required in subsection (1) or (2) of this section. The execution of a
written waiver at the request of the department by the taxpayer may
extend this limitation. The tax shall be paid in accordance with RCW
83.100.060 and interest shall be paid in accordance with RCW
83.100.070.
(4) If the department determines the amended return, adjustment, or
final determination requires the refund of overpaid tax, penalties, or
interest under this chapter, the department shall refund the amount of
the overpayment with interest in accordance with RCW 83.100.070. No
refund shall be made unless notice is provided as required in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section. The taxpayer shall provide the
department with any additional information or supporting documents
necessary to determine if a refund is due. The execution of a written
waiver of the period for assessment under subsection (3) of this
section shall extend the time for making a refund, if prior to the
expiration of the waiver period an application for refund of such taxes
is made by the taxpayer or the department discovers a refund is due.

Sec. 105 RCW 83.100.210 and 1996 c 149 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may enter into closing agreements as provided in RCW
82.32.350 and 82.32.360. In the event of a concurrent audit of a
taxpayer by the department and the federal government or concurrent
appeals by a taxpayer before the department and the federal government,
the department may in its sole discretion agree in writing to accept a
future determination by the federal government of a question of fact.

PART II
ADJUSTING THE ESTATE TAX APPORTIONMENT FORMULA
Sec. 201 RCW 83.100.040 and 1988 c 64 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A tax in an amount computed as provided in this section is
imposed on every transfer of property located in Washington ((of every
nonresident)).
(2) The tax shall be computed by multiplying the federal credit by
a fraction, the numerator of which is the value of the property located
in Washington, and the denominator of which is the value of the
decedent's gross estate.
(3) ((The transfer of the property of a nonresident is exempt from
the tax imposed by this section to the extent that the property of
residents is exempt from taxation under the laws of the state in which
the nonresident is domiciled.)) For the purposes of this section, any
intangible personal property owned by a resident is located in
Washington.

PART III
JURISDICTION FOR TRANSFER TAX APPEALS
Sec. 301 RCW 83.100.150 and 1988 c 64 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) The department may collect the estate tax imposed under RCW
((83.100.030 and)) 83.100.040, including interest and penalties, and
shall represent this state in all matters pertaining to the same,
either before courts or in any other manner. ((At any time after the
Washington return is due, the department may file its findings
regarding the amount of the tax, the federal credit, the person
required to file the federal return, and all persons having an interest
in property subject to the tax with the clerk of the superior court in
the matter of the estate of the decedent or, if no probate or
administration proceedings have been commenced in any court of this
state, of the superior court for the county in which the decedent was
a resident, if the resident was a domiciliary, or, if the decedent was
a nondomiciliary, of any superior court which has jurisdiction over the
property. Such a court first acquiring jurisdiction shall retain
jurisdiction to the exclusion of every other court.
(2) The department may collect the generation-skipping transfer tax
under RCW 83.100.045, including interest and penalties, and shall
represent this state in all matters pertaining to the same, either
before courts or in any other manner. At any time after the Washington
return is due, the department may file its findings regarding the
amount of the tax, the federal credit, the person required to file the
federal return, and all persons having an interest in property subject
to the tax with the clerk of the superior court in the matter of the
trust or the estate of the decedent, if any, or, if no trust, probate
or administration proceedings have been commenced in any court of this
state, of any superior court which has jurisdiction over the property.
Such a court first acquiring jurisdiction shall retain jurisdiction to
the exclusion of every other court.))

Sec. 302 RCW 82.03.130 and 1998 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have jurisdiction to decide the following types
of appeals:
(a) Appeals taken pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.
(b) Appeals from a county board of equalization pursuant to RCW
84.08.130.
(c) Appeals by an assessor or landowner from an order of the
director of revenue made pursuant to RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if
filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days after the
mailing of the order, the right to such an appeal being hereby
established.
(d) Appeals by an assessor or owner of an intercounty public
utility or private car company from determinations by the director of
revenue of equalized assessed valuation of property and the
apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant to chapter 84.12 and
84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days
after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being
hereby established.
(e) Appeals by an assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty
public utility or private car company from a determination of any
county indicated ratio for such county compiled by the department of
revenue pursuant to RCW 84.48.075: PROVIDED, That
(i) Said appeal be filed after review of the ratio under RCW
84.48.075(3) and not later than fifteen days after the mailing of the
certification; and
(ii) The hearing before the board shall be expeditiously held in
accordance with rules prescribed by the board and shall take precedence
over all matters of the same character.
(f) Appeals from the decisions of sale price of second class
shorelands on navigable lakes by the department of natural resources
pursuant to RCW 79.94.210.
(g) Appeals from urban redevelopment property tax apportionment
district proposals established by governmental ordinances pursuant to
RCW 39.88.060.
(h) Appeals from interest rates as determined by the department of
revenue for use in valuing farmland under current use assessment
pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.
(i) Appeals from revisions to stumpage value tables used to
determine value by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.
(j) Appeals from denial of tax exemption application by the
department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.36.850.
(k) Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.40.038(3).
(l) Appeals pursuant to section 303 of this act.
(2) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law hereafter, the
provisions of RCW 1.12.070 shall apply to all notices of appeal filed
with the board of tax appeals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 83.100
RCW to read as follows:
If the sole issue for appeal is the value of property contained in
the gross estate, a person otherwise entitled to petition the
department for a correction of the tax imposed by this chapter pursuant
to RCW 82.32.160 or 82.32.170 may include in its petition a request for
a direct appeal to the board of tax appeals. The department in its
sole discretion may grant or deny the request. The department shall
notify the petitioner of its decision by mail.

Sec. 304 RCW 82.03.180 and 2000 c 103 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Judicial review of a decision of the board of tax appeals shall be
de novo in accordance with the provisions of RCW 82.32.180 or 84.68.020
as applicable except when the decision has been rendered pursuant to a
formal hearing elected under RCW 82.03.140 or 82.03.190, in which event
judicial review may be obtained only pursuant to RCW 34.05.510 through
34.05.598: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed
to modify the rights of a taxpayer conferred by RCW 82.32.180 and
84.68.020 to sue for tax refunds: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That no review
from a decision made pursuant to RCW 82.03.130(1)(a) may be obtained by
a taxpayer unless within the petition period provided by RCW 34.05.542
the taxpayer shall have first paid in full the contested tax, together
with all penalties and interest thereon, if any, except for taxes
imposed pursuant to chapter 83.100 RCW that are not required to be paid
under section 306 of this act. The director of revenue shall have the
same right of review from a decision made pursuant to RCW
82.03.130(1)(a) as does a taxpayer; and the director of revenue and all
parties to an appeal under RCW 82.03.130(1)(e) shall have the right of
review from a decision made pursuant to RCW 82.03.130(1)(e).

Sec. 305 RCW 82.03.190 and 1998 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person having received notice of a denial of a petition or a
notice of determination made under RCW 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.34.110,
or 82.49.060 or having received notice of a granted request for direct
review under section 303 of this act may appeal by filing in accordance
with RCW 1.12.070 a notice of appeal with the board of tax appeals
within thirty days after the mailing of the notice of such denial
((or)), determination, or granted request. In the notice of appeal the
taxpayer shall set forth the amount of the tax which the taxpayer
contends should be reduced or refunded and the reasons for such
reduction or refund, in accordance with rules of practice and procedure
prescribed by the board. However, if the notice of appeal relates to
an application made to the department under chapter 82.34 RCW, the
taxpayer shall set forth the amount to which the taxpayer claims the
credit or exemption should apply, and the grounds for such contention,
in accordance with rules of practice and procedure prescribed by the
board. The board shall transmit a copy of the notice of appeal to the
department and all other named parties within thirty days of its
receipt by the board. If the taxpayer intends that the hearing before
the board be held pursuant to the administrative procedure act (chapter
34.05 RCW), the notice of appeal shall also so state. In the event
that the notice of appeal does not so state, the department may, within
thirty days from the date of its receipt of the notice of appeal, file
with the board notice of its intention that the hearing be held
pursuant to the administrative procedure act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 A new section is added to chapter 83.100
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all
taxes, penalties, and interest imposed under this chapter shall be paid
in full before any action may be instituted in any court to contest all
or any part of the taxes, penalties, or interest. No restraining order
or injunction shall be granted or issued by any court or judge to
restrain or enjoin the collection of any tax or penalty or any part
thereof, except upon the ground that the assessment was in violation of
the Constitution of the United States or that of the state.
(2) No taxes, penalties, or interest imposed by this chapter are
required to be paid before judicial review if the taxpayer institutes
an action with the superior court of Thurston county within:
(a) Sixty days of the issuance of a notice of tax due under section
102 of this act;
(b) Sixty days of the mailing of a notice of a denial of a petition
or a notice of a determination under RCW 82.32.160; or
(c) Thirty days of a decision of the board of tax appeals, if the
tax was not paid prior to review by the board.

PART IV
REPEALING THE GENERATION-SKIPPING TRANSFER TAX
AND ADDING A DEFINITION OF "TAXPAYER"
Sec. 401 RCW 83.100.020 and 2001 c 320 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Decedent" means a deceased individual;
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue, the director of
that department, or any employee of the department exercising authority
lawfully delegated to him by the director;
(3) "Federal credit" means (((a) for a transfer,)) the maximum
amount of the credit for state taxes allowed by section 2011 of the
Internal Revenue Code((; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer,
the maximum amount of the credit for state taxes allowed by section
2604 of the Internal Revenue Code));
(4) "Federal return" means any tax return required by chapter 11
((or 13)) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(5) "Federal tax" means (((a) for a transfer,)) a tax under chapter
11 of the Internal Revenue Code((; and (b) for a generation-skipping
transfer, the tax under chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(6) "Generation-skipping transfer" means a "generation-skipping
transfer" as defined and used in section 2611 of the Internal Revenue
Code));
(((7))) (6) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used
in section 2031 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(((8))) (7) "Nonresident" means a decedent who was domiciled
outside Washington at his death;
(((9))) (8) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof;
(((10))) (9) "Person required to file the federal return" means any
person required to file a return required by chapter 11 ((or 13)) of
the Internal Revenue Code, such as the personal representative of an
estate((; or a transferor, trustee, or beneficiary of a generation-skipping transfer;)) or a qualified heir with respect to qualified real
property, as defined and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(((11))) (10) "Property" means (((a) for a transfer,)) property
included in the gross estate; ((and (b) for a generation-skipping
transfer, all real and personal property subject to the federal tax;))
(((12))) (11) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in
Washington at time of death;
(12) "Taxpayer" means a person upon whom tax is imposed under this
chapter, including an estate or a person liable for tax under RCW
83.100.120;
(13) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of the
Internal Revenue Code, or a disposition or cessation of qualified use
as defined and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
and
(14) (("Trust" means "trust" under Washington law and any
arrangement described in section 2652 of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(15))) "Internal Revenue Code" means, for the purposes of this
chapter and RCW 83.110.010, the United States Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2001.

Sec. 402 RCW 83.100.110 and 1988 c 64 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless any tax due under this chapter is sooner paid in full,
it shall be a lien upon the property subject to the tax for a period of
ten years from the date of the transfer ((or the generation-skipping
transfer)), except that any part of the property which is used for the
payment of claims against the property or expenses of its
administration, allowed by any court having jurisdiction thereof, shall
be divested of the lien. Liens created under this subsection shall be
qualified as follows:
(a) Any part of the property subject to the tax which is sold to a
bona fide purchaser shall be divested of the lien and the lien shall be
transferred to the proceeds of the sale; and
(b) The lien shall be subordinate to any mortgage or deed of trust
on the property pursuant to an order of court for payment of claims
against the property or expenses of administration. The lien shall
attach to any proceeds from the sale of the property in excess of the
obligations secured by the mortgage or deed of trust and the expenses
of sale, including a reasonable charge by the trustee and by his or her
attorney where the property has been sold by a nonjudicial trustee's
sale pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW, and including court costs and any
attorneys' fees awarded by the superior court of the county in which
the property is sold at sheriff's sale pursuant to a judicial
foreclosure of the mortgage or deed of trust.
(2) If the person required to file the federal return has obtained
an extension of time for payment of the federal tax or has elected to
pay such tax in installments, the tax lien under this section shall be
extended as necessary to prevent its expiration prior to twelve months
following the expiration of any such extension or the installment.
(3) The tax lien shall be extended as necessary to prevent its
expiration prior to twelve months following the conclusion of
litigation of any question affecting the determination of the amount of
tax due if a lis pendens has been filed with the auditor of the county
in which the property is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 RCW 83.100.045 (Generation-skipping
transfers -- Tax imposed -- Credit for tax paid to another state) and 1988
c 64 s 5 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Sections 401 through 403 of this act apply
to transfers resulting from deaths occurring on or after January 1,
2004.

PART V
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS TO CHAPTER 82.32 RCW
Sec. 501 RCW 82.32.070 and 1999 c 358 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person liable for any fee or tax imposed by chapters
82.04 through 82.27 or 83.100 RCW shall keep and preserve, for a period
of five years, suitable records as may be necessary to determine the
amount of any tax for which he may be liable, which records shall
include copies of all federal income tax and state tax returns and
reports made by him. All his books, records, and invoices shall be
open for examination at any time by the department of revenue. In the
case of an out-of-state person or concern which does not keep the
necessary books and records within this state, it shall be sufficient
if it produces within the state such books and records as shall be
required by the department of revenue, or permits the examination by an
agent authorized or designated by the department of revenue at the
place where such books and records are kept. Any person who fails to
comply with the requirements of this section shall be forever barred
from questioning, in any court action or proceedings, the correctness
of any assessment of taxes made by the department of revenue based upon
any period for which such books, records, and invoices have not been so
kept and preserved.
(2) A person liable for any fee or tax imposed by chapters 82.04
through 82.27 RCW who contracts with another person or entity for work
subject to chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW shall obtain and preserve a
record of the unified business identifier account number for the person
or entity performing the work. Failure to obtain or maintain the
record is subject to RCW 39.06.010 and to a penalty determined by the
director, but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars. The department
shall notify the taxpayer and collect the penalty in the same manner as
penalties under RCW 82.32.100.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.32.105 and 1998 c 304 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department of revenue finds that the payment by a
taxpayer of a tax less than that properly due or the failure of a
taxpayer to pay any tax by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department of revenue shall
waive or cancel any penalties imposed under this chapter or chapter
83.100 RCW with respect to such tax.
(2) The department shall waive or cancel the penalty imposed under
RCW 82.32.090(1) when the circumstances under which the delinquency
occurred do not qualify for waiver or cancellation under subsection (1)
of this section if:
(a) The taxpayer requests the waiver for a tax return required to
be filed under RCW 82.32.045, 82.14B.061, 82.23B.020, 82.27.060,
82.29A.050, or 84.33.086; and
(b) The taxpayer has timely filed and remitted payment on all tax
returns due for that tax program for a period of twenty-four months
immediately preceding the period covered by the return for which the
waiver is being requested.
(3) The department shall waive or cancel interest imposed under
this chapter or chapter 83.100 RCW if:
(a) The failure to timely pay the tax was the direct result of
written instructions given the taxpayer by the department; or
(b) The extension of a due date for payment of an assessment of
deficiency was not at the request of the taxpayer and was for the sole
convenience of the department.
(4) The department of revenue shall adopt rules for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties and interest imposed by this chapter or
chapter 83.100 RCW.

Sec. 503 RCW 82.32.265 and 1987 c 80 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may retain, by written contract, collection
agencies licensed under chapter 19.16 RCW or licensed under the laws of
another state or the District of Columbia for the purpose of collecting
from sources outside the state of Washington taxes including interest
and penalties thereon imposed under this title ((and)), RCW 84.33.041,
and chapter 83.100 RCW.
(2) Only accounts represented by tax warrants filed in the superior
court of a county in the state as provided by RCW 82.32.210 may be
assigned to a collection agency, and no such assignment may be made
unless the department has previously notified or has attempted to
notify the taxpayer of his or her right to petition for correction of
assessment within the time provided and in accordance with the
procedures set forth in chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) Collection agencies assigned accounts for collection under this
section shall have only those remedies and powers that would be
available to them as assignees of private creditors. However, nothing
in this section limits the right to enforce the liability for taxes
lawfully imposed under the laws of this state in the courts of another
state or the District of Columbia as provided by the laws of such
jurisdictions and RCW 4.24.140 and 4.24.150.
(4) The account of the taxpayer shall be credited with the amounts
collected by a collection agency before reduction for reasonable
collection costs, including attorneys fees, that the department is
authorized to negotiate on a contingent fee or other basis.

Sec. 504 RCW 82.32.330 and 2000 c 173 s 1 and 2000 c 106 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
whatever a return or tax information;
(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund
required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state
which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with
respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to,
or part of, the return so filed;
(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the
nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts,
deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax
liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken
from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii)
whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or
subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written
determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a
written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by,
prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue
with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible
existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the
laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or
other imposition, or offense: PROVIDED, That data, material, or
documents that do not disclose information related to a specific or
identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this
section. Except as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter
shall require any person possessing data, material, or documents made
confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from
such data, material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;
(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and
(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer,
agent, employee, or representative.
(2) Returns and tax information shall be confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or
tax information.
(3) The foregoing, however, shall not prohibit the department of
revenue from:
(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or
criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under Title 82 RCW
or chapter 83.100 RCW is a party in the proceeding; or
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director shall prescribe by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such
taxpayer or to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in
a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person,
at the taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a
request for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such
other person: PROVIDED, That tax information not received from the
taxpayer shall not be so disclosed if the director determines that such
disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any
federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil
or criminal liability of the taxpayer or another person, or that such
disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that such
disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the department
that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information with other
government agencies which agreement requires confidentiality with
respect to such information unless such information is required to be
disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding for
a period of at least ten working days. The department shall not be
required to disclose any information under this subsection if a
taxpayer: (i) Has been issued a tax assessment; (ii) has been issued
a warrant that has not been filed; and (iii) has entered a deferred
payment arrangement with the department of revenue and is making
payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness
within twelve months;
(d) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been filed with a court of record and remains
outstanding;
(e) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the
identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;
(f) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official
purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state
agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing
with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of
industry or the professions;
(g) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace
officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information
may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the
investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was
sought;
(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(j) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the Department
of Justice, the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms of the
Department of the Treasury, the Department of Defense, the United
States Customs Service, the Coast Guard of the United States, and the
United States Department of Transportation, or any authorized
representative thereof, for official purposes;
(k) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written
determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW
82.32.410;
(l) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, revenue tax registration numbers, North American industry
classification system or standard industrial classification code of a
taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing of business. This
subsection shall not be construed as giving authority to the department
to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any
commercial purpose;
(m) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also
maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as
a public record available for inspection and copying under the
provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW or is a document maintained by a court
of record not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(n) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States
department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food
stamp fraud by retailers;
(o) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title
company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject
of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a
filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property; ((or))
(p) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information
pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person
has succeeded; or
(q) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability under RCW 83.100.120 return or tax information pertaining to
that person's liability for tax under chapter 83.100 RCW.
(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information
to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative
proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this
subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the
department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity,
or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only
when the person under investigation and the person in possession of
data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax
information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax
information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or
exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not
disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check
registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals,
financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state
tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials,
or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department shall, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence shall clearly
identify the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The
department may not disclose any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this
subsection has expired or until the court has ruled on any challenge
brought under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court shall limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department shall reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.
(5) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information
in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue
and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as
provided under subsection (3)(f), (g), (h), (i), (j), or (n) of this
section, who discloses any such return or tax information to another
person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax information
under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If
the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the
state, such person shall forfeit such office or employment and shall be
incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for
a period of two years thereafter.

PART VI
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 83.100.030 (Residents -- Estate tax imposed -- Credit for tax
paid other state) and 1988 c 64 s 3 & 1981 2nd ex.s. c 7 s 83.100.030;
(2) RCW 83.100.160 (Clerk to give notice of filings) and 1993 c 413
s 1 & 1988 c 64 s 15;
(3) RCW 83.100.170 (Court order) and 1988 c 64 s 16;
(4) RCW 83.100.180 (Objections) and 1999 c 42 s 636 & 1988 c 64 s
17; and
(5) RCW 83.100.190 (Hearing by court) and 1988 c 64 s 18.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 This act applies to all returns not filed
with the department of revenue before the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---