BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.010 and 1998 c 179 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
All property belonging exclusively to the United States, the state,
or any county or municipal corporation((,)); all property belonging
exclusively to any federally recognized Indian tribe located in the
state, if that property is used exclusively for essential government
services as defined in RCW 43.06.455; all state route number 16
corridor transportation systems and facilities constructed under
chapter 47.46 RCW((,)); and all property under a financing contract
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW or recorded agreement granting immediate
possession and use to ((said)) the public bodies listed in this section
or under an order of immediate possession and use pursuant to RCW
8.04.090((, shall be)); is exempt from taxation. All property
belonging exclusively to a foreign national government ((shall be)) is
exempt from taxation if ((such)) that property is used exclusively as
an office or residence for a consul or other official representative of
((such)) the foreign national government, and if the consul or other
official representative is a citizen of ((such)) that foreign nation.

--- END ---