BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.473 and 1999 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the ((Washington)) state ((patrol)) with respect to
the officers of the Washington state patrol appointed under RCW
43.43.020((. Subjects of bargaining include wage-related matters)),
except that the ((Washington)) state ((patrol)) is prohibited from
negotiating ((rates of pay or wage levels and)) any matters relating to
retirement benefits or health care benefits or other employee insurance
benefits.
(2) For the purposes of negotiating:
(a) Wages and wage-related matters, the state shall be represented
by the governor or the governor's designee who is appointed under
chapter 41.80 RCW; and
(b) Nonwage related matters, the state shall be represented by the
Washington state patrol.
(3) The negotiation of provisions pertaining to wages and wage-related matters in a collective bargaining agreement between the
((Washington)) state ((patrol)) and the Washington state patrol
officers is subject to the following:
(a) The state's bargaining representative must periodically consult
with a subcommittee of the joint committee on employment relations
created in RCW 41.80.010(5) which shall consist of the four members
appointed to the joint committee with leadership positions in the
senate and the house of representatives, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate highways and transportation committee
and the house transportation committee, or their successor committees.
The subcommittee must be consulted regarding the appropriations
necessary to implement these provisions in a collective bargaining
agreement and, on completion of negotiations, must be advised on the
elements of these provisions.
(b) Provisions that are entered into before the legislature
approves the funds necessary to implement the provisions must be
conditioned upon the legislature's subsequent approval of the funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---