BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current
telephone service for offender calls from department of corrections
facilities is based on outdated technology that provides neither the
most secure nor the most accountable system available and is provided
at a high cost to the offenders' families. The legislature, in budget
provisions, has required the secretary of corrections to investigate
other systems as offender telephone service contracts came due for
renewal. The legislature now finds that the current statute prevents
the secretary of corrections from using systems that provide greater
security, more offender accountability, and lower costs. Therefore,
the legislature intends to remove this barrier while retaining the
intent of the statute to provide safe, accountable, and affordable
telephone services.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.73.095 and 1998 c 217 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) RCW 9.73.030 through 9.73.080 and 9.73.260 shall not apply to
employees of the department of corrections in the following instances:
Intercepting, recording, or divulging any telephone calls from an
((inmate)) offender or resident of a state correctional facility; or
intercepting, recording, or divulging any monitored nontelephonic
conversations in ((inmate)) offender living units, cells, rooms,
dormitories, and common spaces where ((inmates)) offenders may be
present. For the purposes of this section, "state correctional
facility" means a facility that is under the control and authority of
the department of corrections, and used for the incarceration,
treatment, or rehabilitation of convicted felons.
(2)(a) All personal calls made by ((inmates)) offenders shall be
((collect calls only)) made using a calling system approved by the
secretary of corrections which is at least as secure as the system it
replaces. In approving one or more calling systems, the secretary of
corrections shall consider the safety of the public, the ability to
reduce telephone fraud, and the ability of offender families to select
a low-cost option.
(b) The calls ((will)) shall be "operator announcement" type calls.
The operator shall notify the receiver of the call that the call is
coming from a prison ((inmate)) offender, and that it will be recorded
and may be monitored.
(3) The department of corrections shall adhere to the following
procedures and restrictions when intercepting, recording, or divulging
any telephone calls from an ((inmate)) offender or resident of a state
correctional facility as provided for by this section. The department
shall also adhere to the following procedures and restrictions when
intercepting, recording, or divulging any monitored nontelephonic
conversations in ((inmate)) offender living units, cells, rooms,
dormitories, and common spaces where ((inmates)) offenders may be
present:
(a) Unless otherwise provided for in this section, after
intercepting or recording any conversation, only the superintendent and
his or her designee shall have access to that recording.
(b) The contents of any intercepted and recorded conversation shall
be divulged only as is necessary to safeguard the orderly operation of
the correctional facility, in response to a court order, or in the
prosecution or investigation of any crime.
(c) All conversations that are recorded under this section, unless
being used in the ongoing investigation or prosecution of a crime, or
as is necessary to assure the orderly operation of the correctional
facility, shall be destroyed one year after the intercepting and
recording.
(4) So as to safeguard the sanctity of the attorney-client
privilege, the department of corrections shall not intercept, record,
or divulge any conversation between an ((inmate)) offender or resident
and an attorney. The department shall develop policies and procedures
to implement this section. The department's policies and procedures
implemented under this section shall also recognize the privileged
nature of confessions made by an offender to a member of the clergy or
a priest in his or her professional character, in the course of
discipline enjoined by the church to which he or she belongs as
provided in RCW 5.60.060(3).
(5) The department shall notify in writing all ((inmates))
offenders, residents, and personnel of state correctional facilities
that their nontelephonic conversations may be intercepted, recorded, or
divulged in accordance with the provisions of this section.
(6) The department shall notify all visitors to state correctional
facilities who may enter ((inmate)) offender living units, cells,
rooms, dormitories, or common spaces where ((inmates)) offenders may be
present, that their conversations may intercepted, recorded, or
divulged in accordance with the provisions of this section. The notice
required under this subsection shall be accomplished through a means no
less conspicuous than a general posting in a location likely to be seen
by visitors entering the facility.

--- END ---