BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.031 and 2003 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in
effect in all counties and cities the state building code which shall
consist of the following codes which are hereby adopted by reference:
(1)(a) The International Building Code, published by the
International Code Council(([,])), Inc.;
(b) The International Residential Code, published by the
International Code Council, Inc.;
(2) The International Mechanical Code, published by the
International Code Council(([,])), Inc.((, except that the standards
for liquified petroleum gas installations shall be NFPA 58 (Storage and
Handling of Liquified Petroleum Gases) and ANSI Z223.1/NFPA 54
(National Fuel Gas Code)));
(3) The International Fuel Gas Code, published by the International
Code Council, Inc.;
(4) The International Fire Code, published by the International
Code Council(([,])), Inc., including those standards of the National
Fire Protection Association specifically referenced in the
International Fire Code: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording
in this code, participants in religious ceremonies shall not be
precluded from carrying hand-held candles;
(((4))) (5) Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the ((Uniform
Plumbing Code and Uniform Plumbing Code Standards, published by the
International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials:
PROVIDED, That any provisions of such code affecting sewers or fuel gas
piping are not adopted)) International Plumbing Code, published by the
International Code Council, Inc.; and
(((5))) (6) The rules adopted by the council establishing standards
for making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by the
physically disabled or elderly persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100
through 70.92.160.
In case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1),
(2), (((3), and)) (4), and (5) of this section, the first named code
shall govern over those following.
The codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the
council as provided in RCW 19.27.074. The council shall solicit input
from first responders to ensure that fire fighter safety issues are
addressed during the code adoption process.
The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request
of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated
codes.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27A.020 and 1998 c 245 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) No later than ((January 1, 1991, the state building code
council shall adopt rules to be known as the Washington state energy
code as part of the state building code.
(2) The council shall follow the legislature's standards set forth
in this section to adopt rules to be known as the Washington state
energy code. The Washington state energy code shall be designed to
require new buildings to meet a certain level of energy efficiency, but
allow flexibility in building design, construction, and heating
equipment efficiencies within that framework. The Washington state
energy code shall be designed to allow space heating equipment
efficiency to offset or substitute for building envelope thermal
performance.
(3) The Washington state energy code shall take into account
regional climatic conditions. Climate zone 1 shall include all
counties not included in climate zone 2. Climate zone 2 includes:
Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Ferry, Grant, Kittitas, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend
Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, and Whitman counties.
(4) The Washington state energy code for residential buildings
shall require:
(a) New residential buildings that are space heated with electric
resistance heating systems to achieve energy use equivalent to that
used in typical buildings constructed with:
(i) Ceilings insulated to a level of R-38. The code shall contain
an exception which permits single rafter or joist vaulted ceilings
insulated to a level of R-30 (R value includes insulation only);
(ii) In zone 1, walls insulated to a level of R-19 (R value
includes insulation only), or constructed with two by four members,
R-13 insulation batts, R-3.2 insulated sheathing, and other normal
assembly components; in zone 2 walls insulated to a level of R-24 (R
value includes insulation only), or constructed with two by six
members, R-22 insulation batts, R-3.2 insulated sheathing, and other
normal construction assembly components; for the purpose of determining
equivalent thermal performance, the wall U-value shall be 0.058 in zone
1 and 0.044 in zone 2;
(iii) Below grade walls, insulated on the interior side, to a level
of R-19 or, if insulated on the exterior side, to a level of R-10 in
zone 1 and R-12 in zone 2 (R value includes insulation only);
(iv) Floors over unheated spaces insulated to a level of R-30 (R
value includes insulation only);
(v) Slab on grade floors insulated to a level of R-10 at the
perimeter;
(vi) Double glazed windows with values not more than U-0.4;
(vii) In zone 1 the glazing area may be up to twenty-one percent of
floor area and in zone 2 the glazing area may be up to seventeen
percent of floor area where consideration of the thermal resistance
values for other building components and solar heat gains through the
glazing result in thermal performance equivalent to that achieved with
thermal resistance values for other components determined in accordance
with the equivalent thermal performance criteria of (a) of this
subsection and glazing area equal to fifteen percent of the floor area.
Throughout the state for the purposes of determining equivalent thermal
performance, the maximum glazing area shall be fifteen percent of the
floor area; and
(viii) Exterior doors insulated to a level of R-5; or an exterior
wood door with a thermal resistance value of less than R-5 and values
for other components determined in accordance with the equivalent
thermal performance criteria of (a) of this subsection.
(b) New residential buildings which are space-heated with all other
forms of space heating to achieve energy use equivalent to that used in
typical buildings constructed with:
(i) Ceilings insulated to a level of R-30 in zone 1 and R-38 in
zone 2 the code shall contain an exception which permits single rafter
or joist vaulted ceilings insulated to a level of R-30 (R value
includes insulation only);
(ii) Walls insulated to a level of R-19 (R value includes
insulation only), or constructed with two by four members, R-13
insulation batts, R-3.2 insulated sheathing, and other normal assembly
components;
(iii) Below grade walls, insulated on the interior side, to a level
of R-19 or, if insulated on the exterior side, to a level of R-10 in
zone 1 and R-12 in zone 2 (R value includes insulation only);
(iv) Floors over unheated spaces insulated to a level of R-19 in
zone 1 and R-30 in zone 2 (R value includes insulation only);
(v) Slab on grade floors insulated to a level of R-10 at the
perimeter;
(vi) Heat pumps with a minimum heating season performance factor
(HSPF) of 6.8 or with all other energy sources with a minimum annual
fuel utilization efficiency (AFUE) of seventy-eight percent;
(vii) Double glazed windows with values not more than U-0.65 in
zone 1 and U-0.60 in zone 2. The state building code council, in
consultation with the department of community, trade, and economic
development, shall review these U-values, and, if economically
justified for consumers, shall amend the Washington state energy code
to improve the U-values by December 1, 1993. The amendment shall not
take effect until July 1, 1994; and
(viii) In zone 1, the maximum glazing area shall be twenty-one
percent of the floor area. In zone 2 the maximum glazing area shall be
seventeen percent of the floor area. Throughout the state for the
purposes of determining equivalent thermal performance, the maximum
glazing area shall be fifteen percent of the floor area.
(c) The requirements of (b)(ii) of this subsection do not apply to
residences with log or solid timber walls with a minimum average
thickness of three and one-half inches and with space heat other than
electric resistance.
(d) The state building code council may approve an energy code for
pilot projects of residential construction that use innovative energy
efficiency technologies intended to result in savings that are greater
than those realized in the levels specified in this section.
(5) U-values for glazing shall be determined using the area
weighted average of all glazing in the building. U-values for vertical
glazing shall be determined, certified, and labeled in accordance with
the appropriate national fenestration rating council (NFRC) standard,
as determined and adopted by the state building code council.
Certification of U-values shall be conducted by a certified,
independent agency licensed by the NFRC. The state building code
council may develop and adopt alternative methods of determining,
certifying, and labeling U-values for vertical glazing that may be used
by fenestration manufacturers if determined to be appropriate by the
council. The state building code council shall review and consider the
adoption of the NFRC standards for determining, certifying, and
labeling U-values for doors and skylights when developed and published
by the NFRC. The state building code council may develop and adopt
appropriate alternative methods for determining, certifying, and
labeling U-values for doors and skylights. U-values for doors and
skylights determined, certified, and labeled in accordance with the
appropriate NFRC standard shall be acceptable for compliance with the
state energy code. Sealed insulation glass, where used, shall conform
to, or be in the process of being tested for, ASTM E-774-81 class A or
better.
(6) The minimum state energy code for new nonresidential buildings
shall be the Washington state energy code, 1986 edition, as amended.
(7)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the Washington
state energy code for residential structures shall preempt the
residential energy code of each city, town, and county in the state of
Washington.
(b) The state energy code for residential structures does not
preempt a city, town, or county's energy code for residential
structures which exceeds the requirements of the state energy code and
which was adopted by the city, town, or county prior to March 1, 1990.
Such cities, towns, or counties may not subsequently amend their energy
code for residential structures to exceed the requirements adopted
prior to March 1, 1990.
(8) The state building code council shall consult with the
department of community, trade, and economic development as provided in
RCW 34.05.310 prior to publication of proposed rules. The department
of community, trade, and economic development shall review the proposed
rules for consistency with the guidelines adopted in subsection (4) of
this section. The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall recommend to the state building code council
any changes necessary to conform the proposed rules to the requirements
of this section)) December 1, 2004, the state building code council
shall adopt the International Energy Conservation Code, published by
the International Code Council, Inc.

--- END ---