BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Physician assistants practicing with physician supervision as
required by chapters 18.57A and 18.71A RCW may execute the certificate
required by RCW 51.28.020(1) for reports of noncompensable industrial
injuries, but not reports of any occupational diseases. Physician
assistants may not execute time loss cards related to any industrial
injuries or any occupational diseases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By December 1, 2006, the department of labor
and industries shall report to the senate committee on commerce and
trade and the house committee on commerce and labor, or successor
committees, on the implementation of this act, including but not
limited to the effects of this act on injured worker outcomes, claim
costs, and disputed claims.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire July 1,
2007.

--- END ---