BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature makes the following
findings:
(1) In some cases, there is confusion over whether the cause of a
person's mental disorder can make that person ineligible for
involuntary treatment;
(2) Some offenders under supervision in the community are
concurrently subject to court-ordered mental health or chemical
dependency treatment;
(3) Some offenders under supervision in the community are subject
to department of corrections-ordered mental health or substance abuse
treatment;
(4) The department of corrections frequently does not know that an
offender is subject to court-ordered treatment;
(5) Treatment providers frequently do not know that a client is
subject to department of corrections supervision;
(6) There is confusion about the extent to which information about
an offender subject to both treatment orders and supervision by the
department of corrections may be shared;
(7) When information is not shared, the lack of information creates
gaps in enforcement both of the court order and the offender's
conditions of supervision; and
(8) When there are gaps in enforcement, there is an increased risk
to public safety.
Consequently, the legislature intends to clarify the standards for
commitment and improve the coordination between the department of
corrections and mental health and chemical dependency treatment
providers to enhance public safety by improving compliance with
treatment and supervision orders and by providing both treatment
providers and the department of corrections with more current, complete
information about the offender's status.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.05.040 and 1997 c 112 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Persons who are developmentally disabled, impaired by chronic
alcoholism or drug abuse, or suffering from dementia shall not be
detained for evaluation and treatment or judicially committed solely by
reason of that condition unless such condition causes a person to be
gravely disabled or as a result of a mental disorder such condition
exists that constitutes a likelihood of serious harm: Provided
however, That persons who are developmentally disabled, impaired by
chronic alcoholism or drug abuse, or suffering from dementia and who
otherwise meet the criteria for detention or judicial commitment are
not ineligible for detention or commitment based on this condition
alone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
When a county designated mental health professional or a
professional person has determined that a person has a mental disorder,
and is otherwise committable, the cause of the person's mental disorder
shall not make the person ineligible for commitment under chapter 71.05
RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.05.445 and 2002 c 39 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Information related to mental health services" means all
information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course
of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services by a mental health service provider. This may include
documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or
10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information.
(b) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private
agency that provides services to persons with mental disorders as
defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receives funding from public sources.
This includes evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in RCW
71.05.020, community mental health service delivery systems, or
community mental health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and
facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under
chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2)(a) Information related to mental health services delivered to
a person subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW shall be released, upon
request, by a mental health service provider to department of
corrections personnel for whom the information is necessary to carry
out the responsibilities of their office. The information must be
provided only for the purposes of completing presentence investigations
or risk assessment reports, supervision of an incarcerated ((person))
offender or offender under supervision in the community, planning for
and provision of supervision of ((a person)) an offender, or assessment
of ((a person's)) an offender's risk to the community. The request
shall be in writing and shall not require the consent of the subject of
the records.
(b) If an offender subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW has failed
to report for department of corrections supervision or in the event of
an emergent situation that poses a significant risk to the public or
the offender, information related to mental health services delivered
to the offender and, if known, information regarding where the offender
is likely to be found shall be released by the mental health services
provider to the department of corrections upon request. The initial
request may be written or oral. All oral requests must be subsequently
confirmed in writing. Information released in response to an oral
request is limited to a statement as to whether the offender is or is
not being treated by the mental health services provider and the
address or information about the location or whereabouts of the
offender. Information released in response to a written request may
include information identified by rule as provided in subsections (4)
and (5) of this section. For purposes of this subsection a written
request includes requests made by e-mail or facsimile so long as the
requesting person at the department of corrections is clearly
identified. The request must specify the information being requested.
Disclosure of the information requested does not require the consent of
the subject of the records unless the offender has received relief from
disclosure under section 11, 12, or 13 of this act.
(3)(a) When a mental health service provider conducts its initial
assessment for a person receiving court-ordered treatment, the service
provider shall inquire and shall be told by the offender whether he or
she is subject to supervision by the department of corrections.
(b) When a person receiving court-ordered treatment or treatment
ordered by the department of corrections discloses to his or her mental
health service provider that he or she is subject to supervision by the
department of corrections, the mental health services provider shall
notify the department of corrections that he or she is treating the
offender and shall notify the offender that his or her community
corrections officer will be notified of the treatment, provided that if
the offender has received relief from disclosure pursuant to section
11, 12, or 13 of this act and the offender has provided the mental
health services provider with a copy of the order granting the relief,
the mental health services provider is not required to notify the
department of corrections that the mental health services provider is
treating the offender. The notification may be written or oral and
shall not require the consent of the offender. If an oral notification
is made, it must be confirmed by a written notification. For purposes
of this section, a written notification includes notification by e-mail
or facsimile, so long as the notifying mental health service provider
is clearly identified.
(4) The information to be released to the department of corrections
shall include all relevant records and reports, as defined by rule,
necessary for the department of corrections to carry out its duties,
including those records and reports identified in subsection (2) of
this section.
(((4))) (5) The department and the department of corrections, in
consultation with regional support networks, mental health service
providers as defined in subsection (1) of this section, mental health
consumers, and advocates for persons with mental illness, shall adopt
rules to implement the provisions of this section related to the type
and scope of information to be released. These rules shall:
(a) Enhance and facilitate the ability of the department of
corrections to carry out its responsibility of planning and ensuring
community protection with respect to persons subject to sentencing
under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW, including accessing and releasing or
disclosing information of persons who received mental health services
as a minor; and
(b) Establish requirements for the notification of persons under
the supervision of the department of corrections regarding the
provisions of this section.
(((5))) (6) The information received by the department of
corrections under this section shall remain confidential and subject to
the limitations on disclosure outlined in chapter 71.05 RCW, except as
provided in RCW 72.09.585.
(((6))) (7) No mental health service provider or individual
employed by a mental health service provider shall be held responsible
for information released to or used by the department of corrections
under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this
section except under RCW 71.05.670 and 71.05.440.
(((7))) (8) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict
the release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the
release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply
with federal law and regulations.
(((8))) (9) This section does not modify the terms and conditions
of disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases
under chapter 70.24 RCW.
(10) The department shall, subject to available resources,
electronically, or by the most cost-effective means available, provide
the department of corrections with the names, last dates of services,
and addresses of specific regional support networks and mental health
service providers that delivered mental health services to a person
subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW pursuant to an agreement between
the departments.

Sec. 5 RCW 72.09.585 and 2000 c 75 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department is determining an offender's risk
management level, the department shall inquire of the offender and
shall be told whether the offender is subject to court-ordered
treatment for mental health services or chemical dependency services.
The department shall request and the offender shall provide an
authorization to release information form that meets applicable state
and federal requirements and shall provide the offender with written
notice that the department will request the offender's mental health
and substance abuse treatment information. An offender's failure to
inform the department of court-ordered treatment is a violation of the
conditions of supervision if the offender is in the community and an
infraction if the offender is in confinement, and the violation or
infraction is subject to sanctions.
(2) When an offender discloses that he or she is subject to court-ordered mental health services or chemical dependency treatment, the
department shall provide the mental health services provider or
chemical dependency treatment provider with a written request for
information and any necessary authorization to release information
forms. The written request shall comply with rules adopted by the
department of social and health services or protocols developed jointly
by the department and the department of social and health services. A
single request shall be valid for the duration of the offender's
supervision in the community. Disclosures of information related to
mental health services made pursuant to a department request shall not
require consent of the offender.
(3) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or 71.34.225 may be released to the indeterminate sentence review board
as relevant to carry out its responsibility of planning and ensuring
community protection with respect to persons under its jurisdiction.
Further disclosure by the indeterminate sentence review board is
subject to the limitations set forth in subsections (((3))) (5) and
(((4))) (6) of this section and must be consistent with the written
policy of the indeterminate sentence review board. The decision to
disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for the
indeterminate sentence review board or its employees provided that the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.
(((2))) (4) The information received by the department under RCW
71.05.445 or 71.34.225 may be used to meet the statutory duties of the
department to provide evidence or report to the court. Disclosure to
the public of information provided to the court by the department
related to mental health services shall be limited in accordance with
RCW 9.94A.500 or this section.
(((3))) (5) The information received by the department under RCW
71.05.445 or 71.34.225 may be disclosed by the department to other
state and local agencies as relevant to plan for and provide offenders
transition, treatment, and supervision services, or as relevant and
necessary to protect the public and counteract the danger created by a
particular offender, and in a manner consistent with the written policy
established by the secretary. The decision to disclose or not shall
not result in civil liability for the department or its employees so
long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross
negligence. The information received by a state or local agency from
the department shall remain confidential and subject to the limitations
on disclosure set forth in chapters 70.02, 71.05, and 71.34 RCW and,
subject to these limitations, may be released only as relevant and
necessary to counteract the danger created by a particular offender.
(((4))) (6) The information received by the department under RCW
71.05.445 or 71.34.225 may be disclosed by the department to
individuals only with respect to offenders who have been determined by
the department to have a high risk of reoffending by a risk assessment,
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, only as relevant and necessary for those
individuals to take reasonable steps for the purpose of self-protection, or as provided in RCW 72.09.370(2). The information may
not be disclosed for the purpose of engaging the public in a system of
supervision, monitoring, and reporting offender behavior to the
department. The department must limit the disclosure of information
related to mental health services to the public to descriptions of an
offender's behavior, risk he or she may present to the community, and
need for mental health treatment, including medications, and shall not
disclose or release to the public copies of treatment documents or
records, except as otherwise provided by law. All disclosure of
information to the public must be done in a manner consistent with the
written policy established by the secretary. The decision to disclose
or not shall not result in civil liability for the department or its
employees so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without
gross negligence. Nothing in this subsection prevents any person from
reporting to law enforcement or the department behavior that he or she
believes creates a public safety risk.

Sec. 6 RCW 71.05.390 and 2000 c 94 s 9, 2000 c 75 s 6, and 2000
c 74 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in this section, the fact of admission and all
information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course
of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services at public or private agencies shall be confidential.
Information and records may be disclosed only:
(1) In communications between qualified professional persons to
meet the requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services or
appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings.
The consent of the patient, or his or her guardian, shall be obtained
before information or records may be disclosed by a professional person
employed by a facility unless provided to a professional person:
(a) Employed by the facility;
(b) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;
(c) Who is a county designated mental health professional;
(d) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(e) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where
the person is confined or supervised; or
(f) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services
under chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient
and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the
disclosure is made by a facility providing outpatient services to the
operator of a care facility in which the patient resides.
(3) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian,
designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or
if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such
designation.
(4) To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or for
a claim to be made on behalf of a recipient for aid, insurance, or
medical assistance to which he or she may be entitled.
(5) For either program evaluation or research, or both: PROVIDED,
That the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the evaluation or
research, or both. Such rules shall include, but need not be limited
to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers must sign an
oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any
information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research
regarding persons who have received services such that the person who
received such services is identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(6) To the courts as necessary to the administration of this
chapter or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter
10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any
evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order
entered under this chapter.
(7) To law enforcement officers, public health officers, or
personnel of the department of corrections or the indeterminate
sentence review board for persons who are the subject of the records
and who are committed to the custody or supervision of the department
of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board which information
or records are necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their
office. Except for dissemination of information released pursuant to
RCW 71.05.425 and 4.24.550, regarding persons committed under this
chapter under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(2)(c) after dismissal of
a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the extent of information
that may be released is limited as follows:
(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, the
fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address shall
be disclosed upon request; ((and))
(b) The law enforcement and public health officers or personnel of
the department of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board
shall be obligated to keep such information confidential in accordance
with this chapter; ((and))
(c) Additional information shall be disclosed only after giving
notice to said person and his or her counsel and upon a showing of
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that such information is
necessary and that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality
are and will be maintained. However, in the event the said person has
escaped from custody, said notice prior to disclosure is not necessary
and that the facility from which the person escaped shall include an
evaluation as to whether the person is of danger to persons or property
and has a propensity toward violence;
(d) Information and records shall be disclosed to the department of
corrections pursuant to and in compliance with the provisions of RCW
71.05.445 for the purposes of completing presentence investigations or
risk assessment reports, supervision of an incarcerated offender or
offender under supervision in the community, planning for and provision
of supervision of an offender, or assessment of an offender's risk to
the community; and
(e) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(8) To the attorney of the detained person.
(9) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2) and
71.05.340(1)(b) and 71.05.335. The prosecutor shall be provided access
to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis,
medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue
of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in
the best interest of the committed person or others. Information shall
be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the
person's counsel.
(10) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when
the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency,
whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have
been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a
representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure shall be made
by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or
his or her designee and shall include the dates of commitment,
admission, discharge, or release, authorized or unauthorized absence
from the agency's facility, and only such other information that is
pertinent to the threat or harassment. The decision to disclose or not
shall not result in civil liability for the agency or its employees so
long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross
negligence.
(11) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies((,
upon request,)) all necessary and relevant information in the event of
a crisis or emergent situation that poses a significant and imminent
risk to the public. The decision to disclose or not shall not result
in civil liability for the mental health service provider or its
employees so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without
gross negligence.
(12) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes
described in that section.
(13) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information
about a particular person who is committed to the department under RCW
71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(2)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.
(14) To a patient's next of kin, guardian, or conservator, if any,
in the event of death, as provided in RCW 71.05.400.
(15) To the department of health for the purposes of determining
compliance with state or federal licensure, certification, or
registration rules or laws. However, the information and records
obtained under this subsection are exempt from public inspection and
copying pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW.
The fact of admission, as well as all records, files, evidence,
findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained pursuant
to this chapter shall not be admissible as evidence in any legal
proceeding outside this chapter without the written consent of the
person who was the subject of the proceeding except in a subsequent
criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3)
or 71.05.320(2)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to chapter
10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial or in a civil commitment
proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW. The records and files
maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter shall be
confidential and available subsequent to such proceedings only to the
person who was the subject of the proceeding or his or her attorney.
In addition, the court may order the subsequent release or use of such
records or files only upon good cause shown if the court finds that
appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and will be
maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
An offender's failure to inform the department of court-ordered
treatment upon request by the department is a violation of the
conditions of supervision if the offender is in the community and an
infraction if the offender is in confinement, and the violation or
infraction is subject to sanctions.

Sec. 8 RCW 71.34.225 and 2002 c 39 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Information related to mental health services" means all
information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course
of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services by a mental health service provider. This may include
documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.05 or
10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information.
(b) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private
agency that provides services to persons with mental disorders as
defined under RCW 71.34.020 and receives funding from public sources.
This includes evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in RCW
71.34.020, community mental health service delivery systems, or
community mental health programs, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and
facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under
chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2) Information related to mental health services delivered to a
person subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW shall be released, upon
request, by a mental health service provider to department of
corrections personnel for whom the information is necessary to carry
out the responsibilities of their office. The information must be
provided only for the purpose of completing presentence investigations,
supervision of an incarcerated person, planning for and provision of
supervision of a person, or assessment of a person's risk to the
community. The request shall be in writing and shall not require the
consent of the subject of the records.
(3) The information to be released to the department of corrections
shall include all relevant records and reports, as defined by rule,
necessary for the department of corrections to carry out its duties,
including those records and reports identified in subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) The department shall, subject to available resources,
electronically, or by the most cost-effective means available, provide
the department of corrections with the names, last dates of services,
and addresses of specific regional support networks and mental health
service providers that delivered mental health services to a person
subject to chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW pursuant to an agreement between
the departments.
(5) The department and the department of corrections, in
consultation with regional support networks, mental health service
providers as defined in subsection (1) of this section, mental health
consumers, and advocates for persons with mental illness, shall adopt
rules to implement the provisions of this section related to the type
and scope of information to be released. These rules shall:
(a) Enhance and facilitate the ability of the department of
corrections to carry out its responsibility of planning and ensuring
community protection with respect to persons subject to sentencing
under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW, including accessing and releasing or
disclosing information of persons who received mental health services
as a minor; and
(b) Establish requirements for the notification of persons under
the supervision of the department of corrections regarding the
provisions of this section.
(((5))) (6) The information received by the department of
corrections under this section shall remain confidential and subject to
the limitations on disclosure outlined in RCW 71.34.200, except as
provided in RCW 72.09.585.
(((6))) (7) No mental health service provider or individual
employed by a mental health service provider shall be held responsible
for information released to or used by the department of corrections
under the provisions of this section or rules adopted under this
section.
(((7))) (8) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict
the release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the
release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply
with federal law and regulations.
(((8))) (9) This section does not modify the terms and conditions
of disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases
under chapter 70.24 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
When an offender receiving court-ordered mental health or chemical
dependency treatment or treatment ordered by the department of
corrections presents for treatment from a mental health or chemical
dependency treatment provider, the offender must disclose to the mental
health or chemical dependency treatment provider whether he or she is
subject to supervision by the department of corrections. If an
offender has received relief from disclosure pursuant to section 11,
12, or 13 of this act, the offender must provide the mental health or
chemical dependency treatment provider with a copy of the order
granting the relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 9.95 RCW
to read as follows:
When an offender receiving court-ordered mental health or chemical
dependency treatment or treatment ordered by the department of
corrections presents for treatment from a mental health or chemical
dependency treatment provider, the offender must disclose to the mental
health or chemical dependency treatment provider whether he or she is
subject to supervision by the department of corrections. If an
offender has received relief from disclosure pursuant to section 11,
12, or 13 of this act, the offender must provide the mental health or
chemical dependency treatment provider with a copy of the order
granting the relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
When any person is convicted in a superior court, the judgment and
sentence shall include a statement that if the offender is or becomes
subject to court-ordered mental health or chemical dependency
treatment, the offender must notify the department and the offender's
treatment information must be shared with the department of corrections
for the duration of the offender's incarceration and supervision. Upon
a petition by an offender who has no history of violent acts, as
defined in RCW 71.05.020, the court may, for good cause, find that
public safety is not enhanced by the sharing of this offender's
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
When any court orders a person to receive treatment under this
chapter, the order shall include a statement that if the person is, or
becomes, subject to supervision by the department of corrections, the
person must notify the treatment provider and the person's mental
health treatment information must be shared with the department of
corrections for the duration of the offender's incarceration and
supervision, under RCW 71.05.445. Upon a petition by a person who has
no history of violent acts, the court may, for good cause, find that
public safety would not be enhanced by the sharing of this person's
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A
RCW to read as follows:
When any court orders a person to receive treatment under this
chapter, the order shall include a statement that if the person is, or
becomes, subject to supervision by the department of corrections, the
person must notify the treatment provider and the person's chemical
dependency treatment information must be shared with the department of
corrections for the duration of the offender's incarceration and
supervision. Upon a petition by a person who has no history of violent
acts, as defined in RCW 71.05.020, the court may, for good cause, find
that public safety would not be enhanced by the sharing of this
person's information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person having charge of a jail, or that person's designee,
shall notify the county designated mental health professional or the
designated chemical dependency specialist seventy-two hours prior to
the release to the community of an offender or defendant who was
subject to a discharge review under section 18 of this act. If the
person having charge of the jail does not receive seventy-two hours
notice of the release, the notification to the county designated mental
health professional or the designated chemical dependency specialist
shall be made as soon as reasonably possible, but not later than the
actual release to the community of the defendant or offender.
(2) When a person having charge of a jail, or that person's
designee, releases an offender or defendant who was the subject of a
discharge review under section 18 of this act, the person having charge
of a jail, or that person's designee, shall notify the state hospital
from which the offender or defendant was released.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) When a designated chemical dependency specialist is notified by
a jail that a defendant or offender who was subject to a discharge
review under section 18 of this act is to be released to the community,
the designated chemical dependency specialist shall evaluate the person
within seventy-two hours of release, if the person's treatment
information indicates that he or she may need chemical dependency
treatment.
(2) When an offender is under court-ordered treatment in the
community and the supervision of the department of corrections, and the
treatment provider becomes aware that the person is in violation of the
terms of the court order, the treatment provider shall notify the
designated chemical dependency specialist of the violation and request
an evaluation for purposes of revocation of the conditional release.
(3) When a designated chemical dependency specialist becomes aware
that an offender who is under court-ordered treatment in the community
and the supervision of the department of corrections is in violation of
a treatment order or a condition of supervision, or the designated
chemical dependency specialist detains a person under this chapter, the
designated chemical dependency specialist shall notify the person's
treatment provider and the department of corrections.
(4) When an offender who is confined in a state correctional
facility or is under supervision of the department of corrections in
the community is subject to a petition for involuntary treatment under
this chapter, the designated chemical dependency specialist shall
notify the department of corrections and the department of corrections
shall have an opportunity to present its risk assessment or other
concerns to the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a county designated mental health professional is notified
by a jail that a defendant or offender who was subject to a discharge
review under section 18 of this act is to be released to the community,
the county designated mental health professional shall evaluate the
person within seventy-two hours of release.
(2) When an offender is under court-ordered treatment in the
community and the supervision of the department of corrections, and the
treatment provider becomes aware that the person is in violation of the
terms of the court order, the treatment provider shall notify the
county designated mental health professional of the violation and
request an evaluation for purposes of revocation of the less
restrictive alternative.
(3) When a county designated mental health professional becomes
aware that an offender who is under court-ordered treatment in the
community and the supervision of the department of corrections is in
violation of a treatment order or a condition of supervision, or the
county designated mental health professional detains a person under
this chapter, the county designated mental health professional shall
notify the person's treatment provider and the department of
corrections.
(4) When an offender who is confined in a state correctional
facility or is under supervision of the department of corrections in
the community is subject to a petition for involuntary treatment under
this chapter, the county designated mental health professional shall
notify the department of corrections and the department of corrections
shall present its risk assessment or other concerns to the court if it
classifies the offender as a high risk or high needs offender.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When an offender is under court-ordered mental health or
chemical dependency treatment in the community and the supervision of
the department of corrections, and the community corrections officer
becomes aware that the person is in violation of the terms of the
court's treatment order, the community corrections officer shall notify
the county designated mental health professional or the designated
chemical dependency specialist, as appropriate, of the violation and
request an evaluation for purposes of revocation of the less
restrictive alternative or conditional release.
(2) When a county designated mental health professional or the
designated chemical dependency specialist becomes aware that an
offender who is under court-ordered treatment in the community and the
supervision of the department of corrections is in violation of a
treatment order or a condition of supervision, or the county designated
mental health professional or the designated chemical dependency
specialist detains a person under chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW, the
county designated mental health professional or the designated chemical
dependency specialist shall notify the person's treatment provider and
the department of corrections.
(3) When a county designated mental health professional or the
designated chemical dependency specialist notifies the department that
an offender in a state correctional facility is the subject of a
petition for involuntary treatment under chapter 71.05 or 70.96A RCW,
the county designated mental health professional or the designated
chemical dependency specialist shall notify the department of
corrections and the department of corrections shall have an opportunity
to present its risk assessment or other concerns to the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a state hospital admits a person for evaluation or
treatment under this chapter who has a history of violent acts and:
(a) Has been transferred from a correctional facility; or
(b) Is or has been under the authority of the department of
corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board,
the state hospital shall consult with the appropriate corrections and
chemical dependency personnel and the appropriate forensic staff at the
state hospital to conduct a discharge review to determine whether the
person presents a likelihood of serious harm and whether the person is
appropriate for release to a less restrictive alternative.
(2) When a state hospital returns a person who was reviewed under
subsection (1) of this section to a correctional facility, the hospital
shall notify the correctional facility that the person was subject to
a discharge review pursuant to this section.

Sec. 19 RCW 70.02.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 741 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A patient may authorize a health care provider to disclose the
patient's health care information. A health care provider shall honor
an authorization and, if requested, provide a copy of the recorded
health care information unless the health care provider denies the
patient access to health care information under RCW 70.02.090.
(2) A health care provider may charge a reasonable fee for
providing the health care information and is not required to honor an
authorization until the fee is paid.
(3) To be valid, a disclosure authorization to a health care
provider shall:
(a) Be in writing, dated, and signed by the patient;
(b) Identify the nature of the information to be disclosed;
(c) Identify the name, address, and institutional affiliation of
the person to whom the information is to be disclosed;
(d) Except for third-party payors, identify the provider who is to
make the disclosure; and
(e) Identify the patient.
(4) Except as provided by this chapter, the signing of an
authorization by a patient is not a waiver of any rights a patient has
under other statutes, the rules of evidence, or common law.
(5) A health care provider shall retain each authorization or
revocation in conjunction with any health care information from which
disclosures are made. This requirement shall not apply to disclosures
to third-party payors.
(6) Except for authorizations given pursuant to an agreement with
a treatment or monitoring program or disciplinary authority under
chapter 18.71 or 18.130 RCW, when the patient is under the supervision
of the department of corrections, or to provide information to third-party payors, an authorization may not permit the release of health
care information relating to future health care that the patient
receives more than ninety days after the authorization was signed.
Patients shall be advised of the period of validity of their
authorization on the disclosure authorization form. If the
authorization does not contain an expiration date and the patient is
not under the supervision of the department of corrections, it expires
ninety days after it is signed.
(7) Where the patient is under the supervision of the department of
corrections, an authorization signed pursuant to this section for
health care information related to mental health or drug or alcohol
treatment expires at the end of the term of supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) The department of social and health
services and the department of corrections shall develop a training
plan for department employees, contractors, and necessary mental health
service providers and chemical dependency treatment providers covering
the information sharing processes for offenders with treatment orders
and terms of supervision in the community.
(2) The department of corrections and the department of social and
health services, in consultation with prosecuting attorneys, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, regional support
networks, county designated chemical dependency specialists, and other
experts that the departments deem appropriate, shall develop a model
for multidisciplinary case management and release planning of offenders
classified as having high resource needs in multiple service areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 The department of social and health
services, in consultation with the appropriate committees of the
legislature, shall assess the current and needed residential capacity
for crisis response and ongoing treatment services for persons in need
of treatment for mental disorders and chemical dependency. In addition
to considering the demand for persons with either a mental disorder or
chemical dependency, the assessment shall consider the demand for
services for mentally ill offenders, and persons with co-occurring
disorders, mental disorders caused by traumatic brain injury or
dementia, and drug induced psychosis. An initial report assessing the
types, number, and location of needed crisis response and emergency
treatment beds, both in community hospital-based and in other settings,
shall be submitted to appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 1, 2004. A final report assessing the types, number, and
location of beds needed for emergency, transitional, and ongoing
treatment shall be submitted to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005. Both reports shall set forth the
projected costs and benefits of alternative strategies and timelines
for addressing identified needs.
Legislative staff shall review and analyze the use of mental health
resources in other state programs for providing community based and
hospital based care for persons with mental illness, including
information available through the council of state governments and the
national conference of state legislatures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 This act takes effect July 1, 2004, except
for sections 6, 20, and 21 of this act, which are necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and take effect immediately.

--- END ---