BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to:
(1) Maintain and improve the state's ambient air quality by
establishing an overall performance standard for state vehicles
regarding air pollutant emissions and energy efficiency;
(2) Provide flexibility to meet the performance standard as
technologies change, as the market provides additional vehicle options,
and recognize demand management strategies as an additional method of
contributing toward meeting the standard; and
(3) Establish clear accountability for progress in meeting the
performance standards, including regular reporting to the governor and
appropriate legislative committees, as well as availability of
performance information to the general public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following goals are established for achievement by the
fleet of passenger motor vehicles operated by motor pool services
within the department of general administration and by each of the
state agencies determined by the office of financial management under
subsection (4) of this section:
(a) A doubling of mileage performance by July 1, 2015; and
(b) A reduction by half of pollutant emissions by July 1, 2015.
(2) The baseline date to which to apply the goals shall be July 1,
2003. The department and the office of financial management shall
establish biennial goals with the initial biennium beginning July 1,
2005, to assist in determining progress toward meeting the goals of
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department and the state energy policy office shall develop
a methodology for measuring mileage performance across all types of
propulsion technologies, which if practicable shall include a uniform
measure of energy usage. The methodology may incorporate factors other
than vehicle performance, such as passenger miles travelled. The
department and the department of ecology shall develop a methodology
for measuring pollutant emissions. The methodology may include any
factors relevant to the adverse health, safety, environmental, or
visibility effects of emissions, including but not limited to such
factors as the pollutant's quantity, toxicity, persistence, and
reactivity with other substances.
(4) The office of financial management shall determine those state
agencies whose passenger motor vehicle fleets shall be subject to the
goals of subsection (1) of this section. The office shall include
those agencies with a passenger motor vehicle fleet that averages fifty
or more vehicles over the two years preceding the baseline date of July
1, 2005. The office may include state agencies with smaller fleets
where it will not cause an undue hardship in meeting the mission of the
state agency. The office may aggregate two or more agency fleets for
purposes of measuring progress toward the goal, provided that such
aggregation is used consistently over the ten-year period. For the
purposes of this section, "state agency" shall have the same meaning as
provided in RCW 43.19.560.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2015, the department and the office of
financial management shall establish strong biennial goals for
passenger vehicle mileage performance and pollutant emissions
reductions that build on the achievements of the previous decade. The
department shall review existing performance data for comparably sized
fleets of local, state, and federal agencies, and shall ensure that the
biennial goals are not below the performance of the top quartile of
such government agency fleets.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "passenger motor vehicle"
means any sedan, station wagon, bus, or light truck that is designed
for carrying ten passengers or less and is used primarily for the
transportation of persons. The department for the motor pool services
and the office of financial management for other state agency fleets
may permit specific additional vehicles to be included for purposes of
measuring fleet performance progress toward the goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No later than January 1, 2005, the department and the office of
financial management shall jointly provide a progress report to the
governor and to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives on implementing section 2 of this act. The report
shall address the methodologies for measuring the progress toward the
goals, the progress toward determining the fleet performance as of the
baseline date, and any information that would assist in making
budgetary allocations or policy modifications for the initial biennium
of progress toward the goals.
(2) No later than January 1st of each odd-numbered year beginning
in 2007, the department and the office of financial management shall
provide a progress report on all state agency fleets subject to the
goals of this section. The report shall be provided to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives.
(3) The reports required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section
and other information pertaining to fleet performance and methodologies
for measuring performance shall be posted on the department's
electronic web site.

--- END ---