BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the salaries
of state employees have not kept pace with inflation in recent years.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature that state employees be
given an additional holiday as partial compensation for this hardship.

Sec. 2 RCW 1.16.050 and 2003 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The following are legal holidays: Sunday; the first day of
January, commonly called New Year's Day; the third Monday of January,
being celebrated as the anniversary of the birth of Martin Luther King,
Jr.; the third Monday of February to be known as Presidents' Day and to
be celebrated as the anniversary of the births of Abraham Lincoln and
George Washington; the last Monday of May, commonly known as Memorial
Day; the fourth day of July, being the anniversary of the Declaration
of Independence; the first Monday in September, to be known as Labor
Day; the eleventh day of November, to be known as Veterans' Day; the
fourth Thursday in November, to be known as Thanksgiving Day; the day
immediately following Thanksgiving Day; ((and)) the twenty-fifth day of
December, commonly called Christmas Day; and the twenty-sixth day of
December shall be a legal holiday for agencies of the state and shall
be recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees thereof.
(2) Employees of the state and its political subdivisions, except
employees of school districts and except those nonclassified employees
of institutions of higher education who hold appointments or are
employed under contracts to perform services for periods of less than
twelve consecutive months, shall be entitled to one paid holiday per
calendar year in addition to those specified in this section. Each
employee of the state or its political subdivisions may select the day
on which the employee desires to take the additional holiday provided
for herein after consultation with the employer pursuant to guidelines
to be promulgated by rule of the appropriate personnel authority, or in
the case of local government by ordinance or resolution of the
legislative authority.
(3) If any of the ((above)) specified state legal holidays in
subsection (1) of this section are also federal legal holidays but
observed on different dates, only the state legal holidays shall be
recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees of the state and its
political subdivisions except that for port districts and the law
enforcement and public transit employees of municipal corporations,
either the federal or the state legal holiday, but in no case both, may
be recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees.
(4)(a) Whenever any legal holiday, other than Sunday, falls upon a
Sunday, the following Monday shall be the legal holiday, except that if
the twenty-sixth day of December falls upon a Sunday, then the
preceding Thursday shall be the legal holiday.
(b) Whenever any legal holiday falls upon a Saturday, the preceding
Friday shall be the legal holiday, except that if the twenty-sixth day
of December falls upon a Saturday, then the preceding Thursday shall be
the legal holiday.
(c) Whenever the twenty-sixth day of December falls upon a Monday,
then the following Tuesday shall be the legal holiday.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to have the effect
of adding or deleting the number of paid holidays provided for in an
agreement between employees and employers of political subdivisions of
the state or as established by ordinance or resolution of the local
government legislative authority.
(6)(a) The legislature declares that the twelfth day of October
shall be recognized as Columbus Day but shall not be considered a legal
holiday for any purposes.
(b) The legislature declares that the ninth day of April shall be
recognized as former prisoner of war recognition day but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
(c) The legislature declares that the twenty-sixth day of January
shall be recognized as Washington army and air national guard day but
shall not be considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
(d) The legislature declares that the seventh day of August shall
be recognized as purple heart recipient recognition day but shall not
be considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
(e) The legislature declares that the second Sunday in October be
recognized as Washington state children's day but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
(f) The legislature declares that the sixteenth day of April shall
be recognized as Mother Joseph day and the fourth day of September as
Marcus Whitman day, but neither shall be considered legal holidays for
any purpose.
(g) The legislature declares that the seventh day of December be
recognized as Pearl Harbor remembrance day but shall not be considered
a legal holiday for any purpose.
(h) The legislature declares that the nineteenth day of February be
recognized as civil liberties day of remembrance but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---