BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that the individual
and collective actions of the present generation of Washington citizens
should not jeopardize the potential of future generations of
Washingtonians to experience a quality of life at least comparable to
that enjoyed today. To this end all state agencies should examine and
modify their programs and actions to adopt sustainable practices, and
all governmental agencies and officials should assess the impacts of
their decisions on both present and future generations. The
legislature recognizes the contributions of the governor's sustainable
Washington advisory panel in guiding the state toward sustainability,
and specifically recognizes and adopts the panel's goal of achieving a
fully sustainable Washington within one generation.
Therefore, it is the purpose of this chapter to adopt sustainable
practices by all state agencies to contribute toward achieving this
goal, and to provide for a state-level entity to focus discussion and
analysis of sustainability. It is further the purpose of this chapter
to provide advice and recommendations to the governor and legislature
for the effective implementation of measures to achieve this goal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The governor shall create a sustainable
Washington advisory panel. The governor may choose to continue with
the panel created by the governor and in existence on the effective
date of this act, modify that panel's membership, or create a new
panel. The primary task of the panel shall be to provide advice to the
governor and the legislature on implementing the panel's report, "A New
Path Forward: Action Plan for a Sustainable Washington." The panel
shall be staffed by the office of financial management. The panel
shall ensure that the "New Path Forward" report is readily accessible
for public review, including providing a hard copy upon request and
posting on an electronic web site.
(2) The panel shall work with the governor's staff to provide a
forum for state agency discussion and analysis of sustainable practices
issues. The panel shall also serve as a resource to all state agencies
regarding sustainable practices. The panel may provide recommendations
directly to a state agency regarding opportunities to align an agency
practice or program with the sustainability goals of this chapter and
the action plan identified in this section.
(3) The panel shall also convene forums and use other means to
encourage sustainable practices across all sectors, including, but not
limited to, local governments, businesses, and nongovernmental
nonprofit organizations. The panel shall encourage broad public
participation across these sectors and from all geographic areas of the
state.
(4) The panel shall build upon its existing action plan to address
the use of performance measures to track progress toward the statewide
goal of sustainability, and to consider specific practices that would
promote the essential strategic outcomes addressed in the "New Path
Forward" report. The panel's analysis should include a broad range of
conditions, including, at a minimum, economic vitality, social justice,
education, public health, energy, natural resources, waste and
recycling, and air and water quality.
(5) On or about January 1, 2005, July 1, 2005, and January 1, 2006,
the panel shall provide progress reports to the governor and
legislature on implementation of the action plan and other agency
activities to achieve sustainable practices. The final progress report
shall also include recommendations for strengthening state agency
oversight and coordination to achieve the goal stated in section 1 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund
to the office of financial management for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2005, to carry out the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act expires June 30, 2006.

--- END ---