BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
An initiative or referendum that repeals a statute shall set forth
the language being repealed in its entirety. Statutes repealed in
violation of this section presumptively violate Article II, section 37
of the Washington state Constitution.

--- END ---