BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following special license plate series created by the
legislature may be personalized: (a) RCW 46.16.301; (b) RCW 46.16.305,
except those plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1); (c) RCW 46.16.324;
(d) RCW 46.16.585; or (e) RCW 46.16.745.
(2) Personalized special plates issued under this section may only
be personalized by using numbers or letters, or any combination thereof
not exceeding seven positions, including the special plate identifier
position holders, and not less than one position, to the extent that
there are no conflicts with existing license plate series. A
personalized special license plate is subject to the same requirements
as personalized license plates issued on the standard background as
listed in RCW 46.16.575, 46.16.580, 46.16.590, 46.16.595, and
46.16.600.
(3) In addition to any other fees and taxes due at the time of
registration, applicants for a personalized special license plate must
pay both the fees and taxes required to be paid upon registration or
renewal of the special plate as set out in the statute creating the
special plate and the personalized plate as required in RCW 46.16.585
and 46.16.606. The special plate fee must be distributed in accordance
with the requirements set out in the statute creating the special
plate. The personalized plate fee must be distributed under RCW
46.16.585 and 46.16.606.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall design and issue disabled parking emblem
versions of special license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305,
46.16.324, 46.16.301, 46.16.745, or 46.16.585. The disabled parking
emblem version of the special plate must display the universal symbol
of access that may be used in lieu of the parking placard issued to
persons who qualify for special parking privileges under RCW 46.16.381.
The department may not charge an additional fee for the issuance of the
special disabled parking emblem license plate, except the regular motor
vehicle registration fee, the fee associated with the particular
special plate, and any other fees and taxes required to be paid upon
registration of a motor vehicle. The emblem must be incorporated into
the design of the special license plate in a manner to be determined by
the department, and under existing vehicular licensing procedures and
existing laws.
(2) Persons who qualify for special parking privileges under RCW
46.16.381, and who have applied and paid the appropriate fee for a
special license plate issued under RCW 46.16.305, 46.16.324, 46.16.301,
or 46.16.745, are entitled to receive from the department a special
disabled parking emblem license plate. The special disabled parking
emblem license plate may be used for one vehicle registered in the
disabled person's name. Persons who have been issued the parking
privileges or who are using a vehicle displaying the special disabled
parking emblem license plate may park in places reserved for mobility
disabled persons.
(3) The special disabled parking emblem license plate must be
administered in the same manner as the plates issued under RCW
46.16.381.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.381 and 2003 c 371 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall grant special parking privileges to any
person who has a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk
and meets one of the following criteria, as determined by a licensed
physician or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW:
(a) Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest;
(b) Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic,
neurological, or orthopedic condition;
(c) Is so severely disabled, that the person cannot walk without
the use of or assistance from a brace, cane, another person, prosthetic
device, wheelchair, or other assistive device;
(d) Uses portable oxygen;
(e) Is restricted by lung disease to such an extent that forced
expiratory respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry is less than
one liter per second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty
mm/hg on room air at rest;
(f) Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to
the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified as
class III or IV under standards accepted by the American Heart
Association; or
(g) Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to
automobile emissions which limits or impairs the ability to walk. The
personal physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner of the
applicant shall document that the disability is comparable in severity
to the others listed in this subsection.
(2) The applications for disabled parking permits and temporary
disabled parking permits are official state documents. Knowingly
providing false information in conjunction with the application is a
gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. The following
statement must appear on each application form immediately below the
physician's or advanced registered nurse practitioner's signature and
immediately below the applicant's signature: "A disabled parking
permit may be issued only for a medical necessity that severely affects
mobility (RCW 46.16.381). Knowingly providing false information on
this application is a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is up to one year
in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both."
(3) Persons who qualify for special parking privileges are entitled
to receive from the department of licensing a removable windshield
placard bearing the international symbol of access and an individual
serial number, along with a special identification card bearing the
name and date of birth of the person to whom the placard is issued, and
the placard's serial number. The special identification card shall be
issued no later than January 1, 2000, to all persons who are issued
parking placards, including those issued for temporary disabilities,
and special disabled parking license plates. The department shall
design the placard to be displayed when the vehicle is parked by
suspending it from the rearview mirror, or in the absence of a rearview
mirror the card may be displayed on the dashboard of any vehicle used
to transport the disabled person. Instead of regular motor vehicle
license plates, disabled persons are entitled to receive special
license plates under this section or section 2 of this act bearing the
international symbol of access for one vehicle registered in the
disabled person's name. Disabled persons who are not issued the
special license plates are entitled to receive a second special placard
upon submitting a written request to the department. Persons who have
been issued the parking privileges and who are using a vehicle or are
riding in a vehicle displaying the placard or special license plates
((or placard)) issued under this section or section 2 of this act may
park in places reserved for mobility disabled persons. The director
shall adopt rules providing for the issuance of special placards and
license plates to public transportation authorities, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, boarding homes licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW, senior citizen centers, private nonprofit agencies as
defined in chapter 24.03 RCW, and vehicles registered with the
department as cabulances that regularly transport disabled persons who
have been determined eligible for special parking privileges provided
under this section. The director may issue special license plates for
a vehicle registered in the name of the public transportation
authority, nursing home, boarding homes, senior citizen center, private
nonprofit agency, or cabulance service if the vehicle is primarily used
to transport persons with disabilities described in this section.
Public transportation authorities, nursing homes, boarding homes,
senior citizen centers, private nonprofit agencies, and cabulance
services are responsible for insuring that the special placards and
license plates are not used improperly and are responsible for all
fines and penalties for improper use.
(4) Whenever the disabled person transfers or assigns his or her
interest in the vehicle, the special license plates shall be removed
from the motor vehicle. If another vehicle is acquired by the disabled
person and the vehicle owner qualifies for a special plate, the plate
shall be attached to the vehicle, and the director shall be immediately
notified of the transfer of the plate. If another vehicle is not
acquired by the disabled person, the removed plate shall be immediately
surrendered to the director.
(5) The special license plate shall be renewed in the same manner
and at the time required for the renewal of regular motor vehicle
license plates under this chapter. No special license plate may be
issued to a person who is temporarily disabled. A person who has a
condition expected to improve within six months may be issued a
temporary placard for a period not to exceed six months. If the
condition exists after six months a new temporary placard shall be
issued upon receipt of a new certification from the disabled person's
physician. The permanent parking placard and identification card of a
disabled person shall be renewed at least every five years, as required
by the director, by satisfactory proof of the right to continued use of
the privileges. In the event of the permit holder's death, the parking
placard and identification card must be immediately surrendered to the
department. The department shall match and purge its disabled permit
data base with available death record information at least every twelve
months.
(6) Each person who has been issued a permanent disabled parking
permit on or before July 1, 1998, must renew the permit no later than
July 1, 2003, subject to a schedule to be set by the department, or the
permit will expire.
(7) Additional fees shall not be charged for the issuance of the
special placards or the identification cards. No additional fee may be
charged for the issuance of the special license plates except the
regular motor vehicle registration fee and any other fees and taxes
required to be paid upon registration of a motor vehicle.
(8) Any unauthorized use of the special placard, special license
plate issued under this section or section 2 of this act, or
identification card is a traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of
two hundred fifty dollars.
(9) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars for a person to make inaccessible the access
aisle located next to a space reserved for physically disabled persons.
The clerk of the court shall report all violations related to this
subsection to the department.
(10) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars for any person to park a vehicle in a parking
place provided on private property without charge or on public property
reserved for physically disabled persons without a placard or special
license plate ((or placard)) issued under this section or section 2 of
this act. If a person is charged with a violation, the person shall
not be determined to have committed an infraction if the person
produces in court or before the court appearance the placard or special
license plate ((or placard)) issued under this section or section 2 of
this act required under this section. A local jurisdiction providing
nonmetered, on-street parking places reserved for physically disabled
persons may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less than four
hours on the use of these parking places. A local jurisdiction may
impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less than four hours on the
use of nonreserved, on-street parking spaces by vehicles displaying the
special parking placards or special license plates issued under this
section or section 2 of this act. All time restrictions must be
clearly posted.
(11) The penalties imposed under subsections (9) and (10) of this
section shall be used by that local jurisdiction exclusively for law
enforcement. The court may also impose an additional penalty
sufficient to reimburse the local jurisdiction for any costs it may
have incurred in removal and storage of the improperly parked vehicle.
(12) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, it is a
traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars
for any person willfully to obtain a special license plate issued under
this section or section 2 of this act, placard, or identification card
in a manner other than that established under this section.
(13)(a) A law enforcement agency authorized to enforce parking laws
may appoint volunteers, with a limited commission, to issue notices of
infractions for violations of this section or RCW 46.61.581.
Volunteers must be at least twenty-one years of age. The law
enforcement agency appointing volunteers may establish any other
qualifications the agency deems desirable.
(b) An agency appointing volunteers under this section must provide
training to the volunteers before authorizing them to issue notices of
infractions.
(c) A notice of infraction issued by a volunteer appointed under
this subsection has the same force and effect as a notice of infraction
issued by a police officer for the same offense.
(d) A police officer or a volunteer may request a person to show
the person's identification card or special parking placard when
investigating the possibility of a violation of this section. If the
request is refused, the person in charge of the vehicle may be issued
a notice of infraction for a violation of this section.
(14) For second or subsequent violations of this section, in
addition to a monetary fine, the violator must complete a minimum of
forty hours of:
(a) Community restitution for a nonprofit organization that serves
the disabled community or persons having disabling diseases; or
(b) Any other community restitution that may sensitize the violator
to the needs and obstacles faced by persons who have disabilities.
(15) The court may not suspend more than one-half of any fine
imposed under subsection (8), (9), (10), or (12) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect November 1, 2004.

--- END ---