BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislative transportation committee
shall conduct a feasibility study of the potential for local government
entities, including but not limited to port districts, to provide
locations for parking commercial motor vehicles as defined in RCW
46.04.140, at night.
The study must, at a minimum:
(1) Identify the factors that should be examined in determining the
best locations for parking commercial motor vehicles at night;
(2) Apply the identified factors to an analysis of potential
locations;
(3) Recommend the best locations for parking commercial motor
vehicles at night that can be provided by local government entities,
including but not limited to port districts.
The entity selected to perform the study through the request for
proposals process shall report back to the transportation committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2004.

--- END ---