BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
If any person or government agency fails to follow the requirements
of obtaining hydraulic project approval under this chapter or fails to
carry out any of the requirements or conditions of a hydraulic project
approval issued under this chapter, the department's regional program
manager responsible for overseeing the regional hydraulic project
activities at any point prior to the approval of a hydraulic project
approval may issue a stop work order to that person or government
agency. The stop work order must set forth the specific nature,
extent, and time of violation, the damage or potential damage, a notice
that the violation must stop, and, in appropriate cases, the specific
corrective action to be taken within a specified time. Within twenty
days of service of a stop work order or other order or as provided by
rule of the department extending the time, the person may file a
written petition with the department appealing the order, and this
petition must be treated as an application for an adjudicative
proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. In the event of an appeal, a
person or government agency may seek interim relief from a stop work
order or other order under this section as provided in chapter 34.05
RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.300 and 2000 c 107 s 239 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person or
government agency is guilty of unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project
activities if the person constructs any form of hydraulic project or
performs other work on a hydraulic project and:
(a) Fails to have a hydraulic project approval required under
chapter 77.55 RCW for such construction or work; or
(b) Violates any requirements or conditions of the hydraulic
project approval for such construction or work.
(2) Unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) The commission may, by rule, identify categories of acts that
violate the hydraulics code, chapter 77.55 RCW, and may classify such
acts as infractions, punishable under RCW 77.15.160.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) Activities that are the subject of a stop work order issued
under section 1 of this act and the person does not violate such an
order; or
(b) Activities for which an infraction has been issued under
subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.140 (Unclassified fish or
wildlife -- Unlawful taking -- Penalty) and 1998 c 190 s 15 are each
repealed.

--- END ---