BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.84.010 and 1991 c 222 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to protect the public
by the certification and registration of practitioners of radiological
technology. By promoting high standards of professional performance,
by requiring professional accountability, and by credentialing those
persons who seek to provide radiological technology under the title of
radiological technologists or radiology assistants, and by regulating
all persons utilizing ionizing radiation on human beings this chapter
identifies those practitioners who have achieved a particular level of
competency. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require that
individual or group policies or contracts of an insurance carrier,
health care service contractor, or health maintenance organization
provide benefits or coverage for services and supplies provided by a
person certified under this chapter.
The legislature finds and declares that this chapter conforms to
the guidelines, terms, and definitions for the credentialing of health
or health-related professions specified under chapter 18.120 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.84.020 and 2000 c 93 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(3) "Licensed practitioner" means any licensed health care
practitioner performing services within the person's authorized scope
of practice.
(4) "Radiologic technologist" means an individual certified under
this chapter, other than a licensed practitioner, who practices
radiologic technology as a:
(a) Diagnostic radiologic technologist, who is a person who
actually handles x-ray equipment in the process of applying radiation
on a human being for diagnostic purposes at the direction of a licensed
practitioner, this includes parenteral procedures related to radiologic
technology when performed under the direct supervision of a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW; ((or))
(b) Therapeutic radiologic technologist, who is a person who uses
radiation-generating equipment for therapeutic purposes on human
subjects at the direction of a licensed practitioner, this includes
parenteral procedures related to radiologic technology when performed
under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under chapter
18.71 or 18.57 RCW; ((or))
(c) Nuclear medicine technologist, who is a person who prepares
radiopharmaceuticals and administers them to human beings for
diagnostic and therapeutic purposes and who performs in vivo and in
vitro detection and measurement of radioactivity for medical purposes
at the direction of a licensed practitioner; or
(d) Radiologist assistant, who is an advanced-level certified
radiologic technologist who has completed an academic program
encompassing a radiologist assistant curriculum from an approved school
of radiologic technology and a radiologist-directed clinical
preceptorship who:
(i) Works to enhance patient care under the indirect supervision of
a radiologist, by assisting the radiologist in the diagnostic imaging
environment; and
(ii) Performs advanced diagnostic procedures, as permitted by rule,
under the general supervision of a radiologist, including radiology
procedures, invasive procedures, procedures as delegated by a
radiologist, and the types of injection of contrast media and
radioactive isotopes material allowed.
(5) "Approved school of radiologic technology" means a school of
radiologic technology approved by the council on medical education of
the American medical association or a school found to maintain the
equivalent of such a course of study as determined by the department.
Such school may be operated by a medical or educational institution,
and for the purpose of providing the requisite clinical experience,
shall be affiliated with one or more general hospitals.
(6) "Radiologic technology" means the use of ionizing radiation
upon a human being for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.
(7) "Radiologist" means a physician certified by the American board
of radiology or the American osteopathic board of radiology.
(8) "Registered x-ray technician" means a person who is registered
with the department, and who applies ionizing radiation at the
direction of a licensed practitioner and who does not perform
parenteral procedures.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.84.030 and 1991 c 222 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person may practice radiologic technology without being
registered or certified under this chapter, unless that person is a
licensed practitioner as defined in RCW 18.84.020(3). A person
represents himself or herself to the public as a certified radiological
technologist when that person adopts or uses a title or description of
services that incorporates one or more of the following items or
designations:
(1) Certified radiologic technologist or CRT, for persons so
certified under this chapter;
(2) Certified radiologic therapy technologist, CRTT, or CRT, for
persons certified in the therapeutic field;
(3) Certified radiologic diagnostic technologist, CRDT, or CRT, for
persons certified in the diagnostic field; ((or))
(4) Certified nuclear medicine technologist, CNMT, or CRT, for
persons certified as nuclear medicine technologists; or
(5) Certified radiologist assistant or certified radiology
practitioner assistant for persons so certified under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.84 RCW
to read as follows:
It shall be considered unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130
RCW for any person registered or certified under this chapter to
interpret images, make diagnoses, or prescribe medications or
therapies.

--- END ---