BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish achievable streamflow levels for
each water resource inventory area in which watershed planning under
the provisions of chapter 90.82 RCW is not considering amending an
existing flow or setting new flows or for those water resource
inventory areas without watershed planning activities. The streamflows
must be set within twenty years from the effective date of this
section, as funding is made available by the legislature for such flow
setting. The department shall create a process of public involvement
similar to that of a watershed planning unit under the provision of
chapter 90.82 RCW, in order to ensure that local citizens are informed
and afforded, to the maximum extent practicable, the opportunity to
guide the flow setting process.
(2) The department shall establish a schedule for setting flows
under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, and shall
submit the schedule to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005. The department shall subsequently
report to the legislature with an updated schedule every two years
until the schedule is completed. Along with the schedule, the
department shall provide updated information on flows that have been
set.
(3) Once flows have been set, the department shall develop a
strategy to achieve such flows. The strategy must be part of the
report to the legislature required by subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The reports required under the provisions of this section may
be coordinated with the annual flow status report required by RCW
90.82.080.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.15.030 and 2000 c 11 s 66 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter shall be divided ((equally
between the habitat conservation and outdoor recreation accounts)) as
follows: Forty-five percent each to the habitat conservation and
outdoor recreation accounts, and ten percent to the water quality
account, and shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in
this chapter. The ten percent allocated to the water quality account
must be used exclusively for setting and achieving flows in accordance
with section 1 of this act.
(2) Moneys deposited in these accounts shall be invested as
authorized for other state funds, and any earnings on them shall be
credited to the respective account.
(3) All moneys deposited in the habitat conservation and outdoor
recreation accounts shall be allocated under RCW 79A.15.040 and
79A.15.050 as grants to state or local agencies for acquisition,
development, and renovation within the jurisdiction of those agencies,
subject to legislative appropriation. The committee may use or permit
the use of any funds appropriated for this chapter as matching funds
where federal, local, or other funds are made available for projects
within the purposes of this chapter.
(4) Projects receiving grants under this chapter that are developed
or otherwise accessible for public recreational uses shall be available
to the public on a nondiscriminatory basis.
(5) The committee may make grants to an eligible project from both
the habitat conservation and outdoor recreation accounts and any one or
more of the applicable categories under such accounts described in RCW
79A.15.040 and 79A.15.050.

--- END ---