BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.62.260 and 1994 c 250 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall operate a transient accommodation as defined in
this chapter without having a valid license issued by the department.
Applications for a transient accommodation license shall be filed with
the department sixty days or more before initiating business as a
transient accommodation. All licenses issued under the provisions of
this chapter shall expire one year from the effective date.
(2) All applications for renewal of licenses shall be ((made thirty
days or more prior to the date of expiration of the license)) either:
(a) Postmarked no later than midnight on the date the license expires;
or (b) if personally presented to the department or sent by electronic
means, received by the department by 5:00 p.m. on the date the license
expires.
(3) A licensee that submits a license renewal application in
accordance with this section and the rules and fee schedule adopted
under this chapter shall be deemed to possess a valid license for the
year following the expiration date of the expiring license, or until
the department suspends or revokes the license pursuant to RCW
70.62.270.
(4) The license of a licensee that fails to submit a license
renewal application in accordance with this section, and the rules and
fee schedule adopted under this chapter, shall become invalid on the
thirty-fifth day after the expiration date, unless the licensee shall
have corrected any and all deficiencies in the renewal application and
paid a penalty fee as established by rule by the department before the
thirty-fifth day following the expiration date. An invalid license may
be reinstated upon reapplication as an applicant for a new license
under subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Each license shall be issued only for the premises and persons
named in the application.

--- END ---