BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.23.035 and 1997 c 58 s 933 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall adopt rules
for the distribution of support money collected by the division of
child support. These rules shall:
(a) Comply with Title IV-D of the federal social security act as
amended by the personal responsibility and work opportunity
reconciliation act of 1996;
(b) Direct the division of child support to distribute support
money within eight days of receipt, unless one of the following
circumstances, or similar circumstances specified in the rules,
prevents prompt distribution:
(i) The location of the custodial parent is unknown;
(ii) The support debt is in litigation;
(iii) The division of child support cannot identify the responsible
parent or the custodian;
(c) Provide for:
(i) Proportionate distribution of current support payments if the
responsible parent owes a support obligation ((or a support debt)) for
two or more Title IV-D cases;
(ii) Distribution of past-due support payments if the responsible
parent owes a support debt for two or more Title IV-D cases, as
authorized under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 657. In determining priority of
distribution of past-due support payments between Washington state and
another state, the division of child support shall first distribute
past-due support payments to another state if there are nonassistance
arrears owing to a custodial parent in that state and if that state's
distribution policy is to first pay in full the nonassistance debt owed
to a custodial parent. Upon satisfaction of the nonassistance arrears
debt to a custodial parent in another state, or if the state is no
longer paying nonassistance arrears to that custodial parent,
Washington shall determine an appropriate distribution of past-due
payments; and
(d) Authorize the distribution of support money, except money
collected under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 664, to satisfy a support debt owed to
the IV-D custodian before the debt owed to the state when the custodian
stops receiving a public assistance grant.
(2) The division of child support may distribute support payments
to the payee under the support order or to another person who has
lawful physical custody of the child or custody with the payee's
consent. The payee may file an application for an adjudicative
proceeding to challenge distribution to such other person. Prior to
distributing support payments to any person other than the payee, the
registry shall:
(a) Obtain a written statement from the child's physical custodian,
under penalty of perjury, that the custodian has lawful custody of the
child or custody with the payee's consent;
(b) Mail to the responsible parent and to the payee at the payee's
last known address a copy of the physical custodian's statement and a
notice which states that support payments will be sent to the physical
custodian; and
(c) File a copy of the notice with the clerk of the court that
entered the original support order.
(3) If the Washington state support registry distributes a support
payment to a person in error, the registry may obtain restitution by
means of a set-off against future payments received on behalf of the
person receiving the erroneous payment, or may act according to RCW
74.20A.270 as deemed appropriate. Any set-off against future support
payments shall be limited to amounts collected on the support debt and
ten percent of amounts collected as current support.
(4) The division of child support shall ensure that the fifty
dollar pass through payment, as required by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 657 before
the adoption of P.L. 104-193, is terminated immediately upon July 27,
1997, and all rules to the contrary adopted before July 27, 1997, are
without force and effect.

--- END ---