BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the air
quality around idling heavy duty diesel vehicles at truck stops and
large vessels in marine ports can contribute to unhealthy conditions.
The legislature also recognizes that many other states, the federal
government, and the countries of Canada and Mexico and private sector
organizations are examining the issues related to this problem.
Washington state must work cooperatively with these governments and
organizations to seek compatible solutions to improve the air quality.
The legislature recognizes and declares that environmental issues of
this nature should not become issues that interfere with the
competitiveness of businesses, and that the states' efforts include
solutions that work especially well with any projects undertaken by
Idaho, Oregon, California, Canada, and Mexico.
Idling vehicles not only consume up to one billion gallons of
diesel fuel a year, but also contribute to air pollution by releasing
volatile organic compounds, carbon monoxide, carbon dioxide, nitrogen
oxides, and particulates. Additionally, these conditions contribute to
driver fatigue through exposure to noise, vibration, and elevated
levels of carbon monoxide and other pollutants.
These emissions include fine particles and gases that contribute to
deteriorating human health conditions, including asthma, heart disease,
cancer, aggravated allergies, and more.
The state can assist in the reduction of idling vehicles by
providing infrastructure to support the use of auxiliary power through
a system of stand-alone and onboard electrification projects.
The legislature intends to provide assistance to owners and
operators of heavy duty diesel vehicles which contribute to areas of
concentrated air pollution by providing infrastructure to support the
electrification of these facilities and seeking federal assistance to
aid the owners and operators of vehicles, vessels, and trains to modify
their equipment to accept auxiliary power when stationary.
The legislature intends to support electrification projects in
areas where the current conditions are especially harmful to human
health and there exist cost-effective solutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop, in consultation with the
department of transportation and the Washington public ports
association, a list of approximately ten sites where cost-effective
electrification projects appear to be practical and could be initiated
for heavy duty diesel vehicles or large vessels. The sites shall be
selected in areas where these vehicles and vessels commonly operate
their engines or run diesel generators, while stationary, for lengthy
periods of time. The department shall also develop a list of
recommended nonelectrification options for improving the air quality at
truck stops and in marine ports.
(2) In developing the list of potential electrification sites, the
department shall consider:
(a) Cost of installing electrification infrastructure; and
(b) Areas designated by the environmental protection agency as in
nonattainment for any air pollutant, former nonattainment areas, or
areas at risk of receiving a nonattainment designation, or areas where
the greatest hazards to human health are suspected.
(3) In developing the site list and list of nonelectrification
options, the department is not required to conduct any original
scientific research. The department shall use existing, available
information including ongoing studies and initiatives being conducted
in other states, by the federal government, and in Canada and Mexico.
The department shall make reasonable assumptions and estimates as it
deems necessary to meet the intent of this section.
(4) In the site list, the department shall seek the advice of
individuals representing trucking, truck stop, and maritime
organizations and businesses, local air authorities, and public health
organizations.
(5) The list of sites for potential electrification projects and
the list of nonelectrification options shall be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by December
15, 2004. The list may be updated as the department deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall initiate electrification pilot projects at
sites identified under the provisions of section 2 of this act as
funding becomes available under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall seek financial assistance from federal and
nonstate sources to fund stand-alone and onboard electrification
infrastructure projects and, when needed, to assist owners and
operators of heavy duty diesel vehicles to modify their onboard
equipment to accept auxiliary power when stationary.
The department shall also develop a state funding strategy for
construction of additional electrification projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of sections 2 through 4 of this act, the following
words shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Heavy duty diesel vehicles" means any diesel vehicle with a
gross vehicle weight rating over fourteen thousand pounds;
(2) "Large vessel" means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, or passenger
vessel as those terms are defined in RCW 88.40.011;
(3) "Onboard electrification projects" means systems that require
the truck or vessel to be equipped with the necessary components to
accept electrical power, including inverters, heat and air systems
capable of being powered by electricity, and hardware to plug into an
electrical outlet; and
(4) "Stand-alone electrification projects" means an independent
system that supplies the vehicle's needs for heating, ventilation, and
air conditioning without modification to the vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---