BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that all of the
public lands granted to the state are held in trust and should be
managed in a manner that enhances benefits in perpetuity.
(2) The legislature further finds that globalization of the wood
products industry is changing the context for forest product marketing.
New forest technologies in the world marketplace are creating a new
model for production of the wood fiber needed to provide for wood
products. Worldwide industrial forestry is migrating to an agronomic
model of wood fiber production and away from traditional forestry
models. In order for state timber to compete in the forest marketplace
of the twenty-first century, strategic niche marketing must be
employed.
(3) The legislature further finds that state timber revenues can be
enhanced over time and given long-term stability by distinguishing
state forest products from the competition in the market, thus
providing sustainable revenue for trust beneficiaries into the future.
This sustainable revenue can be realized by providing leadership in
sustainable forestry and still providing ecological and social benefits
to the public and local communities.
(4) Therefore, the legislature finds that certification of the
state forest lands will ensure access to economically valuable markets
for state forest products, increasing the benefits to the trust
beneficiaries in both the short and long term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with this section, the department shall seek to
strategically position state forest products to enhance benefits and
revenues to the trusts by obtaining third-party certification of the
forest practices and silviculture conducted on all state-owned lands
under its jurisdiction which are primarily managed for the purpose of
growing forest crops.
(2) In order to satisfy the requirements of this section, the
department must obtain third-party certification from an organization
that develops standards and objectives independent from any forest
products or timber trade associations. The organization chosen to
grant certification must, at a minimum, satisfy the following
requirements:
(a) The organization must measure on-the-ground performance of the
department against predefined standards related to:
(i) Long-term economic viability, including sustained forest yields
of products, ecological services, and species diversity that provide
for a stable future for the forest industry;
(ii) Ecologically sound forest practices, including considerations
for water quality, soil erosion, wildlife habitat, and biodiversity;
and
(iii) The maximization of social benefits, including public access
and treaty rights.
(b) The organization must require independent peer review of
certification reports and decisions.
(c) The organization must require the tracking of products removed
from the certified forest from the place of production to the point of
sale.
(d) The organization must apply a certification system that is
applicable worldwide, except that the organization may allow for
regional differences in their standards.
(e) The organization must require the people inspecting the forest
to be accredited by the organization as having expertise in
silviculture, ecology, social sciences, and other relevant disciplines,
and must require the inspectors to consult with the scientific
community and interested stakeholders during the certification process.
(f) The organization must require certified landowners to reinvest
in local communities and diversify local economies by managing for a
diverse range of timber and nontimber forest products.
(g) The organization must require certified landowners to protect
old growth stands.
(h) The organization must require certified landowners to protect
their working forests from conversion to development and other
nonforest uses.
(i) The organization must require certified landowners to address
the rights of indigenous peoples.
(j) The organization must require certified landowners to reduce or
eliminate the use of the most toxic chemicals.
(3) The department and the board must satisfy the certification
requirements of this section, including making any needed changes to
silviculture practices, on the following timetable:
(a) All state-owned lands under the jurisdiction of the department
located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, which are primarily
valuable for the purpose of growing forest crops, must be certified by
an organization that satisfies the requirements of this section by
December 31, 2005.
(b) All state-owned lands under the jurisdiction of the department
located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, which are primarily
valuable for the purpose of growing forest crops, must be audited for
certification by an organization that satisfies the requirements of
this section by December 31, 2005, and must be certified within one
year of the completion of the certification audit.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.10.320 and 2003 c 334 s 538 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall manage the state-owned lands under its
jurisdiction which are primarily valuable for the purpose of growing
forest crops on a sustained yield basis ((insofar as compatible with
other statutory directives)). ((To this end, the))
(2) In order to satisfy the requirements of this section, the
department shall periodically adjust the acreages designated for
inclusion in the sustained yield management program and calculate a
sustainable harvest level.
(3) Any sustainable yield management conducted by the department
under this section must be compatible with other statutory directives,
including section 2 of this act.

--- END ---