BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds an urgent and
substantial need to enhance the development of all infants and toddlers
with disabilities in Washington to minimize developmental delays and to
maximize individual potential for learning and functioning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
By September 1, 2008, each school district shall provide or
contract for early intervention services to all eligible children with
disabilities from birth to three years of age. Eligibility shall be
determined according to Part C of the federal individuals with
disabilities education act and as specified in WAC 392-172-114. School
districts shall provide or contract for early intervention services in
partnership with local birth-to-three lead agencies and birth-to-three
providers. Services provided under this section shall not supplant
services or funding currently provided in the state for early
intervention services to eligible children with disabilities from birth
to three years of age. The state-designated birth-to-three lead agency
shall be payor of last resort for birth-to-three early intervention
services provided under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) There is established a birth-to-three task force to make
recommendations concerning policies, procedures, and regulations
necessary to implement an equitable statewide comprehensive system for
all eligible children with disabilities from birth to three years of
age.
(2) Members of the task force shall be jointly appointed by the
governor and the superintendent of public instruction by July 1, 2004,
and shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(a) Representatives of the following: Special education operations
within the office of the superintendent of public instruction; the
Washington association of school administrators; the Washington state
school directors' association; an educational service district; the
special education advisory council; the infant toddler early
intervention program within the department of social and health
services; the developmental disabilities section of the association of
county human services; the medical assistance administration within the
department of social and health services; the governor's head start
state collaboration office; the division of child care and early
learning within the department of social and health services; the
children with special health care needs program within the department
of health; a local health department/district; an Indian tribe
providing early intervention services; the Washington state chapter of
the American academy of pediatrics; the early childhood development
association of Washington; the neurodevelopmental centers of
Washington; a nonprofit local birth-to-three lead agency, which is not
already represented in the membership of the task force; and an
advocacy group for children with disabilities from birth to three years
of age and their families; and
(b) A special education director from a school district providing
early intervention services; a special education director from a school
district not providing early intervention services; and four members of
the state interagency coordinating council for infants and toddlers
with disabilities and their families, three of whom shall be parents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
The birth-to-three task force shall submit a report to the governor
and the superintendent of public instruction by December 1, 2006,
outlining their recommendations.

--- END ---