BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must continuously improve in quality, efficiency,
and effectiveness to increase public trust in the way the department
operates and delivers services so that employers and workers receive
maximum value for their premium dollars. Further, the department must
establish priorities for the delivery of its services and annually
assess whether the department's programs and activities contribute to
the department's priorities. The highest priority programs must be
evaluated to determine if they are operating at maximum efficiency, and
the lowest priority programs must be assessed to determine their
continued viability. The department shall release its annual
assessment to the citizens of the state, the governor, and the
appropriate legislative committees by January 1st of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The office of financial management shall
draft a plan for funding the programs and services not directly related
to industrial insurance that are currently funded through the medical
aid and accident funds. The office of financial management shall
convene an advisory panel comprised of representatives of both labor
and business to assist it in developing the plan. For the medical aid
fund, the office of financial management shall include in its plan how
to pay for programs and services currently funded that do not meet the
following criteria: Medical aid and like benefits for loss sustained
because of injury, disease, or death provided for by Title 51 RCW,
administration costs of Title 51 RCW, and debt service for capital
improvements related to the state fund. For the accident fund, the
office of financial management shall include in its plan how to pay for
programs and services currently funded that do not meet the following
criteria: Payment of compensation, vocational rehabilitation, death
benefits, funeral expenses, or like benefits for loss sustained because
of injury, disease, or death provided for by Title 51 RCW,
administration costs of Title 51 RCW, and debt service for capital
improvements related to the state fund. The report shall be delivered
to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by November 1, 2004.

--- END ---