BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.210 and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 55 are each amended
to read as follows:
Claims of injured workers of employers who have secured the payment
of compensation by insuring with the department shall be promptly acted
upon by the department. The department must enter an order allowing or
denying a claim within ninety days from the date that the claim is
filed with the department. Where temporary disability compensation is
payable, the first payment thereof shall be mailed within fourteen days
after receipt of the claim at the department's offices in Olympia and
shall continue at regular semimonthly intervals. The payment of this
or any other benefits under this title, prior to the entry of an order
by the department in accordance with RCW 51.52.050 as now or hereafter
amended, shall be not considered a binding determination of the
obligations of the department under this title. The acceptance of
compensation by the worker or his or her beneficiaries prior to such
order shall likewise not be considered a binding determination of their
rights under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of labor and industries may purchase services by
contract from individuals, nonprofit organizations, or businesses to
provide for management of some or all industrial insurance claims filed
with the state fund under this title.

--- END ---