BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 MANAGED CARE--DEFINITIONS. The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Complaint" means any dissatisfaction expressed by an injured
worker concerning a workers' compensation managed care arrangement.
(2) "Grievance" means a written complaint, other than an
application for benefits, filed by the injured worker pursuant to the
requirements of the managed care arrangement, expressing
dissatisfaction with the refusal of the workers' compensation managed
care arrangement to provide health care or dissatisfaction with the
health care provided.
(3) "Health care coordinator" means a primary care provider within
a provider network who is responsible for managing the health care of
an injured worker, including determining other health care providers
and health care facilities to which the injured worker will be referred
for evaluation or treatment. A health care coordinator must be a
physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, a chiropractor licensed under chapter
18.25 RCW, or a podiatric physician licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW.
(4) "Practice parameters and protocols" means the practice
parameters and protocols of treatment adopted by the United States
agency for healthcare research and quality in effect on January 1,
2003, and any other practice parameters or protocols of treatment
applicable under this title that the director adopts by rule or policy.
(5) "Provider network" means a comprehensive panel of health care
providers and health care facilities who have contracted directly or
indirectly with a self-insurer or the department in accordance with
this chapter to provide proper and necessary medical, surgical, and
hospital care and services to injured workers as required under chapter
51.36 RCW.
(6) "Service area" means the department-approved geographic area
within which the self-insured employer or department is authorized to
offer a workers' compensation managed care arrangement.
(7) "Workers' compensation managed care arrangement" means an
arrangement under which a health care provider as defined in RCW
48.43.005, a health care facility as defined in RCW 48.43.005, a group
of health care providers, a health carrier regulated under chapter
48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor registered under
chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance organization registered
under chapter 48.46 RCW has entered into a written agreement directly
or indirectly with a self-insured employer or the department to provide
and to manage proper and necessary medical, surgical, and hospital care
and services to injured workers in accordance with this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 MANAGED CARE AUTHORIZED. (1) Subject to the
terms and limitations specified in this chapter, a self-insured
employer may furnish to its workers, or the department may furnish to
some or all workers covered by the state fund, solely through workers'
compensation managed care arrangements such proper and necessary
medical, surgical, and hospital care and services for the period of a
worker's disability from a covered injury as may be required under
chapter 51.36 RCW, and which must be provided in accordance with
practice parameters and protocols established under this chapter. If
a self-insured employer or the department elects to deliver the medical
benefits required by this title through a method other than a workers'
compensation managed care arrangement, the discontinuance of the use of
the workers' compensation managed care arrangement shall be without
regard to the date of injury.
(2)(a) The department shall authorize a self-insured employer to
offer or use a workers' compensation managed care arrangement after:
(i) The self-insurer files a completed application along with the
payment of a one thousand dollar application fee;
(ii) The department is satisfied that the self-insurer has the
ability to provide quality of care consistent with the prevailing
professional standards of care; and
(iii) The self-insurer and its workers' compensation managed care
arrangement otherwise meet the requirements of this chapter.
(b) No self-insurer may offer or use a managed care arrangement in
this state without department authorization required by this section.
The authorization, unless sooner suspended or revoked, automatically
expires two years after the date of issuance unless renewed by the
self-insurer. The authorization shall be renewed upon application for
renewal and payment of a renewal fee of one thousand dollars, provided
that the self-insurer is in compliance with this section and any rules
adopted hereunder. An application for renewal of the authorization
shall be made ninety days before expiration of the authorization on
forms provided by the department. The renewal application shall not
require the resubmission of any documents previously filed with the
department if such documents have remained valid and unchanged since
their original filing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 MANAGED CARE PLAN OF OPERATION. (1) Before
a self-insured employer may be authorized to offer or use a workers'
compensation managed care arrangement in this state, the self-insurer's
managed care plan of operation must be approved by the department.
(2) A self-insurer must file a proposed managed care plan of
operation with the department in a format prescribed by the department.
The plan of operation must contain evidence that all covered services
are available and accessible, including a demonstration that:
(a) The covered services can be provided with reasonable promptness
with respect to geographic location, hours of operation, and after-hour
care. The hours of operation must reflect usual practice in the local
area. Geographic availability must reflect the usual travel times with
the community;
(b) Unless the department determines that insufficient numbers of
providers are available, the number of providers in the workers'
compensation managed care arrangement service area is sufficient, with
respect to current and expected workers to be serviced by the
arrangement, either:
(i) By delivery of all required health care services; or
(ii) Through the ability to make appropriate referrals within the
provider network;
(c) Written agreements are entered into with providers describing
specific responsibilities and prohibiting providers from billing or
otherwise seeking reimbursement from or recourse against any injured
worker for covered services; and
(d) Emergency care is available twenty-four hours a day and seven
days a week.
(3) The proposed managed care plan of operation must include:
(a) A statement or map providing a clear description of the service
area;
(b) A description of the grievance procedure to be used;
(c) A description of the quality assurance program that assures
that the health care services provided to workers shall be rendered
under reasonable standards of quality of care consistent with the
prevailing standards of medical practice in the medical community. The
program shall include, but not be limited to:
(i) A written statement of goals and objectives that stresses
health and return-to-work outcomes as the principal criteria for the
evaluation of the quality of care rendered to injured workers;
(ii) A written statement describing how methodology has been
incorporated into an ongoing system for monitoring of care that is
individual care oriented and, when implemented, can provide
interpretation and analysis of patterns of care rendered to individual
patients by individual providers;
(iii) Written procedures for taking appropriate remedial action
whenever, as determined under the quality assurance program,
inappropriate or substandard services have been provided or services
that should have been furnished have not been provided;
(iv) A written plan, that includes ongoing review, for providing
review of physicians and other licensed health care providers;
(v) Appropriate financial incentives to reduce service costs and
utilization without sacrificing the quality of service;
(vi) Adequate methods of peer review and utilization review. The
utilization review process shall include a health care facility's
precertification mechanism, including, but not limited to, all elective
admissions and nonemergency surgeries and adherence to practice
parameters and protocols established under this chapter;
(vii) Provisions for resolution of disputes arising between a
health care provider and a self-insurer regarding reimbursements and
utilization review;
(viii) Availability of process for aggressive health care
coordination, as well as a program involving cooperative efforts by the
workers, the employer, and the workers' compensation managed care
arrangement to promote early return to work for injured workers;
(ix) A provision for the selection of a primary care provider by
the employee from among primary providers in the provider network; and
(x) The written information proposed to be used by the self-insurer
to comply with (e) of this subsection;
(d) Written procedures to provide the self-insurer with timely
medical records and information including, but not limited to, work
status, work restrictions, date of maximum medical improvement,
permanent impairment ratings, and other information as required,
including information demonstrating compliance with the practice
parameters and protocols of treatment established under this chapter;
(e) Evidence that appropriate health care providers and
administrative staff of the self-insurer's workers' compensation
managed care arrangement have received training and education on the
provisions of this chapter; the administrative rules that govern the
provision of proper and necessary medical, surgical, and hospital care
and services to injured workers; and the practice parameters and
protocols of treatment established under this chapter;
(f) Written procedures and methods to prevent inappropriate or
excessive treatment that are in accordance with the practice parameters
and protocols of treatment established under this chapter;
(g) Written procedures and methods for the management of an injured
worker's health care by a health care coordinator including:
(i) The mechanism for assuring that covered employees receive all
initial covered services from a primary care provider participating in
the provider network, except for emergency care;
(ii) The mechanism for assuring that all continuing covered
services be received from the same primary care provider participating
in the provider network that provided the initial covered services,
except when services from another provider are authorized by the health
care coordinator pursuant to (g)(iv) of this subsection;
(iii) The policies and procedures for allowing an employee to
change to another provider within the provider network as the
authorized treating physician during the course of treatment for a
work-related injury in accordance with rules adopted under RCW
51.36.010;
(iv) The process for assuring that all referrals authorized by a
health care coordinator, in accordance with the practice parameters and
protocols of treatment established under this chapter, are made to the
participating network providers, unless proper and necessary medical,
surgical, and hospital care and services are not available and
accessible to the injured worker in the provider network; and
(v) Assignment of a health care coordinator licensed under chapter
18.71 RCW to manage care by physicians licensed under chapter 18.71
RCW, a health care coordinator licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW to
manage care by osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW,
a health care coordinator licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW to manage
care by chiropractors licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, on an injured
worker's request for care by any of the listed providers; and
(h) A description of the use of workers' compensation practice
parameters and protocols of treatment for health care services.
(4) A self-insured employer must file any proposed changes to the
plan of operation, except for changes in the list of health care
providers, with the department before implementing the changes. The
changes are considered approved forty-five days after filing unless
specifically disapproved by the department within the forty-five day
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Before the department may offer or use a
workers' compensation managed care arrangement in this state, the
department must develop a managed care plan of operation that meets the
requirements of the plan of operation required under section 3 of this
act, and must provide a period of at least thirty days for public
review and comment before implementing the plan or any changes to the
plan, except for changes to the list of health care providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 MANAGED CARE--DISCLOSURE. A self-insured
employer or the department, as the case may be, must make full and fair
disclosure in writing of the provisions, restrictions, and limitations
of the workers' compensation managed care arrangement to affected
workers, including at least:
(1) A description, including address and telephone number, of the
network providers, including primary care physicians, specialty
physicians, hospitals, and other health care providers;
(2) A description of the coverage for emergency and urgently needed
care provided within and outside the service area;
(3) A description of limitations on referrals; and
(4) A description of the grievance process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 MANAGED CARE--GRIEVANCE PROCEDURES. (1) A
workers' compensation managed care arrangement must have and use
procedures for hearing complaints and resolving written grievances from
injured workers and health care providers. The procedures must be
aimed at mutual agreement for settlement and may include arbitration
procedures. Procedures provided in this section are in addition to
other dispute resolution procedures contained in this title.
(2) The grievance procedures must be described in writing and
provided to the affected workers and health care providers.
(3) At the time that the workers' compensation managed care
arrangement is implemented, the self-insurer or the department, as the
case may be, must provide detailed information to workers and health
care providers describing the manner in which a grievance may be filed
with the self-insured employer or department.
(4) Grievances must be considered in a timely manner and must be
transmitted to appropriate decision makers who have the authority to
investigate the issues fully and take corrective action.
(5) If a grievance is found to be valid, corrective action must be
taken promptly.
(6) All concerned parties must be notified of the results of a
grievance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 MANAGED CARE--TREATMENT COMPLYING WITH
REQUIREMENTS. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title,
when an authorized self-insured employer or the department provides
health care through a workers' compensation managed care arrangement
under this chapter, those workers who are subject to the arrangement
must receive health care services for work-related injuries and
diseases as prescribed in the contract, if: (a) The self-insurer or
the department, as the case may be, has provided notice to the
employees of the arrangement in a manner approved by the department;
and (b) the health care services are in accordance with the practice
parameters and protocols established under this chapter. In such
cases, treatment received outside the workers' compensation managed
care arrangement is not compensable, regardless of the purpose of the
treatment, including, but not limited to, evaluations, examinations, or
diagnostic studies to determine causation between medical findings and
a covered injury or occupational disease, the existence or extent of
impairments or disabilities, and whether the injured employee has
reached maximum medical improvement, unless authorized by the self-insurer or the department, as the case may be, before the treatment
date.
(2) When a self-insurer or the department enters into a managed
care arrangement under this chapter, the employees who are covered by
the provision of such arrangement shall be deemed to have received all
the benefits to which they are entitled pursuant to chapter 51.36 RCW.
In addition, the employer and the department shall be deemed to have
complied completely with the requirements of such provisions. The
provisions governing managed care arrangements shall govern exclusively
unless specifically stated otherwise in this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 MANAGED CARE--PENALTIES FOR VIOLATIONS. (1)
The director may suspend the authority of a self-insurer to offer a
workers' compensation managed care arrangement or may order compliance
within sixty days, if the director finds that:
(a) The self-insurer or its managed care contractor is in
substantial violation of its contracts;
(b) The self-insurer or its managed care contractor is unable to
fulfill its obligations under outstanding managed care arrangement
contracts;
(c) The self-insurer or managed care contractor knowingly uses a
provider who is furnishing or has furnished health care services
without having an existing license or other authority to practice or
furnish health care services in this state;
(d) The self-insurer no longer meets the requirements for
authorization as originally issued; or
(e) The self-insurer has violated any provision of this chapter or
rule or order of the director adopted under this chapter.
(2) Revocation of a self-insurer's authorization under this chapter
shall be for a period of two years. After two years, the self-insurer
may apply for a new authorization by complying with all requirements
applicable to first-time applicants.
(3) Suspension of a self-insurer's authority to offer a workers'
compensation managed care arrangement shall be for a period, not to
exceed one year, as is fixed by the director. The director shall, in
his or her order suspending the authority of a self-insurer to offer
workers' compensation managed care, specify the period during which the
suspension is to be in effect and the conditions, if any, that must be
met by the self-insurer before reinstatement of its authority. The
order of suspension is subject to rescission or modification by further
order of the director before the expiration of the suspension period.
Reinstatement shall not be made unless requested by the self-insurer.
However, the director shall not grant reinstatement if he or she finds
that the circumstances for which the suspension occurred still exist or
are likely to recur.
(4) Upon expiration of the suspension period, the self-insurer's
authorization shall automatically be reinstated unless the director
finds before the expiration that the causes of the suspension have not
been rectified or that the self-insurer is otherwise not in compliance
with the requirements of this chapter. If not so automatically
reinstated, the authorization shall be deemed to have expired as of the
end of the suspension period.
(5) If the director finds that one or more grounds exist for the
revocation or suspension of an authorization issued under this section,
the director may, in lieu of such revocation or suspension, impose a
fine upon the self-insurer as follows:
(a) With respect to a nonwillful violation, the fine may not exceed
two thousand five hundred dollars for each such violation. A fine may
not exceed an aggregate amount of ten thousand dollars for all
nonwillful violations arising out of the same action; or
(b) With respect to a knowing and willful violation, the fine may
not exceed twenty thousand dollars for each such violation. A fine may
not exceed an aggregate amount of one hundred thousand dollars for all
knowing and willful violations arising out of the same action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 MANAGED CARE RULES. The director shall
adopt rules that specify:
(1) Procedures for authorization and examination of workers'
compensation managed care arrangements by the department;
(2) Requirements and procedures for authorization of workers'
compensation arrangement provider networks and procedures for the
department to grant exceptions from accessibility of services;
(3) Requirements and procedures for case management, utilization
management, and peer review;
(4) Requirements and procedures for quality assurance and medical
records;
(5) Requirements and procedures for dispute resolution in
conformance with this chapter;
(6) Requirements and procedures for employee and provider
education; and
(7) Requirements and procedures for reporting data regarding
grievances, return-to-work outcomes, and provider networks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
STANDARDS OF CARE. The following standards of care shall be
followed in providing medical care under this title:
(1)(a) Abnormal anatomical findings alone, in the absence of
objective relevant medical findings, shall not be an indicator of
injury or illness, a justification for the provision of curative or
rehabilitative medical care or the assignment of restrictions, or a
foundation for limitations.
(b) At all times during evaluation and treatment, the health
services provider shall act on the premise that returning to work is an
integral part of the treatment plan. The goal of removing all
restrictions and limitations as early as appropriate shall be part of
the treatment plan on a continuous basis. The assignment of
restrictions and limitations shall be reviewed with each patient
examination and upon receipt of new information, such as progress
reports from physical therapists and other health services providers.
Consideration shall be given to upgrading or removing the restrictions
and limitations with each patient examination, based upon the presence
or absence of objective relevant medical findings.
(c) Reasonable proper and necessary medical care of injured
employees shall in all situations:
(i) Use a high intensity, short duration treatment approach that
focuses on early activation and restoration of function whenever
possible.
(ii) Include reassessment of the treatment plans, regimes,
therapies, prescriptions, and functional limitations or restrictions
prescribed by the provider every thirty days.
(iii) Be focused on treatment of the individual employee's specific
clinical dysfunction or status and shall not be based upon nondescript
diagnostic labels.
(2) All treatment shall be inherently scientifically logical and
the evaluation or treatment procedure must match the documented
physiologic and clinical problem. Treatment shall match the type,
intensity, and duration of service required by the problem identified.

Sec. 11 RCW 51.36.010 and 1986 c 58 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
CHOICE OF PHYSICIAN. (1) Subject to the limits in this section,
upon the occurrence of any injury to a worker entitled to compensation
under the provisions of this title, he or she shall receive proper and
necessary medical and surgical services at the hands of a physician of
his or her own choice, if conveniently located, and proper and
necessary hospital care and services during the period of his or her
disability from such injury((, but the same shall be limited in point
of duration as follows:)).
(a) The duration of medical and surgical services is limited as
provided in this subsection:
(i) In the case of permanent partial disability, services may not
((to)) extend beyond the date when compensation shall be awarded him or
her, except when the worker returned to work before permanent partial
disability award is made, in such case services may not ((to)) extend
beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease;
(ii) In case of temporary disability services may not ((to)) extend
beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease:
PROVIDED, That after any injured worker has returned to his or her work
his or her medical and surgical treatment may be continued if, and so
long as, such continuation is deemed necessary by the supervisor of
industrial insurance to be necessary to his or her more complete
recovery;
(iii) In case of a permanent total disability services may not
((to)) extend beyond the date on which a lump sum settlement is made
with him or her or he or she is placed upon the permanent pension roll:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the supervisor of industrial insurance, solely
in his or her discretion, may authorize continued medical and surgical
treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when
such medical and surgical treatment is deemed necessary by the
supervisor of industrial insurance to protect such worker's life or
provide for the administration of medical and therapeutic measures
including payment of prescription medications, but not including those
controlled substances currently scheduled by the state board of
pharmacy as Schedule I, II, III, or IV substances under chapter 69.50
RCW, which are necessary to alleviate continuing pain which results
from the industrial injury. In order to authorize such continued
treatment the written order of the supervisor of industrial insurance
issued in advance of the continuation shall be necessary.
(b) The choice of attending physician is limited as provided in
this subsection:
(i) If an injured worker is covered through a workers' compensation
managed care arrangement as provided in chapter 51.-- RCW (sections 1
through 9 of this act), the worker must select a primary care provider
from among the primary care providers in the provider network as
prescribed in the managed care contract; and
(ii) A physician who is not an attending physician may not: (A)
Authorize payment of temporary disability compensation; or (B) make
ratings regarding the worker's impairment for the purpose of evaluating
the worker's disability unless requested by the department or the
employer.
(2) The supervisor of industrial insurance, the supervisor's
designee, or a self-insurer, in his or her sole discretion, may
authorize inoculation or other immunological treatment in cases in
which a work-related activity has resulted in probable exposure of the
worker to a potential infectious occupational disease. Authorization
of such treatment does not bind the department or self-insurer in any
adjudication of a claim by the same worker or the worker's beneficiary
for an occupational disease.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 51 RCW.

--- END ---