BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The parties to a claim may enter into a final settlement
agreement at any time as provided in this section with respect to one
or more claims under this title. All final settlement agreements must
be approved by the board of industrial insurance appeals. The final
settlement agreement may:
(i) Bind the parties with regard to any or all aspects of a claim,
including but not limited to allowance or rejection of a claim,
monetary payment, provision of medical treatment, claim closure, and
claim reopening under RCW 51.32.160; and
(ii) Not subject any employer who is not a signatory to the
agreement to any responsibility or burden under any claim.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term "parties" means as
follows:
(i) For a self-insured claim, the worker and his or her attorney,
if any; the employer and its attorney, if any; and a designated agent
of the department of labor and industries; and
(ii) For a state fund claim, the worker and his or her attorney, if
any; the employer and its attorney, if any; and a designated agent of
the department of labor and industries.
(c) A final settlement agreement entered into under this section
must be signed by the parties and must clearly state that the parties
agree to the terms of the final settlement agreement. Unless one of
the parties revokes consent to the agreement, as provided in subsection
(3) of this section, the final settlement agreement becomes final and
binding thirty days after approval of the agreement by the board of
industrial insurance appeals.
(d) A final settlement agreement that has become final and binding
as provided in this section is binding on the department and on all
parties to the agreement as to its terms and the injuries and
occupational diseases to which the final settlement applies. A final
settlement agreement that has become final and binding is not subject
to appeal.
(2)(a) If a worker is not represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a final settlement agreement, the parties must forward a copy
of the signed settlement agreement to the board with a request for a
conference with a settlement officer. Unless one of the parties
requests a later date, the settlement officer must convene a conference
within fourteen days after receipt of the request for the limited
purpose of receiving the final settlement agreement of the parties,
explaining the benefits generally available under this title, and
explaining that a final settlement agreement may alter the benefits
payable on a claim. In no event may a settlement officer render legal
advice to any party.
(b) The settlement officer may reject a settlement agreement only
if the agreement constitutes a miscarriage of justice. Within seven
days after the conference, the settlement officer shall issue an order
allowing or rejecting the final settlement agreement. There shall be
no appeal from the settlement officer's decision.
(c) If the settlement officer issues an order allowing the final
settlement agreement, the order shall be submitted to the board.
(3) If a worker is represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a final settlement agreement, the parties may submit the
agreement directly to the board without the hearing described in this
subsection.
(4) Upon receiving the final settlement agreement, the board shall
approve the agreement unless it finds that the agreement constitutes a
miscarriage of justice. If the board approves the agreement, it shall
provide notice to the department of the binding terms of the agreement
and provide for placement of the agreement in the applicable claim
files.
(5) A party may revoke consent to the final settlement agreement by
providing written notice to the other parties and the board within
thirty days after the date the agreement is approved by the board.
(6) To the extent the worker is entitled to temporary total
disability or permanent total disability benefits while a final
settlement agreement is being negotiated, or during the revocation
period of an agreement, such benefits shall be paid until the agreement
becomes final.
(7)(a) If the parties have provided in a final settlement agreement
that a claim or claims are not subject to reopening pursuant to RCW
51.32.160, any application to reopen the claim or claims must be
denied.
(b) A final settlement agreement in any claim may be used as a
defense by any employer if a worker subject to a final settlement
agreement files a subsequent new claim or an application to reopen a
claim for the same or similar diagnosis in the same region of the body
or the same or similar mental health diagnosis.
(c) As used in this subsection, "same or similar diagnosis in the
same region of the body or the same or similar mental health diagnosis"
shall be broadly construed to prevent excessive or duplicative benefits
to the worker or abuse by the worker in filing multiple or repetitious
claims for benefits.

--- END ---