BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.28.010 and 2001 c 231 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any accident occurs to any worker it ((shall be)) is
the duty of ((such)) the worker or someone ((in)) on his or her behalf
to ((forthwith)) report ((such)) the accident to his or her employer,
superintendent, or supervisor in charge of the work((, and)) within
five working days after the accident.
(2) When an employer receives a notice of an accident as required
under subsection (1) of this section, it is the duty of the employer to
at once report such accident and the injury resulting therefrom to the
department pursuant to RCW 51.28.025 where the worker has received
treatment from a physician, has been hospitalized, disabled from work,
or has died as the apparent result of such accident and injury.
(((2))) (3) Upon receipt of ((such)) the notice of accident
required under RCW 51.28.025, the department shall immediately forward
to the worker or his or her beneficiaries or dependents notification,
in nontechnical language, of their rights under this title. The notice
must specify the worker's right to receive health services from a
physician of the worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010, including
chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and must list the types of
providers authorized to provide these services.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.28.055 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever a physician notifies a worker of the existence of an
occupational disease, the worker or someone on his or her behalf must
report the existence of the disease to his or her employer,
superintendent, or supervisor in charge of the work within five working
days after the notification.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section
for claims filed for occupational hearing loss, claims for occupational
disease or infection to be valid and compensable must be filed within
two years following the date the physician notifies the worker ((had
written notice from a physician: (a))) of the existence of his or her
occupational disease((, and (b) that a claim for disability benefits
may be filed. The notice shall also contain a statement that the
worker has two years from the date of the notice to file a claim. The
physician shall file the notice with the department. The department
shall send a copy to the worker and to the self-insurer if the worker's
employer is self-insured)). However, a claim is valid if it is filed
within two years ((from)) after the date of death of the worker
suffering from an occupational disease.
(((2))) (3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, to be
valid and compensable, claims for hearing loss due to occupational
noise exposure must be filed within two years ((of)) after the date of
the worker's last injurious exposure to occupational noise in
employment covered under this title or within one year ((of)) after
September 10, 2003, whichever is later.
(b) A claim for hearing loss due to occupational noise exposure
that is not timely filed under (a) of this subsection ((can only)) may
be allowed only for medical aid benefits under chapter 51.36 RCW.
(((3))) (4) The department may adopt rules to implement this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.28.040 and 1977 ex.s. c 199 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
((If change of circumstances warrants an increase or rearrangement
of compensation, like application shall be made therefor.)) Where the
worker's application to reopen a claim has been granted under RCW
51.32.160, compensation and other benefits, if in order, shall be
allowed for periods of time up to sixty days prior to the receipt of
such application.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.32.160 and 1995 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If aggravation, diminution, or termination of disability
takes place, the director may, upon the application of the beneficiary,
made within seven years from the date the first closing order becomes
final, or at any time upon his or her own motion, readjust the rate of
compensation in accordance with the rules in this section provided for
the same, or in a proper case terminate the payment: PROVIDED, That
the director may, upon application of the worker made at any time,
provide proper and necessary medical and surgical services as
authorized under RCW 51.36.010. The department shall promptly mail a
copy of the application to the employer at the employer's last known
address as shown by the records of the department.
(b) "Closing order" as used in this section means an order based on
factors which include medical recommendation, advice, or examination.
(c) Applications for benefits where the claim has been closed
without medical recommendation, advice, or examination are not subject
to the seven year limitation of this section. The preceding sentence
shall not apply to any closing order issued prior to July 1, 1981.
First closing orders issued between July 1, 1981, and July 1, 1985,
shall, for the purposes of this section only, be deemed issued on July
1, 1985. The time limitation of this section shall be ten years in
claims involving loss of vision or function of the eyes.
(d)(i) With respect to an application to reopen a claim filed on or
after July 1, 1988, but before the effective date of this section, if
an order denying ((an)) the application to reopen ((filed on or after
July 1, 1988,)) is not issued within ninety days of receipt of such
application by the self-insured employer or the department, such
application shall be deemed granted. ((However,))
(ii) With respect to an application to reopen a claim filed on or
after the effective date of this section:
(A) The self-insured employer or department, as applicable, must
notify the worker by mail at the worker's last known address as shown
by department records that the application has been received.
(B) If an order denying or granting the application is not issued
within ninety days of mailing notice to the worker of receipt of the
application, such application shall be deemed granted.
(iii) For good cause, the department or self-insurer may extend the
time for making the final determination on the application filed under
(d)(i) or (ii) of this subsection for an additional sixty days.
(2) If a worker receiving a pension for total disability returns to
gainful employment for wages, the director may suspend or terminate the
rate of compensation established for the disability without producing
medical evidence that shows that a diminution of the disability has
occurred.
(3) No act done or ordered to be done by the director, or the
department prior to the signing and filing in the matter of a written
order for such readjustment shall be grounds for such readjustment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 51.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of labor and industries shall monitor the number of
accidents and occupational diseases that are reported to the employer
after the five-day period under sections 1 and 2 of this act has
elapsed. The department shall determine the reason or reasons the
employee reported the accident or occupational disease past the five-day period. The department shall report on its findings annually, with
the first report due December 15, 2004.

--- END ---