BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.205 and 1996 c 191 s 55 and 1996 c 178 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of the department of health, in conjunction with
the advice and assistance of the emergency medical services licensing
and certification advisory committee as prescribed in RCW 18.73.050,
and the commission, shall prescribe:
(a) Practice parameters, training standards for, and levels of,
physician trained emergency medical service intermediate life support
technicians and paramedics;
(b) Minimum standards and performance requirements for the
certification and recertification of physician's trained emergency
medical service intermediate life support technicians and paramedics;
and
(c) Procedures for certification, recertification, and
decertification of physician's trained emergency medical service
intermediate life support technicians and paramedics.
(2) Initial certification shall be for a period established by the
secretary pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(3) Recertification shall be granted upon proof of continuing
satisfactory performance and education, and shall be for a period
established by the secretary pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(4) As used in chapters 18.71 and 18.73 RCW, "approved medical
program director" means a person who:
(a) Is licensed to practice medicine and surgery pursuant to
chapter 18.71 RCW or osteopathic medicine and surgery pursuant to
chapter 18.57 RCW; and
(b) Is qualified and knowledgeable in the administration and
management of emergency care and services; and
(c) Is so certified by the department of health for a county, group
of counties, or cities with populations over four hundred thousand in
coordination with the recommendations of the local medical community
and local emergency medical services and trauma care council.
(5) The Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
uncertified practice, the issuance and denial of certificates, and the
disciplining of certificate holders under this section. The secretary
shall be the disciplining authority under this section. Disciplinary
action shall be initiated against a person credentialed under this
chapter in a manner consistent with the responsibilities and duties of
the medical program director under whom such person is responsible.
(6) Such activities of physician's trained emergency medical
service intermediate life support technicians and paramedics shall be
limited to actions taken under the express written or oral order of
medical program directors and shall not be construed at any time to
include free standing or nondirected actions, for actions not
presenting an emergency or life-threatening condition.
(7) Any person who is convicted of theft from any ambulance or
ambulance service licensed under chapter 18.73 RCW is disqualified from
being licensed as emergency medical service personnel. A person who
has been charged with theft under chapter 9A.56 RCW from any ambulance
or ambulance service licensed under chapter 18.73 RCW is presumptively
disqualified, but may file an appeal with the secretary, and may be
licensed upon showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the
person did not commit the act charged.

--- END ---