BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.212 and 1989 c 353 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of licensing shall notify the public of the
requirements of RCW 46.30.020 through 46.30.040 at the time of new
vehicle registration and when the department sends a registration
renewal notice.
(2) When the department sends a vehicle license renewal notice, it
shall also provide notice of the requirement for written proof of
meeting the financial responsibility requirements in order to renew the
license.
(3) The department shall not renew a vehicle license due for
renewal January 1, 2005, or after unless the applicant provides written
proof of meeting the financial responsibility requirements for
operating a motor vehicle as provided in RCW 46.30.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.210 and 2001 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application and proper fee for original
vehicle license, the director shall make a recheck of the application
and in the event that there is any error in the application it may be
returned to the county auditor or other agent to effectively secure the
correction of such error, who shall return the same corrected to the
director.
(2) Application for the renewal of a vehicle license shall be made
to the director or his agents, including county auditors, by the
registered owner on a form prescribed by the director. The application
must be accompanied by the payment of such license fees and excise tax
as may be required by law. Such application shall be handled in the
same manner and the fees transmitted to the state treasurer in the same
manner as in the case of an original application. Any such application
which upon validation becomes a renewal certificate need not have
entered upon it the name of the lien holder, if any, of the vehicle
concerned.
(3) Persons expecting to be out of the state during the normal
renewal period of a vehicle license may secure renewal of such vehicle
license and have license plates or tabs preissued by making application
to the director or his agents upon forms prescribed by the director.
The application must be accompanied by such license fees, and excise
tax as may be required by law.
(4) Every applicant for renewal of a vehicle license due for
renewal January 1, 2005, or after shall provide current proof of
financial responsibility to operate a vehicle as required in RCW
46.30.020. The department may adopt rules regarding valid proof of
financial responsibility for persons renewing a vehicle license. The
department shall reimburse its agents, including county auditors, for
the mailing costs of returning license renewal applications that are
submitted without proof of financial responsibility.
(5) Application for the annual renewal of a vehicle license number
plate to the director or the director's agents shall not be required
for those vehicles owned, rented, or leased by the state of Washington,
or by any county, city, town, school district, or other political
subdivision of the state of Washington or a governing body of an Indian
tribe located within this state and recognized as a governmental entity
by the United States department of the interior.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.30.040 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who knowingly provides false evidence of financial
responsibility to a law enforcement officer ((or)), to a court, or to
the department of licensing on an application for renewal of a vehicle
license, including an expired or canceled insurance policy, bond, or
certificate of deposit is guilty of a misdemeanor.

--- END ---