BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The United States military is a vital
component of the Washington state economy. The protection of military
installations from incompatible development of land is essential to the
health of Washington's economy and quality of life. Incompatible
development of land close to a military installation reduces the
ability of the military to complete its mission or to undertake new
missions, and increases its cost of operating. The department of
defense evaluates continued utilization of military installations based
upon their operating costs, their ability to carry out missions, and
their ability to undertake new missions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Military installations are of particular importance to the
economic health of the state of Washington and it is a priority of the
state to protect the land surrounding our military installations from
incompatible development.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that strategies and
policies adopted under this section shall be adopted and amended
concurrent with the scheduled update provided in RCW 36.70A.130, except
that counties and cities identified in RCW 36.70A.130(4)(a) shall
comply with this section on or before December 1, 2005.
(3) A comprehensive plan, amendment to a plan, a development
regulation or amendment to a development regulation, should not allow
development in the vicinity of a military installation that is
incompatible with the installation's ability to carry out its mission
requirements. A city or county may find that an existing comprehensive
plan and development regulations are compatible with the installation's
ability to carry out its mission requirements.
(4) As part of the requirements of RCW 36.70A.070(1) each county
and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that has a federal military
installation, other than a reserve center, that employs one hundred or
more personnel and is operated by the United States department of
defense within or adjacent to its border, shall notify the commander of
the military installation of the county or city's intent to amend its
comprehensive plan to address lands adjacent to military installations
and consider policies to ensure those lands are protected from
incompatible development.
(5)(a) The notice provided under subsection (4) of this section
shall request from the commander of the military installation a written
recommendation and supporting facts relating to the use of land being
considered in the adoption of a comprehensive plan or an amendment to
a plan. The notice shall provide sixty days for a response from the
commander. If the commander does not submit a response to such request
within sixty days, the local government may presume that implementation
of the proposed plan or amendment will not have any adverse effect on
the operation of the installation.
(b) When a county or city intends to amend its development
regulations to be consistent with the comprehensive plan elements
addressed in (a) of this subsection, notice shall be provided to the
commander of the military installation consistent with subsection (4)
of this section. The notice shall request from the commander of the
military installation a written recommendation and supporting facts
relating to the use of land being considered in the amendment to the
development regulations. The notice shall provide sixty days for a
response from the commander to the requesting government. If the
commander does not submit a response to such request within sixty days,
the local government may presume that implementation of the proposed
development regulation or amendment will not have any adverse effect on
the operation of the installation.

--- END ---