BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.270 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 233 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
All moneys paid to the landlord by the tenant as a deposit as
security for performance of the tenant's obligations in a lease or
rental agreement shall promptly be deposited by the landlord in a trust
account, maintained by the landlord for the purpose of holding such
security deposits for tenants of the landlord, in a ((bank, savings and
loan association, mutual savings bank, or licensed escrow agent located
in Washington)) financial institution as defined by RCW 30.22.041.
Unless otherwise agreed in writing, the landlord shall be entitled to
receipt of interest paid on such trust account deposits. The landlord
shall provide the tenant with a written receipt for the deposit and
shall provide written notice of the name and address and location of
the depository and any subsequent change thereof. If during a tenancy
the status of landlord is transferred to another, any sums in the
deposit trust account affected by such transfer shall simultaneously be
transferred to an equivalent trust account of the successor landlord,
and the successor landlord shall promptly notify the tenant of the
transfer and of the name, address, and location of the new depository.
The tenant's claim to any moneys paid under this section shall be prior
to that of any creditor of the landlord, including a trustee in
bankruptcy or receiver, even if such moneys are commingled.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.20.170 and 1999 c 359 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All moneys paid to the landlord by the tenant as a deposit as
security for performance of the tenant's obligations in a rental
agreement shall promptly be deposited by the landlord in a trust
account, maintained by the landlord for the purpose of holding such
security deposits for tenants of the landlord, in a ((bank, savings and
loan association, mutual savings bank, or licensed escrow agent located
in Washington)) financial institution as defined by RCW 30.22.041.
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, unless otherwise
agreed in writing, the landlord shall be entitled to receipt of
interest paid on such trust account deposits. The landlord shall
provide the tenant with a written receipt for the deposit and shall
provide written notice of the name and address and location of the
depository and any subsequent change thereof. If during a tenancy the
status of landlord is transferred to another, any sums in the deposit
trust account affected by such transfer shall simultaneously be
transferred to an equivalent trust account of the successor landlord,
and the successor landlord shall promptly notify the tenant of the
transfer and of the name, address and location of the new depository.
The tenant's claim to any moneys paid under this section shall be prior
to that of any creditor of the landlord, including a trustee in
bankruptcy or receiver, even if such moneys are commingled.
(2) All moneys paid, in excess of two months' rent on the mobile
home lot, to the landlord by the tenant as a deposit as security for
performance of the tenant's obligations in a rental agreement shall be
deposited into an interest-bearing trust account for the particular
tenant. The interest accruing on the deposit in the account, minus
fees charged to administer the account, shall be paid to the tenant on
an annual basis. All other provisions of subsection (1) of this
section shall apply to deposits under this subsection.

--- END ---