BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the
following project loans recommended by the public works board are
authorized to be made with funds previously appropriated from the
public works assistance account:
(1) City of Auburn-sanitary sewer project-install approximately
1,300 lineal feet of side sewers in the public right-of-way, abandon a
sewage pump station, and install approximately 7,500 lineal feet of
sewer main line. Make other improvements as necessary to complete the
project . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,212,791
(2) City of Bainbridge Island-sanitary sewer project-construct on-site sewer facilities and related service connections, install piping,
pump stations, and connection to the Kitsap County Sewer District No.
7's sewage treatment plant. Pay appropriate share of the previously
built sewage pump station, 12,170 linear feet of sewer force main, 256
linear feet of sanitary sewer, and the connection to the Kitsap County
Sewer District No. 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,600,000
(3) Benton County-road project-acquire right-of-way and construct
a two-lane roadway and install drainage structures for surface water
runoff. In the rural area, the roadway will have two 12-foot lanes
with eight-foot shoulders. In the urban area, the roadway will have
12-foot lanes with five-foot shoulders; curb and gutter with center
turn lanes at road intersections . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000
(4) Birch Bay Water/Sewer District-sanitary sewer project-upgrade
pump station No. 3. Add controls and appurtenances, upgrade telemetry
systems, and construct a building to house standby power, other
electrical equipment, and appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $626,450
(5) Birch Bay Water/Sewer District-domestic water project-upgrade
transmission mains, upgrade the Kickerville Reservoir, and upgrade the
Birch Point Reservoir. Connect mains, replace water services, and add
or replace fire hydrants. Restore wetlands or vegetated areas. The
Kickerville and Birch Point reservoirs will be repainted, disinfected
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,110,900
(6) City of Black Diamond-domestic water project-construct a water
system intertie between the City of Black Diamond and Tacoma Public
Utilities' second supply pipeline. Construct or install all the
necessary appurtenances, design and construct a reservoir, and
construct a pumping facility to deliver water from the Tacoma pipeline
. . . . . . . . . . . . $5,447,820
(7) City of Bonney Lake-sanitary sewer project-upgrade and expand
the wastewater treatment plant. Construct or install other
improvements and replace deteriorated equipment. Construct new
facilities required to meet permit conditions . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,109,000
(8) City of Bonney Lake-domestic water project-construct a pumping
facility including filtration treatment capable of removing iron and
manganese for flow rates up to 2,000 gallons per minute. Install
approximately 6,600 linear feet of water main from the back-up well to
the existing water system . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,375,000
(9) City of Bonney Lake-domestic water project-replace
approximately 71,000 lineal feet of water main . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,516,000
(10) City of Bremerton-sanitary sewer project-construct
approximately 2,000 feet of trunk sewer and approximately 5,000 feet of
collection sewers to allow separation of storm water from the sanitary
sewer system . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
(11) City of Burien-road project-reconstruct the roadway from SW
148th Street to SW 162nd Place. The construction will provide
additional turn lanes, eliminate split-phase signal timing, and provide
urban design and safety features. Other improvements, including storm
drainage system upgrades, will occur to meet current water quality and
runoff standards . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(12) City of Carnation–sanitary sewer project-construct a sanitary
sewer collection system, which will consist of approximately 18,200
feet of interceptor/trunk lines, approximately 27,900 feet of collector
pipe, approximately 5,100 feet of force main, and one combined
vacuum/pump station. Also included are approximately 11 grinder pump
stations . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,625,300
(13) Cedar River Water/Sewer District-domestic water project-construct approximately 12,000 feet of transmission main, replace
existing pipeline, install approximately 1,950 linear feet of new pipe,
and install valves, hydrants, and appurtenances. Completely restore
the project area . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,572,500
(14) City of Centralia-sanitary sewer project-replace approximately
2,300 feet of sewer pipe. Remove a portion of the existing sewer force
main and reroute the sewage through the new gravity sewer . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $1,192,500
(15) City of Chehalis-sanitary sewer project-construct a new
wastewater treatment plant and a water reuse site. Install
approximately 7,900 feet of force main, 370,000 feet of above ground
irrigation line, 12,100 self-regulating irrigation nozzles, and three
irrigation distribution manifolds. Upgrade pump stations and install
approximately 4,000 linear feet of force main and new standby
generators. Raise both pump stations three feet above flood level, and
convert to submersible pumps. Install approximately 2,450 feet of
force main to complete the project . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(16) Chelan County Public Utility District 1-domestic water
project-upgrade the Lester Road booster pump station. Construct a
reservoir of approximately 750,000 gallons, install about 18,700 feet
of water transmission mains, develop an access road, and install
pressure-reducing valve stations. Decommission and abandon two
reservoirs . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,427,000
(17) Clark County-road project-improve a 1.42-mile section of St.
Johns Road from NE 50th Avenue to NE 72nd Avenue. Specific
improvements include but are not limited to: Pavement width of 70 feet
with a 100-foot right-of-way; a 14-foot center left-turn lane or
landscaped median; five-foot bike lanes on each side of the roadway;
drainage improvements; intersection and transit improvements; and noise
walls where necessary . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
(18) Clark County-road project-create a link between NW 119th
Street and NE 117th Avenue. Construction includes but is not limited
to: One 12-foot travel lane in each direction; realignment of Hazel
Dell and Bassel Road; 5-foot bike lanes in each direction; 6-foot
sidewalks on both sides; storm drainage improvement; replacement of the
Sudds Creek culvert; sound walls or berms as required by the
environmental assessment and sound study; and landscaping including
street trees and shrubs . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
(19) Clark County-road project-realign NE Ward Road into NE 172nd
Avenue and extending NE 99th Street east to NE Ward Road, eliminating
the existing portion between Ward Road and 172nd Avenue. A traffic
signal will be installed at the new four-leg intersection of 172nd
Avenue and 99th Street. Other associated road improvements will
include one 12-foot travel lane in each direction, 4-foot shoulders,
side slopes, and guardrails where appropriate . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
(20) Clark Public Utilities-domestic water project-acquire
approximately 18.4 acres of private property to construct a well field
complex. Design and construct four potable water supply wells, pumping
facilities, wellhead enclosures, three test wells, a water transmission
line, and a water treatment plant. Other site work including, but not
limited to, grading, access road construction, and landscaping . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $6,257,320
(21) Clark Public Utilities-domestic water project-make system-wide
improvements on the water system, including construction of a new well,
replacing Griffels Reservoir with a new 500,000-gallon steel facility
and attendant station, construction of a new reservoir and attendant
station at Alpine Heights Reservoir, construction of a water
distribution line at High Valley water storage, installation of a 500
gallon-per-minute booster station at Upper Valley View Water, and
replacement of approximately 62,860 feet of waterline . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,686,000
(22) Clinton Water District-domestic water project-construct a
reservoir of approximately a 150,000-gallon capacity. Construction
will include the demolition and removal of the old reservoir, placement
of temporary storage facilities, and the construction of the new
reservoir. The district will install water mains, equipment,
telemetry, and controls compatible with the existing system. Site
improvements such as lighting, grading, and fencing will be made . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $281,180
(23) City of Colfax-domestic water project-replace the well pump
controls, pump house, and interior piping, and install a new
chlorination system. The new well house will include proper
ventilation, heating, and security to protect the instrumentation and
piping components. The chlorination system will be brought into
conformance with safety standards and the cross connection with the
sewer system will be eliminated . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,000
(24) City of Covington-road project-widen 164th Avenue SE from two
lanes to three lanes, from SE 263rd Street to SE 256th Street. The
project also includes the installation of traffic signals, storm
drainage trunk line, and burying overhead utilities. Additional
improvements to 164th Avenue SE will include two 5-foot wide bike
lanes, curbs, gutters, a planting strip, and sidewalks on both sides of
the street . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,785,500
(25) Cross Valley Water District-domestic water project-extend
service to the Mountain View Water Association and replace
approximately 3,450 linear feet of water main. In addition, the
project will also take over the existing private water system. Extend
and replace approximately 12,800 linear feet of water main to the
Seattle Hill area . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,125,000
(26) City of Des Moines-road project-expand the roadway cross
section from approximately 62 feet to 114 feet to accommodate two 14-foot HOV lanes and a 15-foot illuminated, erosion control median.
Purchase right-of-way on both sides of the highway, and overlay the
entire roadway. Construct four new bus pullouts with shelters, upgrade
signals at intersections, and install two new signal systems, and
interconnect all traffic signals. Both sides will have curb and
gutter, a 6-foot erosion control area, and sidewalks. A pedestrian
activated signal will be installed. Double left-turn lanes and
exclusive right lanes will be installed at some intersections, and
driveways will be consolidated where possible . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(27) East Wenatchee Water District-domestic water project-design
and install approximately 5,000 feet of water main, valves, services,
and miscellaneous appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $429,000
(28) East Wenatchee Water District-domestic water project-design
and construct a booster pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $489,600
(29) City of Edmonds-domestic water project-prepare a predesign
report, design and construct the following: Motor controls, electrical
components, and telemetry equipment. Replace pumps and appurtenances,
replace valves and meters, install security measures, and upgrade the
generator to accommodate new station equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $408,000
(30) City of Edmonds-storm sewer project-replace the Willow Creek
and Dayton Street storm water outfalls. Install approximately 800 feet
of storm pipe; construct headwalls, install riprap, and restore the
site and system connections. A water quality treatment system will be
installed at the Dayton Street outfall . . . . . . . . . . . . $605,625
(31) City of Edmonds-road project-construct improvements to 220th
Street SW, including two standard 11-foot through lanes, standard 11-foot left-turn lane pockets at 9th Avenue, 96th Avenue, 95th Place, and
84th Avenue, two standard 5-foot bike lanes, curb, gutter, and 5-foot
sidewalks on both sides of the street, installation of an underground
storm water conveyance system, installation of a storm water quality
and detention vault system, relocate overhead utilities, restore the
existing ACP pavement surface, flatten vertical curves to improve sight
distance, construct four concrete bus shelter pads and four bus stops,
construct ten improved crosswalks, improve school zone signage,
construct an in-ground crosswalk light system near the school, and
construct a signal with left turn pockets at 84th Avenue W and 220th
Street SW . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
(32) Fall City Water District-domestic water project-install an
oxidation and filtration treatment system. Implement a supervisory
control and data acquisition (SCADA) system. Install security
monitoring and alarms. Install source meters. Replace approximately
200 feet of water main, install approximately 1,200 feet of new water
main, and complete the connection between the Heathercrest system and
the Riverview Park system . . . . . . . . . . . . $570,108
(33) Hazel Dell Sewer District-sanitary sewer project-design,
engineer, construct, and expand the capacity of the shared use
facilities. The project work will include the design of approximately
five miles of parallel inceptor, one transmission pump station, an
influent pressure main, treatment plant improvements, and an effluent
transmission line and diffuser into the Columbia River . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(34) Highline Water District-domestic water project-replace
approximately 7,630 feet of water main. Install hydrants, valves, and
appurtenances. Restore project area . . . . . . . . . . . . $808,350
(35) Karcher Creek Sewer District-sanitary sewer project-replace
approximately 6,400 lineal feet of sewer main and over 4,500 lineal
feet of residential side sewers . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,360,000
(36) City of Kent-road project-construct a new 5-lane street
between 54th Avenue South and Military Road, including a new bridge
over the Green River. Upgrade Military Road with new traffic signals
at various locations, wetland restoration, and new storm water
detention/treatment . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(37) King County-storm sewer project-replace approximately 12,000
feet of pipe in the Boeing Creek Trunk Sewer. Construct an underground
storage pipe to temporarily store sewage during large storm events.
Construct a new Hidden Lake Pump Station . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(38) City of Kirkland-sanitary sewer project-replace approximately
4,300 feet of sewer pipe. Connect to existing sewer mains, replace
side sewers within the right-of-way, and restore pavement, curbs, and
sidewalks, and make other surface enhancements . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,086,300
(39) Lakehaven Utility District-domestic water project-install in-line water pressure filters to remove manganese and iron from the
drinking water wells located at sites 17, 19, 21, and 23. Install
emergency generators at two of the four well sites . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
(40) Lakehaven Utility District-sanitary sewer project-improve the
wastewater treatment plant to include installation of a biosolid dryer,
natural gas lines to the dryer, and an odor scrubber . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(41) Liberty Lake Sewer/Water District-sanitary sewer project-improve the treatment plant to remove nutrients, BOD, TSS,
nitrogen/ammonia, and phosphorus from two million gallons of sewage per
day . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(42) City of Lynden-road project-reconstruct approximately 1.5
miles of Main Street. Grind approximately 3 miles of existing pavement
and curb interface, remove areas of base failures and reconstruct
travel lanes to all-weather status, place paving fabric and structural
asphalt overlay on the existing street, replace approximately 2,500
feet of broken and disjointed curb and sidewalk. At the intersection
of Third and Main, the city will provide full signalization,
channelization, and provide pedestrian actuated crosswalks.
Approximately 30 ADA compliant ramps will be constructed and
approximately 3 miles of striped and signed bicycle route will be
provided. Upgrade approximately 2,500 feet of water distribution main,
and upgrade approximately 2,500 feet of sewer trunk main . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,876,560
(43) City of Maple Valley-road project-reconstruct the south half
of the intersection of SR 516 and 228th Avenue SE. The improvements
will include but are not limited to, travel lanes, left turn pockets,
right turn only lanes, bicycle lanes, landscaping planters, sidewalks,
street lighting, signing, and striping. And construction of storm
drain piping and a water quality vault . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,917,000
(44) City of Maple Valley-road project-install signals at the SR
169 and SE 64th Street intersection, and reconstruct the SR 169 and SR
516 intersection. This will include, but is not limited to, travel
lanes, left turn pockets, right turn only lanes, bicycle lanes,
sidewalks, curbs, gutters, street lighting, signing, and striping.
Construction of a modified storm drainage conveyance system, storm
water quality vault, and retention/detention facility . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,793,000
(45) City of Marysville-sanitary sewer project-provide a new
effluent conveyance system to the City of Everett. This will allow
Marysville effluent to bypass the Snohomish River system most of the
year and link up with Everett conveyance/discharge for ocean disposal
of the treated effluent . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(46) City of Milton-road project-provide the following improvements
from approximately 200 feet west of the intersection of Milton Way and
28th Avenue to approximately 400 feet east of the intersection:
Install traffic signals, left turn lanes, sidewalk, storm drainage
system, landscaping, irrigation, bike lanes, street illumination, a
signalized intersection to include ADA amenities, and a controlled
pedestrian crossing . . . . . . . . . . . . $442,800
(47) City of Milton-road project-provide the following improvements
from approximately 300 feet west of the intersection of Milton Way and
27th Avenue to approximately 500 feet east of the intersection:
Install traffic signals, left turn lanes, sidewalk, storm drainage
system, bike lanes, street illumination, a signalized intersection to
include ADA amenities, and a controlled pedestrian crossing . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $552,600
(48) City of Morton-domestic water project-construct a new
500,000-gallon reservoir, together with a concrete foundation, water
main piping, electrical supply, telemetry, fencing, access road, site
improvements, and appurtenances. Also, the city will install
approximately 1,400 feet of water main pipe, fire hydrants, valves,
fittings, services, surface restoration, and appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
(49) City of Napavine-sanitary sewer project-construct an
additional 3,515 feet of force main and approximately 7,550 feet of
gravity main to augment the existing force main . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,563,890
(50) Northshore Utility District-sanitary sewer project-provide
sanitary sewer service to an area of Bothell experiencing failed septic
systems. The project consists of installing approximately 925 feet of
sewer main, side sewer connections, three manholes, and connection to
the district's existing sanitary sewer system, related restoration, and
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,124
(51) Northshore Utility District-sanitary sewer project-provide
sanitary sewer service to an area located in the 40th Place NE area,
located in the City of Lake Forest Park. The project consists of
installing approximately 1,250 feet of gravity sewer main, side sewer
connections, five manholes, and connection to the district's existing
sanitary sewer system, related restoration, and appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $316,566
(52) Northshore Utility District-sanitary sewer project-provide
sanitary sewer service to the area located in NE 202nd Street, between
68th Avenue NE and 62nd Avenue NE due to failed septic systems. The
project consists of installing approximately 4,350 feet of gravity
sewer main, side sewer connections, 16 manholes, and connection to the
district's existing sanitary sewer system, related restoration, and
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,101,210
(53) Olympic View Water/Sewer District-sanitary sewer project-upgrade the Forest Glen lift station: Replace two pumps, station power
and control equipment, station onsite standby power equipment, check
valves, plug valves, sump pump, discharge piping and valves, dry well
blower, ducts, heater, dehumidifier, and station electrical equipment.
Install a buried valve to pump house for the standby power equipment.
Complete spot repair on the force main associated with this station and
include temporary sedimentation and erosion control measures and
surface restoration as required . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000
(54) Pierce County-road project-construct a new ferry vessel to
serve Anderson and Ketron Islands. The new vessel's general
specifications include, but are not limited to: 213 feet in length, 66
feet wide, capacity for 54 vehicles, and twin diesel power . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $7,058,000
(55) City of Port Angeles-domestic water project-replace
approximately 3,800 feet of water mains, install fire hydrants and
other appurtenances, replace sanitary and storm sewer, underground
light utilities, sidewalks, alley, and street restoration . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
(56) City of Port Orchard-sanitary sewer project-expand the
capacity of the wastewater treatment facility, including the
construction of physical, chemical, and biological process systems as
well as upgrade and expand the necessary appurtenance conveyance,
equipment, and treatment systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,800,000
(57) City of Renton-domestic water project-construct drinking water
treatment improvements to include new water mains, fittings, valves,
flow meters, and a new building. Restore all affected areas. Provide
storm water detention, infiltration, and treatment . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,150,000
(58) City of Seattle-storm sewer project-install a complete natural
drainage system and one sidewalk per block on 16 residential streets.
Install approximately 8,000 feet of bio-swales; planting strips,
underlying soil reservoirs, gravel beds, and approximately 50 trees and
plants/shrubs per block . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,754,174
(59) Seaview Sewer District-sanitary sewer project-install new
pumps and controls, telemetry systems with remote alarm capabilities,
and an emergency power generation system . . . . . . . . . . . . $456,997
(60) City of Shelton-sanitary sewer project-replace approximately
12,000 feet of existing sanitary sewer mains, replace approximately 60
manholes, restore surface asphalt, gravel, and approximately 20,000
square yards of streets and alleys . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,325,000
(61) Skyway Water/Sewer District-sanitary sewer project-replace
approximately 11,200 feet of sewer main, 13,000 feet of sewer inceptor,
all manholes, cleanouts, and associated appurtenances. Pipelines in
the project area will be relocated from a residential plat to a street
right-of-way . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,114,000
(62) City of Snohomish-sanitary sewer project-the city's project
will be accomplished in four segments: (a) Segment one will extend an
18-inch sanitary sewer system to an existing pump station located on
72nd Street SE. This extension will allow for the removal of this pump
station; (b) segment two will extend an existing collector sewer to
serve the Bickford commercial and multifamily annexation, and abandon
the pump station on 72nd Street; (c) segment three will continue from
the finishing point of segment one with a 15 and 10-inch sewer with
jacking under Bickford Avenue to reach an existing pump station
adjacent to Blackman's Lake. Extend the above sewer from 72nd Street
SE to an existing pump station on 14th Street. This segment will allow
for the abandonment of these two pump stations; and (d) segment four
will replace an existing sewer with a 10-inch pipe to provide
additional capacity and for future service of Blackman's Lake . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $6,934,300
(63) City of Spokane-bridge project-rehabilitate the Monroe Street
Bridge; rehabilitate the superstructure including all spandrel columns
and arches; reconstruct the four pavilions; clean all existing concrete
surfaces and apply sealer; repair cracks and spalls; apply a concrete
overlay to the south approach; reconstruct the two entrance pylons;
install a deck drainage and storm water treatment system; install
roadway illumination, traffic barrier, sidewalk railings, and
interpretive kiosk. Reconstruct the street at each end of the bridge;
reinstall existing utilities; and assess "building in" provisions for
future deck widening and possible implementation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
(64) City of Sultan-road project-reconstruct approximately .65
miles of a two-lane section of U.S. Highway 2. Construct intersection
signalization, right and left-turn channelization, and
bicycle/pedestrian facilities. Improve access to the community transit
park, ride-lot, and bus interface; connect a .65-mile gap in the two-way left-turn lane, and storm detention and treatment facilities. The
city may replace a narrow bridge built in the 1940s that does not meet
current design standards . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
(65) City of Sultan-road project-install new traffic signal and
complete the railroad preemption. Widen roadway. Install drainage
facilities and pedestrian improvements including signals, crosswalks,
sidewalk at intersection corners, and handicap access ramps . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
(66) City of Sultan-sanitary sewer project-install approximately
2,600 feet of sewer main, approximately 2,100 feet of storm drain, and
related appurtenances. Patch and overlay the street . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,315,000
(67) City of Sumner-sanitary sewer project-upgrade the wastewater
treatment plant to include new primary clarifiers, aeration basin,
blowers, UV disinfection system, influent pump station, headworks,
additional secondary clarifiers, anaerobic digester, centrifuge for
sludge dewatering, sludge dryer, and improved flood controls . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,109,000
(68) City of Tacoma-road project-upgrade streets, sidewalks, bike
lanes, street lighting, traffic signals, and street landscaping . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(69) City of Tukwila-storm sewer project-construct drainage and
roadway improvements consisting of a new storm sewer system and under-drains along approximately 7,000 feet of public roadways, storm sewer
stub-outs to each private parcel. Repair approximately 11,000 square
yards of failing pavement, resurface approximately 21,000 square yards
of roadway, provide water quality treatment, return base flows to
Southgate Creek, and replace approximately 15,000 linear feet of curb,
gutter, and sidewalks . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,197,600
(70) City of Tukwila-sanitary sewer project-design and construct
wastewater pumping facilities, force mains, and approximately 14,100
feet of gravity sewer mains. The project will eliminate existing
health issues associated with the failing septic tanks and drain
fields, increase fire flow, and alleviate surface water pooling and
stagnant contaminated ditch water . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,700,000
(71) City of Union Gap-domestic water project-install approximately
12,500 feet of water mains, complete construction of pump and pump
house for well No. 6, install a new chlorination system, install new
transmission line from well No. 6 to the transmission main on Ahtanum
Road, complete construction of a water main along south 10th Avenue to
Pioneer Street, install water main in conjunction with the current
roadway extension construction, restore approximately 3,200 feet of
pavement, install approximately 31 fire hydrants, valves,
appurtenances, and 1,500 feet of water line for fire flow . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,376,050
(72) City of Uniontown-domestic water project-drill a new municipal
well to produce 100-300 gallons per minute. Test the aquifer to
determine production rates, drawdowns, and other aquifer
characteristics that are required to design a well pump. A well pump
and well house will be constructed. The existing wells will be
abandoned. Existing well houses will also be removed . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,658
(73) Val Vue Sewer District-sanitary sewer project-extend sanitary
sewer service to the district's unsewered basin areas. Install
approximately 11,200 feet of sewer pipe; install side sewers, manholes,
and cleanout structures. Rehabilitate or replace four segments of pipe
totaling approximately 2,830 feet and rehabilitate existing manholes to
eliminate infiltration of groundwater . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,609,050
(74) Valley Water District-domestic water project-construct a
500,000-gallon reservoir and booster pump station. Install all
necessary waterlines, valves, and appurtenances to connect the new
facility to the existing water system. Included with the booster
station will be all controls, instrumentation, and telemetry necessary
to integrate the new facility with existing operation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,264,800
(75) Valley Water District-domestic water project-install a water
treatment system and a hypochlorite system. Construct a treatment
building. Install an effluent disposal system, piping, valves and
appurtenances, security fencing and electrical modifications.
Construct a 380,000-gallon reservoir, including all necessary
waterlines, valves, and appurtenances to connect the new facility.
Upsize the distribution system with approximately 2,600 feet of water
main, gate valves, fire hydrants, and service connections. Included
will be the replacement of water mains and restoration of asphalt as
required . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,220,600
(76) City of Washtucna-domestic water project-construct a new
reservoir with a capacity of approximately 290,000 gallons; install
approximately 8,000 feet of distribution and transmission lines;
install a reservoir and well pump telemetry and control system . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $297,500
(77) City of West Richland-road project-construct approximately 3
miles of two-lane roadway with associated curb, gutter, and sidewalk,
left-turn lanes at intersections, a separated asphalt pathway, bicycle
lanes, transit turn-outs with shelters, street lighting, storm drainage
structures, and site restoration . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
(78) City of West Richland-domestic water project-drill two new
wells or purchase two existing wells, install associated well equipment
and structures including well motors, pumps, buildings, chlorination
system, controls, telemetry system, site security, construct
approximately 1.5 million-gallon reservoir, install 24,500 feet of
water transmission lines, repair or replace miscellaneous asphalt
roadway, and complete site restoration. If additional funds are
available after the construction identified in this subsection (78),
the city will build an additional 250,000-gallon reservoir at a
separate site . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,495,000
(79) City of Zillah-domestic water project-construct a 1.2 million-gallon reservoir, a new transmission line and pressure-reducing valve
station, and acquire a new 550 gallon per minute well either by
purchasing an existing well or drilling a new well. If the well is
acquired through purchase, a booster pump station will be constructed
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,075,900

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---