BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.534 and 1997 c 409 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person may file a petition for judicial review under this chapter
only after exhausting all administrative remedies available within the
agency whose action is being challenged, or available within any other
agency authorized to exercise administrative review, except:
(1) A petitioner for judicial review of a rule need not have
participated in the rule-making proceeding upon which that rule is
based, have petitioned for its amendment or repeal, have petitioned the
joint administrative rules review committee for its review, or have
appealed a petition for amendment or repeal to the governor;
(2) A petitioner for judicial review need not exhaust
administrative remedies to the extent that this chapter or any other
statute states that exhaustion is not required; ((or))
(3) A petitioner for judicial review who is a small business as
defined in RCW 19.85.020 need not exhaust administrative remedies if
the petition is filed within two years of the agency action that is the
subject of the petition; or
(4) The court may relieve a petitioner of the requirement to
exhaust any or all administrative remedies upon a showing that:
(a) The remedies would be patently inadequate;
(b) The exhaustion of remedies would be futile; or
(c) The grave irreparable harm that would result from having to
exhaust administrative remedies would clearly outweigh the public
policy requiring exhaustion of administrative remedies.

--- END ---