BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.140 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
The University of Washington, Washington State University, Central
Washington University, Eastern Washington University, Western
Washington University, and The Evergreen State College are each
authorized to train teachers and other personnel for whom teaching
certificates or special credentials prescribed by the state board of
education are required, for any grade, level, department, or position
of the public schools of the state((, except that the training for
superintendents, over and above that required for teaching certificates
and principals' credentials, shall be given by the University of
Washington and Washington State University only)).

--- END ---