BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable as
provided in RCW 9A.20.021 if he or she knowingly transports or accepts
delivery of live nonambulatory livestock to, from, or between any
livestock market, feedlot, slaughtering facility, or other facility
that trades in livestock. The transport or acceptance of each
nonambulatory livestock animal is considered a separate and distinct
violation.
(2) Nonambulatory livestock must be humanely euthanized before
transport to, from, or between locations listed in subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "nonambulatory livestock"
means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, or other equine that
cannot rise from a recumbent position or cannot walk, including but not
limited to those with broken appendages, severed tendons or ligaments,
nerve paralysis, a fractured vertebral column, or metabolic conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---