BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Impact fees for residential construction, as defined in section
3 of this act, shall only be collected by the county, city, or town
imposing the impact fee either:
(a) At the time of final inspection of the residence. A final
inspection shall be conditioned on the payment of the impact fees; or
(b) At the time the certificate of occupancy is issued. Issuance
of a certificate of occupancy shall be conditioned on the payment of
the impact fees.
(2) As a form of surety, a county, city, or town may require a
signed statement from the owner agreeing to and acknowledging the terms
of this chapter.
(3) Impact fees imposed under this chapter shall become a lien upon
real property, in the same manner as provided for under RCW 84.60.010,
thirty days after the impact fees become due until the same are paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Impact fees under this chapter for residential construction, as
defined in section 3 of this act, shall only be collected by the
county, city, or town imposing the impact fee either:
(a) At the time of final inspection of the residence. A final
inspection shall be conditioned on the payment of the impact fees; or
(b) At the time the certificate of occupancy is issued. Issuance
of a certificate of occupancy shall be conditioned on the payment of
the impact fees.
(2) As a form of surety, a county, city, or town may require a
signed statement from the owner agreeing to and acknowledging the terms
of this chapter.
(3) Impact fees imposed under this chapter shall become a lien upon
real property, in the same manner as provided for under RCW 84.60.010,
thirty days after the impact fees become due until the same are paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of sections 1 and 2 of this act, "residential
construction" means construction of single-family dwellings, duplexes,
apartments, condominiums, and other residential structures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any section of this act is vetoed by the
governor, the remainder of this act is null and void.

--- END ---