BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of labor and industries shall prepare financial
statements on the state fund in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles, including but not limited to the accident fund,
the medical aid fund, the pension reserve fund, the supplemental
pension fund and the second injury fund. Statements shall be presented
desegregated and in aggregate.
(2) Beginning in 2005, the joint legislative audit and review
committee with the office of the state actuary shall oversee annual
audits of the state fund. The audits shall be conducted by firms
recognized as qualified to perform a financial audit and a separate
independent actuarial audit. The financial audit and the independent
actuarial audit may be performed by separate firms.
(a) The firm or firms conducting the reviews shall be familiar with
the accounting standards applicable to the accounts under review, shall
have experience in workers' compensation reserving and rate making in
Washington state, and shall employ staff who have no fewer than three
people who have attained fellowship in the casualty actuarial society
and shall maintain professionally recognized standards of limits for
errors and omission insurance.
(b) The legislative auditor shall determine the scope of the
financial audit which shall include, but is not limited to, an opinion
on whether the financial statements were prepared in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles.
(c) The legislative auditor, in consultation with the state
actuary, shall determine the scope of the actuarial audit, which shall
include, but is not limited to:
(i) An independent estimate of the claim reserves;
(ii) An evaluation of the effect of discounting using various
investment yields on reported reserve levels;
(iii) A retrospective test of the accuracy of labor and industries
reserve estimates over at least a fifteen-year period;
(iv) An assessment of the actuarial calculations underlying the
break-even indicated rate level;
(v) A retrospective test of the accuracy of past rate level
indications over at least a ten-year period;
(vi) An assessment of the actuarial reserving calculations;
(vii) An assessment of the financial impact of the proposed rate
level on the actuarial soundness of the industrial insurance fund,
taking into consideration the risks inherent with insurance and the
fact that competition does not mitigate rate setting.
(d) The department of labor and industries shall cooperate with the
firms in all respects and shall permit the firms full access to all
information the firms deem necessary for a true and complete review.
(e) The costs of the audits shall be paid by the state fund under
separate interagency agreements with the joint legislative audit and
review committee and the office of the state actuary.
(3) The legislative auditor shall issue an annual report to the
governor, the leaders of the majority and minority caucuses in the
senate and the house of representatives, the director of the office of
financial management, the director of the department of labor and
industries, and the attorney general on the results of the financial
and actuarial audits and reviews, within six months of the end of the
fiscal year. The report may include recommendations.
(4) The audit report shall be available for public inspection.
(5) Within six months after the legislative auditor completes and
delivers to the appropriate authority an audit under subsection (2) of
this section, the director of the department of labor and industries
shall notify the legislative auditor in writing of the measures taken
and proposed to be taken, if any, to respond to the recommendations of
the audit report. The office of the attorney general and the
department shall discuss its actions in response to an audit at a
public meeting of the joint legislative audit and review committee.

--- END ---