BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the federal
permit program under the federal clean water act and the state water
pollution control laws provide numerous environmental and public health
benefits to the citizens of Washington and to the state. Failure to
prevent and control pollution discharges, including those associated
with storm water runoff, can damage the public health and industries
dependent on clean water such as shellfish production.
(2) The legislature finds the nature of storm water presents unique
challenges and difficulties in meeting the permitting requirements
under the federal clean water act, including compliance with technology
and water quality-based standards.
(3) The legislature finds that the federal clean water act requires
certain larger construction sites and industrial facilities to obtain
storm water permits under the national pollutant discharge elimination
system permit program. The legislature also finds that under phase two
of this program, smaller construction sites are also required to obtain
storm water permits for their discharges.
(4) The legislature finds the department of ecology has been using
general permits to permit categories of similar dischargers, including
storm water associated with industrial and construction activities.
The legislature finds general permits must comply with all applicable
requirements of the federal clean water act and the state water
pollution control act including technology and water quality-based
permitting requirements. The legislature further finds general permits
may not always be the best solution for an individual discharger,
especially when establishing water quality-based permitting
requirements.
(5) The legislature finds that where sources within a specific
category or subcategory of dischargers are subject to water
quality-based requirements imposed under the federal clean water act,
the sources in that specific category or subcategory must be subject to
the same water quality-based requirements.
(6) For this reason, the legislature encourages, to the extent
allowed under existing state and federal law, an adaptive management
approach to permitting storm water discharges.
(7) The legislature further finds that storm water management must
satisfy state and federal water quality requirements while also
providing for flexibility in meeting such requirement to help ensure
cost-effective storm water management.
(8) The legislature declares that general permits can be an
effective and efficient permitting mechanism for permitting large
numbers of similar dischargers.
(9) The legislature further declares that an inspection and
technical assistance program for industrial and construction storm
water general permits is needed to ensure an effective permitting
program. Such a program should be fully funded to ensure its success.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effluent limitations shall be included in construction and
industrial storm water general permits as required under the federal
clean water act and implementing regulations. In accordance with
federal clean water act requirements, effluent limitations must be
included in construction and industrial storm water general permits if
there is a reasonable potential to cause or contribute to an excursion
of a state water quality standard.
(2) Subject to the provisions of this section, effluent limitations
may be expressed as (a) numeric effluent limitations; (b) narrative
effluent limitations; or (c) a combination of numeric and narrative
effluent discharge limitations.
(3) The department may only condition storm water general permits
for industrial and construction activities issued under the national
pollutant discharge elimination system of the federal clean water act
to require compliance with numeric effluent discharge limits when such
discharges are subject to:
(a) Numeric effluent limitations established in federally adopted,
industry-specific effluent guidelines;
(b) State developed, industry-specific performance-based numeric
effluent limitations;
(c) Numeric effluent limitations based on a completed total maximum
daily load analysis or other pollution control measures; or
(d) A determination by the department that the discharges covered
under either the construction or industrial storm water general permits
have (i) a reasonable potential to cause or contribute to violation of
state water quality standards; and (ii) a determination by the
department that effluent limitations based on nonnumeric best
management practices are not effective in achieving compliance with
state water quality standards.
(4) In making a determination under subsection (3)(d) of this
section, the department shall use procedures that account for (a)
existing controls on point and nonpoint sources of pollution; (b) the
variability of the pollutant or pollutant parameter in the storm water
runoff; and (c) as appropriate, the dilution of the storm water in the
receiving waters.
(5) Narrative effluent limitations requiring the implementation of
best management practices, when designed to satisfy technology and
water quality-based requirements of the federal clean water act, shall
be used for construction and industrial storm water general permits,
unless the provisions of subsection (3) of this section apply.
(6) Compliance with water quality standards shall be presumed,
unless site specific information demonstrates otherwise, when the
permittee is:
(a) In compliance with permit conditions for planning, sampling,
monitoring, reporting, and recordkeeping; and
(b) Following storm water management practices, or practices that
are demonstrably equivalent to practices contained in storm water
technical manuals approved by the department, including the proper
selection, implementation, and maintenance of appropriate best
management practices for on-site pollution control.
(7) Existing discharges to receiving waters listed under section
303(d) of the federal clean water act shall be conditioned on an
interim effluent discharge limit based on compliance with all
requirements of a permit including implementation of best management
practices for a period of ten years or until a completed total maximum
daily load is adopted by the department, whichever is earlier.
(8) Permittees covered under the construction and industrial storm
water general permits must not cause or have the reasonable potential
to cause or contribute to a violation of an applicable water quality
standard. Where a discharge has already been authorized under a
national pollutant discharge elimination system storm water permit and
it is later determined to cause or have the reasonable potential to
cause or contribute to the violation of an applicable water quality
standard, the department must notify the permittee of such a violation.
(9) Once notified by the department that a determination of
reasonable potential to cause or contribute to the violation of an
applicable water quality standard, the permittee must take all
necessary actions to ensure future discharges do not cause or
contribute to the violation of a water quality standard and document
those actions in the storm water pollution prevention plan.
(10) Receiving water sampling shall not be a requirement of an
industrial or construction storm water general permit unless it can be
conducted without endangering the health and safety of a permittee and
its employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2005, the department shall initiate an inspection
program of all permittees covered under the construction and industrial
storm water general permits. The purpose of the inspections is to:
(a) Provide technical assistance and survey for evidence of permit
violations;
(b) Identify corrective actions for actual or imminent discharges
that violate or could violate the state's water quality standards;
(c) Monitor the development and implementation of storm water
pollution prevention plans; and
(d) Identify dischargers who would benefit from follow-up technical
assistance programs.
(2) Follow-up inspections shall be conducted by the department to
ensure that corrective and other actions as identified in the course of
initial inspections are being carried out. The department shall also
conduct such additional inspections as are necessary to ensure
compliance with state and federal water quality requirements, provided
that all permittees must be inspected once within two years of the
start of this program.
(3) Permittees must be prioritized for inspection based on the
development of criteria that include, but are not limited to, the
following factors:
(a) Historical compliance history, including submittal or
nonsubmittal of discharge monitoring reports;
(b) Monitoring results in relationship to permit benchmarks; and
(c) Discharge to impaired waters of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any portion of sections 2 and 3 of this
act are found to be in conflict with the federal clean water act, that
portion alone is void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2004, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---