BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29.04.075 and 2003 c 109 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
The secretary of state, or any staff of the elections division of
the office of secretary of state, may make unannounced on-site visits
to county election offices and facilities to observe the handling,
processing, counting, or tabulation of ballots.

Sec. 2 RCW 29.04.260 and 2003 c 48 s 1 are each reenacted to read
as follows:
(1) The election account is created in the state treasury.
(2) The following receipts must be deposited into the account:
Amounts received from the federal government under Public Law 107-252
(October 29, 2002), known as the "Help America Vote Act of 2002,"
including any amounts received under subsequent amendments to the act;
amounts appropriated or otherwise made available by the state
legislature for the purposes of carrying out activities for which
federal funds are provided to the state under Public Law 107-252,
including any amounts received under subsequent amendments to the act;
and such other amounts as may be appropriated by the legislature to the
account.
(3) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be made only to facilitate the
implementation of Public Law 107-252.

Sec. 3 RCW 29.33.305 and 2003 c 110 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary of state shall adopt rules and establish
standards for voting technology and systems used by the state or any
political subdivision to be accessible for individuals with
disabilities, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and
visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for
access and participation, including privacy and independence, as other
voters.
(2) At each polling location, at least one voting unit certified by
the secretary of state shall provide access to individuals who are
blind or visually impaired.
(3) Compliance with this provision in regard to voting technology
and systems purchased prior to July 27, 2003, shall be achieved at the
time of procurement of an upgrade of technology compatible with
nonvisual voting methods or replacement of existing voting equipment or
systems.
(4) Compliance with subsections (2) and (3) of this section is
contingent on available funds to implement this provision.
(5) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Accessible" includes receiving, using, selecting, and
manipulating voter data and controls.
(b) "Nonvisual" includes synthesized speech, Braille, and other
output methods.
(c) "Blind and visually impaired" excludes persons who are both
deaf and blind.
(6) This section does not apply to voting by absentee ballot.

Sec. 4 RCW 29.79.075 and 2002 c 139 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
The office of financial management, in consultation with the
secretary of state, the attorney general, and any other appropriate
state or local agency, shall prepare a fiscal impact statement for each
of the following state ballot measures: (1) An initiative to the
people that is certified to the ballot; (2) an initiative to the
legislature that will appear on the ballot; (3) an alternative measure
appearing on the ballot that the legislature proposes to an initiative
to the legislature; (4) a referendum bill referred to voters by the
legislature; and (5) a referendum measure appearing on the ballot.
Fiscal impact statements must be written in clear and concise language
and avoid legal and technical terms when possible, and may include
easily understood graphics.
A fiscal impact statement must describe any projected increase or
decrease in revenues, costs, expenditures, or indebtedness that the
state or local governments will experience if the ballot measure were
approved by state voters. Where appropriate, a fiscal impact statement
may include both estimated dollar amounts and a description placing the
estimated dollar amounts into context. A fiscal impact statement must
include both a summary of not to exceed one hundred words and a more
detailed statement that includes the assumptions that were made to
develop the fiscal impacts.
Fiscal impact statements must be available online from the
secretary of state's web site and included in the state voters'
pamphlet.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.04.255 and 2003 c 111 s 142 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state or a county auditor shall accept and file in
his or her office electronic facsimile transmissions of the following
documents:
(1) Declarations of candidacy;
(2) County canvass reports;
(3) Voters' pamphlet statements;
(4) Arguments for and against ballot measures that will appear in
a voters' pamphlet;
(5) Requests for recounts;
(6) Certification of candidates and measures by the secretary of
state;
(7) Direction by the secretary of state for the conduct of a
mandatory recount;
(8) Requests for absentee ballots;
(9) Any other election related document authorized by rule adopted
by the secretary of state under RCW ((29.04.235)) 29A.04.610.
The acceptance by the secretary of state or the county auditor is
conditional upon the document being filed in a timely manner, being
legible, and otherwise satisfying the requirements of state law or
rules with respect to form and content.
If the original copy of a document must be signed and a copy of the
document is filed by facsimile transmission under this section, the
original copy must be subsequently filed with the official with whom
the facsimile was filed. The original copy must be filed by a deadline
established by the secretary by rule. The secretary may by rule
require that the original of any document, a copy of which is filed by
facsimile transmission under this section, also be filed by a deadline
established by the secretary by rule.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.04.330 and 2003 c 111 s 145 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All city, town, and district general elections shall be held
throughout the state of Washington on the first Tuesday following the
first Monday in November in the odd-numbered years.
This section shall not apply to:
(a) Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;
(b) Public utility districts, conservation districts, or district
elections at which the ownership of property within those districts is
a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections shall be held at the
times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable thereto;
(c) Consolidation proposals as provided for in RCW ((28A.315.265))
28A.315.235 and nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for in
chapter 28A.540 RCW.
(2) The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon
request in the form of a resolution of the governing body of a city,
town, or district, presented to the auditor at least forty-five days
prior to the proposed election date, may, if the county auditor deems
an emergency to exist, call a special election in such city, town, or
district, and for the purpose of such special election he or she may
combine, unite, or divide precincts. Except as provided in subsection
(3) of this section, such a special election shall be held on one of
the following dates as decided by the governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary election as specified by RCW 29A.04.310;
or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29A.56 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called under
subsection (2) of this section during the month of that primary is the
date of the presidential primary.
(4) In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section,
a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be
called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood,
earthquake, or other act of God, except that no special election may be
held between the first day for candidates to file for public office and
the last day to certify the returns of the general election other than
as provided in subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section. Such special
election shall be conducted and notice thereof given in the manner
provided by law.
(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.08.320 and 2003 c 111 s 223 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person may register to vote or transfer a voter registration
when he or she applies for service or assistance and with each renewal,
recertification, or change of address at agencies designated under RCW
((29.07.420)) 29A.08.310.
(2) A prospective applicant shall initially be offered a form
adopted by the secretary of state that is designed to determine whether
the person wishes to register to vote. The form must comply with all
applicable state and federal statutes regarding content.
The form shall also contain a box that may be checked by the
applicant to indicate that he or she declines to register.
If the person indicates an interest in registering or has made no
indication as to a desire to register or not register to vote, the
person shall be given a mail-in voter registration application or a
prescribed agency application as provided by RCW 29A.08.330.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.08.620 and 2003 c 111 s 239 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A county auditor shall assign a registered voter to inactive
status and shall send the voter a confirmation notice if any of the
following documents are returned by the postal service as
undeliverable:
(a) An acknowledgement of registration;
(b) An acknowledgement of transfer to a new address;
(c) A vote-by-mail ballot, absentee ballot, or application for a
ballot;
(d) Notification to a voter after precinct reassignment;
(e) Notification to serve on jury duty; or
(f) Any other document other than a confirmation notice, required
by statute, to be mailed by the county auditor to the voter.
(2) A county auditor shall also assign a registered voter to
inactive status and shall send the voter a confirmation notice:
(a) Whenever change of address information received from the
department of licensing under RCW 29A.08.350, or by any other agency
designated to provide voter registration services under RCW
((29.07.420)) 29A.08.310, indicates that the voter has moved to an
address outside the county; or
(b) If the auditor receives postal change of address information
under RCW 29A.08.605, indicating that the voter has moved out of the
county.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.08.720 and 2003 c 111 s 247 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In the case of voter registration records received through the
department of licensing, the identity of the office at which any
particular individual registered to vote is not available for public
inspection and shall not be disclosed to the public. In the case of
voter registration records received through an agency designated under
RCW ((29.07.420)) 29A.08.310, the identity of the agency at which any
particular individual registered to vote is not available for public
inspection and shall not be disclosed to the public. Any record of a
particular individual's choice not to register to vote at an office of
the department of licensing or a state agency designated under RCW
((29.07.420)) 29A.08.310 is not available for public inspection and any
information regarding such a choice by a particular individual shall
not be disclosed to the public.
(2) All poll books or current lists of registered voters, except
original voter registration forms or their images, shall be public
records and be made available for inspection under such reasonable
rules and regulations as the county auditor may prescribe. The county
auditor shall promptly furnish current lists or mailing labels of
registered voters in his or her possession, at actual reproduction
cost, to any person requesting such information. The lists and labels
shall not be used for the purpose of mailing or delivering any
advertisement or offer for any property, establishment, organization,
product, or service or for the purpose of mailing or delivering any
solicitation for money, services, or anything of value. However, the
lists and labels may be used for any political purpose.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.16.040 and 2003 c 111 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county legislative authority of each county in the state
hereafter formed shall, at their first session, divide their respective
counties into election precincts and establish the boundaries of the
precincts. The county auditor shall thereupon designate the voting
place for each such precinct or whether the precinct is a vote by mail
precinct.
(1) Precinct boundaries may be altered at any time as long as
sufficient time exists prior to a given election for the necessary
procedural steps to be honored. Except as permitted under subsection
(((4))) (5) of this section, no precinct boundaries may be changed
during the period starting on the thirtieth day prior to the first day
for candidates to file for the primary election and ending with the day
of the general election.
(2) The county legislative authority may establish by ordinance a
limitation on the maximum number of active registered voters in each
precinct within its jurisdiction. The limitation may be different for
precincts based upon the method of voting used for such precincts and
the number may be less than the number established by law, but in no
case may the number exceed that authorized by law.
(3) Precincts in which voting machines or electronic voting devices
are used may contain as many as nine hundred active registered voters.
The number of poll-site ballot counting devices at each polling place
is at the discretion of the auditor. The number of devices must be
adequate to meet the expected voter turnout.
(((3))) (4) On petition of twenty-five or more voters resident more
than ten miles from any polling site, the county legislative authority
shall establish a separate voting precinct therefor.
(((4))) (5) The county auditor shall temporarily adjust precinct
boundaries when a city or town annexes unincorporated territory to the
city or town, or whenever unincorporated territory is incorporated as
a city or town. The adjustment must be made as soon as possible after
the approval of the annexation or incorporation. The temporary
adjustment must be limited to the minimum changes necessary to
accommodate the addition of the territory to the city or town, or to
establish the eligible voters within the boundaries of the new city or
town, and remains in effect only until precinct boundary modifications
reflecting the annexation or incorporation are adopted by the county
legislative authority.
((The county legislative authority may establish by ordinance a
limitation on the maximum number of active registered voters in each
precinct within its jurisdiction. The limitation may be different for
precincts based upon the method of voting used for such precincts and
the number may be less than the number established by law, but in no
case may the number exceed that authorized by law.
The county legislative authority of each county in the state
hereafter formed shall, at their first session, divide their respective
counties into election precincts and establish the boundaries of the
precincts. The county auditor shall thereupon designate the voting
place for each such precinct or whether the precinct is a vote by mail
precinct.
(5))) (6) In determining the number of active registered voters for
the purposes of this section, persons who are ongoing absentee voters
under RCW 29A.40.040 shall not be counted. Nothing in this subsection
may be construed as altering the vote tallying requirements of RCW
29A.60.230.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.20.020 and 2003 c 111 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person filing a declaration of candidacy for an office shall,
at the time of filing, be a registered voter and possess the
qualifications specified by law for persons who may be elected to the
office.
(2) Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a
temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or
freeholder, no person may file for more than one office.
(3) The name of a candidate for an office shall not appear on a
ballot for that office unless, except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and
3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of
candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in the geographic area
represented by the office. For the purposes of this section, each
geographic area in which registered voters may cast ballots for an
office is represented by that office. If a person elected to an office
must be nominated from a district or similar division of the geographic
area represented by the office, the name of a candidate for the office
shall not appear on a primary ballot for that office unless the
candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of candidacy is
filed, properly registered to vote in that district or division. The
officer with whom declarations of candidacy must be filed under this
title shall review each such declaration filed regarding compliance
with this subsection.
(4) ((This section does)) The requirements of voter registration
and residence within the geographic area of a district do not apply to
((the)) candidates for congressional office ((of a member of)).
Qualifications for the United States Congress are specified in the
United States Constitution.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.32.120 and 2003 c 254 s 6 and 2003 c 111 s 812
are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) The maximum number of words for statements submitted by
candidates is as follows: State representative, one hundred words;
state senator, judge of the superior court, judge of the court of
appeals, justice of the supreme court, and all state offices voted upon
throughout the state, except that of governor, two hundred words;
president and vice president, United States senator, United States
representative, and governor, three hundred words.
(2) Arguments written by committees under RCW 29A.32.060 may not
exceed two hundred fifty words in length.
(3) Rebuttal arguments written by committees may not exceed
seventy-five words in length.
(4) The secretary of state shall allocate space in the pamphlet
based on the number of candidates or nominees for each office.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.40.070 and 2003 c 162 s 2 and 2003 c 111 s 1007
are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) Except where a recount or litigation under RCW 29A.68.010 is
pending, the county auditor shall have sufficient absentee ballots
available for absentee voters of that county at least twenty days
before any primary, general election, or special election. The county
auditor must mail absentee ballots to each voter for whom the county
auditor has received a request nineteen days before the primary or
election at least eighteen days before the primary or election. For a
request for an absentee ballot received after the nineteenth day before
the primary or election, the county auditor shall make every effort to
mail ballots within one business day, and shall mail the ballots within
two business days.
(2) The county auditor shall make every effort to mail ballots to
overseas and service voters earlier than eighteen days before a primary
or election.
(3) Each county auditor shall certify to the office of the
secretary of state the dates the ballots prescribed in subsection (1)
of this section were available and mailed.
(4) If absentee ballots will not be available or mailed as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, the county auditor shall
immediately certify to the office of the secretary of state when
absentee ballots will be available and mailed. Copies of this
certification must be provided to the county canvassing board, the
press, jurisdictions with issues on the ballot in the election, and any
candidates.
(5) If absentee ballots were not available or mailed as prescribed
in subsection (1) of this section, for a reason other than a recount or
litigation, the county auditor, in consultation with the certification
and training program of the office of the secretary of state, shall
submit a report to the office of the secretary of state outlining why
the deadline was missed and what corrective actions will be taken in
future elections to ensure that absentee ballots are available and
mailed as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(6) Failure to have absentee ballots available and mailed as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section does not by itself provide
a basis for an election contest or other legal challenge to the results
of a primary, general election, or special election.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.48.010 and 2003 c 162 s 3 and 2003 c 111 s 1201
are each reenacted to read as follows:
The county auditor may designate any precinct having fewer than two
hundred active registered voters at the time of closing of voter
registration as provided in RCW 29A.08.140 as a mail ballot precinct.
The county auditor shall notify each registered voter by mail that for
all future primaries and elections the voting in his or her precinct
will be by mail ballot only. In determining the number of registered
voters in a precinct for the purposes of this section, persons who are
ongoing absentee voters under RCW 29A.40.040 shall not be counted.
Nothing in this section may be construed as altering the vote tallying
requirements of RCW 29A.60.230.
The auditor shall mail each active voter a ballot at least eighteen
days before a primary, general election, or special election. The
auditor shall send each inactive voter either a ballot or an
application to receive a ballot at least eighteen days before a
primary, general election, or special election. The auditor shall
determine which of the two is to be sent. If the inactive voter
returns a voted ballot, the ballot shall be counted and the voter's
status restored to active. If the inactive voter completes and returns
an application, a ballot shall be sent and the voter's status restored
to active. The requirements regarding certification, reporting, and
the mailing of overseas and military ballots in RCW 29.36.270 apply to
mail ballot precincts.
If the precinct exceeds two hundred registered voters, or the
auditor determines to return to a polling place election environment,
the auditor shall notify each registered voter, by mail, of this and
shall provide the address of the polling place to be used.

Sec. 15 RCW 29A.48.020 and 2003 c 162 s 4 and 2003 c 111 s 1202
are each reenacted to read as follows:
At any nonpartisan special election not being held in conjunction
with a state primary or general election, the county, city, town, or
district requesting the election pursuant to RCW 29A.04.320 or
29A.04.330 may also request that the special election be conducted by
mail ballot. The county auditor may honor the request or may determine
that the election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The decision
of the county auditor in this regard is final.
For all special elections not being held in conjunction with a
state primary or state general election where voting is conducted by
mail ballot, the county auditor shall, not less than eighteen days
before the date of such election, mail to each registered voter a mail
ballot. The auditor shall handle inactive voters in the same manner as
inactive voters in mail ballot precincts. The requirements regarding
certification, reporting, and the mailing of overseas and military
ballots in RCW 29.36.270 apply to mail ballot elections.

Sec. 16 RCW 29A.60.030 and 2003 c 111 s 1503 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided by rule under RCW ((29.04.210)) 29A.04.610, on
the day of the primary or election, the tabulation of ballots at the
polling place or at the counting center shall proceed without
interruption or adjournment until all of the ballots cast at the polls
at that primary or election have been tabulated.

Sec. 17 RCW 29A.60.080 and 2003 c 111 s 1508 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for reopening to make a recanvass, the registering mechanism
of each mechanical voting device used in any primary or election shall
remain sealed until ten days after the completion of the canvass of
that primary or election in that county. Except where provided by a
rule adopted under RCW ((29.04.210)) 29A.04.610, voting devices used in
a primary or election shall remain sealed until ten days after the
completion of the canvass of that primary or election in that county.

Sec. 18 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2003 c 111 s 1519 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On the tenth day after a special election or primary and on the
fifteenth day after a general election, the county canvassing board
shall complete the canvass and certify the results. Each absentee
ballot that was returned before the closing of the polls on the date of
the primary or election for which it was issued, and each absentee
ballot with a postmark on or before the date of the primary or election
for which it was issued and received on or before the date on which the
primary or election is certified, must be included in the canvass
report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house ((or [of])) of representatives.

Sec. 19 RCW 29A.84.240 and 2003 c 111 s 2112 and 2003 c 53 s 183
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person who signs a recall petition with any other than
his or her true name is guilty of a class B felony punishable according
to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Every person who knowingly (a) signs more than one petition for
the same recall, (b) signs a recall petition when he or she is not a
legal voter, or (c) makes a false statement as to ((his or her))
residence on any recall petition is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(3) Every registration officer who makes any false report or
certificate on any recall petition is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 20 RCW 29A.84.270 and 2003 c 111 s 2115 and 2003 c 53 s 178
are each reenacted to read as follows:
Any person who with intent to mislead or confuse the electors
conspires with another person who has a surname similar to an incumbent
seeking reelection to the same office, or to an opponent for the same
office whose political reputation has been well established, by
persuading such other person to file for such office with no intention
of being elected, but to defeat the incumbent or the well known
opponent, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter
9A.20 RCW. In addition, all conspirators are subject to a suit for
civil damages, the amount of which may not exceed the salary that the
injured person would have received had he or she been elected or
reelected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 RCW 29.51.215 and 2003 c 111 s 2135 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 RCW 29.04.075 and 29.04.260 are each
recodified as sections in chapter 29A.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 RCW 29.33.305 is recodified as a section in
chapter 29A.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 RCW 29.79.075 is recodified as a section in
chapter 29A.72 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---