BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.115 and 2003 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall ensure that, taken collectively, adoption of and
amendments to their comprehensive plans and/or development regulations
provide sufficient capacity of land suitable for development within
their jurisdictions to accommodate their allocated housing and
employment growth, as adopted in the applicable countywide planning
policies and consistent with the twenty-year population forecast from
the office of financial management.
(2) If, after January 1, 2004, a county or city planning under RCW
36.70A.040 that amends its comprehensive plan to designate new critical
areas land located within an urban growth area in its comprehensive
plan land use element under RCW 36.70A.070(1) or amends its development
regulations or other standards and thereby reduces the development
potential of land within its urban growth area designated for
development in its comprehensive plan:
(a) That county or city must determine the acreage and qualitative
reduction in land suitable for development within its urban growth area
and docket that amount as a deficiency to the planning director of the
county in which the land is located;
(b) By September 1, 2006, and at least every five years thereafter,
each county, in consultation with its cities as required by RCW
36.70A.110 and 36.70A.210, must increase the total land area within its
urban growth areas by the total docketed acreage deficiency, with
comparable qualitative land characteristics, through amendment of the
county's comprehensive plan; and
(c) The county within which the increased land suitable for urban
development is located must review its comprehensive plan elements
under RCW 36.70A.070 and its development regulations under RCW
36.70A.060 and adopt any amendments necessary to assure that the
comprehensive plan elements and development regulations are consistent
with the changes required by (b) of this subsection. This review may
be combined with but may not be delayed by the review required by RCW
36.70A.130(3) or the review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(3) For purposes of this section, "docketing" means compiling and
maintaining a detailed list, available to the public, of acreage and
land use deficiencies in a manner that ensures the deficiencies will be
presented for the required periodic county action.
(4) For purposes of this section, "qualitative land
characteristics" means the designated use of the land in deficiency,
its suitability for development, the general location of that land
within the county, its physical characteristics, and the availability
of urban governmental services for the land.

--- END ---