BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47.020 and 2000 c 79 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(4) "Subsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an area of
the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not
exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for
family size and determined annually by the federal department of health
and human services; and (e) who chooses to obtain basic health care
coverage from a particular managed health care system in return for
periodic payments to the plan. To the extent that state funds are
specifically appropriated for this purpose, with a corresponding
federal match, "subsidized enrollee" also means an individual, or an
individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the requirements
in (a) through (c) and (e) of this subsection and whose gross family
income at the time of enrollment is more than two hundred percent, but
less than two hundred fifty-one percent, of the federal poverty level
as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal
department of health and human services.
(5) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who resides in an area of
the state served by a managed health care system participating in the
plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system; and (e) who pays or on whose
behalf is paid the full costs for participation in the plan, without
any subsidy from the plan.
(6) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic
payment the administrator makes to a managed health care system on
behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the
plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount
determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW
70.47.060(2).
(7) "Premium" means a periodic payment, based upon gross family
income which an individual, their employer or another financial sponsor
makes to the plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan as a
subsidized enrollee or a nonsubsidized enrollee.
(8) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with
and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based
upon the enrollment of subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in the
plan and in that system.
(9) "Small employer group enrollee" means an individual, or an
individual plus the individual's spouse or dependent children, whose
employer: (a) Is a small employer as defined in RCW 48.43.005; (b)
applies for group coverage through the plan; and (c) agrees to pay a
premium for that coverage which is equal to the cost charged by the
managed health care system to the state for the plan plus the
administrative cost of providing the plan to the small employer group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrator shall accept applications for group coverage
from small employers who meet the requirements of this section on
behalf of themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent
children who reside in an area served by the plan.
(2) Small employer group coverage through the basic health plan is
not conditioned upon the small employer group enrollees meeting the
eligibility requirements for subsidized enrollees provided in RCW
70.47.020(4). The administrator shall not require employers to report
total household income of their employees as a condition of receiving
group coverage through the basic health plan.
(3) The administrator may require all or a substantial majority of
employees of small employers to enroll in the plan and establish those
procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly enrollment of groups in
the plan. The administrator may also devise policies and procedures to
assist small employer group enrollees who meet the eligibility
requirements for subsidized enrollees provided in RCW 70.47.020(4) to
seek enrollment as a subsidized enrollee.
(4) Small employer group enrollees are eligible for coverage
through the basic health plan subsidized enrollee pool, even though
employees in the group may not be subsidized enrollees as defined in
RCW 70.47.020(4).
(5) Premiums due from small employers participating in the plan
under the terms of this section shall be in an amount equal to the cost
charged by the managed health care system to the state for the plan
plus the administrative cost of providing the plan to the small
employer less the amount of subsidy paid by the plan for employees
enrolled as subsidized enrollees.

--- END ---