BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.16.110 and 2002 c 111 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall issue the appropriate license to any
applicant who meets the requirements as outlined in this chapter.
(2) Failure to renew a license ((before)) by its expiration date
subjects the holder to a penalty fee and payment of each year's renewal
fee, at the current rate. A person whose license has not been renewed
within one year after its expiration date ((shall have the license
canceled and)) shall be required to submit an application, pay the
license fee for the current year, pay a penalty fee equal to a year's
license fee, and meet current licensing requirements((, and pass any
applicable examination or examinations,)) in addition to the other
requirements of this chapter, before the license may be reinstated.
(3) Upon request and payment of an additional fee to be established
by rule by the director, the director shall issue a duplicate license
to an applicant.

--- END ---