BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.52.132 and 1965 ex.s. c 63 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Where the department, the board or the court, pursuant to RCW
51.52.120 or 51.52.130 fixes the attorney's fee, it shall be unlawful
for)) (1) An attorney ((to)) engaged in the representation of any
worker or beneficiary may charge or receive ((any)) a fee ((in excess
of that)) for services rendered in connection with securing benefits
under this title that is twenty percent of the compensation awarded
under chapter 51.32 RCW; or the amount fixed by the department, board,
or the court under RCW 51.52.120; whichever is less. This fee
requirement shall apply regardless of the number of forums in which the
attorney has represented the worker or beneficiary.
(2) The department shall notify any worker or beneficiary
represented by an attorney that the attorney's fee is restricted as
provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any attorney entitled to a fee under this chapter shall be paid
by the worker or beneficiary but only after the worker or beneficiary
has received the total compensation to which he or she is entitled
under chapter 51.32 RCW.
(4) Any person who violates any provision of this section ((shall
be)):
(a) Is guilty of a misdemeanor; and
(b) From the date of conviction under (a) of this subsection, may
not engage in the representation for a fee of a worker or beneficiary
in connection with securing benefits under this title.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.52.120 and 2003 c 53 s 285 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((It shall be unlawful for an attorney engaged in the
representation of any worker or beneficiary to charge for services in
the department any fee in excess of a reasonable fee, of not more than
thirty percent of the increase in the award secured by the attorney's
services. Such reasonable fee shall be fixed by)) For services
rendered before the department in connection with securing benefits
under this title, the director or the director's designee shall fix a
reasonable fee, subject to RCW 51.52.132, for services performed by an
attorney for ((such)) a worker or beneficiary, but only if ((written
application therefor is made by the attorney, worker, or beneficiary))
the attorney, worker, or beneficiary applies in writing within one year
from the date the final decision and order of the department is
communicated to the party making the application.
(2)(a) If, on appeal to the board, the order, decision, or award of
the department is reversed or modified and additional relief is granted
to a worker or beneficiary, or in cases where a party other than the
worker or beneficiary is the appealing party and the worker's or
beneficiary's right to relief is sustained by the board, the board
shall fix a reasonable fee, subject to RCW 51.52.132, for the services
of ((his or her)) the worker's or beneficiary's attorney in proceedings
before the board but only if ((written application therefor is made by
the attorney, worker, or beneficiary)) the attorney, worker, or
beneficiary applies in writing within one year from the date the final
decision and order of the board is communicated to the party making the
application.
(b) In fixing the ((amount of such attorney's)) fee, the board
shall take into consideration the fee ((allowed)), if any, fixed by the
director or the director's designee, for the attorney's services before
the department, and the board may review the fee fixed by the director
or the director's designee.
(3)(a) If, on appeal to the superior or appellate court from the
decision and order of the board, the decision and order is reversed or
modified and additional relief is granted to a worker or beneficiary,
or in cases where a party other than the worker or beneficiary is the
appealing party and the worker's or beneficiary's right to relief is
sustained, the court shall fix a reasonable fee, subject to RCW
51.52.132, for the services before the court of the worker's or
beneficiary's attorney.
(b) In fixing the fee, the court shall take into consideration the
fee or fees, if any, fixed by the director or the director's designee
or the board for the attorney's services before the department and the
board under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Any attorney's fee ((set)) fixed by the ((department)) director
or the director's designee or the board may be reviewed by the superior
court upon application of such attorney, worker, or beneficiary. The
department or self-insured employer, as the case may be, shall be
served a copy of the application and shall be entitled to appear and
take part in the proceedings. ((Where the board, pursuant to this
section, fixes the attorney's fee, it shall be unlawful for an attorney
to charge or receive any fee for services before the board in excess of
that fee fixed by the board.
(3) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.))

Sec. 3 RCW 51.52.130 and 1993 c 122 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((If, on appeal to the superior or appellate court from the
decision and order of the board, said decision and order is reversed or
modified and additional relief is granted to a worker or beneficiary,
or in cases where a party other than the worker or beneficiary is the
appealing party and the worker's or beneficiary's right to relief is
sustained, a reasonable fee for the services of the worker's or
beneficiary's attorney shall be fixed by the court. In fixing the fee
the court shall take into consideration the fee or fees, if any, fixed
by the director and the board for such attorney's services before the
department and the board. If the court finds that the fee fixed by the
director or by the board is inadequate for services performed before
the department or board, or if the director or the board has fixed no
fee for such services, then the court shall fix a fee for the
attorney's services before the department, or the board, as the case
may be, in addition to the fee fixed for the services in the court.))
If, in a worker or beneficiary appeal to the superior or appellate
court from the decision and order of the board, the decision and order
of the board is reversed or modified and if the accident fund or
medical aid fund is affected by the litigation, or if in an appeal by
the department or employer the worker or beneficiary's right to relief
is sustained, or in an appeal by a worker involving a state fund
employer with twenty-five employees or less, in which the department
does not appear and defend, and the board order in favor of the
employer is sustained, the attorney's fee permitted under RCW 51.52.132
and fixed by the court under RCW 51.52.120, for services before the
court only, and the fees of medical and other witnesses and the costs
shall be payable out of the administrative fund of the department. In
the case of self-insured employers, the attorney's fee((s)) permitted
under RCW 51.52.132 and fixed by the court under RCW 51.52.120, for
services before the court only, and the fees of medical and other
witnesses and the costs shall be payable directly by the self-insured
employer.

--- END ---