BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.52 RCW
to read as follows:
When a provider files with the board an appeal from an order
terminating the provider's authority to provide services related to the
treatment of industrially injured workers, the department may petition
the board for an order immediately suspending the provider's
eligibility to participate as a provider of services to industrially
injured workers under this title pending the final disposition of the
appeal by the board. The board shall grant the petition if it
determines that there is good cause to believe that workers covered
under this title may suffer serious physical or mental harm if the
petition is not granted. The board shall expedite the hearing of the
department's petition under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.36.110 and 1994 c 154 s 312 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of the department of labor and industries or the
director's authorized representative shall have the authority to:
(((1))) (a) Conduct audits and investigations of providers of
medical, chiropractic, dental, vocational, and other health services
furnished to industrially injured workers pursuant to Title 51 RCW to
determine whether providers are: (i) Complying with this title and the
rules adopted under this title; (ii) engaging in overutilization; (iii)
engaging in improper billing practices; and (iv) adhering to practice
parameters and protocols of treatment established under this title. In
the conduct of such audits or investigations, the director or the
director's authorized representatives may examine all records, or
portions thereof, including patient records, for which services were
rendered by a health services provider and reimbursed by the
department, notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute which
may make or purport to make such records privileged or confidential:
PROVIDED, That no original patient records shall be removed from the
premises of the health services provider, and that the disclosure of
any records or information obtained under authority of this section by
the department of labor and industries is prohibited and constitutes a
violation of RCW 42.52.050, unless such disclosure is directly
connected to the official duties of the department: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the disclosure of patient information as required under
this section shall not subject any physician or other health services
provider to any liability for breach of any confidential relationships
between the provider and the patient: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
director or the director's authorized representative shall destroy all
copies of patient medical records in their possession upon completion
of the audit, investigation, or proceedings;
(((2))) (b) Approve or deny applications to participate as a
provider of services furnished to industrially injured workers pursuant
to Title 51 RCW; and
(((3))) (c) Terminate or suspend eligibility to participate as a
provider of services furnished to industrially injured workers pursuant
to Title 51 RCW.
(2)(a) If the department finds that a health services provider has
improperly billed, overutilized, or failed to comply with rules adopted
under this title, including but not limited to practice parameters and
protocols established under this title, it must notify the provider of
its findings and may determine that the health services provider must
repay, or may not receive payment from the department or self-insured
employer, as the case may be. The department may impose penalties as
provided in RCW 51.48.080.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "overutilization" means
establishing a pattern of providing an inappropriate health service or
level of service to injured workers, including but not limited to
providing treatment in excess of established practice parameters and
protocols of treatment established under this title.

--- END ---