BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.04.130 and 2003 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, whenever
any public service company shall file with the commission any schedule,
classification, rule, or regulation, the effect of which is to change
any rate, charge, rental, or toll theretofore charged, the commission
shall have power, either upon its own motion or upon complaint, upon
notice, to enter upon a hearing concerning such proposed change and the
reasonableness and justness thereof. Pending such hearing and the
decision thereon, the commission may suspend the operation of such
rate, charge, rental, or toll for a period not exceeding ten months
from the time the same would otherwise go into effect. After a full
hearing, the commission may make such order in reference thereto as
would be provided in a hearing initiated after the same had become
effective.
(2)(a) The commission shall not suspend a tariff that makes a
decrease in a rate, charge, rental, or toll filed by a
telecommunications company pending investigation of the fairness,
justness, and reasonableness of the decrease when the filing does not
contain any offsetting increase to another rate, charge, rental, or
toll and the filing company agrees to not file for an increase to any
rate, charge, rental, or toll to recover the revenue deficit that
results from the decrease for a period of one year.
(i) The filing company shall file with any decrease sufficient
information as the commission by rule may require to demonstrate the
decreased rate, charge, rental, or toll is above the long run
incremental cost of the service. A tariff decrease that results in a
rate that is below long run incremental cost, or is contrary to
commission rule or order, or the requirements of this chapter, shall be
rejected for filing and returned to the company.
(ii) The commission may prescribe a different rate to be effective
on the prospective date stated in its final order after its
investigation, if it concludes based on the record that the originally
filed and effective rate is unjust, unfair, or unreasonable.
(b) The commission shall not suspend a promotional tariff. For the
purposes of this section, "promotional tariff" means a tariff that, for
a period of up to ninety days, waives or reduces charges or conditions
of service for existing or new subscribers for the purpose of retaining
or increasing the number of customers who subscribe to or use a
service.
(3) The commission may suspend the initial tariff filing of any
water company removed from and later subject to commission jurisdiction
because of the number of customers or the average annual gross revenue
per customer provisions of RCW 80.04.010. The commission may allow
temporary rates during the suspension period. These rates shall not
exceed the rates charged when the company was last regulated. Upon a
showing of good cause by the company, the commission may establish a
different level of temporary rates.
(4) At any hearing involving any change in any schedule,
classification, rule, or regulation the effect of which is to increase
any rate, charge, rental, or toll theretofore charged, the burden of
proof to show that such increase is just and reasonable shall be upon
the public service company.
(5) The implementation of mandatory local measured
telecommunications service is a major policy change in available
telecommunications service. The commission shall not accept for filing
a price list, nor shall it accept for filing or approve, prior to June
1, ((2004)) 2008, a tariff filed by a telecommunications company which
imposes mandatory local measured service on any customer or class of
customers, except that, upon finding that it is in the public interest,
the commission may accept for filing a price list or it may accept for
filing and approve a tariff that imposes mandatory measured service for
a telecommunications company's extended area service or foreign
exchange service. This subsection does not apply to land, air, or
marine mobile service, or to pay telephone service, or to any service
which has been traditionally offered on a measured service basis.
(6) The implementation of Washington telephone assistance program
service is a major policy change in available telecommunications
service. The implementation of Washington telephone assistance program
service will aid in achieving the stated goal of universal telephone
service.
(7) If a utility claims a sales or use tax exemption on the
pollution control equipment for an electrical generation facility and
abandons the generation facility before the pollution control equipment
is fully depreciated, any tariff filing for a rate increase to recover
abandonment costs for the pollution control equipment shall be
considered unjust and unreasonable for the purposes of this section.

--- END ---