BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.410.095 and 1992 c 159 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction may initiate and
conduct investigations as may be reasonably necessary to establish the
existence of any alleged violations of or noncompliance with this
chapter or any rules adopted under it. For the purpose of any
investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the superintendent or
any officer designated by the superintendent may administer oaths and
affirmations, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, take
evidence, and require the production of any books, papers,
correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records
that the superintendent deems relevant and material to the inquiry.
(2) If any person fails to obey a subpoena or obeys a subpoena but
refuses to give evidence, any court of competent jurisdiction, upon
application by the superintendent, may issue to that person an order
requiring him or her to appear before the court and to show cause why
he or she should not be compelled to obey the subpoena, and give
evidence material to the matter under investigation. The failure to
obey an order of the court may be punishable as contempt.
(3) Once an investigation has been initiated by the superintendent
of public instruction, the investigation shall be completed regardless
of whether the individual being investigated has resigned his or her
position or allowed his or her teaching certificate to lapse.

--- END ---