BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.060 and 1993 c 501 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A notice of traffic infraction represents a determination that
an infraction has been committed. The determination will be final
unless contested as provided in this chapter.
(2) The form for the notice of traffic infraction shall be
prescribed by rule of the supreme court and shall include the
following:
(a) A statement that the notice represents a determination that a
traffic infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice
and that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided
in this chapter;
(b) A statement that a traffic infraction is a noncriminal offense
for which imprisonment may not be imposed as a sanction; that the
penalty for a traffic infraction may include sanctions against the
person's driver's license including suspension, revocation, or denial;
that the penalty for a traffic infraction related to standing,
stopping, or parking may include nonrenewal of the vehicle license;
(c) A statement of the specific traffic infraction for which the
notice was issued;
(d) A statement of the monetary penalty established for the traffic
infraction, additional mandatory penalties or fees, possible court
costs if a hearing for the purpose of contesting the determination is
held, and possible costs assessed if the court agrees to defer
findings;
(e) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(f) A statement of the procedure and circumstances in which the
court may grant a request for deferred findings and the consequences of
the deferral;
(g) A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination
the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the person may
subpoena witnesses including the officer who issued the notice of
infraction;
(((g))) (h) A statement that at any hearing requested for the
purpose of explaining mitigating circumstances surrounding the
commission of the infraction the person will be deemed to have
committed the infraction and may not subpoena witnesses;
(((h))) (i) A statement that the person must respond to the notice
as provided in this chapter within fifteen days or the person's
driver's license or driving privilege will be suspended by the
department until any penalties imposed pursuant to this chapter have
been satisfied;
(((i))) (j) A statement that failure to appear at a hearing
requested for the purpose of contesting the determination or for the
purpose of explaining mitigating circumstances will result in the
suspension of the person's driver's license or driving privilege, or in
the case of a standing, stopping, or parking violation, refusal of the
department to renew the vehicle license, until any penalties imposed
pursuant to this chapter have been satisfied;
(((j))) (k) A statement, which the person shall sign, that the
person promises to respond to the notice of infraction in one of the
ways provided in this chapter.

--- END ---