BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.05.022 and 2002 c 56 s 302 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature designates ((that portion of state route number 509
that runs or will run from state route number 518 in the north to the
intersection with interstate 5 in the south as a state)) as highways of
statewide significance those highways so designated by transportation
commission resolution number 660 as adopted on January 21, 2004.

--- END ---