BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.49 RCW
to read as follows:
An owner of a vessel that is not registered as required by chapter
88.02 RCW and for which watercraft excise tax is due under this chapter
is liable for a penalty in the following amount:
(1) One hundred dollars for the owner's first violation;
(2) Two hundred dollars for the owner's second violation involving
the same or any other vessel; or
(3) Four hundred dollars for the owner's third and successive
violations involving the same or any other vessel.
The department may collect this penalty under the procedures
established in chapter 82.32 RCW. The penalty imposed under this
section is in addition to any other civil or criminal penalty imposed
by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A marina that leases permanent moorage to vessels must require
the following information from the lessee as a condition of leasing
moorage space:
(a) The name of the legal owner of the vessel;
(b) A local contact person, if different than the owner;
(c) The owner's address and telephone number;
(d) The vessel's hull identification number;
(e) The vessel's Coast Guard registration (if applicable);
(f) The vessel's home port;
(g) The date on which the moorage lease began; and
(h) The vessel's country or state of registration and registration
number.
A marina shall maintain records of this information for at least
two years. The marina shall permit any authorized agent of the
department of revenue to inspect these records upon request.
(2) A marina that leases permanent moorage to vessels must require
proof of vessel registration or a written statement of intent to
register a vessel as a condition of leasing moorage space. If the
applicant's vessel is not registered in this state, the marina must
inform the moorage applicant of the state law requiring vessel
registration and direct the moorage applicant to the appropriate vessel
registration forms. After this, it is the moorage applicant's
responsibility to register the vessel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act applies to any
violation that occurs on or after the effective date of this act.
Section 2 of this act applies to any lease of permanent moorage that
continues in effect beyond or is entered into, renewed, or extended on
or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---