BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.220
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall include information
on motorcycle awareness, approved by the Motorcycle Safety Foundation,
in instructional material used in traffic safety education courses, to
ensure new operators of motor vehicles have been instructed in the
importance of safely sharing the road with motorcyclists.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.82.420 and 1991 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The advisory committee shall compile and furnish to each qualifying
applicant for an instructor's license or a driver training school
license a basic minimum required curriculum. The basic minimum
required curriculum shall also include (1) information on the effects
of alcohol and drug use on motor vehicle operators, including
information on drug and alcohol related traffic injury and mortality
rates in the state of Washington((, and)); (2) current penalties for
driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol; and (3) information on
motorcycle awareness, approved by the Motorcycle Safety Foundation, to
ensure new operators of motor vehicles have been instructed in the
importance of safely sharing the road with motorcyclists. Should the
director be presented with acceptable proof that any licensed
instructor or driver training school is not showing proper diligence in
teaching such basic minimum curriculum as required, the instructor or
school shall be required to appear before the advisory committee and
show cause why the license of the instructor or school should not be
revoked for such negligence. If the committee does not accept such
reasons as may be offered, the director may revoke the license of the
instructor or school, or both.

--- END ---