BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.08 RCW
to read as follows:
For all paid or volunteer fire fighters, hired or appointed after
the effective date of this act, that may, in the course of their work
or volunteer activity for a city or town, have access to the home or
property of another person, cities and towns shall require a record
check through the Washington state patrol criminal identification
system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050
and through the federal bureau of investigation before hiring an
employee or accepting a volunteer. The record check shall include a
fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. The requesting entity shall provide
a copy of the record report to the applicant or volunteer. When
necessary, as determined by the city or town, applicants and volunteers
may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of the
investigation. If the applicant has had a record check within the
previous twelve months, the city or town may waive the requirement upon
receiving a copy of the record from the applicant or volunteer. The
city or town may in its discretion require that the applicant or
volunteer pay the costs associated with the record check.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 52.30 RCW
to read as follows:
For all employees or volunteers, hired or appointed after the
effective date of this act, that may, in the course of their work or
volunteer activity with the district, have access to the home or
property of another person, fire protection districts shall require a
record check through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030,
and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of investigation before
hiring an employee or accepting a volunteer. The record check shall
include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. The requesting entity shall provide
a copy of the record report to the applicant or volunteer. When
necessary, as determined by the fire protection district, applicants
and volunteers may be employed on a conditional basis pending
completion of the investigation. If the applicant has had a record
check within the previous twelve months, the fire protection district
may waive the requirement upon receiving a copy of the record from the
applicant or volunteer. The fire protection district may in its
discretion require that the applicant or volunteer pay the costs
associated with the record check.

--- END ---