BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state intends to improve the response of
state, local, and private entities to incidents of trafficking of
humans in order to provide better investigations and prosecutions of
such acts and to establish a coordinated and humane system of
identifying the needs of persons who are victimized by human
trafficking in order to deliver appropriate services in a way that
promotes safety and dignity. The legislature recognizes there are many
state agencies and private organizations that might be called on to
provide services to victims of trafficking of humans and that such
victims would be better served if protocols are developed for training
of service delivery agencies staff and the delivery of services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2004, the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development, or the director's designee, shall
within existing resources convene and chair a work group to develop
written protocols for delivery of services to victims of trafficking of
humans. The director shall invite appropriate federal agencies to
consult with the work group for the purpose of developing protocols
that, to the extent possible, are in concert with federal statutes,
regulations, and policies. In addition to the director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the following
shall be members of the work group: The secretary of the department of
health, the secretary of the department of social and health services,
the attorney general, the director of the department of labor and
industries, the commissioner of the employment security department, a
representative of the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys,
the chief of the Washington state patrol, two members selected by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and five members,
selected by the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development from a list submitted by public and private sector
organizations that provide assistance to persons who are victims of
trafficking. The attorney general, the chief of the Washington state
patrol, and the secretaries or directors may designate a person to
serve in their place.
Members of the work group shall serve without compensation.
(2) The protocols must meet all of the following minimum standards:
(a) The protocols must apply to the following state agencies: The
department of community, trade, and economic development, the
department of health, the department of social and health services, the
attorney general's office, the Washington state patrol, the department
of labor and industries, and the employment security department;
(b) The protocols must provide policies and procedures for
interagency coordinated operations and cooperation with government
agencies and nongovernmental organizations, agencies, and
jurisdictions, including law enforcement agencies and prosecuting
attorneys;
(c) The protocols must include the establishment of a data base
electronically available to all affected agencies which contains the
name, address, and telephone numbers of agencies that provide services
to victims of human trafficking; and
(d) The protocols must provide guidelines for providing for the
social service needs of victims of trafficking of humans, including
housing, health care, and employment.
(3) By January 1, 2005, the work group shall finalize the written
protocols and submit them with a report to the legislature and the
governor.
(4) The protocols shall be reviewed on a biennial basis by the work
group to determine whether revisions are appropriate. The director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development, or the
director's designee, shall within existing resources reconvene and
chair the work group for this purpose.

--- END ---