BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that human
trafficking is growing to epidemic proportions and that our state is
impacted. Reliable reports estimate that tens of thousands of humans
are trafficked into the United States annually. Human trafficking is
one of the greatest threats to human dignity. It is the
commodification of human beings. United States Attorney General John
Ashcroft has said: "Sex trafficking is more than just a serious
violation of the law. It is an affront to human dignity; it is an
assault on human values."
Victims of human trafficking are often in need of services such as
emergency medical attention, food and shelter, vocational and English
language training, mental health counseling, and legal support. A
variety of public and private agencies and organizations, and many
individuals are making great efforts in the state of Washington to
fight human trafficking or to provide services to victims of human
trafficking.
Washington is, and must continue to be, a national leader at the
state level in the fight against human trafficking. Such leadership
extends beyond government efforts and laws and is grounded in efforts
of highly dedicated individuals and community-based groups to combat,
and mitigate the adverse consequences of, human trafficking. Indeed,
without these efforts the struggle against human trafficking will be
very difficult to win. The legislature, therefore, finds that such
efforts merit regular public recognition and appreciation. Such
recognition and appreciation will encourage the efforts of all persons
and groups to end human trafficking within our state as well as
providing the public with information and education about the necessity
of its involvement in this struggle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is created an award to honor and recognize individuals
and groups, public or private, who have made noteworthy efforts to
fight human trafficking or to provide services to the victims of human
trafficking.
(2) The governor, in conjunction with the director, shall identify
and honor up to two individuals or groups, public or private, in
Washington state who have made noteworthy efforts to fight human
trafficking or to provide services to the victims of human trafficking.
The award shall be given annually, commencing September 2004,
consistent with the availability of qualified nominees. The director
shall appoint a broad-based advisory committee that includes community
advocacy and other organizations and agencies serving trafficking
victims, immigrants, and others affected by trafficking.

--- END ---