BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall adopt rules, under RCW 41.06.400(2)(b),
developing policies, procedures, and mandatory training programs on
sexual harassment for all state employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---