BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.200
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Private, parochial, and home-based instruction students are
entitled to all the benefits of the certificate of mastery upon
successfully passing the standardized test or an academic knowledge-based objective test selected by the private or parochial school or the
parent of the home-based instruction student if the test meets the
requirement of RCW 28A.200.010(3) in effect on July 25, 1993.
(2) Private, parochial, and home-based instruction students shall
not be denied equal access or opportunities to any benefit or benefits
provided by the certificate of mastery obtained in the public schools
of this state.
(3) Discrimination in equal access and opportunity against students
who receive private, parochial, or home-based instruction is unlawful.

--- END ---