BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.007 and 2003 c 111 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this title:
(1) "Ballot" means, as the context implies, either:
(a) The issues and offices to be voted upon in a jurisdiction or
portion of a jurisdiction at a particular primary, general election, or
special election;
(b) A facsimile of the contents of a particular ballot whether
printed on a paper ballot or ballot card or as part of a voting machine
or voting device;
(c) A physical or electronic record of the choices of an individual
voter in a particular primary, general election, or special election;
((or))
(d) The physical document on which the voter's choices are to be
recorded; or
(e) The set of ballots given to each voter in a primary election
that includes the nonpartisan ballot, if prepared, and all party
ballots;
(2) "Paper ballot" means a piece of paper on which the ballot for
a particular election or primary has been printed, on which a voter may
record his or her choices for any candidate or for or against any
measure, and that is to be tabulated manually;
(3) "Ballot card" means any type of card or piece of paper of any
size on which a voter may record his or her choices for any candidate
and for or against any measure and that is to be tabulated on a vote
tallying system;
(4) "Sample ballot" means a printed facsimile of all the issues and
offices on the ballot in a jurisdiction and is intended to give voters
notice of the issues, offices, and candidates that are to be voted on
at a particular primary, general election, or special election;
(5) "Provisional ballot" means a ballot issued to a voter at the
polling place on election day by the precinct election board, for one
of the following reasons:
(a) The voter's name does not appear in the poll book;
(b) There is an indication in the poll book that the voter has
requested an absentee ballot, but the voter wishes to vote at the
polling place;
(c) There is a question on the part of the voter concerning the
issues or candidates on which the voter is qualified to vote.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Each major political party shall nominate
its candidates for public office, except for presidential electors by
a primary election as provided in this chapter.
A minor political party may qualify to nominate its candidates by
primary election by presenting a petition, in a form prescribed by the
secretary of state, requesting the primary election and signed by the
lesser of a number of registered voters equal to five percent or more
of the total votes cast for the successful candidate for governor at
the last general election, or a total of five thousand registered
voters. The total must include registered voters equal to five percent
or more of the total votes cast for the successful candidate for
governor at the last general election from more than one-third of the
legislative districts, or one hundred fifty registered voters from
those districts, whichever is less.
The petition must be presented to the county auditor in which the
signatures were gathered. The county auditor shall check the petition
and canvass the signatures on the petition to determine if the
requirements of this section have been met. Once the determination has
been made, the county auditor shall forward the verified petition to
the secretary of state. The petition must be submitted to the county
auditor by the close of business on the last day for candidates to file
for office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In all partisan primary elections, separate
ballots must be prepared for each political party entitled to
participate. The name of the political party must appear at the top of
the separate ballot for that party and need not appear opposite each
candidate's name.
The separate ballots for each political party must have the same
appearance. Each set of party ballots must bear the same number.
A primary ballot for a political party need not be prepared if the
party does not have candidates for more than half of the offices to
appear on the ballot; and no more than one candidate files for
nomination by that party for any of the offices to appear on the
ballot. If a primary ballot for a political party is not prepared, the
secretary of state shall certify that a primary election is unnecessary
for that party and shall instruct the county auditor to certify the
names of the candidates for that party for the general election ballot
only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Nonpartisan offices and ballot issues to be
voted on at a primary election must either be prepared on separate
ballots or appear on the same ballot as partisan offices if:
(1) Each section is clearly identified as separate; and
(2) The nonpartisan offices and ballot issues appear on each
political party ballot.
If prepared as a separate ballot, the nonpartisan ballot must have
a different appearance than the party ballots but must be numbered in
the same order as the party ballots.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 At the primary election, each voter shall
receive a set of ballots that includes the nonpartisan and issue
ballot, if prepared, and all party ballots. The voter shall cast votes
on the nonpartisan ballot and only one of the party ballots. After
casting votes the voter shall either: (1) Remove the numbered stub
from the nonpartisan and voted party ballots, place the ballots in the
ballot box, and return the number and all nonvoted party ballots to the
precinct election officers; or (2) deliver the entire set of ballots to
the precinct election officers, who shall remove the numbered stub from
the nonpartisan and party ballot and place the ballots in the ballot
box. All nonvoted party ballots shall be placed in a separate ballot
box.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Except as otherwise provided in this
section, election officers at the primary election shall prepare for a
count of votes cast on paper ballots in the manner prescribed in
chapter 29A.60 RCW.
In preparing for a count of paper ballots, the election officers
shall:
(1) Separate the ballots for each political party and count each
party's ballots separately;
(2) Reconcile the total number of party ballots and the separate
total number of other ballots used at the election with the number of
electors voting;
(3) List each party's candidates separately in the tally books; and
(4) Bundle the voted ballots for each party separately for return
to the election officer. The unvoted ballots must be bundled in
accordance with rules established pursuant to RCW 29A.04.610.
The election officers shall prepare for the counting of primary
nonpaper ballots in the manner prescribed under rules adopted pursuant
to RCW 29A.04.610.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.36.120 and 2003 c 111 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The positions or offices on a primary ballot shall be arranged
in substantially the following order: United States senator; United
States representative; governor; lieutenant governor; secretary of
state; state treasurer; state auditor; attorney general; commissioner
of public lands; superintendent of public instruction; insurance
commissioner; state senator; state representative; county officers;
justices of the supreme court; judges of the court of appeals; judges
of the superior court; and judges of the district court. For all other
jurisdictions on the primary ballot, the offices in each jurisdiction
shall be grouped together and be in the order of the position numbers
assigned to those offices, if any.
(2) The order of the positions or offices on an election ballot
shall be substantially the same as on a primary ballot except that the
offices of president and vice president of the United States shall
precede all other offices on a presidential election ballot. State
ballot issues shall be placed before all offices on an election ballot.
The positions on a ballot to be assigned to ballot measures regarding
local units of government shall be established by the secretary of
state by rule.
(3) The political party or independent candidacy of each candidate
for partisan office shall be indicated next to the name of the
candidate on the ((primary and)) election ballot. A candidate shall
file a written notice with the filing officer within three business
days after the close of the filing period designating the political
party to be indicated next to the candidate's name on the ballot if
either: (a) The candidate has been nominated by two or more minor
political parties or independent conventions; or (b) the candidate has
both filed a declaration of candidacy declaring an affiliation with a
major political party and been nominated by a minor political party or
independent convention. If no written notice is filed the filing
officer shall give effect to the party designation shown upon the first
document filed. A candidate may be deemed nominated by a minor party
or independent convention only if all documentation required by chapter
29A.20 RCW has been timely filed.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.12.080 and 2003 c 111 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
No voting device shall be approved by the secretary of state unless
it:
(1) Secures to the voter secrecy in the act of voting;
(2) Permits the voter to vote at any general or special election
for any person for any office and upon any measure that he or she has
the right to vote for;
(3) Permits the voter to vote at any general or special election
for all the candidates of one party or in part for the candidates of
one or more other parties;
(4) Correctly registers all votes cast for any and all persons and
for or against any and all measures;
(5) Provides that a vote for more than one candidate cannot be cast
by one single operation of the voting device or vote tally system
except when voting for president and vice president of the United
States; and
(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested, certified, and used in at least one other state or
election jurisdiction.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.20.200 and 2003 c 111 s 514 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not later than the Friday immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file, the secretary of state shall notify the county
auditors of the names and designations of all minor party and
independent candidates who have filed valid convention certificates and
nominating petitions with that office. Except for the offices of
president and vice president, persons nominated under this chapter
shall file declarations of candidacy as provided by RCW 29A.24.030 and
29A.24.070. The name of a candidate nominated at a convention shall
not be printed upon the primary ballot ((unless he or she pays the fee
required by law to be paid by candidates for the same office to be
nominated at a primary)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 29A.52.130 (Blanket primary authorized)
and 2003 c 111 s 1304 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 29A.52 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---