BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is essential
to provide a safe and secure learning environment within the public
schools. While recognizing that cellular or portable phones may be
used for inappropriate activities during school hours and on school
property and may, on occasion, cause disruption in the classroom
environment, the legislature also recognizes that the use of cellular
or portable phones can decrease the response time of officials to
emergency situations. In addition, cellular or portable phones allow
parents an additional and timely method of contacting their children in
the event of an emergency.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.320.135 and 1997 c 266 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
School district boards of directors may adopt policies that limit
the ((possession)) use by a student while in school, on school
property, on public school transportation, or during school-sponsored
activities of (1) paging telecommunication devices by students that
emit audible signals, vibrate, display a message, or otherwise summons
or delivers a communication to the possessor, and (2) portable or
cellular telephones. A school district board of directors shall not
adopt policies and shall amend current policies prohibiting students
from possessing paging telecommunication devices or portable or
cellular phones. However, district policies may be adopted that
prohibit an individual student from possessing a paging
telecommunication device or portable or cellular phone if the student
violates the policies adopted by the board.

--- END ---