BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.04.155 and 2000 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a minor enrolled in any common school is convicted in
adult criminal court, or adjudicated or entered into a diversion
agreement with the juvenile court on any of the following offenses, the
court must notify the principal of the student's school of the
disposition of the case, after first notifying the parent or legal
guardian that such notification will be made:
(a) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) A sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(c) Inhaling toxic fumes under chapter 9.47A RCW;
(d) A controlled substances violation under chapter 69.50 RCW;
(e) A liquor violation under RCW 66.44.270; and
(f) Any crime under chapters 9.41, 9A.36, 9A.40, 9A.46, and 9A.48
RCW.
(2) The principal must provide the information received under
subsection (1) of this section to every teacher of any student who
qualifies under subsection (1) of this section and any other personnel
who, in the judgment of the principal, supervises the student or for
security purposes should be aware of the student's record. The
principal must provide the information to teachers and other personnel
based on any written records that the principal maintains or receives
from a juvenile court administrator or a law enforcement agency
regarding the student.
(3) Any information received by a principal or school personnel
under this section is confidential and may not be further disseminated
except as provided in RCW 28A.225.330, other statutes or case law, and
the family and educational and privacy rights act of 1994, 20 U.S.C.
Sec. 1232g et seq.
(4) Any person or entity who releases or receives the information
under this section in compliance with federal and state law is immune
from civil liability for damages unless it is shown that the school
district or district employee acted with gross negligence or in bad
faith.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.50.160 and 1997 c 266 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Records of disposition for a juvenile offense must be provided to
schools as provided in RCW 13.04.155. A juvenile justice or care
agency, a school district, or an employee or agent or other person who
receives or releases the information in compliance with federal and
state law is immune from civil liability for damages unless it is shown
that the entity or employee acted with gross negligence or in bad
faith.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.600.475 and 1998 c 269 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts may participate in the exchange of information
with law enforcement and juvenile court officials to the extent
permitted by the family educational and privacy rights act of 1974, 20
U.S.C. Sec. 1232g. When directed by court order or pursuant to any
lawfully issued subpoena, a school district shall make student records
and information available to law enforcement officials, probation
officers, court personnel, and others legally entitled to the
information. Except as provided in RCW 13.40.480, parents and students
shall be notified by the school district of all such orders or
subpoenas in advance of compliance with them.
(2) Any school district or district employee who releases or
receives the information or provides notification in compliance with
federal and state law is immune from civil liability for damages unless
it is shown that the school district or district employee acted with
gross negligence or in bad faith.

--- END ---