BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 25.05.125 and 1998 c 103 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4)
of this section, all partners are liable jointly and severally for all
obligations of the partnership unless otherwise agreed by the claimant
or provided by law.
(2) A person admitted as a partner into an existing partnership is
not personally liable for any partnership obligation incurred before
the person's admission as a partner.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section,
an obligation of a partnership incurred while the partnership is a
limited liability partnership, whether arising in contract, tort, or
otherwise, is solely the obligation of the partnership. A partner is
not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution
or otherwise, for such an obligation solely by reason of being or so
acting as a partner. This subsection applies notwithstanding anything
inconsistent in the partnership agreement that existed, in the case of
a limited liability partnership in existence on June 11, 1998, and, in
the case of a partnership becoming a limited liability partnership
after June 11, 1998, immediately before the vote required to become a
limited liability partnership under RCW 25.05.500(1).
(4) If the partners of a limited liability partnership or a foreign
limited liability partnership are required to be licensed to provide
professional services as defined in RCW 18.100.030, and the partnership
fails to maintain for itself and for its members practicing in this
state a policy of professional liability insurance, bond, deposit in
trust, bank escrow of cash, bank certificates of deposit, United States
treasury obligations, bank letter of credit, insurance company bond, or
other evidence of financial responsibility of a kind designated by rule
by the state insurance commissioner and in the amount of at least one
million dollars ((or such greater amount, not to exceed three million
dollars, as the state insurance commissioner may establish by rule for
a licensed profession or for any specialty within a profession, taking
into account the nature and size of the businesses within the
profession or specialty)), then the partners shall be personally liable
to the extent that, had such insurance, bond, deposit in trust, bank
escrow of cash, bank certificates of deposit, United States treasury
obligations, bank letter of credit, insurance company bond, or other
evidence of responsibility been maintained, it would have covered the
liability in question.

--- END ---