BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
convene a study panel composed of four members from the legislature:
Two members of the senate to be appointed by the president of the
senate, including one member of the majority party and one member of
the minority party; and two members of the house of representatives to
be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, including
one member from the majority party and one member from the minority
party. The study group shall invite the participation of the governor.
The study panel shall create an advisory committee of invited
representatives from federally recognized Indian tribes, the Washington
state bar association, the judiciary, adoption agencies and child-placing agencies including state, nonprofit, and those agencies
providing services for domestic or international adoptions, adoptive
parents, and adoptees to participate in the study panel. The study
panel shall solicit comments from the community, study, and report
findings and recommendations regarding the current adoption statutes
and policies related to the following issues: Adoption-related fees;
barriers to adoption; child selling and buying; adoption facilitation,
advertising, and marketing; assisted reproductive technology;
discrimination in adoption based upon ability to pay, race, color, or
national origin of child or parent; background checks; and agency
licensing and credentialing. The study panel shall report its findings
to the legislature by January 1, 2005.

--- END ---