BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The owner of an automated teller machine
may charge an access fee or surcharge to a customer for the use of the
machine.
(2) An agreement to operate or share an automated teller machine
may not prohibit, limit, or restrict the right of the operator of the
automated teller machine from charging a customer with an access fee or
surcharge not otherwise prohibited under state or federal law.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "automated teller machine" is
defined as set forth in RCW 19.174.020(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---