BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.170 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) On or before September 1, 1991, each county, and each city,
shall designate where appropriate:
(a) Agricultural lands that are not already characterized by urban
growth and that have long-term significance for the commercial
production of food or other agricultural products;
(b) Forest lands that are not already characterized by urban growth
and that have long-term significance for the commercial production of
timber;
(c) Mineral resource lands that are not already characterized by
urban growth and that have long-term significance for the extraction of
minerals; and
(d) Critical areas.
(2) In making the designations required by this section, counties
and cities shall consider the guidelines established pursuant to RCW
36.70A.050.
(3) An agricultural resource land designation previously adopted
pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section may be removed, if the
result complies with RCW 36.70A.020(8), 36.70A.060, and 36.70A.177 and
is consistent with guidelines adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.050 and
with the goals, objectives, and implementing policies of the governing
comprehensive plan. To remove an agricultural resource land
designation, a finding must be made that the land does not meet the
requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section. Where there are
adopted criteria for designation of agricultural resource land, the
finding must be based on the adopted criteria.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
For a single parcel or a small isolated area of more than one
parcel of land that is zoned rural and required by regulations adopted
under this chapter to remain in agricultural use but is not designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170, a local government may allow subdivision to
a density that is consistent with the average parcel size of the
surrounding area, if the single parcel or small isolated area of more
than one parcel is surrounded by incompatible residential uses and the
result complies with RCW 36.70A.070(5)(c) and all applicable
subdivision regulations and serves to infill the surrounding higher-density area or resolves conflicts between agricultural use and
surrounding residential use.

--- END ---