BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of labor and industries shall
prepare a report on the use of total employer payroll as the basis for
workers' compensation premiums. The department shall compare the use
of hours worked with the use of total employer payroll and discuss the
positive and negative aspects of each. In preparing this report, the
department shall also review how other states determine workers'
compensation premiums. The report shall be delivered to the
appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2004.

--- END ---