BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.0282 and 1997 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Social card game" as used in this chapter means a card game that
constitutes gambling and is authorized by the commission under RCW
9.46.070. Authorized card games may include a house-banked or a
player-funded banked card game, but in no case may the maximum
allowable wager exceed the amount established by the commission and
effective on January 1, 2004. No one may participate in the card game
or have an interest in the proceeds of the card game who is not a
player or a person licensed by the commission to participate in social
card games. There shall be two or more participants in the card game
who are players or persons licensed by the commission. The card game
must be played in accordance with the rules adopted by the commission
under RCW 9.46.070, which shall include but not be limited to rules for
the collection of fees, limitation of wagers, and management of player
funds. The number of tables authorized shall be set by the commission
but shall not exceed a total of fifteen separate tables per
establishment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---