BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.42.055 and 1987 c 476 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this section is to prohibit discrimination
against medicaid recipients by nursing homes which have contracted with
the department to provide skilled or intermediate nursing care services
to medicaid recipients.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any nursing home which has a medicaid
contract with the department:
(a) To require, as a condition of admission, assurance from the
patient or any other person that the patient is not eligible for or
will not apply for medicaid;
(b) To deny or delay admission or readmission of a person to a
nursing home because of his or her status as a medicaid recipient;
(c) To transfer a patient, except from a private room to another
room within the nursing home, because of his or her status as a
medicaid recipient;
(d) To transfer a patient to another nursing home because of his or
her status as a medicaid recipient;
(e) To discharge a patient from a nursing home because of his or
her status as a medicaid recipient; or
(f) To charge any amounts in excess of the medicaid rate from the
date of eligibility, except for any supplementation permitted by the
department pursuant to RCW 18.51.070.
(3) Any nursing home which has a medicaid contract with the
department shall maintain one list of names of persons seeking
admission to the facility, which is ordered by the date of request for
admission. This information shall be retained for one year from the
month admission was requested. However, a nursing facility is
permitted to give preferential admission to individuals who seek
admission from a boarding home, licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, or
from independent retirement housing, provided the nursing facility is
owned by the same entity that owns the boarding home or independent
housing which are located within the same county; and provided further,
the purpose of such preferential admission is to allow continued
provision of: (a) Culturally or faith-based services, or (b) services
provided by a continuing care retirement community as defined in RCW
70.38.025.
(4) The department may assess monetary penalties of a civil nature,
not to exceed three thousand dollars for each violation of this
section.
(5) Because it is a matter of great public importance to protect
senior citizens who need medicaid services from discriminatory
treatment in obtaining long-term health care, any violation of this
section shall be construed for purposes of the application of the
consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, to constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice or unfair method of competition in the
conduct of trade or commerce.
(6) It is not an act of discrimination under this chapter to refuse
to admit a patient if admitting that patient would prevent the needs of
the other patients residing in that facility from being met at that
facility, or if the facility's refusal is consistent with subsection
(3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---