BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.22.178 and 2002 c 294 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
surcharge of ten dollars per instrument shall be charged by the county
auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any
other charge authorized by law. The ((auditor)) county may retain ((up
to)) five percent of these funds collected ((to administer)) for the
collection, administration, and local distribution of these funds. Of
the remaining funds, forty percent of the revenue generated through
this surcharge will be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer who
will deposit the funds into the Washington housing trust account. The
office of community development of the department of community, trade,
and economic development will develop guidelines for the use of these
funds to support building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to
extremely low-income persons with incomes at or below thirty percent of
the area median income, and that require a supplement to rent income to
cover ongoing operating expenses. Sixty percent of the revenue
generated by this surcharge will be retained by the county and be
deposited into a fund that must be used by the county and its cities
and towns for housing projects or units within housing projects that
are affordable to very low-income persons with incomes at or below
fifty percent of the area median income. The portion of the surcharge
retained by a county shall be allocated to very low-income housing
projects or units within such housing projects in the county and the
cities within a county according to an interlocal agreement between the
county and the cities within the county, consistent with countywide and
local housing needs and policies. ((The funds generated with this
surcharge shall not be used for construction of new housing if at any
time the vacancy rate for available low-income housing within the
county rises above ten percent. The vacancy rate for each county shall
be developed using the state low-income vacancy rate standard developed
under subsection (3) of this section.)) Permissible uses of these
local funds are limited to:
(a) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to very
low-income persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area
median income;
(b) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects ((built with)) eligible to
receive housing trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income
persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median
income, and that require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing
operating expenses;
(c) Rental assistance vouchers, including rental assistance or
vouchers for payment of first and last month's rent and security and
other deposits required of all other new tenants by a landlord, for
housing projects or units within housing projects that are affordable
to very low-income persons with incomes at or below fifty percent of
the area median income, to be administered ((by a local public housing
authority or other local organization that has an existing rental
assistance voucher program,)) consistent with the United States
department of housing and urban development's section 8 rental
assistance voucher program standards; and
(d) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed overnight
youth shelters.
(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.
(((3) The real estate research center at Washington State
University shall develop a vacancy rate standard for low-income housing
in the state as described in RCW 18.85.540(1)(i).))

Sec. 2 RCW 18.85.540 and 2002 c 294 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of a real estate research center in Washington
state is to provide credible research, value-added information,
education services, and project-oriented research to real estate
licensees, real estate consumers, real estate service providers,
institutional customers, public agencies, and communities in Washington
state and the Pacific Northwest region. The center may:
(a) Conduct studies and research on affordable housing and
strategies to meet the affordable housing needs of the state;
(b) Conduct studies in all areas directly or indirectly related to
real estate and urban or rural economics and economically isolated
communities;
(c) Disseminate findings and results of real estate research
conducted at or by the center or elsewhere, using a variety of
dissemination media;
(d) Supply research results and educational expertise to the
Washington state real estate commission to support its regulatory
functions, as requested;
(e) Prepare information of interest to real estate consumers and
make the information available to the general public, universities, or
colleges, and appropriate state agencies;
(f) Encourage economic growth and development within the state of
Washington;
(g) Support the professional development and continuing education
of real estate licensees in Washington; and
(h) Study and recommend changes in state statutes relating to real
estate((; and
(i) Develop a vacancy rate standard for low-income housing in the
state)).
(2) The director shall establish a memorandum of understanding with
an institution of higher learning that establishes a real estate
research center for the purposes under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section expires September 30, 2005.

--- END ---