BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.136.030 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 41 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The joint legislative ((budget)) audit and review committee
shall review each tax preference for termination by the processes
provided in this chapter. The review shall be completed and a report
prepared on or before June 30th of the year prior to the date
established for termination. Upon completion of its report, the joint
legislative ((budget)) audit and review committee shall transmit copies
of the report to the department of revenue. The department of revenue
may then conduct its own review of the tax preference scheduled for
termination and shall prepare a report on or before September 30th of
the year prior to the date established for termination. Upon
completion of its report the department of revenue shall transmit
copies of its report to the joint legislative ((budget)) audit and
review committee. The joint legislative ((budget)) audit and review
committee shall prepare a final report that includes the reports of
both the department of revenue and the joint legislative ((budget))
audit and review committee. The joint legislative ((budget)) audit and
review committee and the department of revenue shall, upon request,
make available to each other all working papers, studies, and other
documents which relate to reports required under this section. The
joint legislative ((budget)) audit and review committee shall transmit
the final report to all members of the legislature, to the governor,
and to the state library.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall review
all tax preferences in chapter 84.36 RCW that have not been reviewed
under subsection (1) of this section beginning in 2005 and every six
years thereafter. The review shall be completed and a report prepared
on or before June 30th of the year a review is required. Tax
preferences that have been in effect less than two years from June 30th
of the year a review is required do not need to be evaluated. Upon
completion of the report, the committee shall transmit the report to
each member of the legislature. The report shall address the
following:
(a) The persons or organizations whose state tax liabilities are
directly affected;
(b) The additional amount of taxes that state and local governments
would collect if the tax preference is eliminated;
(c) The change in the distribution of property taxes if the tax
preference is eliminated;
(d) The fiscal, societal, and other legislative objectives that
have occurred because of the tax preference;
(e) Expected fiscal, societal, and other legislative objectives if
the tax preference is continued.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.136.040 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 42 are each
amended to read as follows:
In reviewing a tax preference under RCW 43.136.030(1), the joint
legislative ((budget)) audit and review committee shall develop
information needed by the legislature to determine if the tax
preference should be terminated as scheduled, modified, or
reestablished without modification. The joint legislative ((budget))
audit and review committee shall consider, but not be limited to, the
following factors in the review.
(1) The persons or organizations whose state tax liabilities are
directly affected by the tax preference.
(2) Legislative objectives that might provide a justification for
the tax preference.
(3) Evidence that the existence of the tax preference has
contributed to the achievement of any of the objectives identified in
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The extent to which continuation of the tax preference beyond
its scheduled termination date might contribute to any of the
objectives identified in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Fiscal impacts of the tax preference, including past impacts
and expected future impacts if it is not terminated as scheduled.
(6) The extent to which termination of the tax preference would
affect the distribution of liability for payment of state taxes.

--- END ---