BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
A pilot program for a limited number of school districts to
administer retakes of the Washington assessment of student learning is
established.
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop or
contract to develop an electronic version of the Washington assessment
of student learning.
(2) No later than June 15, 2004, the superintendent shall use the
minimum eligibility criteria provided by this section to determine
which school districts will participate in the program.
(3) Interested school districts shall apply no later than May 15,
2004, to the superintendent of public instruction to participate in the
pilot program. To be eligible to participate in the pilot program a
school district shall meet the following minimum requirements:
(a) Demonstrate that the district has a sufficient number of
computers that are appropriate to access the electronic version of the
Washington assessment of student learning for the estimated number of
students who will need to retake the assessment; and
(b) Agree to participate in an evaluation of the pilot program.
(4)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall conduct an
evaluation of the pilot program. At a minimum, the evaluation shall
address the effectiveness of electronic administration of the
Washington assessment of student learning in relation to the current
paper-based administration of the assessment, including the following:
(i) The efficient use of resources;
(ii) The cost of administration;
(iii) The timeliness of getting the student scores back to the
student and to the school district;
(iv) Any security issues; and
(v) Any confidentiality issues.
(b) The evaluation shall include recommendations on whether or not
the use of the electronic version of the Washington assessment of
student learning should be expanded to the entire state.
(c) By December 1, 2007, the superintendent of public instruction
shall provide a report to the house of representatives and senate
education committees regarding the results of the evaluation.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---