BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 To the extent funds are provided, the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide scholarships to be
applied toward all or a portion of the educational expenses incurred by
eligible classroom teachers for obtaining credits or clock hours that
satisfy the continuing education requirements for state professional
licensure. Eligible classroom teachers are first-year classroom
teachers teaching in schools receiving federal Title I funds. The
scholarships shall be awarded to all eligible applicants who apply on
a first-come first-served basis. The amount of the award shall be
prorated in accordance with the number of applicants, if necessary. By
March 30, 2004, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall notify all eligible applicants of the availability of the
scholarships. Interested eligible applicants must submit an
application to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
by April 15, 2004, in order to receive an award. The superintendent of
public instruction must distribute the scholarship funds by May 15,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---