BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 86.12.200 and 1991 c 322 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county legislative authority of any county may adopt a
comprehensive flood control management plan for any drainage basin that
is located wholly or partially within the county. A flood control or
other district organized under Title 85 RCW located within the county
may initiate and conduct the preparation of a comprehensive flood
control management plan with the concurrence of the county legislative
authority.
A comprehensive flood control management plan shall include the
following elements:
(1) Designation of areas that are susceptible to periodic flooding,
from inundation by bodies of water or surface water runoff, or both,
including the river's meander belt or floodway;
(2) Establishment of a comprehensive scheme of flood control
protection and improvements for the areas that are subject to such
periodic flooding, that includes: (a) Determining the need for, and
desirable location of, flood control improvements to protect or
preclude flood damage to structures, works, and improvements, based
upon a cost/benefit ratio between the expense of providing and
maintaining these improvements and the benefits arising from these
improvements; (b) establishing the level of flood protection that each
portion of the system of flood control improvements will be permitted;
(c) identifying alternatives to in-stream flood control work; (d)
identifying areas where flood waters could be directed during a flood
to avoid damage to buildings and other structures; and (e) identifying
sources of revenue that will be sufficient to finance the comprehensive
scheme of flood control protection and improvements;
(3) Establishing land use regulations that preclude the location of
structures, works, or improvements in critical portions of such areas
subject to periodic flooding, including a river's meander belt or
floodway, and permitting only flood-compatible land uses in such areas;
(4) Establishing restrictions on construction activities in areas
subject to periodic floods that require the flood proofing of those
structures that are permitted to be constructed or remodeled; and
(5) Establishing restrictions on land clearing activities and
development practices that exacerbate flood problems by increasing the
flow or accumulation of flood waters, or the intensity of drainage, on
low-lying areas. Land clearing activities do not include forest
practices as defined in chapter 76.09 RCW.
A comprehensive flood control management plan shall be subject to
the minimum requirements for participation in the national flood
insurance program, requirements exceeding the minimum national flood
insurance program that have been adopted by the department of ecology
for a specific flood plain pursuant to RCW 86.16.031, and rules adopted
by the department of ecology pursuant to RCW 86.26.050 relating to
flood plain management activities. When a county plans under chapter
36.70A RCW, it may incorporate the portion of its comprehensive flood
control management plan relating to land use restrictions in its
comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted pursuant to
chapter 36.70A RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 86.12.210 and 1991 c 322 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A comprehensive flood control management plan that includes an area
within which a city or town, or a special district subject to chapter
85.38 RCW, is located shall be developed by the county, or by the
district when the district is developing the plan, with the full
participation of officials from the city, town, or special district,
including conservation districts, and appropriate state and federal
agencies. Where a comprehensive flood control management plan is being
prepared for a river basin that is part of the common boundary between
two counties, the county legislative authority of the county preparing
the plan or the governing body of the district may allow participation
by officials of the adjacently located county.
Following adoption by ((the)) each county, city, ((or)) town, or
special district organized under Title 85 RCW, a comprehensive flood
control management plan shall be binding on each jurisdiction and
special district that is located within an area included in the plan.
If within one hundred twenty days of the county's adoption, a city
((or)), town, or special district does not adopt the comprehensive
flood control management plan, the city ((or)), county, town, or
special district shall request arbitration on the issue or issues in
dispute. If parties cannot agree to the selection of an arbitrator,
the arbitrator shall be selected according to the process described in
RCW 7.04.050. The cost of the arbitrator shall be shared equally by
the participating parties and the arbitrator's decision shall be
binding. Any land use regulations and restrictions on construction
activities contained in a comprehensive flood control management plan
applicable to a city or town shall be minimum standards that the city
or town may exceed. A city ((or)), town, or special district
undertaking flood or storm water control activities consistent with the
comprehensive flood control management plan shall retain authority over
such activities.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.155.020 and 2001 c 131 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.
(2) "Capital facility plan" means a capital facility plan required
by the growth management act under chapter 36.70A RCW or, for local
governments not fully planning under the growth management act, a plan
required by the public works board.
(3) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(4) "Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the public
works assistance account, or money to be received by the public works
assistance account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the
principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to
finance public works projects.
(5) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, special
purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state excluding school districts and port
districts.
(6) "Public works project" means a project of a local government
for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads,
bridges, water systems, ((or)) storm and sanitary sewage systems, flood
hazard reduction systems, and solid waste facilities, including
recycling facilities. A planning project may include the compilation
of biological, hydrological, or other data on a county, drainage basin,
or region necessary to develop a base of information for a capital
facility plan.
(7) "Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial actions
necessary to bring abandoned or closed landfills into compliance with
regulatory requirements and the repair, restoration, and replacement of
existing solid waste transfer, recycling facilities, and landfill
projects limited to the opening of landfill cells that are in existing
and permitted landfills.
(8) "Technical assistance" means training and other services
provided to local governments to: (a) Help such local governments
plan, apply, and qualify for loans and financing guarantees from the
board, and (b) help local governments improve their ability to plan
for, finance, acquire, construct, repair, replace, rehabilitate, and
maintain public facilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 86.26.060 and 1984 c 212 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Grants for flood control maintenance shall be so employed that as
far as possible, funds will be on hand to meet unusual, unforeseeable
and emergent flood conditions. Allocations by the department of
ecology, for emergency purposes, shall in each instance be in amounts
which together with funds provided by local authority, if any, under
reasonable exercise of its emergency powers, shall be adequate for the
preservation of life and property, and with due regard to similar needs
elsewhere in the state. For fiscal years 2005 through and including
2009, the department of ecology shall place a priority upon funding
flood control maintenance by special purpose districts that have
experienced significant increases in maintenance costs from increased
flood water runoff due to increasing urbanization and land use
development in the drainage basin in which the district's facilities
are located. This priority applies to those funds not set aside by the
department of ecology to meet unusual, unforeseeable, and emergent
flood conditions.

--- END ---