BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts received from the department
of social and health services for the specific purpose of providing
division of developmental disabilities contracted and certified
nonfacility based residential services to a person with a developmental
disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

--- END ---