BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW
to read as follows:
After the effective date of this act, a city may designate a new
manufactured housing community as a nonconforming use, but may not
order the removal or phased elimination of an existing manufactured
housing community because of its status as a nonconforming use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW
to read as follows:
After the effective date of this act, a code city may designate a
manufactured housing community as a nonconforming use, but may not
order the removal or phased elimination of an existing manufactured
housing community because of its status as a nonconforming use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
After the effective date of this act, a county may designate a
manufactured housing community as a nonconforming use, but may not
order the removal or phased elimination of an existing manufactured
housing community because of its status as a nonconforming use.

--- END ---