BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
Manufactured housing communities, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, are
attached, multifamily housing units for the purpose of imposing impact
fees under this chapter.

--- END ---