BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that quantities of
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, and phenylpropanolamine continue to be sold
at the wholesale and retail levels far in excess of legitimate consumer
needs. The excess quantities being sold are most likely used in the
criminal manufacture of methamphetamine. It is therefore necessary for
the legislature to further regulate the sales of these drugs, including
sales from out-of-state sources, in order to reduce the threat that
methamphetamine presents to the people of the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.64.044 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 401 and 1989 c 352
s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A shopkeeper registered as provided in this section may sell
nonprescription drugs, if such drugs are sold in the original package
of the manufacturer.
(2) Every shopkeeper not a licensed pharmacist, desiring to secure
the benefits and privileges of this section, is hereby required to
register as a shopkeeper through the master license system, and he or
she shall pay the fee determined by the secretary for registration, and
on a date to be determined by the secretary thereafter the fee
determined by the secretary for renewal of the registration; and shall
at all times keep said registration or the current renewal thereof
conspicuously exposed in the ((shop)) location to which it applies. In
event such shopkeeper's registration is not renewed by the master
license expiration date, no renewal or new registration shall be issued
except upon payment of the registration renewal fee and the master
license delinquency fee under chapter 19.02 RCW. This registration fee
shall not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled substances.
(3) The registration fees determined by the secretary under
subsection (2) of this section shall not exceed the cost of registering
the shopkeeper.
(4) Any shopkeeper who shall vend or sell, or offer to sell to the
public any such nonprescription drug or preparation without having
registered to do so as provided in this section, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell shall constitute a separate
offense.
(5) A shopkeeper who is not a licensed pharmacy may purchase
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, only from a wholesaler licensed by the
department under RCW 18.64.046 or from a manufacturer licensed by the
department under RCW 18.64.045. The board shall issue a warning to a
shopkeeper who violates this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the
registration of the shopkeeper for a subsequent violation.
(6) A shopkeeper who has purchased ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, in
a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW 69.43.035, is subject to the
following requirements:
(a) The shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
ten percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs in March through October. In November through
February, the shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
twenty percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section, "monthly sales"
means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or revoke
the registration of a shopkeeper who violates this subsection.
(b) The shopkeeper shall maintain inventory records of the receipt
and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing inventory
controls if an auditor or investigator can determine compliance with
(a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and manner required
by the board. The records must be available for inspection by the
board or any law enforcement agency and must be maintained for two
years. The board may suspend or revoke the registration of a
shopkeeper who violates this subsection. For purposes of this
subsection, "disposition" means the return of product to the wholesaler
or distributor.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.64.046 and 2003 c 53 s 133 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of each place of business which sells legend drugs
and nonprescription drugs, or nonprescription drugs at wholesale shall
pay a license fee to be determined by the secretary, and thereafter, on
or before a date to be determined by the secretary as provided in RCW
43.70.250 and 43.70.280, a like fee to be determined by the secretary,
for which the owner shall receive a license of location from the
department, which shall entitle such owner to either sell legend drugs
and nonprescription drugs or nonprescription drugs at wholesale at the
location specified for the period ending on a date to be determined by
the secretary, and each such owner shall at the time of payment of such
fee file with the department, on a blank therefor provided, a
declaration of ownership and location, which declaration of ownership
and location so filed as aforesaid shall be deemed presumptive evidence
of the ownership of such place of business mentioned therein. It shall
be the duty of the owner to notify immediately the department of any
change of location and ownership and to keep the license of location or
the renewal thereof properly exhibited in such place of business.
(2) Failure to conform with this section is a misdemeanor, and each
day that the failure continues is a separate offense.
(3) In event the license fee remains unpaid on the date due, no
renewal or new license shall be issued except upon compliance with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(4) No wholesaler may sell any quantity of drug products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these
products to persons within the state of Washington exceed five percent
of the wholesaler's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs
to persons within the state in March through October. In November
through February, no wholesaler may sell any quantity of drug products
containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers if the total monthly sales of these
products to persons within the state of Washington exceed ten percent
of the wholesaler's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs
to persons within the state. For purposes of this section, monthly
sales means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or
revoke the license of any wholesaler that violates this section.
(5) The board may exempt a wholesaler from the limitations of
subsection (4) of this section if it finds that the wholesaler
distributes nonprescription drugs only through transactions between
divisions, subsidiaries, or related companies when the wholesaler and
the retailer are related by common ownership, and that neither the
wholesaler nor the retailer has a history of suspicious transactions in
precursor drugs as defined in RCW 69.43.035.
(6) The requirements for a license apply to all persons, in
Washington and outside of Washington, who sell both legend drugs and
nonprescription drugs and to those who sell only nonprescription drugs,
at wholesale to pharmacies, practitioners, and shopkeepers in
Washington.
(7) No wholesaler may sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers, to any person in Washington other than a pharmacy licensed
under this chapter, a shopkeeper or itinerant vendor registered under
this chapter, or a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011. A
violation of this subsection is punishable as a class C felony
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, and each sale in violation of this
subsection constitutes a separate offense.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.64.047 and 2003 c 53 s 134 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any itinerant vendor or any peddler of any nonprescription drug
or preparation for the treatment of disease or injury, shall pay a
registration fee determined by the secretary on a date to be determined
by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The
department may issue a registration to such vendor on an approved
application made to the department.
(2) Any itinerant vendor or peddler who shall vend or sell, or
offer to sell to the public any such nonprescription drug or
preparation without having registered to do so as provided in this
section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell
shall constitute a separate offense.
(3) In event the registration fee remains unpaid on the date due,
no renewal or new registration shall be issued except upon compliance
with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. This
registration shall not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled
substances.
(4) An itinerant vendor may purchase ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers only
from a wholesaler licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.046 or
from a manufacturer licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.045.
The board shall issue a warning to an itinerant vendor who violates
this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the registration of the
vendor for a subsequent violation.
(5) An itinerant vendor who has purchased ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, in a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW
69.43.035, is subject to the following requirements:
(a) The itinerant vendor may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
ten percent of the vendor's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs in March through October. In November through
February, the vendor may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
twenty percent of the vendor's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section, "monthly sales"
means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or revoke
the registration of an itinerant vendor who violates this subsection.
(b) The itinerant vendor shall maintain inventory records of the
receipt and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing
inventory controls if an auditor or investigator can determine
compliance with (a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and
manner required by the board. The records must be available for
inspection by the board or any law enforcement agency and must be
maintained for two years. The board may suspend or revoke the
registration of an itinerant vendor who violates this subsection. For
purposes of this subsection, "disposition" means the return of product
to the wholesaler or distributor.

Sec. 5 RCW 69.43.110 and 2001 c 96 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or
itinerant vendor registered with, the department of health under
chapter 18.64 RCW, or an employee thereof, or a practitioner as defined
in RCW 18.64.011, knowingly to sell, transfer, or to otherwise furnish,
in a single transaction:
(a) More than three packages of one or more products that he or she
knows to contain ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine,
their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers; or
(b) A single package of any product that he or she knows to contain
more than three grams of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, or a
combination of any of these substances.
(2) It is unlawful for a person who is not a manufacturer,
wholesaler, pharmacy, practitioner, shopkeeper, or itinerant vendor
licensed by or registered with the department of health under chapter
18.64 RCW to purchase or acquire, in any twenty-four hour period, more
than the quantities of the substances specified in subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to sell or distribute any of the
substances specified in subsection (1) of this section unless the
person is licensed by or registered with the department of health under
chapter 18.64 RCW, or is a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011.
(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 6 RCW 69.43.035 and 2001 c 96 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any manufacturer or wholesaler who sells, transfers, or
otherwise furnishes any substance specified in RCW 69.43.010(1) to any
person in a suspicious transaction shall report the transaction in
writing to the state board of pharmacy.
(2) Any person specified in subsection (1) of this section who does
not submit a report as required by subsection (1) of this section is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "suspicious transaction"
means a sale or transfer to which any of the following applies:
(a) The circumstances of the sale or transfer would lead a
reasonable person to believe that the substance is likely to be used
for the purpose of unlawfully manufacturing a controlled substance
under chapter 69.50 RCW, based on such factors as the amount involved,
the method of payment, the method of delivery, and any past dealings
with any participant in the transaction. The state board of pharmacy
shall adopt by rule criteria for determining whether a transaction is
suspicious, taking into consideration the recommendations in appendix
A of the report to the United States attorney general by the suspicious
orders task force under the federal comprehensive methamphetamine
control act of 1996.
(b) The transaction involves payment for any substance specified in
RCW 69.43.010(1) in cash or money orders in a total amount of more than
two hundred dollars.
(4) The board of pharmacy shall transmit to the department of
revenue a copy of each report of a suspicious transaction that it
receives under this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 69.43.130 and 2001 c 96 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 69.43.110 and 69.43.120 do not apply to:
(1) Pediatric products primarily intended for administration to
children under twelve years of age, according to label instructions,
either: (a) In solid dosage form whose individual dosage units do not
exceed fifteen milligrams of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine; or (b) in liquid form whose recommended dosage,
according to label instructions, does not exceed fifteen milligrams of
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine per five milliliters
of liquid product;
(2) Pediatric liquid products primarily intended for administration
to children under two years of age for which the recommended dosage
does not exceed two milliliters and the total package content does not
exceed one fluid ounce; ((or))
(3) Products that the state board of pharmacy, upon application of
a manufacturer, exempts by rule from RCW 69.43.110 and 69.43.120
because the product has been formulated in such a way as to effectively
prevent the conversion of the active ingredient into methamphetamine,
or its salts or precursors; or
(4) Products, as packaged, that the board of pharmacy, upon
application of a manufacturer, exempts from RCW 69.43.110(1)(b) and
69.43.120 because:
(a) The product meets the federal definition of an ordinary over-the-counter pseudoephedrine product as defined in 21 U.S.C. 802;
(b) The product is a salt, isomer, or salts of isomers of
pseudoephedrine and, as packaged, has a total weight of more than three
grams but the net weight of the pseudoephedrine base is equal to or
less than three grams; and
(c) The board of pharmacy determines that the value to the people
of the state of having the product, as packaged, available for sale to
consumers outweighs the danger, and the product, as packaged, has not
been used in the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---