BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.340 and 1998 c 254 s 1 and 1998 c 116 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) An attendance incentive program is established for all eligible
employees. As used in this section the term "eligible employee" means
any employee of the state, other than eligible employees of the
community and technical colleges and the state board for community and
technical colleges identified in RCW 28B.50.553, and teaching and
research faculty at the state and regional universities and The
Evergreen State College, entitled to accumulate sick leave and for whom
accurate sick leave records have been maintained. No employee may
receive compensation under this section for any portion of sick leave
accumulated at a rate in excess of one day per month. The state and
regional universities and The Evergreen State College shall maintain
complete and accurate sick leave records for all teaching and research
faculty.
(2) In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of
sixty days of sick leave is accrued, and each January thereafter, any
eligible employee may receive remuneration for unused sick leave
accumulated in the previous year at a rate equal to one day's monetary
compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick
leave in excess of sixty days. Sick leave for which compensation has
been received shall be deducted from accrued sick leave at the rate of
four days for every one day's monetary compensation.
(3) At the time of separation from state service due to retirement
or death, an eligible employee or the employee's estate may elect to
receive remuneration at a rate equal to one day's current monetary
compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick
leave. Eligible state employees who separate from state service after
January 1, 2004, and who are at least fifty-five years of age and have
at least ten years of service credit under the public employees'
retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010 may elect to
receive remuneration at the time of separation rather than the time of
retirement.
(4) Remuneration or benefits received under this section shall not
be included for the purpose of computing a retirement allowance under
any public retirement system in this state.
(5) Except as provided in subsections (7) through (9) of this
section for employees not covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, this section
shall be administered, and rules shall be adopted to carry out its
purposes, by the Washington personnel resources board for persons
subject to chapter 41.06 RCW: PROVIDED, That determination of classes
of eligible employees shall be subject to approval by the office of
financial management.
(6) Should the legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits
granted under this section, no affected employee shall be entitled
thereafter to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.
(7) In lieu of remuneration for unused sick leave at retirement as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, an agency head or designee
may with equivalent funds, provide eligible employees with a benefit
plan that provides for reimbursement for medical expenses. This plan
shall be implemented only after consultation with affected groups of
employees. For eligible employees covered by chapter 41.06 RCW,
procedures for the implementation of these plans shall be adopted by
the Washington personnel resources board. For eligible employees
exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and classified employees who have opted
out of coverage of chapter 41.06 RCW as provided in RCW 41.56.201,
implementation procedures shall be adopted by an agency head having
jurisdiction over the employees.
(8) Implementing procedures adopted by the Washington personnel
resources board or agency heads shall require that each medical expense
plan authorized by subsection (7) of this section apply to all eligible
employees in any one of the following groups: (a) Employees in an
agency; (b) employees in a major organizational subdivision of an
agency; (c) employees at a major operating location of an agency; (d)
exempt employees under the jurisdiction of an elected or appointed
Washington state executive; (e) employees of the Washington state
senate; (f) employees of the Washington state house of representatives;
(g) classified employees in a bargaining unit established by the
Washington personnel resources board; or (h) other group of employees
defined by an agency head that is not designed to provide an
individual-employee choice regarding participation in a medical expense
plan. However, medical expense plans for eligible employees in any of
the groups under (a) through (h) of this subsection who are covered by
a collective bargaining agreement shall be implemented only by written
agreement with the bargaining unit's exclusive representative and a
separate medical expense plan may be provided for unrepresented
employees.
(9) Medical expense plans authorized by subsection (7) of this
section must require as a condition of participation in the plan that
employees in the group affected by the plan sign an agreement with the
employer. The agreement must include a provision to hold the employer
harmless should the United States government find that the employer or
the employee is in debt to the United States as a result of the
employee not paying income taxes due on the equivalent funds placed
into the plan, or as a result of the employer not withholding or
deducting a tax, assessment, or other payment on the funds as required
by federal law. The agreement must also include a provision that
requires an eligible employee to forfeit remuneration under subsection
(3) of this section if the employee belongs to a group that has been
designated to participate in the medical expense plan permitted under
this section and the employee refuses to execute the required
agreement.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.04.340 and 2002 c 354 s 227 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An attendance incentive program is established for all eligible
employees. As used in this section the term "eligible employee" means
any employee of the state, other than eligible employees of the
community and technical colleges and the state board for community and
technical colleges identified in RCW 28B.50.553, and teaching and
research faculty at the state and regional universities and The
Evergreen State College, entitled to accumulate sick leave and for whom
accurate sick leave records have been maintained. No employee may
receive compensation under this section for any portion of sick leave
accumulated at a rate in excess of one day per month. The state and
regional universities and The Evergreen State College shall maintain
complete and accurate sick leave records for all teaching and research
faculty.
(2) In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of
sixty days of sick leave is accrued, and each January thereafter, any
eligible employee may receive remuneration for unused sick leave
accumulated in the previous year at a rate equal to one day's monetary
compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick
leave in excess of sixty days. Sick leave for which compensation has
been received shall be deducted from accrued sick leave at the rate of
four days for every one day's monetary compensation.
(3) At the time of separation from state service due to retirement
or death, an eligible employee or the employee's estate may elect to
receive remuneration at a rate equal to one day's current monetary
compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick
leave. Eligible state employees who separate from state service after
January 1, 2004, and who are at least fifty-five years of age and have
at least ten years of service credit under the public employees'
retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010 may elect to
receive remuneration at the time of separation rather than the time of
retirement.
(4) Remuneration or benefits received under this section shall not
be included for the purpose of computing a retirement allowance under
any public retirement system in this state.
(5) Except as provided in subsections (7) through (9) of this
section for employees not covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, this section
shall be administered, and rules shall be adopted to carry out its
purposes, by the director of personnel for persons subject to chapter
41.06 RCW: PROVIDED, That determination of classes of eligible
employees shall be subject to approval by the office of financial
management.
(6) Should the legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits
granted under this section, no affected employee shall be entitled
thereafter to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.
(7) In lieu of remuneration for unused sick leave at retirement as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, an agency head or designee
may with equivalent funds, provide eligible employees with a benefit
plan that provides for reimbursement for medical expenses. This plan
shall be implemented only after consultation with affected groups of
employees. For eligible employees covered by chapter 41.06 RCW,
procedures for the implementation of these plans shall be adopted by
the director of personnel. For eligible employees exempt from chapter
41.06 RCW, and classified employees who have opted out of coverage of
chapter 41.06 RCW as provided in RCW 41.56.201, implementation
procedures shall be adopted by an agency head having jurisdiction over
the employees.
(8) Implementing procedures adopted by the director of personnel or
agency heads shall require that each medical expense plan authorized by
subsection (7) of this section apply to all eligible employees in any
one of the following groups: (a) Employees in an agency; (b) employees
in a major organizational subdivision of an agency; (c) employees at a
major operating location of an agency; (d) exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of an elected or appointed Washington state executive; (e)
employees of the Washington state senate; (f) employees of the
Washington state house of representatives; (g) classified employees in
a bargaining unit established by the director of personnel; or (h)
other group of employees defined by an agency head that is not designed
to provide an individual-employee choice regarding participation in a
medical expense plan. However, medical expense plans for eligible
employees in any of the groups under (a) through (h) of this subsection
who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement shall be
implemented only by written agreement with the bargaining unit's
exclusive representative and a separate medical expense plan may be
provided for unrepresented employees.
(9) Medical expense plans authorized by subsection (7) of this
section must require as a condition of participation in the plan that
employees in the group affected by the plan sign an agreement with the
employer. The agreement must include a provision to hold the employer
harmless should the United States government find that the employer or
the employee is in debt to the United States as a result of the
employee not paying income taxes due on the equivalent funds placed
into the plan, or as a result of the employer not withholding or
deducting a tax, assessment, or other payment on the funds as required
by federal law. The agreement must also include a provision that
requires an eligible employee to forfeit remuneration under subsection
(3) of this section if the employee belongs to a group that has been
designated to participate in the medical expense plan permitted under
this section and the employee refuses to execute the required
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Section 1 of this act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.
(2) Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2004.

--- END ---