BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The horse racing commission may authorize advance deposit
wagering to be conducted by:
(a) A licensed class 1 racing association operating a live horse
racing facility; or
(b) The operator of an advance deposit wagering system accepting
wagers pursuant to an agreement with a licensed class 1 racing
association. The agreement between the operator and the class 1 racing
association must be approved by the commission.
(2) No system of advance deposit wagering located outside of or
within the state of Washington may accept wagers from residents or
other persons located within this state, nor shall residents or other
persons located within this state place wagers through advance deposit
wagering systems, except with a licensed class 1 racing association
authorized to conduct advance deposit wagering, or an operator of an
advance deposit wagering system under an agreement approved by the
commission with a licensed class 1 racing association. Advance deposit
wagering may be accepted for races conducted in the state of Washington
under a class 1 license or races not conducted within the state of
Washington on a schedule approved by the class 1 licensee.
(3) As used in this section, "advance deposit wagering" means a
form of parimutuel wagering in which an individual deposits money in an
account with an entity authorized by the commission to conduct advance
deposit wagering and then the account funds are used to pay for
parimutuel wagers made in person, by telephone, or through
communication by other electronic means.
(4) In order to participate in advance deposit wagering, the holder
of a class 1 racing association license must have conducted at least
one full live racing season. All class 1 racing associations must
complete a live race meet within each succeeding twelve-month period to
maintain eligibility to continue participating in advance deposit
wagering.
(5) When more than one class 1 racing association is participating
in advance deposit wagering the moneys paid to the racing associations
shall be allocated proportionate to the gross amount of all sources of
parimutuel wagering during each twelve-month period derived from the
associations' live race meets. This percentage must be calculated
annually. Revenue derived from advance deposit wagers placed on races
conducted by the class 1 racing association shall all be allocated to
that association.
(6) The commission shall adopt rules regulating advance deposit
wagering.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.16.200 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 10 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A class 1 racing association licensed by the commission to
conduct a race meet may seek approval from the commission to conduct
parimutuel wagering ((on its program)) at a satellite location or
locations within the state of Washington. In order to participate in
parimutuel wagering at a satellite location or locations within the
state of Washington, the holder of a class 1 racing association license
must have conducted at least one full live racing season. All class 1
racing associations must hold a live race meet within each succeeding
twelve-month period to maintain eligibility to continue to participate
in parimutuel wagering at a satellite location or locations. The sale
of parimutuel pools at satellite locations shall be conducted ((only
during the licensee's race meet and)) simultaneous to all parimutuel
wagering activity conducted at the licensee's live racing facility in
the state of Washington. The commission's authority to approve
satellite wagering at a particular location is subject to the following
limitations:
(a) The commission may approve only one satellite location in each
county in the state; however, the commission may grant approval for
more than one licensee to conduct wagering at each satellite location.
A satellite location shall not be operated within twenty driving miles
of any class 1 racing facility. For the purposes of this section,
"driving miles" means miles measured by the most direct route as
determined by the commission; and
(b) A licensee shall not conduct satellite wagering at any
satellite location within sixty driving miles of any other racing
facility conducting a live race meet.
(2) Subject to local zoning and other land use ordinances, the
commission shall be the sole judge of whether approval to conduct
wagering at a satellite location shall be granted.
(3) The licensee shall combine the parimutuel pools of the
satellite location with those of the racing facility for the purpose of
determining odds and computing payoffs. The amount wagered at the
satellite location shall be combined with the amount wagered at the
racing facility for the application of take out formulas and
distribution as provided in RCW 67.16.102, 67.16.105, 67.16.170, and
67.16.175. A satellite extension of the licensee's racing facility
shall be subject to the same application of the rules of racing as the
licensee's racing facility.
(4) Upon written application to the commission, a class 1 racing
association may be authorized to transmit simulcasts of live horse
races conducted at its racetrack to locations outside of the state of
Washington approved by the commission and in accordance with the
interstate horse racing act of 1978 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 to 3007) or
any other applicable laws. The commission may permit parimutuel pools
on the simulcast races to be combined in a common pool. A racing
association that transmits simulcasts of its races to locations outside
this state shall pay at least fifty percent of the fee that it receives
for sale of the simulcast signal to the horsemen's purse account for
its live races after first deducting the actual cost of sending the
signal out of state.
(5) Upon written application to the commission, a class 1 racing
association may be authorized to transmit simulcasts of live horse
races conducted at its racetrack to licensed racing associations
located within the state of Washington and approved by the commission
for the receipt of the simulcasts. The commission shall permit
parimutuel pools on the simulcast races to be combined in a common
pool. The fee for in-state, track-to-track simulcasts shall be five
and one-half percent of the gross parimutuel receipts generated at the
receiving location and payable to the sending racing association. A
racing association that transmits simulcasts of its races to other
licensed racing associations shall pay at least fifty percent of the
fee that it receives for the simulcast signal to the horsemen's purse
account for its live race meet after first deducting the actual cost of
sending the simulcast signal. A racing association that receives races
simulcast from class 1 racing associations within the state shall pay
at least fifty percent of its share of the parimutuel receipts to the
horsemen's purse account for its live race meet after first deducting
the purchase price and the actual direct costs of importing the race.
(6) A class 1 racing association may be allowed to import
simulcasts of horse races from out-of-state racing facilities. With
the prior approval of the commission, the class 1 racing association
may participate in ((an interstate)) a multijurisdictional common pool
and may change its commission and breakage rates to achieve a common
rate with other participants in the common pool.
(a) The class 1 racing association shall make written application
with the commission for permission to import simulcast horse races for
the purpose of parimutuel wagering. Subject to the terms of this
section, the commission is the sole authority in determining whether to
grant approval for an imported simulcast race.
(b) ((A licensed racing association may also be approved to import
one simulcast race of regional or national interest on each live race
day.
(c) The commission may allow simulcast races of regional or
national interest to be sent to satellite locations. The simulcasts
shall be limited to one per day except for Breeder's Cup special events
day.
(d))) When open for parimutuel wagering, a class 1 racing
association which imports simulcast races shall also conduct simulcast
parimutuel wagering within its licensed racing enclosure on all races
simulcast from other class 1 racing associations within the state of
Washington.
(((e) The conduct of parimutuel wagering on imported simulcast
races shall be for not more than fourteen hours during any twenty-four
hour period, for not more than five days per week and only at the live
racing facility of a class 1 racing association.
(f))) (c) On any imported simulcast race, the class 1 racing
association shall pay fifty percent of its share of the parimutuel
receipts to the horsemen's purse account for its live race meet after
first deducting the purchase price of the imported race and the actual
costs of importing and offering the race.
(7) For purposes of this section, a class 1 racing association is
defined as a licensee approved by the commission to conduct during each
twelve-month period at least forty days of live racing. If a live race
day is canceled due to reasons directly attributable to acts of God,
labor disruptions affecting live race days but not directly involving
the licensee or its employees, or other circumstances that the
commission decides are beyond the control of the class 1 racing
association, then the canceled day counts toward the forty-day
requirement. The commission may by rule increase the number of live
racing days required to maintain class 1 racing association status or
make other rules necessary to implement this section.
(8) This section does not establish a new form of gaming in
Washington or allow expanded gaming within the state beyond what has
been previously authorized. Simulcast wagering has been allowed in
Washington before April 19, 1997. Therefore, this section does not
allow gaming of any nature or scope that was prohibited before April
19, 1997. This section is necessary to protect the Washington equine
breeding and racing industries, and in particular those sectors of
these industries that are dependent upon live horse racing. The
purpose of this section is to protect these industries from adverse
economic impacts and to promote fan attendance at class 1 racing
facilities. ((Therefore, imported simulcast race card programs shall
not be disseminated to any location outside the live racing facility of
the class 1 racing association and a class 1 racing association is
strictly prohibited from simulcasting imported race card programs to
any location outside its live racing facility.)) Therefore, a licensed
class 1 racing association may be approved to disseminate imported
simulcast race card programs to locations outside the live racing
facility of the class 1 racing association, provided that the class 1
racing association has conducted at least forty live racing days with
an average on-track handle on the live racing product of a minimum of
one hundred fifty thousand dollars per day during the twelve months
immediately preceding the application date.
(9) A licensee conducting simulcasting under this section shall
place signs in the licensee's gambling establishment under RCW
9.46.071. The informational signs concerning problem and compulsive
gambling must include a toll-free telephone number for problem and
compulsive gamblers and be developed under RCW 9.46.071.
(10) Chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. does not establish a
new form of gaming in Washington or allow expanded gaming within the
state beyond what has been previously authorized. Simulcast wagering
has been allowed in Washington before August 23, 2001. Therefore, this
section does not allow gaming of any nature or scope that was
prohibited before August 23, 2001. Chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp.
sess. is necessary to protect the Washington equine breeding and racing
industries, and in particular those sectors of these industries that
are dependent upon live horse racing. The purpose of chapter 10, Laws
of 2001 1st sp. sess. is to protect these industries from adverse
economic impacts and to promote fan attendance at class 1 racing
facilities. ((Therefore, imported simulcast race card programs shall
not be disseminated to any location outside the live racing facility of
the class 1 racing association and a class 1 racing association is
strictly prohibited from simulcasting imported race card programs to
any location outside its live racing facility.
(11) If a state or federal court makes a finding that the increase
in the number of imported simulcast races that may be authorized under
chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. is an expansion of gaming beyond
that which is now allowed, chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. is
null and void.
(12) If any provision of chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. or
its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. or the application
of the provision to other persons or circumstances is also invalid.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---