BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of health, in cooperation
with the Washington state hospital association, shall oversee a pilot
project to implement and evaluate strategies to reduce the burden on
hospitals, and improve the quality and efficiency, of hospital surveys
or audits.
(2) The pilot project shall also include the state auditor's
office, the department of revenue, the department of social and health
services, the state board of pharmacy, the department of ecology, the
office of the state fire marshal, the department of labor and
industries, local building and fire officials, and the joint commission
on accreditation of health care organizations.
(3) Strategies to be implemented and evaluated by the pilot project
include, but are not limited to, providing notice of survey and audit
visits, consolidation of survey and audit visits, coordination of
separate survey and audit visits, deeming of one agency's visits for
another, using a combined entrance meeting with hospital management,
identifying a standard set of documents to be available for all surveys
and audits, and minimizing duplication of required documents.
(4) The department of health shall report to the legislature by
December 1, 2004, regarding the results of the pilot project and the
strategies identified for adoption on a statewide basis to improve the
regulatory environment for hospitals while assuring the safety and
well-being of patients and full compliance with relevant state and
local laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Agency" means a department of state government created under
RCW 43.17.010 and the office of the state auditor.
(b) "Audit" means an examination of records or financial accounts
to evaluate accuracy and monitor compliance with statutory or
regulatory requirements.
(c) "Hospital" means a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(d) "Survey" means an inspection, examination, or site visit
conducted by an agency to evaluate and monitor the compliance of a
hospital or hospital services or facilities with statutory or
regulatory requirements.
(2) By July 1, 2004, each state agency which conducts hospital
surveys or audits shall post to its agency web site a list of the most
frequent problems identified in its hospital surveys or audits along
with information on how to avoid or address the identified problems,
and a person within the agency that a hospital may contact with
questions or for further assistance.
(3) By July 1, 2004, the department of health, in cooperation with
other state agencies which conduct hospital surveys or audits, shall
develop an instrument, to be provided to every hospital upon completion
of a state survey or audit, which allows the hospital to anonymously
evaluate the survey or audit process in terms of quality, efficacy, and
the extent to which it supported improved patient care and compliance
with state law without placing an unnecessary administrative burden on
the hospital. The evaluation may be returned to the department of
health for distribution to the appropriate agency. The department of
health shall annually compile the evaluations in a report to the
legislature.
(4) Any state agency that provides notice of a hospital survey or
audit must provide such notice to the hospital no less than four weeks
prior to the date of the survey or audit.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.41.080 and 1995 c 369 s 40 are each amended to read
as follows:
Standards for fire protection and the enforcement thereof, with
respect to all hospitals to be licensed hereunder shall be the
responsibility of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection, who shall adopt, after approval by the
department, such recognized standards as may be applicable to hospitals
for the protection of life against the cause and spread of fire and
fire hazards. Such standards shall be consistent with the standards
adopted by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services for
hospitals that care for medicare or medicaid beneficiaries. The
department upon receipt of an application for a license, shall submit
to the director of fire protection in writing, a request for an
inspection, giving the applicant's name and the location of the
premises to be licensed. Upon receipt of such a request, the chief of
the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection,
or his or her deputy, shall make an inspection of the hospital to be
licensed, and if it is found that the premises do not comply with the
required safety standards and fire regulations as adopted pursuant to
this chapter, he or she shall promptly make a written report to the
hospital and to the department listing the corrective actions required
and the time allowed for accomplishing such corrections. The applicant
or licensee shall notify the chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, upon completion of any
corrections required by him or her, and the chief of the Washington
state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or his or her
deputy, shall make a reinspection of such premises. Whenever the
hospital to be licensed meets with the approval of the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, he or
she shall submit to the department a written report approving the
hospital with respect to fire protection, and such report is required
before a full license can be issued. The chief of the Washington state
patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall make or cause to
be made inspections of such hospitals at least once a year.
In cities which have in force a comprehensive building code, the
provisions of which are determined by the chief of the Washington state
patrol, through the director of fire protection, to be equal to the
minimum standards of the code for hospitals adopted by the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, the
chief of the fire department, provided the latter is a paid chief of a
paid fire department, shall make the inspection with the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or
his or her deputy and they shall jointly approve the premises before a
full license can be issued.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.41.120 and 1995 c 282 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall make or cause to be made at least yearly an
inspection of all hospitals. Every inspection of a hospital may
include an inspection of every part of the premises. The department
may make an examination of all phases of the hospital operation
necessary to determine compliance with the law and the standards, rules
and regulations adopted thereunder. Any licensee or applicant desiring
to make alterations or additions to its facilities or to construct new
facilities shall, before commencing such alteration, addition or new
construction, comply with the regulations prescribed by the department.
No hospital licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
shall be required to be inspected or licensed under other state laws or
rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, or local ordinances,
relative to hotels, restaurants, lodging houses, boarding houses,
places of refreshment, nursing homes, maternity homes, or psychiatric
hospitals.
To avoid unnecessary duplication in inspections, the department
shall coordinate with the department of social and health services, the
office of the state fire marshal, and local agencies when inspecting
facilities over which ((both agencies have)) each agency has
jurisdiction, the facilities including but not necessarily being
limited to hospitals with both acute care and skilled nursing or
psychiatric nursing functions. The department shall notify the office
of the state fire marshal and the relevant local agency at least four
weeks prior to any inspection conducted under this section and invite
their attendance at the inspection, and shall provide a copy of its
inspection report to each agency upon completion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall coordinate its hospital construction
review process with other state and local agencies having similar
review responsibilities, including the department of labor and
industries, the office of the state fire marshal, and local building
and fire officials. Inconsistencies or conflicts among the agencies
shall be identified and eliminated. The department shall provide local
agencies with relevant information derived from its construction review
process.
(2) By September 1, 2004, the department shall report to the
legislature regarding its implementation of subsection (1) of this
section.

--- END ---