BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.112.010 and 1991 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Biodiesel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty acids
derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the American
society for testing and materials specification D6751, in effect as of
January 1, 2004.
(2) "Ethanol" means fuel-grade ethanol that meets the requirements
of the American society for testing and materials specification D4806,
"Standard Specification for Denatured Fuel Ethanol for Blending with
Gasolines for Use as Automotive Spark-Ignition Engine Fuel," in effect
as of January 1, 2004.
(3) "Motor fuel" means any liquid product used for the generation
of power in an internal combustion engine used for the propulsion of a
motor vehicle upon the highways of this state. Motor fuels containing
ethanol may be marketed if either (a) the base motor fuel meets the
applicable standards before the addition of the ethanol or (b) the
resultant blend meets the applicable standards after the addition of
the ethanol.
(((2))) (4) "Director" means the director of agriculture.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All diesel fuel sold or offered for sale in the state for use
in internal combustion engines must contain at least two percent
biodiesel fuel by volume, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) The minimum biodiesel fuel content requirement does not apply
to fuel used in the following equipment: (a) Motors located at an
electric generating plant regulated by the nuclear regulatory
commission, unless the commission has approved the use of biodiesel
fuel in motors at electric generating plants under its regulation; or
(b) railroad locomotives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On and after July 1, 2006, and until July 1, 2007, at least
thirty-five percent of all gasoline sold by each distributor for use in
motor vehicles in the state must contain ten percent ethanol by volume.
(2) On and after July 1, 2007, and until July 1, 2008, at least
seventy percent of all gasoline sold by each distributor for use in
motor vehicles in the state must contain ten percent ethanol by volume.
(3) On and after July 1, 2008, at least eighty-five percent of all
gasoline sold by each distributor for use in motor vehicles in the
state must contain ten percent ethanol by volume.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---