BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 By December 1, 2004, the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall provide to the senate
committee on land use and planning a report regarding designation
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170(1)(a) of agricultural resource land in King,
Chelan, and Yakima counties. The report shall address the amount of
land designated as agricultural resource land, the amount of land in
agricultural production, changes in the amount of such land since 1990,
comparison with amounts of land in other uses, designation standards
and procedures, effect of designation on tax revenue, contribution of
agriculture to the local economy, and any other type of information
that will help the committee to evaluate the implementation and effect
of designation.

--- END ---