BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.260 and 1992 c 212 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any member whose public school service is interrupted by active
service to the United States as a member of its military, naval or air
service, or to the state of Washington, as a member of the legislature,
may upon becoming reemployed in the public schools, receive credit for
that service upon presenting satisfactory proof, and contributing to
the member reserve, either in a lump sum or installments, amounts
determined by the director. Except that no military service credit in
excess of five years shall be established or reestablished after July
1, 1961, unless the service was actually rendered during time of war.
(2)(a) After completing twenty-five years of creditable service,
any member may have service in the armed forces that was performed
prior to membership in the retirement system credited to him or her as
a member. However, the total number of years of military service
credit from all sources, as authorized by any statute, may not exceed
five years.
(b) The member must also contribute to the member reserve, either
in a lump sum or installments, the member's contribution as determined
by the director.
(c) This section does not apply to any individual, not a veteran
within the meaning of RCW 41.04.005. Military service shall not be
credited to any member who is receiving full military retirement
benefits pursuant to Title 10 United States Code.

--- END ---