BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
After December 31, 2005, a health carrier that issues a card
identifying a person as an enrollee, and requires the person to present
the card to providers for purposes of claims processing, may not
display on the card an identification number that includes more than a
four-digit portion of the person's complete social security number.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47.130 and 2000 c 5 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The activities and operations of the Washington basic health
plan under this chapter, including those of managed health care systems
to the extent of their participation in the plan, are exempt from the
provisions and requirements of Title 48 RCW except:
(a) Benefits as provided in RCW 70.47.070;
(b) Managed health care systems are subject to the provisions of
section 1 of this act, and RCW 48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through
48.43.535, 43.70.235, 48.43.545, 48.43.550, 70.02.110, and 70.02.900;
(c) Persons appointed or authorized to solicit applications for
enrollment in the basic health plan, including employees of the health
care authority, must comply with chapter 48.17 RCW. For purposes of
this subsection (1)(c), "solicit" does not include distributing
information and applications for the basic health plan and responding
to questions; and
(d) Amounts paid to a managed health care system by the basic
health plan for participating in the basic health plan and providing
health care services for nonsubsidized enrollees in the basic health
plan must comply with RCW 48.14.0201.
(2) The purpose of the 1994 amendatory language to this section in
chapter 309, Laws of 1994 is to clarify the intent of the legislature
that premiums paid on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees in the basic
health plan are subject to the premium and prepayment tax. The
legislature does not consider this clarifying language to either raise
existing taxes nor to impose a tax that did not exist previously.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Any card issued after December 31, 2005, by the department or a
managed health care system to a person receiving services under this
chapter, that must be presented to providers for purposes of claims
processing, may not display an identification number that includes more
than a four-digit portion of the person's complete social security
number.

--- END ---