BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No employee of a court, county clerk's office, government
agency, the administrative office of the courts, or any other person
under contract with any such agency may intentionally access, use, or
disclose court records that he or she knows to be confidential, unless
authorized.
(2) A court record is confidential if access to that record is
restricted by statute, court order, or court rules.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "authorized" means access:
(a) For the purpose of conducting official court business for a use
specifically permitted by employment status; (b) by court order, court
rule, or statute for the use specified; or (c) by contractual provision
contained in an agreement between the official custodian of the court
record and another person or entity, as specified in such agreement.
(4) Violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---