BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.36.025 and 2003 c 361 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A motor vehicle fuel tax rate of ((twenty-three)) twenty-seven
cents per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor
vehicle fuel.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative motor fuel
tax rate of five cents per gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or
use of motor vehicle fuel. This subsection (2) expires when the bonds
issued for transportation 2003 projects are retired.
(3)(a) The money collected under subsection (1) of this section
based on a rate of twenty-three cents per gallon shall be deposited in
the motor vehicle fund.
(b) The money collected under subsection (1) of this section based
on a rate of two cents per gallon shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle account.
(c) The money collected under subsection (1) of this section based
on a rate of one cent per gallon shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund and distributed to cities in accordance with RCW
46.68.090(2)(g).
(d) The money collected under subsection (1) of this section based
on a rate of one cent per gallon shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund and distributed to counties in accordance with RCW
46.68.090(2)(h).

Sec. 2 RCW 82.38.030 and 2003 c 361 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and imposed upon special fuel users a
tax at the rate of ((twenty-three)) twenty-seven cents per gallon of
special fuel, or each one hundred cubic feet of compressed natural gas,
measured at standard pressure and temperature.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2003, an additional and cumulative tax rate
of five cents per gallon of special fuel, or each one hundred cubic
feet of compressed natural gas, measured at standard pressure and
temperature shall be imposed on special fuel users. This subsection
(2) expires when the bonds issued for transportation 2003 projects are
retired.
(3) Taxes are imposed when:
(a) Special fuel is removed in this state from a terminal if the
special fuel is removed at the rack unless the removal is to a licensed
exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state, or
the removal is to a special fuel distributor for direct delivery to an
international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW 82.38.320;
(b) Special fuel is removed in this state from a refinery if either
of the following applies:
(i) The removal is by bulk transfer and the refiner or the owner of
the special fuel immediately before the removal is not a licensee; or
(ii) The removal is at the refinery rack unless the removal is to
a licensed exporter for direct delivery to a destination outside of the
state, or the removal is to a special fuel distributor for direct
delivery to an international fuel tax agreement licensee under RCW
82.38.320;
(c) Special fuel enters into this state for sale, consumption, use,
or storage if either of the following applies:
(i) The entry is by bulk transfer and the importer is not a
licensee; or
(ii) The entry is not by bulk transfer;
(d) Special fuel is sold or removed in this state to an unlicensed
entity unless there was a prior taxable removal, entry, or sale of the
special fuel;
(e) Blended special fuel is removed or sold in this state by the
blender of the fuel. The number of gallons of blended special fuel
subject to tax is the difference between the total number of gallons of
blended special fuel removed or sold and the number of gallons of
previously taxed special fuel used to produce the blended special fuel;
(f) Dyed special fuel is used on a highway, as authorized by the
internal revenue code, unless the use is exempt from the special fuel
tax;
(g) Dyed special fuel is held for sale, sold, used, or is intended
to be used in violation of this chapter;
(h) Special fuel purchased by an international fuel tax agreement
licensee under RCW 82.38.320 is used on a highway; and
(i) Special fuel is sold by a licensed special fuel supplier to a
special fuel distributor, special fuel importer, or special fuel
blender and the special fuel is not removed from the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(4) The tax imposed by this chapter, if required to be collected by
the licensee, is held in trust by the licensee until paid to the
department, and a licensee who appropriates or converts the tax
collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is
guilty of a felony, or gross misdemeanor in accordance with the theft
and anticipatory provisions of Title 9A RCW. A person, partnership,
corporation, or corporate officer who fails to collect the tax imposed
by this section, or who has collected the tax and fails to pay it to
the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, is personally
liable to the state for the amount of the tax.
(5)(a) The money collected under subsection (1) of this section
based on a rate of twenty-three cents per gallon shall be deposited in
the motor vehicle fund.
(b) The money collected under subsection (1) of this section based
on a rate of two cents per gallon shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle account.
(c) The money collected under subsection (1) of this section based
on a rate of one cent per gallon shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund and distributed to cities in accordance with RCW
46.68.090(2)(g).
(d) The money collected under subsection (1) of this section based
on a rate of one cent per gallon shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund and distributed to counties in accordance with RCW
46.68.090(2)(h).

Sec. 3 RCW 82.36.410 and 1973 c 95 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
All moneys collected by the director shall be transmitted forthwith
to the state treasurer, together with a statement showing whence the
moneys were derived, and shall be by him credited to the motor vehicle
fund, unless specified otherwise.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.68.090 and 2003 c 361 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle
fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax under RCW 82.36.025(3)(a) and
special fuel tax under RCW 82.38.030(5)(a) shall be first expended for
purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The remaining
net tax amount shall be distributed monthly by the state treasurer in
accordance with subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.
(a) For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special
fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;
(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to
appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state
treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state
of Washington in the administration of the motor vehicle fuel tax and
the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed monthly.
(2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1) shall be distributed as set forth in (a)
through (j) of this section.
(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as
defined in RCW 46.68.130;
(b) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby
created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to
be expended for special category C projects. Special category C
projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will
require bond financing to complete construction.
The following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used
in determining which special category C projects have the highest
priority:
(i) Accident experience;
(ii) Fatal accident experience;
(iii) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable
speeds without undue congestion; and
(iv) Continuity of development of the highway transportation
network.
Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor
vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under
this subsection (2)(b);
(c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;
(d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;
(e) For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;
(f) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended
in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;
(g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW
46.68.110;
(h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an
amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall be
distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of
transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to
the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed
monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;
(i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account,
hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565
percent. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the
number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural,
safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road
administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies
to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management
system is used;
(j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in
accordance with RCW 36.79.020.
(3) One hundred percent of the net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(2) and 82.38.030(2) shall be distributed to the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account).
(4) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so
as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway
construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and
whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---