BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that fast and
convenient access to information improves the efficiency and
effectiveness of government. The legislature further declares that
ready and equitable public access to information is fundamental to the
sound governance of a free society. Therefore, the legislature intends
to encourage the use of new technology to facilitate and expand access
to information by state officers, state employees, and the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The joint legislative systems committee, the department of
information services, and the department of general administration
shall deploy a pilot wireless network. The network shall initially be
established in the legislative building during 2004 as part of the
legislative building rehabilitation project with the future objective
of expanding coverage to the state capitol campus. The committee and
the departments shall determine the schedule for future deployment of
the network.
(2) The committee and the departments shall determine the means by
which persons may use the network; however, access shall proceed in
three phases: Phase one, legislative officers and staff; phase two,
executive officers and staff; and phase three, the public.
(3) In determining the conditions under which the public may access
the network, the committee and the departments shall consult with the
state library.
(4) The committee and the departments may choose a private vendor
to deploy or provide network services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The joint legislative systems committee, the
department of information services, and the department of general
administration shall present a report to the appropriate technology
committees in the house of representatives and the senate on the
deployment of the wireless network by January 10, 2005. The report
shall include recommendations and fiscal implications of expanding the
wireless network to additional state capitol campus facilities, the
executive officers, their staff, and the public.

--- END ---