BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent and purpose of sections 1 through
8 of this act are to recognize that there exists a public policy in the
state of Washington against strikes by teachers and other certificated
instructional staff as a means of settling their labor disputes; that
the uninterrupted and dedicated service of these educational employees
is vital to the welfare and education of the children of the state of
Washington; that to promote such dedicated and uninterrupted public
service there should exist an effective and adequate alternative means
of settling disputes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) If an agreement has not been reached on
a new employment contract following a reasonable period of negotiations
and mediation, but in no event later than July 15th of any year in
which the previous employment contract will expire, an interest
arbitration panel shall be created to resolve the dispute.
(2) By July 15th, each party shall name one person to serve as its
arbitrator on the arbitration panel. The two members so appointed
shall meet within three days following the appointment of the later
appointed member to attempt to choose a third member to act as the
neutral chairman of the arbitration panel. Upon the failure of the
arbitrators to select a neutral chairman within three days, the two
appointed members shall use one of the two following options in the
appointment of the third member, who shall act as chairman of the
panel: (a) By mutual consent, the two appointed members may jointly
request the commission, and the commission shall appoint a third member
within two days of such request. Costs of each party's appointee shall
be borne by each party respectively; other costs of the arbitration
proceedings shall be borne by the commission; or (b) either party may
apply to the commission, the federal mediation and conciliation
service, or the American Arbitration Association to provide a list of
five qualified arbitrators from which the neutral chairman shall be
chosen. Each party shall pay the fees and expenses of its arbitrator,
and the fees and expenses of the neutral chairman shall be shared
equally between the parties.
(3) The issues for determination by the arbitration panel shall be
limited to the issues certified by the executive director of the
commission.
(4) The members of the arbitration panel shall be determined by
July 22nd. Once the members of the arbitration panel are determined,
the panel shall promptly establish a date, time, and place for a
hearing and shall provide reasonable notice thereof to the parties to
the dispute.
(5) The hearing shall take place by August 1st. The hearing shall
be informal, and each party shall have the opportunity to present
evidence and make argument. No member of the arbitration panel may
present the case for a party to the proceedings. The rules of evidence
prevailing in judicial proceedings may be considered, but are not
binding. Any oral testimony or documentary evidence or other data
deemed relevant by the chairman of the arbitration panel may be
received in evidence. The proceedings shall be recorded.
(6) The arbitration panel has the power to administer oaths,
require the attendance of witnesses, and require the production of such
books, papers, contracts, agreements, and documents as may be deemed by
the panel to be material to a just determination of the issues in
dispute. If any person refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the
arbitration panel, or refuses to be sworn or to make an affirmation to
testify, or any witness, party, or attorney for a party is guilty of
any contempt while in attendance at any hearing held hereunder, the
arbitration panel may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court in
the county where the labor dispute exists, and the court has
jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order. Any failure to obey the
order may be punished by the court as a contempt.
(7) The hearing conducted by the arbitration panel shall be
concluded by August 8th.
(8) The neutral chairman shall consult with the other members of
the arbitration panel, and, by August 15th, the neutral chairman shall
make written findings of fact and a written determination of the issues
in dispute, based on the evidence presented.
(9) A copy of the written findings of fact and a determination of
the dispute shall be served on the commission, on each of the other
members of the arbitration panel, and on each of the parties to the
dispute.
(10) The parties shall meet to confer on the arbitration chairman's
written findings of fact and determination. The parties may
voluntarily take either of the following actions:
(a) Mutually agree to accept the arbitrator's dispute settlement
determination; or
(b) Mutually agree upon their own dispute settlement agreement to
end the dispute, which can be different from the arbitration chairman's
determination.
(11) If, by August 30th, the parties do not voluntarily agree to a
settlement that will end the dispute then on August 31st the
arbitration chairman's written determination shall be final and binding
upon both parties.
(12) The arbitration chairman's final and binding written
determination shall be subject to review by the superior court upon the
application of either party to the dispute by September 7th solely upon
the question of whether the decision of the panel was arbitrary or
capricious.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An interest arbitration panel created
pursuant to section 2 of this act, in the performance of its duties
under sections 1 through 8 of this act, exercises a state function and
is, for the purposes of sections 1 through 8 of this act, a state
agency. Chapter 34.05 RCW does not apply to proceedings before an
interest arbitration panel under sections 1 through 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In making its determination, the
arbitration panel shall be mindful of the legislative purpose
enumerated in section 1 of this act and, as additional standards or
guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision, it shall take into
consideration the following factors:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c) Comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of like personnel of like employers within the
state of Washington;
(d) The availability of fiscal resources and financial capability
of the school district;
(e) The academic achievement level of students in the district;
(f) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through (e) of
this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings; and
(g) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under (a)
through (f) of this subsection, that are normally or traditionally
taken into consideration in the determination of wages, hours, and
conditions of employment.
(2) The arbitration panel is bound by the statutory limitations for
salaries and compensation provided in RCW 28A.400.200 and 41.59.930.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 During the pendency of the proceedings
before the arbitration panel, existing wages, hours, and other
conditions of employment shall not be changed by action of either party
without the consent of the other but a party may so consent without
prejudice to his or her rights or position under sections 1 through 8
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If the representative of either or both the
teachers and other certificated instructional staff and the school
district refuse to submit to the mediation and arbitration procedures
set forth in this chapter, the parties, or the commission on its own
motion, may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court for the
county in which the labor dispute exists and such court shall have
jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order. A failure to obey such
order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof. A decision
of the arbitration panel shall be final and binding on the parties, and
may be enforced at the instance of either party, the arbitration panel
or the commission in the superior court for the county where the
dispute arose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The right of teachers and other certificated
instructional staff to engage in any strike, concerted work slowdown or
stoppage, or other concerted interruption of operations is not granted.
An organization recognized as the bargaining representative of teachers
and other certificated instructional staff subject to sections 1
through 8 of this act that willfully disobeys a lawful order of
enforcement by a superior court pursuant to section 6 of this act and
this section, or willfully offers resistance to such order, whether by
strike or otherwise, is in contempt of court as provided in chapter
7.21 RCW. An employer that willfully disobeys a lawful order of
enforcement by a superior court pursuant to section 6 of this act or
willfully offers resistance to such order is in contempt of court as
provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing in sections 1 through 8 of this act
may be construed to require the state to pay, directly or indirectly,
any increased salary or compensation resulting from the determination
of the arbitration.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2002 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section and sections 1 through 8 of
this act.
(2)(a) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be
less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a masters
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
masters degree and zero years of service;
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may
exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by
separate contract for additional time, additional responsibilities, or
incentives. Supplemental contracts shall not cause the state to incur
any present or future funding obligation. Supplemental contracts shall
be subject to the collective bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW
and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed one year, and
if not renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance with
RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a
supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of
services which are a part of the basic education program required by
Article IX, section 3 of the state Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The provisions of sections 1 through 8 of
this act are intended to be additional to other remedies and shall be
liberally construed to accomplish their purpose. If any provision of
sections 1 through 8 of this act conflicts with any other statute,
rule, or policy of any school district, the provisions of sections 1
through 8 of this act shall control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 8 and 10 of this act are
each added to chapter 41.59 RCW.

--- END ---