BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.73.070 and 1994 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to public school
buses operated by a school district or any activity in connection with
services provided by a common carrier pursuant to its tariffs on file
with the Washington utilities and transportation commission or the
Federal Communication Commission and any activity of any officer, agent
or employee of a common carrier who performs any act otherwise
prohibited by this law in the construction, maintenance, repair and
operations of the common carrier's communications services, facilities,
or equipment or incident to the use of such services, facilities or
equipment. Common carrier as used in this section means any person
engaged as a common carrier or public service company for hire in
intrastate, interstate or foreign communication by wire or radio or in
intrastate, interstate or foreign radio transmission of energy.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Any common carrier automatic number, caller, or location
identification service that has been approved by the Washington
utilities and transportation commission; or
(b) A 911 or enhanced 911 emergency service as defined in RCW
82.14B.020, for purposes of aiding public health or public safety
agencies to respond to calls placed for emergency assistance.

--- END ---