BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state fire protection policy board,
through the director of fire protection within the state patrol, shall
conduct an assessment of fire suppression capability in the interface
areas between wildlands and urban areas throughout the state. The
state fire protection policy board should concentrate upon the
geographic areas in which wildland fuels and development meet or are
intermixed. The state fire protection policy board should generally
exclude from the assessment those areas within the fire suppression
jurisdiction of the department of natural resources for forest lands
under chapter 76.04 RCW and urban areas protected by city fire
departments or fire protection districts in which wildland fuels are a
minimal source of fire hazard.
(2) The state fire protection policy board shall encourage the
participation of fire suppression jurisdictions, fire fighters, the
insurance industry, the building industry, the department of natural
resources, the emergency management division of the military
department, and local governments in conducting the assessment. The
state fire protection policy board shall invite the associations of
fire chiefs and fire commissioners to participate fully in the
assessment and to facilitate involvement of and communication with fire
protection districts and fire departments throughout the state that
provide coverage in wildland and urban interface areas. The fire
protection bureau of the state patrol shall provide staff assistance to
the state fire protection policy board in conducting the assessment.
(3) The assessment should include the following:
(a) An inventory of the interface areas within the state, including
a general description of the total area, and the characteristics of
wildland fuels and development patterns within this area;
(b) A general description of current and projected coverage by fire
protection jurisdictions in these areas, and current and project
capacity of such jurisdictions considering factors such as personnel,
training, equipment, and budgetary resources;
(c) A review of existing agreements among fire jurisdictions for
mutual assistance and fire response within interface areas, and
response times and callout procedures both at a mutual-aid level and
for a state declared mobilization;
(d) An assessment of water sources and infrastructure for fire flow
delivery in interface areas, including availability of piped water at
fire flow pressure, fire hydrants, standpipes in water bodies or water
storage facilities, and other infrastructure;
(e) An assessment of land use, building and fire codes within such
areas, defensible space requirements, egress and ingress routes from
the interface areas, and the effects upon wildland fire hazard and
potential damages;
(f) Recommendations for a system of classifying interface areas
that recognize differences across the state in fire hazard, fire risk,
and structural and wildland fuel characteristics; and
(g) Recommendations to strengthen fire prevention and suppression
in interface areas, including provision of suppression infrastructure,
improvements in fire jurisdiction training, equipment, and funding, and
improved coordination among fire jurisdictions to achieve prompt and
effective response to fires in interface areas.
(4) The state fire protection policy board shall provide the report
to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives no later than December 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---