BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.140.160 and 2002 c 86 s 239 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action for the following
conduct, acts, or conditions:
(1) Failing to meet the minimum qualifications for state
((licensure or)) certification or licensure established by or
((pursuant to)) under this chapter;
(2) Paying money other than the fees provided for by this chapter
to any employee of the director or the commission to procure state
((licensure or)) certification or licensure under this chapter;
(3) Continuing to act as a ((state-licensed or)) state-certified
real estate appraiser or state-licensed real estate appraiser when his
or her ((license or)) certificate or license is on an expired status;
(4) Violating any provision of this chapter or any lawful rule made
by the director pursuant thereto;
(5) Issuing an appraisal report on any real property in which the
appraiser has an interest unless his or her interest is clearly stated
in the appraisal report; and
(6) Being affiliated as an ((employee or independent contractor
with a state-licensed or state-certified real estate appraiser when the
appraiser's license or certificate has been revoked due to disciplinary
action)) employer, independent contractor, or supervisory appraiser of
a state-certified real estate appraiser or state-licensed real estate
appraiser whose certification or license is currently in a suspended or
revoked status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2004.

--- END ---