BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A city or town may not enact any statute or ordinance that has the
effect, directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of
manufactured homes in manufactured housing communities, as defined in
RCW 59.20.030, based exclusively on the age or dimensions of the
manufactured home.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A code city may not enact any statute or ordinance that has the
effect, directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of
manufactured homes in manufactured housing communities, as defined in
RCW 59.20.030, based exclusively on the age or dimensions of the
manufactured home.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
A county may not enact any statute or ordinance that has the
effect, directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of
manufactured homes in manufactured housing communities, as defined in
RCW 59.20.030, based exclusively on the age or dimensions of the
manufactured home.

--- END ---