BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.170 and 2003 c 111 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 29A.36.180 and in subsection (2) of
this section, on the ballot at the general election for a nonpartisan
office for which a primary was held, only the names of the candidate
who received the greatest number of votes and the candidate who
received the next greatest number of votes for that office shall appear
under the title of that office, and the names shall appear in that
order. If a primary was conducted, no candidate's name may be printed
on the subsequent general election ballot unless he or she receives at
least one percent of the total votes cast for that office at the
preceding primary. On the ballot at the general election for any other
nonpartisan office for which no primary was held, the names of the
candidates shall be listed in the order determined under RCW
29A.36.130.
(2) On the ballot at the general election for the office of justice
of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the
superior court, judge of the district court, or state superintendent of
public instruction, if a candidate in a contested primary receives a
majority of all the votes cast for that office or position, only the
name of that candidate may be printed under the title of the office for
that position.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---