BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) This chapter may be known and cited as
the "third party utility billing act." The purpose of this chapter is
to prevent landlords, either themselves or through a third party
billing agent, from billing tenants for master metered or unmetered
utility services without proper notice and disclosure of billing
practices to tenants, to protect tenants from deceptive or fraudulent
billing practices, and to establish uniform statewide standards for
third party utility billing that do not permit the adoption of
inconsistent or more restrictive standards by any city, code city, or
county.
(2) This chapter does not prevent a landlord from including a
tenant's cost of master metered or unmetered utility services within
the rent set forth in a rental agreement, and the practice of including
that cost within a tenant's rent is not a billing practice or
methodology affected by this chapter.
(3) This chapter does not affect the practices used by public
utilities to bill and collect residential multiunit building owners or
landlords for master metered or unmetered utility services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Billing entity" means the landlord or third party billing
agent responsible for billing multiunit building tenants for master
metered or unmetered utility services.
(2) "Disclosure" means providing tenants with complete and accurate
written information in a clear, concise, and understandable manner in
all notices required under this chapter and on each bill presented from
the billing entity to tenants.
(3) "Landlord" has the meaning provided in RCW 59.18.030 and also
has the meaning provided in RCW 59.20.030 with regard to mobile home
parks.
(4) "Master metered utility service" means a utility service
supplied to more than one unit in a multiunit building and measured
through a single inclusive metering system.
(5) "Methodology" means any method, technique, or criterion used to
apportion to tenants charges billed to the landlord by the utility for
master metered or unmetered utility services, including but not limited
to, ratio utility billing systems, submetering systems, and hot water
metering systems.
(6) "Multiunit building" means a residential building, group of
buildings, or mobile home park, with three or more dwelling units, as
defined in RCW 59.18.030, or mobile home lots, as defined in RCW
59.20.030, with a master metered utility service or unmetered utility
service that is provided to the building or group of buildings as a
whole.
(7) "Ratio utility billing system" means any method by which the
cost of master metered or unmetered utility services provided to
tenants and common areas of a multiunit building are apportioned to
tenants through the use of a formula that estimates the utility usage
of each rental unit in the multiunit building based on the number of
occupants in a unit, number of bedrooms in a unit, square footage of a
unit, or any similar criterion.
(8) "Rental agreement" has the meaning provided in RCW 59.18.030.
(9) "Tenant" has the meaning provided in RCW 59.18.030 and also
means a tenant of a mobile home park as defined in RCW 59.20.030.
(10) "Billing practices" means the practices of a billing entity
that apportions and bills multiunit building tenants for master metered
or unmetered utility services provided to the multiunit building as a
whole by an apportioning methodology and also means any related
practices including but not limited to, collecting, using, or
disclosing tenants' personally identifiable information, other than
name and address; attempting to collect unpaid amounts from tenants;
verifying tenants' credit; and reporting unpaid balances to credit
reporting agencies.
(11) "Third party billing agent" means any entity retained or
authorized by a landlord as a billing entity.
(12) "Unmetered" or "unmetered utility services" means utilities
provided to more than one unit of a multiunit building, in which the
bill from the utility is based on a method other than a meter and
includes, but is not limited to, sewer and solid waste services.
(13) "Utilities" or "utility services" means water, sewer,
electric, and solid waste services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A landlord of a multiunit building shall not
bill tenants for utility services separately from rent except as
permitted in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A landlord may or may authorize a third
party billing agent to bill tenants of a multiunit building for master
metered or unmetered utility services provided to the tenants, only if
the following requirements are met:
(a) Billing practices may be adopted only upon advance written
notice to a tenant as part of a new or renewed rental agreement.
Tenants must receive written notice of the billing practices at least
thirty days before expiration of their rental agreements, or, in the
case of month-to-month tenancies, at least thirty days before the
billing practices may become effective. However, if billing practices
are already in place on the effective date of this act, written notice
must be given within thirty days of the effective date of this act.
(b) The notice required under (a) of this subsection shall include
a detailed written disclosure of the methodology used by the billing
entity to allocate the charges to each tenant, including the
methodology used to allocate utility services for common areas of the
multiunit building, along with all other terms and conditions of the
billing arrangement. If submetering is used, the notice shall also
include descriptions of the location of the submeter and any access
requirements to tenant dwelling units or mobile home lots for submeter
installation, reading, repair, maintenance, or inspections, including
removal of the submeter for testing. Access requirements shall be
consistent with the provisions of RCW 59.18.150 or 59.20.130 for mobile
home parks. An additional written notice must also be given at least
thirty days prior to the due date of the next rental payment in order
to implement a change in billing agents, apportionment methodology,
fees, or other terms and conditions of the billing arrangement.
(c) The total of all charges for any utility service included in
the bills sent to all units may not cumulatively exceed the amount of
the bill sent by the utility to the landlord for the multiunit building
or the covered dwelling units or mobile home lots in the multiunit
building as a whole, less any late charges, interest, or other
penalties owed by the landlord, with the exception of the following,
which may be included in each bill covering an individual dwelling unit
or mobile home lot:
(i) A service charge;
(ii) Late payment charges; and
(iii) Insufficient funds check charges for dishonored checks.
Service charges, late payment charges, and insufficient funds check
charges shall be reasonable, and shall be a flat fee, or schedule of
fees disclosed in the billing practices notices. No late payment
charges may accrue until at least twenty-one days after the date the
bill was mailed to the tenant or until twenty-one days after the bill
was delivered to the tenant if the bill was not mailed.
(d) Any third party billing agent must be properly registered and
licensed to do business in this state and must be in compliance with
all applicable state laws and rules, and all applicable state license
identification numbers, if any, must be disclosed upon request.
(e) Each billing statement sent to a tenant by a billing entity
must disclose all required information in a clear and conspicuous
manner and at minimum must:
(i) Include the name, business address, and telephone number of the
billing entity;
(ii) Identify and show the basis for each separate charge,
including service charges and late charges, if any, as a line item, and
show the total amount of the bill;
(iii) If the building units are submetered, include the current and
previous meter readings, the current read date, and the amount
consumed, or estimated to have been consumed if the utility has
provided the landlord with an estimated bill;
(iv) Specify the due date, the date upon which the bill becomes
overdue, the amount of any late charges or penalties that may apply,
and the date upon which the late charges or penalties may be imposed;
(v) Identify any past due dollar amounts;
(vi) Identify a mailing address and telephone number for billing
inquiries and disputes, identify the entity responsible for resolving
billing inquiries and disputes and its business hours and days of
availability, and describe the process used to resolve disputes related
to bills as set forth in this chapter; and
(vii) Include a statement to the effect that "this bill is from
(landlord name) and not from (utility company name)."
(f) If a utility company has billed the landlord using an estimate
of utility service consumed, the billing agent may estimate the charges
to be billed to tenants until billing based on actual consumption
resumes.
(g) Submetering is permitted as a way of allocating master metered
utility services to tenants.
(2) This section does not prevent a landlord from addressing
billing of master metered or other unmetered utility services in a
written addendum to a lease. A lease addendum may be used to give the
notice required under subsection (1)(a) of this section, so long as the
lease addendum is provided to the tenant with the notice required under
that subsection, and so long as all other requirements of this chapter
are satisfied.
(3) No dispute resolution provision may require a tenant to pursue
a remedy in another state.
(4) The state of Washington fully occupies and preempts the entire
field of residential third party utility billings. Cities, towns, and
counties or other municipalities may enact only those laws and
ordinances relating to third party utility billings that are consistent
with this chapter. Local laws and ordinances that are inconsistent
with, more restrictive than, or exceed the requirements of state law
may not be enacted and are preempted and repealed, regardless of the
nature of the code, charter, or home rule status of the city, town,
county, or municipality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 When a billing entity employs a methodology
for third party utility billing based on submetering or hot water
metering, the individual meters must be accurate and regularly
maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

--- END ---