BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.12.010 and 1994 c 223 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
A public utility district that is created as provided in RCW
54.08.010 shall be a municipal corporation of the state of Washington,
and the name of such public utility district shall be Public Utility
District No. . . . . of . . . . . . County.
The powers of the public utility district shall be exercised
through a commission consisting of three members in three commissioner
districts, and five members in five commissioner districts.
((When)) (1) If the public utility district is county-wide and the
county has three county legislative authority districts, then, at the
first election of commissioners and until any change ((shall have
been)) is made in the boundaries of public utility district
commissioner districts, one public utility district commissioner shall
be chosen from each of the three county legislative authority
districts. ((When))
(2) If the public utility district comprises only a portion of the
county, with boundaries established in accordance with chapter 54.08
RCW, or ((when)) if the public utility district is county-wide and the
county does not have three county legislative authority districts,
three public utility district commissioner districts, numbered
consecutively, each with approximately equal population and following
precinct lines, as far as practicable, shall be described in the
petition for the formation of the public utility district, ((which
shall be)) subject to appropriate change by the county legislative
authority if and when it changes the boundaries of the proposed public
utility district((, and)). One commissioner shall be elected as a
commissioner of each of the public utility district commissioner
districts. ((Commissioner districts shall be used as follows: (1)))
(3) Only a registered voter who resides in a commissioner district
may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a commissioner of the
commissioner district((; and (2))). Only voters of a commissioner
district may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for a
commissioner of the commissioner district. Voters of the entire public
utility district may vote at a general election to elect a person as a
commissioner of the commissioner district.
(4) The term of office of each public utility district commissioner
other than the commissioners at large shall be six years, and the term
of each commissioner at large shall be four years. Each term shall be
computed in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170)) 29A.20.040 following the
commissioner's election. All public utility district commissioners
shall hold office until their successors shall have been elected and
have qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW ((29.04.170))
29A.20.040.
(5) A vacancy in the office of public utility district commissioner
shall occur as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW or by nonattendance at
meetings of the public utility district commission for a period of
sixty days unless excused by the public utility district commission.
Vacancies on a board of public utility district commissioners shall be
filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.
(6) The boundaries of the public utility district commissioner
districts may be changed only by the public utility district
commission, and shall be examined every ten years to determine
substantial equality of population in accordance with chapter ((29.70))
29A.76 RCW((, but)). Except as provided in this section or section 2
of this act, the boundaries shall not be changed oftener than once in
four years((, and)). Boundaries may only be changed when all members
of the commission are present. Whenever territory is added to a public
utility district under RCW 54.04.035, or added or withdrawn under
section 2 of this act, the boundaries of the public utility
commissioner districts shall be changed to include ((such)) the
additional or exclude the withdrawn territory. Unless the boundaries
are changed pursuant to section 2 of this act, the proposed change of
the boundaries of the public utility district commissioner district
must be made by resolution and after public hearing. Notice of the
time of ((a)) the public hearing ((thereon)) shall be published for two
weeks ((prior thereto)) before the hearing. Upon a referendum petition
signed by ten percent of the qualified voters of the public utility
district being filed with the county auditor, the county legislative
authority shall submit ((such)) the proposed change of boundaries to
the voters of the public utility district for their approval or
rejection. ((Such)) The petition must be filed within ninety days
after the adoption of resolution of the proposed action. The validity
of the petition ((shall be)) is governed by the provisions of chapter
54.08 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 54.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any voting precinct located within a county that has a federal
nuclear reservation within its boundaries is:
(a) Withdrawn from a public utility district if the precinct
receives at least one electric distribution, water, or sewer service
from a city, and no electric distribution, water, or sewer service from
a public utility district;
(b) Included in a public utility district if any portion of the
precinct receives at least one electric distribution, water, or sewer
service from the public utility district.
(2) For voting precincts that meet the requirements of subsection
(1) of this section, within ten days after the effective date of this
act, and for voting precincts that later meet the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, within thirty days of meeting the
requirements:
(a) The city that provides any electric distribution, water, or
sewer service to a precinct that is withdrawn from a public utility
district under subsection (1) of this section shall submit to the
public utility district and the county auditor a list of street
addresses, or map of the areas to which any service is provided;
(b) The public utility district that provides any electric
distribution, water, or sewer service to a precinct that is included in
the public utility district under subsection (1) of this section shall
submit to the city or town and the county auditor a list of street
addresses, or map of the areas to which any service is provided.
(3) Within ten days of receipt of the information required under
subsection (2) of this section, the auditor shall determine which
voting precincts are required to be withdrawn from or included in the
public utility district, and provide that information to the public
utility district commissioners who shall, within ten days, revise the
boundaries of the district in conformance with RCW 54.12.010 without
dividing any voting precinct.
(4) Unless otherwise provided in an agreement between the public
utility district and the city or town, taxes or assessments levied or
assessed against property located in an area withdrawn from a public
utility district shall remain a lien and be collected as by law (a) if
the taxes or assessments were levied or assessed before the withdrawal
or (b) if the levies or assessments were made to pay or secure an
obligation of the district duly incurred or issued before the
withdrawal. The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a
district does not exempt any property therein from taxation or
assessment for the purpose of paying the costs of retiring or redeeming
any obligation of the district duly incurred or issued before the
withdrawal.
(5) Except as set forth in subsection (4) of this section, a public
utility district may not levy or impose any taxes upon property located
within those voting precincts withdrawn from the public utility
district.
(6) Nothing in this act limits the authority of public utility
districts and cities or towns to enter into service agreements that are
otherwise permitted by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---