BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.82.020 and 1991 c 363 s 87 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any funds accruing to and to be deposited in the county road fund
arising from any levy in any road district shall be expended for proper
county road purposes. Compensation to county commissioners for the
performance of their duties as road commissioners is a proper use of
the county road fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.82.070 and 2001 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any money paid to any county road fund may be used for the
construction, alteration, repair, improvement, or maintenance of county
roads and bridges thereon and for wharves necessary for ferriage of
motor vehicle traffic, and for ferries, and for the acquiring,
operating, and maintaining of machinery, equipment, quarries, or pits
for the extraction of materials, and for the cost of establishing
county roads, acquiring rights-of-way therefor, and expenses for the
operation of the county engineering office, and for any of the
following programs when directly related to county road purposes: (1)
Insurance; (2) self-insurance programs; and (3) risk management
programs; and for any other proper county road purpose. Such
expenditure may be made either independently or in conjunction with the
state or any city, town, or tax district within the county. County
road purposes include compensation to county commissioners for the
performance of their duties as road commissioners. County road
purposes also include the removal of barriers to fish passage related
to county roads, and include but are not limited to the following
activities associated with the removal of these barriers: Engineering
and technical services; stream bank stabilization; streambed
restoration; the placement of weirs, rock, or woody debris; planting;
and channel modification. County road funds may be used beyond the
county right-of-way for activities clearly associated with removal of
fish passage barriers that are the responsibility of the county.
Activities related to the removal of barriers to fish passage performed
beyond the county right-of-way must not exceed twenty-five percent of
the total cost of activities related to fish barrier removal on any one
project, and the total annual cost of activities related to the removal
of barriers to fish passage performed beyond the county rights-of-way
must not exceed one-half of one percent of a county's annual road
construction budget. The use of county road funds beyond the county
right-of-way for activities associated with the removal of fish
barriers is permissive, and wholly within the discretion of the county
legislative authority. The use of county road funds beyond the county
right-of-way for such activities does not create or impose a legal duty
upon a county for salmon recovery work beyond the county right-of-way.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.82.160 and 1991 c 363 s 88 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each county legislative authority, with the assistance of the
county road engineer, shall prepare and file with the county auditor on
or before the second Monday in August in each year, detailed and
itemized estimates of all expenditures required in the county for the
ensuing fiscal year. In the preparation and adoption of the county
road budget the legislative authority shall determine and budget sums
to become available for the following county road purposes: (1)
Administration, including compensation to county commissioners for the
performance of their duties as road commissioners; (2) bond and warrant
retirement; (3) maintenance; (4) construction; (5) operation of
equipment rental and revolving fund; and (6) such other items relating
to the county road budget as may be required by the county road
administration board; and the respective amounts as adopted for these
several items in the final budget for the ensuing calendar year shall
not be altered or exceeded except as by law provided.

--- END ---