BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that schools are
increasingly required to play an expanding role in protecting our
children's health. Schools are responsible for monitoring the
immunization of children, evaluating children's hearing and vision, and
screening for scoliosis. Chronically ill children often require
medically ordered treatment to enable them to attend school.
Medication is often required to be given to children during the school
day. Schools are also responsible for identifying and reporting child
abuse, identifying drug and alcohol problems, treating emergencies,
providing counseling and assistance for teenage parents, and providing
AIDS, human growth and development, and personal safety education.
Schools are asked to coordinate with families and community services to
manage students with significant health problems and to make referrals
to appropriate community services. Schools are required to abide by
rules of confidentiality and to properly maintain health care records.
The legislature finds that additional school nurses with the
appropriate expertise are needed in our schools to play a pivotal role
in improving the health and educational success of the school-age
child.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2005, from the general fund to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of funding a
position to pursue grants and obtain funds for the school nurse
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The school nurse account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, or
endowments obtained under section 4 of this act must be deposited into
the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to increase the
number of certificated educational staff associate school nurses in
class I school districts. School districts with more than one thousand
five hundred students for every school nurse shall receive priority for
these funds. As used in this section, "school nurse" does not include
nurses in the school nurse corps.
Only the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or
private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise,
for the use and benefit of the purposes of this act and spend gifts,
grants, or endowments or income from the public or private sources to
support the purpose in section 3 of this act, unless the receipt of the
gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

--- END ---