BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.042 and 2001 c 103 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Institutions of higher education shall not use the social
security number of any student, staff, or faculty for identification
except for the purposes of employment, financial aid, research,
assessment, accountability, transcripts, or as otherwise required by
state or federal law.
(2) Each institution of higher education shall develop a system of
personal identifiers for students to be used for grading and other
administrative purposes. The personal identifiers may not be social
security numbers.
(3) Personal identifiers and lists of currently enrolled students
shall not be shared, given, provided, or sold to organizations,
corporations, or other business entities, for the purpose of marketing
goods and services, by institutions of higher education and their
respective alumni associations, without written consent by the student.

--- END ---