BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of reporting disciplinary actions taken against
certificated staff to other states via a national data base used by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, reprimands and
stayed suspensions shall be reported to the same extent that
suspensions and revocations are reported.

--- END ---