BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.030 and 1991 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Benefit year" with respect to each individual, means the
fifty-two consecutive week period beginning with the first day of the
calendar week in which the individual files an application for an
initial determination and thereafter the fifty-two consecutive week
period beginning with the first day of the calendar week in which the
individual next files an application for an initial determination after
the expiration of the individual's last preceding benefit year:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the foregoing limitation shall not be deemed to
preclude the establishment of a new benefit year under the laws of
another state pursuant to any agreement providing for the interstate
combining of employment and wages and the interstate payment of
benefits nor shall this limitation be deemed to preclude the
commissioner from backdating an initial application at the request of
the claimant either for the convenience of the department of employment
security or for any other reason deemed by the commissioner to be good
cause.
(2) An individual's benefit year shall be extended to be fifty-three weeks when at the expiration of fifty-two weeks the establishment
of a new benefit year would result in the use of a quarter of wages in
the new base year that had been included in the individual's prior base
year.
((No)) (3)(a) A benefit year ((will)) may not be established unless
it is determined that the individual earned wages in "employment" in
not less than six hundred eighty hours of the individual's base year((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)).
(b) A benefit year may not be established if an individual:
(i) Earned wages in employment in the fishing and seafood product
preparation and packaging industries assigned the North American
industry classification system codes "1141" and "3117" in not less than
six hundred eighty hours of the individual's base year; and
(ii) Earned at least seventy-five percent of his or her total base
year wages from employment in the fishing and seafood product
preparation and packaging industries; and
(iii) Has total base year wages from employment in the fishing and
seafood product preparation and packaging industries that are more than
1.4 times the average annual wage.
(c) A benefit year ((cannot)) may not be established if the base
year wages include wages earned prior to the establishment of a prior
benefit year unless the individual worked and earned wages since the
last separation from employment immediately before the application for
initial determination in the previous benefit year if the applicant was
an unemployed individual at the time of application, or since the
initial separation in the previous benefit year if the applicant was
not an unemployed individual at the time of filing an application for
initial determination for the previous benefit year, of not less than
six times the weekly benefit amount computed for the individual's new
benefit year.
(d) If an individual's prior benefit year was based on the last
four completed calendar quarters, a new benefit year ((shall)) may not
be established until the new base year does not include any hours used
in the establishment of the prior benefit year.
(4) If the wages of an individual are not based upon a fixed
duration of time or if the individual's wages are paid at irregular
intervals or in such manner as not to extend regularly over the period
of employment, the wages for any week shall be determined in such
manner as the commissioner may by regulation prescribe. Such
regulation shall, so far as possible, secure results reasonably similar
to those which would prevail if the individual were paid his or her
wages at regular intervals.
(5) Individuals who are separated from employment between two
customary work periods if they were employed during the first period
and have reasonable assurance of returning to work during the second
period, are not eligible for benefits during this nonwork period.
However, if the individual is not offered comparable employment with
the same employer in the second customary work period, they are
eligible for benefits beginning the first day of the second period.

--- END ---