BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.530 and 2003 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful:
(a) For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
not equipped with mirrors on the left and right sides of the motorcycle
which shall be so located as to give the driver a complete view of the
highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet to the rear of the
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle: PROVIDED, That mirrors shall not be
required on any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle over twenty-five years
old originally manufactured without mirrors and which has been restored
to its original condition and which is being ridden to or from or
otherwise in conjunction with an antique or classic motorcycle contest,
show, or other such assemblage: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no mirror is
required on any motorcycle manufactured prior to January 1, 1931;
(b) For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
which does not have a windshield unless wearing glasses, goggles, or a
face shield of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol;
(c) For any person under the age of twenty-one years to operate or
ride upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped on a state
highway, county road, or city street unless wearing upon his or her
head a motorcycle helmet except when the vehicle is an antique motor-driven cycle or automobile that is licensed as a motorcycle or when the
vehicle is equipped with seat belts and roll bars approved by the state
patrol. The motorcycle helmet neck or chin strap must be fastened
securely while the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle is in motion.
Persons operating electric-assisted bicycles shall comply with all laws
and regulations related to the use of bicycle helmets;
(d) For any person twenty-one years old or older to operate or ride
upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped on a state highway,
county road, or city street unless wearing upon his or her head a
motorcycle helmet except when the operator (i) is driving an antique
motor-driven cycle at least twenty-five years old; (ii) is driving an
automobile that is licensed as a motorcycle; (iii) is driving a vehicle
equipped with seat belts and roll bars; (iv) is covered by a health
insurance plan providing the operator with at least ten thousand
dollars in medical benefits for injuries incurred as a result of an
accident while operating or riding on a motorcycle; or (v) has
successfully completed a motorcycle skills education program under
chapter 46.81A RCW;
(e) For any person to transport a child under the age of five on a
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle;
(((e))) (f) For any person to sell or offer for sale a motorcycle
helmet that does not meet the requirements established by this section.
(2) The state patrol may adopt and amend rules, pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, concerning standards for glasses,
goggles, and face shields.
(3) For purposes of this section and RCW 46.37.535, "motorcycle
helmet" means a protective covering for the head consisting of a hard
outer shell, padding adjacent to and inside the outer shell, and a neck
or chin strap type retention system, with a sticker indicating that the
motorcycle helmet meets standards established by the United States
Department of Transportation.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.535 and 1990 c 270 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for any person to rent out motorcycles, motor-driven
cycles, or mopeds unless the person also has on hand for rent
motorcycle helmets ((of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state
patrol)) as defined in RCW 46.37.530.
It shall be unlawful for any person under the age of twenty-one
years to rent a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped unless the
person has in his or her possession a motorcycle helmet ((of a type
approved by the state patrol, regardless of from whom the helmet is
obtained)) as defined in RCW 46.37.530.
It is unlawful for any person twenty-one years of age or older to
rent a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped unless the person has
in his or her possession a motorcycle helmet as defined in RCW
46.37.530, except if the person is covered by a health insurance plan
providing the operator with at least ten thousand dollars in medical
benefits for injuries incurred as a result of an accident while
operating or riding on a motorcycle, or has successfully completed a
motorcycle skills education program under chapter 46.81A RCW.

--- END ---