BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that scientific
studies show that sleep contributes significantly to several important
cognitive, emotional, and performance-related functions and that
excessive sleepiness is associated with reduced short-term memory and
learning ability, negative mood, inconsistent performance, poor
productivity, and a loss of some forms of behavioral control. The
legislature further finds that the consequences of insufficient sleep
are particularly pronounced among adolescents because of the changes
experienced by adolescents due to puberty. The legislature further
finds that school districts should consider sleep-friendly start times
that are more likely to result in students that are alert and
performing well in class.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By September 1, 2004, each school district
board of directors shall review the start times of each of the schools
within the district and consider starting high schools no earlier than
9:00 a.m. When making the decision, the board shall consider the
impact of a later start time on the following:
(1) Student academic performance, behavior, attendance, and
tardiness;
(2) Student participation in athletic programs and other
extracurricular activities;
(3) Neighboring schools and school districts' schedules;
(4) Transportation services;
(5) Use of the school for community activities during nonschool
hours;
(6) School food services;
(7) Employment of adolescents;
(8) Safety issues;
(9) Family members; and
(10) Any other consideration that the board deems appropriate to be
considered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act expires December 1,
2004.

--- END ---