BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that twenty-eight of
the state's thirty-nine currently operating county courthouses appear
to meet the state criteria as historic buildings. Washington's
historic county courthouses are an unsurpassed historical and
architectural collection reflecting civic pride, local heritage, and
master craftsmanship. These buildings are intensively used by the
public as the seats of county government and as judicial and criminal
justice centers. As anchors of the downtown commercial cores of their
communities, these courthouses strengthen local commerce, attract
tourism, and provide a sense of identity. Capital improvements to
these landmarks are needed to protect their safety and historic and
architectural integrity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 27.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The historic county courthouse account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account shall be used exclusively to fund the
historic county courthouse grant program.
(2) The historic county courthouse grant program is established
within the department of community, trade, and economic development for
the protection and preservation of the state's historic county
courthouses. The department's office of archaeology and historic
preservation shall administer the historic county courthouse grant
program. No more than one percent of the expenditures from the
historic county courthouse account may be used for the administrative
purposes of the department. All other expenditures from the account
shall be for grants to be made to counties for the protection and
preservation of courthouses that meet the eligibility requirements for
listing on the Washington heritage register established under RCW
27.34.220. Counties receiving grants under this section shall provide
an equal amount of matching funds from public or private sources.
(3) By October 1, 2004, the office of archaeology and historic
preservation, working with the advisory board established in subsection
(4) of this section, shall establish eligibility criteria and a grant
application process. Grants may be made for courthouse protection and
preservation, including character defining architectural features,
general repairs, system upgrades, and improvements to access and
accommodations for persons with disabilities. All rehabilitation work
shall comply with the federal department of the interior's standards
for rehabilitation. Grants shall not be used for expenditures for
courthouse maintenance. Only counties with historic courthouses that
continue to maintain county functions are eligible for grants under
this section.
(4) The office of archaeology and historic preservation shall
establish an historic courthouse advisory board. The advisory board
shall make recommendations to the office regarding eligibility
criteria, the grant application process, and prioritization of
applicants for receipt of grant awards. The board shall include two
county elected officials appointed by the Washington state association
of counties, two county elected officials appointed by the Washington
association of county officials, a representative of a statewide
historic preservation organization, a representative from a county
heritage commission that is a certified local government, a member of
the senate appointed by the president of the senate, a member of the
house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, a member of the state advisory council on historic
preservation, and up to three at-large members with expertise in
architecture, architectural history, construction, construction
management, engineering, planning, or a related field.
(5) If available funds in the account exceed eligible courthouse
grant recipients, historic county-owned facilities such as libraries,
museums, and hospitals may apply for grants using the same criteria.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of ten million dollars is
transferred from the state building construction account for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2005, to the historic county courthouse account.
The sum of ten million dollars is appropriated from the historic county
courthouse account to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, to carry out the
purposes of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---