BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for
borrowed money that is secured by transportation bond revenue shall be
issued by the state which will cause the aggregate debt contracted by
the state to exceed that amount for which payments of principal and
interest in any fiscal year would require the state to expend more than
seventeen percent of the arithmetic mean of state transportation bond
revenue, for the three immediately preceding fiscal years as certified
by the treasurer in accordance with RCW 39.42.070. It is the duty of
the state finance committee to compute annually the amount required to
pay principal of and interest on outstanding debt. In making this
computation, the state finance committee shall include all borrowed
money represented by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness
which are secured by the full faith and credit of the state or are
required to be paid, directly or indirectly, from state transportation
bond payment revenue and which are incurred by the state, any
department, authority, public corporation or quasi public corporation
of the state, any state university or college, or any other public
agency created by the state but not by counties, cities, towns, school
districts, or other municipal corporations, but shall exclude the
following:
(a) Debt incurred pursuant to section 3 of Article VIII of the
Washington state Constitution; and
(b) Indebtedness authorized and incurred after July 1, 2002,
pursuant to statute that requires that the state treasury be
reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and the interest on the
indebtedness, from tolls, fees, or other revenues derived from the
operation of a state transportation facility.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "state transportation bond
payment revenue" means revenue from license fees for motor vehicles and
excise taxes collected by the state on the sale, distribution, or use
of motor vehicle fuel or special fuel that may be used for the payment
of the principal and interest on general obligation bonds that are
exempt from the state debt limit under RCW 39.42.060. State
transportation bond payment revenue shall only include state motor
vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax as distributed under RCW
46.68.090(2) (c), (e), and (f) and motor vehicle license fees
distributed under RCW 46.68.030 and 46.68.035. State transportation
bond payment revenue does not include state motor vehicle license fees
and fuel taxes that are distributed as tribal reservation refunds or
other refunds, statutory distributions of revenue for the benefit of
cities and counties, or distributions to state accounts whose primary
purpose is the payment of bond debt. On or after the effective date of
this act, the treasurer shall compute state transportation bond payment
revenue for the three fiscal years immediately preceding this date, and
determine the arithmetic mean. This computation shall be performed
each year after the close of the fiscal year.

--- END ---