BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 65.16.130 and 1961 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any official of the state or any of its political subdivisions who
is required by law to publish any notice required by law may supplement
publication thereof by radio or television broadcast or both when, in
his judgment, the public interest will be served thereby: PROVIDED,
That the time, place, and nature of such notice only be read or shown
with no reference to any person by name then a candidate for political
office, ((and that such broadcasts shall be made only by duly employed
personnel of the station from which such broadcasts emanate,)) and that
notices by political subdivisions may be made only by stations situated
within the county of origin of the legal notice.

Sec. 2 RCW 65.16.150 and 1961 c 85 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Written documentation of proof of publication of legal notice or
notice of event must be provided by the radio or television ((broadcast
shall be by affidavit of the manager, an assistant manager or a program
director of the)) station broadcasting the ((same)) notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 65.16.140 (Broadcaster to retain copy or
transcription) and 1961 c 85 s 2 & 1951 c 119 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---