BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
efforts by nonbank financial service providers to comply voluntarily
with state and federal statutory and regulatory requirements are vital
to the public interest; and that possible discovery and use in civil
litigation of work produced in connection with voluntary compliance
efforts has an undesirable chilling effect on the use, scope, and
effectiveness of voluntary compliance efforts by nonbank financial
service providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Civil action" means a civil proceeding pending in a court or
other adjudicatory tribunal with jurisdiction to issue a request or
subpoena for records, including a voluntary or mandated alternative
dispute resolution mechanism under which a party may compel the
production of records. "Civil action" does not include an examination,
enforcement proceeding, an administrative hearing conducted under this
chapter, or any other hearing initiated by the director under this
chapter.
(2) "Compliance review personnel" means a person or persons
assigned and directed by a licensee to conduct a compliance review, and
any person engaged or assigned by compliance review personnel to assist
in a compliance review, including any agents, employees, auditors,
consultants, and legal counsel of the licensee.
(3) "Compliance review" means a self-critical analysis conducted by
compliance review personnel to test, review, or evaluate past conduct,
transactions, policies, or procedures for the purpose of confidentially
(a) ascertaining, monitoring, or remediating violations of applicable
state and federal statutes, rules, regulations, or mandatory policies,
statements, or guidelines, (b) assessing and improving compliance with
applicable federal and state laws and regulations, or (c) assessing and
improving financial reporting to federal or state regulatory agencies.
(4) "Compliance review document" means any record prepared or
created by compliance review personnel in connection with a compliance
review. "Compliance review document" includes any documents created or
data generated in the course of conducting a compliance review, but
does not include other underlying documents, data, or factual materials
that are the subject of or source materials for the compliance review,
including any documents in existence prior to the commencement of the
compliance review that are not themselves compliance review documents
related to a past compliance review.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of financial
institutions.
(6) "Licensee" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, association, joint venture; public corporation;
or any other legal or commercial entity that has a valid license issued
by the director under authority granted by chapters 18.44, 19.146,
19.230, 31.04, and 31.45 RCW.
(7) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture; government, governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality; public corporation; or any other legal or commercial
entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Compliance review documents are
confidential and are not discoverable or admissible as evidence in any
civil action.
(2) Compliance review personnel shall not be required to testify at
deposition or trial in any civil action concerning the contents of or
matters addressed in any compliance review or any compliance review
documents, nor as to the actions or activities undertaken by or at the
direction of the licensee in connection with a compliance review.
(3) This section does not:
(a) Limit the discovery or admissibility in any civil action of any
documents that are not compliance review documents;
(b) Limit the discovery or admissibility of the testimony of
compliance review personnel as to the identity of relevant witnesses or
the identification of any relevant documents other than compliance
review documents;
(c) Apply if the licensee expressly waives the privilege in
writing;
(d) Apply if a compliance review document or matters learned in
connection with a compliance review are voluntarily disclosed, but only
to the extent of that disclosure, to a nonaffiliated third party other
than a federal or state regulatory agency or legal counsel for or
independent auditors of the licensee; or
(e) Apply to any information required by statute, rule, or federal
regulation to be maintained by or provided to a governmental agency
while the information is in the possession of the agency, to the extent
applicable law authorizes its disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In a proceeding in which the privilege
provided by this chapter is asserted, a court of competent jurisdiction
may determine after in camera review that the privilege does not apply
to any or all of the documents for which the privilege is claimed, and
if so, the court may order the materials disclosed but shall protect
from disclosure any other material in or related to compliance review
documents or to activities of compliance review personnel to which the
privilege does apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This chapter does not limit, waive, or
abrogate the scope or nature of any other statutory or common law
privilege of this state or the United States, including the attorney-client privilege.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Any licensee that makes a disclosure (1) to
any law enforcement agency of a possible violation of any law or
regulation, or (2) in response to a request for records from any law
enforcement agency, and any director, officer, or employee of such a
licensee, is not liable to any person under any law or regulation for
the disclosure or for any failure to notify the customer, customers, or
any other person of the disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---