BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.311 and 2000 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an electrical board, consisting of
((fourteen)) eighteen members to be appointed by the governor with the
advice of the director of labor and industries as herein provided. It
shall be the purpose and function of the board to advise the director
on all matters pertaining to the enforcement of this chapter including,
but not limited to standards of electrical and telecommunications
installation, minimum inspection procedures, and the adoption of rules
pertaining to the electrical inspection division((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That)). No rules shall be amended or repealed until the electrical
board has first had an opportunity to consider any proposed amendments
or repeals and had an opportunity to make recommendations to the
director relative thereto.
(2) The members of the electrical board shall be selected and
appointed as follows:
(a) One member shall be an employee or officer of a corporation or
public agency generating or distributing electric power;
(b) One member must be an employee or officer of a facilities-based
telecommunications service provider regulated by the Washington state
utilities and transportation commission;
(c) Three members shall be licensed electrical contractors((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, one of these members may be a
representative of a trade association in the electrical industry;
(d) One member shall be a licensed telecommunications contractor;
(e) One member shall be an employee, or officer, or representative
of a corporation or firm engaged in the business of manufacturing or
distributing electrical and telecommunications materials, equipment, or
devices;
(f) One member shall be a person with knowledge of the electrical
industry, not related to the electrical industry, to represent the
public;
(g) Three members shall be certified electricians;
(h) One member shall be an outside journeyman lineman;
(i) One member shall be a telecommunications worker;
(j) One member shall be a licensed professional electrical engineer
qualified to do business in the state of Washington and designated as
a registered communications distribution designer;
(k) One member shall be an officer, or management representative,
of a corporation or firm engaged in the business of appliance repair;
(l) One member shall be an officer, or management representative,
of a corporation or firm engaged in the business of installing heating,
ventilation, and air conditioning systems or equipment;
(m) One member shall be a representative of industrial
manufacturers that use industrial electricians; and
(n) One nonvoting member must be a building official from an
incorporated city or town with an electrical inspection program
established under RCW 19.28.141.
(3) The regular term of each member shall be four years: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, The original board shall be appointed on June 9, 1988, for the
following terms: The first term of the member representing a
corporation or public agency generating or distributing electric power
shall serve four years; two members representing licensed electrical
contractors shall serve three years; the member representing a
manufacturer or distributor of electrical equipment or devices shall
serve three years; the member representing the public and one member
representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve two years; the
three members selected as certified electricians shall serve for terms
of one, two, and three years, respectively; the member selected as the
licensed professional electrical engineer shall serve for one year. In
appointing the original board, the governor shall give due
consideration to the value of continuity in membership from predecessor
boards. Thereafter, the governor shall appoint or reappoint board
members for terms of four years and to fill vacancies created by the
completion of the terms of the original members. When new positions
are created, the governor may appoint the initial members to the new
positions to staggered terms of one to three years. The governor shall
also fill vacancies caused by death, resignation, or otherwise for the
unexpired term of such members by appointing their successors from the
same business classification. The same procedure shall be followed in
making such subsequent appointments as is provided for the original
appointments. The board, at this first meeting shall elect one of its
members to serve as ((chairman)) chair. Any person acting as the chief
electrical inspector shall serve as secretary of the board during his
or her tenure as chief state inspector.
(4) Meetings of the board shall be held at least quarterly in
accordance with a schedule established by the board. Each member of
the board shall receive compensation in accordance with RCW 43.03.240
and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 which shall be paid out of the electrical
license fund, upon vouchers approved by the director of labor and
industries.

--- END ---