BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 1.20.015 and 1955 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The flag of the United States and the flag of the state shall be
prominently installed, displayed and maintained in schools, court
rooms, ((and)) state buildings, and ferry vessels operated by the
department of transportation.

--- END ---