BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.73.180 and 1987 c 214 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Other vehicles not herein defined by this chapter shall not be
used for transportation of patients ((who must be carried on a
stretcher or)) who may require medical attention en route, except that
such transportation may be used when a disaster creates a situation
that cannot be served by licensed ambulances.
(2) Except as excluded by rules established by the department,
specialized commercial transport vehicles such as cabulances, stretcher
vans, and wheelchair vans may transport, for comfort and convenience,
individuals whose condition does not indicate that medical attention
would be needed during transport.
(3) The department shall define by rule the terms necessary to
administer this section.

--- END ---