BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.130.060 and 2001 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the authority specified in RCW 18.130.050, the
secretary has the following additional authority:
(1) To employ such investigative, administrative, and clerical
staff as necessary for the enforcement of this chapter;
(2) Upon the request of a board, to appoint pro tem members to
participate as members of a panel of the board in connection with
proceedings specifically identified in the request. Individuals so
appointed must meet the same minimum qualifications as regular members
of the board. Pro tem members appointed for matters under this chapter
are appointed for a term of no more than one year. No pro tem member
may serve more than four one-year terms. While serving as board
members pro tem, persons so appointed have all the powers, duties, and
immunities, and are entitled to the emoluments, including travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of regular
members of the board. The chairperson of a panel shall be a regular
member of the board appointed by the board chairperson. Panels have
authority to act as directed by the board with respect to all matters
concerning the review, investigation, and adjudication of all
complaints, allegations, charges, and matters subject to the
jurisdiction of the board. The authority to act through panels does
not restrict the authority of the board to act as a single body at any
phase of proceedings within the board's jurisdiction. Board panels may
make interim orders and issue final decisions with respect to matters
and cases delegated to the panel by the board. Final decisions may be
appealed as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure
Act;
(3) To establish fees to be paid for witnesses, expert witnesses,
and consultants used in any investigation and to establish fees to
witnesses in any agency adjudicative proceeding as authorized by RCW
34.05.446;
(4) To conduct investigations and practice reviews at the direction
of the disciplining authority and to issue subpoenas, administer oaths,
and take depositions in the course of conducting those investigations
and practice reviews at the direction of the disciplining authority;
(5) To obtain copies of health care information pursuant to RCW
70.02.050(2) that are relevant to a matter under investigation. In the
event there is reasonable cause to believe a delay will result in the
destruction or alteration of such records, investigators may enter the
facility, during normal business hours, where the records are located
and immediately make copies of the original records;
(6) To obtain an administrative investigation warrant in accordance
with section 2 of this act in the event it is necessary to obtain
physical evidence;
(7) To have the health professions regulatory program establish a
system to recruit potential public members, to review the
qualifications of such potential members, and to provide orientation to
those public members appointed pursuant to law by the governor or the
secretary to the boards and commissions specified in RCW
18.130.040(2)(b), and to the advisory committees and councils for
professions specified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(a).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In the event it is necessary to obtain physical evidence, a
judge of a court of competent jurisdiction, and upon proper oath or
affirmation showing probable cause, may issue warrants for the purpose
of conducting administrative investigations authorized by this chapter,
or rules adopted under this chapter, and removal of property
appropriate to the investigations. For purposes of the issuance of
administrative investigation warrants, probable cause exists upon
showing a valid public interest in the effective enforcement of this
chapter, or rules adopted under this chapter, sufficient to justify
administrative investigation of the area, premises, building, or
conveyance in the circumstances specified in the application for the
warrant.
(2) A warrant shall be issued only upon receipt of an affidavit of
a designated officer or employee having knowledge of the facts alleged,
sworn to before the judge and establishing the grounds for issuing the
warrant. If the judge is satisfied that grounds for the application
exist or that there is probable cause to believe they exist, the judge
shall issue a warrant identifying the area, premises, building, or
conveyance to be inspected, the purpose of the investigation, and, if
appropriate, the type of property to be inspected, if any. The warrant
shall:
(a) State the grounds for its issuance and the name of each person
whose affidavit has been taken in support;
(b) Be directed to a person authorized by RCW 18.130.060 to execute
it;
(c) Command the person to whom it is directed to inspect the area,
premises, building, or conveyance identified for the purpose specified
and, if appropriate, direct the seizure of the property specified;
(d) Identify the item or types of property to be removed, if any;
and
(e) Direct that it be served during normal business hours and
designate the judge to whom it shall be returned.
(3) A warrant issued in accordance with this section must be
executed and returned within ten days of its date unless, upon a
showing of a need for additional time, the court orders otherwise. If
property is removed in accordance with a warrant, a copy shall be given
to the person from whom or from whose premises the property is taken,
together with a receipt for the property taken. The return of the
warrant shall be made promptly, accompanied by a written inventory of
any property taken. The inventory shall be made in the presence of the
person executing the warrant and of the person from whose possession or
premises the property was taken, if present, or in the presence of at
least one credible person other than the person executing the warrant.
A copy of the inventory shall be delivered to the person from whom or
from whose premises the property was taken and to the applicant for the
warrant.
(4) The judge who has issued a warrant shall attach a copy of the
documents in connection with the warrant and cause them to be filed
with the clerk of the court of the county in which the warrant is to be
executed.
(5) In the event consent to entry and removal of property is given,
a warrant is not required. A written inventory shall be made and
provided as set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.130.090 and 1993 c 367 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the disciplining authority determines, upon investigation,
that there is reason to believe a violation of RCW 18.130.180 has
occurred, a statement of charge or charges ((shall)) may be prepared
and served upon the license holder or applicant at the earliest
practical time. The statement of charge or charges shall be
accompanied by a notice that the license holder or applicant may
request ((a hearing)) an adjudicative proceeding to contest the charge
or charges.
(a) The license holder or applicant must file a request for
((hearing)) an adjudicative proceeding with the disciplining authority
within twenty days after being served the statement of charges. If the
twenty-day limit results in a hardship upon the license holder or
applicant, he or she may request for good cause an extension not to
exceed sixty additional days. If the disciplining authority finds that
there is good cause, it shall grant the extension.
(b) The failure to request ((a hearing)) an adjudicative proceeding
constitutes a default((, whereupon)). The disciplining authority may
then enter a decision on the basis of the facts available to it.
(2) As an alternative to filing a statement of charge or charges,
the disciplining authority may issue to a license holder or applicant
a written notice of action imposing any sanction authorized under RCW
18.130.160. The notice shall state the reasons for the action.
(a) The applicant or license holder has the right to an
adjudicative proceeding. If an adjudicative proceeding is requested,
the action will be of no effect, other than to identify the allegations
and proposed sanctions. The license holder or applicant must file a
request for an adjudicative proceeding with the disciplining authority
within twenty days after being served the action. If the twenty-day
limit results in a hardship upon the license holder or applicant, he or
she may request for good cause an extension not to exceed sixty
additional days. If the disciplining authority finds that there is
good cause, it shall grant the extension.
(b) In the event no request for an adjudicative proceeding is filed
within the time allowed by (a) of this subsection, the action becomes
effective.
(3) If ((a hearing)) an adjudicative proceeding is requested, the
time of the ((hearing)) adjudicative proceeding shall be fixed by the
disciplining authority as soon as convenient, but the ((hearing))
adjudicative proceeding shall not be held earlier than thirty days
after service of the charges or notice of action upon the license
holder or applicant.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.130.190 and 2003 c 53 s 141 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall investigate complaints concerning practice
by unlicensed persons of a profession or business for which a license
is required by the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040. In the
investigation of the complaints, the secretary shall have the same
authority as provided the secretary under RCW 18.130.050 and
18.130.060.
(2) The secretary may issue a notice of intention to issue a cease
and desist order to any person whom the secretary has reason to believe
is engaged in the unlicensed practice of a profession or business for
which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW
18.130.040. The person to whom such notice is issued may request an
adjudicative proceeding to contest the charges. The request for
hearing must be filed within twenty days after service of the notice of
intention to issue a cease and desist order. The failure to request a
hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the secretary may enter a
permanent cease and desist order, which may include a civil fine. All
proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) If the secretary makes a final determination that a person has
engaged or is engaging in unlicensed practice, the secretary may issue
a cease and desist order. In addition, the secretary may impose a
civil fine in an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars for each day
upon which the person engaged in unlicensed practice of a business or
profession for which a license is required by one or more of the
chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040. The proceeds of such fines shall
be deposited to the health professions account.
(4) If the secretary makes a written finding of fact that the
public interest will be irreparably harmed by delay in issuing an
order, the secretary may issue a temporary cease and desist order. The
person receiving a temporary cease and desist order shall be provided
an opportunity for a prompt hearing. The temporary cease and desist
order shall remain in effect until further order of the secretary. The
failure to request a prompt or regularly scheduled hearing constitutes
a default, whereupon the secretary may enter a permanent cease and
desist order, which may include a civil fine.
(5) Neither the issuance of a cease and desist order nor payment of
a civil fine shall relieve the person so practicing or operating a
business without a license from criminal prosecution therefor, but the
remedy of a cease and desist order or civil fine shall be in addition
to any criminal liability. The cease and desist order is conclusive
proof of unlicensed practice and may be enforced under RCW 7.21.060.
This method of enforcement of the cease and desist order or civil fine
may be used in addition to, or as an alternative to, any provisions for
enforcement of agency orders set out in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) The attorney general, a county prosecuting attorney, the
secretary, a board, or any person may in accordance with the laws of
this state governing injunctions, maintain an action in the name of
this state to enjoin any person practicing a profession or business for
which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040
without a license from engaging in such practice or operating such
business until the required license is secured. However, the
injunction shall not relieve the person so practicing or operating a
business without a license from criminal prosecution therefor, but the
remedy by injunction shall be in addition to any criminal liability.
(7)(a) Unlicensed practice of a profession or operating a business
for which a license is required by the chapters specified in RCW
18.130.040, unless otherwise exempted by law, constitutes a gross
misdemeanor for a single violation.
(b) Each subsequent violation, whether alleged in the same or in
subsequent prosecutions, is a class C felony punishable according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(8) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a court because of a violation of this section shall be
remitted to the health professions account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 4 of this act takes effect January
1, 2005.

--- END ---