BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.04.530 and 1995 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the following
do not apply to a local exchange company that serves less than two
percent of the access lines, or is classified as a competitive local
exchange company under RCW 80.36.320 in the state of Washington: RCW
80.04.080, 80.04.300 through 80.04.330, and, except for RCW 80.08.140,
chapters 80.08, 80.12, and 80.16 RCW.
(b) Nothing in this subsection (1) shall affect the commission's
authority over the rates, service, accounts, valuations, estimates, or
determinations of costs, as well as the authority to determine whether
any expenditure is fair, reasonable, and commensurate with the service,
material, supplies, or equipment received.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, the number of access lines
served by a local exchange company includes the number of access lines
served in this state by any affiliate of that local exchange company.
(2) Any local exchange company for which an exemption is provided
under this section shall not be required to file reports or data with
the commission, except each such company shall file with the commission
an annual report that consists of its annual balance sheet and results
of operations, both presented on a Washington state jurisdictional
basis. This requirement may be satisfied by the filing of information
or reports and underlying studies filed with exchange carrier entities
or regulatory agencies if the jurisdictionally separated results of
operations for Washington state can be obtained from the information or
reports. This subsection shall not be applied to exempt a local
exchange company from an obligation to respond to data requests in an
adjudicative proceeding in which it is a party.
(3) The commission may, in response to customer complaints or on
its own motion and after notice and hearing, establish additional
reporting requirements for a specific local exchange company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires July 1, 2005.

--- END ---