BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It remains the intent of the legislature
that all applicants to the Washington WorkFirst program shall be
focused on obtaining paid, unsubsidized employment. The focus of the
Washington WorkFirst program continues to be work for all recipients.
The key principles of the state temporary assistance for needy families
program must be to help move people from welfare to work; to be a
short-term transitional experience, not a way of life; and to assist
families to receive the child care and health care they need to protect
their children as they move from welfare to work. A statewide
partnership of state agencies, public education, business, and
nongovernmental providers are in place in Washington to provide
families with services and opportunities to gain competitive
employment. The legislature recognizes that there will always be
families while working hard to find work, need assistance over a longer
period. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that these
families have available to them continuing assistance and other
services and resources that will assist in gaining competitive
employment while those who are uncooperative and malingering no longer
receive a cash grant.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08A.260 and 2003 c 383 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each recipient shall be assessed after determination of program
eligibility and before referral to job search. Assessments shall be
based upon factors that are critical to obtaining employment, including
but not limited to education, availability of child care, history of
family violence, history of substance abuse, and other factors that
affect the ability to obtain employment. Assessments may be performed
by the department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be
based on a uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be
accepted by all agencies and organizations serving the recipient.
Based on the assessment, an individual responsibility plan shall be
prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal and a plan for moving
the recipient immediately into employment; (b) contains the obligation
of the recipient to become and remain employed; (c) moves the recipient
into whatever employment the recipient is capable of handling as
quickly as possible; and (d) describes the services available to the
recipient to enable the recipient to obtain and keep employment. If
the assessment in this subsection indicates the recipient is able to
engage in job search, he or she shall participate in job search for
thirty days before receiving the cash benefit portion of public
assistance. If the recipient has been aggressively participating in a
local job search prior to application by making at least three job
contacts each day or fifteen job contacts each week and documented by
providing copies of completed job applications or verification of job
interviews, the thirty-day waiting period or a portion shall be waived.
(2) Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and
do not qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall
engage in self-directed service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.
(3) If a recipient ((refuses to engage in work and work activities
required by the department, the family's grant shall be reduced by the
recipient's share, and may, if the department determines it
appropriate, be terminated)) has refused to engage in work and work
activities as required by the department, without good cause, the
sanction shall be a reduction of cash benefits by forty percent and
mandatory designation of a protective payee. A protective payee is a
person or an employee of an agency who manages client cash benefits to
provide for basic needs such as housing, utilities, clothing, child
care, and food. Before cash benefits are reduced by forty percent and
sent to a protective payee, the department shall conduct a case
staffing to determine whether the recipient has good cause for
nonparticipation provided in RCW 74.08A.270. The recipient and his or
her chosen representative shall be allowed to attend this case
staffing. The cash benefit portion of the public assistance shall be
restored and protective payee discontinued the first of the following
month after the recipient resumes full and active participation as
required for twelve, full, consecutive weeks.
(4) ((The department may waive the penalties required under
subsection (3) of this section, subject to a finding that the recipient
refused to engage in work for good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270))
The department shall sanction a recipient who has: (a) Received
temporary assistance for needy families for sixty months, as provided
under RCW 74.08A.010; and (b) refused to engage in work and work
activities as required by the department, without good cause. The
sanction for refusing to engage in work without good cause shall be a
reduction of cash benefits by forty percent and mandatory designation
of a protective payee. A protective payee is a person or an employee
of an agency who manages client cash benefits to provide for basic
needs such as housing, utilities, clothing, child care, and food.
Before cash benefits are reduced by forty percent and sent to a
protective payee, the department shall conduct a case staffing to
determine whether the recipient has good cause for nonparticipation
provided in RCW 74.08A.270. The recipient and his or her chosen
representative shall be allowed to attend this case staffing. The cash
benefit portion of the public assistance shall be restored and
protective payee discontinued the first of the following month after
the recipient resumes full and active participation as required for
twelve, full, consecutive weeks.
(5) In implementing this section, the department shall assign the
highest priority to the most employable clients, including adults in
two-parent families and parents in single-parent families that include
older preschool or school-age children to be engaged in work
activities.
(6) In consultation with the recipient, the department or
contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is
available in the local area where the recipient resides.

--- END ---