BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.52.205 and 1994 c 261 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of animal cruelty in the first degree when,
except as authorized in law, he or she intentionally (a) inflicts
substantial pain on, (b) causes physical injury to, or (c) kills an
animal by a means causing undue suffering, or forces a minor to inflict
unnecessary pain, injury, or death on an animal. The malicious use of
a hook in a manner whereby the hook purposefully pierces the flesh of
a bird or mammal constitutes animal cruelty in the first degree.
(2) Animal cruelty in the first degree is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---