BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, the
council of presidents, and the superintendent of public instruction
shall:
(a) Take actions to strengthen, expand, and create dual enrollment
programs available to students on high school campuses by removing
barriers that inhibit the availability of such programs and, where
possible, by creating incentives for the offering of such courses and
programs; and
(b) Continue to examine the feasibility of using the Washington
assessment of student learning as a factor in higher education
admission and placement processes.
(2) "Dual enrollment programs" are defined as those courses
allowing high school students the ability to earn postsecondary course
credits and high school credits toward graduation concurrently. Such
programs include, but are not limited to, running start, tech-prep,
college in the high school, advanced placement, and international
baccalaureate.
(3) By December 15, 2004, the organizations identified in
subsection (1) of this section shall report to the higher education and
education committees of the legislature on actions that were taken to
reduce or eliminate barriers and what incentives were created. In
addition, the report shall include actions the legislature should take
to encourage the availability of dual enrollment and programs on high
school campuses.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2004.

--- END ---