BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.010 and 1973 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is declared to be the public policy of the state of Washington
to maintain the highest possible standards to ((insure)) ensure the
purity of all waters of the state consistent with public health and
public enjoyment thereof, the propagation and protection of wild life,
birds, game, fish and other aquatic life, and the industrial
development of the state, and to that end require the use of all known
available and reasonable methods by industries and others, except urban
storm water runoff, to prevent and control the pollution of the waters
of the state of Washington. Urban storm water runoff shall be required
to reduce the discharge of pollutants to the maximum extent
practicable, including management practices, control techniques, and
system design and engineering methods, and such other provisions as the
administrator of the federal environmental protection agency, under the
guidance of the federal environmental protection agency's storm water
regulations, shall determine appropriate for the control of such
pollutants. Consistent with this policy, the state of Washington will
exercise its powers, as fully and as effectively as possible, to retain
and secure high quality for all waters of the state. The state of
Washington in recognition of the federal government's interest in the
quality of the navigable waters of the United States, of which certain
portions thereof are within the jurisdictional limits of this state,
proclaims a public policy of working cooperatively with the federal
government in a joint effort to extinguish the sources of water quality
degradation, while at the same time preserving and vigorously
exercising state powers to ((insure)) ensure that present and future
standards of water quality within the state shall be determined by the
citizenry, through and by the efforts of state government, of the state
of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.48.080 and 1987 c 109 s 126 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to throw, drain, run, or
otherwise discharge into any of the waters of this state, or to cause,
permit or suffer to be thrown, run, drained, allowed to seep or
otherwise discharged into such waters any organic or inorganic matter
that shall cause or tend to cause pollution of such waters according to
the determination of the department, as provided for in this chapter.
(2) For the purposes of urban storm water runoff, it shall be
unlawful for any person to throw, drain, run, or otherwise discharge
into any of the waters of this state, or to cause, permit, or suffer to
be thrown, run, drained, allowed to seep or otherwise discharged into
such waters any organic or inorganic matter that shall cause or tend to
cause pollution of such waters according to the provisions of the
federal environmental protection agency's storm water regulations, and
the determination of the administrator of the federal environmental
protection agency under the guidance of those regulations.

--- END ---