BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Snohomish county shall conduct an initial
feasible air study of commercial passenger air service at Paine Field.
The elements studied must include, but are not limited to:
(1) Determining the service market area;
(2) Commercial passenger air service market and feasibility;
(3) The level of service that could be provided at Paine Field;
(4) Determining the customer base from the public, business, and
government;
(5) A comparison of market size to other small state airports such
as Bellingham, Olympia, Tri-cities, Wenatchee, and Yakima;
(6) The potential cost savings to the public, business, and
government; and
(7) The potential economic impact to Snohomish county.
The county shall send its report to the legislature by December 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated as a capital
budget item for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004, from the
multimodal account to the department of community, trade, and economic
development solely for distribution to Snohomish county to carry out
the purposes of this act.

--- END ---