BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.391 and 1999 c 274 s 4 and 1999 c 272 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of an
offense relating to motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation
of the driver's license is mandatory, other than vehicular homicide or
vehicular assault, or who has had his or her license suspended under
RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), may submit to the department an
application for an occupational driver's license. The department, upon
receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining that the petitioner
is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that the
petitioner operate a motor vehicle, may issue an occupational driver's
license and may set definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394.
No person may petition for, and the department shall not issue, an
occupational driver's license that is effective during the first thirty
days of any suspension or revocation imposed either for a violation of
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or
for both a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and under RCW
46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a) where the action arises from the same
incident. A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an occupational driver's license may request a hearing
as provided by rule of the department.
(2)(a) A person licensed under this chapter whose driver's license
is suspended administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic
ticket under RCW 46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility
laws under chapter 46.29 RCW; or for multiple violations within a
specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291, may apply to the
department for an occupational driver's license if the applicant
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that one of the
following additional conditions are met:
(i) The applicant is in an apprenticeship program or ((an on-the-job training program for which)) is gainfully employed and a driver's
license is required;
(ii) The applicant presents evidence that he or she has applied for
a position in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program and the
program has certified that a driver's license is required to begin the
program, provided that a license granted under this provision shall be
in effect no longer than fourteen days;
(iii) The applicant is in a program that assists persons who are
enrolled in a WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to
become gainfully employed and the program requires a driver's license;
or
(iv) The applicant is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is
participating in meetings of a twelve-step group such as alcoholics
anonymous.
(b) If the suspension is for failure to respond, pay, or comply
with a notice of traffic infraction or conviction, the applicant must
enter into a payment plan with the court unless such a plan is not
available.
(c) An occupational driver's license issued to an applicant
described in (a) of this subsection shall be valid for the period of
the suspension or revocation but not more than two years. The
suspension or revocation of the regular driver's license shall not be
affected by the issuance of an occupational license.
(d) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational
driver's license granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in
an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program, or is no longer
gainfully employed, the director shall give written notice by first
class mail to the driver that the occupational driver's license shall
be canceled. The effective date of cancellation shall be fifteen days
from the date of mailing the notice. If at any time before the
cancellation goes into effect the driver submits evidence of continued
enrollment in the program or continued employment, the cancellation
shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective, the driver may
obtain, at no additional charge, a new occupational driver's license
upon submittal of evidence of enrollment in another program or gainful
employment that meets the criteria set forth in this subsection.
(e) The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license
under (a)(iv) of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive
transit services sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation
in the programs referenced under (a)(iv) of this subsection.
(3) An applicant for an occupational driver's license is eligible
to receive such license only if:
(a) Within one year immediately preceding the date of the offense
that gave rise to the present conviction, the applicant has not
committed any offense relating to motor vehicles for which suspension
or revocation of a driver's license is mandatory; and
(b) Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the
offense that gave rise to the present conviction or incident, the
applicant has not committed any of the following offenses: (i) Driving
or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor; (ii) vehicular homicide under RCW
46.61.520; or (iii) vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; and
(c) The applicant is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes
it essential that he or she operate a motor vehicle, except as allowed
under subsection (2)(a) of this section; and
(d) The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW.
(4) The director shall cancel an occupational driver's license upon
receipt of notice that the holder thereof has been convicted of
operating a motor vehicle in violation of its restrictions, or of a
separate offense that under chapter 46.20 RCW would warrant suspension
or revocation of a regular driver's license. The cancellation is
effective as of the date of the conviction, and continues with the same
force and effect as any suspension or revocation under this title.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.110 and 2003 c 380 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.55.105(2) is two
hundred fifty dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other
monetary obligation is imposed by a court under this chapter it is
immediately payable. If the ((person is unable to pay at that time the
court may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the period in which
the penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the
time established for payment the court shall notify the department of
the failure to pay the penalty)) court determines, in its discretion
that a person is not able to pay a monetary obligation in full, and not
more than one year has passed since the effective date of this act or
the date the monetary obligation initially became due and payable, the
court shall enter into a payment plan with the person, unless the
person has previously been granted a payment plan with respect to the
same monetary obligation, in which case the court may, at its
discretion, implement a payment plan. "Payment plan," as used in this
section, means a plan that requires reasonable payments based on the
financial ability of the person to pay. The person may voluntarily pay
an amount at any time in addition to the payments required under the
payment plan:
(a) If a payment required to be made under the payment plan is
delinquent or the person fails to complete a community restitution
program on or before the time established under the payment plan, the
court shall notify the department of the person's failure to meet the
conditions of the plan, and the department shall suspend the person's
driver's license or driving privilege until ((the penalty has)) all
monetary obligations, including those imposed under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section, have been paid ((and the penalty provided in
subsection (4) of this section has been paid)), and court authorized
community restitution has been completed or until the department has
been notified that the court has entered into a new time payment or
community restitution agreement with the person.
(b) If a person has not entered into a payment plan with the court
and has not paid the monetary obligation in full on or before the time
established for payment, the court shall notify the department of the
delinquency. The department shall suspend the person's driver's
license or driving privilege until all monetary obligations have been
paid, including those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, or until the person has entered into a payment plan under this
section.
(c) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the
court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be
wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The
administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per infraction or
twenty-five dollars per payment plan, whichever is less.
(d) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with
outside entities to administer its payment plan system. When outside
entities are used for the administration of a payment plan, the court
may assess the person a reasonable fee for such administrative
services, which fee may be calculated on a periodic, percentage, or
other basis. Fees collected under this subsection shall be wholly
retained by the city or county with jurisdiction, for payment to its
outside entity.
(e) If a court authorized community restitution program for
offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court may allow
conversion of all or part of the monetary obligations due under
subsection (5) of this section to court authorized community
restitution in lieu of time payments if the person is unable to make
reasonable time payments.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed
a fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall
this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an additional penalty of twenty
dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional
penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a court
authorized community restitution program for offenders is available in
the jurisdiction, the court ((shall)) may allow offenders to offset all
or a part of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation
in the court authorized community restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited as
provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the revenue received by the
county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into
the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city
or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.
(9) A person may not enter into a second or subsequent payment plan
if the person is in noncompliance with the terms of any existing or
prior plan.
(10) A person is not eligible to enter into a payment plan if any
delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty imposed by the
court under this section has been assigned to a collection agency and
legal action has commenced to collect the delinquent amount.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.64.025 and 1999 c 86 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person violates his or her written promise to
appear in court, ((or)) fails to appear for a scheduled court hearing,
or fails to comply with the terms of a citation, the court in which the
defendant failed to appear or comply shall promptly give notice of such
fact to the department of licensing. Whenever thereafter the case in
which the defendant failed to appear or comply is adjudicated, the
court hearing the case shall promptly file with the department a
certificate showing that the case has been adjudicated.
(2)(a) Where compliance with the terms of a misdemeanor citation is
limited to the payment of a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or
other monetary obligation, and the court determines, in its discretion,
that a person is not able to pay the monetary obligation in full, and
not more than one year has passed since the effective date of this act
or the date the monetary obligation initially became due and payable,
the court shall enter into a payment plan with the person, unless the
person has previously been granted a payment plan with respect to the
same monetary obligation, in which case the court may, at its
discretion, implement a payment plan. "Payment plan," as used in this
section, means a plan that requires reasonable payments based on the
financial ability of the person to pay. The person may voluntarily pay
any amount at any time in addition to these payments. If a person has
entered into a payment plan under this subsection, the court shall not
notify the department of licensing that the person has failed to comply
with the terms of a citation as it applies to payment of the monetary
obligation unless a payment required to be made under the payment plan
is delinquent.
(b) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the
court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be
wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The
administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per infraction or
twenty-five dollars per payment plan, whichever is less.
(c) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with
outside entities to administer its payment plan system. When outside
entities are used for the administration of a payment plan, the court
may assess the person a reasonable fee for such administrative
services, which fee may be calculated on a periodic, percentage, or
other basis. Fees collected under this subsection shall be wholly
retained by the city or county with jurisdiction, for payment to its
outside entity.
(d) A person may not enter into a second or subsequent payment plan
if the person is in noncompliance with the terms of any existing or
prior plan.
(e) A person is not eligible to enter into a payment plan if any
delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty imposed by the
court under this section has been assigned to a collection agency and
legal action has commenced to collect the delinquent amount.

--- END ---