BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.101 and 2003 c 264 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A transfer of ownership in a motor vehicle is perfected by
compliance with the requirements of this section.
(1)(a) If an owner transfers his or her interest in a vehicle,
other than by the creation, deletion, or change of a security interest,
the owner shall, at the time of the delivery of the vehicle, execute an
assignment to the transferee and provide an odometer disclosure
statement under RCW 46.12.124 on the certificate of ownership or as the
department otherwise prescribes, and cause the certificate and
assignment to be transmitted to the transferee. The owner shall notify
the department or its agents or subagents, in writing, on the
appropriate form, of the date of the sale or transfer, the name and
address of the owner and of the transferee, the transferee's driver's
license number if available, and such description of the vehicle,
including the vehicle identification number, the license plate number,
or both, as may be required in the appropriate form provided or
approved for that purpose by the department. The form provided or
approved by the department must include the statement "Providing false
information on a seller's report of sale submitted to the department or
its agents is a criminal violation of RCW 9A.76.175." The report of
sale will be deemed properly filed if all information required in this
section is provided on the form and includes a department-authorized
notation that the document was received by the department, its agents,
or subagents on or before the fifth day after the sale of the vehicle,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and state and federal holidays.
(b) Agents and subagents shall immediately electronically transmit
the seller's report of sale to the department. Reports of sale
processed and recorded by the department's agents or subagents may be
subject to fees as specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b). By
January 1, 2003, the department shall create a system enabling the
seller of a vehicle to transmit the report of sale electronically. The
system created by the department must immediately indicate on the
department's vehicle record that a seller's report of sale has been
filed. However, if an abandoned vehicle report has been filed by a tow
operator, the electronic submittal must be rejected and the owner must
file the report of sale on a form prescribed by the department that
includes the signature of the purchaser of the vehicle as evidence that
the purchaser is accepting liability for the vehicle.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section to provide
an odometer disclosure statement apply to the transfer of vehicles held
for lease when transferred to a lessee and then to the lessor at the
end of the leasehold and to vehicles held in a fleet when transferred
to a purchaser.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.55.100 and 46.70.122 the
transferee shall within fifteen days after delivery to the transferee
of the vehicle, execute the application for a new certificate of
ownership in the same space provided therefor on the certificate or as
the department prescribes, and cause the certificates and application
to be transmitted to the department.
(4) Upon request of the owner or transferee, a secured party in
possession of the certificate of ownership shall, unless the transfer
was a breach of its security agreement, either deliver the certificate
to the transferee for transmission to the department or, when the
secured party receives the owner's assignment from the transferee, it
shall transmit the transferee's application for a new certificate, the
existing certificate, and the required fee to the department.
Compliance with this section does not affect the rights of the secured
party.
(5) If a security interest is reserved or created at the time of
the transfer, the certificate of ownership shall be retained by or
delivered to the person who becomes the secured party, and the parties
shall comply with the provisions of RCW 46.12.170.
(6) If the purchaser or transferee fails or neglects to make
application to transfer the certificate of ownership and license
registration within fifteen days after the date of delivery of the
vehicle, he or she shall on making application for transfer be assessed
a twenty-five dollar penalty on the sixteenth day and two dollars
additional for each day thereafter, but not to exceed one hundred
dollars. The director may by rule establish conditions under which the
penalty will not be assessed when an application for transfer is
delayed for reasons beyond the control of the purchaser. Conditions
for not assessing the penalty may be established for but not limited to
delays caused by:
(a) The department requesting additional supporting documents;
(b) Extended hospitalization or illness of the purchaser;
(c) Failure of a legal owner to release his or her interest;
(d) Failure, negligence, or nonperformance of the department,
auditor, or subagent.
Failure or neglect to make application to transfer the certificate
of ownership and license registration within forty-five days after the
date of delivery of the vehicle is a misdemeanor.
(7) Upon receipt of an application for reissue or replacement of a
certificate of ownership and transfer of license registration,
accompanied by the endorsed certificate of ownership or other
documentary evidence as is deemed necessary, the department shall, if
the application is in order and if all provisions relating to the
certificate of ownership and license registration have been complied
with, issue new certificates of title and license registration as in
the case of an original issue and shall transmit the fees together with
an itemized detailed report to the state treasurer.
(8) Once each quarter the department shall report to the department
of revenue a list of those vehicles for which a seller's report has
been received but no transfer of title has taken place.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.12.102 and 2002 c 279 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An owner who has made a bona fide sale or transfer of a vehicle
and has delivered possession of it to a purchaser shall not by reason
of any of the provisions of this title be deemed the owner of the
vehicle so as to be subject to civil liability or criminal liability
for the operation of the vehicle thereafter by another person when the
owner has also fulfilled both of the following requirements:
(a) When the owner has made proper endorsement and delivery of the
certificate of ownership and has delivered the certificate of
registration as provided in this chapter;
(b) When the owner has delivered to the department either a
properly filed report of sale that includes all of the information
required in RCW 46.12.101(1) and is delivered to the department within
five days of the sale of the vehicle excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
state and federal holidays, or appropriate documents for registration
of the vehicle pursuant to the sale or transfer.
(2) When a registered tow truck operator submits an abandoned
vehicle report to the department for a vehicle sold at an abandoned
vehicle auction, any previous owner is relieved of civil or criminal
liability for the operation of the vehicle from the date of sale
thereafter, and liability is transferred to the purchaser of the
vehicle as listed on the abandoned vehicle report.
(3) Providing false information on a seller's report of sale
submitted to the department or its agents is a violation of RCW
9A.76.175.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.55.100 and 2002 c 279 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of impoundment the registered tow truck operator
providing the towing service shall give immediate notification, by
telephone or radio, to a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction who
shall maintain a log of such reports. A law enforcement agency, or a
private communication center acting on behalf of a law enforcement
agency, shall within six to twelve hours of the impoundment, provide to
a requesting operator the name and address of the legal and registered
owners of the vehicle, and the registered owner of any personal
property registered or titled with the department that is attached to
or contained in or on the impounded vehicle, the vehicle identification
number, and any other necessary, pertinent information. The initial
notice of impoundment shall be followed by a written or electronic
facsimile notice within twenty-four hours. In the case of a vehicle
from another state, time requirements of this subsection do not apply
until the requesting law enforcement agency in this state receives the
information.
(2) The operator shall immediately send an abandoned vehicle report
to the department for any vehicle, and for any items of personal
property registered or titled with the department, that are in the
operator's possession after the one hundred twenty hour abandonment
period. Such report need not be sent when the impoundment is pursuant
to a writ, court order, or police hold that is not a suspended license
impound. The owner notification and abandonment process shall be
initiated by the registered tow truck operator immediately following
notification by a court or law enforcement officer that the writ, court
order, or police hold that is not a suspended license impound is no
longer in effect.
(3) Following the submittal of an abandoned vehicle report, the
department shall provide the registered tow truck operator with owner
information within seventy-two hours.
(4) ((Within fourteen days of)) Upon receiving payment for the sale
of an abandoned vehicle at public auction, the towing operator shall
send a copy of the abandoned vehicle report showing the disposition of
the abandoned vehicle and any other items of personal property
registered or titled with the department to the department. The
vehicle buyer information sent to the department on the abandoned
vehicle report relieves the previous owner of the vehicle from any
civil or criminal liability for the operation of the vehicle from the
date of sale thereafter and transfers full liability for the vehicle to
the buyer. By January 1, 2003, the department shall create a system
enabling tow truck operators the option of sending the portion of the
abandoned vehicle report that contains the vehicle's buyer information
to the department electronically.
(5) Abandoned vehicles purchased at public auction may not be
released to the purchaser until the purchaser has executed an
application for a new certificate of ownership or shown evidence that
he or she has executed an application for a new certificate of
ownership signifying that he or she is the new registered owner. The
department shall create a system to enable a tow company to serve as a
limited agent for the purposes of registering a vehicle for a new
certificate of ownership for vehicles purchased at a public auction
held by the same tow company.
(6) If the operator sends an abandoned vehicle report to the
department and the department finds no owner information, an operator
may proceed with an inspection of the vehicle and any other items of
personal property registered or titled with the department to determine
whether owner identification is within the vehicle.
(((6))) (7) If the operator finds no owner identification, the
operator shall immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement
agency, which shall search the vehicle and any other items of personal
property registered or titled with the department for the vehicle
identification number or other appropriate identification numbers and
check the necessary records to determine the vehicle's or other
property's owners.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.55.120 and 2003 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department that are impounded by registered tow truck
operators pursuant to RCW 46.55.080, 46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140
may be redeemed only under the following circumstances:
(a) Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized
in writing by the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person
who is determined and verified by the operator to have the permission
of the registered owner of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, or one who has
purchased a vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled
with the department from the registered owner who produces proof of
ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may
redeem an impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or
titled with the department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because
the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be
released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection
(1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (e) of this subsection, including
paying all towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact
that the hold was ordered by a government agency. If the department's
records show that the operator has been convicted of a violation of RCW
46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past five years, the
vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written direction of
the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle impounded because
the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may be
released only pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered
the vehicle impounded or from the court having jurisdiction. An agency
may issue a written order to release pursuant to a provision of an
applicable state agency rule or local ordinance authorizing release on
the basis of the following:
(i) Economic or personal hardship to the spouse of the operator,
taking into consideration public safety factors, including the
operator's criminal history and driving record; or
(ii) The owner of the vehicle was not the driver, the owner did not
know that the driver's license was suspended or revoked, and the owner
has not received a prior release under this subsection or RCW
46.55.113(3).
In order to avoid discriminatory application, other than for the
reasons for release set forth in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, an
agency shall, under a provision of an applicable state agency rule or
local ordinance, deny release in all other circumstances without
discretion.
If a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of
RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b), the vehicle may be held for up to thirty
days at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded. However, if the department's records show that the operator
has been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or a
similar local ordinance within the past five years, the vehicle may be
held at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days if the
operator has two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is
impounded because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW
46.20.342, the vehicle may not be released until a person eligible to
redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements of
(e) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and
storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a
government agency.
(b) If the vehicle is directed to be held for a suspended license
impound, a person who desires to redeem the vehicle at the end of the
period of impound shall within five days of the impound at the request
of the tow truck operator pay a security deposit to the tow truck
operator of not more than one-half of the applicable impound storage
rate for each day of the proposed suspended license impound. The tow
truck operator shall credit this amount against the final bill for
removal, towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator
may accept other sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit.
If the person desiring to redeem the vehicle does not pay the security
deposit or provide other security acceptable to the tow truck operator,
the tow truck operator may process and sell at auction the vehicle as
an abandoned vehicle within the normal time limits set out in RCW
46.55.130(1). The security deposit required by this section may be
paid and must be accepted at any time up to twenty-four hours before
the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle as abandoned. The
registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at the
auction, and the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the
highest bidder who is not the registered owner.
(c) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a rental car business
may immediately redeem a rental vehicle it owns by payment of the costs
of removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound.
(d) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer
or lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle may redeem
or lawfully repossess a vehicle immediately by payment of the costs of
removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound. A motor vehicle dealer or lender with
a perfected security interest in the vehicle may not knowingly and
intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner to repossess
and then return or resell a vehicle to the registered owner in an
attempt to avoid a suspended license impound. However, this provision
does not preclude a vehicle dealer or a lender with a perfected
security interest in the vehicle from repossessing the vehicle and then
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of it in accordance with
chapter 62A.9A RCW, including providing redemption rights to the debtor
under RCW 62A.9A-623. If the debtor is the registered owner of the
vehicle, the debtor's right to redeem the vehicle under chapter 62A.9A
RCW is conditioned upon the debtor obtaining and providing proof from
the impounding authority or court having jurisdiction that any fines,
penalties, and forfeitures owed by the registered owner, as a result of
the suspended license impound, have been paid, and proof of the payment
must be tendered to the vehicle dealer or lender at the time the debtor
tenders all other obligations required to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle
dealers or lenders are not liable for damages if they rely in good
faith on an order from the impounding agency or a court in releasing a
vehicle held under a suspended license impound.
(e) The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or
titled with the department shall be released upon the presentation to
any person having custody of the vehicle of commercially reasonable
tender sufficient to cover the costs of towing, storage, or other
services rendered during the course of towing, removing, impounding, or
storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for the amount of any
security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In addition, if a
vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a violation
of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.345 and was being operated by the registered
owner when it was impounded under local ordinance or agency rule, it
must not be released to any person until the registered owner
establishes with the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded or the
court having jurisdiction that any penalties, fines, or forfeitures
owed by him or her have been satisfied. Registered tow truck operators
are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an order from
the impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound. Commercially reasonable tender shall
include, without limitation, cash, major bank credit cards issued by
financial institutions, or personal checks drawn on Washington state
branches of financial institutions if accompanied by two pieces of
valid identification, one of which may be required by the operator to
have a photograph. If the towing firm cannot determine through the
customer's bank or a check verification service that the presented
check would be paid by the bank or guaranteed by the service, the
towing firm may refuse to accept the check. Any person who stops
payment on a personal check or credit card, or does not make
restitution within ten days from the date a check becomes insufficient
due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has provided a service
pursuant to this section or in any other manner defrauds the towing
firm in connection with services rendered pursuant to this section
shall be liable for damages in the amount of twice the towing and
storage fees, plus costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(2)(a) The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person
who seeks to redeem an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, written notice of the right
of redemption and opportunity for a hearing, which notice shall be
accompanied by a form to be used for requesting a hearing, the name of
the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy of the towing
and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall maintain
a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.
(b) ((Any person)) Only a legal or registered owner seeking to
redeem an impounded vehicle under this section has a right to a hearing
in the district or municipal court for the jurisdiction in which the
vehicle was impounded to contest the validity of the impoundment or the
amount of towing and storage charges. The district court has
jurisdiction to determine the issues involving all impoundments
including those authorized by the state or its agents. The municipal
court has jurisdiction to determine the issues involving impoundments
authorized by agents of the municipality. Any request for a hearing
shall be made in writing on the form provided for that purpose and must
be received by the appropriate court within ten days of the date the
opportunity was provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this section and
more than five days before the date of the auction. At the time of the
filing of the hearing request, the petitioner shall pay to the court
clerk a filing fee in the same amount required for the filing of a suit
in district court. If the hearing request is not received by the court
within the ten-day period, the right to a hearing is waived and the
registered owner is liable for any towing, storage, or other
impoundment charges permitted under this chapter. Upon receipt of a
timely hearing request, the court shall proceed to hear and determine
the validity of the impoundment.
(3)(a) The court, within five days after the request for a hearing,
shall notify the registered tow truck operator, ((the person requesting
the hearing if not the owner,)) the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, and the person or agency authorizing the impound in
writing of the hearing date and time.
(b) At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing
may produce any relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing,
or storage fees charged were not proper. The court may consider a
written report made under oath by the officer who authorized the
impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal appearance at the
hearing.
(c) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine
whether the impoundment was proper, whether the towing or storage fees
charged were in compliance with the posted rates, and who is
responsible for payment of the fees. The court may not adjust fees or
charges that are in compliance with the posted or contracted rates.
(d) If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing,
and storage fees as permitted under this chapter together with court
costs shall be assessed against the person or persons requesting the
hearing, unless the operator did not have a signed and valid
impoundment authorization from a private property owner or an
authorized agent.
(e) If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this
chapter, then the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other
item of personal property registered or titled with the department
shall bear no impoundment, towing, or storage fees, and any security
shall be returned or discharged as appropriate, and the person or
agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any towing,
storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck
operator against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the
impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court
shall enter judgment in favor of the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle, or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, for the amount of the filing fee required by law for
the impound hearing petition as well as reasonable damages for loss of
the use of the vehicle during the time the same was impounded, for not
less than fifty dollars per day, against the person or agency
authorizing the impound. However, if an impoundment arising from an
alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.345 is determined to be in
violation of this chapter, then the law enforcement officer directing
the impoundment and the government employing the officer are not liable
for damages if the officer relied in good faith and without gross
negligence on the records of the department in ascertaining that the
operator of the vehicle had a suspended or revoked driver's license.
If any judgment entered is not paid within fifteen days of notice in
writing of its entry, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees
and costs against the defendant in any action to enforce the judgment.
Notice of entry of judgment may be made by registered or certified
mail, and proof of mailing may be made by affidavit of the party
mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of the judgment shall read
essentially as follows:

TO: . . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you in the
. . . . . . Court located at . . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled . . . . . ., Case No.
. . . . YOU ARE FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs
will be awarded against you under RCW . . . if the judgment is
not paid within 15 days of the date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature . . . . . . . . . .
Typed name and address
of party mailing notice

(4) Any impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department that is not redeemed within
fifteen days of mailing of the notice of custody and sale as required
by RCW 46.55.110(3) shall be sold at public auction in accordance with
all the provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW 46.55.130.
A vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with the
department may be redeemed at any time before the start of the auction
upon payment of the applicable towing and storage fees.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.55.140 and 1995 c 360 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A registered tow truck operator who has a valid and signed
impoundment authorization has a lien upon the impounded vehicle for
services provided in the towing and storage of the vehicle, unless the
impoundment is determined to have been invalid. The lien does not
apply to personal property in or upon the vehicle that is not
permanently attached to or is not an integral part of the vehicle
except for items of personal property registered or titled with the
department. The registered tow truck operator also has a deficiency
claim against the registered owner of the vehicle for services provided
in the towing and storage of the vehicle not to exceed the sum of five
hundred dollars after deduction of the amount bid at auction, and for
vehicles of over ten thousand pounds gross vehicle weight, the operator
has a deficiency claim of one thousand dollars after deduction of the
amount bid at auction, unless the impound is determined to be invalid.
The limitation on towing and storage deficiency claims does not apply
to an impound directed by a law enforcement officer. In no case may
the cost of the auction or a buyer's fee be added to the amount charged
for the vehicle at the auction, the vehicle's lien, or the overage due.
A registered owner who has completed and filed with the department the
seller's report as provided for by RCW 46.12.101 and has timely and
properly filed the seller's report is relieved of liability under this
section. The person named as the new owner of the vehicle on the
timely and properly filed seller's report shall assume liability under
this section. Providing false information on a seller's report
submitted to the department or its agents is a violation of RCW
9A.76.175.
(2) Any person who tows, removes, or otherwise disturbs any vehicle
parked, stalled, or otherwise left on privately owned or controlled
property, and any person owning or controlling the private property, or
either of them, are liable to the owner or operator of a vehicle, or
each of them, for consequential and incidental damages arising from any
interference with the ownership or use of the vehicle which does not
comply with the requirements of this chapter.

--- END ---