BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there has been a
significant increase in the demand for adequate swimming facilities and
that the state presently has insufficient facilities to meet the needs
of our residents. Aquatics programs offer opportunities for a
significant number of Washington residents of all ages. Whether the
aquatics activities are instructional swimming, rehabilitation therapy,
aqua aerobics, recreation, diving, SCUBA, wellness programs, swimming
camps, or athletic competition, the events are equally available for
both men and women.
Popularity of competitive swimming, diving, and synchronized
swimming as Olympic events have encouraged many of our young athletes
to pursue swimming activities. Several of our young athletes from the
Puget Sound region have qualified for the Olympic trials including
Megan Quann, Dana and Tara Kirk, and Emily and Helen Silver. Athletes
like Shawn Sussex also have an excellent future for Olympic
involvement. Through swimming, these athletes have become outstanding
role models who have shown other young people that swimming can provide
positive experiences and lifetime values.
The development of a combined intercollegiate and community swim
facility at the University of Washington will provide a significant
benefit to the state through a public and private partnership in the
tradition of the Northwest commitment to our citizens, our youth, and
the athletic community.
It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to support a swim
facility with the capacity to accommodate intercollegiate swim and dive
competitions, including springboard and platform diving. The facility
shall also support university intramural and recreational activities by
students, faculty, and staff. Community use shall also be accommodated
and scheduled for local competitive swim teams, swim lessons, swim
camps, Special Olympics, and high school competitions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of ten million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2005, from the state building construction account to the
University of Washington as matching funds for the construction of a
collegiate and community swim facility. The amount provided in this
section shall be matched by an equal amount from combined donations of
institutional, student, and private donations.

--- END ---