BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that citizens of
Washington state take great pride in the many landmark achievements in
Washington state during the last several decades, and earlier, in
achieving innumerable substantial improvements in legal rights and
broad opportunities for women and girls. These include rights and
opportunities in all spheres of life: Personal, professional, labor,
education, business, science and technology, health, sports, arts,
financial, community leadership, public administration, civil rights,
political leadership, elective office, and much more. Because of the
substantial commitment and dedicated efforts of untold tens of
thousands of Washingtonians, state laws and opportunities for women in
Washington advanced more quickly and substantially than in many other
states. Washington achieved recognition as a bellwether state and a
model for similar efforts in other states. The history of this
sustained effort over many years is a significant component of
Washington state history and national history. Many people are
interested in learning about and researching how and why Washington has
become such a major leader, and Washington students in kindergarten
through grade twelve should have the opportunity to learn about this
important part of state history.
The legislature further finds that there has been no systematic
effort to compile this landmark history, maintain documents,
photographs, and other artifacts, or index where such items can be
accessed. Unfortunately, much valuable history is scattered and
fragmented. While various museums, archives, and libraries have some
documentation of these important achievements, a very great quantity of
historically valuable records and artifacts continue to reside in
individuals' memories, organizational minutes, and boxes in people's
attics and garages. Thus, without an intentional effort, this critical
history might become lost to history forever.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The institute for public policy may
undertake a study and make recommendations to the 2005 legislature for
development of a center or an information network, or both, that would
achieve the following:
(a) Develop an approach for systematically collecting, preserving,
maintaining, and providing public access to historically valuable
records and artifacts pertaining to women's history in Washington
state;
(b) Develop a general outline of where historically significant
records and artifacts are located and may be accessed;
(c) Encourage citizens with historically significant records and
artifacts to preserve them and make them accessible;
(d) Encourage development of educational programs and displays,
including those which can tour throughout the state;
(e) Encourage development of learning opportunities for K-12
students, as well as providing materials for women's history studies in
colleges and universities;
(f) Actively promote collection of oral histories;
(g) Encourage research about this history;
(h) Encourage private donations of funds to assist this effort; and
(i) Encourage private donations or loans of records and artifacts
for public access, including protecting the ability of donors to
specify conditions under which loaned materials will be returned to the
donor or their heirs.
(2) The institute may create an advisory committee or engage in
other efforts to consult with interested parties, including: Higher
education institutions and archives, state and local libraries, state
and local museums, state historical societies, state archives,
interested organizations and individuals who participated in this
historic effort, members and staff of the former state women's
commission, current and former state elected officials and their
staffs, current and former legislators and their staffs, historians,
state agencies, local governments, office of financial management,
state commissions on African-American affairs, Hispanic affairs, and
Asian Pacific American affairs, governor's office of Indian affairs,
business organizations, labor organizations, and such others as
appropriate.
(3) The institute shall submit its recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2004.

--- END ---