BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 65.04.045 and 1999 c 233 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When any instrument is presented to a county auditor or
recording officer for recording, the first page of the instrument shall
contain:
(a) A top margin of at least three inches and a one-inch margin on
the bottom and sides, except that an instrument may be recorded if a
minor portion of a notary seal, incidental writing, or minor portion of
a signature extends beyond the margins;
(b) The top left-hand side of the page shall contain the name and
address to whom the instrument will be returned;
(c) The title or titles, or type or types, of the instrument to be
recorded indicating the kind or kinds of documents or transactions
contained therein immediately below the three-inch margin at the top of
the page. The auditor or recording officer shall be required to index
only the title or titles captioned on the document;
(d) Reference numbers of documents assigned or released with
reference to the document page number where additional references can
be found, if applicable;
(e) The names of the grantor(s) and grantee(s), as defined under
RCW 65.04.015, with reference to the document page number where
additional names are located, if applicable;
(f) An abbreviated legal description of the property, and for
purposes of this subsection, "abbreviated legal description of the
property" means lot, block, plat, or section, township, range, and
quarter/quarter section, and reference to the document page number
where the full legal description is included, if applicable;
(g) The assessor's property tax parcel or account number set forth
separately from the legal description or other text.
(2) All pages of the document shall be on sheets of paper of a
weight and color capable of producing a legible image that are not
larger than fourteen inches long and eight and one-half inches wide
with text printed or written in eight point type or larger. All text
within the document must be of sufficient color and clarity to ensure
that when the text is imaged all text is readable. Further, all pages
presented for recording must have at minimum a one-inch margin on the
top, bottom, and sides for all pages except page one, except that an
instrument may be recorded if a minor portion of a notary seal,
incidental writing, or minor portion of a signature extends beyond the
margins, be prepared in ink color capable of being imaged, and have all
seals legible and capable of being imaged. No attachments, except
firmly attached bar code or address labels, may be affixed to the
pages.
(3) When any instrument is presented to a county auditor or
recording officer for recording, the document shall not contain the
following information: (a) A social security number; (b) a date of
birth identified with a particular person; or (c) the maiden name of a
person's parent so as to be identified with a particular person.
The information provided on the instrument must be in substantially
the following form:

This Space Provided for Recorder's Use

When Recorded Return to:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Document Title(s)

Grantor(s)

Grantee(s)

Legal Description

Assessor's Property Tax Parcel or Account Number

Reference Numbers of Documents Assigned or Released

Sec. 2 RCW 65.04.080 and 1996 c 229 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
When any instrument, paper, or notice, authorized or required by
law to be filed or recorded, is deposited in or electronically
transmitted to the county auditor's office for filing or record, that
officer must indorse upon the same the time when it was received,
noting the year, month, day, hour and minute of its reception, and note
that the document was received by electronic transmission, and must
file, or file and record the same without delay, together with the
acknowledgments, proofs, and certificates written or printed upon or
annexed to the same, with the plats, surveys, schedules and other
papers thereto annexed, in the order and as of the time when the same
was received for filing or record, and must note on the instrument
filed, or at the foot of the record the exact time of its reception,
and the name of the person at whose request it was filed or filed and
recorded: PROVIDED, That the county auditor shall not be required to
accept for filing, or filing and recording, any instrument unless there
appear upon the face thereof, the name and nature of the instrument
offered for filing, or filing and recording, as the case may be. When
any instrument is presented to a county auditor or recording officer
for recording, the document shall not contain the following
information: (1) A social security number; (2) a date of birth
identified with a particular person; or (3) the maiden name of a
person's parent so as to be identified with a particular person.

--- END ---