BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The department, as resources allow, shall at the request of the
United States bureau of reclamation or federal reclamation project
irrigation districts cooperatively conduct a use attainability analysis
of water bodies located within the boundaries of the federal
reclamation project. The department, consistent with applicable
federal water quality laws and regulations, shall adopt rules
designating uses for water bodies within the federal reclamation
project that support beneficial uses consistent with the primary
authorized project purposes of constructed storage and conveyance
facilities and other water transport systems and that recognize the
unique site-specific characteristics of the arid and semiarid regions
of the state of Washington where federal reclamation projects are
located. The rules shall also recognize the need to deliver project
irrigation water and to construct, operate, and maintain project
facilities.

--- END ---