BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the valuable role
community action agencies play in delivering human services to low-income families and individuals of all ages in rural and urban areas of
the state. The legislature also recognizes that uncoordinated and
duplicative electronic reporting requirements are placing extraordinary
burdens on community action agencies. To alleviate these burdens, the
legislature finds that state agencies must coordinate and standardize
the data collection and reporting systems that are used in the
administration and distribution of contracts with community action
agencies.
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall study the
feasibility of establishing common data collection, grant distribution,
accountability requirements, and management standards for state
agencies that work with community action agencies. The study shall
include the identification and potential uses of common data elements
across state agencies. The committee shall review the policies and
practices of those state agencies that work with and provide funding to
local community action agencies, including, but not limited to, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the
department of social and health services, and the employment security
department. State agencies that work with community action agencies
shall cooperate with the joint legislative audit and review committee
in this study.
The committee shall submit a progress report to the appropriate
policy committees of the legislature by September 1, 2004, and a final
report to the same committees by September 1, 2005.
This section expires December 31, 2005.

--- END ---