BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.40.060 and 2001 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Every officer and employee of the state or of any county, city,
or other political subdivision thereof who is a member of the
Washington national guard or of the army, navy, air force, coast guard,
or marine corps reserve of the United States, or of any organized
reserve or armed forces of the United States shall be entitled to and
shall be granted military leave of absence from such employment for a
period not exceeding fifteen days during each year beginning October
1st and ending the following September 30th. Such leave shall be
granted in order that the person may report for active duty, when
called, or take part in active training duty in such manner and at such
time as he or she may be ordered to active duty or active training
duty. Such military leave of absence shall be in addition to any
vacation or sick leave to which the officer or employee might otherwise
be entitled, and shall not involve any loss of efficiency rating,
privileges, or pay. During the period of military leave, the officer
or employee shall receive from the state, or the county, city, or other
political subdivision, his or her normal pay.)) Public employees who
are members of the Washington national guard or of the army, navy, air
force, coast guard, or marine corps reserve of the United States, or of
any organized reserve or armed forces of the United States are entitled
to and shall be granted military leave of absence from their employment
as follows:
(1) Every officer and employee of the state or of any county, city,
or other political subdivision thereof is entitled to military leave
for a period not exceeding fifteen days during each year beginning
October 1st and ending the following September 30th. This leave shall
be granted in order that the person may report for active duty, when
called, or take part in active training duty in the manner and at the
time as he or she may be ordered to active duty or active training
duty. This military leave of absence is in addition to any vacation or
sick leave to which the officer or employee might otherwise be
entitled, and shall not involve any loss of efficiency rating,
privileges, or pay. During the period of military leave, the officer
or employee shall receive from the state, or the county, city, or other
political subdivision, his or her normal pay.
(2)(a) Every officer and employee of the state, excepting only
temporary employees and employees of school districts and educational
service districts, who is mobilized under Title 10 or 32 of the United
States Code for a period exceeding thirty days, is entitled to and
shall be granted, in addition to the military leave of absence provided
in subsection (1) of this section, military leave of absence from their
employment for a period not exceeding two years. This leave shall be
granted in order that the person may report for active duty. This
military leave of absence is in addition to any vacation or sick leave
to which the officer or employee might otherwise be entitled, and shall
not involve any loss of efficiency rating or privileges. During the
period of military leave, if the combined military pay and allowances
of the officer or employee are less than his or her normal pay from the
state, then he or she shall receive as compensation from the employing
agency one-half of the difference.
(b) "Normal pay," for the purposes of this subsection, means an
employee's regular pay, increased by any step or merit increase and
cost-of-living adjustments as and when appropriate, calculated using
the average number of hours per pay period that the employee worked
over the six-month period immediately preceding mobilization.
(3) The department of personnel shall adopt rules necessary to
implement this section.

--- END ---