BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the state fire marshal finds that conditions of
extreme fire hazard exist and that state resources or the protection of
life and property may be in danger, the fire marshal may recommend to
the governor that the governor prohibit all outdoor burning on public
and private land throughout the state or within specific portions of
the state.
(2) Prior to making such a recommendation the state fire marshal
must first consult with:
(a) The commissioner of public lands;
(b) The director of the department of ecology;
(c) The director of the department of agriculture; and
(d) The director of state parks.
(3) Upon receiving such a recommendation from the state fire
marshal, if the governor finds that state resources or the protection
of life and property are in danger then the governor may issue an
executive order forbidding all outdoor burning throughout the state or
within specific portions of the state. The order shall be in effect
until rescinded by the governor. The order may allow for specific
exceptions to be made where the governor determines that certain
outdoor burning will not unduly endanger state resources nor the
protection of life and property, and subject to limitations and
conditions as recommended by the state fire marshal.
(4) It shall be unlawful for any person to conduct or cause to be
conducted any outdoor burning at any time and place as is forbidden by
an executive order issued pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(a) Intentional violation of this section is a crime and shall be
punished as a gross misdemeanor.
(b) Negligent violation of this section is a class 1 civil
infraction pursuant to chapter 7.80 RCW.
(5) In addition to the penalty provided in subsection (4) of this
section, any injured party may bring a civil cause of action for
violation of an executive order issued pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section. A person may be liable under such an action for actual
damages and reasonable attorneys' fees, court costs, and investigative
costs incurred in bringing the action.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "outdoor burning" means the
combustion of material of any type in an open fire or in an outdoor
container without providing for the control of combustion or the
control of emissions from the combustion.
(7) The state fire marshal may adopt rules necessary to implement
this section.
(8) The provisions of this section shall be enforced by any general
or limited authority Washington peace officer as those terms are
defined in RCW 10.93.020 or may be enforced by any district, city,
county, and/or state fire authority.

--- END ---