BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Each employer shall post and keep posted a notice, which form shall
be furnished by the department, containing information about the
history of repetitive motion injuries claimed by other employees during
their course of employment with the current employer. In addition, the
notice shall also contain specific health and safety standards, if any,
recommended by the employer or the department to avoid prospective
repetitive motion injuries. Such notice shall contain the number of
repetitive motion injuries occurring during the prior calendar year,
the body part or parts affected by the injury, and whether the employee
or employees received workers' compensation benefits as a result of the
injury from the department or the employer, if self-insured. Such
notice shall be posted by the employer at each business establishment
where there are employees and in a conspicuous place or places where
notices to employees are customarily posted. Each employer shall take
steps to assure that such notices are not altered, defaced, or covered
by other material.

--- END ---