BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 74.46.091 (Additional reporting requirements for quality
maintenance fee) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 4;
(2) RCW 74.46.535 (Quality maintenance fee) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16
s 5; and
(3) RCW 82.71.020 (Fee imposed) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2005, unless
the waiver requested by the department of social and health services
under RCW 74.46.091 has been approved by the federal department of
health and human services. If the requested waiver is approved by July
1, 2005, this act is null and void.

--- END ---