BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2003 c 399 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) Until July 1, ((2004)) 2005, the department of labor and
industries shall cease to administer and enforce licensing requirements
under RCW 19.28.091, certification requirements under RCW 19.28.161,
and inspection and permitting requirements under RCW 19.28.101, as
applied only to maintenance work on the electrical controls of a boiler
performed by an employee of a service company.
(2) The electrical board and the board of boiler rules shall
jointly evaluate whether electrical licensing, certification,
inspection, and permitting requirements should apply to maintenance
work on the electrical controls of a boiler performed by an employee of
a service company. The electrical board shall report their joint
findings and recommendations for legislation or rule making, if any, to
the commerce and labor committee of the house of representatives and
the commerce and trade committee of the senate by December 1, ((2003))
2004.
(3) This section expires July 1, ((2004)) 2005.

--- END ---