BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature intends:
(a) To ensure that mitigation fees are imposed through established
standards by which counties, cities, and towns may require by ordinance
that new growth and development pay a reasonable cost only to mitigate
specific adverse environmental impacts that are identified in the
environmental documents prepared under this chapter;
(b) To ensure that mitigation fees are imposed through established
procedures and criteria so that specific developments do not pay
arbitrary fees or duplicative fees for the same adverse environmental
impact; and
(c) To add process to current statutory authority for mitigation
and not allow for additional authority than currently provided in RCW
43.21C.060.
(2) The legislature further intends that mitigation fees:
(a) Only be imposed to mitigate specific adverse environmental
impacts that are directly related to the new development; and
(b) Not exceed the proportionate share of the costs reasonably
related to the specific adverse environmental impacts caused by the new
development.
(3) As used in this chapter, "development activity" means any
construction or expansion of a building, structure, or use; any change
in use of a building or structure; or any change in the use of land,
that cause specific adverse environmental impacts that are identified
in the environmental documents prepared under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A local ordinance imposing a mitigation
fee shall include a schedule of mitigation fees that is adopted for
each type of development activity subject to a mitigation fee,
specifying the amount of the mitigation fee to be imposed for each
proposed action.
(2) In determining the reasonable mitigation fee for built
environment as defined under WAC 197-11-444(2) as it existed on the
effective date of this act, the formula or other method of calculating
the mitigation fee shall incorporate the availability of other means of
funding the mitigation of the identified specific adverse environmental
impact.
(3) A local ordinance imposing a mitigation fee shall include a
provision for calculating the amount of the fee to be imposed on a
particular development that permits consideration of studies and data
submitted by the developer to adjust the amount of the fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Mitigation fee receipts shall be
earmarked specifically and retained in special interest-bearing
accounts. Separate accounts shall be established for each type of
public facility for which a mitigation fee is collected. All interest
shall be retained in the account and expended for the purpose or
purposes for which the mitigation fee was imposed. Annually, each
county, city, or town imposing mitigation fees shall provide a report
on each mitigation fee account showing the source and amount of all
moneys collected, earned, or received and development activities that
were financed in whole or in part by the mitigation fee.
(2) The county, city, or town shall provide an annual accounting of
the mitigation fee expenditures, published on its internet site.
(3) A mitigation fee may be paid under protest in order to obtain
a permit or other approval of development activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) The person paying the mitigation fee
shall receive a refund if the county, city, or town fails to expend or
encumber the mitigation fee within six years of when the fee is paid on
mitigation of specific adverse environmental impacts that are
identified in the environmental documents prepared under this chapter.
The county, city, or town shall notify potential claimants by first
class mail deposited with the United States postal service at the last
known address of claimants.
The request for a refund must be submitted to the county, city, or
town governing body in writing within one year of the date the right to
claim the refund arises or the date that notice is given, whichever is
later. Any mitigation fee that is not expended within these time
limitations, and for which no timely application for a refund has been
made, shall be retained and expended on the indicated development
activity or any other development activity.
(b) The refund of a mitigation fee under (a) of this subsection
shall include interest earned on the mitigation fee.
(2) When a county, city, or town seeks to terminate any or all
mitigation fee requirements, all unexpended or unencumbered funds,
including interest earned, shall be refunded under this section. Upon
the finding that any or all fee requirements are to be terminated, the
county, city, or town shall place notice of the termination and the
availability of refunds in a newspaper of general circulation at least
two times and shall notify all potential claimants by first class mail
to the last known address of claimants. All funds available for refund
shall be retained for a period of one year. At the end of one year,
any remaining funds shall be retained by the local government, but must
be expended for the indicated public facilities. This notice
requirement does not apply if there are no unexpended or unencumbered
balances within an account or accounts being terminated.
(3) A developer may request and shall receive a refund, including
interest earned on the mitigation fee, when the developer does not
proceed with the development activity and no adverse environmental
impact has resulted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.21C RCW.

--- END ---