BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.103.030 and 1999 c 40 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created the Washington state forensic investigations
council. The council shall oversee the bureau of forensic laboratory
services and, in consultation with the chief of the Washington state
patrol or the chief's designee, control the operation and establish
policies of the bureau of forensic laboratory services. The council
may also study and recommend cost-efficient improvements to the death
investigation system in Washington and report its findings to the
legislature.
Further, the council shall((, jointly with the chairperson of the
pathology department of the University of Washington's School of
Medicine, or the chairperson's designee,)) oversee the state forensic
((pathology fellowship)) pathologist program, determine the budget for
the program and set the ((fellow's)) state forensic pathologist's
annual salary, and take those steps necessary to administer the
program. The state forensic pathologist shall be available to the
county coroners and medical examiners of the state without charge to
perform autopsies, provide consultations, and testify in court.
The forensic investigations council shall be actively involved in
the preparation of the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget
and shall approve the bureau of forensic laboratory services budget
prior to its formal submission to the office of financial management
pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.79.445 and 1997 c 454 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is established an account in the state treasury referred to
as the "death investigations account" which shall exist for the purpose
of receiving, holding, investing, and disbursing funds appropriated or
provided in RCW 70.58.107 and any moneys appropriated or otherwise
provided thereafter.
Moneys in the death investigations account shall be disbursed by
the state treasurer once every year on December 31 and at any other
time determined by the treasurer. The treasurer shall make
disbursements to: The state toxicology laboratory, counties for the
cost of autopsies, the ((University of Washington)) forensic
investigations council to fund the state forensic ((pathology
fellowship)) pathologist program, the state patrol for providing
partial funding for the state dental identification system, the
criminal justice training commission for training county coroners,
medical examiners and their staff, and the state forensic
investigations council. Funds from the death investigations account
may be appropriated during the 1997-99 biennium for the purposes of
statewide child mortality reviews administered by the department of
health.
The ((University of Washington and the)) Washington state forensic
investigations council shall ((jointly)) determine the yearly amount
for the state forensic ((pathology fellowship)) pathologist program
established by RCW ((28B.20.426)) 43.103.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 28B.20.426 (Fellowship program in
forensic pathology -- Funding -- Recipient's services to county coroners)
and 1991 c 176 s 3 & 1986 c 31 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---