BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2002 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. A county or city shall take legislative action
according to the schedule established under subsection (4) of this
section and the scope specified in subsection (5) of this section to
review and, if needed, revise its comprehensive land use plan and
development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply with
the requirements of this chapter ((according to the time periods
specified in subsection (4) of this section)). A county or city not
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if
needed, revise its policies and development regulations regarding
critical areas and natural resource lands adopted according to this
chapter to ensure these policies and regulations comply with the
requirements of this chapter according to the ((time periods specified
in)) schedule established under subsection (4) of this section.
Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or ordinance
following notice and a public hearing indicating at a minimum, a
finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and identifying the
revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and the reasons
therefore. The review and evaluation required by this subsection may
be combined with the review required by subsection (3) of this section.
The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall include,
but is not limited to, consideration of critical area ordinances and,
if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the population
allocated to a city or county from the most recent ten-year population
forecast by the office of financial management.
(b) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the ((time
periods specified in)) schedule established under subsection (4) of
this section. Amendments may be considered more frequently than once
per year under the following circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan that does not modify the
comprehensive plan policies and designations applicable to the subarea;
(ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; and
(iii) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board
or with the court.
(3) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas. The county comprehensive plan designating
urban growth areas, and the densities permitted in the urban growth
areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each city located
within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the
urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding
twenty-year period. The review required by this subsection may be
combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) The department shall establish a schedule for counties and
cities to take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter. Such
schedule shall be based on the official April 1st population estimates
and forecasts issued by the office of financial management in April of
the year two years prior to the update required under this section.
The schedule established by the department shall provide for the
reviews and evaluations to be completed as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, ((and every seven years
thereafter,)) for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those
counties, and every seven years thereafter for Clark, King, Kitsap,
Pierce, Snohomish, and Thurston counties and the cities within those
counties, and every ten years thereafter for Clallam, Jefferson, and
Whatcom counties and the cities within those counties except that the
December 1, 2004, updates required for Clallam, Jefferson, and Whatcom
counties and the cities within those counties may be delayed until
December 1, 2005, if each county and the cities within that county
mutually agree by legislative action within forty-five days of the
effective date of this section;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, and every ((seven)) ten years
thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and
Skamania counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, and every ((seven)) ten years
thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and
Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; ((and))
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, and every ((seven)) ten years
thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield,
Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille,
Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities
within those counties; and
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of (a) through (d) of this
subsection, for any county with a population seventy-five thousand or
greater and a growth rate of seventeen percent or greater, and the
cities within, the updates required under this section shall be every
seven years.
(5) The scope of the required reviews and updates under this
section shall consist of the following:
(a) For local governments meeting the criteria established in
subsection (6)(a) of this section, all the provisions of this chapter;
and
(b) For local governments meeting the criteria established in
subsection (6)(b) of this section, at least the following provisions:
(i) Review and update, if necessary, critical areas designated
under RCW 36.70A.170, and policies and development regulations adopted
under RCW 36.70A.060 that protect critical areas, to include best
available science;
(ii) Review and update, if necessary, resource lands designated
under RCW 36.70A.170, and policies and development regulations adopted
under RCW 36.70A.060 that protect resource lands; and
(iii) For a county or city that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, review and update, if necessary, local
comprehensive plan and development regulations necessary to incorporate
any changes in this chapter since the last required local review and
update and to plan for an individual county's or city's share of
projected population growth based on the most current office of
financial management population forecast.
(6)(a) All jurisdictions subject to the requirements of RCW
36.70A.215(7), all counties with populations of seventy-five thousand
or greater, and all counties and the cities within those counties that
have experienced population growth rates in excess of seventeen percent
during the ten years prior to their most recent population projections
shall conduct reviews and updates covering the scope of issues required
in subsection (5)(a) of this section.
(b) A county containing less than seventy-five thousand people, and
any city outside a county subject to the requirements of RCW
36.70A.215(7) containing less than five thousand people, that has
experienced a population growth rate of less than seventeen percent
during the ten years prior to the deadline established in subsection
(4) of this section shall conduct its review and update to cover, at a
minimum, the scope of issues required in subsection (5)(b) of this
section.
For the purposes of this subsection, "growth rates" and "population
projections" are those rates and projections reported by the office of
financial management.
(7)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (4) of this section, subject
to the provisions of subsection (9) of this section. Counties and
cities may begin this process early and may be eligible for grants from
the department, subject to available funding, if they elect to do so.
(b) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(((6))) (8) A county or city subject to the time periods in
subsection (4)(a) of this section that, pursuant to an ordinance
adopted by the county or city establishing a schedule for periodic
review of its comprehensive plan and development regulations, has
conducted a review and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and
development regulations and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken
action in response to that review and evaluation shall be deemed to
have conducted the first review required by subsection (4)(a) of this
section. Subsequent review and evaluation by the county or city of its
comprehensive plan and development regulations shall be conducted in
accordance with the time periods established under subsection (4)(a) of
this section.
(((7))) (9) A county or city that, pursuant to an ordinance adopted
by the county or city establishing a schedule for periodic review of
its comprehensive plan and development regulations, has conducted a
review and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development
regulations and, no earlier than two years prior to the date
established for its action in subsection (4) of this section, has taken
action in response to that review and evaluation shall be deemed to
have conducted the review required for that deadline by subsection (4)
of this section.
(10) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this
section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the
terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities in
compliance with the schedules in this section shall have the requisite
authority to receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees
from those accounts established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030. Only
those counties and cities in compliance with the schedules in this
section shall receive preference for grants or loans subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.17.250.
(11) For the purposes of subsection (6)(b) of this section, the
provisions of RCW 36.70A.280 apply only to matters within the scope of
issues required in subsection (5)(b) of this section, and any other
provisions a jurisdiction chooses to review and update beyond those
required in subsection (5)(b) of this section.

--- END ---