BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) All parents and members of the community have the right to
file, with the educational service district superintendent, a written
and signed complaint alleging that a certificated education
professional within the superintendent's educational service district
is not of good moral character or personal fitness or has committed an
act of unprofessional conduct. The educational service district
superintendent shall provide the person filing the complaint with
written notice within five working days of what actions will be taken
in response to the complaint.
(2) Any investigations by the educational service district
superintendent into allegations raised by complaints filed under
subsection (1) of this section must be conducted and completed within
twenty-five working days of the educational service district
superintendent receiving the complaint. The person filing the
complaint must be sent written notice of the results of the
investigation and, specifically, whether or not the complaint will be
forwarded on to the superintendent of public instruction for further
investigation.
(3) If no investigation is to be conducted by the educational
service district superintendent or if the complaint is not forwarded to
the superintendent of public instruction, the person filing the
complaint under subsection (1) of this section may file the same
complaint directly with the superintendent of public instruction.
(4) If the educational service district superintendent, the
district superintendent, or the chief administrative officer of an
approved private school possesses reliable information that leads him
or her to believe a certified employee is not of good moral character,
is not personally fit, or has committed an act of unprofessional
conduct, the superintendent or officer shall file a written complaint
with the superintendent of public instruction. A parent or community
member may file a complaint directly with the superintendent of public
instruction if he or she believes that the district superintendent or
chief administrative officer has failed to comply with this provision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The membership of the admissions and professional conduct advisory
committee created by the superintendent of public instruction must
include representatives of parents and the school district's community
members who are not also employees of the school district or private
schools.

--- END ---