BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.53.904 and 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person convicted of violating any of the provisions of this
chapter or the rules and regulations issued thereunder or who shall
impede, obstruct, hinder, or otherwise prevent or attempt to prevent
the department in the performance of its duty in connection with the
provisions of this chapter, shall be adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor
((and shall be fined not less than fifty dollars nor more than one
hundred dollars for the first violation, and not less than two hundred
dollars nor more than five hundred dollars for a subsequent violation))
as provided in RCW 9A.20.021. In all prosecutions under this chapter
involving the composition of a lot of commercial feed, a certified copy
of the official analysis signed by the department shall be accepted as
prima facie evidence of the composition.
(2) Any person convicted of intentionally adding any animal protein
prohibited in ruminant feed that is unsafe within the meaning of RCW
15.53.902(3) and rules adopted thereunder is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the
department to report for prosecution or for the institution of seizure
proceedings as a result of minor violations of this chapter when it
believes that the public interest will be best served by a suitable
notice of warning in writing.
(((3))) (4) It shall be the duty of each prosecuting attorney to
whom any violation is reported to cause appropriate proceedings to be
instituted and prosecuted in a court of competent jurisdiction without
delay. Before the department reports a violation for such prosecution,
an opportunity shall be given the distributor to present ((his)) the
distributor's view in writing or orally to the department.
(((4))) (5) The department is hereby authorized to apply for and
the court to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any
person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of
this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter
notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law. Said
injunction to be issued without bond.

--- END ---