BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.16.330 and 2000 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public utility district in existence on June 8, 2000, may
construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease, license, handle,
provide, add to, contract for, interconnect, alter, improve, repair,
operate, and maintain any telecommunications facilities within or
without the district's limits for the following purposes:
(a) For the district's internal telecommunications needs; and
(b) For the provision of wholesale telecommunications services
within the district and by contract with another public utility
district.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize public
utility districts to provide telecommunications services to end users.
(2) A public utility district providing wholesale
telecommunications services shall ensure that rates, terms, and
conditions for such services are not unduly or unreasonably
discriminatory or preferential. Rates, terms, and conditions are
discriminatory or preferential when a public utility district offering
rates, terms, and conditions to an entity for wholesale
telecommunications services does not offer substantially similar rates,
terms, and conditions to all other entities seeking substantially
similar services.
(3) ((When)) A public utility district ((establishes a separate
utility function for the provision of wholesale telecommunications
services, it shall account for any and all revenues and expenditures
related to its wholesale telecommunications facilities and services
separately from revenues and expenditures related to its internal
telecommunications operations)) providing wholesale telecommunications
services may establish a separate utility system or function for such
purpose. In either case, a public utility district providing wholesale
telecommunications services shall separately account for any revenues
and expenditures for those services according to standards established
by the state auditor pursuant to its authority in chapter 43.09 RCW and
consistent with the provisions of this chapter. Any revenues received
from the provision of wholesale telecommunications services must be
dedicated to ((the utility function that includes the provision of
wholesale telecommunications services for)) costs incurred to build and
maintain ((the)) any telecommunications facilities constructed,
installed, or acquired to provide such services, including payments on
debt issued to finance such services, until such time as any bonds or
other financing instruments executed after June 8, 2000, and used to
finance ((the)) such telecommunications facilities are discharged or
retired.
(4) When a public utility district ((establishes a separate utility
function for the provision of)) provides wholesale telecommunications
services, all telecommunications services rendered ((by the separate
function)) to the district for the district's internal
telecommunications needs shall be allocated or charged at its true and
full value. A public utility district may not charge its
nontelecommunications operations rates that are preferential or
discriminatory compared to those it charges entities purchasing
wholesale telecommunications services.
(5) A public utility district shall not exercise powers of eminent
domain to acquire telecommunications facilities or contractual rights
held by any other person or entity to telecommunications facilities.
(6) Except as otherwise specifically provided, a public utility
district may exercise any of the powers granted to it under this title
and other applicable laws in carrying out the powers authorized under
this section. Nothing in chapter 81, Laws of 2000 limits any existing
authority of a public utility district under this title.

--- END ---