BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In implementing any rules adopted pursuant to RCW 49.17.050(4)
that require agricultural employers to implement a monitoring program
for employees who handle category I or II organophosphate or N-methyl-carbamate pesticides, the department must collect and analyze data to
determine whether mandatory testing is warranted and, if so, what
thresholds of exposure to pesticides should trigger mandatory testing.
The department shall develop or contract the development of a data base
to help in assessing the efficacy of the monitoring program. The data
collected and entered into the data base must include, at a minimum:
(a) The number of employees that are tested; (b) the number of baseline
tests that are performed; (c) the number of periodic tests that are
performed for each of the employees; (d) the number of investigations
of employee work practices that are required; (e) the number of medical
removals from pesticide handling and other work exposures to pesticides
that are required; (f) the number of investigations of employee work
practices required for which depressed cholinesterase levels are not
positively correlated to pesticide handling or other workplace
exposures; (g) the number of medical removals required for which
depressed cholinesterase levels are not positively correlated to
pesticide handling or other workplace exposures; and (h) for each
employee with a substantially depressed cholinesterase level, the
relationship between his or her depressed cholinesterase level and the
number of hours he or she spent handling category I or II
organophosphate or N-methyl-carbamate pesticides.
(2) For each employee tested during 2004 and 2005, the department
shall ensure that each cholinesterase test measurement is correlated
with documented hours handling category I or II organophosphate or N-methyl-carbamate pesticides since the employee's last cholinesterase
test. For each test that requires action by the employer, the
department shall determine whether the depression was subsequently
determined to be caused by factors that are unrelated to workplace
exposure.
(3) Upon receiving a report of a test showing actionable levels of
cholinesterase depression, the department may contact the employer and
offer assistance by means of a voluntary and nonpunitive consultation
focused solely on pesticide workplace safety. Before conducting such
consultation, the department will obtain a determination from the
treating physician as to whether the physician has concluded that the
depression is due to workplace exposure. The department shall notify
the employer if the physician was unable to determine that the
depression was due to workplace exposure.
(4) By December 1st of each year, the department shall report the
results of this data collection and analysis to the house of
representatives committees on agriculture and natural resources, and
commerce and labor, or their successor committees, and the senate
committees on agriculture, and commerce and trade, or their successor
committees. The department's report shall also identify any technical
problems regarding testing or the administration of cholinesterase
monitoring. Recommendations regarding legislation needed to resolve
identified problems shall be presented in bill form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within the appropriations from the medical aid fund provided
for administering this chapter, the department shall pay approved
health care facilities and licensed health care professionals directly
for all costs of services related to baseline and periodic
cholinesterase tests and interpretations of such tests during calendar
years 2004, 2005, and 2006. These health care facilities and
professionals include, but are not limited to, approved laboratories
and clinics, and licensed physicians. These services include, but are
not limited to, taking, shipping, and testing blood samples,
interpreting blood tests, and counseling employees who handle category
I or II organophosphate or N-methyl-carbamate pesticides.
(2) Any rules adopted pursuant to RCW 49.17.050(4) that require
agricultural employers to implement a monitoring program for employees
who handle category I or II organophosphate or N-methyl-carbamate
pesticides shall allow agricultural employers to seek reimbursement
from the accident fund for the costs they incur in complying with such
rules during calendar years 2004, 2005, and 2006. These costs are the
probable central compliance costs specified in the benefit-cost
determination for such rules, which shall include the costs of training
and paying wages and benefits to employees for time traveling to
approved laboratories or clinics. Reimbursement rates for these costs
shall be consistent with probable compliance costs specified in the
benefit-cost determination for such rules. Requests for reimbursement
for a calendar quarter must be submitted to the department no later
than the day immediately following the last day of the first month
following that calendar quarter. The department shall reimburse
employers making timely requests for reimbursement. Payments of
reimbursements for a calendar quarter must be made no later than the
day immediately following the last day of the second month following
that calendar quarter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Any rules adopted pursuant to RCW 49.17.050(4) that require
agricultural employers to implement a monitoring program for employees
who handle category I or II organophosphate or N-methyl-carbamate
pesticides shall allow agricultural employers to seek reimbursement
from the accident fund for the recordkeeping costs they incur in
complying with such rules during calendar years 2004, 2005, and 2006.
With regard to recordkeeping reimbursement rates and the procedures,
requirements, and deadlines for recordkeeping reimbursement requests
and payments, the provisions of section 2(2) of this act apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---