BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.16.300 and 1986 c 305 s 703 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 4.16.300 through 4.16.320 shall apply to all claims or causes
of action of any kind against any person, arising from such person
having constructed, altered or repaired any improvement upon real
property, or having performed or furnished any design, planning,
surveying, architectural or construction or engineering services, or
supervision or observation of construction, or administration of
construction contracts for any construction, alteration or repair of
any improvement upon real property. This section is specifically
intended to benefit ((only those persons referenced herein)) persons
having performed work for which the persons must be registered or
licensed under RCW 18.08.310, 18.27.020, 18.43.040, 18.96.020, or
19.28.041, and shall not apply to claims or causes of action against
((manufacturers)) persons not required to be so registered or licensed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---