BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends by this act to
prevent frivolous lawsuits against manufacturers, packers,
distributors, carriers, holders, sellers, marketers, or advertisers of
food products that comply with applicable statutory and regulatory
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as exempted in subsection (2) of this section, a
manufacturer, packer, distributor, carrier, holder, seller, marketer,
or advertiser of a food, or an association of one or more such
entities, shall not be subject to civil liability arising under any law
of this state, including all statutes, regulations, rules, common law,
public policies, court or administrative decisions or decrees, or other
state action having the effect of law, for any claim arising out of
weight gain, obesity, a health condition associated with weight gain or
obesity, or other generally known condition allegedly caused by or
allegedly likely to result from long-term consumption of food.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not preclude civil
liability where the claim of weight gain, obesity, health condition
associated with weight gain or obesity, or other generally known
condition allegedly caused by or allegedly likely to result from
long-term consumption of food is based on: (a) A material violation of
an adulteration or misbranding requirement prescribed by statute or
rule of the state of Washington or the United States and the claimed
injury was proximately caused by such violation; or (b) any other
material violation of federal or state law applicable to the
manufacturing, marketing, distribution, advertising, labeling, or sale
of food, provided that such violation is knowing and willful, and the
claimed injury was proximately caused by such violation.
(3) In any action exempted under subsection (2)(a) of this section,
the complaint initiating such action shall state with particularity the
following: The statute, regulation, or other law of the state of
Washington or of the United States that was allegedly violated; the
facts that are alleged to constitute a material violation of such
statute or regulation; and the facts alleged to demonstrate that such
violation proximately caused actual injury to the plaintiff. In any
action exempted under subsection (2)(b) of this section, in addition to
the foregoing pleading requirements, the complaint initiating such
action shall state with particularity facts sufficient to support a
reasonable inference that the violation was with the intent to deceive
or injure consumers or with the actual knowledge that such violation
was injurious to consumers. For purposes of applying this section, the
pleading requirements of this subsection are hereby deemed part of the
substantive law of the state of Washington and not merely in the nature
of procedural provisions.
(4) In any action exempted under subsection (2) of this section,
all discovery and other proceedings shall be stayed during the pendency
of any motion to dismiss unless the court finds upon the motion of any
party that particularized discovery is necessary to preserve evidence
or to prevent undue prejudice to that party. During the pendency of
any stay of discovery pursuant to this subsection, unless otherwise
ordered by the court, any party to the action with actual notice of the
allegations contained in the complaint shall treat all documents, data
compilations including electronically recorded or stored data, and
tangible objects that are in the custody or control of such party and
that are relevant to the allegations, as if they were the subject of a
continuing request for production of documents from an opposing party
under Washington court rules.
(5) The provisions of this section shall apply to all covered
claims pending on the effective date of this act and all claims filed
thereafter, regardless of when the claim arose.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Claim" means any claim by or on behalf of a natural person, as
well as any derivative or other claim arising therefrom asserted by or
on behalf of any individual, corporation, company, association, firm,
partnership, society, joint stock company, or any other entity,
including any governmental entity or private attorney general.
(b) "Food" means "food" as defined in section 201(f) of the federal
food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. 321(f)).
(c) "Generally known condition allegedly caused by or allegedly
likely to result from long-term consumption" means a condition
generally known to result or to likely result from the cumulative
effect of consumption, and not from a single instance of consumption.
(d) "Knowing and willful violation" means that: (i) The conduct
constituting the violation was committed with the intent to deceive or
injure consumers or with actual knowledge that such conduct was
injurious to consumers; and (ii) the conduct constituting the violation
was not required by regulations, orders, rules, or other pronouncement
of, or any statute administered by, a federal, state, or local
government agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be cited as the commonsense
consumption act.

--- END ---