BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.72 RCW
to read as follows:
A manufacturer of goods is not liable for harm caused by defects in
goods attributed to such a manufacturer where the goods have been
purchased through a chain of distribution that does not establish the
manufacturer as the lawful source of the defective product. This
section does not apply where the harm is caused by:
(1) Willful or wanton acts of negligence by the manufacturer;
(2) Conscious indifference or reckless disregard for the safety of
others by the manufacturer; or
(3) Intentional conduct on the part of the manufacturer.

--- END ---