BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.120 and 1961 ex.s. c 18 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter establishes ((a)) minimum wage and hour standards
for ((wages and working conditions of)) all employees in this state,
unless exempted herefrom, and is in addition to and supplementary to
any other federal((,)) or state((, or local)) law ((or ordinance)), or
any rule or regulation issued thereunder. Any wage or hour standards
((relating to wages, hours, or other working conditions)) established
by any applicable federal((,)) or state((, or local)) law ((or
ordinance)), or any rule or regulation issued thereunder, which are
more favorable to employees than the minimum standards applicable under
this chapter, or any rule or regulation issued hereunder, shall not be
affected by this chapter and such other laws, or rules or regulations,
shall be in full force and effect and may be enforced as provided by
law.
(2) This chapter and chapter 39.12 RCW constitutes the exclusive
state authority for the establishment of minimum wage and hour
standards for employees in this state, and the state hereby fully
occupies and preempts any such authority of any county, city, town, or
other municipality. Any ordinance, resolution, or other legislative
act by any county, city, town, or other municipality relating to
minimum wage and hour standards on July 1, 2004, is, as of that date,
null and void and of no effect, regardless of the nature of the home
rule, charter, or code status of such county, city, town, or other
municipality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---