BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the heating,
ventilating, air conditioning, and refrigeration industry is
sufficiently unique and distinct from the general electrical industry
to justify the creation of a separate regulatory structure, governed by
its own board. The department of labor and industries is directed to
work with representatives of the heating, ventilating, air
conditioning, and refrigeration industry, and other interested parties,
to develop a comprehensive plan, including but not limited to all
legislative and regulatory changes necessary to create such a structure
and board.
(2) The comprehensive plan must be guided by and include the
following:
(a) Specific equipment must be identified and defined that
distinguish the heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and
refrigeration industry from other trades and industries;
(b) The regulatory scheme may not be a duplicate licensing process,
but must establish the training and experience requirements, including
but not limited to an examination relating to the identified heating,
ventilating, air conditioning, and refrigeration equipment, to ensure
that technicians and businesses performing work on such equipment are
qualified to do so in a manner that ensures their safety and the safety
of the public;
(c) The regulatory scheme must require heating, ventilating, air
conditioning, and refrigeration contractors to be subject to the
licensing and bonding requirements of chapter 18.27 RCW, but shall
exempt from electrical contractor licensing requirements all heating,
ventilating, air conditioning, and refrigeration contractors that meet
the requirements to be established under (a) of this subsection, with
respect to the identified heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and
refrigeration equipment;
(d) The regulatory scheme must also include a permitting and
inspection component, to apply where local jurisdictions do not have
more stringent standards, in order to ensure that appropriate
requirements for health and safety are met; and
(e) A board of heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and
refrigeration must be established with authority to: (i) Develop
appropriate rules; (ii) require, receive, and manage fees adequate to
finance the regulatory scheme; and (iii) enforce compliance of its
rules upon heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and refrigeration
contractors and technicians.
(3) The department shall submit the plan to the legislature no
later than December 31, 2004.

--- END ---