BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Consistent with the centennial accord, the
new millennium agreement, related treaties, and federal and state law,
it is the intent of the legislature to establish a framework whereby
the state and federally recognized tribes jointly establish operations
and methods of accountability to provide health care services to
maintain and improve the health status of American Indians residing in
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agencies" or "agency" means the department of health,
department of social and health services, state health care authority,
department of labor and industries, state board of health, and office
of the insurance commissioner.
(2) "Plan" means the American Indian health care plan developed
under section 6 of this act.
(3) "Lead agency" means the agency appointed by the governor to
meet the requirements set forth in section 4 of this act.
(4) "Tribes" are those tribes federally recognized in accordance
with the regulations of the United States department of the interior,
bureau of Indian affairs.
(5) "Subcabinet" means the subcabinet on health care or similar
body created by the governor comprised of agencies, related
governmental departments, and a tribal representative appointed under
section 3 of this act.
(6) "Indian health care system" means those tribal, Indian health
service, and urban Indian health programs that receive funding from the
federal Indian health service appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Upon a recommendation of the state's
American Indian health organization representing the largest number of
tribal leaders, the governor shall appoint the tribal representative to
the subcabinet as an advocate for Indian health care needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The subcabinet has the following
responsibilities:
(a) Recommend to the governor a lead agency to fulfill requirements
as specified in subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Review the plan prepared under section 6 of this act and make
recommendations to the governor regarding its approval;
(c) Convene, at least annually, a tribal health care management
meeting to provide a public forum for review of tribal and agency plan
performance and related issues;
(d) Develop, in consultation with the tribes, specific health care
performance measures.
(2) The lead agency has the following responsibilities:
(a) Consistent with funds identified for this purpose, provide and
coordinate the necessary resources and technical support to implement
this chapter;
(b) Coordinate the plan development required in section 6 of this
act;
(c) Administer funds and grants specifically designated for the
purpose of this chapter;
(d) Appoint work groups and ad hoc committees, as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Each agency and tribe has the following
responsibilities under this chapter:
(1) Work with the governor to ensure the provisions of the
centennial accord and new millennium agreement are implemented;
(2) Participate in the development of the plan and performance
measures standards;
(3) Create separately, or integrate into an existing tribal or
agency strategic plan, related objectives, strategies, and performance
measures consistent with the standards established under section 6 of
this act and strategic planning requirements set forth by the office of
financial management;
(4) Collect the necessary data to monitor plan performance and
provide the data for review at Indian health care management meetings
and for related purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The American Indian health care delivery
plan is established to be developed as follows:
(1) The plan must encompass a six-year period but may be revised
biennially consistent with the development of the state's biennial
budget.
(2) The plan must be developed in coordination with the state
health report, as required by chapter 43.20 RCW, and similar reporting
documents.
(3) It is the responsibility of the lead agency to oversee the
plan's development and to assure tribal consultation during the
process.
(4) The plan must include the following elements:
(a) Background and analysis, to include:
(i) Descriptions of all treaties, accords, agreements, statutes,
regulations, case law governing tribal health care, and related major
amendments and modifications during the previous biennium;
(ii) Description of the state's Indian health care system;
(iii) Forecasts and trends on: Indian morbidity, mortality, and
other selected health status indicators; funding and service delivery
issues; and adequacy of programs, providers, and facilities to meet
needs;
(iv) A summary of major Indian health care problems and issues,
including methods and analyses of identification;
(b) Strategies plan development, to include:
(i) Goals and strategies of each tribe and agency on methods to
address identified problems and issues;
(ii) Statutory and regulatory changes necessary to implement
strategies;
(iii) Related budget requirements;
(c) Performance measurements, including specific quantifiable
outcome measures that are consistent with the standards developed by
the subcabinet and of the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The governor has the following
responsibilities:
(1) Work with tribes and agencies to ensure the centennial accord
and the new millennium agreement are implemented;
(2) Appoint the tribal subcabinet member under section 3 of this
act in a timely manner;
(3) Attend an Indian health care management meeting at least
annually;
(4) Ensure that Indian health care issues received adequate
deliberation in the preparation of the state budget or key health
policy legislation, regulations, and executive orders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 43.70.590 (American Indian health care
delivery plan) and 1995 c 43 s 4 & 1993 c 492 s 468 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 7, 10, and 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended
or repealed in this act or under any rule or order adopted under those
sections, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those
sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act may be known and cited as the Sue
Crystal Indian health act.

--- END ---