BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.50.050 and 2001 c 175 s 1, 2001 c 174 s 1, and 2001
c 49 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This section governs records relating to the commission of
juvenile offenses, including records relating to diversions.
(2) The official juvenile court file of any alleged or proven
juvenile offender shall be open to public inspection, unless sealed
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.
(3) All records other than the official juvenile court file are
confidential and may be released only as provided in this section, RCW
13.50.010, 13.40.215, and 4.24.550.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section and RCW 13.50.010,
records retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care agency may
be released to other participants in the juvenile justice or care
system only when an investigation or case involving the juvenile in
question is being pursued by the other participant or when that other
participant is assigned the responsibility for supervising the
juvenile.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, information not in an
official juvenile court file concerning a juvenile or a juvenile's
family may be released to the public only when that information could
not reasonably be expected to identify the juvenile or the juvenile's
family.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the
release, to the juvenile or his or her attorney, of law enforcement and
prosecuting attorneys' records pertaining to investigation, diversion,
and prosecution of juvenile offenses shall be governed by the rules of
discovery and other rules of law applicable in adult criminal
investigations and prosecutions.
(7) Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, law enforcement and
prosecuting attorneys may cooperate with schools in releasing
information to a school pertaining to the investigation, diversion, and
prosecution of a juvenile attending the school. Upon the decision to
arrest or the arrest, incident reports may be released unless releasing
the records would jeopardize the investigation or prosecution or
endanger witnesses. If release of incident reports would jeopardize
the investigation or prosecution or endanger witnesses, law enforcement
and prosecuting attorneys may release information to the maximum extent
possible to assist schools in protecting other students, staff, and
school property.
(8) The juvenile court and the prosecutor may set up and maintain
a central record-keeping system which may receive information on all
alleged juvenile offenders against whom a complaint has been filed
pursuant to RCW 13.40.070 whether or not their cases are currently
pending before the court. The central record-keeping system may be
computerized. If a complaint has been referred to a diversion unit,
the diversion unit shall promptly report to the juvenile court or the
prosecuting attorney when the juvenile has agreed to diversion. An
offense shall not be reported as criminal history in any central
record-keeping system without notification by the diversion unit of the
date on which the offender agreed to diversion.
(9) Upon request of the victim of a crime or the victim's immediate
family, the identity of an alleged or proven juvenile offender alleged
or found to have committed a crime against the victim and the identity
of the alleged or proven juvenile offender's parent, guardian, or
custodian and the circumstance of the alleged or proven crime shall be
released to the victim of the crime or the victim's immediate family.
(10) Subject to the rules of discovery applicable in adult criminal
prosecutions, the juvenile offense records of an adult criminal
defendant or witness in an adult criminal proceeding shall be released
upon request to prosecution and defense counsel after a charge has
actually been filed. The juvenile offense records of any adult
convicted of a crime and placed under the supervision of the adult
corrections system shall be released upon request to the adult
corrections system.
(11) In any case in which an information has been filed pursuant to
RCW 13.40.100 or a complaint has been filed with the prosecutor and
referred for diversion pursuant to RCW 13.40.070, the person the
subject of the information or complaint may file a motion with the
court to have the court vacate its order and findings, if any, and,
subject to subsection (23) of this section, order the sealing of the
official juvenile court file, the social file, and records of the court
and of any other agency in the case.
(12) The court shall not grant any motion to seal records made
pursuant to subsection (11) of this section that is filed on or after
July 1, 1997, unless it finds that:
(a) For class B offenses other than sex offenses, since the last
date of release from confinement, including full-time residential
treatment, if any, or entry of disposition, the person has spent
((ten)) five consecutive years in the community without committing any
offense or crime that subsequently results in conviction. For class C
offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date of release from
confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or
entry of disposition, the person has spent ((five)) two consecutive
years in the community without committing any offense or crime that
subsequently results in conviction. For gross misdemeanors and
misdemeanors, since the last date of release from confinement,
including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry of
disposition, the person has spent two consecutive years in the
community without committing any offense or crime that subsequently
results in conviction ((and the person is at least eighteen years old.
For gross misdemeanors, since the last date of release from
confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or
entry of disposition, the person has spent three consecutive years in
the community without committing any offense or crime that subsequently
results in conviction and the person is at least eighteen years old)).
For diversions, since completion of the diversion agreement, the person
has spent two consecutive years in the community without committing any
offense or crime that subsequently results in conviction or diversion
((and the person is at least eighteen years old));
(b) No proceeding is pending against the moving party seeking the
conviction of a juvenile offense or a criminal offense;
(c) No proceeding is pending seeking the formation of a diversion
agreement with that person;
(d) The person has not been convicted of a class A or sex offense;
and
(e) Full restitution has been paid.
(13) The person making a motion pursuant to subsection (11) of this
section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to the prosecution
and to any person or agency whose files are sought to be sealed.
(14) If the court grants the motion to seal made pursuant to
subsection (11) of this section, it shall, subject to subsection (23)
of this section, order sealed the official juvenile court file, the
social file, and other records relating to the case as are named in the
order. Thereafter, the proceedings in the case shall be treated as if
they never occurred, and the subject of the records may reply
accordingly to any inquiry about the events, records of which are
sealed. Any agency shall reply to any inquiry concerning confidential
or sealed records that records are confidential, and no information can
be given about the existence or nonexistence of records concerning an
individual.
(15) Inspection of the files and records included in the order to
seal may thereafter be permitted only by order of the court upon motion
made by the person who is the subject of the information or complaint,
except as otherwise provided in RCW 13.50.010(8) and subsection (23) of
this section.
(16) Any adjudication of a juvenile offense or a crime subsequent
to sealing has the effect of nullifying the sealing order. Any
charging of an adult felony subsequent to the sealing has the effect of
nullifying the sealing order for the purposes of chapter 9.94A RCW.
The administrative office of the courts shall ensure that the
superior court management information system automatically retrieves
sealed juvenile records upon the charging of the person with an adult
felony.
(17)(a) A person eighteen years of age or older whose criminal
history consists of only one referral for diversion may request that
the court order the records in that case destroyed. The request shall
be granted, subject to subsection (23) of this section, if the court
finds that two years have elapsed since completion of the diversion
agreement.
(b) A person twenty-three years of age or older whose criminal
history consists of only referrals for diversion may request that the
court order the records in those cases destroyed. The request shall be
granted, subject to subsection (23) of this section, if the court finds
that all diversion agreements have been successfully completed and no
proceeding is pending against the person seeking the conviction of a
criminal offense.
(18) If the court grants the motion to destroy records made
pursuant to subsection (17) of this section, it shall, subject to
subsection (23) of this section, order the official juvenile court
file, the social file, and any other records named in the order to be
destroyed.
(19) The person making the motion pursuant to subsection (17) of
this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to the
prosecuting attorney and to any agency whose records are sought to be
destroyed.
(20) Any juvenile to whom the provisions of this section may apply
shall be given written notice of his or her rights under this section
at the time of his or her disposition hearing or during the diversion
process.
(21) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a crime
victim or a member of the victim's family from divulging the identity
of the alleged or proven juvenile offender or his or her family when
necessary in a civil proceeding.
(22) Any juvenile justice or care agency may, subject to the
limitations in subsection (23) of this section and (a) and (b) of this
subsection, develop procedures for the routine destruction of records
relating to juvenile offenses and diversions.
(a) Records may be routinely destroyed only when the person the
subject of the information or complaint has attained twenty-three years
of age or older, or is eighteen years of age or older and his or her
criminal history consists entirely of one diversion agreement and two
years have passed since completion of the agreement.
(b) The court may not routinely destroy the official juvenile court
file or recordings or transcripts of any proceedings.
(23) No identifying information held by the Washington state patrol
in accordance with chapter 43.43 RCW is subject to destruction or
sealing under this section. For the purposes of this subsection,
identifying information includes photographs, fingerprints, palmprints,
soleprints, toeprints and any other data that identifies a person by
physical characteristics, name, birthdate or address, but does not
include information regarding criminal activity, arrest, charging,
diversion, conviction or other information about a person's treatment
by the criminal justice system or about the person's behavior.
(24) Information identifying child victims under age eighteen who
are victims of sexual assaults by juvenile offenders is confidential
and not subject to release to the press or public without the
permission of the child victim or the child's legal guardian.
Identifying information includes the child victim's name, addresses,
location, photographs, and in cases in which the child victim is a
relative of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the relationship
between the child and the alleged perpetrator. Information identifying
a child victim of sexual assault may be released to law enforcement,
prosecutors, judges, defense attorneys, or private or governmental
agencies that provide services to the child victim of sexual assault.

--- END ---