BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.750 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Effective September 1, 2000, the membership of all plan 2
members currently employed in eligible positions in a school district
or educational service district and all plan 2 service credit for such
members, is transferred to the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2. Plan 2 members who have withdrawn their member
contributions for prior plan 2 service may restore contributions and
service credit to the Washington school employees' retirement system
plan 2 as provided under RCW 41.40.740.
(2)(a) ((The membership and previous service credit of a plan 2
member not employed in an eligible position on September 1, 2000, will
be transferred to the Washington school employees' retirement system
plan 2 when he or she becomes employed in an eligible position.)) Plan
2 members not employed in an eligible position on September 1, 2000,
who have withdrawn their member contributions for prior plan 2 service
may restore contributions and service credit to the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 2 as provided under RCW 41.40.740.
(b) The membership and previous service credit of a plan 2 member
last employed by a school district or educational service district and
retired prior to September 1, 2000, will be transferred to the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 if the member
opts to reestablish membership.
(3) Members who restore contributions and service credit under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall have their contributions
and service credit transferred to the Washington school employees'
retirement system.

--- END ---