BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.010 and 1985 c 38 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Selling price" means the consideration, whether money,
credits, rights, or other property except trade-in property of like
kind, expressed in the terms of money paid or delivered by a buyer to
a seller without any deduction on account of the cost of tangible
property sold, the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest,
discount, delivery costs, taxes other than taxes imposed under this
chapter if the seller advertises the price as including the tax or that
the seller is paying the tax, or any other expenses whatsoever paid or
accrued and without any deduction on account of losses; but shall not
include the amount of cash discount actually taken by a buyer or a
rebate given by a manufacturer and assigned to a seller by a buyer; and
shall be subject to modification to the extent modification is provided
for in RCW 82.08.080.
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department of revenue may
prescribe;
(2) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or principal, except
"seller" does not mean the state and its departments and institutions
when making sales to the state and its departments and institutions;
(3) "Buyer" and "consumer" include, without limiting the scope
hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy,
trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint
stock company, business trust, corporation, association, society, or
any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative,
fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation, quasi
municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at retail,"
"retail sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging
in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state"
and "within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.010 and 2003 c 168 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means
the total amount of consideration, except trade-in property of like
kind, including cash, credit, property, and services, for which
tangible personal property or services defined as a "retail sale" under
RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether
received in money or otherwise. No deduction from the total amount of
consideration is allowed for the following: (a) The seller's cost of
the property sold; (b) the cost of materials used, labor or service
cost, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to the seller, all
taxes imposed on the seller, and any other expense of the seller; (c)
charges by the seller for any services necessary to complete the sale,
other than delivery and installation charges; (d) delivery charges; (e)
installation charges; and (f) the value of exempt tangible personal
property given to the purchaser where taxable and exempt tangible
personal property have been bundled together and sold by the seller as
a single product or piece of merchandise.
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
"Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property or services, if the amount is
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
given to the purchaser; a rebate given by a manufacturer and assigned
to a seller by a buyer; and any taxes legally imposed directly on the
consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser;
(2) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean the state and its departments
and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and
institutions;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at retail,"
"retail sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging
in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state"
and "within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter;
(6) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and
under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal
property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that
is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal
property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten
computer software.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---