BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Transportation efficiency legislation
enacted in 2002 revised the state's highway project priority selection
systems to include a primary emphasis on the relief of traffic
congestion. The comprehensive six-year investment program is based
both upon the revised project priority selection systems and upon the
needs identified in the state-owned highway component of the statewide
multimodal transportation plan. The legislature finds that the
statewide multimodal transportation plan should reflect the same focus
on congestion as the recently revised project priority selection
systems.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.06.050 and 2002 c 5 s 413 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state-owned facilities component of the statewide
transportation plan shall consist of:
(1) The state highway system plan, which identifies program and
financing needs and recommends specific and financially realistic
improvements to preserve the structural integrity of the state highway
system, ensure acceptable operating conditions, and provide for
enhanced access to scenic, recreational, and cultural resources. The
state highway system plan shall contain the following elements:
(a) A system preservation element, which shall establish structural
preservation objectives for the state highway system including bridges,
identify current and future structural deficiencies based upon analysis
of current conditions and projected future deterioration, and recommend
program funding levels and specific actions necessary to preserve the
structural integrity of the state highway system consistent with
adopted objectives. Lowest life cycle cost methodologies must be used
in developing a pavement management system. This element shall serve
as the basis for the preservation component of the six-year highway
program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;
(b) A highway maintenance element, establishing service levels for
highway maintenance on state-owned highways that meet benchmarks
established by the transportation commission. The highway maintenance
element must include an estimate of costs for achieving those service
levels over twenty years. This element will serve as the basis for the
maintenance component of the six-year highway program and the two-year
biennial budget request to the legislature;
(c) A capacity and operational improvement element, which shall
establish operational objectives, including safety considerations, for
moving people and goods on the state highway system, identify current
and future capacity, operational, and safety deficiencies, and
recommend program funding levels and specific improvements and
strategies necessary to achieve the operational objectives. In
developing capacity and operational improvement plans the department
shall first assess ((strategies to enhance the operational efficiency
of the existing system before recommending system expansion)) system
expansion strategies to relieve traffic congestion before recommending
strategies that enhance only the operational efficiency of the existing
system. System expansion strategies that relieve traffic congestion
must primarily address delay, accidents, heavily traveled
transportation corridors, and possible synchronization of
transportation projects that include both transit and multimodal
projects within heavily traveled corridors. Strategies to enhance the
operational efficiencies include but are not limited to access
management, transportation system management, demand management, and
high-occupancy vehicle facilities. The capacity and operational
improvement element must conform to the state implementation plan for
air quality and be consistent with regional transportation plans
adopted under chapter 47.80 RCW, and shall serve as the basis for the
capacity and operational improvement portions of the six-year highway
program and the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;
(d) A scenic and recreational highways element, which shall
identify and recommend designation of scenic and recreational highways,
provide for enhanced access to scenic, recreational, and cultural
resources associated with designated routes, and recommend a variety of
management strategies to protect, preserve, and enhance these
resources. The department, affected counties, cities, and towns,
regional transportation planning organizations, and other state or
federal agencies shall jointly develop this element;
(e) A paths and trails element, which shall identify the needs of
nonmotorized transportation modes on the state transportation systems
and provide the basis for the investment of state transportation funds
in paths and trails, including funding provided under chapter 47.30
RCW.
(2) The state ferry system plan, which shall guide capital and
operating investments in the state ferry system. The plan shall
establish service objectives for state ferry routes, forecast travel
demand for the various markets served in the system, develop strategies
for ferry system investment that consider regional and statewide
vehicle and passenger needs, support local land use plans, and assure
that ferry services are fully integrated with other transportation
services. The plan must provide for maintenance of capital assets.
The plan must also provide for preservation of capital assets based on
lowest life cycle cost methodologies. The plan shall assess the role
of private ferries operating under the authority of the utilities and
transportation commission and shall coordinate ferry system capital and
operational plans with these private operations. The ferry system plan
must be consistent with the regional transportation plans for areas
served by the state ferry system, and shall be developed in conjunction
with the ferry advisory committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---