BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.91.040 and 1965 c 7 s 35.91.040 are each amended to
read as follows:
((No)) (1) A person, firm, or corporation ((shall)) may not be
granted a permit or be authorized to tap into, or use any such water or
sewer facilities or extensions thereof during the period of time
prescribed in such contract without first paying to the municipality,
in addition to any and all other costs and charges made or assessed for
such tap, or use, or for the water lines or sewers constructed in
connection therewith, the amount required by the provisions of the
contract under which the water or sewer facilities so tapped into or
used were constructed. All amounts so received by the municipality
shall be paid out by it under the terms of such contract within sixty
days after the receipt thereof. Whenever any tap or connection is made
into any such contracted water or sewer facilities without such payment
having first been made, the governing body of the municipality may
remove, or cause to be removed, such unauthorized tap or connection and
all connecting tile, or pipe located in the facility right of way and
dispose of unauthorized material so removed without any liability
whatsoever.
(2) A tap or connection charge under this section for service to a
manufactured housing community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, applies to
an individual lot within that community only if the municipality
provides and maintains the tap-in connection.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.94.140 and 2003 c 394 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every county, in the operation of a system of sewerage and/or
water, shall have full jurisdiction and authority to manage, regulate,
and control it. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
every county shall have full jurisdiction and authority to fix, alter,
regulate, and control the rates and charges for the service and
facilities to those to whom such service and facilities are available,
and to levy charges for connection to the system.
(2) The rates for availability of service and facilities, and
connection charges so charged must be uniform for the same class of
customers or service and facility. In classifying customers served,
service furnished or made available by such system of sewerage and/or
water, or the connection charges, the county legislative authority may
consider any or all of the following factors:
(a) The difference in cost of service to the various customers
within or without the area;
(b) The difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair and
replacement of the various parts of the systems;
(c) The different character of the service and facilities furnished
various customers;
(d) The quantity and quality of the sewage and/or water delivered
and the time of its delivery;
(e) Capital contributions made to the system or systems, including,
but not limited to, assessments;
(f) The cost of acquiring the system or portions of the system in
making system improvements necessary for the public health and safety;
(g) The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user; and
(h) Any other matters which present a reasonable difference as a
ground for distinction.
(3) The rate a county may charge under this section for storm or
surface water sewer systems or the portion of the rate allocable to the
storm or surface water sewer system of combined sanitary sewage and
storm or surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of
ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes
a permissive rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems
shall be properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the
building. The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of
ten percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested.
(4) A county may provide assistance to aid low-income persons in
connection with services provided under this chapter.
(5) The service charges and rates shall produce revenues sufficient
to take care of the costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond
and warrant interest and principal amortization requirements, and all
other charges necessary for the efficient and proper operation of the
system.
(6) A connection charge under this section for service to a
manufactured housing community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, applies to
an individual lot within that community only if the system of water or
sewerage provides and maintains the connection.

Sec. 3 RCW 57.08.081 and 2003 c 394 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 57.08.005(6), the commissioners of any district
shall provide for revenues by fixing rates and charges for furnishing
sewer and drainage service and facilities to those to whom service is
available or for providing water, such rates and charges to be fixed as
deemed necessary by the commissioners, so that uniform charges will be
made for the same class of customer or service and facility. Rates and
charges may be combined for the furnishing of more than one type of
sewer or drainage service and facilities.
(2) In classifying customers of such water, sewer, or drainage
system, the board of commissioners may in its discretion consider any
or all of the following factors: The difference in cost to various
customers; the location of the various customers within and without the
district; the difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair, and
replacement of the various parts of the system; the different character
of the service furnished various customers; the quantity and quality of
the service and facility furnished; the time of its use; the
achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement of
wasteful practices; capital contributions made to the system including
but not limited to assessments; and any other matters which present a
reasonable difference as a ground for distinction. Rates shall be
established as deemed proper by the commissioners and as fixed by
resolution and shall produce revenues sufficient to take care of the
costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond and warrant interest
and principal amortization requirements, and all other charges
necessary for efficient and proper operation of the system. Prior to
furnishing services, a district may require a deposit to guarantee
payment for services. However, failure to require a deposit does not
affect the validity of any lien authorized by this section.
(3)(a) The commissioners shall enforce collection of connection
charges, and rates and charges for water supplied against property
owners connecting with the system or receiving such water, and for
sewer and drainage services charged against property to which and its
owners to whom the service is available, such charges being deemed
charges against the property served, by addition of penalties of not
more than ten percent thereof in case of failure to pay the charges at
times fixed by resolution. The commissioners may provide by resolution
that where either connection charges or rates and charges for services
supplied are delinquent for any specified period of time, the district
shall certify the delinquencies to the auditor of the county in which
the real property is located, and the charges and any penalties added
thereto and interest thereon at the rate of not more than the prime
lending rate of the district's bank plus four percentage points per
year shall be a lien against the property upon which the service was
received, subject only to the lien for general taxes.
(b) A connection charge under this section for service to a
manufactured housing community, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, applies to
an individual lot within that community only if the district provides
and maintains the connection.
(4) The district may, at any time after the connection charges or
rates and charges for services supplied or available and penalties are
delinquent for a period of sixty days, bring suit in foreclosure by
civil action in the superior court of the county in which the real
property is located. The court may allow, in addition to the costs and
disbursements provided by statute, attorneys' fees, title search and
report costs, and expenses as it adjudges reasonable. The action shall
be in rem, and may be brought in the name of the district against an
individual or against all of those who are delinquent in one action.
The laws and rules of the court shall control as in other civil
actions.
(5) In addition to the right to foreclose provided in this section,
the district may also cut off all or part of the service after charges
for water or sewer service supplied or available are delinquent for a
period of thirty days.
(6) A district may determine how to apply partial payments on past
due accounts.
(7) A district may provide a real property owner or the owner's
designee with duplicate bills for service to tenants, or may notify an
owner or the owner's designee that a tenant's service account is
delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's designee notifies the
district in writing that a property served by the district is a rental
property, asks to be notified of a tenant's delinquency, and has
provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing address, the
district shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a tenant's
delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the district
notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a
district provides a real property owner or the owner's designee with
duplicates of tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's
utility account is delinquent, the district shall notify the tenant
that it is providing the duplicate bills or delinquency notice to the
owner or the owner's designee. After January 1, 1999, if a district
fails to notify the owner of a tenant's delinquency after receiving a
written request to do so and after receiving the other information
required by this subsection (7), the district shall have no lien
against the premises for the tenant's delinquent and unpaid charges.

--- END ---