BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.16.120 and 1984 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a worker has a previous bodily disability from any
previous injury or disease, whether known or unknown to the employer,
and shall suffer a further disability from injury or occupational
disease in employment covered by this title and become totally and
permanently disabled from the combined effects thereof or die when
death was substantially accelerated by the combined effects thereof,
then the experience record of an employer insured with the state fund
at the time of said further injury or disease shall be charged and a
self-insured employer shall pay directly into the reserve fund only the
accident cost which would have resulted solely from said further injury
or disease, had there been no preexisting disability, and which
accident cost shall be based upon an evaluation of the disability by
medical experts. The difference between the charge thus assessed to
such employer at the time of said further injury or disease and the
total cost of the pension reserve shall be assessed against the second
injury fund. The department shall pass upon the application of this
section in all cases where benefits are paid for total permanent
disability or death and issue an order thereon appealable by the
employer. Pending outcome of such appeal the transfer or payment shall
be made as required by such order.
(2) The department shall, in cases of claims of workers sustaining
injuries or occupational diseases in the employ of state fund
employers, recompute the experience record of such employers when the
claims of workers injured in their employ have been found to qualify
for payments from the second injury fund after the regular time for
computation of such experience records and the department may make
appropriate adjustments in such cases including cash refunds or credits
to such employers.
(3) To encourage employment of injured workers who are not
reemployed by the employer at the time of injury, the department may
adopt rules providing for the reduction or elimination of premiums or
assessments from subsequent employers of such workers and may also
adopt rules for the reduction or elimination of charges against such
employers in the event of further injury to such workers in their
employ.
(4) To encourage employment of injured workers who have a
developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020, the department
may adopt rules providing for the reduction or elimination of premiums
or assessments from employers of such workers and may also adopt rules
for the reduction or elimination of charges against their employers in
the event of further injury to such workers in their employ.

--- END ---