BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
corporate three strikes act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds and declares all of
the following:
(1) The people of Washington have declared that the public safety
and welfare are priorities for them and critical to the preservation
and improvement of their quality of life. This declaration of policy
includes adoption of Initiative 593, to reduce threats to the enjoyment
of life and security by eliminating the ability of certain offenders to
repeat their victimization of the people and businesses of Washington.
(2) The principles of equity and consistency, as well as the goal
of improving public safety and welfare, require the extension of the
goals in Initiative 593 to another class of repeat offenders when the
consequences to the repeated offenses may not otherwise achieve a
sufficient deterrent or preventive effect to protect Washingtonians.
(3) The penalties available to the judiciary for criminal conduct
by corporations are restricted by the inability of the judicial system
to imprison a fictional person, generally leaving only temporary
monetary penalties as the practical method of punishment and deterrent
in cases of corporate criminal conduct. These penalties may not prove
to be sufficient in all cases, leading to an ongoing risk of harm to
public safety and welfare.
(4) Therefore, the legislature intends to expand the protections
afforded Washingtonians by establishing an additional set of
protections to be invoked only when existing remedies prove
insufficient to end the repeated commission of felonies by a limited
number of corporations conducting intrastate business in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This chapter applies to the following
entities:
(1) Business corporations subject to Title 23B RCW;
(2) Nonprofit corporations and associations subject to Title 24
RCW, except those operating under chapter 24.12 RCW or operating
primarily or exclusively for any religious purposes;
(3) Partnerships and limited liability companies subject to Title
25 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An entity subject to this chapter is a
repeat offender if it has three or more strikes against it within any
ten-year period after the effective date of this act.
(a) For purposes of this chapter, a strike against a wholly owned
subsidiary shall also be considered a strike against the parent entity.
A strike against a predecessor entity shall be considered a strike
against the entity.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have
the following meanings:
(i) "Conviction" means a conviction by a court of competent
jurisdiction in the United States, whether entered upon a verdict or a
plea, including a plea of nolo contendere.
(ii) "Felony crime" means a crime that is classified as a felony
under Washington law, a crime that would be classified as a felony
under Washington law if the crime was committed in Washington, or a
federal crime that is classified as a class A, B, C, D, or E felony in
the United States Code.
(iii) "Predecessor entity" means an entity subject to this chapter
for which a majority of its directors or officers at the time of a
strike are now directors or officers of the existing entity, as
determined by the secretary of state.
(iv) "Strike" means the conviction of a felony crime arising from
any violation of fraud, tax, bribery, extortion, consumer protection,
environmental protection, civil rights, labor, employment, antitrust,
political campaign, or finance law.
(2) A repeat offender shall not transact intrastate business in
Washington if its third or subsequent strike was a conviction by a
state or federal court in Washington or if the facts giving rise to the
third or subsequent strike occurred in Washington.
(3) An entity subject to this chapter shall not be incorporated,
formed, or transact intrastate business in Washington if a majority of
its directors or officers were directors or officers of a repeat
offender when it became subject to subsection (2) of this section, as
determined by the secretary of state after notice to the entity and an
opportunity for the entity to respond.
(4) An entity subject to this chapter shall not be incorporated,
formed, or transact intrastate business in Washington if it is legally
controlled by an entity with a majority of directors or officers who
were directors or officers of a repeat offender when it became subject
to subsection (2) of this section, as determined by the secretary of
state after notice to the entity and an opportunity for the entity to
respond.
(5) Multiple convictions arising out of the same facts and
circumstances and heard by the same court shall be considered one
conviction for purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An entity subject to this chapter that
is formed under the laws of this state or is qualified to transact
intrastate business in this state shall file with the secretary of
state an annual statement of any criminal convictions against the
entity during the previous year. No statement shall be filed if there
are no convictions to report.
(2) The secretary of state shall prescribe an electronic form for
submission of these statements and shall make them available to the
public in a timely fashion through the secretary's internet web site.
A statement shall be accessible on the web site of the secretary for a
minimum of ten years.
(3) If the entity is a wholly owned subsidiary of another entity,
the statement shall also indicate the following information:
(a) The parent entity's name.
(b) The parent entity's place of incorporation.
(4) Whether the parent entity is authorized to transact intrastate
business in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) If a repeat offender is a corporation
formed under the laws of this state, and its third or subsequent strike
was a conviction by a state or federal court in Washington or if the
facts giving rise to the third or subsequent strike occurred in
Washington, the attorney general shall bring an action to dissolve the
corporation and provide for forfeiture of its corporate existence.
(2) If a repeat offender is a partnership or limited liability
company formed under the laws of this state, and its third or
subsequent strike was a conviction by a state or federal court in
Washington or if the facts giving rise to the third or subsequent
strike occurred in Washington, the attorney general shall bring an
action for unlawful exercise of a franchise.
(3) If an entity is subject to subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the court may appoint a receiver to take over and manage the
business and affairs of the entity, and to preserve its property, until
final dissolution and forfeiture is complete. In the process of
dissolving and forfeiture, the court shall endeavor to assure, within
reason, that following dissolution and forfeiture existing jobs and
wages are not lost, to protect community interests and legitimate
investor interests, and to maintain the entity's obligations to protect
the health, safety, and environment of workers and the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If a repeat offender is an entity formed
under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this state and is qualified
to transact intrastate business in this state, and its third or
subsequent strike was a conviction by a state or federal court in
Washington or if the facts giving rise to the conviction occurred in
Washington, the secretary of state shall, after a fair hearing and on
the basis of substantial evidence that the entity is a repeat offender,
order forfeiture of the entity's qualification to transact intrastate
business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) In addition to all other civil and
criminal remedies, an entity subject to this chapter that has committed
a first strike offense shall publish the details of its offense in a
full page statement in the largest newspaper of general circulation in
Washington.
(2) In addition to all other civil and criminal remedies, an entity
subject to this chapter that has committed a second strike offense
shall publish the details of its offense in a full page statement in
the six largest newspapers of general circulation in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A person may petition the attorney
general or the secretary of state to enforce this chapter against a
repeat offender or a first or second strike offender.
(2) If the attorney general or the secretary of state rejects the
petition, or fails to act within one hundred eighty days of the
submission of the petition, a person may bring an action for a writ of
mandate to compel enforcement of this chapter.
(3) The person bringing the action for writ of mandate shall be
entitled to an award of costs and reasonable attorneys' fees if he or
she is the prevailing party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 23B RCW.

--- END ---