BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.040 and 2001 c 159 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond
issued by a surety insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28
RCW in the sum of at least twelve thousand dollars if the applicant is
a general contractor and at least six thousand dollars if the applicant
is a specialty contractor.
(b) If no valid bond is already on file with the department at the
time the application is filed, a bond must accompany the registration
application.
(c) The amount of the bond required upon the renewal of an
applicant's registration shall be the equivalent of:
(i) The sum of two thousand dollars times the number of contracts
to which RCW 18.27.114 applies that the applicant entered into during
the twelve months immediately preceding the expiration of the
applicant's registration, plus twelve thousand dollars, if the
applicant is a general contractor; or
(ii) The sum of one thousand dollars times the number of projects
to which RCW 18.27.114 applies that the applicant contracted to work on
during the twelve months immediately preceding the expiration of the
applicant's registration, plus six thousand dollars, if the applicant
is a specialty contractor.
(d) The bond shall have the state of Washington named as obligee
with good and sufficient surety in a form to be approved by the
department. The bond shall be continuous and may be canceled by the
surety upon the surety giving written notice to the director. A
cancellation or revocation of the bond or withdrawal of the surety from
the bond automatically suspends the registration issued to the
registrant until a new bond or reinstatement notice has been filed and
approved as provided in this section. The bond shall be conditioned
that the applicant will pay all persons performing labor, including
employee benefits, for the contractor, will pay all taxes and
contributions due to the state of Washington, and will pay all persons
furnishing labor or material or renting or supplying equipment to the
contractor and will pay all amounts that may be adjudged against the
contractor by reason of breach of contract including negligent or
improper work in the conduct of the contracting business.
(e) A change in the name of a business or a change in the type of
business entity shall not impair a bond for the purposes of this
section so long as one of the original applicants for such bond
maintains partial ownership in the business covered by the bond.
(2) At the time of initial registration or renewal, the contractor
shall provide a bond or other security deposit as required by this
chapter and comply with all of the other provisions of this chapter
before the department shall issue or renew the contractor's certificate
of registration. Any contractor registered as of July 1, 2001, who
maintains that registration in accordance with this chapter is in
compliance with this chapter until the next renewal of the contractor's
certificate of registration.
(3) Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the
contractor for any of the items referred to in this section may bring
suit upon the bond or deposit in the superior court of the county in
which the work was done or of any county in which jurisdiction of the
contractor may be had. The surety issuing the bond shall be named as
a party to any suit upon the bond. Action upon the bond or deposit
brought by a residential homeowner for breach of contract by a party to
the construction contract shall be commenced by filing the summons and
complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within two
years from the date the claimed contract work was substantially
completed or abandoned. Action upon the bond or deposit brought by any
other authorized party shall be commenced by filing the summons and
complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within one
year from the date the claimed labor was performed and benefits
accrued, taxes and contributions owing the state of Washington became
due, materials and equipment were furnished, or the claimed contract
work was substantially completed or abandoned. Service of process in
an action against the contractor, the contractor's bond, or the deposit
shall be exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of
the summons and complaint and a fee adopted by rule of not less than
twenty dollars to cover the costs shall be served by registered or
certified mail, or other delivery service requiring notice of receipt,
upon the department at the time suit is started and the department
shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all suits
so commenced. Service is not complete until the department receives
the fee and three copies of the summons and complaint. The service
shall constitute service on the registrant and the surety for suit upon
the bond or deposit and the department shall transmit the summons and
complaint or a copy thereof to the registrant at the address listed in
the registrant's application and to the surety within two days after it
shall have been received.
(4) The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate
amount in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary
penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for an infraction. The
liability of the surety shall not cumulate where the bond has been
renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued or otherwise extended. The
surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the department and the
parties, tender to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the
action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the amount of the
bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied
therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond
shall be exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending at any one
time exceed the amount of the bond then unimpaired, claims shall be
satisfied from the bond in the following order:
(a) Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee
benefits;
(b) Claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction
contract;
(c) Registered or licensed subcontractors, material, and equipment;
(d) Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;
(e) Any court costs, interest, and ((attorney's [attorneys']))
attorneys' fees plaintiff may be entitled to recover. The surety is
not liable for any amount in excess of the penal limit of its bond.
A payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to
the extent of any payment made by the surety.
(5) The total amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a
general contractor by this section to claimants other than residential
homeowners must not exceed one-half of the bond amount. The total
amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a specialty contractor
by this section to claimants other than residential homeowners must not
exceed one-half of the bond amount or four thousand dollars, whichever
is greater.
(6) The prevailing party in an action filed under this section
against the contractor and contractor's bond or deposit, for breach of
contract by a party to a construction contract, is entitled to costs,
interest, and reasonable attorneys' fees. The surety upon the bond is
not liable in an aggregate amount in excess of the amount named in the
bond nor for any monetary penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for
an infraction.
(7) If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon
the bond so furnished that there is not in effect a bond in the full
amount prescribed in this section, the registration of the contractor
is automatically suspended until the bond liability in the required
amount unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims is furnished.
(8) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
contractor may file with the department a deposit consisting of cash or
other security acceptable to the department.
(9) Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as
required by this section having an unsatisfied final judgment against
the registrant for any items referred to in this section may execute
upon the security held by the department by serving a certified copy of
the unsatisfied final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the
department within one year of the date of entry of such judgment. Upon
the receipt of service of such certified copy the department shall pay
or order paid from the deposit, through the registry of the superior
court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the unsatisfied
judgment. The priority of payment by the department shall be the order
of receipt by the department, but the department shall have no
liability for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.
(10) The director may require an applicant applying to renew or
reinstate a registration or applying for a new registration to file a
bond of up to three times the normally required amount, if the director
determines that an applicant, or a previous registration of a corporate
officer, owner, or partner of a current applicant, has had in the past
five years a total of six final judgments in actions under this chapter
involving a residential single-family dwelling on two or more different
structures.
(11) The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper
administration of the security.

--- END ---