BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.85.110 and 1997 c 322 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter shall not apply to: (1) Any person who purchases
property and/or a business opportunity for his or her own account, or
that of a group of which he or she is a member, or who, as the owner or
part owner of property, and/or a business opportunity, in any way
disposes of the same; ((nor,)) (2) any duly authorized attorney in fact
acting without compensation, or an attorney at law in the performance
of his or her duties; ((nor,)) (3) any receiver, trustee in bankruptcy,
executor, administrator, guardian, or any person acting under the order
of any court, or selling under a deed of trust; ((nor,)) (4) any
secretary, bookkeeper, accountant, or other office personnel who does
not engage in any conduct or activity specified in any of the
definitions under RCW 18.85.010; ((nor,)) (5) any owner of rental or
lease property, members of the owner's family whether or not residing
on such property, or a resident manager of a complex of residential
dwelling units wherein such manager resides; ((nor,)) (6) any person
who manages residential dwelling units on an incidental basis and not
as his or her principal source of income so long as that person does
not advertise or hold out to the public by any oral or printed
solicitation or representation that he or she is so engaged; ((nor,))
(7) only with respect to the rental or lease of individual storage
space, any person who owns or manages a self-service storage facility
as defined under chapter 19.150 RCW; or (8) any person contracting with
a local public agency to acquire real estate for that agency under that
agency's right of eminent domain. For the purposes of this subsection,
"local public agency" has the same meaning as in RCW 8.26.020.

--- END ---