BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.28.050 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) After computing the tax imposed by RCW 54.28.020(1), the
department of revenue shall instruct the state treasurer, after placing
thirty-seven and six-tenths percent in the state general fund to be
dedicated for the benefit of the public schools, to distribute the
balance collected under RCW 54.28.020(1)(a) to each county in
proportion to the gross revenue from sales made within each county; and
to distribute the balance collected under RCW 54.28.020(1) (b) and (c)
as follows:
(a) If the entire generating facility, including reservoir,
powerhouse, and dam, if any, is in a single county then all of the
balance to the county where such generating facility is located.
(b) If any reservoir is in more than one county, then to each
county in which the reservoir or any portion thereof is located a
percentage equal to the percentage determined by dividing the total
cost of the generating facilities, including adjacent switching
facilities, into twice the cost of land and land rights acquired for
any reservoir within each county, land and land rights to be defined
the same as used by the federal power commission.
(c) If the powerhouse and dam, if any, in connection with such
reservoir are in more than one county, the balance shall be divided
sixty percent to the county in which the owning district is located and
forty percent to the other county or counties or if said powerhouse and
dam, if any, are owned by a joint operating agency organized under
chapter 43.52 RCW, or by more than one district or are outside the
county of the owning district, then ((to)) the balance shall be divided
equally between the counties in which such facilities are located.
((If all of the powerhouse and dam, if any, are in one county, then the
balance shall be distributed to the county in which the facilities are
located.))
(d) If an entire nonhydroelectric generating facility is located in
more than one county, then the balance shall be distributed to each
county in an amount equal to the percent of the original cost of the
generating facility located in each county as compared to the total
original cost of the generating facility.
(2) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the
distribution of taxes collected under RCW 54.28.025.

--- END ---