BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the need for
employees to freely exercise their rights to use their accrued sick
leave to care for their family members, as established by RCW 49.12.270
and 49.12.287, is paramount. In order to be able to fully enjoy those
rights, a more swift and immediate remedy must be available to
employees, than the remedies expressly contained in chapter 49.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that while the monetary penalties
authorized under RCW 49.12.285 may serve as an effective deterrent to
prevent some employers from interfering with the right of employees to
use their accrued sick leave to care for their family members, as
established by RCW 49.12.270 and 49.12.287, such authority is patently
insufficient in comparison to the devastating financial, emotional, and
sociological damage that such violations can and do have on the lives
of the employees whose rights are violated.
(2) Nothing in this chapter limits a person from initiating any
private right of action against an employer that violates RCW 49.12.270
or 49.12.287.
(3) Any person who is injured by a violation of RCW 49.12.270 or
49.12.287 may bring a civil action in either:
(a) The superior court to enjoin further violations, to recover the
actual damages sustained by him or her, or both, together with the
costs of the suit, including a reasonable attorney's fee, and the court
may, in its discretion, increase the award of damages to an amount not
to exceed three times the actual damages sustained; or
(b) The district court to recover the costs of the suit, including
reasonable attorneys' fees, and his or her actual damages, except for
damages that exceed the amount specified in RCW 3.66.020. The district
court may, in its discretion, increase the award of damages to an
amount not more than three times the actual damages sustained, but such
increased damage award shall not exceed the amount specified in RCW
3.66.020.
(4) The amount of actual damages resulting from each day that RCW
49.12.270 or 49.12.287 is violated will be no less than two hundred
fifty dollars or two times the employee's daily wage rate at the time
of the violation, whichever is greater.

--- END ---