BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is hereby declared to be the policy of
the state of Washington to assist in the creation and expansion of
innovative small commercial enterprises that produce marketable goods
and services through the employment of residents, the use of
technology, and the application of best management practices. This
policy is to be implemented through the use of small business
incubators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business incubator" means a physical location that offers:
(a) Space for start-up and expanding firms with viable products;
(b) The shared use of equipment and work areas;
(c) Daily management support services essential to high-quality
commercial operations; and
(d) Technical resources that enable entrepreneurs to transform
private activities into successful business.
(2) "Qualified small business incubator" means an incubator that
is:
(a) Designated as a nonprofit organization under section 501(c)(3)
of the internal revenue code;
(b) Focused on developing small businesses in an economically
distressed or disadvantaged area;
(c) Structured around a sound business plan; and
(d) Compliant with the standards developed by the department of
community, trade, and economic development in consultation with the
Washington association of small business incubators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The small business incubator program is
created and shall be administered by the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall award grants to qualified small business incubator organizations
with viable operational plans for the construction and equipment needs
of small business incubator facilities. In order to receive the grant
money, the qualified small business incubator organization must show
that it has the resources to complete the project in a timely manner
and the state grant is not the sole source of funds.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
will provide operating assistance, up to a maximum of 125,000 dollars
per year, to qualified small business incubators for support services
and the operation of incubator facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 All state agencies must include small
business incubators in strategies for economic growth. This inclusion
may consist of practicable communications, partnership agreements, and
other relationships that promote the use of small business incubators
to stimulate economic activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The small business incubator account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All money received for
the incubator program must be deposited in the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the small business incubator
program. Only the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act may be known as the Washington
small business incubator and entrepreneurship assistance act of 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---