BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.324 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(((1) As used in this section:
(a) "Blood" includes human whole blood, plasma, blood derivatives,
and related products.
(b) "Bone" includes human bone, bone marrow, and related products.
(c) "Tissue" includes human musculoskeletal tissue, musculoskeletal
tissue derivatives, and related products.
(d) "Blood, bone, or tissue bank" means an organization exempt from
federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code, organized solely for the purpose of performing research
on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging, distributing,
or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(e) "Medical supplies" means any item of tangible personal
property, including any repair and replacement parts for such tangible
personal property, used by a blood, tissue, or bone bank for the
purpose of performing research on, procuring, testing, processing,
storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue. The
term includes tangible personal property used to:
(i) Provide preparatory treatment of blood, bone, or tissue;
(ii) Control, guide, measure, tune, verify, align, regulate, test,
or physically support blood, bone, or tissue; and
(iii) Protect the health and safety of employees or others present
during research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging,
distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(f) "Chemical" means any catalyst, solvent, water, acid, oil, or
other additive that physically or chemically interacts with blood,
bone, or tissue.
(g) "Materials" means any item of tangible personal property,
including, but not limited to, bags, packs, collecting sets, filtering
materials, testing reagents, antisera, and refrigerants used or
consumed in performing research on, procuring, testing, processing,
storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(h) "Research" means basic and applied research that has as its
objective the design, development, refinement, testing, marketing, or
commercialization of a product, service, or process.
(2))) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a
qualifying blood bank, bone((,)) or tissue ((banks)) bank, or
comprehensive cancer center to the extent the amounts are exempt from
federal income tax.
(1) "Qualifying blood bank" means a blood bank that qualifies as an
exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3), is licensed pursuant to
21 C.F.R., part 607 as existing on the effective date of this section,
and whose primary business purpose is the collection, preparation,
processing, and compatibility testing of blood and the administering of
blood transfusion services.
For the purposes of this section, "blood" means whole human blood,
plasma, or serum or any product derived from human whole blood, plasma,
or serum.
(2) "Qualifying bone or tissue bank" means a bone or tissue bank
that qualifies as an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3), is
licensed pursuant to 21 C.F.R., part 1271 as existing on the effective
date of this section, and whose primary business purpose is the
recovery, processing, storage, labeling, packaging, or distribution of
any human cell or tissue, and the screening or testing of the cell or
tissue donor.
(3) "Qualifying comprehensive cancer center" means a cancer center
that has written confirmation that it is recognized by the national
cancer institute as a comprehensive cancer center and that qualifies as
an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3).

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.02805 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
medical supplies, chemicals, or materials to a qualifying blood bank,
bone((,)) or tissue bank, or comprehensive cancer center. ((The
definitions in RCW 82.04.324 apply to this section.)) The exemption in
this section does not apply to the sale of construction materials,
office equipment, building equipment, administrative supplies, or
vehicles.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Medical supplies" means any item of tangible personal
property, including any repair and replacement parts for such tangible
personal property, used by a qualifying blood bank, tissue or bone
bank, or comprehensive cancer center for the purpose of performing
research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging,
distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue. The term includes
tangible personal property used to:
(i) Provide preparatory treatment of blood, bone, or tissue;
(ii) Control, guide, measure, tune, verify, align, regulate, test,
or physically support blood, bone, or tissue; and
(iii) Protect the health and safety of employees or others present
during research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging,
distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(b) "Chemical" means any catalyst, solvent, water, acid, oil, or
other additive that physically or chemically interacts with blood,
bone, or tissue.
(c) "Materials" means any item of tangible personal property,
including, but not limited to, bags, packs, collecting sets, filtering
materials, testing reagents, antisera, and refrigerants used or
consumed in performing research on, procuring, testing, processing,
storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(d) "Research" means basic and applied research that has as its
objective the design, development, refinement, testing, marketing, or
commercialization of a product, service, or process.
(e) "Qualifying blood bank," "bone or tissue bank," and
"comprehensive cancer center" have the same meanings as provided in RCW
82.04.324.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.02747 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of medical supplies, chemicals, or materials by a qualifying blood
bank, bone((,)) or tissue bank, or comprehensive cancer center. ((The
definitions in RCW 82.04.324 apply to this section.)) The exemption in
this section does not apply to the use of construction materials,
office equipment, building equipment, administrative supplies, or
vehicles.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.02805 apply to this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.36.035 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The following property shall be exempt from taxation:
All property, whether real or personal, belonging to or leased by
any nonprofit corporation or association and used exclusively in the
business of a qualifying blood bank, bone((,)) or tissue bank ((as
defined in RCW 82.04.324)), or comprehensive cancer center, or in the
administration of ((such business)) these businesses. If the real or
personal property is leased, the benefit of the exemption shall inure
to the nonprofit corporation or association.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.324 apply to this section.

--- END ---