BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Autism is a complex developmental disability that typically
appears during the first three years of life;
(2) As many as one million five hundred thousand Americans are
believed to have some form of autism;
(3) The number of children with autism is increasing;
(4) Researchers are investigating a number of theories, including
the link between heredity, genetics, and medical problems, and the
relationship between vaccines and autism; and
(5) Research into the causes and prevention of autism is urgently
needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of health shall contract for
a study on the causes and prevention of autism. The department shall
submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2005, that includes recommendations to help decrease the
incidence of autism in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2005, from the general fund to the
department of health for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---