BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.370 and 1997 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The driver of a vehicle upon overtaking or meeting from either
direction any school bus which has stopped on the roadway for the
purpose of receiving or discharging any school children shall stop the
vehicle before reaching such school bus when there is in operation on
said school bus a visual signal as specified in RCW 46.37.190 and said
driver shall not proceed until such school bus resumes motion or the
visual signals are no longer activated.
(2) The driver of a vehicle upon a highway divided into separate
roadways as provided in RCW 46.61.150 need not stop upon meeting a
school bus which is proceeding in the opposite direction and is stopped
for the purpose of receiving or discharging school children.
(3) The driver of a vehicle upon a highway with three or more
marked traffic lanes need not stop upon meeting a school bus which is
proceeding in the opposite direction and is stopped for the purpose of
receiving or discharging school children.
(4) The driver of a school bus shall actuate the visual signals
required by RCW 46.37.190 only when such bus is stopped on the roadway
for the purpose of receiving or discharging school children.
(5) The driver of a school bus may stop completely off the roadway
for the purpose of receiving or discharging school children only when
the school children do not have to cross the roadway. The school bus
driver shall actuate the hazard warning lamps as defined in RCW
46.37.215 before loading or unloading school children at such stops.
(6) A person found to have committed an infraction of subsection
(1) of this section shall be assessed a monetary penalty ((equal to
twice the total penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110)) of one thousand
dollars. This penalty may not be waived, reduced, or suspended. Fifty
percent of the money so collected shall be deposited into the school
zone safety account in the custody of the state treasurer and disbursed
in accordance with RCW 46.61.440(((3))) (4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.59 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington traffic safety commission shall provide grants to
local law enforcement agencies for increased efforts in enforcement of
the requirement for drivers to stop for school buses when so indicated
under RCW 46.61.370.
The commission shall also produce and disseminate through all
possible media, informational and educational materials explaining the
extent of the problems caused by failure to stop for school buses, the
need for public involvement in their solution, and the penalties of
existing and new laws against failure to stop for school buses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 2 of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number,
is not provided by June 30, 2004, in the transportation appropriations
act, section 2 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---