BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) An interagency work group shall be
formed by the departments of health, agriculture, and ecology. The
purpose of the work group is to develop a comprehensive state policy on
proper methods of disposing of animal carcasses that protect other
animals and humans. The interagency work group shall seek the
involvement of local health departments, other state and federal
agencies that have an interest or expertise in issues to be reviewed,
university scientists, and affected constituency groups. In developing
the comprehensive state policy, the interagency work group shall
include a review of existing rules for their adequacy in protecting
public health and animal health from possible transmission of diseases
including but not limited to various forms of transmissible spongiform
encephalopathies. Furthermore, the possible vectors of disease
transmission shall be examined including air, land, water, birds, and
scavengers.
(2) The review shall include an evaluation of any existing or
proposed federal regulations and draft technical guides. References to
federal regulations and guidance documents may be included in the state
policy and the work group shall strive for a high degree of consistency
between jurisdictions. Additionally, the interagency work group shall
review RCW 16.68.020, WAC 246-203-120(3), and guidance from the United
States department of agriculture.
(3) The interagency work group shall include an education component
that will provide information and technical guidance to governmental
entities, animal owners, and the public on how to comply with the state
policy and associated rules.
(4) The interagency work group shall report to the legislature any
statutes that need to be amended to carry out this policy and to
recommend adjustment to any inconsistent policies.
(5) The interagency work group shall provide a written report to
the legislature by December 15th of each year that summarizes the
actions of the work group and its findings and recommendations.
(6) This section expires December 31, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If federal requirements are found to be
insufficient, the board of health, after consulting the interagency
work group's state policy as reported under section 1 of this act,
shall, as necessary, adopt rules that provide for the proper treatment
and disposal of any animal that is tested positive for transmissible
spongiform encephalopathy. The rules may differentiate between the
method of treatment and disposal of various types of transmissible
spongiform encephalopathies based on the scientific differences between
the diseases and the risk that each pose to other animals and to
humans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of ecology, after consulting
the interagency work group's state policy as reported under section 1
of this act, shall review and, as necessary, adopt additional minimum
standards that landfills must meet to accept animal carcasses. In
developing the standards, the department shall take into consideration
whether animals to be disposed of may carry various types of diseases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of agriculture, after
consulting the interagency work group's state policy as reported under
section 1 of this act and the state conservation commission, shall
review and, as necessary, adopt standards that provide for the proper
on-site disposal of carcasses of livestock as defined in RCW 16.50.110
by the owner which may be more restrictive than those provided in RCW
16.68.020. The department shall take into consideration whether
livestock to be disposed of may carry various types of diseases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A person who violates rules adopted under
this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 16 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---