BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, in order to
comply with the interstate commerce clause for apportionment purposes,
the department of revenue has construed the phrase "maintaining a place
of business" in existing law to mean engaging in activities that would
subject a taxpayer to tax under chapter 82.04 RCW if performed in this
state.
Furthermore, the legislature finds that one area in which
apportionment problems arise is with regard to service activities
provided by internet service providers engaging in business activities
inside and outside Washington. Internet service providers engaging in
business activities in Washington and in other states need an equitable
way to apportion to this state that portion of their gross income
earned from providing such services in Washington.
The legislature intends to affirm the department of revenue's
construction of existing law and to provide a method by which internet
service providers can equitably apportion their gross receipts among
the states in which they provide internet services.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.297 and 2000 c 103 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provision of internet services is subject to tax under RCW
82.04.290(2).
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
chapter.
(a) "Electronically supplied service" means a service that is
taxable under RCW 82.04.290(2) and that relies on the internet for its
operation, is automated, and involves only occasional and incidental
human intervention. "Electronically supplied service" includes, but is
not limited to:
(i) Services that provide a web site or web page, or support a
business or personal presence on the internet, or a proprietary
subscriber network;
(ii) Services that are automatically generated from a computer, via
the internet or a proprietary subscriber network, in response to
specific data input by the customer; or
(iii) Internet advertising services and enhanced internet
advertising services.
(b) "Electronically supplied service" does not include any services
taxable under RCW 82.04.290(2) if the only use of the internet is to
deliver the work product.
(c) "Enhanced internet advertising services" means business
arrangements that solely involve listing products or services on a web
site in conjunction with the performance of additional business
activities, including activities such as electronic order taking,
payment processing, auction listings, and other similar arrangements
that connect buyers and sellers through the internet.
(d) "Human intervention" does not include the creation or
acquisition of content that is stored electronically and made available
for access by customers via the internet nor does it include customer
or technical support services provided to assist customers in the use
of an electronically supplied service.
(e) "Internet" means the international computer network of both
federal and nonfederal interoperable packet switched data networks,
including the graphical subnetwork called the world wide web.
(((3))) (f) "Internet advertising services" means advertising,
marketing, and solicitations that are conducted solely on or through
the internet or on internet web sites and involves the provision of
advertising, marketing, and solicitations via the internet using sound,
video, banners, click-through, hyperlinks, metatags, text, and
graphical representations.
(g) "Internet service" means a service that includes computer
processing applications, provides the user with additional or
restructured information, or permits the user to interact with stored
information through the internet or a proprietary subscriber network.
"Internet service" includes provision of internet electronic mail,
access to the internet for information retrieval, and hosting of
information for retrieval over the internet or the graphical subnetwork
called the world wide web. The term also includes an electronically
supplied service.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.460 and 1985 c 7 s 154 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person
((rendering services)) engaging in business activities in this state
taxable under RCW 82.04.290, and ((maintaining places of business both
within and without this state which contribute to the rendition of such
services)) engaging in business activities outside this state that
contribute more than incidentally to such in-state activities, shall,
for the purpose of computing tax liability under RCW 82.04.290,
apportion to this state that portion of ((his)) gross income ((which
is)) derived from ((services rendered)) business activities performed
within this state. Where such apportionment cannot be accurately made
by separate accounting methods, the taxpayer shall apportion to this
state that proportion of ((his)) total income which the cost of doing
business within the state bears to the total cost of doing business
both within and without the state.
(2) ((Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (1) of this
section,)) Persons doing business both within and without the state who
receive gross income from service charges, as defined in RCW 63.14.010
(relating to amounts charged for granting the right or privilege to
make deferred or installment payments) or who receive gross income from
engaging in business as financial institutions within the scope of
chapter 82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial institutions)
shall apportion or allocate gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 to
this state pursuant to rules ((promulgated)) adopted by the department
consistent with uniform rules for apportionment or allocation developed
by the states.
(3) The department shall by rule provide a method or methods of
apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of telephone
services taxed under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales
subject to tax under this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of
the taxpayer's income attributable to this state. The rules shall be,
so far as feasible, consistent with the methods of apportionment
contained in this section and shall require the consideration of those
facts, circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the services.
(4) Any person subject to tax under this chapter engaging in the
activity of providing internet services in this state, and engaging in
business activities outside this state that contribute more than
incidentally to such in-state activity, shall apportion to this state
that portion of gross income derived from internet service activity
performed within this state as provided in section 4 of this act.
(5) Activities performed outside the state contribute more than
incidentally to in-state activities only to the extent that such
activities would subject the taxpayer to the tax under this chapter if
performed in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The apportionable income of an internet service provider shall
be apportioned to Washington by multiplying the income by a fraction,
the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor
plus eight times the sales factor, and the denominator of which is ten.
The denominator shall be reduced by the number of missing factors, if
any. If the sales factor is missing, the denominator shall be reduced
by eight. A factor is missing if both the numerator and denominator of
that factor are zero.
(2)(a) The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is
the average value of real and tangible personal property owned or
rented and used by the taxpayer in this state during the tax period and
the denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer's
real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used during the
tax period. For purposes of computing the property factor, "property"
includes a co-location arrangement pursuant to which the taxpayer is
granted the right to locate computer or telecommunication equipment in
an equipment room, cage, rack, or similar space.
(b) Property owned by the taxpayer is valued at its original cost.
Property rented by the taxpayer is valued at eight times the net annual
rental rate. The net annual rental rate is the annual rental paid by
the taxpayer less any annual rental received by the taxpayer from
subrentals. Property occupied under a co-location arrangement is
valued at eight times the annual consideration paid for the right to
occupy space in an equipment room, cage, rack, or similar space. If
property is rented by the taxpayer or occupied under a co-location
arrangement at no charge or at a nominal rate or a rate not otherwise
ascertainable, the net annual rental rate or other charge for that
property shall be determined on the basis of a reasonable market rental
rate for such property.
(c) For purposes of computing the property factor, "property"
includes prewritten computer software as defined by RCW 82.04.215.
(i) Prewritten computer software included in the property factor is
allocated to the location where it is used.
(ii) The value of the software includes mandatory maintenance
agreements and shall be its original cost, or in the case of rented or
leased software, the value shall be equal to eight times the annual
rental, license, or lease price.
(d) The average value of property shall be determined by averaging
the values at the beginning and end of the tax period. The department
may require the averaging of monthly values during the tax period if
reasonably required to reflect properly the average value of the
taxpayer's property.
(e) Property used in the production of nonapportionable income
shall be excluded from the numerator and denominator of the property
factor. Property used in the production of both apportionable and
nonapportionable income shall be partially excluded from the numerator
and denominator of the property factor to exclude, to the extent
possible, the portion of property producing the nonapportionable
income.
(3)(a) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is
the total amount of compensation paid in this state to employees of the
taxpayer during the tax year by the taxpayer and the denominator of
which is the total compensation paid to employees of the taxpayer
everywhere during the tax year by the taxpayer. Compensation related
to the production of both apportionable and nonapportionable income
shall be partially excluded from the numerator and denominator of the
payroll factor to exclude, to the extent possible, the portion of
compensation related to the production of nonapportionable income.
(b) Compensation is paid in this state if:
(i) The individual's service is performed entirely within this
state;
(ii) The individual's service is performed within and without this
state, but the service performed without this state is incidental to
the individual's service within this state;
(iii) A portion of the service is performed within this state and
the base of operations of the individual is in this state;
(iv) A portion of the service is performed within this state and,
if there is no base of operations, the place from which the
individual's service is directed or controlled is in this state;
(v) A portion of the service is performed within this state and
neither the base of operations of the individual nor the place from
which the service is directed or controlled is in any state in which
some part of the service is performed, but the individual's residence
is in this state; or
(vi) The individual is neither a resident of nor performs services
in this state but is directed or controlled from an office in this
state and returns to this state periodically for business purposes and
the state in which the individual resides does not have authority under
the United States Constitution to impose on the employer a gross
receipts tax. For this purpose a gross receipts tax is any tax imposed
on or measured by the gross volume of business, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not make the tax a
net income or value added tax, and the tax is not, pursuant to law or
custom, separately stated on customer invoices.
(c) "Compensation" means wages, salaries, commissions, and any
other form of remuneration paid to or accrued to employees for personal
services. Employer contributions under a qualified cash plan, deferred
arrangement plan, and nonqualified deferred compensation plan are
included in the payroll factor. Stock based compensation is included
in the payroll factor to the extent included in gross income for
federal income tax purposes.
(4)(a) The sales factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is
the total receipts of the taxpayer from providing internet services in
this state during the tax period, and the denominator of which is the
total receipts of the taxpayer from providing internet services
everywhere during the tax period.
(b) For purposes of computing the sales factor, internet services
are considered provided in this state if:
(i) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the receipt of
the service by the purchaser occurs in this state as determined by
instructions provided by the purchaser to the taxpayer regarding
delivery of any tangible personal property to which the service
relates;
(ii) The address for the purchaser is located in this state as
indicated by the business records of the taxpayer maintained in the
regular course of business, and (b)(i) of this subsection does not
apply;
(iii) The address for the purchaser obtained during consummation of
the sale, including any address of a purchaser's payment instrument
when readily available to the taxpayer and no other address is
available, is located in this state, and (b)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection do not apply; or
(iv) The commercial domicile of the taxpayer is in this state, and
(b)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection do not apply.
(c)(i) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section to the
contrary, the sale of internet advertising services is considered
provided in this state in the ratio that internet usage in this state
bears to the total internet usage in the United States.
(ii) Internet advertising is not considered provided in this state
if the web site displaying the advertising predominantly uses a
language spoken by less than fifteen percent of Washington residents
and does not have a United States universal resource locator ending in
.biz, .net, .org, .com, or other similar United States universal
resource locator.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section to the
contrary, the sale of enhanced internet advertising that constitutes an
internet service is considered provided in this state in the ratio that
the number of service purchasers in this state bears to the total
service purchasers purchasing the taxpayer's enhanced internet
advertising services in the United States.
(5)(a) If the apportionment provisions of this section do not
fairly represent the extent of its business activity in this state, the
taxpayer may use, or the department may prospectively require, in
respect to all or any part of the taxpayer's business activity of
providing internet services:
(i) Separate accounting;
(ii) A calculation of tax liability using the cost of doing
business method outlined in RCW 82.04.460(1);
(iii) The exclusion of any one or more of the apportionment
factors;
(iv) The inclusion of one or more additional apportionment factors
that will fairly represent the taxpayer's business activity in this
state; or
(v) The employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable
apportionment of the gross income of the taxpayer derived from business
activity in this state.
(b) The party seeking to apply this subsection (5) has the burden
to prove by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that:
(i) The apportionment provisions of this section do not fairly
represent the extent of taxpayer's business activity in this state; and
(ii) The proposed alternative does fairly represent the extent of
taxpayer's business activity in this state.
(c) If a taxpayer uses an alternative apportionment method
permitted under this subsection (5) in preparing its return, a
statement describing such alternative method must be filed with such
return to which the alternative method relates. In the event a
taxpayer fails to file such a statement disclosing the use of an
alternative apportionment method, the department may disregard the use
of such method and apply the general apportionment provisions of this
section. A taxpayer may not use more than one method of apportionment
for each calendar year, or part thereof, during which the taxpayer is
subject to the taxes imposed under this chapter. A taxpayer seeking to
use an alternative apportionment method must apply the same method to
all tax periods in which an assessment for taxes may be made under RCW
82.32.050(3) and that involves the same material facts.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Apportionable income" means income derived from providing
internet services and subject to apportionment under RCW 82.04.460(4)
after exclusions, deductions, and exemptions, but before apportionment.
(b) "Internet service provider" means a person who provides
internet services and who is entitled to apportion under RCW
82.04.460(4).
(7) The department shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to
administer the provisions of this section, including rules for the
measurement of internet usage which shall, to the extent reliably
available, be based on published statistics of internet usage. In the
absence of published statistics of internet usage the department may
use any reasonable method of measurement, including population or other
demographic data published by the United States census bureau.

--- END ---