BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.090 and 2003 c 111 s 1009 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The
larger return envelope must contain a declaration by the absentee voter
reciting his or her qualifications and stating that he or she has not
voted in any other jurisdiction at this election, together with a
summary of the penalties for any violation of any of the provisions of
this chapter. The return envelope must provide space for the voter to
indicate the date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to
sign the oath. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this
chapter must be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to
the space for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the
return envelope must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the signed
declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a
voter registration for the election or primary for which the ballot has
been issued. The voter must be instructed to either return the ballot
to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first
class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate
county auditor ((no later than the day of the election or primary for
which the ballot was issued)) in accordance with the time requirements
of RCW 29A.40.110.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2003 c 111 s 1011 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return identification
envelopes for any primary or election may begin on or after the tenth
day before the primary or election. The tabulation of absentee ballots
must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or
election.
(2) After opening the return identification envelopes, the county
canvassing board or its representative shall place all of the ballots
in secure storage until after 8:00 p.m. of the day of the primary or
election. Absentee ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic
vote tallying system may be taken from the inner security envelopes and
all the normal procedural steps may be performed to prepare these
ballots for tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the return identification envelope that
contains the security envelope and absentee ballot. ((They)) An
absentee ballot may be counted only if the return identification
envelope was signed by the date of the primary or election for which it
was issued and is in the office of the county auditor before the close
of the polls on the day of the primary or election for which it was
issued. However, an absentee ballot from an out-of-state, overseas, or
service voter may be counted if it was mailed no later than the day of
the primary or election for which it was issued. The canvassing board
or its representative shall verify that the voter's signature on the
return envelope is the same as the signature of that voter in the
registration files of the county. For registered voters casting
absentee ballots, the date on the return identification envelope to
which the voter has attested determines the validity, as to the ((time
of voting)) date of mailing for that absentee ballot if the postmark is
missing or is illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and
service voters, the date on the return identification envelope to which
the voter has attested determines the validity as to the ((time of
voting)) date of mailing for that absentee ballot. For any absentee
ballot, a variation between the signature of the voter on the return
envelope and the signature of that voter in the registration files due
to the substitution of initials or the use of common nicknames is
permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.48.050 and 2003 c 111 s 1205 are each amended to
read as follows:
The voter shall return the ballot to the county auditor in the
return identification envelope. ((If)) Whether mailed or returned
otherwise, a ballot must be ((postmarked not later than the date of the
primary or election. Otherwise, the ballot must be deposited at the
office of the county auditor or the designated place of deposit not
later than 8:00 p.m. on the date of the primary or election)) returned
in accordance with the time requirements as provided for an absentee
ballot under RCW 29A.40.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---