BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.710 and 1993 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the date a
regular legislative session convenes and continuing ((thirty days
past)) through the date of final adjournment, and during the period
beginning on the date a special legislative session convenes and
continuing through the date that session adjourns, no state official or
a person employed by or acting on behalf of a state official or state
legislator may solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund,
to a candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt.

--- END ---