BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.136 and 2003 c 227 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from the child's home, the
agency charged with his or her care shall provide the court with:
(a) A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the
following outcomes as a primary goal and may identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the
child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption; guardianship;
permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the
child is age eighteen, with a written agreement between the parties and
the care provider; successful completion of a responsible living skills
program; or independent living, if appropriate and if the child is age
sixteen or older. The department shall not discharge a child to an
independent living situation before the child is eighteen years of age
unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW;
(b) Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(4),
that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the
child will be placed, what steps will be taken to return the child
home, what steps the agency will take to promote existing appropriate
sibling relationships and/or facilitate placement together or contact
in accordance with the best interests of each child, and what actions
the agency will take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the
plan shall include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.
(i) The agency plan shall specify what services the parents will be
offered to enable them to resume custody, what requirements the parents
must meet to resume custody, and a time limit for each service plan and
parental requirement.
(ii) Visitation is the right of the family, including the child and
the parent. Early, consistent, and frequent visitation is crucial for
maintaining parent-child relationships and making it possible for
parents and children to safely reunify. The agency shall encourage the
maximum parent and child and sibling contact possible, including
regular visitation and participation by the parents in the care of the
child while the child is in placement. Visitation shall not be limited
as a sanction for a parent's failure to comply with court orders or
services where the health, safety, or welfare of the child is not at
risk as a result of the visitation. Visitation may be limited or
denied only if the court determines that such limitation or denial is
necessary to protect the child's health, safety, or welfare. The court
and the agency should rely upon community resources, relatives, foster
parents, and other appropriate persons to provide transportation and
supervision for visitation to the extent that such resources are
available and the child's safety would not be compromised. Supervision
of visitation shall not be required except when necessary to protect
the child's health, safety, or welfare.
(iii) A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as
possible, preferably in the child's own neighborhood, unless the court
finds that placement at a greater distance is necessary to promote the
child's or parents' well-being.
(iv) The agency charged with supervising a child in placement shall
provide all reasonable services that are available within the agency,
or within the community, or those services which the department has
existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to the court if it is
unable to provide such services; and
(c) If the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(4), that a
termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child
will be placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency for the
child, services to be offered or provided to the child, and, if
visitation would be in the best interests of the child, a
recommendation to the court regarding visitation between parent and
child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination petition. The
agency shall not be required to develop a plan of services for the
parents or provide services to the parents if the court orders a
termination petition be filed. However, reasonable efforts to ensure
visitation and contact between siblings shall be made unless there is
reasonable cause to believe the best interests of the child or siblings
would be jeopardized.
(2) If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable
efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from his
or her home or to safely return the child home should not be part of
the permanency plan of care for the child, reasonable efforts shall be
made to place the child in a timely manner and to complete whatever
steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.
(3) The court shall consider the child's relationships with the
child's siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(3).

--- END ---