BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.410 and 2002 c 353 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature shall establish for each school year in the
appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for
allocation purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for basic
education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW
28A.150.260.
(2) Salary allocations for state-funded basic education
certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the
superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's
average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the
statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions,
and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.
(3) Beginning January 1, 1992, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree
may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state
salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus
appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(4) Beginning in the 2004-2005 school year, the determination of
years of service for occupational therapists, physical therapists,
speech-language pathologists, audiologists, school nurses, social
workers, counselors, and psychologists regulated under Title 18 RCW may
include experience in schools and other nonschool positions as
occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language
pathologists, audiologists, registered nurses, social workers,
counselors, or psychologists. The calculation of years of service for
experience in nonschool positions shall be as follows: Until the 2005-2006 school year, every two years of service in nonschool positions
shall be counted as one year of service for purposes of this chapter.
Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year and thereafter, every one year
of service in nonschool positions shall be counted as one year of
service for purposes of this chapter.

--- END ---