BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that individuals
performing conveyance work on private residence conveyances must be
licensed by the department of labor and industries. However, the
licensing requirements for this type of work need not be to the same
level as those established for conveyance work in circumstances where
the general public has access to the conveyances. The legislature
further finds that the department of labor and industries should be
given the authority to develop the licensing requirements for this type
of work using the normal rule-making process established under chapter
34.05 RCW. Lastly, the legislature finds that private residence
conveyance maintenance work that is performed by an owner or at the
direction of the owner is exempt from licensing if the owner resides in
the residence at which the conveyance is located and the conveyance is
not accessible to the general public.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.87.240 and 2003 c 143 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, firm, public agency, or company wishing to engage
in the business of performing conveyance work within the state must
apply for an elevator contractor license with the department on a form
provided by the department and be a registered general or specialty
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(2) Except as provided by RCW 70.87.270, any person wishing to
perform conveyance work within the state must apply for an elevator
mechanic license with the department on a form provided by the
department.
(3) An elevator contractor license may not be granted to any person
or firm who does not possess the following qualifications:
(a) Five years' experience performing conveyance work, as verified
by current and previous elevator contractors licensed to do business;
or
(b) Satisfactory completion of a written examination administered
by the department on this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, section
3 of this act, and RCW 70.87.245, an elevator mechanic license may not
be granted to any person who does not possess the following
qualifications:
(a) An acceptable combination of documented experience and
education credits: Not less than three years' experience performing
conveyance work, as verified by current and previous employers licensed
to do business in this state or public agency employers; and
(b) Satisfactory completion of a written examination administered
by the department on this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter.
(5) Any person who furnishes the department with acceptable proof
that he or she has performed conveyance work in the category for which
a license is sought shall upon making application for a license and
paying the license fee receive a license without an examination. The
person must have:
(a) Worked without direct and immediate supervision for a general
or specialty contractor registered under chapter 18.27 RCW and engaged
in the business of performing conveyance work in this state. This
employment may not be less than each and all of the three years
immediately before March 1, 2004. The person must apply within ninety
days after the effective date of rules adopted under this chapter
establishing licensing requirements;
(b) Worked without direct and immediate supervision for an owner
exempt from licensing requirements under RCW 70.87.270 or a public
agency as an individual responsible for maintenance of conveyances
owned by the owner exempt from licensing requirements under RCW
70.87.270 or the public agency. This employment may not be less than
each and all of the three years immediately before March 1, 2004. The
person must apply within ninety days after the effective date of rules
adopted under this chapter establishing licensing requirements;
(c) Obtained a certificate of completion and successfully passed
the mechanic examination of a nationally recognized training program
for the elevator industry such as the national elevator industry
educational program or its equivalent; or
(d) Obtained a certificate of completion of an apprenticeship
program for an elevator mechanic, having standards substantially equal
to those of this chapter, and registered with the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council.
(6) A license must be issued to an individual holding a valid
license from a state having entered into a reciprocal agreement with
the department and having standards substantially equal to those of
this chapter, upon application and without examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.87 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, by rule, establish licensing requirements
for conveyance work performed on private residence conveyances. These
rules shall include an exemption from licensing for maintenance work on
private residence conveyances performed by an owner or at the direction
of the owner, provided the owner resides in the residence at which the
conveyance is located and the conveyance is not accessible to the
general public. However, maintenance work performed on private
residence conveyances located in or at adult family homes licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW, boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW, or similarly licensed caregiving facilities must comply with the
licensing requirements of this chapter.
(2) The rules adopted under this section take effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---