BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that: The robust development and
availability of new drugs, treatments, and therapies requires greater
efforts to assure that medical assistance clients will not be harmed or
injured by inappropriate service utilization; the growing limitations
on available resources require funds be spent in a cost-efficient and
effective manner to improve the health of clients; the department's
current definition of medical necessity for determining services under
this chapter is outdated and inadequate; and certain orders in
Washington state superior court cases unduly restrict the department
from adopting necessary rule modifications, which results in
inefficiencies and possible harm to clients.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the department adopt
a new definition and decision-making process for the term "medical
necessity" for use in programs authorized under this chapter that, to
the extent possible, improves health status and avoids harm to clients.
(3) By September 1, 2004, the department shall establish, by rule,
a medical necessity definition and decision-making process for all
programs authorized under this chapter, conditioned as follows:
(a) The department is the authority for all medical necessity
service determinations;
(b) The definition must be established on evidence-based standards
establishing criteria for new and existing health services;
(c) The definition must set forth complementary definitions to
include, but not be limited to, "cost-effective," "effective,"
"efficacy," "evidence," "expert opinion," "medical condition,"
"purpose," "scientific evidence," and "scope";
(d) In developing the medical necessity definition and decision-making process, the department should consider, to the extent
practicable, model definitions developed by prominent academic health
centers and under consideration nationally by publicly funded health
programs or private health purchasing organizations; and
(e) The department must endeavor to complement uniform policy
directives set forth in RCW 41.05.013.
(4) To the extent the new definition and decision-making process
for medical necessity adopted by the department differs from the
definitions, conditions, and processes provided in court orders, the
department's new definition and procedures shall control.
(5) The secretary shall report by letter to the health policy
committees of the legislature on the implementation of this section by
October 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---