BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Snohomish county or in the alternative, the
Snohomish county economic development council, may conduct an initial
feasible air study of commercial passenger air service at Paine Field.
The elements studied must include, but are not limited to:
(1) Determining the service market area;
(2) Commercial passenger air service market and feasibility;
(3) The level of service that could be provided at Paine Field;
(4) Determining the customer base from the public, business, and
government;
(5) A comparison of market size to other small state airports such
as Bellingham, Olympia, Tri-Cities, Wenatchee, and Yakima;
(6) The potential cost savings to the public, business, and
government; and
(7) The potential economic impact to Snohomish county.
The county shall send its report to the legislature by December 1,
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated as a capital
budget item for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004, from the general
fund to the department of community, trade, and economic development
solely for distribution first to Snohomish county or, in the
alternative, to the Snohomish county economic development council, to
carry out the purposes of this act. This appropriation is intended to
supplement other funds that may be available.

--- END ---