BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.14.150 and 1997 c 35 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "hospital" means a hospital
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(((2))) or a psychiatric hospital regulated
under chapter 71.12 RCW, but does not include beds utilized by a
comprehensive cancer center for cancer research.
(2)(a) Any two or more employers which are school districts or
educational service districts, ((or)) (b) any two or more employers
which are public hospital districts or hospitals, and are owned or
operated by a state agency or municipal corporation of this state,
((or)) (c) any two or more employers which are hospitals, no one of
which is owned or operated by a state agency or municipal corporation
of this state, (d) any two or more public transportation benefit areas
created under chapter 36.57A RCW, or (e) any one or more public
transportation benefit areas created under chapter 36.57A RCW and a
county public transportation authority created under chapter 36.57 RCW,
may enter into agreements to form self-insurance groups for the
purposes of this chapter.
(3) No more than one group may be formed under subsection (2)(b) of
this section and no more than one group may be formed under subsection
(2)(c) of this section.
(4) The self-insurance groups shall be organized and operated under
rules promulgated by the director under RCW 51.14.160. Such a self-insurance group shall be deemed an employer for the purposes of this
chapter, and may qualify as a self-insurer if it meets all the other
requirements of this chapter.

--- END ---