BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.17.050 and 1998 c 224 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the adoption of rules and regulations under the authority of
this chapter, the director shall:
(1) Provide for the preparation, adoption, amendment, or repeal of
rules and regulations of safety and health standards governing the
conditions of employment of general and special application in all work
places;
(2) Provide for the adoption of occupational health and safety
standards which are at least as effective as those adopted or
recognized by the United States secretary of labor under the authority
of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-596;
84 Stat. 1590);
(3) Provide a method of encouraging employers and employees in
their efforts to reduce the number of safety and health hazards at
their work places and to stimulate employers and employees to institute
new and to perfect existing programs for providing safe and healthful
working conditions;
(4) Provide for the promulgation of health and safety standards and
the control of conditions in all work places concerning gases, vapors,
dust, tobacco smoke or other airborne particles, toxic materials, or
harmful physical agents which shall set a standard which most
adequately assures, to the extent feasible, on the basis of the best
available evidence, that no employee will suffer material impairment of
health or functional capacity even if such employee has regular
exposure to the hazard dealt with by such standard for the period of
his working life; any such standards shall require where appropriate
the use of protective devices or equipment and for monitoring or
measuring any such gases, vapors, dust, or other airborne particles,
toxic materials, or harmful physical agents;
(5) Provide for appropriate reporting procedures by employers with
respect to such information relating to conditions of employment which
will assist in achieving the objectives of this chapter;
(6) Provide for the frequency, method, and manner of the making of
inspections of work places without advance notice; and,
(7) Provide for the publication and dissemination to employers,
employees, and labor organizations and the posting where appropriate by
employers of informational, education, or training materials calculated
to aid and assist in achieving the objectives of this chapter;
(8) Provide for the establishment of new and the perfection and
expansion of existing programs for occupational safety and health
education for employers and employees, and, in addition institute
methods and procedures for the establishment of a program for voluntary
compliance solely through the use of advice and consultation with
employers and employees with recommendations including recommendations
of methods to abate violations relating to the requirements of this
chapter and all applicable safety and health standards and rules and
regulations promulgated pursuant to the authority of this chapter;
(9) Provide for the adoption of safety and health standards
requiring the use of safeguards in trenches and excavations and around
openings of hoistways, hatchways, elevators, stairways, and similar
openings;
(10) Provide for the promulgation of health and safety standards
requiring the use of safeguards for all vats, pans, trimmers, cut off,
gang edger, and other saws, planers, presses, formers, cogs, gearing,
belting, shafting, coupling, set screws, live rollers, conveyors,
mangles in laundries, and machinery of similar description, which can
be effectively guarded with due regard to the ordinary use of such
machinery and appliances and the danger to employees therefrom, and
with which the employees of any such work place may come in contact
while in the performance of their duties and prescribe methods,
practices, or processes to be followed by employers which will enhance
the health and safety of employees in the performance of their duties
when in proximity to machinery or appliances mentioned in this
subsection;
(11) Certify that no later than twenty business days prior to the
effective date of any significant legislative rule, as defined by RCW
34.05.328, a meeting of impacted parties is convened to: (a) Identify
ambiguities and problem areas in the rule; (b) coordinate education and
public relations efforts by all parties; (c) provide comments regarding
internal department training and enforcement plans; and (d) provide
comments regarding appropriate evaluation mechanisms to determine the
effectiveness of the new rule. The meeting shall include a balanced
representation of both business and labor from impacted industries,
department personnel responsible for the above subject areas, and other
agencies or key stakeholder groups as determined by the department. An
existing advisory committee may be utilized if appropriate.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.17.060 and 1973 c 80 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each employer:
(1) Shall furnish to each of his or her employees a place of
employment free from recognized hazards, including tobacco smoke, that
are causing or likely to cause serious injury or death to his or her
employees: PROVIDED, That no citation or order assessing a penalty
shall be issued to any employer solely under the authority of this
subsection except where no applicable rule or regulation has been
adopted by the department covering the unsafe or unhealthful condition
of employment at the workplace; and
(2) Shall comply with the rules, regulations, and orders
promulgated under this chapter.

--- END ---