BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.88.105 and 1990 c 122 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In cases where all or a portion of the estate consisting of
cash or securities has been placed in possession of savings and loan
associations or banks, trust companies, escrow corporations, or other
corporations approved by the court and if a verified receipt signed by
the custodian of the funds is filed by the guardian or limited guardian
in court stating that such corporations hold the cash or securities
subject to order of court, the court may in its discretion dispense
with the bond or reduce the amount of the bond by the amount of such
deposits.
(2) Funds held in any fiduciary account including, but not limited
to, an account created under chapter 11.114 RCW or its equivalent, or
a special needs or other trust approved by the court as provided in RCW
11.92.140, that is created by or under the control of a guardian, shall
be bonded as provided in RCW 11.88.100, unless the funds are held
subject to order of the court.

--- END ---