BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.89.050 and 1997 c 334 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the
secretary may:
(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to
implement this chapter;
(b) Set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance
with RCW 43.70.250;
(c) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(d) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the education,
training, and examination requirements for licensure;
(e) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement this chapter and hire individuals licensed under
this chapter to serve as examiners for any practical examinations;
(f) Approve those schools from which graduation will be accepted as
proof of an applicant's eligibility to take the licensure examination,
specifically requiring that applicants must have completed ((programs))
an accredited respiratory program with two-year curriculum;
(g) Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature of, and
supervise the grading and administration of, examinations for
applicants for licensure;
(h) Determine whether alternative methods of training are
equivalent to formal education and establish forms, procedures, and
criteria for evaluation of an applicant's alternative training to
determine the applicant's eligibility to take the examination;
(i) Determine which states have legal credentialing requirements
equivalent to those of this state and issue licenses to individuals
legally credentialed in those states without examination;
(j) Define and approve any experience requirement for licensure;
and
(k) Appoint members of the profession to serve in an ad hoc
advisory capacity to the secretary in carrying out this chapter. The
members will serve for designated times and provide advice on matters
specifically identified and requested by the secretary. The members
shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed
for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.040 and 43.03.060.
(2) The provisions of chapter 18.130 RCW shall govern the issuance
and denial of licenses, unlicensed practice, and the disciplining of
persons licensed under this chapter. The secretary shall be the
disciplining authority under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.89.110 and 1997 c 334 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The date and location of the examination shall be established
by the secretary. Applicants who have been found by the secretary to
meet the other requirements for licensure shall be scheduled for the
next examination following the filing of the application. However, the
applicant shall not be scheduled for any examination taking place
sooner than sixty days after the application is filed.
(2) The secretary shall examine each applicant, by means determined
most effective, on subjects appropriate to the scope of practice. Such
examinations shall be limited to the purpose of determining whether the
applicant possesses the minimum skill and knowledge necessary to
practice competently, and shall meet generally accepted standards of
fairness and validity for licensure examinations.
(3) All examinations shall be conducted by the secretary, and all
grading of the examinations shall be under fair and wholly impartial
methods.
(4) Any applicant who fails to make the required grade in the first
examination is entitled to take up to three subsequent examinations,
upon compliance with administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250
and 43.70.280 and such remedial education as is deemed necessary.
(5) Applicants who meet the educational criteria as established by
the national board for respiratory care to sit for the national board
for respiratory care's advanced practitioner exams, or who have been
issued the registered respiratory therapist credential by the national
board for respiratory care, shall be considered to have met the
educational criteria of this chapter. Applicants must have
verification submitted directly from the national board for respiratory
care to the department.
(6) The secretary may approve an examination prepared and
administered by a private testing agency or association of
credentialing boards for use by an applicant in meeting the licensure
requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---