BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is established within the office of financial management
an oversight committee to review the utilization of the alternative
public works contracting procedures authorized under this chapter,
specifically to further good contracting practices on general
contractor/construction manager (GC/CM) projects for the benefit of the
taxpayers. The membership of the committee shall include
representatives from the appropriate segments of the contracting,
subcontracting, and design industries, as well as appropriate labor
organizations, and public bodies authorized to use the alternative
public works contracting procedures under this chapter. The director
shall maintain a balance between representatives from public agencies
and the private sector when appointing members to the committee, and
shall consider the recommendations of established organizations
representing the contracting, subcontracting, design industries, and
organized labor in making the appointments.
(2) The committee shall meet quarterly beginning after July 1,
2004. The director or his or her designee shall chair the committee
and the office of financial management shall provide staff support for
the committee.
(3) Public bodies utilizing the alternative contracting procedures
authorized under this chapter shall provide any requested information
concerning implementation of projects under this chapter to the
committee in a timely manner, excepting any trade secrets or
proprietary information.
(4) The committee shall report to the governor by December 10,
2004, and every year thereafter, concerning its findings and
recommendations.

--- END ---