BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the legislature's intent to
provide funding for the development and implementation of an automated
system for the electronic processing of the real estate excise tax.
The legislature finds that due to the numerous users of the real estate
excise tax information, and the many entities involved in its workflow,
that county systems must be compatible with the automated system
developed by the state department of revenue.
(2) The legislature finds that under current law an electronic real
estate excise tax affidavit that is signed with a digital signature
under chapter 19.34 RCW is a legally valid document and pursuant to RCW
5.46.010 electronic facsimiles, scanned signatures, and digital and
other electronic conversions of written signatures satisfy the
signature component of the affidavit requirement under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.45.180 and 1998 c 106 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For taxes collected by the county under this chapter, the
county treasurer shall collect a ((two-dollar)) five-dollar fee on all
transactions required by this chapter where the transaction does not
require the payment of tax. A total of ((two)) five dollars shall be
collected in the form of a tax and fee, where the calculated tax
payment is less than ((two)) five dollars. The county treasurer shall
place one percent of the proceeds of the tax imposed by this chapter
and the treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund to defray
costs of collection and shall pay over to the state treasurer and
account to the department of revenue for the remainder of the proceeds
at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the state under
RCW 84.56.280. The state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds in the
general fund for the support of the common schools.
(2) For taxes collected by the department of revenue under this
chapter, the department shall remit the tax to the state treasurer who
shall deposit the proceeds of any state tax in the general fund for the
support of the common schools. The state treasurer shall deposit the
proceeds of any local taxes imposed under chapter 82.46 RCW in the
local real estate excise tax account hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the local real estate excise tax account may be
spent only for distribution to counties, cities, and towns imposing a
tax under chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all
earnings of investments of balances in the local real estate excise tax
account shall be credited to the local real estate excise tax account
and distributed to the counties, cities, and towns monthly. Monthly
the state treasurer shall make distribution from the local real estate
excise tax account to the counties, cities, and towns the amount of tax
collected on behalf of each taxing authority. The state treasurer
shall make the distribution under this subsection without
appropriation.
(3)(a) The real estate excise tax technology account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not required
for expenditure and the account is not subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Until June 20, 2012, the county treasurer shall collect an
additional fee on all transactions required by this chapter. From July
1, 2004, until July 1, 2007, the fee shall be five dollars on all
transactions required by this chapter. From July 1, 2007, through June
30, 2012, the fee shall be two dollars. The county treasurer shall
remit this fee to the state treasurer at the same time the county
treasurer remits funds to the state under RCW 84.56.280. The state
treasurer shall place funds from this fee in the real estate excise tax
technology fund. By the twentieth day of the subsequent month, the
state treasurer shall distribute to each county treasurer according to
the following formula: One-half of the funds available shall be
equally distributed among the thirty-nine counties; and the balance
will be distributed among the counties in direct proportion to their
population as it relates to the total state's population based on most
recent statistics.
(c) When received by the county treasurer the funds shall be placed
in a special real estate excise tax technology fund held by the county
treasurer to be used exclusively for the development, implementation,
and maintenance of an electronic processing and reporting system for
real estate excise tax affidavits. Funds may be expended to make the
system compatible with the automated real estate excise tax system
developed by the department of revenue and compatible with the
processes used in the offices of the county assessor and county
auditor.
(d) The Washington state association of county treasurers shall
deliver a progress report to the legislature by January 1, 2008, and
January 1, 2012. This subsection (3) expires July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---