BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that legal proceedings
relating to water rights and instream flows impose a growing demand on
the superior courts of the state. The legislature further finds that
the technical complexity and specialized legal issues raised by many
water right disputes would be better managed by a water court with
specialized expertise. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature
to establish a water court within the state court system that will have
exclusive original jurisdiction for challenges relating to the adoption
of instream flows and that will have appellate jurisdiction for water
rights management and enforcement disputes. Further, it is the intent
of the legislature to provide the water court with exclusive original
jurisdiction for future general water rights adjudications, if any. It
is not the intent of the legislature, by vesting the water court with
exclusive original jurisdiction for future general water rights
adjudications, to direct the state to file, or not, any such
adjudications.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.08.010 and 1955 c 38 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Except as provided in this act, the superior court shall have
original jurisdiction in all cases in equity, and in all cases at law
which involve the title or possession of real property, or the legality
of any tax, impost, assessment, toll or municipal fine, and in all
other cases in which the demand or the value of the property in
controversy amounts to three hundred dollars, and in all criminal cases
amounting to felony, and in all cases of misdemeanor not otherwise
provided for by law; of actions of forcible entry and detainer; of
proceedings in insolvency; of actions to prevent or abate a nuisance;
of all matters of probate, of divorce and for annulment of marriage,
and for such special cases and proceedings as are not otherwise
provided for; and shall also have original jurisdiction in all cases
and of all proceedings in which jurisdiction shall not have been by law
vested exclusively in some other court, and shall have the power of
naturalization and to issue papers therefor. Said courts and their
judges shall have power to issue writs of mandamus, quo warranto,
review, certiorari, prohibition and writs of habeas corpus on petition
by or on behalf of any person in actual custody in their respective
counties. Injunctions and writs of prohibition and of habeas corpus
may be issued on legal holidays and nonjudicial days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The water court is a court of record, and
shall be always open, except on nonjudicial days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The water court shall have exclusive
original jurisdiction in all appeals of rules adopted by the department
of ecology relating to instream flows and in any future general
adjudications of water rights filed after the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The water court shall have appellate
jurisdiction in cases affecting water rights arising from review by the
pollution control hearings board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) There shall be three divisions of the
water court, one in each of the three court of appeals divisions within
the state. The water court shall be located in the city having the
largest population within each of the three divisions unless approved
otherwise by the chief justice of the supreme court. Each division
shall have a minimum of one judge. Additional judges may be added,
including an at-large judge under section 8 of this act. The water
court may hold hearings in any suitable location taking into account
the convenience of the hearing's participants and the public.
(2) A central court administrator for the water court shall be
appointed by the administrator for the courts and shall operate within
the office of the administrator for the courts.
(3) The water court may employ pro tem judges, court commissioners,
referees, and other court staff in the same manner as the superior
courts as provided in this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) One water court judge shall initially be
appointed by the governor for each water court division. The governor
shall determine which water court judge positions shall initially be
appointed for two years, four years, and six years. Except as provided
for the initial appointments made by the governor during the initial
establishment of the water court, water court judges shall be appointed
to terms of six years and shall serve until a successor is elected and
qualified or appointed. The supreme court shall nominate a minimum of
three qualified persons for each water court judgeship for the
governor's consideration and the governor shall make the appointment
from the slate of those persons so nominated. Persons who have
practiced law for a minimum of five years and have resided within the
water court division for a minimum of one year are eligible to be
appointed. The governor shall, in making appointments and filling
vacancies created in the water courts, take into consideration such
factors as: Personal character; intellect; ability; diversity of
background of experience in the practice of the law; diversity of
political philosophy; diversity of educational experience; and
diversity of affiliation with social and economic groups, for the
purpose of maintaining a balanced water court with the highest quality
of personnel. It is desirable, though not required, that appointees
have experience in and knowledge of state water law and have experience
working in a judicial or quasi-judicial body.
(2) A competitive election shall be held for each appointed judge
position in the general election immediately preceding the expiration
of the initial appointed term if the person appointed by the governor
informs the secretary of state of his or her intention to stand for
election to a second term. The election shall be held in the same
manner as the election of superior court judges except that those
eligible to vote are all registered voters within the water court
division in which the judge would serve. If the appointee informs the
secretary of state of an intention to not stand for election, no
general election shall be held and the governor shall appoint a new
judge in the same manner as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A water court judge who has been appointed and reelected in a
competitive election must thereafter stand for a retention election
held in the general election preceding the expiration of each six-year
term if the judge informs the secretary of state of his or her
intention to stand for reelection. The electorate consists of the
eligible voters within the water court division in which the judge
serves. The judge will be retained for another six-year term if fifty
percent or more of the persons casting a ballot in the retention
election vote in favor of retention. If the judge decides to not stand
for the retention election, no general election shall be held and the
governor shall appoint a new judge in the same manner as provided in
subsection (1) of this section. If the voters vote to not retain the
judge, the governor shall appoint a new judge in the same manner as
provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A vacant judicial position on a water court shall be filled by
appointment by the governor for the remainder of the term or for a six-year term in the case of a vacancy occurring at the conclusion of a
judge's full term. The appointment shall be made in the manner
provided by subsection (1) of this section. The person appointed to
fill a vacant position must stand for a competitive election at the
conclusion of the term of the position he or she is filling and
subsequent retention elections as provided in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 An at-large water court judge may be
appointed by the governor upon the recommendation of the water court
judges and the central court administrator. The at-large judge may be
assigned cases within any of the three divisions in which the workload
exceeds the capacity of the water court. An at-large water court judge
shall be appointed in the same manner as for a judge serving in one of
the divisions and shall stand for a statewide open election prior to
the conclusion of the initial six-year term and for retention elections
every six years thereafter for as long as the judge wishes to continue
in the position. Vacancies of the at-large judge position shall be
filled in the same manner as provided in section 7(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Every water court judge shall, before
entering upon the duties of his or her office, take and subscribe an
oath that he or she will support the Constitution of the United States
and the Constitution of the state of Washington, and will faithfully
and impartially discharge the duties of judge to the best of his or her
ability, which oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of
state. Such an oath or affirmation to be in form substantially the
same as prescribed for justices of the supreme court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The water court judges shall select a
presiding judge and an assistant presiding judge as provided in
Washington courts general rule 29. In addition to having
responsibilities designated by rule, the presiding judge is responsible
for assigning each new water case filed with the court. The presiding
judge shall consider the geographic origin of each case and the
workload of each judge when making assignment decisions in order to
equitably distribute the workload of the court. The presiding judge
shall to the extent practicable balance the workload of the judges by
assigning cases to the division in which each case arises or by
assigning cases to the at-large judge, if one is established.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.03.012 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
Pursuant to Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution and
RCW 2.04.092, 2.06.062, 2.08.092, 3.58.010, and 43.03.310, the annual
salaries of the judges of the state shall be as follows:
(1) Effective September 1, 2002:
(a) Justices of the supreme court . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 134,584
(b) Judges of the court of appeals . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 128,116
(c) Judges of the superior court . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 121,972
(d) Full-time judges of the district court . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 116,135
(2) Effective September 1, 2003:
(a) Justices of the supreme court . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 134,584
(b) Judges of the court of appeals . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 128,116
(c) Judges of the superior court . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 121,972
(d) Full-time judges of the district court . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 116,135
(3) Effective September 1, 2004:
(a) Justices of the supreme court . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 137,276
(b) Judges of the court of appeals . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 130,678
(c) Judges of the superior court and water court . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 124,411
(d) Full-time judges of the district court . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 118,458
(4) The salary for a part-time district court judge shall be the
proportion of full-time work for which the position is authorized,
multiplied by the salary for a full-time district court judge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Water court judges are subject to the same
mandatory retirement age as superior court judges as provided by
Article IV, section 3(a) of the state Constitution and are eligible for
benefits under the judicial retirement system as provided in chapters
2.10, 2.12, and 2.14 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Unless otherwise provided by statute, all
process issuing out of the water court shall be directed to the sheriff
of the county in which it is to be served, and be executed by the
sheriff according to law. The process of the water courts shall extend
to all parts of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Adjournments from day to day, or from time
to time, are to be construed as recesses in the sessions, and shall not
prevent the court from sitting at any time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The water court judges shall, from time to
time, establish uniform rules for the government of the water court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Water court judges shall, on or before the
first day of November in each year, report in writing to the judges of
the supreme court, such defects and omissions in the laws as their
experience may suggest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Whenever the presiding judge of the water
court requests the governor of the state to direct a judge of the
superior court to hold a session of the water court, the governor shall
request and direct a judge of the superior court, making such selection
as the governor deems to be most consistent with the state of judicial
business, to hold a session of the water court. The direction by the
governor shall be made in writing, and shall specify the water court
division in which the governor directs the superior court judge to hold
the session of the water court, and the period during which the
superior court judge is to hold the session. Thereupon, it shall be
the duty of the superior court judge so requested, and the superior
court judge is hereby empowered to hold a session of the water court as
specified by the governor.

Sec. 18 RCW 90.03.110 and 1987 c 109 s 72 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the filing of a petition with the department by one or more
persons claiming the right to divert any waters within the state or
when, after investigation, in the judgment of the department, the
interest of the public will be subserved by a determination of the
rights thereto, it shall be the duty of the department to prepare a
statement of the facts, together with a plan or map of the locality
under investigation, and file such statement and plan or map in the
((superior)) water court ((of the county in which said water is
situated, or, in case such water flows or is situated in more than one
county, in the county which the department shall determine to be the
most convenient to the parties interested therein)). Such statement
shall contain substantially the following matter, to wit:
(1) The names of all known persons claiming the right to divert
said water, the right to the diversion of which is sought to be
determined, and
(2) A brief statement of the facts in relation to such water, and
the necessity for a determination of the rights thereto.

Sec. 19 RCW 90.03.120 and 1987 c 109 s 73 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the filing of the statement and map as provided in RCW
90.03.110 the judge of such ((superior)) water court shall make an
order directing summons to be issued, and fixing the return day
thereof, which shall be not less than sixty nor more than ninety days,
after the making of such order: PROVIDED, That for good cause, the
court, at the request of the department, may modify said time period.
A summons shall thereupon be issued out of said ((superior)) water
court, signed and attested by the clerk thereof, in the name of the
state of Washington, as plaintiff, against all known persons claiming
the right to divert the water involved and also all persons unknown
claiming the right to divert the water involved, which said summons
shall contain a brief statement of the objects and purpose of the
proceedings and shall require the defendants to appear on the return
day thereof, and make and file a statement of claim to, or interest in,
the water involved and a statement that unless they appear at the time
and place fixed and assert such right, judgment will be entered
determining their rights according to the evidence: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That any persons claiming the right to the use of water by virtue of a
contract with claimant to the right to divert the same, shall not be
necessary parties to the proceeding.

Sec. 20 RCW 90.03.160 and 1989 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the completion of the service of summons as hereinbefore
provided, the ((superior)) water court in which said proceeding is
pending shall make an order referring said proceeding to the department
to take testimony by its duly authorized designee, as referee, and the
designee shall report to and file with the ((superior)) water court of
the county in which such cause is pending a transcript of such
testimony for adjudication thereon by such court. The ((superior))
water court may, in any complex case with more than one thousand named
defendants, including the United States, retain for hearing and further
processing such portions of the proceeding as pertain to a discrete
class or classes of defendants or claims of water rights if the court
determines that: (1) Resolution of claims of such classes appear to
involve significant issues of law, either procedural or substantive;
and (2) such a retention will both expedite the conclusion of the case
and reduce the overall expenditures of the plaintiff, defendants, and
the court.

Sec. 21 RCW 90.03.180 and 1995 c 292 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
At the time of filing the statement as provided in RCW 90.03.140,
each defendant shall pay to the clerk of the ((superior)) water court
a fee as set under RCW 36.18.020.

Sec. 22 RCW 90.03.190 and 1987 c 109 s 78 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the completion of the taking of testimony it shall be the duty
of the department's designee to prepare and file with the clerk of the
((superior)) water court ((where such proceeding is pending,)) a
transcript of the testimony taken at such hearing, in triplicate,
together with all papers and exhibits offered and received in evidence
and not already a part of the record. ((He)) The designee shall also
make and file in said court a full and complete report ((as in other
cases of reference in the superior court)). Two of said transcripts
shall be for the use of the parties as the court may direct. The court
shall set a time for the hearing and the designee shall thereupon
prepare a notice designating a time for the hearing of said report and
serve a copy thereof, together with a copy of ((his)) the designee's
report, on all persons, their agents or attorneys who have appeared in
such proceeding. Such service shall be made not less than twenty days
before the time for said hearing, either personally or by registered
mail, and an affidavit of such service filed with the clerk.

Sec. 23 RCW 90.03.210 and 2001 c 220 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the pendency of such adjudication proceedings prior to
judgment or upon review by an appellate court, the stream or other
water involved shall be regulated or partially regulated according to
the schedule of rights specified in the department's report upon an
order of the water court authorizing such regulation: PROVIDED, Any
interested party may file a bond and obtain an order staying the
regulation of said stream as to him or her, in which case the water
court shall make such order regarding the regulation of the stream or
other water as he or she may deem just. The bond shall be filed within
five days following the service of notice of appeal in an amount to be
fixed by the water court and with sureties satisfactory to the court,
conditioned to perform the judgment of the water court.
(2) Any appeal of a decision of the department on an application to
change or transfer a water right subject to a general adjudication that
is being litigated actively and was commenced before October 13, 1977,
shall be conducted as follows:
(a) The appeal shall be filed with the water court conducting the
adjudication and served under RCW 34.05.542(3). The content of the
notice of appeal shall conform to RCW 34.05.546. Standing to appeal
shall be based on the requirements of RCW 34.05.530 and is not limited
to parties to the adjudication.
(b) If the appeal includes a challenge to the portion of the
department's decision that pertains to tentative determinations of the
validity and extent of the water right, review of those tentative
determinations shall be conducted by the water court consistent with
the provisions of RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, except that the
review shall be de novo.
(c) If the appeal includes a challenge to any portion of the
department's decision other than the tentative determinations of the
validity and extent of the right, the water court must certify to the
pollution control hearings board for review and decision those portions
of the department's decision. Review by the pollution control hearings
board shall be conducted consistent with chapter 43.21B RCW and the
board's implementing regulations, except that the requirements for
filing, service, and content of the notice of appeal shall be governed
by (a) of this subsection.
(d) Appeals shall be scheduled to afford all parties full
opportunity to participate before the ((superior)) water court and the
pollution control hearings board.
(e) Any person wishing to appeal the decision of the board made
under (c) of this subsection shall seek review of the decision in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, except that the petition for review
must be filed with the ((superior)) water court conducting the
adjudication.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or modify
any treaty or other federal rights of an Indian tribe, or the rights of
any federal agency or other person or entity arising under federal law.
Nothing in this section is intended or shall be construed as affecting
or modifying any existing right of a federally recognized Indian tribe
to protect from impairment its federally reserved water rights in
federal court.

Sec. 24 RCW 90.03.230 and 1987 c 109 s 81 are each amended to
read as follows:
The clerk of the ((superior)) water court, immediately upon the
entry of any decree by the ((superior)) water court, shall transmit a
certified copy thereof to the director, who shall immediately enter the
same upon the records of the department.

Sec. 25 RCW 34.05.514 and 2001 c 220 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) ((and (3))) through (5)
of this section, proceedings for review under this chapter shall be
instituted by paying the fee required under RCW 36.18.020 and filing a
petition in the superior court, at the petitioner's option, for (a)
Thurston county, (b) the county of the petitioner's residence or
principal place of business, or (c) in any county where the property
owned by the petitioner and affected by the contested decision is
located.
(2) For proceedings involving institutions of higher education, the
petition shall be filed either in the county in which the principal
office of the institution involved is located or in the county of a
branch campus if the action involves such branch.
(3) For proceedings conducted by the pollution control hearings
board pursuant to chapter 43.21B RCW or as otherwise provided in RCW
90.03.210(2) involving decisions of the department of ecology on
applications for changes or transfers of water rights that are the
subject of a general adjudication of water rights that is being
litigated actively under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW, the petition must
be filed with the ((superior)) water court conducting the adjudication,
to be consolidated by the court with the general adjudication. A party
to the adjudication shall be a party to the appeal under this chapter
only if the party files or is served with a petition for review to the
extent required by this chapter.
(4) For proceedings involving the review of a water rights
management or enforcement decision of the pollution control hearings
board, the petition shall be filed in the water court.
(5) For proceedings involving the review of a rule adopted by the
department of ecology that establishes instream flows, the petition
shall be filed in the water court.

Sec. 26 RCW 34.05.526 and 1988 c 288 s 505 and 1988 c 202 s 35
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
An aggrieved party may secure appellate review of any final
judgment of the superior court or the water court under this chapter by
the supreme court or the court of appeals. The review shall be secured
in the manner provided by law for review of superior court decisions in
other civil cases.

Sec. 27 RCW 34.05.518 and 2003 c 393 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The final decision of an administrative agency in an
adjudicative proceeding under this chapter may, except as otherwise
provided in chapter 43.21L RCW, be directly reviewed by the court of
appeals either (a) upon certification by the superior court or water
court pursuant to this section or (b) if the final decision is from an
environmental board as defined in subsection (3) of this section, upon
acceptance by the court of appeals after a certificate of appealability
has been filed by the environmental board that rendered the final
decision.
(2) For direct review upon certification by the superior court or
the water court, an application for direct review must be filed with
the superior court or the water court within thirty days of the filing
of the petition for review in superior court or water court. The
superior court or water court may certify a case for direct review only
if the judicial review is limited to the record of the agency
proceeding and the court finds that:
(a) Fundamental and urgent issues affecting the future
administrative process or the public interest are involved which
require a prompt determination;
(b) Delay in obtaining a final and prompt determination of such
issues would be detrimental to any party or the public interest;
(c) An appeal to the court of appeals would be likely regardless of
the determination in superior court; and
(d) The appellate court's determination in the proceeding would
have significant precedential value.
Procedures for certification shall be established by court rule.
(3)(a) For the purposes of direct review of final decisions of
environmental boards, environmental boards include those boards
identified in RCW 43.21B.005 and growth management hearings boards as
identified in RCW 36.70A.250.
(b) An environmental board may issue a certificate of appealability
if it finds that delay in obtaining a final and prompt determination of
the issues would be detrimental to any party or the public interest and
either:
(i) Fundamental and urgent statewide or regional issues are raised;
or
(ii) The proceeding is likely to have significant precedential
value.
(4) The environmental board shall state in the certificate of
appealability which criteria it applied, explain how that criteria was
met, and file with the certificate a copy of the final decision.
(5) For an appellate court to accept direct review of a final
decision of an environmental board, it shall consider the same criteria
outlined in subsection (3) of this section, except as otherwise
provided in chapter 43.21L RCW.
(6) The procedures for direct review of final decisions of
environmental boards include:
(a) Within thirty days after filing the petition for review with
the superior court or the water court, a party may file an application
for direct review with the superior court or the water court and serve
the appropriate environmental board and all parties of record. The
application shall request the environmental board to file a certificate
of appealability.
(b) If an issue on review is the jurisdiction of the environmental
board, the board may file an application for direct review on that
issue.
(c) The environmental board shall have thirty days to grant or deny
the request for a certificate of appealability and its decision shall
be filed with the superior court or the water court and served on all
parties of record.
(d) If a certificate of appealability is issued, the parties shall
have fifteen days from the date of service to file a notice of
discretionary review in the superior court or the water court, and the
notice shall include a copy of the certificate of appealability and a
copy of the final decision.
(e) If the appellate court accepts review, the certificate of
appealability shall be transmitted to the court of appeals as part of
the certified record.
(f) If a certificate of appealability is denied, review shall be by
the superior court or the water court. The superior court's or the
water court's decision may be appealed to the court of appeals.

Sec. 28 RCW 34.05.570 and 1995 c 403 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Generally. Except to the extent that this chapter or another
statute provides otherwise:
(a) The burden of demonstrating the invalidity of agency action is
on the party asserting invalidity;
(b) The validity of agency action shall be determined in accordance
with the standards of review provided in this section, as applied to
the agency action at the time it was taken;
(c) The court shall make a separate and distinct ruling on each
material issue on which the court's decision is based; and
(d) The court shall grant relief only if it determines that a
person seeking judicial relief has been substantially prejudiced by the
action complained of.
(2) Review of rules. (a) A rule may be reviewed by petition for
declaratory judgment filed pursuant to this subsection or in the
context of any other review proceeding under this section. In an
action challenging the validity of a rule, the agency shall be made a
party to the proceeding.
(b)(i) The validity of any rule, except a rule relating to instream
flows established under chapter 90.22, 90.54, or 90.82 RCW, may be
determined upon petition for a declaratory judgment addressed to the
superior court of Thurston county, when it appears that the rule, or
its threatened application, interferes with or impairs or immediately
threatens to interfere with or impair the legal rights or privileges of
the petitioner. The declaratory judgment order may be entered whether
or not the petitioner has first requested the agency to pass upon the
validity of the rule in question.
(ii) The validity of a rule relating to instream flows may be
determined upon petition for a declaratory judgment addressed to the
water court when it appears that the rule, or its threatened
application, interferes with or impairs or immediately threatens to
interfere with or impair the legal rights or privileges of the
petitioner. The declaratory judgment order may be entered whether or
not the petitioner has first requested the agency to pass upon the
validity of the rule in question.
(c) In a proceeding involving review of a rule, the court shall
declare the rule invalid only if it finds that: The rule violates
constitutional provisions; the rule exceeds the statutory authority of
the agency; the rule was adopted without compliance with statutory
rule-making procedures; or the rule is arbitrary and capricious.
(3) Review of agency orders in adjudicative proceedings. The court
shall grant relief from an agency order in an adjudicative proceeding
only if it determines that:
(a) The order, or the statute or rule on which the order is based,
is in violation of constitutional provisions on its face or as applied;
(b) The order is outside the statutory authority or jurisdiction of
the agency conferred by any provision of law;
(c) The agency has engaged in unlawful procedure or decision-making
process, or has failed to follow a prescribed procedure;
(d) The agency has erroneously interpreted or applied the law;
(e) The order is not supported by evidence that is substantial when
viewed in light of the whole record before the court, which includes
the agency record for judicial review, supplemented by any additional
evidence received by the court under this chapter;
(f) The agency has not decided all issues requiring resolution by
the agency;
(g) A motion for disqualification under RCW 34.05.425 or 34.12.050
was made and was improperly denied or, if no motion was made, facts are
shown to support the grant of such a motion that were not known and
were not reasonably discoverable by the challenging party at the
appropriate time for making such a motion;
(h) The order is inconsistent with a rule of the agency unless the
agency explains the inconsistency by stating facts and reasons to
demonstrate a rational basis for inconsistency; or
(i) The order is arbitrary or capricious.
(4) Review of other agency action.
(a) All agency action not reviewable under subsection (2) or (3) of
this section shall be reviewed under this subsection.
(b) A person whose rights are violated by an agency's failure to
perform a duty that is required by law to be performed may file a
petition for review pursuant to RCW 34.05.514, seeking an order
pursuant to this subsection requiring performance. Within twenty days
after service of the petition for review, the agency shall file and
serve an answer to the petition, made in the same manner as an answer
to a complaint in a civil action. The court may hear evidence,
pursuant to RCW 34.05.562, on material issues of fact raised by the
petition and answer.
(c) Relief for persons aggrieved by the performance of an agency
action, including the exercise of discretion, or an action under (b) of
this subsection can be granted only if the court determines that the
action is:
(i) Unconstitutional;
(ii) Outside the statutory authority of the agency or the authority
conferred by a provision of law;
(iii) Arbitrary or capricious; or
(iv) Taken by persons who were not properly constituted as agency
officials lawfully entitled to take such action.

Sec. 29 RCW 34.05.578 and 1988 c 288 s 518 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to other remedies provided by law, an agency may
seek enforcement of its rule or order by filing a petition for civil
enforcement in the superior court or the water court.
(2) The petition must name as respondent each alleged person
against whom the agency seeks to obtain civil enforcement.
(3) Venue is determined as in other civil cases.
(4) A petition for civil enforcement filed by an agency may
request, and the court may grant, declaratory relief, temporary or
permanent injunctive relief, any other civil remedy provided by law, or
any combination of the foregoing.

Sec. 30 RCW 34.05.588 and 1989 c 175 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a person fails to obey an agency subpoena issued in an
adjudicative proceeding, or obeys the subpoena but refuses to testify
or produce documents when requested concerning a matter under
examination, the agency or attorney issuing the subpoena may petition
the superior court of any county where the hearing is being conducted
or the water court, where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or
where subpoenaed documents are located, for enforcement of the
subpoena. The petition shall be accompanied by a copy of the subpoena
and proof of service, shall set forth in what specific manner the
subpoena has not been complied with, and shall request an order of the
court to compel compliance. Upon such petition, the court shall enter
an order directing the person to appear before the court at a time and
place fixed in the order to show cause why the person has not obeyed
the subpoena or has refused to testify or produce documents. A copy of
the court's show cause order shall be served upon the person. If it
appears to the court that the subpoena was properly issued, and that
the particular questions the person refused to answer or the requests
for production of documents were reasonable and relevant, the court
shall enter an order that the person appear before the agency at the
time and place fixed in the order and testify or produce the required
documents, and on failing to obey this order the person shall be dealt
with as for contempt of court.
(2) Agencies with statutory authority to issue investigative
subpoenas may petition for enforcement of such subpoenas in accordance
with subsection (1) of this section. The agency may petition the
superior court of any county or the water court where the subpoenaed
person resides or is found, or where subpoenaed documents are located.
If it appears to the court that the subpoena was properly issued, that
the investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose,
and that the testimony or documents required to be produced are
adequately specified and relevant to the investigation, the court shall
enter an order that the person appear before the agency at the time and
place fixed in the order and testify or produce the required documents,
and failing to obey this order the person shall be dealt with as for
contempt of court.
(3) Petitions for enforcement of agency subpoenas are not subject
to RCW 34.05.578 through 34.05.590.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 Nothing in this act is intended to affect
the jurisdiction of the superior court for any general adjudication of
water rights proceeding, water management, or enforcement dispute, or
challenge of a rule adopting instream flows if such action before the
court was filed prior to the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 Sections 3 through 10 and 12 through 17 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 2 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 If Senate/House Bill Joint Resolution No.
. . . (Z-1175.1/04) fails to pass the legislature or if the resulting
referendum to the voters fails to receive a majority approval of the
electorate, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---