BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.101 and 2003 c 264 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A transfer of ownership in a motor vehicle is perfected by
compliance with the requirements of this section.
(1) If an owner transfers his or her interest in a vehicle, other
than by the creation, deletion, or change of a security interest, the
owner shall, at the time of the delivery of the vehicle, execute an
assignment to the transferee and provide an odometer disclosure
statement under RCW 46.12.124 on the certificate of ownership or as the
department otherwise prescribes, and cause the certificate and
assignment to be transmitted to the transferee. The owner shall notify
the department or its agents or subagents, in writing, on the
appropriate form, of the date of the sale or transfer, the name and
address of the owner and of the transferee, the transferee's driver's
license number if available, and such description of the vehicle,
including the vehicle identification number, ((the license plate
number, or both,)) as may be required in the appropriate form provided
or approved for that purpose by the department. The report of sale
will be deemed properly filed if all information required in this
section is provided on the form and includes a department-authorized
notation that the document was received by the department, its agents,
or subagents on or before the fifth day after the sale of the vehicle,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and state and federal holidays. Agents
and subagents shall immediately electronically transmit the seller's
report of sale to the department. Reports of sale processed and
recorded by the department's agents or subagents may be subject to fees
as specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a) or (5)(b). By January 1, 2003,
the department shall create a system enabling the seller of a vehicle
to transmit the report of sale electronically. The system created by
the department must immediately indicate on the department's vehicle
record that a seller's report of sale has been filed.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section to provide
an odometer disclosure statement apply to the transfer of vehicles held
for lease when transferred to a lessee and then to the lessor at the
end of the leasehold and to vehicles held in a fleet when transferred
to a purchaser.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.70.122 the transferee shall within
fifteen days after delivery to the transferee of the vehicle, execute
the application for a new certificate of ownership in the same space
provided therefor on the certificate or as the department prescribes,
and cause the certificates and application to be transmitted to the
department.
(4) Upon request of the owner or transferee, a secured party in
possession of the certificate of ownership shall, unless the transfer
was a breach of its security agreement, either deliver the certificate
to the transferee for transmission to the department or, when the
secured party receives the owner's assignment from the transferee, it
shall transmit the transferee's application for a new certificate, the
existing certificate, and the required fee to the department.
Compliance with this section does not affect the rights of the secured
party.
(5) If a security interest is reserved or created at the time of
the transfer, the certificate of ownership shall be retained by or
delivered to the person who becomes the secured party, and the parties
shall comply with the provisions of RCW 46.12.170.
(6) If the purchaser or transferee fails or neglects to make
application to transfer the certificate of ownership and license
registration within fifteen days after the date of delivery of the
vehicle, he or she shall on making application for transfer be assessed
a twenty-five dollar penalty on the sixteenth day and two dollars
additional for each day thereafter, but not to exceed one hundred
dollars. The director may by rule establish conditions under which the
penalty will not be assessed when an application for transfer is
delayed for reasons beyond the control of the purchaser. Conditions
for not assessing the penalty may be established for but not limited to
delays caused by:
(a) The department requesting additional supporting documents;
(b) Extended hospitalization or illness of the purchaser;
(c) Failure of a legal owner to release his or her interest;
(d) Failure, negligence, or nonperformance of the department,
auditor, or subagent.
Failure or neglect to make application to transfer the certificate
of ownership and license registration within forty-five days after the
date of delivery of the vehicle is a misdemeanor.
(7) Upon receipt of an application for reissue or replacement of a
certificate of ownership and transfer of license registration,
accompanied by the endorsed certificate of ownership or other
documentary evidence as is deemed necessary, the department shall, if
the application is in order and if all provisions relating to the
certificate of ownership and license registration have been complied
with, issue new certificates of title and license registration as in
the case of an original issue and shall transmit the fees together with
an itemized detailed report to the state treasurer.
(8) Once each quarter the department shall report to the department
of revenue a list of those vehicles for which a seller's report has
been received but no transfer of title has taken place.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.023 and 1993 c 488 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every owner or lessee of a vehicle seeking to apply for an
excise tax exemption under RCW 82.08.0287, 82.12.0282, or 82.44.015
shall apply to the director for, and upon satisfactory showing of
eligibility, receive in lieu of the regular motor vehicle license
plates for that vehicle, special plates of a distinguishing separate
numerical series or design, as the director shall prescribe. In
addition to paying all other initial fees required by law, each
applicant for the special license plates shall pay an additional
license fee of twenty-five dollars upon the issuance of such plates.
The special fee shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.
Application for renewal of the license plates shall be as prescribed
for the renewal of other vehicle licenses. No renewal is required for
vehicles exempted under RCW 46.16.020.
(2) Whenever the ownership of a vehicle receiving special plates
under subsection (1) of this section is transferred or assigned, the
plates shall be removed from the motor vehicle, and if another vehicle
qualifying for special plates is acquired, the plates shall be
transferred to that vehicle for a fee of ((five)) ten dollars, and the
director shall be immediately notified of the transfer of the plates.
Otherwise the removed plates shall be immediately forwarded to the
director to be canceled. Whenever the owner or lessee of a vehicle
receiving special plates under subsection (1) of this section is for
any reason relieved of the tax-exempt status, the special plates shall
immediately be forwarded to the director along with an application for
replacement plates and the required fee. Upon receipt the director
shall issue the license plates that are otherwise provided by law.
(3) Any person who knowingly makes any false statement of a
material fact in the application for a special plate under subsection
(1) of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.290 and 1997 c 291 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any case of a valid sale or transfer of the ownership of any
vehicle, the right to the certificates properly transferable therewith,
except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, and to the vehicle license plates
passes to the purchaser or transferee. It is unlawful for the holder
of such certificates, except as provided in RCW 46.16.280, or vehicle
license plates to fail, neglect, or refuse to endorse the certificates
and deliver the vehicle license plates to the purchaser or transferee.
(2)(a) If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed with
current standard issue license plates, the vehicle license plates may
be retained and displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of the
vehicle so sold or transferred. If a person applies for a transfer of
the plate or plates to another eligible vehicle, the plates must be
transferred to a vehicle requiring the same type of plate. A transfer
fee of ten dollars must be charged in addition to all other applicable
fees. The transfer fees must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.
(b) If the sale or transfer is of a vehicle licensed by the state
or any county, city, town, school district, or other political
subdivision entitled to exemption as provided by law, or, if the
vehicle is licensed with personalized plates, amateur radio operator
plates, medal of honor plates, disabled person plates, disabled veteran
plates, prisoner of war plates, or other special license plates issued
under RCW 46.16.301 as it existed before amendment by section 5,
chapter 291, Laws of 1997, the vehicle license plates therefor shall be
retained and may be displayed upon a vehicle obtained in replacement of
the vehicle so sold or transferred.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16.316 and 1997 c 291 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 46.16.305:
(1) When a person who has been issued a special license plate or
plates: (a) Under RCW 46.16.301 as it existed before amendment by
section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, or under RCW 46.16.305(2) or
46.16.324; or (b) approved by the special license plate review board
under RCW 46.16.715 through 46.16.775 sells, trades, or otherwise
transfers or releases ownership of the vehicle upon which the special
license plate or plates have been displayed, he or she shall
immediately report the transfer of such plate or plates to an acquired
vehicle or vehicle eligible for such plates pursuant to departmental
rule, or he or she shall surrender such plates to the department
immediately if such surrender is required by departmental rule. If a
person applies for a transfer of the plate or plates to another
eligible vehicle, a transfer fee of ((five)) ten dollars shall be
charged in addition to all other applicable fees. Such transfer fees
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Failure to surrender the
plates when required is a traffic infraction.
(2) If the special license plate or plates issued by the department
become lost, defaced, damaged, or destroyed, application for a
replacement special license plate or plates shall be made and fees paid
as provided by law for the replacement of regular license plates.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.590 and 1975 c 59 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any person who has been issued personalized license plates
applies to the department for transfer of such plates to a subsequently
acquired vehicle or camper eligible for personalized license plates, a
transfer fee of ((five)) ten dollars shall be charged in addition to
all other appropriate fees. Such transfer fees shall be deposited in
the motor vehicle fund.

--- END ---