BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.46.130 and 2002 c 114 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Proceeds of the sale of bonds issued by the state for projects
constructed under this chapter must be deposited in the state treasury
to the credit of a special account designated for those purposes.
Those proceeds must be expended only for the purposes enumerated in
this chapter, for payment of the expense incurred in the issuance and
sale of any such bonds, and to repay the motor vehicle fund for any
sums advanced to pay the cost of surveys, location, design,
development, right-of-way, and other activities related to the
financing and construction of the bridge and its approaches.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the department
may use any available or remaining bond authorization and bond proceeds
authorized or issued for projects constructed under this chapter and
not required for completion of the projects to be used for safety
improvements within the same corridor and on the same state route as
the toll facility. The special account must be reimbursed for the cost
of the safety improvements.
(a) On June 30, 2009, the state treasurer shall transfer nine
hundred eighty thousand dollars from the transportation 2003 account
(nickel account) to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account.
(b) On June 30, 2011, the state treasurer shall transfer ten
million one hundred thirty thousand dollars from the transportation
2003 account (nickel account) to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account.
(c) On June 30, 2012, the state treasurer shall transfer up to four
million one hundred thousand dollars from the transportation 2003
account (nickel account) to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account.
The amount transferred in this subsection (2)(c), when combined with
the amounts in (a) and (b) of this subsection, may not exceed the
amount expended for right of way acquisition, permitting, design,
construction, and other costs attributable to project number 301632(A)
state route number 16 Burley-Olalla interchange.

--- END ---