BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.26 RCW
to read as follows:
INTENT. The legislature recognizes the need to place a greater
emphasis on the movement of freight in Washington state. A strong
programmatic commitment is needed to focus current resources and direct
new, ongoing funding toward freight corridor priorities and projects
that expedite the movement of international cargo. The legislature
recognizes that the transportation improvement board currently makes a
ten million dollar biennial investment in such projects and has the
engineering expertise required to manage freight construction projects.
It is the intent of the legislature to consolidate the board's freight
activities into a program that helps Washington to become a federal
"center of excellence" and attracts new funding as part of the TEA-21
extension or reauthorization. A freight investment account is created
as a repository to appropriate federal funds and for any new state
revenues dedicated to the ongoing support of freight mobility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.26 RCW
to read as follows:
STATE FREIGHT INVESTMENT PROGRAM CREATED. (1) A state freight
investment program is created to be managed by the board.
Transportation partnership projects with a freight benefit are
relocated into the state freight investment program.
(2) The board shall use the following criteria, not necessarily in
order of importance, to prioritize freight investment program projects
proposed by both local governments and the department of
transportation:
(a) A freight benefit; including corridor completion and reduction
in roadway conflicts between freight and the general public. First and
greatest consideration must be given to projects previously identified
by the freight mobility strategic investment board. Projects so
identified by the freight mobility strategic investment board must
receive no less than two-thirds of the total points or weight that may
be assigned under this criteria.
(b) The creation of economic opportunities; including improved
access to freight generators and development or expansion of freight
facilities.
(c) The potential for project delivery; including full funding at
the time of the grant award and the leveraging of additional local,
state, or federal funds.
(d) The potential to attract federal funding; including projects on
corridors of national significance, highway connection projects between
the national highway system and intermodal freight facilities, grade
separation projects, projects that support intermodal rail capacity,
and projects that sustain multiple gateways for national emergencies.
(3) Major projects with a significant increase in scope or cost
from the original estimate at grant award must include a review of the
project's current funding status and revised priority rank based on the
new scope. The projects may be delayed or canceled by the board in
favor of projects that are certified as fully funded.
(4) Funds or earmarks that traditionally apply to freight action
strategy projects must not be programed in the state freight investment
program or appropriated to the state freight investment account.
(5) Funds or earmarks from federal freight programs that
specifically apply to state highways must not be programed in the state
freight investment program or appropriated to the state freight
investment account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
FREIGHT INVESTMENT ACCOUNT CREATED. (1) The freight investment
account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation.
(2) Expenditures from the account must be used for projects or
improvements selected by the board under section 2 of this act, or to
pay the principal and interest on bonds authorized for projects or
improvements selected under section 2 of this act.
(3) The account may receive one-time or ongoing distributions from
the state multimodal transportation and motor vehicle accounts. The
account must be the repository for any new state revenues dedicated to
the ongoing support of freight mobility. The account must be a
repository to appropriate funds from federal freight programs and to
appropriate flexible funds directed toward the freight program created
in section 2 of this act. Federal appropriations are to be funded from
the surface transportation program flexible funds or similar program
anticipated to be authorized in the extension or reauthorization of the
Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century (TEA-21).
(4) Federal funds deposited in the account must be administered by
the highways and local programs division of the department of
transportation.
(5) When necessary to keep balanced the freight investment account,
the department of transportation may transfer funds between the freight
investment account and either the motor vehicle account or multimodal
transportation account.
(6) Funds or earmarks that traditionally apply to freight action
strategy projects must not be programed in the state freight investment
program or appropriated to the state freight investment account.
(7) Funds or earmarks from federal freight programs that
specifically apply to state highways must not be programed in the state
freight investment program or appropriated to the state freight
investment account.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, and
2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account,
the regional transportation investment district account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
freight investment account, the grade crossing protective fund, the
high capacity transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund,
the highway safety account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle
safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction
account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational
vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol
highway account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, 2003
c 150 s 2, and 2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, the
emergency reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the regional transportation
investment district account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University
of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
freight investment account, the grade crossing protective fund, the
high capacity transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund,
the highway safety account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle
safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction
account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational
vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol
highway account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.26.084 and 1999 c 94 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
The transportation improvement account is hereby created in the
motor vehicle fund. The ((intent)) purpose of the ((program)) account
is to improve mobility of people and goods in Washington state by
supporting economic development and environmentally responsive
solutions to our statewide transportation and freight system needs.
The transportation improvement account funds the transportation
partnership program and, with the freight investment account, funds the
freight investment program.
Within one year after board approval of an application for funding,
a county, city, or transportation benefit district shall provide
written certification to the board of the pledged local and/or private
funding. Funds allocated to an applicant that does not certify its
funding within one year after approval may be reallocated by the board.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.66.030 and 1996 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The transportation improvement board is authorized and
responsible for the final selection of programs and projects funded
from the freight investment account; central Puget Sound public
transportation account; and public transportation systems account((;
and the intermodal surface transportation and efficiency act of 1991,
surface transportation program, statewide competitive)).
(b) The board may establish subcommittees as well as technical
advisory committees to carry out the mandates of this chapter.
(2) Expenses of the board, including administrative expenses for
managing the program, shall be paid in accordance with RCW 47.26.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Sections 1 through 4, 6, and 7 of this
act take effect July 1, 2004.
(2) Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2005.

--- END ---