BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
a city or town that provides water or sewer service outside the
corporate boundaries of the city or town shall not, as condition of
providing water or sewer service, impose, demand, or negotiate any
condition requiring:
(a) Lot sizes different from those required by the jurisdiction
with zoning authority over the property; or
(b) Other development or design requirements not required by the
local government with jurisdiction over the property.
(2) A city or town may impose conditions not otherwise allowed
under subsection (1) of this section if the conditions are necessary to
the proper functioning of the water or sewer service. The burden of
proof shall be on the city or town to demonstrate that the condition is
necessary to the proper functioning of the water or sewer service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
a city or town that provides water or sewer service outside the
corporate boundaries of the city or town shall not, as condition of
providing water or sewer service, impose, demand, or negotiate any
condition requiring:
(a) Lot sizes different from those required by the jurisdiction
with zoning authority over the property; or
(b) Other development or design requirements not required by the
local government with jurisdiction over the property.
(2) A city or town may impose conditions not otherwise allowed
under subsection (1) of this section if the conditions are necessary to
the proper functioning of the water or sewer service. The burden of
proof shall be on the city or town to demonstrate that the condition is
necessary to the proper functioning of the water or sewer service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
a city that provides water or sewer service outside the corporate
boundaries of the city shall not, as condition of providing water or
sewer service, impose, demand, or negotiate any condition requiring:
(a) Lot sizes different from those required by the jurisdiction
with zoning authority over the property; or
(b) Other development or design requirements not required by the
local government with jurisdiction over the property.
(2) A city may impose conditions not otherwise allowed under
subsection (1) of this section if the conditions are necessary to the
proper functioning of the water or sewer service. The burden of proof
shall be on the city to demonstrate that the condition is necessary to
the proper functioning of the water or sewer service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---