BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that standardized
chemical dependency assessment protocols are necessary in court-involved chemical dependency cases to improve the accuracy of
assessments and treatment plans. Background information, such as
criminal history, the police report, and a drug screen urinalysis, must
be available to chemical dependency professionals and probation
assessment officers at the commencement of the assessment of
individuals in court-involved chemical dependency cases. The
legislature intends to create a work group to draft protocols to
address how such information will be made available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By July 1, 2004, the director of the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services, or the director's designee, shall within existing
resources convene and chair a work group to develop written protocols
for the production of accurate chemical dependency assessments and
appropriate treatment plans. The work group shall also determine the
process by which such information will be made available in a timely
manner to chemical dependency professionals and probation assessment
officers.
(2) In addition to the director of the division of alcohol and
substance abuse of the department of social and health services, the
following shall be members of the work group: A representative from
the district and municipal court judges association, a representative
from the administrative office of the courts, a representative from the
misdemeanant corrections association, a representative from the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, a representative
from the association of alcohol and addiction programs, a
representative from the Washington state association of independent
outpatient programs, a representative from the Washington association
of prosecuting attorneys, and a representative from either the
Washington defender association or the Washington association of
criminal defense lawyers.
Members of the work group shall serve without compensation.
(3) By November 1, 2004, the work group shall finalize the written
protocols and submit them to the legislature and the governor.

--- END ---