BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons who are taxable under this chapter may take a credit
for the purchase, or the lease for a period of at least three years, of
new alternative fuel vehicles, if the vehicles are exclusively used in
business operations. The credit is based upon the following schedule:

VEHICLE TONNAGE
CREDIT

Less than 10,000 pounds
gross vehicle weight 30 percent of the cost or
$5,000, whichever is
less

10,000 pounds or more
gross vehicle weight 30 percent of the cost or
$25,000, whichever is
less

(2) For the purposes of this section, "alternative fuel vehicles"
means a motor vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.04.320, originally designed
and equipped by the manufacturer to operate: (a) Exclusively on
natural gas, hydrogen, or electricity; or (b) as a fuel cell vehicle.
For purposes of this subsection, "fuel cell vehicle" is defined as a
vehicle that operates on an electric motor drawing current from
combining hydrogen and oxygen in an electrochemical process.
(3) The credit may not exceed the amount of tax that would
otherwise be due under this chapter. The credit may be accrued and
carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be granted in place
of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section that may
be claimed, by each person, for any calendar year shall not exceed five
hundred thousand dollars.
(4) Tax credit may not be claimed for expenditures that occurred
before the effective date of this section or expenditures that occur
after January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Persons who are taxable under this chapter may take a credit
for the costs expended for acquiring and installing alternative fuel
and electric vehicle recharging equipment, including alternative fuel
storage tanks. For purposes of this subsection, "alternative fuel"
means natural gas, and hydrogen. The credit is based upon the
following schedule:
(a) Fifty percent of the costs incurred at facilities open to the
public not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars; and
(b) Twenty-five percent of the costs incurred at facilities not
open to the public not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(2) The credit may not exceed the amount of tax that would
otherwise be due under this chapter. The credit may be accrued and
carried over until it is used. Refunds shall not be granted in place
of credits. The maximum amount of credit under this section that may
be claimed, by each person, for any calendar year shall not exceed two
million dollars.
(3) Tax credit may not be claimed for expenditures that occurred
before the effective date of this section or expenditures that occur
after January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
constructing structures, installing, constructing, repairing,
decorating, altering, or improving of structures or machinery and
equipment, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of structures or machinery and equipment, if
the machinery, equipment, or structure is used directly for the retail
sale of natural gas, hydrogen, or a blend of natural gas and hydrogen
for use in a motor vehicle or is used for the recharging of an electric
vehicle.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in the form and manner prescribed
by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate
for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, altering, or improving of eligible machinery and
equipment, or tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of machinery and equipment used directly for the retail sale
of natural gas, hydrogen, or a blend of natural gas and hydrogen for
use in a motor vehicle or used for the recharging of an electric
vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
alternative fuel vehicles.
(2) For the purposes of this section and section 6 of this act,
"alternative fuel vehicles" means a motor vehicle, as defined in RCW
46.04.320, originally designed and equipped by the manufacturer to
operate: (a) Exclusively on natural gas, hydrogen, or electricity; or
(b) as a fuel cell vehicle. For purposes of this subsection, "fuel
cell vehicle" is defined as a vehicle that operates on an electric
motor drawing current from combining hydrogen and oxygen in an
electrochemical process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of alternative fuel vehicles, as defined under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act expire
January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2004.

--- END ---