BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.135.025 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund and related
funds during any fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state
expenditure limit established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW 43.135.045(((4)))
(2)(b), the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any check,
warrant, or voucher that will result in a state general fund or related
fund expenditure for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure
limit established under this chapter. A violation of this subsection
constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state
treasurer to the penalties provided in RCW 43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, ((1995)) 2004, the phrase "the previous
fiscal year's state expenditure limit" means the total state
expenditures from the state general fund and related funds, not
including federal funds, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, ((1989))
2003, plus the fiscal growth factor. ((This calculation is then
computed for the state expenditure limit for fiscal years 1992, 1993,
1994, and 1995, and as required under RCW 43.135.035(4).))
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit
committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations. All actions of
the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter
require an affirmative vote of at least ((three)) four members.
(6) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and
then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. If,
by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not adopted
the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his
or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as
necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average of the sum of
inflation and population change for each of the prior three fiscal
years.
(8) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics.
(9) "Population change" means the percentage change in state
population for each fiscal year as reported by the office of financial
management.
(10) "General fund and related funds" means the state general fund,
health services account, violence reduction and drug enforcement
account, public safety and education account, water quality account,
and student achievement fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.035 and 2001 c 3 s 8 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s
2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue to the general fund or related
funds or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house, and then only if state
expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not
exceed the state expenditure limits established under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
((office of financial management)) state expenditure limit committee
shall adjust the state expenditure limit by the amount of additional
revenue approved by the voters under this section. This adjustment
shall not exceed the amount of revenue generated by the legislative
action during the first full fiscal year in which it is in effect. The
state expenditure limit shall be adjusted downward upon expiration or
repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund ((on or after January 1, 1993,)) or related fund
to another source of funding, or if moneys are transferred from the
state general fund or related fund to another fund or account, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure limit to reflect the
shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of money from the
state general fund or related fund to another fund or account includes
any state legislative action ((taken after July 1, 2000,)) that has the
effect of reducing revenues from a particular source, where such
revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general fund or
related fund, while increasing the revenues from that particular source
to another state or local government account. For purposes of this
section, a shift of program costs includes the shift of any portion of
the program's cost, including the shift of any expenditure growth in
the program. This subsection does not apply to the dedication or use
of lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW
84.52.068, in support of education or education expenditures.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function ((is)) and the
ongoing revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted
to the state general fund or related fund on or after January 1,
((2000, from another source of funding, or if moneys are transferred to
the state general fund from another fund or account)) 2004, the state
expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5),
shall increase the state expenditure limit to reflect the shift.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.135.045 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 26 s 919 and 2003 1st
sp.s. c 25 s 920 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) ((The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to)) The student achievement fund is
hereby created in the state treasury ((and twenty-five percent to the
general fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter)).
(((4))) (2) The education construction fund is hereby created in
the state treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2003, and
ending June 30, 2005, funds may also be used for higher education
facilities preservation and maintenance.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(((5))) (3) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be
appropriated to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for
distribution to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the
student achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per
full-time equivalent student basis to each school district.
(((6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated.))
(4) No transfers from the emergency reserve fund to the multimodal
fund shall be made during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.135.045 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 920 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit
in the emergency reserve fund all general fund -- state revenues in
excess of the state expenditure limit for that fiscal year. Deposits
shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter based on projections of
state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall
make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual
annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to)) The student achievement fund is
hereby created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the
general fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(((4))) (2) The education construction fund is hereby created in
the state treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(((5))) (3) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be
appropriated to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for
distribution to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the
student achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per
full-time equivalent student basis to each school district.
(((6) Earnings of the emergency reserve fund under RCW
43.84.092(4)(a) shall be transferred quarterly to the multimodal
transportation account, except for those earnings that are in excess of
thirty-five million dollars each fiscal year. Within thirty days
following any fiscal year in which earnings transferred to the
multimodal transportation account under this subsection did not total
thirty-five million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer from
the emergency reserve fund an amount necessary to bring the total
deposited in the multimodal transportation account under this
subsection to thirty-five million dollars. The revenues to the
multimodal transportation account reflected in this subsection provide
ongoing support for the transportation programs of the state. However,
it is the intent of the legislature that any new long-term financial
support that may be subsequently provided for transportation programs
will be used to replace and supplant the revenues reflected in this
subsection, thereby allowing those revenues to be returned to the
purposes to which they were previously dedicated.))
(4) No transfers from the emergency reserve fund to the multimodal
fund shall be made during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, and
2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, ((the
emergency reserve fund,)) The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account,
the regional transportation investment district account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2003 c 361 s 602, 2003 c 324 s 1, 2003
c 150 s 2, and 2003 c 48 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the election account, ((the
emergency reserve fund,)) The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the regional transportation
investment district account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University
of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.33A.220 (Emergency reserve fund -- Board's duties) and
1999 c 288 s 2; and
(2) RCW 43.135.051 (Emergency reserve fund -- State investment board
authority to invest or manage) and 1999 c 288 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 3 of this act expires June 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 4 of this act takes effect June 30,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1,
2005.

--- END ---