BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.14C.030 and 1996 c 240 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall be the lead administrative agency for
preservation services and may receive funding from any source for the
implementation or expansion of such services. The department shall:
(a) Provide coordination and planning with the advice of the
community networks for the implementation and expansion of preservation
services; and
(b) Monitor and evaluate such services to determine whether the
programs meet measurable standards specified by this chapter and the
department.
(2) The department may: (a) Allow its contractors for preservation
services to use paraprofessional workers when the department and
provider determine the use appropriate. The department may also use
paraprofessional workers, as appropriate, when the department provides
preservation services; and (b) allow follow-up to be provided, on an
individual case basis, when the department and provider determine the
use appropriate.
(3) In carrying out the requirements of this section, the
department shall consult with qualified agencies that have demonstrated
expertise and experience in preservation services.
(4) The department may provide preservation services directly and
shall, within available funds, enter into outcome-based, competitive
contracts with social service agencies to provide preservation
services, provided that such agencies meet measurable standards
specified by this chapter and by the department. The standards shall
include, but not be limited to, satisfactory performance in the
following areas:
(a) The number of families appropriately connected to community
resources;
(b) Avoidance of new referrals accepted by the department for child
protective services or family reconciliation services within one year
of the most recent case closure by the department;
(c) Consumer satisfaction;
(d) For reunification cases, reduction in the length of stay in
out-of-home placement; and
(e) Reduction in the level of risk factors specified by the
department.
(5)(a) The department shall not provide intensive family
preservation services unless it is demonstrated that provision of such
services prevent ((out-of-home)) placement in a foster family home or
group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW in at least
seventy percent of the out-of-home placement cases served for a period
of at least six months following termination of services. The
department's caseworkers may only provide preservation services if
there is no other qualified entity willing or able to do so.
(b) Contractors shall demonstrate that provision of intensive
family preservation services prevent ((out-of-home)) placement in a
foster family home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter
74.15 RCW in at least seventy percent of the out-of-home placement
cases served for a period of no less than six months following
termination of services. The department may increase the period of
time based on additional research and data. If the contractor fails to
meet the seventy percent requirement the department may: (i) Review
the conditions that may have contributed to the failure to meet the
standard and renew the contract if the department determines: (A) The
contractor is making progress to meet the standard; or (B) conditions
unrelated to the provision of services, including case mix and severity
of cases, contributed to the failure; or (ii) reopen the contract for
other bids.
(c) The department shall cooperate with any person who has a
contract under this section in providing data necessary to determine
the amount of reduction in foster care. For the purposes of this
subsection "prevent out-of-home placement" means that a child who has
been a recipient of intensive family preservation services has not been
placed outside of the home in a foster family home or group care
facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW, other than for a
single, temporary period of time not exceeding fourteen days.
(6) The department shall adopt rules to implement this chapter.

--- END ---