BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - CONTRACTORS' FIDUCIARY DUTY AND PERSONAL LIABILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the vast majority
of contractors engaged in the business of constructing or remodeling
owner-occupied single-family homes are both technically proficient in
their trade and able to manage their business dealings in accordance
with the highest standards. The legislature also finds, however, that
in those relatively few, but all-too-frequent, instances where prime
contractors on such construction or remodeling projects intentionally
or unintentionally mismanage payments received from homeowners that are
intended for subcontractors, suppliers, and others, existing provisions
are inadequate to protect homeowners. Additionally, the toll on an
individual homeowner's personal economic and emotional condition that
such financial mismanagement by this small fraction of prime
contractors is not adequately balanced against the responsibilities,
obligations, and possible penalties that contractors bear for such
mismanagement. Consequently, the legislature finds that it is
necessary to (1) clearly establish that prime contractors have a duty
to properly manage funds received from homeowners that are intended for
suppliers, subcontractors, and others, and to hold those who fail in
this duty personally responsible for such financial mismanagement; (2)
reduce the exposure of homeowners to lien liability, particularly when
contractors fail to pay suppliers and subcontractors as promised; (3)
clarify the right of homeowners to require that prime contractors
maintain deposits and other similar payments in a trust account for the
homeowner, when the homeowner elects to do so; and (4) increase
opportunities for homeowners to become better educated about ways to
protect themselves from financial mismanagement by those few
contractors who are unable or unwilling to meet the financial
management standards set by the vast majority of residential
contractors in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 60.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A prime contractor, and a prime contractor's principals,
partners, officers, directors, managers, vice principals, and
authorized purchasing agents, have the duty to act in the best interest
of a residential homeowner in the management and disbursement of all
amounts paid by the homeowner to the prime contractor for labor,
professional services, materials, or equipment supplied by a potential
lien claimant. A prime contractor shall defend the homeowner against
all such lien claims for which the homeowner paid the prime contractor.
(2) Funds paid to a prime contractor by a residential homeowner for
labor, professional services, materials, or equipment supplied by a
potential lien claimant shall not be used by the prime contractor for
any other purpose.
(3) All funds paid to a prime contractor by a residential homeowner
shall be presumed to be for labor, professional services, materials, or
equipment supplied by potential lien claimants unless, before accepting
payment from a residential homeowner, a prime contractor provides
written notice to the homeowner identifying:
(a) The amount of the homeowner's payment that the prime contractor
will retain in compensation for services provided by the prime
contractor;
(b) The potential lien claimants, if any, to which payment is due,
and the amounts due to each potential lien claimant; and
(c) Which of such potential lien claimants the prime contractor (i)
does not intend to fully pay from the homeowner's payment, and the
reason for less than full payment; and (ii) intends to fully pay from
the homeowner's payment.
(4) A prime contractor and its principals, partners, officers,
directors, managers, vice principals, and authorized purchasing agents
are liable for the full amount of any lien claim filed pursuant to RCW
60.04.091 if the prime contractor, or any principal, partner, officer,
director, manager, vice principal, or authorized purchasing agent of
the prime contractor, having knowledge of such use of funds or failure
to comply:
(a) Permits the use of or uses for any other purpose funds paid to
the prime contractor by a residential homeowner for labor, professional
services, materials, or equipment supplied by a potential lien claimant
and a notice of claim of lien is filed, pursuant to RCW 60.04.091,
against a homeowner by a potential lien claimant to which payment was
due when the prime contractor received payment from the homeowner; or
(b) Fails to comply or otherwise interferes with the lien
protection choice made by the homeowner under RCW 60.04.250.

Sec. 3 RCW 60.04.021 and 1991 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section
and RCW 60.04.031, any person furnishing labor, professional services,
materials, or equipment for the improvement of real property shall have
a lien upon the improvement for the contract price of labor,
professional services, materials, or equipment furnished at the
instance of the owner, or the agent or construction agent of the owner.
(2)(a) With respect to labor, professional services, materials, or
equipment for the improvement of an owner-occupied single-family
residence where the aggregate lien claims relating to transactions
constituting violations of section 2 of this act exceed twelve thousand
dollars, any person furnishing labor, professional services, materials,
or equipment for the improvement of an owner-occupied single-family
residence shall have a lien:
(i) In the amount of the contract price of labor, professional
services, materials, or equipment furnished at the instance of the
owner, or the agent or construction agent of the owner, upon any real
property owned by the prime contractor, and any real property owned in
their respective personal capacities by: (A) The owner if the prime
contractor is an individual proprietorship; (B) each partner if the
prime contractor is a firm or partnership; (C) the corporate officers
if the prime contractor is a corporation; and (D) all members of any
other business entities; and
(ii) Upon the improvement for no more than one-half of such
contract price.
(b) No lien against improvement to an owner-occupied single-family
residence shall be foreclosed unless the lien claim or claims against
all of the entities and persons identified in (a)(i) of this subsection
are insufficient to satisfy the lien.
(3) No person furnishing labor, professional services, materials,
or equipment for the improvement of an owner-occupied single-family
residence shall have a lien upon the improvement for labor,
professional services, materials, or equipment furnished on behalf of
the homeowner at the instance of a prime contractor or construction
agent employed by a prime contractor if the person knew or should have
known that the prime contractor had been the prime contractor or
construction agent on a single-family residential improvement project
with respect to which (a) a residential homeowner paid the prime
contractor for goods or services supplied by a potential lien claimant;
(b) the prime contractor failed to pay the potential lien claimant; and
(c) the potential lien claimant filed or otherwise pursued a claim of
lien against the homeowner in the previous three years.

PART II - HOMEOWNERS' DUTIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 60.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At the option of the residential homeowner, a prime contractor
shall deposit in a trust account, or other accounts authorized by rule,
maintained in a federally insured financial institution located in
Washington state all sums received from the residential homeowner for
services not yet provided or goods not yet received.
(2) The trust account shall be established and maintained for the
benefit of residential homeowners paying money to the prime contractor
for services not yet provided or goods not yet received. The prime
contractor shall not in any manner encumber the amounts in trust and
shall not withdraw money from the account, except the following amounts
may be withdrawn at any time:
(a) Partial or full payment to a potential lien claimant that has
provided goods or services to the homeowner;
(b) Refunds of amounts to the homeowner;
(c) Interest earned and credited to the trust account; or
(d) Remaining funds of a homeowner owed to the prime contractor,
provided all potential liens against the homeowner have been released.
(3) The prime contractor may deposit nonhomeowner funds into the
trust account, or other approved account, as needed in an amount equal
to a deficiency resulting from dishonored homeowner payments made by
check, draft, credit card, debit card, or other negotiable instrument.
(4) The prime contractor shall notify the department of any change
in the account number or location of the trust account, or other
approved account, within one business day of the change.
(5) The director, by rule, may allow for the use of other types of
funds or accounts only if the protection for consumers is no less than
that provided by this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 60.04.250 and 1990 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of labor and industries shall prepare a master
document((s)) that provides informational material about the basics of
a construction project, construction lien laws, and a list of available
safeguards against real property lien claims((. The material shall
include methods of protection against lien claims, including obtaining
lien release documents, performance bonds, joint payee checks, the
opportunity to require contractor disclosure of all potential lien
claimants as a condition of payment, and lender supervision under RCW
60.04.200 and 60.04.210. The material)), which the homeowner must
consider, reject, or select. Before any building permit may be issued
for the construction of a new owner-occupied single-family residence or
for the improvement to an owner-occupied single-family residence for an
amount in excess of one thousand dollars, if the construction will
involve the services of a prime contractor, the permit issuing agency
shall not issue any permit until the homeowner has personally, and not
through an agent, acknowledged receipt of the document. If the
homeowner completes the document by making selections, as indicated in
the document, and submits it to the agency, the permit issuing agency
shall maintain a copy of the completed document in the file of the
permit issuing agency relating to the homeowner's permit application.
The document shall be in substantially the following form and shall
also include ((sources of)) information describing the scope and limits
of state contractor bonding requirements, the provisions of this act,
and the availability of further information, including the department
of labor and industries and the office of the attorney general.

Dear Homeowner:
You must complete the items below and select from the options below
what protection, if any, you want against potential lien claims on your
property as a result of the construction work for which you are
contracting. If your contractor fails to pay subcontractors,
suppliers, or laborers or neglects to make other legally required
payments, those who are owed money can file a lien against your
property for payment, even if you have paid your contractor in full.
Anyone filing a valid lien claim may force the sale of your property to
recover the unpaid amount. This is true if you have hired a contractor
to build a new home or are buying a newly built home. It is also true
when you remodel or improve your property, although the amount of your
liability may be limited to the amount you owe the prime contractor at
the time a lien is filed.
Under Washington laws, those who work on your property or provide
materials and are not paid have a right to enforce their claim for
payment against your property. This claim is known as a construction
lien.
People who supply materials or labor ordered by your contractor are
permitted by law to file a lien only if they do so within ninety days
of cessation of performance or delivery of materials. The time frame
is spelled out in RCW 60.04.091.
If you enter into a contract to buy a newly built home, you may not
receive a notice of a lien based on a claim by a contractor or material
handler. Be aware that a lien may be claimed even though you have not
received a notice. Before making final payment on the project, obtain
a completed lien release form from each contractor and material
supplier. A sample of this release of lien form is available from the
department of labor and industries, contractor registration section.
You have final responsibility for seeing that all bills are paid
even if you have paid your contractor in full.
If you are dealing with a lending institution, ask your loan
officer what precautions the lending institution takes to verify that
subcontractors and material suppliers are being paid when mortgage
money is paid to your contractor. You may want to request lender
supervision if your lending institution is providing interim or
construction financing.
If you receive a notice to enforce a lien, take the notice
seriously. Let your contractor know you have received the notice.
Find out what arrangements are being made to pay the sender of the
notice.
When in doubt, or if you need more details, consult your attorney.
When and how to pay your contractor is a decision that requires serious
consideration. Washington law, RCW 18.27.114, requires contractors to
give you this disclosure statement if your contract exceeds one
thousand dollars.
Complete the following information, select below how you want to
protect yourself from possible lien claims on your property, and inform
your contractor of your selections or discuss your selections with your
contractor.
I, (owner's name) . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ,
am agreeing to have (contractor's name)
perform the following construction work (basic description)
at (location of your property using an address, legal description
or approximate address)
in the amount of $ . . . . . . . . including all federal, state,
and local taxes, and this amount may be adjusted only if authorized by
me in writing.
To protect myself against possible lien claims in the future for
this work, I (select one):
. . . . . . . . will only issue checks made payable jointly,
naming the contractor and the subcontractor or supplier as payees.
. . . . . . . . will only issue checks to the contractor and
subcontractors in the amounts equal to the amounts for which lien
releases that release all lien rights to those amounts, as provided by
RCW 60.04.071, have been provided to me by each lien claimant
requesting payment.
. . . . . . . . want the contractor to post a bond to assure both
performance of this construction work and payment to all subcontractors
and suppliers in the amount of (select one) . . . the total contract
amount . . . in the amount of $. . . . . . . . (Note: Your contractor
may add the cost of this bond to your contract price.)
. . . . . . . . will be using . . . . . . . . as an escrow agent
to disburse construction funds and to protect my interests. (NOTE:
Before making this selection, find out whether the escrow agent you
plan to use will protect you against liens when disbursing payments.
If you are interested in using this alternative, consult your
attorney.)
. . . . . . . . want this contractor to set up a trust account for
all funds I pay to this contractor, and the trust funds must be
disbursed in accordance with our construction agreement to
subcontractors and suppliers.
. . . . . . . . DO NOT want any of the above protections from
potential lien claims against my property as a result of this
construction work.
In addition to the above selection, I choose ONE of the following:
. . . WANT . . . DO NOT WANT the prime contractor to disclose all
potential lien claimants as a condition of payment. (NOTE: A lien
claimant must, under RCW 60.04.091(2), mail by certified or registered
mail or by personal service a copy of the claim of lien to the owner
within fourteen days of the time the lien is recorded. While an action
is ongoing, the law, RCW 60.04.151, allows an owner to withhold from
this prime contractor the amount of money for which a claim is recorded
by a subcontractor, supplier, or laborer.)
More information about contractors is available by visiting the
department of labor and industries on the Internet at
www.LNI.wa.gov/SCS/contractors/ or by calling the contractor
registration hotline at 1-800-647-0982. You may also call your local
department of labor and industries office. See listings under
"Washington state of" in the government section or the white pages of
the telephone book.
Signed by (property owner): . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Date signed: . . . . . . . .

PART III - PENALTIES
Sec. 6 RCW 18.27.020 and 1997 c 314 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every contractor shall register with the department.
(2) It is a gross misdemeanor for any contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked;
(c) Use a false or expired registration number in purchasing or
offering to purchase an advertisement for which a contractor
registration number is required; or
(d) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or
allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to
another contractor.
(3) It is not unlawful for a general contractor to employ an
unregistered contractor who was registered at the time he or she
entered into a contract with the general contractor, unless the general
contractor or his or her representative has been notified in writing by
the department of labor and industries that the contractor has become
unregistered.
(4) All ((misdemeanor)) actions under this chapter shall be
prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurs.
(5) A person is guilty of a separate gross misdemeanor for each day
worked if, after the person receives a citation from the department,
the person works while unregistered, or while his or her registration
is suspended or revoked, or works under a registration issued to
another contractor. A person is guilty of a separate misdemeanor for
each worksite on which he or she violates subsection (2) of this
section. Nothing in this subsection applies to a registered
contractor.
(6) The director by rule shall establish a two-year audit and
monitoring program for a contractor not registered under this chapter
who becomes registered after receiving an infraction or conviction
under this chapter as an unregistered contractor. The director shall
notify the departments of revenue and employment security of the
infractions or convictions and shall cooperate with these departments
to determine whether any taxes or registration, license, or other fees
or penalties are owed the state.

Sec. 7 RCW 60.04.035 and 1992 c 126 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that acts of coercion or attempted
coercion, including threats to withhold future contracts, made by a
contractor or developer to discourage a contractor, subcontractor, or
material or equipment supplier from giving an owner the notice of right
to claim a lien required by RCW 60.04.031, or from filing a claim of
lien under this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.
(2) The legislature further finds that acts of coercion or
attempted coercion by a lien claimant or potential lien claimant
against a residential homeowner, including but not limited to threats
to include or actually including interest, collection costs, or any
amount other than the actual price charged under the agreement between
the lien claimant and the homeowner for the goods and services
provided, are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.
(3) These acts of coercion are not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business. These acts of coercion shall
constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice in trade or commerce
for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86
RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 60.04.011 and 1992 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Construction agent" means any registered or licensed
contractor, registered or licensed subcontractor, architect, engineer,
or other person having charge of any improvement to real property, who
shall be deemed the agent of the owner for the limited purpose of
establishing the lien created by this chapter.
(2) "Contract price" means the amount agreed upon by the
contracting parties, or if no amount is agreed upon, then the customary
and reasonable charge therefor, but in no case shall "contract price"
include any amount payable under the contract, or otherwise, in the
event of nonpayment or late payment.
(3) "Draws" means periodic disbursements of interim or construction
financing by a lender.
(4) "Furnishing labor, professional services, materials, or
equipment" means the performance of any labor or professional services,
the contribution owed to any employee benefit plan on account of any
labor, the provision of any supplies or materials, and the renting,
leasing, or otherwise supplying of equipment for the improvement of
real property.
(5) "Improvement" means: (a) Constructing, altering, repairing,
remodeling, demolishing, clearing, grading, or filling in, of, to, or
upon any real property or street or road in front of or adjoining the
same; (b) planting of trees, vines, shrubs, plants, hedges, or lawns,
or providing other landscaping materials on any real property; and (c)
providing professional services upon real property or in preparation
for or in conjunction with the intended activities in (a) or (b) of
this subsection.
(6) "Interim or construction financing" means that portion of money
secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other encumbrance to finance
improvement of, or to real property, but does not include:
(a) Funds to acquire real property;
(b) Funds to pay interest, insurance premiums, lease deposits,
taxes, assessments, or prior encumbrances;
(c) Funds to pay loan, commitment, title, legal, closing,
recording, or appraisal fees;
(d) Funds to pay other customary fees, which pursuant to agreement
with the owner or borrower are to be paid by the lender from time to
time;
(e) Funds to acquire personal property for which the potential lien
claimant may not claim a lien pursuant to this chapter.
(7) "Labor" means exertion of the powers of body or mind performed
at the site for compensation. "Labor" includes amounts due and owed to
any employee benefit plan on account of such labor performed.
(8) "Mortgagee" means a person who has a valid mortgage of record
or deed of trust of record securing a loan.
(9) "Owner-occupied" means a single-family residence occupied by
the owner as his or her principal residence.
(10) "Payment bond" means a surety bond issued by a surety licensed
to issue surety bonds in the state of Washington that confers upon
potential claimants the rights of third party beneficiaries.
(11) "Potential lien claimant" means any person or entity entitled
to assert lien rights under this chapter who has otherwise complied
with the provisions of this chapter and is registered or licensed if
required to be licensed or registered by the provisions of the laws of
the state of Washington.
(12) "Prime contractor" includes all contractors, general
contractors, and specialty contractors, as defined by chapter 18.27 or
19.28 RCW, or who are otherwise required to be registered or licensed
by law, who contract directly with a property owner or their common law
agent to assume primary responsibility for the creation of an
improvement to real property, and includes property owners or their
common law agents who are contractors, general contractors, or
specialty contractors as defined in chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW, or who
are otherwise required to be registered or licensed by law, who offer
to sell their property without occupying or using the structures,
projects, developments, or improvements for more than one year.
(13) "Professional services" means surveying, establishing or
marking the boundaries of, preparing maps, plans, or specifications
for, or inspecting, testing, or otherwise performing any other
architectural or engineering services for the improvement of real
property.
(14) "Real property lender" means a bank, savings bank, savings and
loan association, credit union, mortgage company, or other corporation,
association, partnership, trust, or individual that makes loans secured
by real property located in the state of Washington.
(15) "Residential homeowner" or "homeowner" means the owner or
potential owner who occupies or will occupy a single-family residence
at the completion of the new construction, repair, alteration, or
remodel of the single-family residence or garage appurtenant to the
residence.
(16) "Site" means the real property which is or is to be improved.
(((16))) (17) "Subcontractor" means a general contractor or
specialty contractor as defined by chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW, or who
is otherwise required to be registered or licensed by law, who
contracts for the improvement of real property with someone other than
the owner of the property or their common law agent.

Sec. 9 RCW 60.04.031 and 1992 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every person
furnishing professional services, materials, or equipment for the
improvement of real property shall give the owner or reputed owner
notice in writing of the right to claim a lien. If the prime
contractor is in compliance with the requirements of RCW 19.27.095,
60.04.230, and 60.04.261, this notice shall also be given to the prime
contractor as described in this subsection unless the potential lien
claimant has contracted directly with the prime contractor. The notice
may be given at any time but only protects the right to claim a lien
for professional services, materials, or equipment supplied after the
date which is sixty days before:
(a) Mailing the notice by certified or registered mail to the owner
or reputed owner; or
(b) Delivering or serving the notice personally upon the owner or
reputed owner and obtaining evidence of delivery in the form of a
receipt or other acknowledgement signed by the owner or reputed owner
or an affidavit of service.
In the case of new construction, repair, alteration, or remodel of
a single-family residence or garage appurtenant to a single-family
residence, the notice of a right to claim a lien may be given at any
time but only protects the right to claim a lien for professional
services, materials, or equipment supplied after a date which is ten
days before the notice is given as described in this subsection.
(2) Notices of a right to claim a lien shall not be required of:
(a) Persons who contract directly with the owner or the owner's
common law agent;
(b) Laborers whose claim of lien is based solely on performing
labor; or
(c) Subcontractors who contract for the improvement of real
property directly with the prime contractor, except as provided in
subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(3) Persons who furnish professional services, materials, or
equipment in connection with the new construction, repair, alteration,
or remodel of ((an existing owner-occupied)) a single-family residence
or appurtenant garage:
(a) Who contract directly with the ((owner-occupier or their))
owner or the owner's common law agent shall not be required to send a
written notice of the right to claim a lien and shall have a lien for
the full amount due under their contract, as provided in RCW 60.04.021;
or
(b) Who do not contract directly with the ((owner-occupier or
their)) owner or the owner's common law agent shall give notice of the
right to claim a lien to the ((owner-occupier)) owner. ((Liens of))
Persons furnishing professional services, materials, or equipment who
do not contract directly with the ((owner-occupier or their)) owner or
the owner's common law agent have a lien for such amounts as provided
in RCW 60.04.021, which may only be satisfied from amounts not yet paid
to the prime contractor by the owner at the time the notice described
in this section is received, regardless of whether amounts not yet paid
to the prime contractor are due. For the purposes of this subsection
"received" means actual receipt of notice by personal service, or
registered or certified mail, or three days after mailing by registered
or certified mail, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays.
(4) The notice of right to claim a lien described in subsection (1)
of this section, shall include but not be limited to the following
information and shall substantially be in the following form, using
lower-case and upper-case ten-point type where appropriate.

NOTICE TO OWNER

IMPORTANT: READ BOTH SIDES OF THIS NOTICE CAREFULLY.

PROTECT YOURSELF FROM PAYING TWICE

Re: (description of property: Street address or general location.)

From: . . . . . . . . . . . .

AT THE REQUEST OF: (Name of person ordering the professional
services, materials, or equipment)

THIS IS NOT A LIEN--THIS NOTICE IS MEANT TO PROVIDE YOU WITH
INFORMATION NECESSARY TO PROPERLY MANAGE YOUR CONSTRUCTION PROJECT:
This notice is sent to you to tell you who is providing professional
services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of your property
and to advise you of the rights of these persons and your
responsibilities. Also take note that laborers on your project may
claim a lien without sending you a notice.

OWNER/OCCUPIER OF EXISTING RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY AND/OR

NEW RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY

Under Washington law, those who furnish labor, professional services,
materials, or equipment for the repair, remodel, or alteration of your
owner-occupied principal residence and who are not paid, have a right
to enforce their claim for payment against your property. This claim
is known as a construction lien.

The law limits the amount that a lien claimant can claim against your
property. If the improvement to your property is new construction,
repair, alteration, or remodel of a single-family residence or its
appurtenant garage, a lien may be claimed for some or all professional
services, materials, or equipment furnished after a date that is ten
days before this notice was given to you or mailed to you. Claims may
only be made against that portion of the contract price you have not
yet paid to your prime contractor as of the time this notice was given
to you or three days after this notice was mailed to you. Review the
back of this notice for more information and ways to avoid lien claims.

COMMERCIAL ((AND/OR NEW RESIDENTIAL)) PROPERTY

We have or will be providing professional services, materials, or
equipment for the improvement of your commercial ((or new residential))
project. In the event you or your contractor fail to pay us, we may
file a lien against your property. A lien may be claimed for all
professional services, materials, or equipment furnished after a date
that is sixty days before this notice was given to you or mailed to
you((, unless the improvement to your property is the construction of
a new single-family residence, then ten days before this notice was
given to you or mailed to you)).

Sender: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Brief description of professional services, materials, or equipment
provided or to be provided: . . . . . . . . . . . .

IMPORTANT INFORMATION ON REVERSE SIDE

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOUR PROTECTION

This notice is sent to inform you that we have or will provide
professional services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of
your property. We expect to be paid by the person who ordered our
services, but if we are not paid, we have the right to enforce our
claim by filing a construction lien against your property.

LEARN more about the lien laws and the meaning of this notice by
discussing them with your contractor, suppliers, Department of Labor
and Industries, the firm sending you this notice, your lender, or your
attorney.

COMMON METHODS TO AVOID CONSTRUCTION LIENS: There are several methods
available to protect your property from construction liens. The
following are two of the more commonly used methods.

DUAL PAYCHECKS (Joint Checks): When paying your contractor for
services or materials, you may make checks payable jointly to
the contractor and the firms furnishing you this notice.

LIEN RELEASES: You may require your contractor to provide lien
releases signed by all the suppliers and subcontractors from
whom you have received this notice. If they cannot obtain lien
releases because you have not paid them, you may use the dual
payee check method to protect yourself.

YOU SHOULD TAKE APPROPRIATE STEPS TO PROTECT YOUR PROPERTY FROM LIENS.

YOUR PRIME CONTRACTOR AND YOUR CONSTRUCTION LENDER ARE REQUIRED BY LAW
TO GIVE YOU WRITTEN INFORMATION ABOUT LIEN CLAIMS. IF YOU HAVE NOT
RECEIVED IT, ASK THEM FOR IT.

* * * * * * * * * * * * *

(5) Every potential lien claimant providing professional services
where no improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) has been
commenced, and the professional services provided are not visible from
an inspection of the real property may record in the real property
records of the county where the property is located a notice which
shall contain the professional service provider's name, address,
telephone number, legal description of the property, the owner or
reputed owner's name, and the general nature of the professional
services provided. If such notice is not recorded, the lien claimed
shall be subordinate to the interest of any subsequent mortgagee and
invalid as to the interest of any subsequent purchaser if the mortgagee
or purchaser acts in good faith and for a valuable consideration
acquires an interest in the property prior to the commencement of an
improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) without notice of
the professional services being provided. The notice described in this
subsection shall be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE OF FURNISHING PROFESSIONAL SERVICES

That on the (day) day of (month and year) , (name of
provider) began providing professional services upon or for the
improvement of real property legally described as follows:

[Legal Description is mandatory]

The general nature of the professional services provided is . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

The owner or reputed owner of the real property is . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .

(6) A lien authorized by this chapter shall not be enforced unless
the lien claimant has complied with the applicable provisions of this
section.

--- END ---