BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.020 and 2002 c 56 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional transportation
investment district.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(3) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the transportation commission, its successor
entity, or the legislature.
(4) "Lead agency" means a public agency that by law can plan,
design, and build a transportation project and has been so designated
by the district.
(5) "Regional transportation investment district" or "district"
means a municipal corporation whose boundaries are coextensive with two
or more contiguous counties and that has been created by county
legislative authorities and a vote of the people under this chapter to
implement a regional transportation investment plan.
(6) "Regional transportation investment district planning
committee" or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created
under RCW 36.120.030 to create and propose to county legislative
authorities a regional transportation investment plan to develop,
finance, and construct transportation projects.
(7) "Regional transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a
plan to develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or
projects.
(8) "Transportation project" means:
(a) A capital improvement or improvements relating to, or in
support of, all or a portion of a highway that has been designated, in
whole or in part, as a highway of statewide significance, ((including
an extension, that:
(i) Adds a lane or new lanes to an existing state or federal
highway; or
(ii) Repairs or replaces a lane or lanes damaged by an event
declared an emergency by the governor before January 1, 2002.
(b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
highway of statewide significance, including an extension,)) and may
include the following associated ((multimodal)) capital improvements:
(i) Approaches to highways of statewide significance;
(ii) High-occupancy vehicle lanes;
(iii) Flyover ramps;
(iv) Park and ride lots;
(v) Bus pullouts;
(vi) Vans for vanpools;
(vii) Buses; and
(viii) Signalization, ramp metering, and other transportation
system management improvements.
(((c))) (b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a
portion of a city street, county road, or existing highway or the
creation of a new highway that intersects with a highway of statewide
significance, ((if all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The project is included in a plan that makes highway
improvement projects that add capacity to a highway or highways of
statewide significance;
(ii) The secretary of transportation determines that the project
would better relieve traffic congestion than investing that same money
in adding capacity to a highway of statewide significance;
(iii) Matching money equal to one-third of the total cost of the
project is provided by local entities, including but not limited to a
metropolitan planning organization, county, city, port, or private
entity in which a county participating in a plan is located. Local
entities may use federal grants to meet this matching requirement;
(iv) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed ten percent of the revenues generated by the
district;
(v) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed one billion dollars; and
(vi) The specific projects are included within the plan and
submitted as part of the plan to a vote of the people.
(d) Operations, preservation, and maintenance are excluded from
this definition and may not be included in a regional transportation
investment plan)) but only if the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(b) does not exceed twenty percent of the revenues
generated by the district, or forty percent of the revenues generated
by the district for projects in a rural county. For purposes of this
subsection (8)(b), "rural county" means a county smaller than two
hundred twenty-five square miles or as defined in RCW 43.168.020.
(c) Operations, preservation, and maintenance are excluded from the
definition of transportation project under this subsection, except for
operation, preservation, and maintenance costs of tolled facilities,
including the costs of collecting the tolls, if toll revenues have been
pledged for the payment of contracts.
(9) "Weighted vote" means a vote that reflects the population each
board or planning committee member represents relative to the
population represented by the total membership of the board or planning
committee. Population will be determined using the federal 2000 census
or subsequent federal census data.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.120.070 and 2002 c 56 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Two or more contiguous county legislative authorities, upon
receipt of the regional transportation investment plan under RCW
36.120.040, may certify the plan to the ballot, including
identification of the tax options necessary to fund the plan. County
legislative authorities may draft a ballot title, give notice as
required by law for ballot measures, and perform other duties as
required to put the plan before the voters of the proposed district for
their approval or rejection as a single ballot measure that both
approves formation of the district and approves the plan. Counties may
negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan. The
electorate will be the voters voting within the boundaries of the
participating counties. A simple majority of the total persons voting
on the single ballot measure to approve the plan, establish the
district, and approve the taxes and fees is required for approval.
(2) Voter approval under this section must be accorded substantial
weight regarding the validity of a transportation project as defined in
RCW 36.120.020.

--- END ---