BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of transportation shall appoint an enhancement
advisory committee representing interest groups and local governments.
The enhancement advisory committee is limited to eleven members
representing the following areas: One member from the department of
transportation highways and local programs division, two members
representing counties and two members representing the cities of
Washington, a member representing pedestrian groups, a member
representing trails and equestrian groups, a member representing
historic and scenic highway groups, a member representing bicyclists,
a member representing Indian nations, and a member representing the
heritage community. The city and county representatives should be
selected with consideration given to achieving a geographic balance of
eastern and western Washington and large and small jurisdictions. The
selection of city and county representatives should be drawn from
metropolitan planning organization and regional transportation planning
organization governing boards whenever possible. The state historic
preservation officer shall represent the heritage community. The
department of transportation's highway and local programs member shall
serve as the committee chair.
(2) The enhancement advisory committee shall make the final
selection of projects receiving federal appropriations funded from the
Surface Transportation Program enhancement funds or similar program
anticipated to be authorized in the extension or reauthorization of the
Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century (TEA-21).
(3) The enhancement committee shall make final selection of
projects using metropolitan planning organization or regional
transportation planning organization priorities, consideration of the
diversity of interest groups represented in subsection (1) of this
section, and an equitable statewide distribution of funding that is
based on population.
(4) The department of transportation's highway and local programs
staff shall provide all staff services to the enhancement committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---