BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.100 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 37 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue, by general regulation, shall provide
that a taxpayer whose regular books of account are kept on a cash
receipts basis may file returns based upon his cash receipts for each
reporting period and pay the tax herein provided upon such basis in
lieu of reporting and paying the tax on all sales made during such
period.
(2) Upon a showing of substantial hardship by the taxpayer, the
department shall allow a taxpayer whose regular books of account are
kept on an accrual basis to file returns based upon his cash receipts
for each reporting period and pay the tax herein provided upon such
basis in lieu of reporting and paying the tax on all sales made during
such period. "Substantial hardship" means that on the due date of a
return the taxpayer's retail sales tax billed but not collected for the
tax-reporting period is more than seventy-five percent of the total tax
due on the return for the same tax-reporting period. Once a taxpayer
whose regular books of account are kept on an accrual basis elects to
report on a cash basis because of a substantial hardship, the taxpayer
must continue to report on a cash basis for at least twelve months.
(3) A taxpayer filing returns on a cash receipts basis is not
required to pay such tax on debts which are deductible as worthless for
federal income tax purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.070 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 38 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue, by general regulation, shall provide
that a taxpayer whose regular books of account are kept on a cash
receipts basis may file returns based upon his cash receipts for each
reporting period and pay the tax herein provided upon such basis in
lieu of reporting and paying the tax on all sales made during such
period.
(2) Upon a showing of substantial hardship by the taxpayer, the
department shall allow a taxpayer whose regular books of account are
kept on an accrual basis to file returns based upon his cash receipts
for each reporting period and pay the tax herein provided upon such
basis in lieu of reporting and paying the tax on all sales made during
such period. "Substantial hardship" means that on the due date of a
return the taxpayer's retail sales tax billed but not collected for the
tax-reporting period is more than seventy-five percent of the total tax
due on the return for the same tax-reporting period. Once a taxpayer
whose regular books of account are kept on an accrual basis elects to
report on a cash basis because of a substantial hardship the taxpayer
must continue to report on a cash basis for at least twelve months.
(3) A taxpayer filing returns on a cash receipts basis is not
required to pay such tax on debts which are deductible as worthless for
federal income tax purposes.

--- END ---