BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.20.420 and 1985 c 264 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any disability insurance contract providing health care services,
delivered or issued for delivery in this state more than one hundred
twenty days after August 11, 1969, ((which)) that provides that
coverage of a dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the
limiting age for dependent children ((specified in the contract,))
shall also provide in substance that attainment of such limiting age
shall not operate to terminate the coverage of such child while the
child is and continues to be both (1) incapable of self-sustaining
employment by reason of developmental disability or physical handicap
and (2) chiefly dependent upon the subscriber for support and
maintenance, provided proof of such incapacity and dependency is
furnished to the insurer by the subscriber within thirty-one days of
the child's attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as may be
required by the insurer but not more frequently than annually after the
two year period following the child's attainment of the limiting age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Any disability insurance contract that provides coverage for a
dependent child must cover any unmarried child of the subscriber or the
subscriber's spouse if the child is:
(1) Under the limiting age of twenty-five; and
(2) Not an active duty member of the armed forces of the United
States.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.21.150 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any group disability insurance contract or blanket disability
insurance contract, providing health care services, delivered or issued
for delivery in this state more than one hundred twenty days after
August 11, 1969, ((which)) that provides that coverage of a dependent
child of an employee or other member of the covered group shall
terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children
((specified in the contract)) shall also provide in substance that
attainment of such limiting age shall not operate to terminate the
coverage of such child while the child is and continues to be both (1)
incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of developmental
disability or physical handicap and (2) chiefly dependent upon the
employee or member for support and maintenance, provided proof of such
incapacity and dependency is furnished to the insurer by the employee
or member within thirty-one days of the child's attainment of the
limiting age and subsequently as may be required by the insurer, but
not more frequently than annually after the two year period following
the child's attainment of the limiting age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any group disability insurance contract or blanket disability
insurance contract that provides coverage for a dependent child must
cover any unmarried child of the subscriber or the subscriber's spouse
if the child is:
(1) Under the limiting age of twenty-five; and
(2) Not an active duty member of the armed forces of the United
States.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.44.200 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
An individual health care service plan contract, delivered or
issued for delivery in this state more than one hundred twenty days
after August 11, 1969, ((which)) that provides that coverage of a
dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for
dependent children ((specified in the contract)) shall also provide in
substance that attainment of such limiting age shall not operate to
terminate the coverage of such child while the child is and continues
to be both (1) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of
developmental disability or physical handicap and (2) chiefly dependent
upon the subscriber for support and maintenance, provided proof of such
incapacity and dependency is furnished to the health care service plan
corporation by the subscriber within thirty-one days of the child's
attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as may be required by
the corporation but not more frequently than annually after the two
year period following the child's attainment of the limiting age.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.44.210 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
A group health care service plan contract, delivered or issued for
delivery in this state more than one hundred twenty days after August
11, 1969, ((which)) that provides that coverage of a dependent child of
an employee or other member of the covered group shall terminate upon
attainment of the limiting age for dependent children ((specified in
the contract)) shall also provide in substance that attainment of such
limiting age shall not operate to terminate the coverage of such child
while the child is and continues to be both (1) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of developmental disability or physical
handicap and (2) chiefly dependent upon the employee or member for
support and maintenance, provided proof of such incapacity and
dependency is furnished to the health care service plan corporation by
the employee or member within thirty-one days of the child's attainment
of the limiting age and subsequently as may be required by the
corporation, but not more frequently than annually after the two year
period following the child's attainment of the limiting age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Any individual health care service plan contract or group health
care service plan contract that provides coverage for a dependent child
must cover any unmarried child of the subscriber or the subscriber's
spouse if the child is:
(1) Under the limiting age of twenty-five; and
(2) Not an active duty member of the armed forces of the United
States.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.46.320 and 1985 c 320 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any health maintenance agreement ((which)) that provides that
coverage of a dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the
limiting age for dependent children ((specified in the agreement))
shall also provide in substance that attainment of such limiting age
shall not operate to terminate the coverage of such child while the
child is and continues to be both: (1) Incapable of self-sustaining
employment by reason of developmental disability or physical handicap;
and (2) chiefly dependent upon the subscriber for support and
maintenance, if proof of such incapacity and dependency is furnished to
the health maintenance organization by the enrolled participant within
thirty-one days of the child's attainment of the limiting age and
subsequently as required by the health maintenance organization but not
more frequently than annually after the two-year period following the
child's attainment of the limiting age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Any health maintenance agreement that provides coverage for a
dependent child must cover any unmarried child of the subscriber or the
subscriber's spouse if the child is:
(1) Under the limiting age of twenty-five; and
(2) Not an active duty member of the armed forces of the United
States.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.05.011 and 2001 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees
of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and
appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including
full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; and includes
any or all part-time and temporary employees under the terms and
conditions established under this chapter by the authority; justices of
the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior
courts; and members of the state legislature or of the legislative
authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if
the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of
the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with
the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option
of each such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995,
employees of employee organizations currently pooled with employees of
school districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at
the option of each such employee organization; and (c) employees of a
school district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350.
(7) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(8) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(9) "Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only contribution
plan, a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan
whereby state and public employees may agree to a contribution to
benefit costs which will allow the employee to participate in benefits
offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(10) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(11) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.
(12) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(13) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(14) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
and reserve officers and fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.24.010 who
die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment as
determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and
industries.
(15) "Dependent child" means any child of an employee or employee's
spouse who is:
(a)(i) Unmarried;
(ii) Under the age of twenty-five; and
(iii) Not an active duty member of the armed forces of the United
States; or
(b) One of the following:
(i) Eligible under the criteria established by the public
employees' benefits board for a child who is age twenty-five and older
but is incapable of self-support due to developmental or physical
disability;
(ii) If the child is married, qualified as a dependent of the
employee under the internal revenue code;
(iii) Approved by the health care authority as an extended
dependent; or
(iv) Eligible under the criteria established by the public
employees' benefits board for any other child.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.05.050 and 2003 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every department, division, or separate agency of state
government, and such county, municipal, school district, educational
service district, or other political subdivisions as are covered by
this chapter, shall provide contributions to insurance and health care
plans for its employees and their dependents, including dependent
children the content of such plans to be determined by the authority.
Contributions, paid by the county, the municipality, or other political
subdivision for their employees, shall include an amount determined by
the authority to pay such administrative expenses of the authority as
are necessary to administer the plans for employees of those groups,
except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(2) If the authority at any time determines that the participation
of a county, municipal, or other political subdivision covered under
this chapter adversely impacts insurance rates for state employees, the
authority shall implement limitations on the participation of
additional county, municipal, or other political subdivisions.
(3) The contributions of any department, division, or separate
agency of the state government, and such county, municipal, or other
political subdivisions as are covered by this chapter, shall be set by
the authority, subject to the approval of the governor for availability
of funds as specifically appropriated by the legislature for that
purpose. Insurance and health care contributions for ferry employees
shall be governed by RCW 47.64.270.
(4)(a) Beginning September 1, 2003, the authority shall collect
from each participating school district and educational service
district an amount equal to the composite rate charged to state
agencies, plus an amount equal to the employee premiums by plan and
family size as would be charged to state employees, for groups of
district employees enrolled in authority plans as of January 1, 2003.
(b) For all groups of district employees enrolling in authority
plans for the first time after September 1, 2003, the authority shall
collect from each participating school district an amount equal to the
composite rate charged to state agencies, plus an amount equal to the
employee premiums by plan and by family size as would be charged to
state employees, only if the authority determines that this method of
billing the districts will not result in a material difference between
revenues from districts and expenditures made by the authority on
behalf of districts and their employees.
(c) If the authority determines at any time that the conditions in
(b) of this subsection cannot be met, the authority shall offer
enrollment to additional groups of district employees on a tiered rate
structure until such time as the authority determines there would be no
material difference between revenues and expenditures under a composite
rate structure for all district employees enrolled in authority plans.
(d) The authority may charge districts a one-time set-up fee for
employee groups enrolling in authority plans for the first time.
(e) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "District" means school district and educational service
district; and
(ii) "Tiered rates" means the amounts the authority must pay to
insuring entities by plan and by family size.
(f) Notwithstanding this subsection and RCW 41.05.065(3), the
authority may allow districts enrolled on a tiered rate structure prior
to September 1, 2002, to continue participation based on the same rate
structure and under the same conditions and eligibility criteria.
(5) The authority shall transmit a recommendation for the amount of
the employer contribution to the governor and the director of financial
management for inclusion in the proposed budgets submitted to the
legislature.

--- END ---