BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.070 and 2002 c 56 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
Two or more contiguous county legislative authorities, upon receipt
of the regional transportation investment plan under RCW 36.120.040,
may ((certify the plan to the ballot, including identification of the
tax options)) submit to the voters of the proposed district a single
ballot measure that approves formation of the district, approves the
regional transportation investment plan, and approves the revenue
sources necessary to ((fund)) finance the plan. ((County legislative
authorities)) The planning committee may draft ((a ballot title,)) the
ballot measure on behalf of the county legislative authorities, and the
county legislative authorities may give notice as required by law for
ballot measures, and perform other duties as required to ((put the plan
before)) submit the measure to the voters of the proposed district for
their approval or rejection ((as a single ballot measure that both
approves formation of the district and approves the plan)). Counties
may negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan.
The electorate will be the voters voting within the boundaries of the
participating counties. A simple majority of the total persons voting
on the single ballot measure ((to approve the plan, establish the
district, and approve the taxes and fees)) is required for approval of
the measure.

--- END ---