BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The existing distribution of Transportation
Equity Act for the 21st century (TEA-21) flexible funds has allowed the
state and its local governments to strengthen Washington's economy by
making important investments in our transportation systems. The same
distribution method will be used to allocate flexible funds provided
under the Safe, Accountable, Flexible, and Efficient Transportation
Equity Act of 2003 (SAFETEA), or authorized under any federal surface
transportation act that extends or succeeds the Transportation Equity
Act for the 21st century (TEA-21); except that state transportation
grants will initiate economic vitality through a newly created freight
investment program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The highways and local programs division of the department shall
administer surface transportation program flexible funds or similar
program funds anticipated to be authorized in the extension or
reauthorization of the Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century
(TEA-21). The department shall distribute the funds as follows:
(1) Nineteen percent of the flexible funding identified in this
section must be appropriated to the freight investment account and
allocated for projects in the freight investment program created in
Senate Bill No. 6680. If Senate Bill No. 6680 has not become law by
July 1, 2004, then nineteen percent of the flexible funding identified
in this section must be directed into a state freight investment
program administered by the department. The transportation improvement
board will prioritize and select projects for the state freight
investment program using the following criteria not necessarily ranked
in order of importance:
(a) A freight benefit, including corridor completion and reduction
in roadway conflicts between freight and the general public. First and
greatest consideration must be given to projects previously identified
by the freight mobility strategic investment board. Projects so
identified by the freight mobility strategic investment board must
receive no less than two-thirds of the total points or weight that may
be assigned under this criteria;
(b) The creation of economic opportunities, including improved
access to freight generators and development or expansion of freight
facilities;
(c) The potential for project delivery, including full funding at
time of the grant award and the leveraging of additional local, state,
or federal funds;
(d) The potential to attract federal funding, including projects on
corridors of national significance, highway connection projects between
the national highway system and intermodal freight facilities, grade
separation projects, projects that support intermodal rail capacity,
and projects that sustain multiple gateways for national emergencies.
(2) Thirty-eight percent of the flexible funding identified in this
section must be allocated to the department for projects in the
improvement, maintenance, and preservation programs.
(3) Nineteen percent of the flexible funding identified in this
section must be allocated to metropolitan planning organizations,
regional transportation planning organizations, and county lead
agencies using the same population formula implemented under TEA-21.
(4) Twenty-four percent of the flexible funding identified in this
section must be allocated to a statewide competitive program to be
administered by the department. The transportation improvement board
shall select projects under the same criteria and methods used to
manage the statewide competitive program distribution of flexible
funding under TEA-21.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---