BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that certain
provisions of the commute trip reduction program are outdated,
particularly for new counties entering the program.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.94.524 and 1991 c 202 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "A major employer" means a private or public employer that
employs one hundred or more full-time employees at a single worksite
who begin their regular work day between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on
weekdays for at least twelve continuous months during the year.
(2) "Major worksite" means a building or group of buildings that
are on physically contiguous parcels of land or on parcels separated
solely by private or public roadways or rights of way, and at which
there are one hundred or more full-time employees of one or more
employers, who begin their regular work day between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00
a.m. on weekdays, for at least twelve continuous months.
(3) "Commute trip reduction zones" mean areas, such as census
tracts or combinations of census tracts, within a jurisdiction that are
characterized by similar employment density, population density, level
of transit service, parking availability, access to high occupancy
vehicle facilities, and other factors that are determined to affect the
level of single occupancy vehicle commuting.
(4) "Commute trip" means trips made from a worker's home to a
worksite during the peak period of 6:00 a.m. to 9:00 a.m. on weekdays.
(5) "Proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips" means the
number of commute trips made by single-occupant automobiles divided by
the number of full-time employees.
(6) "Commute trip vehicle miles traveled per employee" means the
sum of the individual vehicle commute trip lengths in miles over a set
period divided by the number of full-time employees during that period.
(7) "Base year" means the year January 1, 1992, through December
31, 1992, on which goals for vehicle miles traveled and single-occupant
vehicle trips shall be based. Base year goals may be determined using
the 1990 journey-to-work census data projected to the year 1992 and
shall be consistent with the growth management act. After 2002, "base
year" means the calendar year in which each county, and city and town
within those counties, adopts by ordinance a commute trip reduction
plan. The task force shall establish a method to be used by
jurisdictions to determine reductions of vehicle miles traveled.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.94.527 and 1997 c 250 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county with a population over one hundred fifty thousand,
and each city or town within those counties containing a major employer
shall, ((by October 1, 1992)) within eighteen months of the county
reaching that population level, adopt by ordinance and implement a
commute trip reduction plan for all major employers. The plan shall be
developed in cooperation with local transit agencies, regional
transportation planning organizations as established in RCW 47.80.020,
major employers, and the owners of and employers at major worksites.
The plan shall be designed to achieve reductions in the proportion of
single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle
miles traveled per employee by employees of major public and private
sector employers in the jurisdiction.
(2) All other counties, and cities and towns in those counties, may
adopt and implement a commute trip reduction plan.
(3) The department of ecology may, after consultation with the
department of transportation, as part of the state implementation plan
for areas that do not attain the national ambient air quality standards
for carbon monoxide or ozone, require municipalities other than those
identified in subsection (1) of this section to adopt and implement
commute trip reduction plans if the department determines that such
plans are necessary for attainment of said standards.
(4) A commute trip reduction plan shall be consistent with the
guidelines established under RCW 70.94.537 and shall include but is not
limited to (a) goals for reductions in the proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle miles
traveled per employee; (b) designation of commute trip reduction zones;
(c) requirements for major public and private sector employers to
implement commute trip reduction programs; (d) a commute trip reduction
program for employees of the county, city, or town; (e) a review of
local parking policies and ordinances as they relate to employers and
major worksites and any revisions necessary to comply with commute trip
reduction goals and guidelines; (f) an appeals process by which major
employers, who as a result of special characteristics of their business
or its locations would be unable to meet the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan, may obtain waiver or modification of those
requirements; and (g) means for determining base year values of the
proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute
trip vehicle miles traveled per employee and progress toward meeting
commute trip reduction plan goals on an annual basis. Goals which are
established shall take into account existing transportation demand
management efforts which are made by major employers. Each
jurisdiction shall ensure that employers shall receive full credit for
the results of transportation demand management efforts and commute
trip reduction programs which have been implemented by major employers
prior to the base year. (i) The goals for miles traveled per employee
for all major employers shall not be less than a fifteen percent
reduction from the worksite base year value or the base year value for
the commute trip reduction zone in which their worksite is located by
January 1, 1995, twenty percent reduction from the base year values by
January 1, 1997, twenty-five percent reduction from the base year
values by January 1, 1999, and a thirty-five percent reduction from the
base year values by January 1, 2005. (ii) For each county, and each
city and town within those counties, required to adopt by ordinance and
implement a commute trip reduction plan after 2002, the goals for miles
traveled per employee for all major employers must be compared to the
worksite base year value or the base year value for the commute trip
reduction zone in which their worksite is located. After the adoption
of the commute trip reduction plan by a jurisdiction, goals for miles
traveled per employee for all major employers must be: (a) Not less
than a fifteen percent reduction within two years; (b) not less than a
twenty percent reduction within four years; (c) not less than a twenty-five percent reduction within six years; and (d) not less than a
thirty-five percent reduction within twelve years.
(5) A county, city, or town may, as part of its commute trip
reduction plan, require commute trip reduction programs for employers
with ten or more full time employees at major worksites in federally
designated nonattainment areas for carbon monoxide and ozone. The
county, city or town shall develop the programs in cooperation with
affected employers and provide technical assistance to the employers in
implementing such programs.
(6) The commute trip reduction plans adopted by counties, cities,
and towns under this chapter shall be consistent with and may be
incorporated in applicable state or regional transportation plans and
local comprehensive plans and shall be coordinated, and consistent
with, the commute trip reduction plans of counties, cities, or towns
with which the county, city, or town has, in part, common borders or
related regional issues. Such regional issues shall include assuring
consistency in the treatment of employers who have worksites subject to
the requirements of this chapter in more than one jurisdiction.
Counties, cities, or towns adopting commute trip reduction plans may
enter into agreements through the interlocal cooperation act or by
resolution or ordinance as appropriate with other jurisdictions, local
transit agencies, or regional transportation planning organizations to
coordinate the development and implementation of such plans. Transit
agencies shall work with counties, cities, and towns to take into
account the location of major employer worksites when planning transit
service changes or the expansion of public transportation services.
Counties, cities, or towns adopting a commute trip reduction plan shall
review it annually and revise it as necessary to be consistent with
applicable plans developed under RCW 36.70A.070.
(7) Each county, city, or town implementing a commute trip
reduction program shall, within thirty days submit a summary of its
plan along with certification of adoption to the commute trip reduction
task force established under RCW 70.94.537.
(8) Each county, city, or town implementing a commute trip
reduction program shall submit an annual progress report to the commute
trip reduction task force established under RCW 70.94.537. The report
shall be due July 1, 1994, and each July 1st thereafter through July 1,
2006. The report shall describe progress in attaining the applicable
commute trip reduction goals for each commute trip reduction zone and
shall highlight any problems being encountered in achieving the goals.
The information shall be reported in a form established by the commute
trip reduction task force.
(9) Any waivers or modifications of the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan granted by a jurisdiction shall be submitted for
review to the commute trip reduction task force established under RCW
70.94.537. The commute trip reduction task force may not deny the
granting of a waiver or modification of the requirements of a commute
trip reduction plan by a jurisdiction but they may notify the
jurisdiction of any comments or objections.
(10) Each county, city, or town implementing a commute trip
reduction program shall count commute trips eliminated through work-at-home options or alternate work schedules as one and two-tenths vehicle
trips eliminated for the purpose of meeting trip reduction goals.
(11) Each county, city, or town implementing a commute trip
reduction program shall ensure that employers that have modified their
employees' work schedules so that some or all employees are not
scheduled to arrive at work between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. are
provided credit when calculating single-occupancy vehicle use and
vehicle miles traveled at that worksite. This credit shall be awarded
if implementation of the schedule change was an identified element in
that worksite's approved commute trip reduction program or if the
schedule change occurred because of impacts associated with chapter
36.70A RCW, the growth management act.
(12) Plans implemented under this section shall not apply to
commute trips for seasonal agricultural employees.
(13) Plans implemented under this section shall not apply to
construction worksites when the expected duration of the construction
project is less than two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislative transportation committee
shall, by December 1, 2004, complete a study of commute trip reduction
issues, including but not limited to, types of employers that must
comply, location of employers, and congestion levels.

--- END ---