BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the
unavailability or unaffordability of malpractice insurance has caused
hardship to health care providers. The legislature further finds that
this hardship has the potential to result in impaired access to
critical health care services, especially in high risk areas of
practice, for Washington state citizens. The legislature further finds
that factors contributing to increasing malpractice insurance rates and
restrictions in coverage are numerous and complex. No single solution
can address these multiple factors, but changes in the civil liability
system can significantly address some of these factors. The
legislature intends to improve the performance of the civil liability
system with respect to the process by which actions alleging negligence
by a health care provider are processed and resolved. These changes
are designed to ensure that the legal system functions as fairly as
possible and that it appropriately addresses concerns that a bad
outcome is too often considered the equivalent of malpractice.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.22.070 and 1993 c 496 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all actions involving fault of more than one entity, the
trier of fact shall determine the percentage of the total fault which
is attributable to every entity which caused the claimant's damages
except entities immune from liability to the claimant under Title 51
RCW. The sum of the percentages of the total fault attributed to at-fault entities shall equal one hundred percent. The entities whose
fault shall be determined include the claimant or person suffering
personal injury or incurring property damage, defendants, third-party
defendants, entities released by the claimant, entities with any other
individual defense against the claimant, and entities immune from
liability to the claimant, but shall not include those entities immune
from liability to the claimant under Title 51 RCW. Judgment shall be
entered against each defendant except those who have been released by
the claimant or are immune from liability to the claimant or have
prevailed on any other individual defense against the claimant in an
amount which represents that party's proportionate share of the
claimant's total damages. The liability of each defendant shall be
several only and shall not be joint except:
(a) A party shall be responsible for the fault of another person or
for payment of the proportionate share of another party where both were
acting in concert or when a person was acting as an agent or servant of
the party.
(b) If the trier of fact determines that the claimant or party
suffering bodily injury or incurring property damages was not at fault,
the defendants against whom judgment is entered shall be jointly and
severally liable for the sum of their proportionate shares of the
((claimants [claimant's])) claimant's total damages.
(2) In all actions for damages under chapter 7.70 RCW, the entities
to whom fault may be attributed shall be limited to the claimants,
defendants, and third-party defendants who are parties to the action
and any entities released by the claimant.
(3) If a defendant is jointly and severally liable under one of the
exceptions listed in subsections (1)(a) or (1)(b) of this section, such
defendant's rights to contribution against another jointly and
severally liable defendant, and the effect of settlement by either such
defendant, shall be determined under RCW 4.22.040, 4.22.050, and
4.22.060.
(((3))) (4)(a) Nothing in this section affects any cause of action
relating to hazardous wastes or substances or solid waste disposal
sites.
(b) Nothing in this section shall affect a cause of action arising
from the tortious interference with contracts or business relations.
(c) Nothing in this section shall affect any cause of action
arising from the manufacture or marketing of a fungible product in a
generic form which contains no clearly identifiable shape, color, or
marking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 It is the intent of the legislature in
enacting section 4 of this act that a hospital not be held liable for
a health care provider's acts or omissions under so-called "apparent
agency" or "ostensible agency" theories as long as the health care
provider is properly credentialed by the hospital and does not perform
services that are an essential function of the hospital. It is further
the intent of the legislature that, notwithstanding any generally
applicable principle of vicarious liability to the contrary, individual
health care providers will not be liable for the negligent or wrongful
acts of others, except those who were acting under their supervision
and control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
A public or private hospital is liable for an act or omission of a
health care provider granted privileges to provide health care at the
hospital only if the health care provider is an agent or employee of
the hospital and the act or omission of the health care provider
occurred while the health care provider was acting within the course
and scope of the health care provider's agency or employment with the
hospital, or if the health care provider is fulfilling an essential
function of the hospital. A hospital is not ostensibly liable for any
act of negligence committed on the hospital's premises by a health care
provider who is properly credentialed and acting as an independent
contractor. A public or private hospital may be liable for failing to
exercise reasonable care in granting credentials and practice
privileges to a health care provider, or in failing to revoke such
credentials and privileges when the hospital knew or reasonably should
have known such revocation was appropriate.

Sec. 5 RCW 4.16.190 and 1993 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided in this section, if a person entitled
to bring an action mentioned in this chapter, except for a penalty or
forfeiture, or against a sheriff or other officer, for an escape, be at
the time the cause of action accrued either under the age of eighteen
years, or incompetent or disabled to such a degree that he or she
cannot understand the nature of the proceedings, such incompetency or
disability as determined according to chapter 11.88 RCW, or imprisoned
on a criminal charge prior to sentencing, the time of such disability
shall not be a part of the time limited for the commencement of action.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section with respect to a person under
the age of eighteen years does not apply to the time limited for the
commencement of an action under RCW 4.16.350.

Sec. 6 RCW 4.16.350 and 1998 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil action for damages that is based upon alleged
professional negligence, that is for an injury or condition occurring
as a result of health care which is provided after June 25, 1976, and
that is brought against((:
(1))) a person or entity identified in subsection (2) of this
section, shall:
(a) With respect to a patient who was eighteen years old or older
at the time of the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition, be commenced by the later of:
(i) Three years from the act or omission; or
(ii) One year from the time the patient or his or her
representative discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the
injury or condition was caused by the act or omission; and
(b) With respect to a patient who was under the age of eighteen
years at the time of the act or omission alleged to have caused the
injury or condition, be commenced by the later of:
(i) When the patient reaches age twenty-one or eight years from the
act or omission, whichever occurs first; or
(ii) One year from the time the patient or his or her
representative discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the
injury or condition was caused by the act or omission.
(2) Persons or entities against whom an action is brought under
subsection (1) of this section include:
(a) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's
assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive
care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his or
her estate or personal representative;
(((2))) (b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of
this subsection (((1) of this section)), acting in the course and scope
of his or her employment, including, in the event such employee or
agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or
(((3))) (c) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in (a) of this
subsection (((1) of this section)), including, but not limited to, a
hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or
an officer, director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course
and scope of his or her employment, including, in the event such
officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or
personal representative((;
based upon alleged professional negligence shall be commenced within
three years of the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition, or one year of the time the patient or his representative
discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the injury or
condition was caused by said act or omission, whichever period expires
later, except that in no event shall an action be commenced more than
eight years after said act or omission: PROVIDED, That)).
(3) The time for commencement of an action is tolled upon proof of
fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence of a foreign body not
intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic purpose or effect, until
the date the patient or the patient's representative has actual
knowledge of the act of fraud or concealment, or of the presence of the
foreign body; the patient or the patient's representative has one year
from the date of the actual knowledge in which to commence a civil
action for damages.
(4) For purposes of this section, ((notwithstanding RCW 4.16.190,))
the knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed to a
person under the age of eighteen years, and such imputed knowledge
shall operate to bar the claim of such minor to the same extent that
the claim of an adult would be barred under this section. Any action
not commenced in accordance with this section shall be barred.
For purposes of this section, with respect to care provided after
June 25, 1976, and before August 1, 1986, the knowledge of a custodial
parent or guardian shall be imputed as of April 29, 1987, to persons
under the age of eighteen years.
This section does not apply to a civil action based on intentional
conduct brought against those individuals or entities specified in this
section by a person for recovery of damages for injury occurring as a
result of childhood sexual abuse as defined in RCW 4.16.340(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action under this chapter, each side shall presumptively be
entitled to only two independent experts on an issue and only two
standard-of-care experts, except upon a showing of good cause. Where
there are multiple parties on a side and the parties cannot agree as to
which independent experts or standard-of-care experts will be called on
an issue, the court, upon a showing of good cause, shall allow
additional experts on an issue or additional standard-of-care experts
to be called as the court deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In an action under this chapter, all parties shall submit a
pretrial expert report pursuant to time frames provided in court rules.
The expert report must disclose the identity of all expert witnesses
and state the nature of the opinions the expert witnesses will present
as testimony at trial. Further depositions of these expert witnesses
is prohibited. The testimony that an expert witness may present at
trial is limited in nature to the opinions disclosed to the court as
part of the pretrial expert report. The supreme court shall adopt
rules to implement the provisions of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 7.70.100 and 1993 c 492 s 419 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No action based upon a health care provider's professional
negligence may be commenced unless the defendant has been given at
least ninety days' notice of the intention to commence the action. If
the notice is served within ninety days of the expiration of the
applicable statute of limitations, the time for the commencement of the
action must be extended ninety days from the service of the notice.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are not
applicable with respect to any defendant whose name is unknown to the
plaintiff at the time of filing the complaint and who is identified
therein by a fictitious name.
(3) After the filing of the ninety-day presuit notice, and before
a superior court trial, all causes of action, whether based in tort,
contract, or otherwise, for damages arising from injury occurring as a
result of health care provided after July 1, 1993, shall be subject to
mandatory mediation prior to trial except as provided in subsection (6)
of this section.
(((2))) (4) The supreme court shall by rule adopt procedures to
implement mandatory mediation of actions under this chapter. The rules
shall require mandatory mediation without exception unless subsection
(6) of this section applies. The rules on mandatory mediation shall
address, at a minimum:
(a) Procedures for the appointment of, and qualifications of,
mediators. A mediator shall have experience or expertise related to
actions arising from injury occurring as a result of health care, and
be a member of the state bar association who has been admitted to the
bar for a minimum of five years or who is a retired judge. The parties
may stipulate to a nonlawyer mediator. The court may prescribe
additional qualifications of mediators;
(b) Appropriate limits on the amount or manner of compensation of
mediators;
(c) The number of days following the filing of a claim under this
chapter within which a mediator must be selected;
(d) The method by which a mediator is selected. The rule shall
provide for designation of a mediator by the superior court if the
parties are unable to agree upon a mediator;
(e) The number of days following the selection of a mediator within
which a mediation conference must be held;
(f) A means by which mediation of an action under this chapter may
be waived by a mediator who has determined that the claim is not
appropriate for mediation; and
(g) Any other matters deemed necessary by the court.
(((3))) (5) Mediators shall not impose discovery schedules upon the
parties.
(6) The mandatory mediation requirement of subsection (4) of this
section does not apply to an action subject to mandatory arbitration
under chapter 7.06 RCW or to an action in which the parties have
agreed, subsequent to the arisal of the claim, to submit the claim to
arbitration under chapter 7.04 RCW.
(7) The supreme court shall by rule also adopt procedures for the
parties to certify to the court the manner of mediation used by the
parties to comply with this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 5.64.010 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In any civil action against a health care provider for personal
injuries which is based upon alleged professional negligence ((and
which is against:
(1) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatrist,
chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist, pharmacist, optician,
physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's assistant, nurse
practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive care paramedic,
including, in the event such person is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;
(2) An employee or agent of a person described in subsection (1) of
this section, acting in the course and scope of his employment,
including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his estate
or personal representative; or
(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in subsection (1)
of this section, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic,
health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer,
director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of
his employment, including, in the event such officer, director,
employee, or agent is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;)), evidence of furnishing or offering or promising to
pay medical, hospital, or similar expenses occasioned by an injury is
not admissible to prove liability for the injury.
(2) In a civil action against a health care provider for personal
injuries which is based upon alleged professional negligence, evidence
of an early offer of settlement is inadmissible, not discoverable, and
otherwise unavailable for use in the action. An early offer of
settlement means an offer that is made before the filing of a claim and
that makes a reasonable offer of compensation for the injury suffered.
An early offer of settlement may include an apology or an admission of
fault on the part of the person making the offer, or a statement
regarding remedial actions that may be taken to address the act or
omission that is the basis for the allegation of negligence, and does
not become admissible, discoverable, or otherwise available for use in
the action because it contains an apology, admission of fault, or
statement of remedial actions that may be taken. Compensation means
payment of money or other property to or on behalf of the injured
party, rendering of services to the injured party free of charge, or
indemnification of expenses incurred by or on behalf of the injured
party.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "health care provider" has
the same meaning provided in RCW 7.70.020.

Sec. 11 RCW 7.70.080 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any party may present evidence to the trier of fact that the
((patient)) plaintiff has already been compensated for the injury
complained of from any source except the assets of the ((patient, his))
plaintiff, the plaintiff's representative, or ((his)) the plaintiff's
immediate family((, or insurance purchased with such assets)). In the
event such evidence is admitted, the plaintiff may present evidence of
an obligation to repay such compensation and evidence of any amount
paid by the plaintiff, or his or her representative or immediate
family, to secure the right to the compensation. ((Insurance bargained
for or provided on behalf of an employee shall be considered insurance
purchased with the assets of the employee.)) Compensation as used in
this section shall mean payment of money or other property to or on
behalf of the patient, rendering of services to the patient free of
charge to the patient, or indemnification of expenses incurred by or on
behalf of the patient. Notwithstanding this section, evidence of
compensation by a defendant health care provider may be offered only by
that provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action against an individual health care provider under
this chapter for personal injury or wrongful death in which the injury
is alleged to have been caused by an act or omission that violates the
accepted standard of care, the plaintiff must file a certificate of
merit at the time of commencing the action.
(2) The certificate of merit must be executed by a health care
provider whose license, certification, or registration is substantially
the same as the defendant. If there is more than one defendant in the
action, the person commencing the action must file a certificate of
merit for each defendant.
(3) The certificate of merit must contain a statement that the
person executing the certificate of merit believes there is a
reasonable probability that the defendant's conduct did not follow the
accepted standard of care required to be exercised by the defendant.
(4) Upon motion of the plaintiff, the court may grant an additional
period of time to file the certificate of merit, not to exceed ninety
days, if the court finds there is good cause for the extension.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) A commission on noneconomic damages is
established. The commission shall study the feasibility of developing
and implementing an advisory schedule of noneconomic damages in actions
for injuries resulting from health care under chapter 7.70 RCW. The
commission shall present the results of the feasibility study and an
implementation plan, if appropriate, to the relevant policy committees
of the legislature by October 31, 2005.
(2) The commission's goal is to determine whether an advisory
schedule could be developed to increase the predictability and
proportionality of settlements and awards for noneconomic damages in
actions for injuries resulting from health care and, if so, what steps
are necessary to implement such a schedule. In making its
determination, the commission shall consider:
(a) The information that can most appropriately be used to provide
guidance to the trier of fact regarding noneconomic damage awards,
giving consideration to: (i) Past noneconomic damage awards for
similar injuries, considering severity and duration of the injuries;
(ii) past noneconomic damage awards for similar claims for damages; and
(iii) such other information or methodologies the commission finds
appropriate;
(b) The most appropriate format in which to present the information
to the trier of fact; and
(c) When and under what circumstances an advisory schedule should
be utilized in alternative dispute resolution settings and presented to
the trier of fact at trial.
(3) If the commission determines that an advisory schedule for
noneconomic damages is feasible, the commission shall develop an
implementation plan for the schedule which shall include, at a minimum:
(a) Identification of changes to statutory law, administrative
rules, or court rules that would be necessary to implement the advisory
schedule;
(b) Identification of forms or other documents that would be
necessary or beneficial in implementing the advisory schedule;
(c) A proposed timetable for implementation of the advisory
schedule; and
(d) Any other information or considerations the commission finds
necessary or beneficial to implementation of the advisory schedule.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "noneconomic damages" has the
meaning given in RCW 4.56.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The commission is composed of fifteen
members, as follows: (a) One member from each of the two largest
caucuses in the senate, to be appointed by the president of the senate,
and one member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of
representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; (b) one health care ethicist; (c) one economist; (d)
one actuary; (e) two attorneys, one representing the plaintiff's bar
and one representing the insurance defense bar; (f) two superior court
judges; (g) one hospital; (h) two physicians; and (i) one medical
malpractice insurer. The governor shall appoint the nonlegislative
members of the commission.
(2) The governor shall select a chair of the commission from among
those commission members that are not health care providers, medical
malpractice insurers, or attorneys.
(3) Legislative members of the commission shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of the
commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Travel expenses of nonlegislative members of
the commission shall be paid jointly by the house of representatives
and senate.
(4) The office of financial management shall provide support to the
commission to enable it to perform its functions, with the assistance
of staff from the administrative office of the courts.

Sec. 15 RCW 70.105.112 and 1987 c 528 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to special incinerator ash regulated
under chapter 70.138 RCW except that, for purposes of RCW
4.22.070(((3))) (4)(a), special incinerator ash shall be considered
hazardous waste.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 13 and 14 of this act expire July
1, 2006.

--- END ---