BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.101.010 and 2003 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Area" means a tourism promotion area.
(2) "Legislative authority" means the legislative authority of any
county with a population greater than forty thousand but less than one
million, or of any city or town within such a county, including
unclassified cities or towns operating under special charters.
(3) "Lodging business" means a ((person that furnishes lodging))
business held out to the public to be an inn, hotel, motel, or public
lodging house in which forty or more rooms are furnished for hire to
accommodate transient guests and whose lodging services are taxable by
the state under chapter 82.08 RCW ((that has forty or more lodging
units)).
(4) "Tourism promotion" means activities and expenditures designed
to increase tourism and convention business, including but not limited
to advertising, publicizing, or otherwise distributing information for
the purpose of attracting and welcoming tourists, and operating tourism
destination marketing organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---