BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education shall adopt rules
regarding disruptive off-campus conduct of students, including
sanctions.
(2) Sanctions may include, but are not limited to, counseling,
probation, suspension, or expulsion.
(3) As used in this section, "disruptive off-campus conduct" means
any conduct that results in a citation or conviction for the violation
of laws or ordinances and that:
(a) Interferes with the institution of higher education's
relationship with the surrounding community;
(b) Harms the reputation of the institution of higher education; or
(c) Violates the institution of higher education's policies.
(4) Each institution of higher education shall report the substance
of the rules adopted under this section to the higher education
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2004.

--- END ---