BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that noxious plant
species cause economic hardship to Washington's public, private, and
tribal landowners, damage native ecosystems, and deprive wildlife of
food sources and habitat. The legislature further finds that effective
action in controlling noxious weeds has been hampered by inadequate
agency coordination and ineffective noxious weed management. The
legislature further finds that prevention is much cheaper than control
and that prevention and control of noxious weed infestations can best
be accomplished when weed managers, land managers, and the public
engage in collaborative efforts.
(2) The legislature therefore declares that Washington must
establish an early detection and rapid response system for noxious
weeds and develop a state agency action plan to strengthen statewide
coordination of weed management activities to be carried out at the
local level. Further, the goal of this act is to encourage state
agencies and private landowners to work together to alleviate the
economic and habitat losses that noxious weeds are causing statewide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Each state agency whose actions may
affect the status of noxious weeds must, to the extent permitted by law
and consistent with the public lands noxious weed management plan:
(a) Identify such actions; and
(b) Use relevant programs and authorities to: (i) Prevent the
introduction of noxious weeds; (ii) detect and respond rapidly to and
control populations of such species in a cost-effective manner; (iii)
monitor noxious weed populations accurately and reliably; (iv) provide
for restoration of native species and habitat conditions in areas that
have been invaded; (v) develop strategies to prevent introduction and
provide for control of noxious weeds; and (vi) promote public education
on noxious weeds and the means to address them.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "control" means as
appropriate, eradicating, suppressing, reducing, or managing noxious
weed populations, preventing spread of noxious weeds from areas where
they are present, and taking steps such as restoration of native
species and habitats to reduce the effects of noxious weeds and to
prevent further invasions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A public lands advisory commission for
noxious weed management is established. Commission members must
include a representative from the department of agriculture, the
department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of natural resources, the department of transportation, the
conservation commission, the parks and recreation commission, a county
weed board representative, and a weed district representative. The
commission must be chaired by the representative of the department of
agriculture. The commission may invite a tribal representative and
additional state and federal agency representatives to be members,
including representatives from state and federal bureaus or offices
with significant responsibilities concerning noxious weeds, and may
prescribe special procedures for their participation. The department
of agriculture's representative must appoint an executive director of
the commission and must provide the staff and administrative support
for the commission.
(2) The commission chair and cochairs, if any, must establish an
advisory committee to provide information and advice for consideration
by the commission, and must, after consultation with other members of
the commission, appoint members of the advisory committee representing
stakeholders. Among other things, the advisory committee must
recommend plans and actions at local, tribal, state, and regional
levels to achieve the goals and objectives of the public lands noxious
weed management plan in section 5 of this act. The advisory committee
must act in cooperation with stakeholders and existing organizations
addressing noxious weeds. The department of agriculture must provide
the administrative support for the advisory committee.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "stakeholders" means, but is
not limited to, state, tribal, and local government agencies, academic
institutions, the scientific community, nongovernmental entities
including environmental, agricultural, and conservation organizations,
trade groups, commercial interests, and private landowners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The commission must provide statewide
leadership regarding noxious weed management, and must:
(1) Oversee the implementation of this act and see that the state
agency activities concerning noxious weeds are coordinated,
complementary, cost-efficient, and effective, relying to the extent
feasible and appropriate on existing organizations addressing noxious
weeds, such as the department of agriculture, the department of natural
resources, state and county weed control boards, and weed districts;
(2) Encourage planning and action at local, tribal, state, and
regional levels to achieve the goals and objectives of the management
plan under section 5 of this act, in cooperation with stakeholders and
existing organizations addressing noxious weeds;
(3) Develop, in consultation with the advisory committee, guidance
to state agencies on prevention and control of noxious weeds, including
the procurement, use, and maintenance of native species as they affect
noxious weeds;
(4) Facilitate development of a coordinated network among state
agencies to document, evaluate, and monitor impacts from noxious weeds;
(5) Facilitate establishment of a coordinated, up-to-date
information-sharing system that uses the internet, to the greatest
extent practicable. This system shall facilitate access to and
exchange of information concerning noxious weeds, including, but not
limited to: Information on distribution and abundance of noxious
weeds; life histories of such weeds and noxious characteristics;
economic, environmental, and human health impacts; management
techniques; and laws and programs for management, research, and public
education; and
(6) Prepare and issue a public lands noxious weed management plan
as set forth in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Within twenty-four months after the
effective date of this act, the commission shall prepare and issue the
first edition of a public lands noxious weed management plan, which
must detail and recommend performance-oriented goals and objectives and
specific measures of success for state agency efforts concerning
noxious weeds. The plan shall recommend specific objectives and
measures for carrying out each of the state agency duties established
in section 2(1) of this act and must set forth steps to be taken by the
commission to carry out the duties assigned to it under section 4 of
this act. The plan shall be developed in consultation with state
agencies and stakeholders.
(2) The first edition of the public lands noxious weed management
plan shall include a review of existing and prospective approaches and
authorities for preventing the introduction and spread of noxious
weeds, including those for identifying pathways by which noxious weeds
are introduced and for minimizing the risk of introductions via those
pathways, and shall identify research needs and recommend measures to
minimize the risk that introductions will occur. Such recommended
measures shall provide for a science-based process to evaluate risks
associated with the introduction and spread of noxious weeds and a
coordinated and systematic risk-based process to identify, monitor, and
interdict pathways that may be involved in the introduction of noxious
weeds. If recommended measures are not authorized by current law, the
commission must develop and recommend to the legislature through its
chair, in bill form, legislative proposals for necessary changes in
authority.
(3) The commission must update the public lands noxious weed
management plan biennially and shall concurrently evaluate and report
on success in achieving the goals and objectives set forth in the plan.
The plan must identify the personnel, other resources, and additional
levels of coordination needed to achieve the plan's identified goals
and objectives, and the commission must provide each edition of the
plan and each report on it to the appropriate legislative committees.
Within twenty-four months after measures have been recommended by the
commission in any edition of the plan, each state agency whose action
is required to implement such measures must either take the action
recommended or must provide the commission with an explanation of why
the action is not feasible.
(4) The commission must assess the effectiveness of this act no
less than once every five years after the effective date of this act
and report its results to the appropriate legislative committees.
(5) The commission must report to the appropriate legislative
committees biannually as to the commission's budget, its progress in
meeting its stated goals and objectives, and any concerns or requests
of the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) This act is intended only to improve the
internal management of the executive branch and is not intended to
create any right, benefit, or trust responsibility, substantive or
procedural, enforceable at law or equity by a party against the state,
its agencies, its officers, or any other person.
(2) The requirements of this act do not affect the obligations of
state agencies under chapter 77.115 RCW with respect to aquaculture
disease control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 17.10 RCW.

--- END ---