BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Each school district's board of directors shall adopt policies for
providing a defibrillator on each campus and for training appropriate
personnel in the proper use of the defibrillators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2005, from the general fund to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2005.

--- END ---