BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds there is an important
state interest in increasing the level of voter participation among the
youth of this state. The purposes of this act are to increase youth
voter participation through increased voter registration, and to
encourage the youth of the state of Washington to take pride in their
civic responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of licensing shall, four times a year, furnish to
the county auditors a list of holders of intermediate driver's licenses
under RCW 46.20.075 who have attained age seventeen and one-half years
or older, together with the addresses and dates of birth of the
licensees. The sole purpose of this list is to provide to county
auditors the information needed to comply with section 3 of this act.
The department shall assess an additional fee of one dollar for each
intermediate license to help defray costs of complying with section 3
of this act. The department may retain ten percent of each fee for
administrative expenses, and shall remit the remainder to the auditor
for the county in which the licensee resides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The county auditor shall prepare and update information concerning
upcoming elections and polling places. The auditor shall, during the
month in which the licensee's eighteenth birthday occurs, send that
information and a voter registration card to each holder of an
intermediate driver's license who resides in the county. The
information shall contain a concise statement of who is eligible to
vote.

--- END ---