BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.80.060 and 1992 c 101 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to qualify for state planning funds available to regional
transportation planning organizations, the regional transportation
planning organizations containing any county with a population in
excess of one million shall provide voting membership on its executive
board to the state transportation commission, the state department of
transportation, ((and)) the three largest public port districts within
the region as determined by gross operating revenues, and any
incorporated principal city of a metropolitan statistical area within
the region, in existence on January 1, 2004, as designated by the
United States Census Bureau. ((It shall further assure that at least
fifty percent of the county and city local elected officials who serve
on the executive board also serve on transit agency boards or on a
regional transit authority.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.80 RCW
to read as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization shall ensure
that the unincorporated areas within its region are appropriately
represented on all organization boards, including its executive board.
The regional transportation planning organization may determine how the
unincorporated areas within its region are to be appropriately
represented on its boards.

--- END ---