BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.36.310 and 1999 c 201 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to erect and maintain motorist
information sign panels within the right of way of the interstate
highway system to give the traveling public specific information as to
gas, food, lodging, camping, or tourist-oriented business available on
a crossroad at or near an interchange. Motorist information sign
panels shall include the words "GAS," "FOOD," "LODGING," "CAMPING," or
"TOURIST ACTIVITIES" and directional information and may contain one or
more individual business signs maintained on the panel. Motorist
information sign panels are authorized within the corporate limits of
cities and towns and areas zoned for commercial or industrial uses at
locations where there is adequate distance between interchanges to
ensure compliance with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.
The erection and maintenance of motorist information sign panels shall
also conform to the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices and rules
adopted by the state department of transportation. A motorist service
or tourist-oriented business located within one mile of an interstate
highway shall not be permitted to display its name, brand, or trademark
on a motorist information sign panel unless its owner has first entered
into an agreement with the department limiting the height of its on-premise signs at the site of its service installation to not more than
fifteen feet higher than the roof of its main building measured to the
bottom of the on-premise sign. The restriction for on-premise signs
does not apply if the sign is not visible from the highway. The
department may, on a case-by-case basis, waive the height restriction
when an on-premise sign is visible from the rural interstate system.
The department shall charge reasonable fees for the display of
individual business signs to defray the costs of their installation and
maintenance, and ((may)) shall charge reasonable fees to recover costs
for the erection and maintenance of the motorist information sign
panels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 47.36.325 (Motorist information signs--Private contractors) and 2002 c 321 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---