BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.550 and 2003 c 217 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the disclosure under subsection (5) of this
section, public agencies are authorized to release information to the
public regarding sex offenders and kidnapping offenders when the agency
determines that disclosure of the information is relevant and necessary
to protect the public and counteract the danger created by the
particular offender. This authorization applies to information
regarding: (a) Any person adjudicated or convicted of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9A.44.130 or a kidnapping offense as defined by RCW
9A.44.130; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate
sentence review board as the result of a sex offense or kidnapping
offense; (c) any person committed as a sexually violent predator under
chapter 71.09 RCW or as a sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW;
(d) any person found not guilty of a sex offense or kidnapping offense
by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and (e) any person found
incompetent to stand trial for a sex offense or kidnapping offense and
subsequently committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.
(2) Except for the information specifically required under
subsection (5) of this section, the extent of the public disclosure of
relevant and necessary information shall be rationally related to: (a)
The level of risk posed by the offender to the community; (b) the
locations where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is
regularly found; and (c) the needs of the affected community members
for information to enhance their individual and collective safety.
(3) Except for the information specifically required under
subsection (5) of this section, local law enforcement agencies shall
consider the following guidelines in determining the extent of a public
disclosure made under this section: (a) For offenders classified as
risk level I, the agency shall share information with ((other
appropriate law enforcement agencies)) the presiding sheriff's
department and police department and ((may)) shall disclose, upon
request, ((relevant, necessary, and accurate information)) the hundred
block address and the first and last name of any offender classified as
risk level I to any victim or witness to the offense and to any
individual community member who lives ((near the residence)) within a
one-mile radius of where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is
regularly found; (b) for offenders classified as risk level II, the
agency ((may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate
information)) shall share information with the presiding sheriff's
department and police department and shall disclose, upon request, the
hundred block address and the first and last name of any offender
classified as risk level II to any victim or witness to the offense, to
any individual community member who lives within a one-mile radius of
where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found,
and to public and private schools, child day care centers, family day
care providers, businesses and organizations that serve primarily
children, women, or vulnerable adults, and neighbors and community
groups near the residence where the offender resides, expects to
reside, or is regularly found; (c) for offenders classified as risk
level III, the agency ((may also disclose relevant, necessary, and
accurate information)) shall share information with the presiding
sheriff's department and police department and shall disclose, upon
request, the hundred block address and the first and last name of any
offender classified as risk level III to any victim or witness to the
offense, to any individual community member who lives within a one-mile
radius of where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is
regularly found, and to the public at large; and (d) because more
localized notification is not feasible and homeless and transient
offenders may present unique risks to the community, the agency may
also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to the
public at large for offenders registered as homeless or transient. The
"presiding sheriff's department and police department" as used in this
subsection means the governing agency for the municipality in which the
level I, II, or III offender resides, expects to reside, or is
regularly found.
(4) The county sheriff with whom an offender classified as risk
level III is registered shall cause to be published by legal notice,
advertising, or news release a sex offender community notification that
conforms to the guidelines established under RCW 4.24.5501 in at least
one legal newspaper with general circulation in the area of the sex
offender's registered address or location. The county sheriff shall
also cause to be published consistent with this subsection a current
list of level III registered sex offenders, twice yearly. Unless the
information is posted on the web site described in subsection (5) of
this section, this list shall be maintained by the county sheriff on a
publicly accessible web site and shall be updated at least once per
month.
(5)(a) When funded by federal grants or other sources, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create and
maintain a statewide registered sex offender web site, which shall be
available to the public. The web site shall post all level III and
level II registered sex offenders in the state of Washington.
(i) For level III offenders, the web site shall contain, but is not
limited to, the registered sex offender's name, relevant criminal
convictions, address by hundred block, physical description, and
photograph. The web site shall provide mapping capabilities that
display the sex offender's address by hundred block on a map. The web
site shall allow citizens to search for registered sex offenders within
the state of Washington by county, city, zip code, last name, type of
conviction, and address by hundred block.
(ii) For level II offenders, the web site shall contain, but is not
limited to, the same information and functionality as described in
(a)(i) of this subsection, provided that it is permissible under state
and federal law. If it is not permissible, the web site shall be
limited to the information and functionality that is permissible under
state and federal law.
(b) Until the implementation of (a) of this subsection, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall create a web
site available to the public that provides electronic links to county-operated web sites that offer sex offender registration information.
(6) Local law enforcement agencies that disseminate information
pursuant to this section shall: (a) Review available risk level
classifications made by the department of corrections, the department
of social and health services, and the indeterminate sentence review
board; (b) assign risk level classifications to all offenders about
whom information will be disseminated; and (c) make a good faith effort
to notify the public and residents at least fourteen days before the
offender is released from confinement or, where an offender moves from
another jurisdiction, as soon as possible after the agency learns of
the offender's move, except that in no case may this notification
provision be construed to require an extension of an offender's release
date. The juvenile court shall provide local law enforcement officials
with all relevant information on offenders allowed to remain in the
community in a timely manner.
(7) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or
public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government
and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil
liability for damages for any discretionary risk level classification
decisions or release of relevant and necessary information, unless it
is shown that the official, employee, or agency acted with gross
negligence or in bad faith. The immunity in this section applies to
risk level classification decisions and the release of relevant and
necessary information regarding any individual for whom disclosure is
authorized. The decision of a local law enforcement agency or official
to classify an offender to a risk level other than the one assigned by
the department of corrections, the department of social and health
services, or the indeterminate sentence review board, or the release of
any relevant and necessary information based on that different
classification shall not, by itself, be considered gross negligence or
bad faith. The immunity provided under this section applies to the
release of relevant and necessary information to other public
officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the general
public.
(8) Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this
section shall impose any liability upon a public official, public
employee, or public agency for failing to release information
authorized under this section.
(9) Nothing in this section implies that information regarding
persons designated in subsection (1) of this section is confidential
except as may otherwise be provided by law.
(10) When a local law enforcement agency or official classifies an
offender differently than the offender is classified by the end of
sentence review committee or the department of social and health
services at the time of the offender's release from confinement, the
law enforcement agency or official shall notify the end of sentence
review committee or the department of social and health services and
submit its reasons supporting the change in classification. Upon
implementation of subsection (5)(a) of this section, notification of
the change shall also be sent to the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid due to a
conflict with federal law, the conflicting part of this act is
inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and such holding does
not affect the operation of the remainder of this act or the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances.

--- END ---