BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) In 2001, the legislature recognized the importance of advancing
the development of a market for qualified alternative energy resources
by requiring as a matter of law that all electric utilities in the
state, except small utilities, offer a green rate option, which entails
the offering of a voluntary option for retail electric customers to
purchase qualified alternative energy resources through their local
utility;
(b) Green rate options have generally been successful, even though
they have been offered less than three years. However, two factors may
be hindering the progress of these programs. One is that renewable
resources have cost more than basic electric utility rates, making the
options less economically attractive to customers. The second factor
is a requirement that all costs associated with a green rate option
must be borne by those customers who subscribe to it;
(c) Because all costs involved with providing a green rate option
must be allocated to its subscribers, marketing costs can compound an
option's comparatively high cost and may diminish customer interest in
it; and
(d) The high cost of green rate options relative to basic electric
utility rates may be a particular economic deterrent to low-income
residential customers.
(2) Therefore, the legislature declares:
(a) It is in the public interest that electric utilities that offer
a green rate option should be allowed a tax incentive to more
aggressively market their programs with little or no additional expense
to subscribers to the green rate option; and
(b) Low-income residential customers should be given an opportunity
to benefit from subscribing to a green rate option and contribute to
the betterment of the state's environment through a billing discount
for a green rate option that is supported by a tax incentive. Any
billing discount that is not supported by a tax incentive would merely
add to the cost of a green rate option to other customers and thus
reduce its economic attractiveness overall.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any light and power business that does not qualify for a tax
credit under RCW 82.16.0491(2) and that offers a voluntary option for
its retail electric customers to purchase qualified alternative energy
resources under RCW 19.29A.090 shall be allowed a credit against taxes
due under this chapter in an amount equal to fifty percent of all
expenditures made in the calendar year in which the credit is taken to
market its voluntary option program to retail electric customers.
(2) For a light and power business to take the credit under this
section, it must use the full value of the credit to supplement
expenditures to market its option under RCW 19.29A.090.
(3) Except as provided under subsection (4) of this section, no
light and power business shall be eligible for tax credits under this
section in excess of thirty-five thousand dollars in any calendar year.
The credit may not exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be due
under this chapter. Expenditures not used to earn a credit in one
calendar year may not be used to earn a credit in subsequent years.
(4) A light and power business that qualifies for a tax credit
under RCW 82.16.0491(2) may take a credit under this section in an
amount equal to credit taken by the light and power business under RCW
82.16.0491 to market its option under RCW 19.29A.090. The combined
total of credit taken under this section and credit taken under RCW
82.16.0491 shall not exceed thirty-five thousand dollars in any
calendar year.
(5) Application for a tax credit under this section may only be
made in the form and manner prescribed in rules adopted by the
department.
(6) The credit under this section shall be taken not more than once
quarterly and not less than once annually against taxes due for the
same calendar year in which the amounts for which credit is claimed
were expended to promote a voluntary option to purchase qualified
alternative energy resources and must be claimed by the due date of the
last tax return for the calendar year in which the expenditure is made.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2013.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.16.0491 and 1999 c 311 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Qualifying project" means a project designed to achieve job
creation or business retention, to add or upgrade nonelectrical
infrastructure, to add or upgrade health and safety facilities, to
accomplish energy and water use efficiency improvements, including
renewable energy development, to market a voluntary option for retail
electric customers to purchase qualified alternative energy resources
under RCW 19.29A.090, or to add or upgrade emergency services in any
designated qualifying rural area.
(b) "Qualifying rural area" means:
(i) A rural county, which is a county with a population density of
less than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the
office of financial management and published each year by the
department for the period July 1st to June 30th; or
(ii) Any geographic area in the state that receives electricity
from a light and power business with twelve thousand or fewer customers
and with fewer than twenty-six meters per mile of distribution line as
determined and published by the department of revenue effective July
1st of each year. The department shall use current data provided by
the electricity industry.
(c) "Electric utility rural economic development revolving fund"
means a fund devoted exclusively to funding qualifying projects in
qualifying rural areas.
(d) "Local board" is a board of directors with at least, but not
limited to, three members representing local businesses and community
groups who have been appointed by the sponsoring electric utility to
oversee and direct the activities of the electric utility rural
economic development revolving fund.
(2) A light and power business with fewer than twenty-six active
meters per mile of distribution line in any geographic area in the
state shall be allowed a credit against taxes due under this chapter in
an amount equal to fifty percent of contributions made in any calendar
year directly to an electric utility rural economic development
revolving fund. The credit shall be taken in a form and manner as
required by the department. The credit under this section shall not
exceed twenty-five thousand dollars per calendar year per light and
power business. The credit may not exceed the tax that would otherwise
be due under this chapter. Refunds shall not be granted in the place
of credits. Expenditures not used to earn a credit in one calendar
year may not be used to earn a credit in subsequent years.
(3) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires
December 31, ((2005)) 2013.
(4) To qualify for the credit in subsection (2) of this section,
the light and power business shall establish an electric utility rural
economic development revolving fund which is governed by a local board
whose members shall reside in the qualifying rural area served by the
light and power business. The local board shall have authority to
determine all criteria and conditions for the expenditure of funds from
the electric utility rural economic development (([revolving]))
revolving fund, and for the terms and conditions of repayment.
(5) Any funds repaid to the electric utility rural economic
development (([revolving])) revolving fund by recipients shall be made
available for additional qualifying projects.
(6) If at any time the electric utility rural economic development
(([revolving])) revolving fund is dissolved, any moneys claimed as a
tax credit under this section shall either be granted to a qualifying
project or refunded to the state within two years of termination.
(7) The total amount of credits that may be used in any fiscal year
shall not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars in any fiscal
year. The department shall allow the use of earned credits on a first-come, first-served basis. Unused earned credits may be carried over to
subsequent years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any light and power business that offers a voluntary option for
its retail electric customers to purchase qualified alternative energy
resources under RCW 19.29A.090 shall be allowed a credit for amounts
supporting low-income billing discounts provided under RCW 19.29A.090.
(2) The credit allowed for the value of low-income billing
discounts under this section shall not exceed one hundred dollars per
customer per calendar year.
(3) No light and power business shall be eligible for tax credits
under this section in excess of one hundred thousand dollars in any
calendar year. The credit may not exceed the amount of tax that would
otherwise be due under this chapter. Refunds shall not be granted in
place of credits. Expenditures not used to earn a credit in one
calendar year may not be used to earn a credit in subsequent years.
(4) Application for a tax credit under this section may only be
made in the form and manner prescribed in rules adopted by the
department.
(5) The credit under this section shall be taken not more than once
quarterly and not less than once annually against taxes due for the
same calendar year in which the amounts for which credit is claimed
were used for billing discounts and must be claimed by the due date of
the last tax return for the calendar year in which the expenditure is
made.
(6) For the purposes of this section: (a) "Low-income residential
customer" means a low-income household as defined on December 31, 2003,
in the low-income home energy assistance act of 1981 as amended August
1, 1999, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 8623 et seq.; and (b) "low-income billing
discount" means a reduction in the amount charged by an electric
utility for providing an option to purchase qualified alternative
energy resources to low-income residential customers.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2013.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.29A.090 and 2002 c 285 s 6 and 2002 c 191 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning January 1, 2002, each electric utility must provide
to its retail electricity customers a voluntary option to purchase
qualified alternative energy resources in accordance with this section.
(2) Each electric utility must include with its retail electric
customer's regular billing statements, at least quarterly, a voluntary
option to purchase qualified alternative energy resources. The option
may allow customers to purchase qualified alternative energy resources
at fixed or variable rates and for fixed or variable periods of time,
including but not limited to monthly, quarterly, or annual purchase
agreements. A utility may provide qualified alternative energy
resource options through either: (a) Resources it owns or contracts
for; or (b) the purchase of credits issued by a clearinghouse or other
system by which the utility may secure, for trade or other
consideration, verifiable evidence that a second party has a qualified
alternative energy resource and that the second party agrees to
transfer such evidence exclusively to the benefit of the utility.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified alternative
energy resource" means the electricity produced from generation
facilities that are fueled by: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c)
geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal action; (f) gas
produced during the treatment of wastewater; (g) qualified hydropower;
or (h) biomass energy based on animal waste or solid organic fuels from
wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not
include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives
such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "qualified hydropower" means
the energy produced either: (a) As a result of modernizations or
upgrades made after June 1, 1998, to hydropower facilities operating on
May 8, 2001, that have been demonstrated to reduce the mortality of
anadromous fish; or (b) by run of the river or run of the canal
hydropower facilities that are not responsible for obstructing the
passage of anadromous fish.
(5) The rates, terms, conditions, and customer notification of each
utility's option or options offered in accordance with this section
must be approved by the governing body of the consumer-owned utility or
by the commission for investor-owned utilities. All costs and benefits
associated with any option offered by an electric utility under this
section must be allocated to the customers who voluntarily choose that
option and may not be shifted to any customers who have not chosen such
option.
(6) Utilities may pursue known, lawful aggregated purchasing of
qualified alternative energy resources with other utilities to the
extent aggregated purchasing can reduce the unit cost of qualified
alternative energy resources, and are encouraged to investigate
opportunities to aggregate the purchase of alternative energy resources
by their customers. Aggregated purchases by investor-owned utilities
must comply with any applicable rules or policies adopted by the
commission related to least-cost planning or the acquisition of
renewable resources.
(((6))) (7) Each consumer-owned utility must report annually to the
department and each investor-owned utility must report annually to the
commission beginning October 1, 2002, until October 1, 2012, describing
the option or options it is offering its customers under the
requirements of this section, the rate of customer participation, the
amount of qualified alternative energy resources purchased by
customers, the amount of utility investments in qualified alternative
energy resources, and the results of pursuing aggregated purchasing
opportunities. The department and the commission together shall report
annually to the legislature, beginning December 1, 2002, until December
1, 2012, with the results of the utility reports.
(8) Electric utilities may provide a low-income billing discount on
the option to purchase qualified alternative energy resources to any of
its low-income residential customers, for as long as a tax credit is
allowed for such discounts under section 4 of this act. Electric
utilities may seek the assistance of a qualifying organization to
identify low-income residential customers who should be eligible for a
low-income billing discount under this subsection.
(9) For the purposes of this section: (a) "Low-income residential
customer" means a low-income household as defined on December 31, 2003,
in the low-income home energy assistance act of 1981 as amended August
1, 1999, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 8623 et seq.; (b) "low-income billing discount"
means a reduction in the amount charged for providing an option to
purchase qualified alternative energy resources to low-income
residential customers by an electric utility; and (c) "qualifying
organization" means an entity that has a contractual agreement with the
department of community, trade, and economic development to administer
in a specified service area low-income home energy assistance funds
received from the federal government and such other funds that may be
received by the entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 and 4 of this act take effect
January 1, 2005.

--- END ---