BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All voting systems in Washington state must produce a voter-verified paper ballot, to be read and verified by the voter at time of
voting, without the use of an interface, except as may be needed for
certain disabled individuals, and placed in a ballot box either by the
voter or voting machine, to be used as the official ballot in recounts
and election audits.
(2) Each county in the state shall conduct mandatory random manual
audits of the voter-verified paper ballots, of five percent of all
precincts in all counties, of all races, of all votes cast on all
ballots for that precinct, at the polling place. The audits must be
random, chosen by lottery immediately after the polls close.
(3) A manual audit of the voter-verified paper ballots is
automatically required for anomalous results. The required audits are
not part of the random five-percent audit requirement. Anomalous
results are any of the following:
(a) Insufficient randomness;
(b) Discrepant trends in analysis of results in each precinct;
(c) Results reported very late;
(d) Excess overvotes or undervotes;
(e) Vote totals that do not match the number registered as having
voted;
(f) Problems with vote counting or vote tabulating systems;
(g) Discrepancies in vote totals reported from the polling place to
a central counting system, or from a central counting system to the
state counting system;
(h) Excessive discrepancy between the electronic vote count totals
and the voter-verified paper ballot totals, regardless of whether the
discrepancy would overturn the election.
(4) A report of the polling place tally of votes must be posted at
the polling place before transmission of vote totals to the county or
central counting, and before ballots are transported to a central
counting location. All polling place totals must be reconciled with
the totals received at the central counting location. Each counting
location must reconcile totals with county or state counting records.
(5) Polling place ballots must be clearly and separately recorded
and audited as a separate line item from absentee, mail-in,
provisional, or other forms of nonpolling place ballots. Absentee,
mail-in, provisional, or other forms of nonpolling place ballots must
not be identified as or combined with, polling place ballots.
(6) All systems must have an open source code. The code must be
available for outside review by a panel chosen by members of all
parties represented in the state legislature. The secretary of state
or the state elections office, due to potential conflicts of interest,
may not submit panel members.
(7) No voting system may contain or use a system that allows
connection to a network via modem, phone, wireless, or other means of
connection. "Voting system" includes the voting unit, vote tabulation
unit, or any other unit that may comprise the entire voting system.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.12.020 and 2003 c 111 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall inspect, evaluate, and publicly test
in their entirety all voting systems or components of voting systems
that are submitted for review under RCW 29A.12.030. The secretary of
state shall determine whether the voting systems conform with all of
the requirements of this title, the applicable rules adopted in
accordance with this title, and with generally accepted safety
requirements. The secretary of state shall transmit a copy of the
report of any examination under this section, within thirty days after
completing the examination, to the county auditor of each county.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.12.050 and 2003 c 111 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
If voting systems or devices or vote tallying systems are to be
used for conducting a primary or election, only those that have the
approval of the secretary of state or had been approved under this
chapter or the former chapter 29.34 RCW before March 22, 1982, may be
used. Any modification, change, or improvement to any voting system or
component of a system ((that does not impair its accuracy, efficiency,
or capacity or extend its function, may be made without reexamination
or reapproval by the secretary of state under RCW 29A.12.020)) must
first be tested and approved by the appropriate independent testing
authority approved by the federal elections commission or its statutory
successor.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.12.080 and 2003 c 111 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
No voting device shall be approved by the secretary of state unless
it:
(1) Secures to the voter secrecy in the act of voting;
(2) Permits the voter to vote for any person for any office and
upon any measure that he or she has the right to vote for;
(3) Permits the voter to vote for all the candidates of one party
or in part for the candidates of one or more other parties;
(4) Correctly registers all votes cast for any and all persons and
for or against any and all measures;
(5) Correctly and accurately tabulates the votes cast for all
candidates and for or against all measures; and
(6) Provides that a vote for more than one candidate cannot be cast
by one single operation of the voting device or vote tally system
except when voting for president and vice president of the United
States((; and
(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested, certified, and used in at least one other state or
election jurisdiction)).

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.12.100 and 2003 c 111 s 310 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall not approve a vote tallying system
unless it:
(1) Correctly counts votes on ballots on which the proper number of
votes have been marked for any office or issue;
(2) Ignores votes marked for any office or issue where more than
the allowable number of votes have been marked, but correctly counts
the properly voted portions of the ballot;
(3) Accumulates a count of the specific number of ballots tallied
for each precinct, total votes by candidate for each office, and total
votes for and against each issue of the ballot in that precinct;
(4) Accommodates rotation of candidates' names on the ballot under
RCW 29A.36.140; and
(5) Produces precinct and cumulative totals in printed form((; and
(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested, certified, and used in at least one other state or
election jurisdiction)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 29A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Immediately upon the effective date of this section, no voting
system may be certified or purchased in Washington state unless it
meets or exceeds the 2002 guidelines of the federal elections
commission that will be required by 2006, and as they may be amended
by the federal elections commission or its statutory successor, or by
the official federal certifying authority, from time to time.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.44.250 and 2003 c 111 s 1124 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Paper ballots may not be tabulated at the precinct polling
place before the closing of the polls. Paper ballots must be tabulated
only after the closing of the polls. The tabulation of ballots, paper
or otherwise, shall be open to the public, but no persons except those
employed and authorized by the county auditor may touch a ballot card
or ballot container or operate vote tallying equipment.
(2) The results of the tabulation of paper ballots at the polls
((shall be delivered to the county auditor)) must be recorded and
posted at the polls as soon as the tabulation is complete and then
delivered to the county auditor.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.60.060 and 2003 c 111 s 1506 are each amended to
read as follows:
After the close of the polls, counties ((employing poll-site ballot
counting devices may telephonically or electronically transmit)) must
conduct a poll-site count. The accumulated tally for each ((device))
polling place must be transmitted to a central reporting location, with
witnesses, by telephone or electronic link to central reporting. The
electronic link or telephone must not be connected in any way to any
part of the voting or vote tabulating systems, nor may the reporting
systems use a disc, cartridge, or other medium created from the voting
system that carries official vote totals. Before ((making a telephonic
or electronic transmission)) transmitting totals by telephone or
electronically, the precinct election officer must create a printed
record of the results of the election for that poll site. During the
canvassing period the results transmitted ((telephonically)) by poll
worker via telephone or electronically must be considered unofficial
until a complete reconciliation of the results has been performed.
This reconciliation ((may)) must be accomplished by a direct loading of
the results from the memory pack into the central accumulator, ((or))
and a comparison of the report produced at the poll site on election
night with the results received by the central accumulating device.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.60.110 and 2003 c 111 s 1511 are each amended to
read as follows:
Immediately after their tabulation, all ballots counted at ((a
ballot counting center)) the polls must be sealed in containers that
identify the primary or election and be retained for at least sixty
days or according to federal law, whichever is longer. All ballots
tallied by poll-site ballot counting devices must be returned to the
elections department in sealed ballot containers on election day.
Counties composed entirely of islands or portions of counties composed
of islands shall collect the ballots within twenty-four hours of the
close of the polls.
Ballots tabulated in poll-site ballot counting devices must be
sealed by two of the election precinct officers at the polling place,
and a log of the seal and the names of the people sealing the container
must be completed. One copy of this log must be retained by the
inspector, one copy must be placed in the ballot transfer case, and one
copy must be transported with the ballots to the elections department,
where the seal number must be verified by the county auditor or a
designated representative. Ballots ((may)) must be transported by
((one)) two election employees ((if the container is sealed at the
poll)), and the names of the employees must appear on the log of the
seal and ((then)) verified when returned to the elections department.
Auditors using poll-site ballot counting devices may not conduct
((early)) pickup of counted ballots on election day until the polls are
closed and precincts for random manual audits of the voter-verified
paper ballots have been chosen. The audits must be conducted at the
polls.
In the presence of major party observers who are available, ballots
may be removed from the sealed containers at the elections department
and consolidated into one sealed container for storage purposes, unless
there is a discrepancy in the count as reported by the polling
official. The containers may only be opened by the canvassing board as
part of the canvass, or to conduct recounts, or under RCW
29A.60.170(3), or by order of the superior court in a contest or
election dispute. If the canvassing board opens a ballot container, it
shall make a full record of the additional tabulation or examination
made of the ballots. This record must be added to any other record of
the canvassing process in that county.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.60.170 and 2003 c 111 s 1517 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The counting center in a county using voting systems is under
the direction of the county auditor and must be observed by one
representative from each major political party, if representatives have
been appointed by the respective major political parties and these
representatives are present while the counting center is operating.
The proceedings must be open to the public, but no persons except those
employed and authorized by the county auditor may touch any ballot or
ballot container or operate a vote tallying system.
(2) In counties in which ballots are not counted at the polling
place as part of the mandatory random audit of the voter-verified paper
ballots of five percent of precincts, the official political party
observers((, upon mutual agreement,)) may ((request that)) each select
a precinct ((be selected at random)) on receipt of the ballots from the
polling place ((and that)). A manual count must be made of the number
of voter-verified paper ballots and of the votes cast on those ballots
on any office or issue. The ballots for that precinct must then be
counted by the vote tallying system, and this result will be compared
to the results of the manual count. This may be done as many as three
times during the tabulation of ballots on the day of the primary or
election. The manual recount of the voter-verified paper ballots is
the official tabulation in all cases where discrepancies in the vote
counting systems arise.
(3) In counties using poll-site ballot counting devices, the
political party observers((, upon mutual agreement,)) may each choose
as many as ((three)) two precincts and request that a manual count be
made of the number of voter-verified paper ballots and the votes cast
on those ballots on any office or issue. The results of this count
will be compared to the count of the precinct made by the poll-site
ballot counting device. The manual recount of the voter-verified paper
ballots is the official tabulation in all cases where discrepancies in
the vote counting systems arise. These selections must be made no
later than thirty minutes after the close of the polls. The manual
count of the voter-verified paper ballots must be completed within
forty-eight hours after the close of the polls. The process must take
place at a location designated by the county auditor for that purpose.
The political party observers must receive timely notice of the time
and location, and have the right to be present. However, the process
must proceed as scheduled if the observers are unable to attend.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.60.210 and 2003 c 111 s 1521 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the canvassing board finds that there is an apparent
discrepancy or an inconsistency in the returns of a primary or
election, the board may recanvass the voter-verified paper ballots ((or
voting devices)) in any precincts of the county. The canvassing board
shall conduct any necessary recanvass activity on or before the last
day to certify the primary or election and correct any error and
document the correction of any error that it finds.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.60.230 and 2003 c 111 s 1523 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Immediately after the official results of a state primary or
general election in a county are ascertained, the county auditor or
other election officer shall make an abstract of the number of
registered voters in each precinct and of all the votes cast in the
county at such state primary or general election for and against state
measures and for each candidate for federal, state, and legislative
office or for any other office which the secretary of state is required
by law to canvass. The cumulative report of the election and a copy of
the certificate of the election must be transmitted to the secretary of
state immediately, through electronic means and mailed with the
abstract of votes no later than the next business day following the
certification by the county canvassing board.
(2) After each general election, the county auditor or other
election officer shall provide to the secretary of state a report of
the number of absentee ballots cast in each precinct for and against
state measures and for each candidate for federal, state, and
legislative office or for any other office which the secretary of state
is required by law to canvass. The report may be included in the
abstract required by this section or may be transmitted to the
secretary of state separately, but in no event later than March 31st of
the year following the election. Absentee ballot results may not be
incorporated into votes cast at the polls for each precinct ((or may)).
They must be reported separately on a precinct-by-precinct basis.
(3) ((If absentee ballot results are not incorporated into votes
cast at the polls,)) The county auditor or other election official may
aggregate results from more than one precinct if the auditor, pursuant
to rules adopted by the secretary of state, finds that reporting a
single precinct's absentee ballot results would jeopardize the secrecy
of a person's ballot. To the extent practicable, precincts for which
absentee results are aggregated must be contiguous.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.64.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1601 are each amended to
read as follows:
An officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were
cast in a primary who was not declared nominated may file a written
application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast
at that primary for all persons for whom votes were cast for nomination
to that office.
An officer of a political party or any person for whom votes were
cast at any election may file a written application for a recount of
the votes or a portion of the votes cast at that election for all
candidates for election to that office.
Any group of five or more registered voters may file a written
application for a recount of the votes or a portion of the votes cast
upon any question or issue. They shall designate one of the members of
the group as chair and shall indicate the voting residence of each
member of the group.
An application for a recount of the votes cast for an office or on
a ballot measure must be filed with the officer with whom filings are
made for the jurisdiction.
An application for a recount must specify whether the recount will
be done manually of the voter-verified paper ballots or by the vote
tally system of the voter-verified paper ballots. A recount done by
the vote tally system must use programming that recounts and reports
only the office or ballot measure in question. The county shall also
provide for a test of the logic and accuracy of that program.
An application for a recount must be filed within three business
days after the county canvassing board or secretary of state has
declared the official results of the primary or election for the office
or issue for which the recount is requested.
This chapter applies to the recounting of votes cast by paper
ballots and to the recounting of votes recorded on voter-verified paper
ballots counted by a vote tally system.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.64.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1602 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the official canvass of all of the returns for any office at
any primary or election reveals that the difference in the number of
votes cast for a candidate apparently nominated or elected to any
office and the number of votes cast for the closest apparently defeated
opponent is less than ((two)) three thousand votes and also less than
((one-half of one)) five percent of the total number of votes cast for
both candidates, the county canvassing board shall conduct a manual
recount of the voter-verified paper ballots of all votes cast on that
position.
(((a))) Whenever such a difference occurs in the number of votes
cast for candidates for a position the declaration of candidacy for
which was filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state
shall, within three business days of the day that the returns of the
primary or election are first certified by the canvassing boards of
those counties, direct those boards to recount all votes cast on the
position.
(((b) If the difference in the number of votes cast for the
apparent winner and the closest apparently defeated opponent is less
than one hundred fifty votes and also less than one-fourth of one
percent of the total number of votes cast for both candidates, the
votes shall be recounted manually or as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.))
(2) A mandatory recount shall be conducted in the manner provided
by RCW 29A.64.030, 29A.64.040, and 29A.64.060. No cost of a mandatory
recount may be charged to any candidate.
(3) The apparent winner and closest apparently defeated opponent
for an office for which a manual recount is required under subsection
(1)(((b))) of this section may select an alternative method of
conducting the recount. To select such an alternative, the two
candidates shall agree to the alternative in a signed, written
statement filed with the election official for the office. The recount
shall be conducted using the alternative method if: It is suited to
the balloting system that was used for casting the votes for the
office; it involves the use of a vote tallying system that is approved
for use in this state by the secretary of state; it is a recount of the
voter-verified paper ballots; and the vote tallying system is readily
available in each county required to conduct the recount. If more than
one balloting system was used in casting votes for the office, an
alternative to a manual recount may be selected for each system.

Sec. 15 RCW 29A.64.090 and 2003 c 111 s 1609 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the official canvass of returns of any election reveals that
the difference in the number of votes cast for the approval of a
statewide measure and the number of votes cast for the rejection of
such measure is less than two thousand votes and also less than ((one-half of one)) two percent of the total number of votes cast on such
measure, the secretary of state shall direct that a recount of all
votes cast on such measure be made on such measure, in the manner
provided by RCW 29A.64.040 and 29A.64.060, and the cost of such recount
will be at state expense.

Sec. 16 RCW 29A.04.007 and 2003 c 111 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this title:
(1) "Ballot" means, as the context implies, either:
(a) The issues and offices to be voted upon in a jurisdiction or
portion of a jurisdiction at a particular primary, general election, or
special election;
(b) A facsimile of the contents of a particular ballot whether
printed on a paper ballot or ballot card or as part of a voting machine
or voting device;
(c) A physical ((or electronic)) record of the choices of an
individual voter in a particular primary, general election, or special
election; or
(d) The physical document on which the voter's choices are to be
recorded;
(2) "Paper ballot" means a piece of paper on which the ballot for
a particular election or primary has been printed, on which a voter may
record his or her choices for any candidate or for or against any
measure, and that is to be tabulated manually, and has been verified by
the voter by the act of marking the ballot or witnessing as correct a
voter-verified paper ballot;
(3) "Ballot card" means any type of card or piece of paper of any
size on which a voter may record his or her choices for any candidate
and for or against any measure and that is to be tabulated on a vote
tallying system;
(4) "Sample ballot" means a printed facsimile of all the issues and
offices on the ballot in a jurisdiction and is intended to give voters
notice of the issues, offices, and candidates that are to be voted on
at a particular primary, general election, or special election;
(5) "Provisional ballot" means a ballot issued to a voter at the
polling place on election day by the precinct election board, for one
of the following reasons:
(a) The voter's name does not appear in the poll book;
(b) There is an indication in the poll book that the voter has
requested an absentee ballot, but the voter wishes to vote at the
polling place;
(c) There is a question on the part of the voter concerning the
issues or candidates on which the voter is qualified to vote.

Sec. 17 RCW 29A.04.019 and 2003 c 111 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Counting center" means the facility or facilities designated by
the county auditor to count and canvass mail ballots, absentee ballots,
and polling place ballots that are transferred to a central site ((to
be counted, rather than)) after being counted by a poll-site ballot
counting device, or manually counted at the poll site, on the day of a
primary or election.

Sec. 18 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2001 c 36 s 1 and 2001 c 9 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of
corrections, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chairman of the energy facility site evaluation council,
the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of
health, the administrator of the Washington state health care
authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive
secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the director of the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation, the executive director of the state
investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of
licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the
office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of
parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director
of the public disclosure commission, the director of retirement
systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health
services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive
secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation,
the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the
director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and
state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College,
each district and each campus president of each state community
college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; ((and))
(4) Each professional staff member of the elections division of the
secretary of state; and
(5) Central Washington University board of trustees, board of
trustees of each community college, each member of the state board for
community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center
board of directors, committee for deferred compensation, Eastern
Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic
development finance authority, The Evergreen State College board of
trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices appeals board,
forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care
facilities authority, each member of the Washington health services
commission, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review
board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information services
board, interagency committee for outdoor recreation, state investment
board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, liquor
control board, lottery commission, marine oversight board, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, personnel appeals board, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearing board, public
employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board of tax
appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of
regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington state
maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board, Washington
public power supply system executive board, Washington State University
board of regents, Western Washington University board of trustees, and
fish and wildlife commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 As the Secure Electronic Registration and
Voting Experiment (SERVE) project cannot be certified to federal
standards as required of other voting systems since standards for
Internet voting do not exist, and partial review of SERVE by an
independent testing authority approved by the federal elections
commission is contracted to Ciber, who will review the voting portion
and not the Internet portion of the system; then the decision of the
recent independent review panel of SERVE, made up of the most qualified
individuals to review such a system, shall decide the use of SERVE for
voting in Washington state. If the panel finds the SERVE voting system
unacceptable, that it puts voters' rights at risk, then Washington
state will stop participation in the SERVE project and repeal the
authorization by P.L. 107-107, Title 16, Section 1604 and chapter 17,
Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., as necessary to protect the integrity of
Washington military and overseas voters.
The secretary of state shall provide a complete copy of the
original independent panel review results directly to Washington state
legislators, the governor, and county auditors. The independent panel
review will also be made available to the public.
If the review finds SERVE unacceptable as a voting system that
cannot secure the integrity of the vote, then in lieu of SERVE,
Washington state election officials will make every attempt to ensure
participation of military and overseas voters by education, the federal
voting assistance program, and blank ballots, and coordinating with
military facilities and embassies to expedite ballots to military and
overseas voters, including faxing and researching the use of e-mail to
expedite the time ballots are in transit to military and overseas
voters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) Sections 1, 6, 18, and 19 of this act
are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and take effect immediately.
(2) Sections 2 through 5 and 7 through 17 of this act take effect
July 1, 2004.

--- END ---