BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
If the water right for the use of water for agricultural purposes
on real property that is zoned or designated for agricultural use by a
local government is found to be relinquished under chapter 90.14 RCW or
is judicially found to be abandoned, the real property that is used for
agricultural purposes is exempt from taxation for as long as it is
zoned or designated for agricultural use by a local government or until
such time a new water right is issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2005 and thereafter.

--- END ---