BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The protection of the health and safety of the people of
Washington state is a paramount responsibility entrusted to the state.
One of the means for achieving such protection is through regulation of
health professionals and effective discipline of those health care
professionals who engage in unprofessional conduct. The vast majority
of health professionals are dedicated to their profession, and provide
quality services to those in their care. However, effective mechanisms
are needed to ensure that the small minority of health professionals
who engage in unprofessional conduct are reported and disciplined in a
timely and effective manner.
(2) Jurisdiction for health professions disciplinary processes is
divided between the secretary of health and fourteen independent boards
and commissions. While the presence of a board or commission
consisting of members of the profession that they regulate may add
value to some steps of the disciplinary process, in other instances
their involvement may be unnecessary, or even an impediment, to
safeguarding the public's health and safety. It is in the interests of
both public health and safety and credentialed health care
professionals that the health professions disciplinary system operate
effectively and appropriately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The task force on improvement of health
professions discipline is established. The governor must appoint its
members, and shall include:
(a) A representative of a medicare contracted professional review
organization in Washington state;
(b) One or more representatives of the University of Washington
school of health sciences or school of public health with expertise in
health professions regulation;
(c) A representative of the foundation for health care quality;
(d) Two representatives of health care professionals, neither of
whom currently serve, or have served in the past, on a health
professions disciplinary board or commission;
(e) A representative of hospital-based continuous quality
improvement programs under RCW 70.41.200;
(f) A representative of a hospital peer review committee;
(g) The secretary of the department of health;
(h) A representative of the superior court judges association;
(i) A representative of the Washington state bar association; and
(j) A representative of health care consumers, who does not
currently serve and has not in the past served, on a health professions
disciplinary board or commission.
(2) The task force shall conduct an independent review of the
funding of the health professions and all phases of the current health
professions disciplinary process, from report intake through final case
closure, and shall, at a minimum, examine and address the following
issues:
(a) The ability of the disciplining authorities identified in RCW
18.130.040 to effectively safeguard the public from potentially harmful
health care practitioners while also ensuring the due process rights of
credentialed health care practitioners;
(b) The feasibility of developing a uniform performance measurement
system for health professions discipline;
(c) Whether there are components to the current health professions
discipline system that serve as impediments to improving the quality of
health professions discipline, including consideration of:
(i) The value of boards and commissions in the health professions
disciplinary process; and
(ii) The respective roles of the secretary and boards and
commissions in health professions disciplinary functions;
(d) The feasibility of allowing law enforcement agencies to share
information from criminal investigations of credentialed health care
providers regardless of whether the provider was not ultimately
convicted; and
(e) Alternative fee structures for health care professionals to
simplify funding and the use of those funds across all health care
professions.
(3) The task force may establish technical advisory committees to
assist in its efforts, and shall provide opportunities for interested
parties to comment upon the task force's findings and recommendations
prior to being finalized.
(4) Staff support to the task force shall be provided by the
department of health and the office of financial management.
(5) The task force shall submit its report and recommendations for
improvement of health professions discipline to the relevant committees
of the legislature and the governor by October 1, 2005.
(6) Nothing in this act limits the secretary of health's authority
to modify the internal processes or organizational framework of the
department.
(7) Members of the task force shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.24.260 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, dentists licensed
under chapter 18.32 RCW, and pharmacists licensed under chapter 18.64
RCW)) Any member of a health profession listed under RCW 18.130.040
who, in good faith, makes a report, files charges, or presents evidence
against another member of ((their)) a health profession based on the
claimed ((incompetency or gross misconduct)) unprofessional conduct as
provided in RCW 18.130.180 or inability to practice with reasonable
skill and safety to consumers by reason of any physical or mental
condition as provided in RCW 18.130.170 of such person before the
((medical quality assurance commission established under chapter 18.71
RCW, in a proceeding under chapter 18.32 RCW, or to the board of
pharmacy under RCW 18.64.160)) agency, board, or commission responsible
for disciplinary activities for the person's profession under chapter
18.130 RCW, shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out
of such activities. A person prevailing upon the good faith defense
provided for in this section is entitled to recover expenses and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense and in
addition shall receive statutory damages of twenty-five thousand
dollars.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.71.0193 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 327 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A ((licensed health care professional)) physician licensed
under this chapter shall report to the commission when he or she has
personal knowledge that a practicing physician has either committed an
act or acts which may constitute statutorily defined unprofessional
conduct or that a practicing physician may be unable to practice
medicine with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of
illness, drunkenness, excessive use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or
any other type of material, or as a result of any mental or physical
conditions.
(2) Reporting under this section is not required by:
(a) An appropriately appointed peer review committee member of a
licensed hospital or by an appropriately designated professional review
committee member of a county or state medical society during the
investigative phase of their respective operations if these
investigations are completed in a timely manner; or
(b) A treating licensed health care professional of a physician
currently involved in a treatment program as long as the physician
patient actively participates in the treatment program and the
physician patient's impairment does not constitute a clear and present
danger to the public health, safety, or welfare.
(3) The commission may impose disciplinary sanctions, including
license suspension or revocation, on any ((health care professional
subject to the jurisdiction of the commission)) physician licensed
under this chapter who has failed to comply with this section.
(4) Every physician licensed under this chapter who reports to the
commission as required under subsection (1) of this section in good
faith is immune from civil liability for damages arising out of the
report, whether direct or derivative. A person prevailing upon the
defense provided for in this section is entitled to recover expenses
and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense and
in addition shall receive statutory damages of ten thousand dollars.
Statutory damages may be denied if the court finds that the complaint
or information was communicated in bad faith.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.57.011 and 1987 c 150 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the
discipline of licensees under this chapter.
(2) The standard of proof for all disciplinary actions, other than
criminal actions, under chapter 18.130 RCW against an osteopathic
physician licensed under this chapter is proof by a preponderance of
the evidence, except actions where the commission orders the revocation
of the osteopathic physician's license. The standard of proof to order
the revocation of the osteopathic physician's license is proof by
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.71.019 and 1996 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice and the issuance and denial of licenses and
discipline of licensees under this chapter. When a panel of the
commission revokes a license, the respondent may request review of the
revocation order of the panel by the remaining members of the
commission not involved in the initial investigation. The respondent's
request for review must be filed within twenty days of the effective
date of the order revoking the respondent's license. The review shall
be scheduled for hearing by the remaining members of the commission not
involved in the initial investigation within sixty days. The
commission shall adopt rules establishing review procedures.
(2) The standard of proof for all disciplinary actions, other than
criminal actions, under chapter 18.130 RCW against a physician licensed
under this chapter is a preponderance of the evidence, except actions
where the commission orders the revocation of the physician's license.
Where the commission orders the revocation of the physician's license,
the standard of proof shall be clear and convincing evidence.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.130.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 601 are each amended
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to strengthen and consolidate
disciplinary and licensure procedures for the licensed health and
health-related professions and businesses by providing a uniform
disciplinary act with standardized procedures for the licensure of
health care professionals and the enforcement of laws the purpose of
which is to ((assure the public of the adequacy of professional
competence and conduct in the healing arts)) reduce unprofessional
conduct and unsafe practices in health care, protect the public health,
safety, and welfare, and promote patient safety.
It is also the intent of the legislature that all health and
health-related professions newly credentialed by the state come under
the Uniform Disciplinary Act.
Further, the legislature declares that the addition of public
members on all health care commissions and boards can give both the
state and the public, which it has a paramount statutory responsibility
to protect, assurances of accountability and confidence in the various
practices of health care.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.130.040 and 2003 c 275 s 2 and 2003 c 258 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter
18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
and
(xxii) Recreational therapists.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses
based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and
the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to
denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the
applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW 18.130.160
by the disciplining authority.
(4) The standard of proof for all disciplinary actions, other than
criminal actions, under this chapter is proof by a preponderance of the
evidence, except actions regarding licenses issued under chapters 18.57
and 18.71 RCW. The preponderance of the evidence standard is
consistent with the primary purpose for proceedings under this chapter,
which is the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare.
(5) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.130.150 and 1997 c 58 s 831 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked under
this chapter may petition the disciplining authority for reinstatement
after an interval as determined by the disciplining authority in the
order. The disciplining authority shall hold hearings on the petition
and may deny the petition or may order reinstatement and impose terms
and conditions as provided in RCW 18.130.160 and issue an order of
reinstatement. The person whose license has been suspended or revoked
has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the
license should be reinstated. The disciplining authority may consider
the following nonexclusive factors when assessing whether to reinstate
the license:
(i) The person's character, standing, and professional reputation
in the community in which he or she practiced before the suspension or
revocation;
(ii) The ethical standards the person observed in his or her health
care practice;
(iii) The nature and character of the charges for which the license
was suspended or revoked;
(iv) The sufficiency of the action taken in connection with the
charges and whether restitution was made when required;
(v) The time that has elapsed since the suspension or revocation
and the person's attitude, conduct, and reformation subsequent to the
suspension or revocation;
(vi) The person's prior proficiency in practicing the profession
and his or her expected competency should the license be reinstated;
and
(vii) The sincerity, frankness, and truthfulness of the person in
presenting and discussing the factors relating to the suspension or
revocation.
(b) The disciplining authority may require successful completion of
an examination as a condition of reinstatement.
(2) A person whose license has been suspended for noncompliance
with a support order or a residential or visitation order under RCW
74.20A.320 may petition for reinstatement at any time by providing the
secretary a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the person is in compliance with the order. If
the person has continued to meet all other requirements for
reinstatement during the suspension, the secretary shall automatically
reissue the person's license upon receipt of the release, and payment
of a reinstatement fee, if any.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.130.180 and 1995 c 336 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct for any license holder or applicant under the
jurisdiction of this chapter:
(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude,
dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of the person's
profession, whether the act constitutes a crime or not. If the act
constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a
condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the
ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or
applicant of the crime described in the indictment or information, and
of the person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the
purposes of this section, conviction includes all instances in which a
plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and
all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended.
Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A
RCW;
(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in
obtaining a license or in reinstatement thereof;
(3) All advertising which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;
(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in
injury to a patient or which creates an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed. The use of a nontraditional treatment by itself
shall not constitute unprofessional conduct, provided that it does not
result in injury to a patient or create an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed;
(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's
license to practice any health care profession by competent authority
in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the
order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the
revocation, suspension, or restriction. Full faith and credit will be
extended to the action by the competent authority, even if procedures
or standards of proof vary in the other jurisdiction;
(6) The possession, use, prescription for use, or distribution of
controlled substances or legend drugs in any way other than for
legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion of controlled substances
or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or prescribing
controlled substances for oneself;
(7) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative
rule regulating the profession in question, including any statute or
rule defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional
conduct or practice;
(8) Failure to cooperate with the disciplining authority by:
(a) Not furnishing any papers or documents;
(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation
covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the
disciplining authority;
(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the disciplining
authority, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused
in the proceeding; or
(d) Not providing reasonable and timely access for authorized
representatives of the disciplining authority seeking to perform
practice reviews at facilities utilized by the license holder;
(9) Failure to comply with an order issued by the disciplining
authority or a stipulation for informal disposition entered into with
the disciplining authority;
(10) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice when a
license is required;
(11) Violations of rules established by any health agency;
(12) Practice beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or
rule;
(13) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the
business or profession;
(14) Failure to adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent
that the consumer's health or safety is at risk;
(15) Engaging in a profession involving contact with the public
while suffering from a contagious or infectious disease involving
serious risk to public health;
(16) Promotion for personal gain of any unnecessary or
inefficacious drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service;
(17) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the
practice of the person's profession. For the purposes of this
subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in
which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this
section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;
(18) The procuring, or aiding or abetting in procuring, a criminal
abortion;
(19) The offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat
disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the
treating, operating, or prescribing for any health condition by a
method, means, or procedure which the licensee refuses to divulge upon
demand of the disciplining authority;
(20) The willful betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as
recognized by law;
(21) Violation of chapter 19.68 RCW;
(22) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding
by willful misrepresentation of facts before the disciplining authority
or its authorized representative, or by the use of threats or
harassment against any patient or witness to prevent them from
providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal
action, or by the use of financial inducements to any patient or
witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing
evidence in a disciplinary proceeding;
(23) Current misuse of:
(a) Alcohol;
(b) Controlled substances; or
(c) Legend drugs;
(24) Abuse of a client or patient or sexual contact with a client
or patient;
(25) Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or
subsidy offered by a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services intended for patients, in contemplation of
a sale or for use in research publishable in professional journals,
where a conflict of interest is presented, as defined by rules of the
disciplining authority, in consultation with the department, based on
recognized professional ethical standards.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.130.900 and 1986 c 259 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter shall be known and cited as the uniform
disciplinary act.
(2) This chapter applies to any conduct, acts, or conditions
occurring on or after June 11, 1986.
(3) This chapter does not apply to or govern the construction of
and disciplinary action for any conduct, acts, or conditions occurring
prior to June 11, 1986. Such conduct, acts, or conditions must be
construed and disciplinary action taken according to the provisions of
law existing at the time of the occurrence in the same manner as if
this chapter had not been enacted.
(4) The amendments to chapter 18.130 RCW in sections 7, 8, 9, and
10 of this act are clarifying amendments and should not be construed as
a change in the construction and application of chapter 18.130 RCW.

--- END ---