BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Adult family homes have experienced
significant problems in both availability and affordability of
liability insurance. Currently, many adult family homes are unable to
find liability insurance coverage in both the admitted and nonadmitted
insurance market, which threatens their continued operation. Several
adult family homes have had to close their doors or refuse service to
certain types of high-risk clients. Adult family homes provide a
valuable alternative to institutional care and promote a high degree of
independent living for residents. The continued viability of adult
family homes is an essential long-term care option for our aging
population. The legislature intends to increase the availability of
cost-effective, high quality adult care. Therefore, the legislature
intends to require all insurers authorized to write commercial or
professional liability insurance to be members of a joint underwriting
association created to provide liability insurance for adult family
home services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Association" means the not-for-profit joint underwriting
association established under this chapter.
(2) "Adult family home insurance" means insurance coverage against
the legal liability of the insured and against loss, damage, or expense
incident to a claim arising out of the death or injury of any person as
the result of negligence or malpractice in rendering professional
service by any licensee.
(3) "Licensee" means any person or facility licensed as an adult
family home under chapter 70.128 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The commissioner must approve by July 1,
2004, a reasonable plan for the establishment of a nonprofit, joint
underwriting association for adult family home insurance, subject to
the conditions and limitations contained in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The association must be comprised of all
insurers possessing a certificate of authority to write and engage in
writing general casualty insurance within this state on a direct basis,
including the liability portion of multiperil policies, but not of
ocean marine insurance. Every such insurer must be a member of the
association and must remain a member as a condition of its authority to
continue to transact business in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any licensee may apply to the association to
purchase adult family home insurance and the association must offer a
policy with reasonable liability limits as determined by the
association based on standard insurance industry practices. The
commissioner must require the use of a rating plan for adult family
home insurance that permits rates to be modified according to the type,
size, and past loss experience of the licensee including any other
difference among licensees that can be demonstrated to have a probable
effect upon losses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The commissioner may select an insurer to
administer a plan established under this chapter. The insurer must be
admitted to transact the business of insurance in the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The commissioner may adopt all rules
necessary to ensure the efficient, equitable operation of the
association, including but not limited to rules requiring or limiting
certain policy provisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---