BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.88.010 and 1986 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Day care service providers)) Persons and entities that provide
services to children and vulnerable adults have experienced major
problems in both the availability and affordability of liability
insurance. Premiums for such insurance policies have recently grown
((as much as five hundred percent)) and the availability of such
insurance in Washington markets has greatly diminished.
The availability of quality ((day care)) services for children and
vulnerable adults is essential to achieving such goals as increased
work force productivity, family self-sufficiency, and protection for
adults and children at risk ((due to poverty and abuse)). The
unavailability of adequate liability insurance threatens to decrease
the availability of ((day care)) essential services for children and
vulnerable adults.
This chapter is intended to remedy the problem of unavailable
liability insurance ((for day care services)) by requiring all insurers
authorized to write ((commercial or professional liability)) general
casualty insurance to be members of a joint underwriting association
created to provide liability insurance for ((day care services))
persons and entities who provide services to children and vulnerable
adults.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.88.020 and 1986 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Association" means the joint underwriting association
established ((pursuant to the provisions of)) under this chapter.
(2) (("Day care)) "Board" means the governing board of the
association.
(3) "Liability insurance" means insurance coverage against the
legal liability of the insured and against loss, damage, or expense
incident to a claim arising out of the death or injury of any person as
the result of negligence or malpractice in rendering professional
service by any licensee.
(((3))) (4) "Licensee" means any ((person)) nonprofit entity or
facility ((licensed to provide day care)) providing services ((pursuant
to chapter 74.15 RCW)) to children or vulnerable adults that:
(a) Is licensed or regulated under Title 70 or 74 RCW; or
(b) Contracts with the department of social and health services to
provide the services.
(5) "Vulnerable adult" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.34.020(13)
and 74.34.021.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.88.030 and 1986 c 141 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner ((shall approve by July 1, 1986,)) must
appoint a board by July 1, 2004. The governing board is subject to
supervision by the commissioner. Members of the governing board may be
reimbursed by the association for actual and necessary expenses
incurred to attend meetings.
(2) The board must develop a reasonable plan ((for the
establishment of)) of operation to establish a nonprofit, joint
underwriting association for ((day care)) liability insurance, subject
to the conditions and limitations contained in this chapter.
(3) The association must offer coverage by January 1, 2005.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.88.040 and 1986 c 141 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The association shall be comprised of all insurers possessing a
certificate of authority to write and engage in writing ((property
and)) general casualty insurance within this state on a direct basis,
including the liability portion of multiperil policies, but not of
ocean marine insurance. Every such insurer shall be a member of the
association and shall remain a member as a condition of its authority
to continue to transact business in this state.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.88.050 and 1986 c 141 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any licensee may apply to the association to purchase ((day care))
liability insurance, and the association shall offer a policy with
reasonable liability limits ((of at least one hundred thousand dollars
per occurrence)) as determined by the commissioner based on standard
insurance industry practices. The commissioner shall require the use
of a rating plan for ((day care)) liability insurance that permits
rates to be modified for individual licensees according to the type,
size and past loss experience of the licensee including any other
difference among licensees that can be demonstrated to have a probable
effect upon losses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.88 RCW
to read as follows:
The commissioner may select one or more insurers to manage the
operations of the association established under this chapter. Every
managing insurer must be admitted to transact the business of insurance
in the state of Washington.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.88.070 and 1986 c 141 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commissioner may adopt all rules necessary to ensure the
efficient, equitable operation of the association, including but not
limited to, rules requiring or limiting certain policy provisions or
requiring development and implementation of risk management programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 48.88 RCW
to read as follows:
The association is not a member of the guaranty fund created under
chapter 48.32 RCW. The guaranty fund, this state, and any political
subdivisions are not responsible for the losses sustained by the
association.

--- END ---