BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.20.020 and 2003 c 111 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person filing a declaration of candidacy for an office shall,
at the time of filing, be a registered voter and possess the
qualifications specified by law for persons who may be elected to the
office.
(2) Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a
temporary elected position such as a charter review board member or
freeholder, no person may file for more than one office.
(3) The name of a candidate for an office shall not appear on a
ballot for that office unless, except as provided in RCW 3.46.067 and
3.50.057, the candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of
candidacy is filed, properly registered to vote in the geographic area
represented by the office. For the purposes of this section, each
geographic area in which registered voters may cast ballots for an
office is represented by that office. If a person elected to an office
must be nominated from a district or similar division of the geographic
area represented by the office, the name of a candidate for the office
shall not appear on a primary ballot for that office unless the
candidate is, at the time the candidate's declaration of candidacy is
filed, properly registered to vote in that district or division. The
officer with whom declarations of candidacy must be filed under this
title shall review each such declaration filed regarding compliance
with this subsection.
(4) ((This section does not apply to the office of a member of the
United States Congress.)) The name of a candidate for a partisan office
may not appear on the primary ballot unless certified as a nominee at
a party convention.
(5) The requirements of voter registration and residence within the
geographic area of a district do not apply to candidates for
congressional office. Qualifications for United States congress are
specified in the United States Constitution.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.20.110 and 2003 c 111 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
A "convention" for the purposes of this chapter, is an organized
assemblage of registered voters representing an independent candidate
or candidates or a ((new)) major or minor political party,
organization, or principle. As used in this chapter, the term
"election jurisdiction" shall mean the state or any political
subdivision or jurisdiction of the state from which partisan officials
are elected. This term shall include county commissioner districts or
council districts for members of a county legislative authority,
counties for county officials who are nominated and elected on a
county-wide basis, legislative districts for members of the
legislature, congressional districts for members of Congress, and the
state for president and vice president, members of the United States
senate, and state officials who are elected on a statewide basis.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.20.120 and 2003 c 111 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any nomination of a candidate for partisan public office ((by
other than a major political party)) may be made only: (a) In a
convention held not earlier than the last Saturday in June and not
later than the first Saturday in July or during any of the seven days
immediately preceding the first day for filing declarations of
candidacy as fixed in accordance with RCW 29A.28.040; (b) as provided
by RCW 29A.60.020; or (c) as otherwise provided in this section.
(2) Nominations of candidates for president and vice president of
the United States other than by a major political party may be made
either at a convention conducted under subsection (1) of this section,
or at a similar convention taking place not earlier than the first
Sunday in July and not later than seventy days before the general
election. Conventions held during this time period may not nominate
candidates for any public office other than president and vice
president of the United States, except as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) If a special filing period for a partisan office is opened
under RCW 29A.24.210, candidates ((of minor political parties and
independent candidates)) may file for office during that special filing
period. The names of those candidates may not appear on the ballot
unless they are nominated by convention held no later than five days
after the close of the special filing period and a certificate of
nomination is filed with the filing officer no later than three days
after the convention. The requirements of RCW 29A.20.130 do not apply
to such a convention. If primary ballots or a voters' pamphlet are
ordered to be printed before the deadline for submitting the
certificate of nomination and the certificate has not been filed, then
the candidate's name will be included but may not appear on the general
election ballot unless the certificate is timely filed and the
candidate otherwise qualifies to appear on that ballot.
(4) A major or minor political party may hold more than one
convention ((but in no case shall any such party)). A major political
party shall not nominate more than three candidates for any one
partisan public office or position. A minor political party shall not
nominate more than one candidate for any one partisan public office or
position. For the purpose of nominating candidates for the offices of
president and vice president, United States senator, or a statewide
office, a ((minor)) party or independent candidate holding multiple
conventions may add together the number of signatures of different
individuals from each convention obtained in support of the candidate
or candidates in order to obtain the number required by RCW 29A.20.140.
For all other offices for which nominations are made, signatures of the
requisite number of registered voters must be obtained at a single
convention.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.20.130 and 2003 c 111 s 507 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each ((minor)) party or independent candidate must publish a notice
in a newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the
party or the candidate intends to hold a convention. The notice must
appear at least ten days before the convention is to be held, and shall
state the date, time, and place of the convention. Additionally, it
shall include the mailing address of the person or organization
sponsoring the convention.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.20.150 and 2003 c 111 s 509 are each amended to
read as follows:
A nominating petition submitted under this chapter shall clearly
identify the name of the ((minor)) party or independent candidate
convention as it appears on the certificate of nomination as required
by RCW 29A.20.160(3). The petition shall also contain a statement that
the person signing the petition is a registered voter of the state of
Washington and shall have a space for the voter to sign his or her name
and to print his or her name and address. No person may sign more than
one nominating petition under this chapter for an office for a primary
((or)) election.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.20.160 and 2003 c 111 s 510 are each amended to
read as follows:
A certificate evidencing nominations made at a convention must:
(1) Be in writing;
(2) Contain the name of each person nominated, his or her
residence, and the office for which he or she is named, and if the
nomination is for the offices of president and vice president of the
United States, a sworn statement from both nominees giving their
consent to the nomination;
(3) Identify the ((minor)) political party or the independent
candidate on whose behalf the convention was held;
(4) Be verified by the oath of the presiding officer and secretary;
(5) Be accompanied by a nominating petition or petitions bearing
the signatures and addresses of registered voters equal in number to
that required by RCW 29A.20.140;
(6) Contain proof of publication of the notice of calling the
convention; and
(7) Be submitted to the appropriate filing officer not later than
one week following the adjournment of the convention at which the
nominations were made. If the nominations are made only for offices
whose jurisdiction is entirely within one county, the certificate and
nominating petitions must be filed with the county auditor. If a
((minor)) party or independent candidate convention nominates any
candidates for offices whose jurisdiction encompasses more than one
county, all nominating petitions and the convention certificates must
be filed with the secretary of state.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.20.170 and 2003 c 111 s 511 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If two or more valid certificates of nomination are filed
purporting to nominate different candidates for the same position using
the same minor political party name, the filing officer must give
effect to both certificates. If conflicting claims to the minor
political party name are not resolved either by mutual agreement or by
a judicial determination of the right to the name, the candidates must
be treated as independent candidates. Disputes over the right to the
minor political party name must not be permitted to delay the printing
of either ballots or a voters' pamphlet. Other candidates nominated by
the same conventions may continue to use the partisan affiliation
unless a court of competent jurisdiction directs otherwise.
(2) A person affected may petition the superior court of the county
in which the filing officer is located for a judicial determination of
the right to the name of a minor political party, either before or
after documents are filed with the filing officer. The court shall
resolve the conflict between competing claims to the use of the same
party name according to the following principles: (a) The prior
established public use of the name during previous elections by a party
composed of or led by the same individuals or individuals in documented
succession; (b) prior established public use of the name earlier in the
same election cycle; (c) the nomination of a more complete slate of
candidates for a number of offices or in a number of different regions
of the state; (d) documented affiliation with a national or statewide
party organization with an established use of the name; (e) the first
date of filing of a certificate of nomination; and (f) such other
indicia of an established right to use of the name as the court may
deem relevant. If more than one filing officer is involved, and one of
them is the secretary of state, the petition must be filed in the
superior court for Thurston county. Upon resolving the conflict
between competing claims, the court may also address any ballot
designation for the candidate who does not prevail.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.20.200 and 2003 c 111 s 514 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not later than the Friday immediately preceding the first day for
candidates to file, the secretary of state shall notify the county
auditors of the names and designations of the major party candidates
and all minor party and independent candidates who have filed valid
convention certificates and nominating petitions with that office.
Except for the offices of president and vice president, persons
nominated under this chapter shall file declarations of candidacy as
provided by RCW 29A.24.030 and 29A.24.070. The name of a candidate
nominated at a convention shall not be printed upon the primary ballot
unless he or she pays the fee required by law to be paid ((by
candidates for the same office to be nominated at a primary)).

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.52.110 and 2003 c 111 s 1302 are each amended to
read as follows:
Candidates for ((the following offices shall be nominated at))
partisan offices will appear on the ballot at primaries held ((pursuant
to the provisions of)) under this chapter((:
(1) Congressional offices;
(2) All state offices except (a) judicial offices and (b) the
office of superintendent of public instruction;
(3) All county offices except (a) judicial offices and (b) those
offices where a county home rule charter provides otherwise)).

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.36.170 and 2003 c 111 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 29A.36.180 and in subsection (2) of
this section, on the ballot at the general election for ((a
nonpartisan)) an office for which a primary was held, only the names of
the candidate who received the greatest number of votes and the
candidate who received the next greatest number of votes for that
office shall appear under the title of that office, and the names shall
appear in that order. If a primary was conducted, no candidate's name
may be printed on the subsequent general election ballot unless he or
she receives at least one percent of the total votes cast for that
office at the preceding primary. On the ballot at the general election
for ((any other nonpartisan)) an office for which no primary was held,
the names of the candidates shall be listed in the order determined
under RCW 29A.36.130.
(2) On the ballot at the general election for the office of justice
of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the
superior court, or state superintendent of public instruction, if a
candidate in a contested primary receives a majority of all the votes
cast for that office or position, only the name of that candidate may
be printed under the title of the office for that position.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 29A.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Whenever candidates for partisan office are to be elected, the
general election must be preceded by a primary conducted under this
chapter, except as otherwise provided by law. Based upon votes cast at
the primary, two candidates must be certified as qualified to appear on
the general election ballot, under RCW 29A.52.320 and 29A.36.170.
(2) A primary may not be used to select the nominees of a political
party. A primary is a critical stage in the public process by which
voters elect candidates to public office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04
RCW to read as follows:
"Partisan office" means an office for which a candidate may
identify a political party under RCW 29A.24.030(3), and is limited to
the following offices:
(1) United States senator and representative;
(2) All state offices except: (a) Judicial offices; and (b) the
office of superintendent of public instruction;
(3) All county offices except: (a) Judicial offices; and (b) those
offices where a county home rule charter provides otherwise.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.04.127 and 2003 c 111 s 122 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Primary" ((or "primary election")) means a statutory qualifying
procedure ((for nominating candidates to public office at the polls))
by which all voters are permitted to cast a vote for his or her
preferred candidate for each office appearing on the ballot, without
any limitation based on party preference or affiliation, of either the
voter or the candidate with the result that not more than two
candidates for each office will qualify to appear on the general
election ballot.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.04.310 and 2003 c 111 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Nominating)) Primaries for general elections to be held in
November must be held on the third Tuesday of the preceding September
or on the seventh Tuesday immediately preceding such general election,
whichever occurs first.

Sec. 15 RCW 29A.24.160 and 2003 c 111 s 616 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filings to fill a void in candidacy for ((nonpartisan)) an office
must be made in the same manner and with the same official as required
during the regular filing period for such office((, except that)).
Nominating ((signature)) petitions that ((may be)) are required of
candidates filing ((for certain district offices)) during the normal
filing period may not be required of candidates filing during the
special three-day filing period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 29A.28
RCW to read as follows:
If the death or disqualification of a candidate for a partisan or
nonpartisan office does not give rise to the opening of a new filing
period under RCW 29A.24.170, then the following will occur:
(1) If the candidate dies or becomes disqualified after filing a
declaration of candidacy but before the close of the filing period,
then the declaration of candidacy is void and his or her name will not
appear on the ballot;
(2) If the candidate dies or becomes disqualified after the close
of the filing period but before the day of the primary, then his or her
name will appear on the primary ballot and all otherwise valid votes
for that candidate will be tabulated. The candidate's name will not
appear on the general election ballot even if he or she otherwise would
have qualified to do so, but no other candidate will advance, or be
substituted, in the place of that candidate. If the candidate was the
only candidate to qualify to advance to the general election, then the
general election for that office lapses, and the office will be
regarded as vacant as of the time the newly elected official would have
otherwise taken office; and
(3) If the candidate dies or becomes disqualified on or after the
day of the primary, and he or she would have otherwise qualified to
appear on the general election ballot, then his or her name will appear
on the general election ballot and all otherwise valid votes for that
candidate will be tabulated. If the candidate received a number of
votes sufficient to be elected to office, but for his or her death or
disqualification, then the office will be regarded as vacant as of the
time the newly elected official would have otherwise taken office.

Sec. 17 RCW 29A.28.040 and 2003 c 111 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the United States house of
representatives or the United States senate from this state, the
governor shall order a special election to fill the vacancy.
(2) Within ten days of such vacancy occurring, he or she shall
issue a writ of election fixing a date for the special vacancy election
not less than ninety days after the issuance of the writ, fixing a date
for the primary for ((nominating)) qualifying candidates for the
special vacancy election not less than thirty days before the day fixed
for holding the special vacancy election, fixing the dates for the
special filing period, and designating the term or part of the term for
which the vacancy exists. If the vacancy is in the office of United
States representative, the writ of election shall specify the
congressional district that is vacant.
(3) If the vacancy occurs less than six months before a state
general election and before the second Friday following the close of
the filing period for that general election, the special primary and
special vacancy elections shall be held in concert with the state
primary and state general election in that year.
(4) If the vacancy occurs on or after the first day for filing
under RCW 29A.24.050 and on or before the second Friday following the
close of the filing period, a special filing period of three normal
business days shall be fixed by the governor and notice thereof given
to all media, including press, radio, and television within the area in
which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that, insofar as
possible, all interested persons will be aware of such filing period.
The last day of the filing period shall not be later than the third
Tuesday before the primary ((at which candidates are to be nominated)).
The names of candidates who have filed valid declarations of candidacy
during this three-day period shall appear on the approaching primary
ballot.
(5) If the vacancy occurs later than the second Friday following
the close of the filing period, a special primary and special vacancy
election to fill the position shall be held after the next state
general election but, in any event, no later than the ninetieth day
following the November election.

Sec. 18 RCW 29A.32.030 and 2003 c 111 s 803 are each amended to
read as follows:
The voters' pamphlet must contain:
(1) Information about each ballot measure initiated by or referred
to the voters for their approval or rejection as required by RCW
29A.32.070;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, advocating
the candidacies of ((nominees)) candidates qualified to appear on the
ballot for the office of president and vice president of the United
States, United States senator, United States representative, governor,
lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, state
auditor, attorney general, commissioner of public lands, superintendent
of public instruction, insurance commissioner, state senator, state
representative, justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of
appeals, or judge of the superior court. Candidates may also submit a
campaign mailing address and telephone number and a photograph not more
than five years old and of a size and quality that the secretary of
state determines to be suitable for reproduction in the voters'
pamphlet;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) In even-numbered years, a section explaining how voters may
participate in the election campaign process; the address and telephone
number of the public disclosure commission established under RCW
42.17.350; and a summary of the disclosure requirements that apply when
contributions are made to candidates and political committees;
(5) In even-numbered years the name, address, and telephone number
of each political party ((with nominees listed in the pamphlet, if
filed with the secretary of state by the state committee of a major
political party or the presiding officer of the convention of a minor
political party)) for which a candidate appearing on the ballot has
expressed his or her declaration of candidacy, if the party has
provided that information to the secretary of state;
(6) In each odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected,
information explaining the precinct caucus and convention process used
by each major political party to elect delegates to its national
presidential candidate nominating convention. The pamphlet must also
provide a description of the statutory procedures by which minor
political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;
(7) In even-numbered years, a description of the office of precinct
committee officer and its duties;
(8) An application form for an absentee ballot;
(9) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language for proposed measures under RCW 29A.32.080;
(10) Any additional information pertaining to elections as may be
required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is deemed
informative to the voters.

Sec. 19 RCW 29A.36.010 and 2003 c 111 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before the day following the last day allowed for ((political
parties to fill vacancies in the ticket as provided by RCW 29A.28.010))
candidates to withdraw under RCW 29A.24.130, the secretary of state
shall certify to each county auditor a list of the candidates who have
filed declarations of candidacy and valid convention certificates and
nominating petitions in his or her office for the primary. For each
office, the certificate shall include the name of each candidate, his
or her address, and his or her party designation, if any.

Sec. 20 RCW 29A.36.100 and 2003 c 111 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for the candidates for the positions of president and vice
president or for a partisan or nonpartisan office for which no primary
is required, the names of all candidates who, under this title, filed
a declaration of candidacy((, were certified as a candidate to fill a
vacancy on a major party ticket, or were nominated as an independent or
minor party candidate)) and valid convention certificates and
nominating petitions will appear on the appropriate ballot at the
primary throughout the jurisdiction ((in which they are to be
nominated)) of the office for which they are a candidate.

Sec. 21 RCW 29A.36.200 and 2003 c 111 s 920 are each amended to
read as follows:
The names of the persons certified ((as nominees)) by the secretary
of state or the county canvassing board as having qualified to appear
on the general election ballot shall be printed on the ballot at the
ensuing election.
No name of any candidate ((whose nomination at a primary is
required by law shall)) for an office for which a primary is conducted
may be placed upon the ballot at a general or special election unless
it appears upon the certificate of either (1) the secretary of
state((,)) or (2) the county canvassing board((, or (3) a minor party
convention or the state or county central committee of a major
political party to fill a vacancy on its ticket under RCW 29A.28.020)).
Excluding the office of precinct committee officer or a temporary
elected position such as a charter review board member or freeholder,
a candidate's name shall not appear more than once upon a ballot for a
position regularly nominated or elected at the same election.

Sec. 22 RCW 29A.52.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1301 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever it shall be necessary to hold a special election in an
odd-numbered year to fill an unexpired term of any office which is
scheduled to be voted upon for a full term in an even-numbered year, no
((September)) primary election shall be held in the odd-numbered year
if, after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, ((either of
the following circumstances exist:
(1) No more than one candidate of each qualified political party
has filed a declaration of candidacy for the same partisan office to be
filled; or
(2))) no more than two candidates have filed a declaration of
candidacy for a single ((nonpartisan)) office to be filled.
In ((either)) this event, the officer with whom the declarations of
candidacy were filed shall immediately notify all candidates concerned
and the names of the candidates that would have been printed upon the
((September)) primary ballot, but for the provisions of this section,
shall be printed as ((nominees)) candidates for the positions sought
upon the ((November)) general election ballot.

Sec. 23 RCW 29A.52.320 and 2003 c 111 s 1310 are each amended to
read as follows:
No later than the day following the certification of the returns of
any primary, the secretary of state shall certify to the appropriate
county auditors, the names of all persons ((nominated)) qualified to
appear on the general election ballot as candidates for offices, the
returns of which have been canvassed by the secretary of state.

Sec. 24 RCW 29A.52.350 and 2003 c 111 s 1313 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 29A.32.260, notice for any state,
county, district, or municipal election, whether special or general,
must be given by at least one publication not more than ten nor less
than three days before the election by the county auditor or the
officer conducting the election as the case may be, in one or more
newspapers of general circulation within the county. The legal notice
must contain the title of each office under the proper party
((designation)) preference, the names and addresses of all ((officers))
candidates who have been ((nominated)) qualified to appear on the
ballot for an office to be voted upon at that election, together with
the ballot titles of all measures, the hours during which the polls
will be open, and the polling places for each precinct, giving the
address of each polling place. The names of all candidates for
nonpartisan offices must be published separately with designation of
the offices for which they are candidates but without party
designation. This is the only notice required for a state, county,
district, or municipal general or special election and supersedes the
provisions of any and all other statutes, whether general or special in
nature, having different requirements for the giving of notice of any
general or special elections.

Sec. 25 RCW 29A.60.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For any office at any election or primary, any voter may write
in on the ballot the name of any person for an office who has filed as
a write-in candidate for the office in the manner provided by RCW
29A.24.310 and such vote shall be counted the same as if the name had
been printed on the ballot and marked by the voter. No write-in vote
made for any person who has not filed a declaration of candidacy
pursuant to RCW 29A.24.310 is valid if that person filed for the same
office, either as a regular candidate or a write-in candidate, at the
preceding primary. Any abbreviation used to designate office,
position, or political party shall be accepted if the canvassing board
can determine, to their satisfaction, the voter's intent.
(2) The number of write-in votes cast for each office must be
recorded and reported with the canvass for the election.
(3) Write-in votes cast for an individual candidate for an office
need not be tallied if the total number of write-in votes cast for the
office is not greater than the number of votes cast for the candidate
apparently ((nominated)) qualified to appear on the general election
ballot or elected, and the write-in votes could not have altered the
outcome of the primary or election. In the case of write-in votes for
statewide office or for any office whose jurisdiction encompasses more
than one county, write-in votes for an individual candidate must be
tallied whenever the county auditor is notified by either the office of
the secretary of state or another auditor in a multicounty jurisdiction
that it appears that the write-in votes could alter the outcome of the
primary or election.
(4) In the case of statewide offices or jurisdictions that
encompass more than one county, if the total number of write-in votes
cast for an office within a county is greater than the number of votes
cast for a candidate apparently ((nominated)) qualified to appear on
the general election ballot or elected in a primary or election, the
auditor shall tally all write-in votes for individual candidates for
that office and notify the office of the secretary of state and the
auditors of the other counties within the jurisdiction, that the write-in votes for individual candidates should be tallied.

Sec. 26 RCW 29A.60.220 and 2003 c 111 s 1522 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the requisite number of any federal, state, county, city, or
district offices have not ((been nominated)) qualified to appear on the
general election ballot in a primary by reason of two or more persons
having an equal and requisite number of votes for being placed on the
general election ballot, the official empowered by state law to certify
candidates for the general election ballot shall give notice to the
several persons so having the equal and requisite number of votes to
attend at the appropriate office at the time designated by that
official, who shall then and there proceed publicly to decide by lot
which of those persons will be declared ((nominated)) qualified and
placed on the general election ballot.
(2) If the requisite number of any federal, state, county, city,
district, or precinct officers have not been elected by reason of two
or more persons having an equal and highest number of votes for one and
the same office, the official empowered by state law to issue the
original certificate of election shall give notice to the several
persons so having the highest and equal number of votes to attend at
the appropriate office at the time to be appointed by that official,
who shall then and there proceed publicly to decide by lot which of
those persons will be declared duly elected, and the official shall
make out and deliver to the person thus duly declared elected a
certificate of election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.04.157 (September primary) and 2003 c 111 s 128;
(2) RCW 29A.24.200 (Lapse of election when no filing for single
positions -- Effect) and 2003 c 111 s 620;
(3) RCW 29A.24.210 (Vacancy in partisan elective office -- Special
filing period) and 2003 c 111 s 621;
(4) RCW 29A.28.010 (Major party ticket) and 2003 c 111 s 701, 1990
c 59 s 102, 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 12, & 1965 c 9 s 29.18.150;
(5) RCW 29A.28.020 (Death or disqualification -- Correcting ballots--Counting votes already cast) and 2003 c 111 s 702, 2001 c 46 s 4, &
1977 ex.s. c 329 s 13; and
(6) RCW 29A.36.190 (Partisan candidates qualified for general
election) and 2003 c 111 s 919.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 The secretary of state and county auditors
may take such steps before this act takes effect as may be necessary to
prepare to conduct an election under the terms of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 This act takes effect July 1, 2004, if, as
of that date, the decision issued by the United States Court of Appeals
for the Ninth Circuit on September 15, 2003, in the case of Democratic
Party of Washington State v. Reed has not been withdrawn, stayed,
reversed, or otherwise superseded.

--- END ---