BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.17.050 and 1998 c 154 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt rules providing standards for apples,
apricots, Italian prunes, peaches, sweet cherries, pears, potatoes, and
asparagus, except for asparagus shipped out-of-state for fresh packing,
and may adopt rules providing standards for any other fruit or
vegetable. When establishing these standards, the director shall
consider the factors of maturity, soundness, color, shape, size, and
freedom from mechanical and plant pest injury and other factors
important to marketing.
(2) The director shall adopt rules providing for mandatory
inspection of apples, apricots, Italian prunes, peaches, sweet
cherries, pears, and asparagus and may adopt rules providing for
mandatory inspection of any other fruit or vegetable.
(3) The director may adopt rules:
(a) Fixing the sizes and dimensions of containers to be used for
the packing or handling of any fruits or vegetables; and
(b) Establishing combination grades for fruits and vegetables. The
standards for combination grades shall, by percentage quantities,
include two or more of the grades provided for under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act expires December 31,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---