BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.120.010 and 2002 c 56 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) The capacity of many of Washington state's transportation
facilities have failed to keep up with the state's growth, particularly
in major urban regions;
(2) The state cannot by itself fund, in a timely way, many of the
major capacity and other improvements required on highways of statewide
significance in the state's largest urbanized area;
(3) Providing a transportation system that provides efficient
mobility for persons and freight requires a shared partnership and
responsibility between the state, local, and regional governments and
the private sector; and
(4) Timely construction and development of significant
transportation improvement projects can best be achieved through
enhanced funding options for governments at the county and regional
levels, using already existing tax authority to address roadway and
multimodal needs and new authority for regions to address critical
transportation projects ((of statewide significance)).

Sec. 2 RCW 36.120.020 and 2002 c 56 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional transportation
investment district.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(3) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the transportation commission, its successor
entity, or the legislature.
(4) "Lead agency" means a public agency that by law can plan,
design, and build a transportation project and has been so designated
by the district.
(5) "Regional transportation investment district" or "district"
means a municipal corporation whose boundaries are coextensive with two
or more contiguous counties and that has been created by county
legislative authorities and a vote of the people under this chapter to
implement a regional transportation investment plan.
(6) "Regional transportation investment district planning
committee" or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created
under RCW 36.120.030 to create and propose to county legislative
authorities a regional transportation investment plan to develop,
finance, and construct transportation projects.
(7) "Regional transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a
plan to develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or
projects.
(8) "Transportation project" means((:
(a) A capital improvement or improvements to a highway that has
been designated, in whole or in part, as a highway of statewide
significance, including an extension, that:
(i) Adds a lane or new lanes to an existing state or federal
highway; or
(ii) Repairs or replaces a lane or lanes damaged by an event
declared an emergency by the governor before January 1, 2002.
(b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
highway of statewide significance, including an extension, and may
include the following associated multimodal capital improvements:
(i) Approaches to highways of statewide significance;
(ii) High-occupancy vehicle lanes;
(iii) Flyover ramps;
(iv) Park and ride lots;
(v) Bus pullouts;
(vi) Vans for vanpools;
(vii) Buses; and
(viii) Signalization, ramp metering, and other transportation
system management improvements.
(c) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
city street, county road, or existing highway or the creation of a new
highway that intersects with a highway of statewide significance, if
all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The project is included in a plan that makes highway
improvement projects that add capacity to a highway or highways of
statewide significance;
(ii) The secretary of transportation determines that the project
would better relieve traffic congestion than investing that same money
in adding capacity to a highway of statewide significance;
(iii) Matching money equal to one-third of the total cost of the
project is provided by local entities, including but not limited to a
metropolitan planning organization, county, city, port, or private
entity in which a county participating in a plan is located. Local
entities may use federal grants to meet this matching requirement;
(iv) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed ten percent of the revenues generated by the
district;
(v) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed one billion dollars; and
(vi) The specific projects are included within the plan and
submitted as part of the plan to a vote of the people.
(d))) a project or program contained in the transportation plan of
the state or of a regional transportation planning organization,
including operations, preservation, and maintenance ((are excluded from
this definition and may not be included in a regional transportation
investment plan)) of the projects or programs.
(9) "Weighted vote" means a vote that reflects the population each
board or planning committee member represents relative to the
population represented by the total membership of the board or planning
committee. Population will be determined using the federal 2000 census
or subsequent federal census data.

--- END ---