BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.010 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This entire title shall be deemed an exercise of the police
power of the state, for the protection of the welfare, health, peace,
morals, and safety of the people of the state, and all its provisions
shall be liberally construed for the accomplishment of that purpose.
(2) This entire title is enacted, pursuant to the authority of this
state under the twenty-first amendment to the United States
Constitution, to promote the public's interest in fostering the orderly
and responsible distribution of liquor as defined in RCW 66.04.010
towards effective control of consumption.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.08.050 and 1997 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules,
shall:
(1) Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall
be established throughout the state, and the number and situation of
the stores within each locality;
(2) Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no
state liquor store is located, liquor vendors. In addition, the board
may appoint, in its discretion, a manufacturer that also manufactures
liquor products other than wine under a license under this title, as a
vendor for the purpose of sale of liquor products of its own
manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such liquor vendors shall
be agents of the board and be authorized to sell liquor to such
persons, firms or corporations as provided for the sale of liquor from
a state liquor store, and such vendors shall be subject to such
additional rules and regulations consistent with this title as the
board may require;
(3) Establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and
bottling, diluting and rectifying of stocks of liquors for the purposes
of this title;
(4) Provide for the leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of
all premises required for the conduct of the business; and for
remodeling the same, and the procuring of their furnishings, fixtures,
and supplies; and for obtaining options of renewal of such leases by
the lessee. The terms of such leases in all other respects shall be
subject to the direction of the board;
(5) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be
used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;
(6) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and
documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the board
may fix;
(7) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations
whatsoever relating to the business of the board;
(8) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the
board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such
employee;
(9) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such
extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the board and the commission;
(10) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and
disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or
donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness
of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The board's
alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and state
agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(11) Perform investigation and analysis regarding the effectiveness
of existing liquor controls and regulation, including whether they are
achieving their intended goals. Such investigation and recommendations
shall be conducted not less than once each biennium, and in the
discretion of the board make recommendations to the legislature;
(12) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and shall
have full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct of
its business, including all buying, selling, preparation and approval
of forms, and every other function of the business whatsoever, subject
only to audit by the state auditor: PROVIDED, That the board shall
have no authority to regulate the content of spoken language on
licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served and where
there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct being
provoked by such language.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.28.180 and 1997 c 321 s 51 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation holding a
certificate of approval issued under RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a beer
distributor's license, a domestic brewer's license, a microbrewer's
license, a beer importer's license, a beer distributor's license, a
domestic winery license, a wine importer's license, or a wine
distributor's license within the state of Washington to modify any
prices without prior notification to and approval of the board.
(1) Intent. This section is enacted, pursuant to the authority of
this state under the twenty-first amendment to the United States
Constitution, to promote the public's interest in fostering the orderly
and responsible distribution of malt beverages and wine towards
effective control of consumption; to promote the fair and efficient
three-tier system of distribution of such beverages; and to confirm
existing board rules as the clear expression of state policy to
regulate the manner of selling and pricing of wine and malt beverages
by licensed suppliers and distributors.
(2) Beer and wine distributor price posting.
(a) Every beer or wine distributor shall file with the board at its
office in Olympia a price posting showing the wholesale prices at which
any and all brands of beer and wine sold by such beer and/or wine
distributor shall be sold to retailers within the state.
(b) Each price posting shall be made on a form prepared and
furnished by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall
set forth:
(i) All brands, types, packages, and containers of beer offered for
sale by such beer and/or wine distributor;
(ii) The wholesale prices thereof to retail licensees, including
allowances, if any, for returned empty containers.
(c) No beer and/or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell any
package or container of beer or wine to any retail licensee at a price
differing from the price for such package or container as shown in the
price posting filed by the beer and/or wine distributor and then in
effect, according to rules adopted by the board.
(d) Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price may be posted that
is below acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost.
However, the board is empowered to review periodically, as it may deem
appropriate, the amount of the percentage of acquisition cost as a
minimum mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by rule of the
board, except such percentage shall be not less than ten percent.
(e) Distributor prices on a "close-out" item shall be accepted by
the board if the item to be discontinued has been listed on the state
market for a period of at least six months, and upon the further
condition that the distributor who posts such a close-out price shall
not restock the item for a period of one year following the first
effective date of such close-out price.
(f) The board may reject any price posting that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule, or portion thereof, or that
would tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer and
wine. Whenever the board rejects any posting, the licensee submitting
the posting may be heard by the board and shall have the burden of
showing that the posting is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
and wine. If the posting is accepted, it shall become effective at the
time fixed by the board. If the posting is rejected, the last
effective posting shall remain in effect until such time as an amended
posting is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(g) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all price
postings filed as required by this section constitute investigative
information and shall ((at all times be open to inspection to all trade
buyers within the state of Washington and shall not in any sense be
considered confidential)) not be subject to disclosure, pursuant to RCW
42.17.310(1)(d).
(h) Any beer and/or wine distributor or employee authorized by the
distributor-employer may sell beer and/or wine at the distributor's
posted prices to any annual or special occasion retail licensee upon
presentation to the distributor or employee at the time of purchase of
a special permit issued by the board to such licensee.
(i) Every annual or special occasion retail licensee, upon
purchasing any beer and/or wine from a distributor, shall immediately
cause such beer or wine to be delivered to the licensed premises, and
the licensee shall not thereafter permit such beer to be disposed of in
any manner except as authorized by the license.
(ii) Beer and wine sold as provided in this section shall be
delivered by the distributor or an authorized employee either to the
retailer's licensed premises or directly to the retailer at the
distributor's licensed premises. A distributor's prices to retail
licensees shall be the same at both such places of delivery.
(3) Beer and wine suppliers' price filings, contracts, and
memoranda.
(a) Every brewery and winery offering beer and/or wine for sale
within the state shall file with the board at its office in Olympia a
copy of every written contract and a memorandum of every oral agreement
which such brewery or winery may have with any beer or wine
distributor, which contracts or memoranda shall contain a schedule of
prices charged to distributors for all items and all terms of sale,
including all regular and special discounts; all advertising, sales and
trade allowances, and incentive programs; and all commissions, bonuses
or gifts, and any and all other discounts or allowances. Whenever
changed or modified, such revised contracts or memoranda shall
forthwith be filed with the board as provided for by rule. The
provisions of this section also apply to certificate of approval
holders, beer and/or wine importers, and beer and/or wine distributors
who sell to other beer and/or wine distributors.
Each price schedule shall be made on a form prepared and furnished
by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall set forth
all brands, types, packages, and containers of beer or wine offered for
sale by such licensed brewery or winery; all additional information
required may be filed as a supplement to the price schedule forms.
(b) Prices filed by a brewery or winery shall be uniform prices to
all distributors on a statewide basis less bona fide allowances for
freight differentials. Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price
shall be filed that is below acquisition/production cost plus ten
percent of that cost, except that acquisition cost plus ten percent of
acquisition cost does not apply to sales of beer or wine between a beer
or wine importer who sells beer or wine to another beer or wine
importer or to a beer or wine distributor, or to a beer or wine
distributor who sells beer or wine to another beer or wine distributor.
However, the board is empowered to review periodically, as it may deem
appropriate, the amount of the percentage of acquisition/production
cost as a minimum mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by
rule of the board, except such percentage shall be not less than ten
percent.
(c) No brewery, winery, certificate of approval holder, beer or
wine importer, or beer or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell
any beer or wine to any persons whatsoever in this state until copies
of such written contracts or memoranda of such oral agreements are on
file with the board.
(d) No brewery or winery may sell or offer to sell any package or
container of beer or wine to any distributor at a price differing from
the price for such package or container as shown in the schedule of
prices filed by the brewery or winery and then in effect, according to
rules adopted by the board.
(e) The board may reject any supplier's price filing, contract, or
memorandum of oral agreement, or portion thereof that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule or that would tend to disrupt the
orderly sale and distribution of beer or wine. Whenever the board
rejects any such price filing, contract, or memorandum, the licensee
submitting the price filing, contract, or memorandum may be heard by
the board and shall have the burden of showing that the price filing,
contract, or memorandum is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
or wine. If the price filing, contract, or memorandum is accepted, it
shall become effective at a time fixed by the board. If the price
filing, contract, or memorandum, or portion thereof, is rejected, the
last effective price filing, contract, or memorandum shall remain in
effect until such time as an amended price filing, contract, or
memorandum is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(f) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all prices,
contracts, and memoranda filed as required by this section constitute
investigative information and shall ((at all times be open to
inspection to all trade buyers within the state of Washington and shall
not in any sense be considered confidential)) not be subject to
disclosure, pursuant to RCW 42.17.310(1)(d).

--- END ---