BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.80 RCW
to read as follows:
In order to qualify for state planning funds available to regional
transportation planning organizations, a regional transportation
planning organization, containing any county with a population greater
than three hundred thousand bordering the state of Oregon, shall
provide voting membership to all incorporated cities within the region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.80 RCW
to read as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization shall ensure
that the unincorporated areas within its region are appropriately
represented on all organization boards, including its executive board.
The regional transportation planning organization may determine how the
unincorporated areas within its region are to be appropriately
represented on its boards.

--- END ---