BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The words "missing child" call to mind
tragic and frightening child abductions reported in the national news.
These events have left many parents frightened and unsure about how to
best protect their children. Children of every age, gender, and race
are vulnerable to child abduction because, as children, they often lack
the skills to protect themselves.
The legislature finds that in 2003, there were twenty-one thousand
three hundred ninety-six missing juvenile reports filed with law
enforcement agencies in Washington state. On any given day, there are
approximately one thousand seven hundred missing juveniles in our
state. The legislature further finds that Washington's children can be
protected by teaching them how to avoid many of the dangerous
situations that they may encounter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall create a pilot
project for selected school districts to identify instructional
materials and resources for parents and teachers to use to provide
instruction designed to prevent the abduction of children. School
districts shall be selected to participate so that instructional
materials and resources are identified for each grade level of
kindergarten through eighth grade.
(2) Upon request from a school district participating in the pilot
project, the superintendent shall provide technical assistance to
assist in the selection or development of relevant instructional
materials and resources.
(3) By May 1, 2004, the superintendent shall disseminate to all
school districts in the state information about the availability of the
grants and the procedure for obtaining the grants.
(4) By October 1, 2005, the superintendent shall disseminate to all
school districts in the state the list of instructional materials and
resources to aid in the prevention of child abduction that were
recommended by the school districts participating in the pilot project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
School districts may apply to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to voluntarily participate in the pilot project
established under section 2 of this act. To be eligible for a grant,
the school district must agree to take the following actions:
(1) To require the instructional materials committee of the school
district, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.230, to recommend
instructional materials and resources that meet the following criteria:
(a) Provide instruction on awareness, skills, and information to
aid in the prevention of child abduction; and
(b) Are age appropriate to the needs and abilities of students at
successive grade levels taught within the district.
(2) By September 1, 2005, to provide a list of the materials
recommended by the instructional materials committee to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
By December 1, 2005, after reviewing the list of recommended
instructional materials and resources disseminated by the
superintendent of public instruction in accordance with section 2 of
this act, each school district shall review the comprehensive safe
school plan of the district created under RCW 28A.320.125 and shall
consider including in the plan the use of appropriate materials and
resources on the list provided by the superintendent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
The Washington professional educator standards board shall review
teacher training materials and programs that address prevention of
child abductions and recommend to the state board of education those
materials and programs that should be used for the following purposes:
(1) Included in preparation programs for teachers, administrators,
and educational staff associates that are approved by the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.130; or
(2) Included in in-service training approved by the state board
under RCW 28A.415.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general
fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, to carry out the pilot project
created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 through 4 of this act expire
January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---