BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the sale and use
of adult entertainment materials and services result in increased costs
to the state through the provision of increased governmental services,
including human services and criminal justice services. It is the
legislature's intention that the activities that result in these
increased services bear more of the costs of these services. The
legislature intends to dedicate the revenues from a tax on the sale and
use of adult entertainment materials and services to crime victims'
compensation, with an emphasis towards providing services, support, or
therapy to those children who are victims of sexual abuse.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.020 and 2003 c 361 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax
on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW
47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) In addition to any tax imposed under subsection (1) of this
section there is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each
retail sale of adult entertainment materials and services equal to
eighteen and one-half percent of the selling price.
(5) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(((5))) (6) The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(((6))) (7) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.010 and 2003 c 168 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means
the total amount of consideration, except trade-in property of like
kind, including cash, credit, property, and services, for which
tangible personal property or services defined as a "retail sale" under
RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether
received in money or otherwise. No deduction from the total amount of
consideration is allowed for the following: (a) The seller's cost of
the property sold; (b) the cost of materials used, labor or service
cost, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to the seller, all
taxes imposed on the seller, and any other expense of the seller; (c)
charges by the seller for any services necessary to complete the sale,
other than delivery and installation charges; (d) delivery charges; (e)
installation charges; and (f) the value of exempt tangible personal
property given to the purchaser where taxable and exempt tangible
personal property have been bundled together and sold by the seller as
a single product or piece of merchandise.
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
"Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property or services, if the amount is
separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed directly on the
consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser;
(2) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean the state and its departments
and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and
institutions;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) "Adult entertainment materials and services" means those
entertainment materials and services that are primarily oriented to an
interest in sex, including but not limited to magazines, photographs,
motion pictures, videotapes, videodiscs, cable television services,
telephone services, audiotapes, computer programs, and paraphernalia.
"Adult entertainment materials and services" does not include (a) books
or magazines that contain no photographs or other graphics; or (b)
motion pictures, videotapes, videodiscs, or cable television services
that do not contain any explicit sex of the type that would be rated
"X" using the standards existing on January 1, 2004, of the Motion
Picture Association of America, Inc. Any motion picture, videotape,
videodisc, cable television service, or other visual medium that
contains any explicit sex of the type that would be rated "X" using
these standards shall be considered to be primarily oriented to an
interest in sex. Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section, adult
entertainment services are a sale at retail for the purposes of this
chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW.
(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at retail,"
"retail sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging
in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state"
and "within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter;
(((6))) (7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this
chapter and under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means
personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or
touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses.
Tangible personal property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and
prewritten computer software.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
All revenues collected on sales and use of adult entertainment
materials and services under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall be
deposited in the public safety and education account under RCW
43.08.250 and shall only be used for the purposes of crime victims'
compensation, with an emphasis towards providing services, support, or
therapy to those children who are victims of sexual abuse.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.010 and 2003 c 168 s 102 and 2003 c 5 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in
RCW 82.08.010.
(2)(a) "Value of the article used" shall be the purchase price for
the article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the
purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to
the importation of the article used. In case the article used is
acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured
by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of
the article used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used shall be in an amount representing
a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined
as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places
of use of similar products of like quality and character under such
rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the
construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become
or are to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or
for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of such
articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used shall be an
amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles,
unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW
upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used shall be determined according to the value of the
ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used shall be determined by: (i) The
retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered
for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used shall be determined
by the purchase price of such article if, but for the use of the direct
pay permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax;
(3) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the
service, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the
service is received by gift or under conditions wherein the purchase
price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of the
service used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar services of like
quality and character under rules the department may prescribe;
(4) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" shall have their
ordinary meaning, and shall mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or
control over the article of tangible personal property (as a consumer),
and include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage,
distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or
consumption within this state; ((and))
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state after the service has been performed by
which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was
performed (as a consumer), and include installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to
subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;
and
(c) With respect to an adult entertainment service which affords a
benefit or is otherwise capable of use within this state, the use
within this state of the service, regardless of the place of
performance;
(5) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included within
the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as defined in
chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;
(6) "Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and
every person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal
property or adult entertainment services at retail and every person
required to collect from purchasers the tax imposed under this chapter;
(7) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter.
"Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04
and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, shall also mean any person who
distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any
article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary
purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With
respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a
consumer as defined in this subsection (7), the use of the property
shall be deemed to be by such consumer. In addition, "consumer"
includes any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any adult
entertainment service other than for resale in the regular course of
business. Resale of a service means a separately stated charge to
another person for the service by a person who has paid or is obligated
to pay an identical charge to one who has originally rendered the
identical service.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.12.020 and 2003 c 361 s 302 and 2003 c 168 s 214
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every
person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within
this state as a consumer: (a) Any article of tangible personal
property purchased at retail, or acquired by lease, gift, repossession,
or bailment, or extracted or produced or manufactured by the person so
using the same, or otherwise furnished to a person engaged in any
business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); or (b) any prewritten
computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding
prewritten computer software that is either provided free of charge or
is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or both.
(2) This tax shall apply to the use of every service defined as a
retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a) and 82.08.010 and the use
of every article of tangible personal property, including property
acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including byproducts used by
the manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter provided, irrespective
of whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are
available for purchase within this state.
(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property or service taxable
under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a) purchased at retail or acquired by
lease, gift, or bailment if the sale to, or the use by, the present
user or his bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under
chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the
present user or by his bailor or donor.
(4) Except as provided in this section, payment by one purchaser or
user of tangible personal property or service of the tax imposed by
chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not have the effect of exempting any
other purchaser or user of the same property or service from the taxes
imposed by such chapters. If the sale to, or the use by, the present
user or his or her bailor or donor has already been subjected to the
tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid
by the present user or by his or her bailor or donor; or in respect to
the use of property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid
based on reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by
the value of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax
rate imposed by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of
first use; or in respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a
previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general
activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961, the tax
imposed by this chapter does not apply.
(5) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used or value of the service used by the taxpayer
multiplied by the rates in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW
82.08.020, except in the case of a seller required to collect use tax
from the purchaser, the tax shall be collected in an amount equal to
the purchase price multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.12.035 and 2002 c 367 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter
upon the use of tangible personal property, or services taxable under
RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a) or defined as a retail sale under RCW
82.08.010, in the state of Washington in the amount that the present
user thereof or his or her bailor or donor has paid a retail sales or
use tax with respect to such property to any other state of the United
States, any political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia,
and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof, prior to the
use of such property in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2004.

--- END ---