BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature intends to provide
affordable access to legal education and meet the legal needs of the
state of Washington in public interest areas of the law. The high cost
of attending law school requires that attorneys command high incomes to
repay the financial obligations incurred in obtaining the required
training. As a result of the need for high incomes, few attorneys are
able to practice in public interest areas of the law, which
traditionally pay substantially less than other areas. The legislature
finds that encouraging outstanding law students and attorneys to
practice in public interest areas of the law is essential to assuring
access to legal services in areas of public interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Eligible education and training programs" means education and
training programs approved by the board that lead to eligibility for a
license to practice law as a licensed attorney.
(3) "Eligible expenses" means reasonable expenses associated with
the costs of acquiring an education such as tuition, books, equipment,
fees, room and board, and other expenses determined by the board.
(4) "Eligible participant" means an eligible licensed attorney who
is a resident of the state of Washington, and who can provide proof of
residency including, but not limited to:
(a) Registration or payment of Washington taxes or fees on a motor
vehicle, mobile home, travel trailer, boat, or any other item of
personal property owned or used by the person for which state
registration or the payment of a state tax or fees is required;
(b) Permanent full-time employment in the state of Washington; or
(c) Registration to vote for state officials in the state of
Washington.
(5) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to render
legal services in a public interest area of the law in the state of
Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.
(6) "Licensed attorney" means an attorney who has successfully
passed the Washington state bar exam and been admitted to practice in
the state of Washington or has otherwise been licensed to practice law
in the state of Washington by the Washington state bar association and
who resides in the state of Washington.
(7) "Loan repayment" means a loan that is paid in full or in part
if the participant renders legal services in Washington in a public
interest area of the law.
(8) "Participant" means a licensed attorney who has received a loan
repayment award and has commenced practice as a licensed attorney in
Washington in a public interest area of the law.
(9) "Program" means the public interest attorney loan repayment
program.
(10) "Public interest area of the law" means those areas of the law
determined by the board in consultation with the advisory committee to
serve the public interest including, but not limited to:
(a) Providing direct legal service at a legal services
organization, the attorney general's office, prosecuting attorneys'
offices, or criminal public defender association or program;
(b) Providing indirect legal services at a legal services
organization, the attorney general's office, prosecuting attorneys'
association, or criminal public defender association or program; or
(c) Practicing in some other capacity that the advisory committee
determines serves the public interest.
(11) "Required service obligation" means an obligation by the
participant to provide legal services in Washington in a public
interest area of the law for a period of time to be established as
provided for in this chapter.
(12) "Satisfied" means paid in full.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PROGRAM--DUTIES OF BOARD. The public
interest attorney loan repayment program is established for licensed
attorneys who practice or agree to practice in public interest areas of
the law in the state of Washington. No state funds shall be used by
the board in administering the program. In administering this program,
once the balance in the public interest attorney loan repayment
endowment account is five hundred thousand dollars from private
sources, the board shall establish an advisory committee. The
committee may include, but is not limited to, one representative from
the Washington state bar association, one representative from the
access to justice board, and up to two representatives from each of the
law schools located in the state of Washington. The advisory committee
shall also include one law student representative from each law school
in the state.
(1) The advisory committee shall advise the board in performing the
following duties:
(a) Adopting rules and developing guidelines to administer the
program;
(b) Collecting and managing repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations under this chapter; and
(c) Developing criteria for a contract for service in lieu of the
service obligation where appropriate, that may be a combination of
service and payment.
(2) The advisory committee shall publicize the program and solicit
grants and donations from public and private sources for the program,
to be accepted by the board and deposited into the public interest
attorney loan repayment endowment account.
(3) The advisory committee shall select licensed attorneys to
participate in the loan repayment program. In selecting eligible
participants, the committee may consider the following criteria:
(a) A demonstrated commitment on the part of the applicant to
practice in public interest areas of the law;
(b) The financial need of the applicant;
(c) The demand for the type of public interest work the applicant
seeks to perform;
(d) A declared interest by the applicant to practice in rural areas
of the state of Washington where the need for public interest attorneys
is high;
(e) The scholastic achievements of the applicant; and
(f) Any other criteria the committee deems relevant to the
selection process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 LOAN REPAYMENT--REQUIRED SERVICE OBLIGATION.
The board shall establish loan repayments for licensed attorneys who
practice in a public interest area of the law. The amount of the loan
repayment shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars per year for a
maximum of five years per individual. Participants incur an obligation
to repay the loan under section 6 of this act unless they practice for
one year in a public interest area of the law for each year of loan
repayment received.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 LOAN REPAYMENT AWARDS. (1) The board may
grant loan repayment awards to eligible participants from the funds
appropriated for this purpose, or from any private or public funds
deposited in the public interest attorney loan repayment endowment
account.
(2) Funds appropriated for the program, including reasonable
administrative costs, may be used by the board for the purposes of loan
repayments. The board shall annually establish the total amount of
funding to be awarded for loan repayments and such allocations shall be
established based upon the best use of funding for that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 PARTICIPANT OBLIGATION--REPAYMENT
OBLIGATION. Participants in the public interest attorney loan
repayment program who are awarded loan repayments shall receive payment
from the program for the purpose of repaying educational loans secured
while attending a program of legal training that led to a license to
practice law in the state of Washington.
(1) Participants shall agree to meet the required service
obligation in a designated public interest area of the law.
(2) Repayment shall be limited to eligible educational and living
expenses as determined by the board and shall include principal and
interest.
(3) Loans from both government and private sources may be repaid by
the program. Participants shall agree to allow the board access to
loan records and to acquire information from lenders necessary to
verify eligibility and to determine payments. Loans may not be
renegotiated with lenders to accelerate repayment.
(4) Repayment of loans under this chapter shall begin no later than
ninety days after the individual has become a participant. Payments
shall be made quarterly, or more frequently if deemed appropriate by
the board, to the participant or the lender until the loan is repaid or
until the required service obligation is fulfilled and eligibility
discontinues, whichever comes first.
(5) Should the participant discontinue practicing in a public
interest area of the law, payments against the loans of the participant
shall cease to be effective on the date that the participant
discontinues service.
(6) Except for circumstances beyond their control, participants who
serve less than the required service obligation shall be obligated to
repay to the program an amount equal to twice the total amount paid by
the program on their behalf in addition to any payments on the
unsatisfied portion of the principal and interest. The board shall
determine the applicability of this subsection.
(7) The board is responsible for the collection of payments made on
behalf of participants from the participants who discontinue service
before completion of the required service obligation. The board shall
exercise due diligence in collection, maintaining all necessary records
to ensure that the maximum amount of payment made on behalf of the
participant is recovered. Collection under this section shall be
pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment if
necessary.
(8) The board is not responsible for any outstanding payments on
principal and interest to any lenders once a participant's eligibility
expires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 PUBLIC INTEREST ATTORNEY LOAN REPAYMENT
ENDOWMENT ACCOUNT. (1) The public interest attorney loan repayment
endowment account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
The account shall be a nontreasury account retaining its interest
earnings in accordance with RCW 43.79A.040.
(2) The board shall deposit in the account all money received for
the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of
private contributions to the program and receipts from participant
repayments. No state funds shall be deposited in the account or
otherwise expended therefor.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall not exceed half of each
appropriation by the legislature until the program becomes self-sustaining and shall be used for loan repayments for eligible attorneys
and the board's administrative costs associated with the awarding,
tracking, and collection of the loans. Appropriations to the program
shall end when the account becomes self-sustaining.
(4) With the exception of the operating costs associated with the
management of the account by the treasurer's office as authorized in
chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be credited with all investment
income earned by the account.
(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. Money used for
program administration is subject to the allotment and budgetary
controls of chapter 43.88 RCW, and an appropriation is required for
expenditures.
(6) Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the
authorization of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INVESTMENT BOARD.
(1) The investment board has the full power to invest, reinvest,
manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment money in the account.
All investment and operating costs associated with the investment of
money shall be paid pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the
exception of these expenses, the earnings from the investment of the
money shall be retained by the account.
(2) All investments made by the investment board shall be made with
the exercise of that degree of judgment and care pursuant to RCW
43.33A.140 and the investment policy established by the state
investment board.
(3) As deemed appropriate by the investment board, money in the
account may be commingled for investment with other funds subject to
investment by the board.
(4) The authority to establish all policies relating to the
account, other than the investment policies in subsections (1) through
(3) of this section, resides with the board. With the exception of
expenses of the investment board in subsection (1) of this section,
disbursements from the account shall be made only on the authorization
of the governing body, and money in the account may be spent only for
the purposes of the program as specified in this chapter.
(5) The investment board shall routinely consult and communicate
with the higher education coordinating board on the investment policy,
earnings of the trust, and related needs of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 TRANSFER OF PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION. After
consulting with the board, the governor may transfer the administration
of this program to another agency with an appropriate mission.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2003 c 403 s 9, 2003 c 313 s 10, 2003
c 191 s 7, 2003 c 148 s 15, 2003 c 92 s 8, and 2003 c 19 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism
promotion account, the produce railcar pool account, the public
interest attorney loan repayment account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, and the children's trust fund((, and the investing
in innovation account)). However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 9 and 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---