BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A majority of students in Washington do not
have the chance to study any language other than English until they are
in middle school, or more often, high school. Education systems of
other nations, some of them much less economically developed than the
United States, begin second language study in the early elementary
grades or even in preschool. Washington's economy is tied to world
trade. If we want future Washington citizens to more effectively
compete in the world marketplace and develop a greater sense of the
world's culture and geography, then we must provide our students, at
all levels, the opportunity to develop fluency in a second language.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2004-05 school year:
(1) Each school district shall administer elementary, middle, and
high school classes or programs that provide instruction in Spanish and
a Chinese language. The classes or programs shall be offered in grades
four through ten and may be offered outside the regularly scheduled
school day as an after or before-school or weekend class or program.
(2) Each student shall be required to take a class or participate
in a program established under subsection (1) of this section and
receive instruction in Spanish or a Chinese language.
(3) Each school district shall provide every student the
opportunity to purchase, at a minimal cost, workbooks to supplement the
instruction received by the student in a class or program established
under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.410.025 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.67.010 are each
amended to read as follows:
No person shall be accounted as a qualified teacher within the
meaning of the school law who is not the holder of a valid teacher's
certificate or permit issued by lawful authority of this state, except
that a school district may use noncertificated staff to provide the
language instruction in the programs or classes taught in accordance
with section 2 of this act. However, the noncertificated staff
providing the language instruction must: (1) Be able to speak and
write the language fluently; and (2) speak English.

--- END ---