BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.70.023 and 1997 c 432 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An "established place of business" requires a permanent,
enclosed commercial building located within the state of Washington
easily accessible at all reasonable times. The business of a vehicle
dealer must be lawfully carried on at an established place of business
in accordance with the terms of all applicable building code, zoning,
and other land-use regulatory ordinances. A vehicle dealer may display
a vehicle for sale only at its established place of business, licensed
subagency, or temporary subagency site, except at auction. The dealer
shall keep the building open to the public so that the public may
contact the vehicle dealer or the dealer's salespersons at all
reasonable times. The books, records, and files necessary to conduct
the business shall be kept and maintained at that place. The
established place of business shall display an exterior sign, subject
only to local requirements, with the business name and nature of the
business, such as auto sales, permanently affixed to the land or
building, with letters clearly visible to the major avenue of traffic.
A room or rooms in a hotel, rooming house, or apartment house building
or part of a single or multiple-unit dwelling house may not be
considered an "established place of business" unless the ground floor
of such a dwelling is devoted principally to and occupied for
commercial purposes and the dealer offices are located on the ground
floor. A mobile office or mobile home may be used as an office if it
is connected to utilities and is set up in accordance with state law.
A statewide trade association representing manufactured housing dealers
shall be permitted to use a manufactured home as an office if the
office complies with all other applicable building code, zoning, and
other land-use regulatory ordinances. This subsection does not apply
to auction companies that do not own vehicle inventory or sell vehicles
from an auction yard.
(2) An auction company shall have office facilities within the
state. The books, records, and files necessary to conduct the business
shall be maintained at the office facilities. All storage facilities
for inventory shall be listed with the department, and shall meet local
zoning and land use ordinances. An auction company shall maintain a
telecommunications system.
(3) Auction companies shall post their vehicle dealer license at
each auction where vehicles are offered, and shall provide the
department with the address of the auction at least three days before
the auction.
(4) If a dealer maintains a place of business at more than one
location or under more than one name in this state, he or she shall
designate one location as the principal place of business of the firm,
one name as the principal name of the firm, and all other locations or
names as subagencies. A subagency license is required for each and
every subagency: PROVIDED, That the department may grant an exception
to the subagency requirement in the specific instance where a licensed
dealer is unable to locate their used vehicle sales facilities adjacent
to or at the established place of business. This exception shall be
granted and defined under the promulgation of rules consistent with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
(5) All vehicle dealers shall maintain ownership or leasehold
throughout the license year of the real property from which they do
business. The dealer shall provide the department with evidence of
ownership or leasehold whenever the ownership changes or the lease is
terminated.
(6) A subagency shall comply with all requirements of an
established place of business, except that subagency records may be
kept at the principal place of business designated by the dealer.
Auction companies shall comply with the requirements in subsection (2)
of this section.
(7) A temporary subagency shall meet all local zoning and building
codes for the type of merchandising being conducted. The dealer
license certificate shall be posted at the location. No other
requirements of an established place of business apply to a temporary
subagency. Auction companies are not required to obtain a temporary
subagency license.
(8) A wholesale vehicle dealer shall have office facilities in a
commercial building within this state, and all storage facilities for
inventory shall be listed with the department, and shall meet local
zoning and land use ordinances. A wholesale vehicle dealer shall
maintain a telecommunications system. An exterior sign visible from
the nearest street shall identify the business name and the nature of
business. When two or more vehicle dealer businesses share a location,
all records, office facilities, and inventory, if any, must be
physically segregated and clearly identified.
(9) A retail vehicle dealer shall be open during normal business
hours, maintain office and display facilities in a commercially zoned
location or in a location complying with all applicable building and
land use ordinances, and maintain a business telephone listing in the
local directory. When two or more vehicle dealer businesses share a
location, all records, office facilities, and inventory shall be
physically segregated and clearly identified.
(10) A subagency license is not required for a mobile home dealer
to display an on-site display model, a consigned mobile home not
relocated from its site, or a repossessed mobile home if sales are
handled from a principal place of business or subagency. A mobile home
dealer shall identify on-site display models, repossessed mobile homes,
and those consigned at their sites with a sign that includes the
dealer's name and telephone number.
(11) Every vehicle dealer shall advise the department of the
location of each and every place of business of the firm and the name
or names under which the firm is doing business at such location or
locations. If any name or location is changed, the dealer shall notify
the department of such change within ten days. The license issued by
the department shall reflect the name and location of the firm and
shall be posted in a conspicuous place at that location by the dealer.
(12) A vehicle dealer's license shall upon the death or incapacity
of an individual vehicle dealer authorize the personal representative
of such dealer, subject to payment of license fees, to continue the
business for a period of six months from the date of the death or
incapacity.

--- END ---