BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that an increase in the governor's out-of-state travel for campaign-related or other nonstate business purposes is causing a budget shortfall in the funding for the executive protection unit in the Washington state patrol. The legislature supports the Washington state patrol providing protection and security for the governor and the governor's family as provided in RCW 43.43.035; however, the legislature finds that the cost of protection and security for this extra travel not related to state business and at the governor's discretion should not be borne by the taxpayers of Washington state.

(2)(a) The legislature intends to resolve this current budget shortfall by reducing existing appropriations to the governor's office by the amount of the estimated shortfall for fiscal year 2019 and increasing the current fiscal year 2019 appropriation to the Washington state patrol by that amount.

(b) The legislature intends to address this in the future by creating the account in section 2 of this act to which private contributions can be made to offset the extra protection and security costs as a result of the travel described in this section. To the extent private contributions do not cover the extra costs, the legislature intends to reduce appropriations to the governor's office and increase appropriations to the Washington state patrol by the amount of the uncovered extra costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

The governor's nonstate business travel reimbursement account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Any gifts, grants, or donations received by the governor's office to reimburse the state for protection and security costs associated with the governor's out-of-state travel for campaign-related or other nonstate business purposes shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used to reimburse the Washington state patrol for protection and security costs associated with the governor's out-of-state travel for campaign-related or other nonstate business purposes. Only the governor or governor's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is not subject to allotment procedures and an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. By December 1, 2019, and December 1, 2020, the governor and the Washington state patrol shall report to the ways and means committee in the senate and the appropriations committee in the house of representatives on the governor's out-of-state travel and associated protection and security costs. The report must specifically identify all travel considered to be out-of-state travel for campaign-related or other nonstate business purposes and must specifically identify the protection and security costs associated with those trips. The report must also summarize the deposits and expenditures related to the account created in section 2 of this act for the period of the report.

Sec. 4. 2018 c 299 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$6,221,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($7,328,000))

$6,613,000

Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$4,000,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$676,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($18,225,000))

$17,510,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $703,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the office of the education ombuds.

(2) $730,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1661 (child, youth, families/department). The amount of state and federal funding to be transferred from the department of social and health services to the department of children, youth, and families for the working connections child care services, administration, and staff must be included in the report required by the bill on how to incorporate the staff responsible for determining eligibility for the working connections child care program into the department of children, youth, and families. If the bill is not enacted by July 31, 2017, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3) $1,216,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1889 (corrections ombuds). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $5,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided to the office of the governor to support the Ruth Woo fellow. Funding will provide financial support for the Ruth Woo fellow participating in the governor's leadership academy internship program.

(5) $291,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2759 (women's commission). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2018, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 5. 2018 c 299 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE STATE PATROL

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2018)
. . . .
$43,800,000

General Fund—State Appropriation (FY 2019)
. . . .
(($46,662,000))

$47,377,000

General Fund—Federal Appropriation
. . . .
$16,255,000

General Fund—Private/Local Appropriation
. . . .
$3,085,000

Death Investigations Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$8,207,000

County Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,752,000

Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$1,520,000

Fire Service Trust Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$131,000

Vehicle License Fraud Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$110,000

Disaster Response Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$12,400,000

Fire Service Training Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$11,121,000

Aquatic Invasive Species Management Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$54,000

Pension Funding Stabilization Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$3,295,000

State Toxics Control Account—State Appropriation
. . . .
$548,000

Fingerprint Identification Account—State

Appropriation
. . . .
$15,745,000

Dedicated Marijuana Account—State Appropriation

(FY 2019)
. . . .
$2,803,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION
. . . .
(($169,488,000))

$170,203,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) $270,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that are located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(2) $12,400,000 of the disaster response account—state appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.964. The state patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in coordination with the military department.

(3) $700,000 of the fire service training account—state appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship training program.

(4) $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $41,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 272, Laws of 2017 (E2SHB 1163) (domestic violence).

(5) $125,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $116,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 261, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1501) (attempts to obtain firearms).

(6) $104,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $90,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for implementation of chapter 308, Laws of 2017 (SHB 1863) (fire incident reporting system).

(7) $3,421,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for the completion of the state patrol's plan to upgrade the criminal history system, and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(8) $1,039,000 of the fingerprint identification account—state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of a sexual assault kit tracking database project and is subject to the conditions, limitations, and review provided in section 724 of this act.

(9) $495,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the costs related to the 1995 king air maintenance. By June 30, 2019, the state patrol is directed to sell the 1983 king air and proceeds generated from the sale of the 1983 king air must be deposited into the state patrol highway account.

(10) $2,803,000 of the dedicated marijuana account—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to create a new drug enforcement task force for the purposes of controlling the potential diversion and illicit production or distribution of marijuana and marijuana-related products in Washington.

(11) $100,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the Washington state patrol to coordinate with the governor's office of Indian affairs, federally recognized tribal governments, and the U.S. justice department to conduct a study to determine how to increase state criminal justice protective and investigative resources for reporting and identifying missing Native American women in the state.

(12) The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for implementing the recommendations of the joint legislative task force on sexual assault forensic examination, and for monitoring and testing untested sexual assault examination kits.

(a) $500,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for the state patrol to:

(i) Work in conjunction with state or nonstate entities to test sexual assault kits pursuant to RCW 43.43.545;

(ii) Conduct forensic analysis of sexual assault examination kits in the custody of the state patrol pursuant to chapter 247, Laws of 2015; and

(((ii)))(iii) Continue the task force.

(b) $1,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2018 and $1,375,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter 247, Laws of 2015 to address the state's backlog in sexual assault examination kits. The seven full-time employees funded under this subsection must work exclusively on processing sexual assault exam kits through the crime laboratory division.

(c) Within amounts provided in this section, the Washington state patrol shall adopt rules necessary to implement RCW 43.43.545.

(13) $715,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal year 2019 is provided solely for cost increases in the executive protection unit.

--- END ---