BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is well established in statute that bulkheads are a permitted use and an existing use along the shorelines. It is in the public interest for these structures to be maintained in good repair. This act encourages maintenance of structures by removing an uncertain, lengthy, and potentially costly process that ultimately cannot prevent what is legally authorized.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

(1) The minor repair or maintenance of existing bulkheads or bank protection structures is not subject to the requirements of this chapter.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "minor repair or maintenance" means any repair or maintenance that does not involve excavation or waterward expansion of the existing footprint of an existing bulkhead or bank protection structure.

--- END ---