BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. This act may be known and cited as the new hope act.

Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.637 and 2009 c 325 s 3 and 2009 c 288 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a))) When an offender has completed all requirements of the sentence, including any and all legal financial obligations, and while under the custody ((and))or supervision of the department, the secretary or the secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing court, which shall discharge the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the certificate to the offender's last known address. A certificate of discharge issued under this subsection (1) is effective on the date the offender completed all conditions of his or her sentence.

(((b)(i)))(2)(a) When an offender has reached the end of his or her supervision with the department and has completed all the requirements of the sentence except his or her legal financial obligations, the secretary's designee shall provide the county clerk with a notice that the offender has completed all nonfinancial requirements of the sentence. The notice must list the specific sentence requirements that have been completed, so that it is clear to the sentencing court that the offender is entitled to discharge upon completion of the legal financial obligations of the sentence.

(((ii)))(b) When the department has provided the county clerk with notice under (a) of this subsection showing that an offender has completed all the requirements of the sentence and the offender subsequently satisfies all legal financial obligations under the sentence, the county clerk shall promptly notify the sentencing court((, including the notice from the department, which)). Upon receipt of the notice under this subsection (2)(b), the court shall discharge the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge ((by issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the certificate to the offender's last known address)). A certificate of discharge issued under this subsection (2) is effective on the date the offender completed all conditions of his or her sentence.

(((c) When an offender who is subject to requirements of the sentence in addition to the payment of legal financial obligations either is not subject to supervision by the department or does not complete the requirements while under supervision of the department, it is the offender's responsibility to provide the court with verification of the completion of the sentence conditions other than the payment of legal financial obligations. When the offender satisfies all legal financial obligations under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the sentencing court that the legal financial obligations have been satisfied. When the court has received both notification from the clerk and adequate verification from the offender that the sentence requirements have been completed, the court shall discharge the offender and provide the offender with))

(3) In the absence of a certificate of discharge issued under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the offender may file a motion with the sentencing court for a certificate of discharge. The sentencing court shall issue a certificate of discharge upon verification of completion of all sentencing conditions, including any and all legal financial obligations. A certificate of discharge issued under this subsection (3) is effective on the date the offender completed all conditions of his or her sentence.

(4) In the absence of a certificate of discharge issued under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, the offender may file a motion with the sentencing court for a certificate of discharge and file a declaration sworn under penalty of perjury that he or she has completed all of the nonfinancial conditions of his or her sentence. A certificate of discharge issued under this subsection (4) is effective on the later of: (a) Five years after completion of community custody, or if the offender was not required to serve community custody, after the completion of full and partial confinement; or (b) the date any and all legal financial obligations were satisfied.

(5) The court shall issue a certificate of discharge by issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the certificate to the offender's last known address.

(((2)))(6)(a) ((For purposes of this subsection (2),))A no-contact order is not a requirement of the offender's sentence. An offender who has completed all requirements of the sentence, including any and all legal financial obligations, is eligible for a certificate of discharge even if the offender has an existing no-contact order that excludes or prohibits the offender from having contact with a specified person or ((business))entity or coming within a set distance of any specified location.

(((b))) In the case of an eligible offender who has a no-contact order as part of the judgment and sentence, the offender may petition the sentencing court to issue a certificate of discharge and a separate no-contact order ((by filing a petition in the sentencing court and)), which must include paying the appropriate filing fee ((associated with the petition)) for the separate no-contact order. This filing fee does not apply to an offender seeking a certificate of discharge when the offender has a no-contact order separate from the judgment and sentence.

(((i)(A) The court shall issue a certificate of discharge and a separate no-contact order under this subsection (2) if the court determines that the offender has completed all requirements of the sentence, including all legal financial obligations.)) The court shall reissue the no-contact order separately under a new civil cause number for the remaining term and under the same conditions as contained in the judgment and sentence.

(((B)))(b) The clerk of the court shall send a copy of the new no-contact order to the individuals or entities protected by the no-contact order, along with an explanation of the reason for the change, if there is an address available in the court file. If no address is available, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order to the prosecutor, who shall send a copy of the no-contact order with an explanation of the reason for the change to the last known address of the protected individuals or entities.

(((ii) Whenever an order under this subsection (2) is issued,))(c) The clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. The clerk shall also include a cover sheet that indicates the case number of the judgment and sentence that has been discharged. Upon receipt of the copy of the order and cover sheet, the law enforcement agency shall enter the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order shall remain in this system until it expires. The new order, and case number of the discharged judgment and sentence, shall be linked in the criminal intelligence information system for purposes of enforcing the no-contact order.

(((iii)))(d) A separately issued no-contact order may be enforced under chapter 26.50 RCW.

(((iv)))(e) A separate no-contact order issued under this subsection (((2)))(6) is not a modification of the offender's sentence.

(((3)))(7) Every signed certificate and order of discharge shall be filed with the county clerk of the sentencing county. In addition, the court shall send to the department a copy of every signed certificate and order of discharge for offender sentences under the authority of the department. The county clerk shall enter into a database maintained by the administrator for the courts the names of all felons who have been issued certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and the date of conviction and offense.

(((4)))(8) An offender who is not convicted of a violent offense or a sex offense and is sentenced to a term involving community supervision may be considered for a discharge of sentence by the sentencing court prior to the completion of community supervision, provided that the offender has completed at least one-half of the term of community supervision and has met all other sentence requirements.

(((5)))(9) The discharge shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights not already restored by RCW 29A.08.520, and the certificate of discharge shall so state. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of an offender's prior record for purposes of determining sentences for later offenses as provided in this chapter. Nothing in this section affects or prevents use of the offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution either as an element of an offense or for impeachment purposes. A certificate of discharge is not based on a finding of rehabilitation.

(((6)))(10) Unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court, a certificate of discharge shall not terminate the offender's obligation to comply with an order that excludes or prohibits the offender from having contact with a specified person or coming within a set distance of any specified location that was contained in the judgment and sentence. An offender who violates such an order after a certificate of discharge has been issued shall be subject to prosecution according to the chapter under which the order was originally issued.

(((7)))(11) Upon release from custody, the offender may apply to the department for counseling and help in adjusting to the community. This voluntary help may be provided for up to one year following the release from custody.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.640 and 2012 c 183 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Every offender who has been discharged under RCW 9.94A.637 may apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record of conviction. If the court finds the offender meets the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the court may clear the record of conviction by: (a) Permitting the offender to withdraw the offender's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty; or (b) if the offender has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, by the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (c) by the court dismissing the information or indictment against the offender.

(2) An offender may not have the record of conviction cleared if:

(a) There are any criminal charges against the offender pending in any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court;

(b) The offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030((;

))or crime against persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830, except the following offenses may be vacated if the conviction did not include a firearm, deadly weapon, or sexual motivation enhancement: (i) Assault in the second degree under RCW 9A.36.021; (ii) assault in the third degree under RCW 9A.36.031 when not committed against a law enforcement officer or peace officer; and (iii) robbery in the second degree under RCW 9A.56.210;

(((d)))(c) The offense is a class B felony and the offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state, another state, or federal court in the ten years prior to the application for vacation;

(d) The offense is a class C felony and the offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state, another state, or federal court ((since the date of the offender's discharge under RCW 9.94A.637))in the five years prior to the application for vacation;

(e) The offense is a class B felony and less than ten years have passed since the ((date the applicant was discharged under RCW 9.94A.637))later of: (i) The applicant's release from community custody; (ii) the applicant's release from full and partial confinement; or (iii) the applicant's sentencing date;

(f) The offense was a class C felony, other than a class C felony described in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), and less than five years have passed since the ((date the applicant was discharged under RCW 9.94A.637))later of: (i) The applicant's release from community custody; (ii) the applicant's release from full and partial confinement; or (iii) the applicant's sentencing date; or

(g) The offense was a ((class C)) felony described in RCW 46.61.502(((6))) or 46.61.504(((6))).

(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection (1) of this section, the fact that the offender has been convicted of the offense shall not be included in the offender's criminal history for purposes of determining a sentence in any subsequent conviction, and the offender shall be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense. For all purposes, including responding to questions on employment applications, an offender whose conviction has been vacated may state that the offender has never been convicted of that crime. A conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement agencies. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use of an offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution, and nothing in this section affects the requirements for restoring a right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040.

(b) A conviction vacated on or after the effective date of this section qualifies as a prior conviction for the purpose of charging a present recidivist offense occurring on or after the effective date of this section.

Sec. 4. RCW 9.96.060 and 2017 c 336 s 2, 2017 c 272 s 9, and 2017 c 128 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) Every person convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense who has completed all of the terms of the sentence for the misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense may apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the applicant's record of conviction for the offense. If the court finds the applicant meets the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the court may in its discretion vacate the record of conviction by: (a)(i) Permitting the applicant to withdraw the applicant's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty; or (ii) if the applicant has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (b) the court dismissing the information, indictment, complaint, or citation against the applicant and vacating the judgment and sentence.

(2) An applicant may not have the record of conviction for a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense vacated if any one of the following is present:

(a) There are any criminal charges against the applicant pending in any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court;

(b) The offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or an attempt to commit a violent offense;

(c) The offense was a violation of RCW 46.61.502 (driving while under the influence), 46.61.504 (actual physical control while under the influence), 9.91.020 (operating a railroad, etc. while intoxicated), or the offense is considered a "prior offense" under RCW 46.61.5055 and the applicant has had a subsequent alcohol or drug violation within ten years of the date of arrest for the prior offense or less than ten years has elapsed since the date of the arrest for the prior offense;

(d) The offense was any misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor violation, including attempt, of chapter 9.68 RCW (obscenity and pornography), chapter 9.68A RCW (sexual exploitation of children), or chapter 9A.44 RCW (sex offenses), except for failure to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.132;

(e) The applicant was convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense as defined in RCW 10.99.020, or the court determines after a review of the court file that the offense was committed by one family member or household member against another, or the court, after considering the damage to person or property that resulted in the conviction, any prior convictions for crimes defined in RCW 10.99.020, or for comparable offenses in another state or in federal court, and the totality of the records under review by the court regarding the conviction being considered for vacation, determines that the offense involved domestic violence, and any one of the following factors exist:

(i) The applicant has not provided written notification of the vacation petition to the prosecuting attorney's office that prosecuted the offense for which vacation is sought, or has not provided that notification to the court;

(ii) The applicant has ((previously had a conviction for domestic violence))two or more domestic violence convictions stemming from different incidents. For purposes of this subsection, however, if the current application is for more than one conviction that arose out of a single incident, none of those convictions counts as a previous conviction;

(iii) The applicant has signed an affidavit under penalty of perjury affirming that the applicant has not previously had a conviction for a domestic violence offense, and a criminal history check reveals that the applicant has had such a conviction; or

(iv) Less than five years have elapsed since the person completed the terms of the original conditions of the sentence, including any financial obligations and successful completion of any treatment ordered as a condition of sentencing;

(f) For any offense other than those described in (e) of this subsection, less than three years have passed since the person completed the terms of the sentence, including any financial obligations;

(g) The offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state, another state, or federal court ((since the date of conviction))in the three years prior to the vacation application; or

(h) ((The applicant has ever had the record of another conviction vacated; or

)) The applicant is currently restrained((, or has been restrained within five years prior to the vacation application,)) by a domestic violence protection order, a no-contact order, an antiharassment order, or a civil restraining order which restrains one party from contacting the other party or was previously restrained by such an order and was found to have committed one or more violations of the order in the five years prior to the vacation application.

(3) Subject to RCW 9.96.070, every person convicted of prostitution under RCW 9A.88.030 who committed the offense as a result of being a victim of trafficking, RCW 9A.40.100, promoting prostitution in the first degree, RCW 9A.88.070, promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, RCW 9.68A.101, or trafficking in persons under the trafficking victims protection act of 2000, 22 U.S.C. Sec. 7101 et seq. may apply to the sentencing court for vacation of the applicant's record of conviction for the prostitution offense. An applicant may not have the record of conviction for prostitution vacated if any one of the following is present:

(a) There are any criminal charges against the applicant pending in any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court, for any crime other than prostitution; or

(b) The offender has been convicted of another crime, except prostitution, in this state, another state, or federal court since the date of conviction. The limitation in this subsection (3)(b) does not apply to convictions where the offender proves by a preponderance of the evidence that he or she committed the crime as a result of being a victim of trafficking, RCW 9A.40.100, promoting prostitution in the first degree, RCW 9A.88.070, promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, RCW 9.68A.101, or trafficking in persons under the trafficking victims protection act of 2000, 22 U.S.C. Sec. 7101 et seq., according to the requirements provided in RCW 9.96.070 for each respective conviction.

(4) Every person convicted prior to January 1, 1975, of violating any statute or rule regarding the regulation of fishing activities, including, but not limited to, RCW 75.08.260, 75.12.060, 75.12.070, 75.12.160, 77.16.020, 77.16.030, 77.16.040, 77.16.060, and 77.16.240 who claimed to be exercising a treaty Indian fishing right, may apply to the sentencing court for vacation of the applicant's record of the misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony conviction for the offense. If the person is deceased, a member of the person's family or an official representative of the tribe of which the person was a member may apply to the court on behalf of the deceased person. Notwithstanding the requirements of RCW 9.94A.640, the court shall vacate the record of conviction if:

(a) The applicant is a member of a tribe that may exercise treaty Indian fishing rights at the location where the offense occurred; and

(b) The state has been enjoined from taking enforcement action of the statute or rule to the extent that it interferes with a treaty Indian fishing right as determined under United States v. Washington, 384 F. Supp. 312 (W.D. Wash. 1974), or Sohappy v. Smith, 302 F. Supp. 899 (D. Oregon 1969), and any posttrial orders of those courts, or any other state supreme court or federal court decision.

(5)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, once the court vacates a record of conviction under this section, the person shall be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense and the fact that the person has been convicted of the offense shall not be included in the person's criminal history for purposes of determining a sentence in any subsequent conviction. For all purposes, including responding to questions on employment or housing applications, a person whose conviction has been vacated under this section may state that he or she has never been convicted of that crime. However, nothing in this section affects the requirements for restoring a right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, nothing in this section affects or prevents the use of an offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.

(b) When a court vacates a record of domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020 under this section, the state may not use the vacated conviction in a later criminal prosecution unless the conviction was for: (i) Violating the provisions of a restraining order, no-contact order, or protection order restraining or enjoining the person or restraining the person from going on to the grounds of or entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220, ((26.26.138))26.26B.050, 26.44.063, 26.44.150, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, 26.50.130, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145); or (ii) stalking (RCW 9A.46.110). A vacated conviction under this section is not considered a conviction of such an offense for the purposes of 27 C.F.R. 478.11.

(((6) All costs incurred by the court and probation services shall be paid by the person making the motion to vacate the record unless a determination is made pursuant to chapter 10.101 RCW that the person making the motion is indigent, at the time the motion is brought.

))(c) A conviction vacated on or after the effective date of this section qualifies as a prior conviction for the purpose of charging a present recidivist offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 occurring on or after the effective date of this section.

(6) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit the order vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement agencies.

Sec. 5. RCW 9.94A.030 and 2018 c 166 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created under chapter 9.95 RCW.

(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department, means that the department, either directly or through a collection agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.

(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as part of a sentence under this chapter and served in the community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by the department.

(6) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private school.

(7) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.

(8) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.

(9) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Title 10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of a plea of guilty.

(10) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.

(11) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or elsewhere, and any issued certificates of restoration of opportunity pursuant to RCW 9.97.020.

(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i) whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of incarceration.

(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated pursuant to a governor's pardon. However, when a defendant is charged with a recidivist offense, "criminal history" includes a vacated prior conviction for the sole purpose of establishing that such vacated prior conviction constitutes an element of the present recidivist offense as provided in RCW 9.94A.640(3)(b) and 9.96.060(5)(c).

(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's criminal history.

(12) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol, having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their members or agents.

(13) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the criminal street gang.

(14) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is committed for one or more of the following reasons:

(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;

(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige, dominance, or control in any geographical area;

(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of the gang;

(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness against the gang or any member of the gang;

(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation, influence, or membership; or

(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance (chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88 RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.101); or promoting pornography (chapter 9.68 RCW).

(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents.

(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report daily to a specific location designated by the department or the sentencing court.

(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.

(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.

(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(20) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and 26.50.010.

(21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW 9.94A.660.

(22) "Drug offense" means:

(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);

(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance; or

(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(23) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.

(24) "Electronic monitoring" means tracking the location of an individual, whether pretrial or posttrial, through the use of technology that is capable of determining or identifying the monitored individual's presence or absence at a particular location including, but not limited to:

(a) Radio frequency signaling technology, which detects if the monitored individual is or is not at an approved location and notifies the monitoring agency of the time that the monitored individual either leaves the approved location or tampers with or removes the monitoring device; or

(b) Active or passive global positioning system technology, which detects the location of the monitored individual and notifies the monitoring agency of the monitored individual's location.

(25) "Escape" means:

(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW 9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or

(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this subsection.

(26) "Felony traffic offense" means:

(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or

(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.

(27) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of time.

(28) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.

(29) "Home detention" is a subset of electronic monitoring and means a program of partial confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence twenty-four hours a day, unless an absence from the residence is approved, authorized, or otherwise permitted in the order by the court or other supervising agency that ordered home detention, and the offender is subject to electronic monitoring.

(30) "Homelessness" or "homeless" means a condition where an individual lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence and who has a primary nighttime residence that is:

(a) A supervised, publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations;

(b) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings; or

(c) A private residence where the individual stays as a transient invitee.

(31) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.

(32) "Minor child" means a biological or adopted child of the offender who is under age eighteen at the time of the offender's current offense.

(33) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:

(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b) Assault in the second degree;

(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;

(d) Child molestation in the second degree;

(e) Controlled substance homicide;

(f) Extortion in the first degree;

(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h) Indecent liberties;

(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;

(j) Leading organized crime;

(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;

(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;

(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(n) Rape in the third degree;

(o) Robbery in the second degree;

(p) Sexual exploitation;

(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner;

(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation;

(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825;

(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;

(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through July 27, 1997;

(w) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was ten years or more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable to a felony offense under this title and Title 9A RCW and the out-of-state definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the definition of sexual motivation contained in this section.

(34) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(35) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. In addition, for the purpose of community custody requirements under this chapter, "offender" also means a misdemeanant or gross misdemeanant probationer ordered by a superior court to probation pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210 and supervised by the department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 and 9.94A.5011. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(36) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention, electronic monitoring, or work crew has been ordered by the court or home detention has been ordered by the department as part of the parenting program or the graduated reentry program, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home detention, work crew, electronic monitoring, and a combination of work crew, electronic monitoring, and home detention.

(37) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:

(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of the following criminal street gang-related offenses:

(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in this section, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);

(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by this section, excluding Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);

(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);

(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act (chapter 9.41 RCW);

(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);

(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);

(vii) Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);

(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));

(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);

(x) Any felony conviction by a person eighteen years of age or older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony offense under RCW 9.94A.833;

(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);

(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);

(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);

(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);

(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);

(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);

(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);

(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075);

(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);

(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);

(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);

(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);

(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);

(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);

(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or

(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);

(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;

(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a) of this subsection; and

(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection, the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or more persons.

(38) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious offense; and

(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection (38)(b)(i); and

(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(39) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity under his or her authority or supervision; (iii) a pastor, elder, volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the organization under his or her authority; or (iv) a teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority providing home-based instruction and the victim was a student receiving home-based instruction while under his or her authority or supervision. For purposes of this subsection: (A) "Home-based instruction" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; and (B) "teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person in authority" does not include the parent or legal guardian of the victim.

(40) "Private school" means a school regulated under chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.

(41) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.

(42) "Repetitive domestic violence offense" means any:

(a)(i) Domestic violence assault that is not a felony offense under RCW 9A.36.041;

(ii) Domestic violence violation of a no-contact order under chapter 10.99 RCW that is not a felony offense;

(iii) Domestic violence violation of a protection order under chapter 26.09, 26.10, ((26.26))26.26B, or 26.50 RCW that is not a felony offense;

(iv) Domestic violence harassment offense under RCW 9A.46.020 that is not a felony offense; or

(v) Domestic violence stalking offense under RCW 9A.46.110 that is not a felony offense; or

(b) Any federal, out-of-state, tribal court, military, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a repetitive domestic violence offense under (a) of this subsection.

(43) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs.

(44) "Risk assessment" means the application of the risk instrument recommended to the department by the Washington state institute for public policy as having the highest degree of predictive accuracy for assessing an offender's risk of reoffense.

(45) "Serious traffic offense" means:

(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.

(46) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and means:

(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;

(ii) Homicide by abuse;

(iii) Murder in the second degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;

(v) Assault in the first degree;

(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;

(vii) Rape in the first degree;

(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or

(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit one of these felonies; or

(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a) of this subsection.

(47) "Sex offense" means:

(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than RCW 9A.44.132;

(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;

(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than RCW 9.68A.080;

(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes; or

(v) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as a sex offender) if the person has been convicted of violating RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register as a sex offender) or 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, on at least one prior occasion;

(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this subsection;

(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or

(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this subsection.

(48) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual gratification.

(49) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(50) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.

(51) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the offender twenty-four hours before the offense.

(52) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(53) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.

(54) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged.

(55) "Violent offense" means:

(a) Any of the following felonies:

(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony;

(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;

(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;

(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;

(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;

(vii) Arson in the second degree;

(viii) Assault in the second degree;

(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;

(x) Extortion in the first degree;

(xi) Robbery in the second degree;

(xii) Drive-by shooting;

(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner; and

(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of this subsection; and

(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(56) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.

(57) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy training, and basic adult education.

(58) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study at school.

(59) "Recidivist offense" means a felony offense where a prior conviction of the same offense or other specified offense is an element of the crime including, but not limited to:

(a) Assault in the fourth degree where domestic violence is pleaded and proven, RCW 9A.36.041(3);

(b) Cyberstalking, RCW 9.61.260(3)(a);

(c) Harassment, RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b)(i);

(d) Indecent exposure, RCW 9A.88.010(2)(c);

(e) Stalking, RCW 9A.46.110(5)(b) (i) and (iii);

(f) Telephone harassment, RCW 9.61.230(2)(a); and

(g) Violation of a no-contact or protection order, RCW 26.50.110(5).

--- END ---