BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.12.240 and 2009 c 333 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department may authorize the removal or killing of wildlife that is destroying or injuring property, or when it is necessary for wildlife management or research.

(2) The department may not authorize the killing of gray wolves. The department may authorize the nonlethal removal or relocation of gray wolves that are destroying or injuring property, or when nonlethal removal or relocation is necessary for wildlife management or research.

(3) The department shall dispose of wildlife taken or possessed by them under this title in the manner determined by the director to be in the best interest of the state. Proceeds from sales shall be deposited in the state treasury to be credited to the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170.

--- END ---