BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.575 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a two-way roadway shall be so stopped or parked with the right-hand wheels parallel to and within twelve inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder.

(2) Except when otherwise provided by local ordinance, every vehicle other than a motorcycle stopped or parked upon a one-way roadway shall be so stopped or parked parallel to the curb or edge of the roadway, in the direction of authorized traffic movement, with its right-hand wheels within twelve inches of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder, or with its left-hand wheels within twelve inches of the left-hand curb or as close as practicable to the left edge of the left-hand shoulder.

(3)(a) Every motorcycle stopped or parked on a highway must be stopped or parked parallel or at an angle to the curb or edge of the highway with at least one wheel or fender within twelve inches of the curb nearest to which the motorcycle is parked or as close as practicable to the edge of the shoulder nearest to which the motorcycle is parked. A motorcycle may not be parked in such a manner that it extends into the roadway.

(b)(i) More than one motorcycle may occupy a parking space, provided that the parked motorcycles occupying the parking space do not exceed the boundaries of that parking space.

(ii) All motor vehicle parking laws and penalties for the unlawful parking of a motor vehicle apply to each motorcycle parked in a parking space when multiple motorcycles are parked in that space to the same extent that motor vehicle parking laws apply to a single motor vehicle when it is the sole motor vehicle parked in a parking space. When proof of payment is required to be displayed by each motor vehicle parking at a location, all motorcycles must display such proof of payment, even if more than one motorcycle is parked in the same parking space. However, parking spaces that are metered by the space may not require payment multiple times for the use of a single parking space by multiple motorcycles during the same period of time.

(4) Local authorities may by ordinance or resolution permit angle parking on any roadway, except that angle parking shall not be permitted on any federal-aid or state highway unless the secretary of transportation has determined by order that the roadway is of sufficient width to permit angle parking without interfering with the free movement of traffic. The angle parking of motorcycles, which is governed under subsection (3) of this section, is not subject to this determination by the secretary of transportation. A county, city, or town may by ordinance prohibit the angle stopping or parking of a motorcycle as specified in this subsection, but must post visible signage in a location to provide notice of the prohibition on angle motorcycle stopping or parking for the prohibition to apply to that location.

(((4)))(5) The secretary with respect to highways under his or her jurisdiction may place official traffic control devices prohibiting, limiting, or restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles on any highway where the secretary has determined by order, such stopping, standing, or parking is dangerous to those using the highway or where the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles would unduly interfere with the free movement of traffic thereon. No person shall stop, stand, or park any vehicle in violation of the restrictions indicated by such devices.

--- END ---