BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A person who is registered to vote pursuant to RCW 29A.08.110 and is not at least eighteen years of age at the time of a primary election held under RCW 29A.04.311 or a presidential primary election but is or will be at least eighteen years of age by the next general election must be permitted to vote in such primary election or presidential primary election. The person may vote only in those races the purpose of which is to winnow the field of candidates for the general election and may not vote in a special election for a candidate or measure that is held in conjunction with a primary election.

(2) For a primary election in which persons described in subsection (1) of this section may vote on one or more races, the county auditor must provide to such persons:

(a) The same ballot as provided to other persons. If necessary because there are races on the ballot in which such persons may not vote, the county auditor must include with each ballot mailed to such a person instructions explaining in which races the person may and may not vote and must mark each ballot and envelope to identify the ballot as one from a person described in subsection (1) of this section. The county auditor must segregate and review the returned ballots, and if a person voted in a race in which the voter was not eligible to vote, the county auditor must create a duplicate ballot and process the ballot in the same manner as other duplicate ballots are processed; or

(b) A ballot including only the races such persons are permitted to vote on.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW to read as follows:

Information that is otherwise disclosable under this chapter may be disclosed only for any of the following persons:

(1) A person who is at least eighteen years old; and

(2) A person who will be eighteen years old by the next general election once they have voted in a primary election, not including presidential primary elections, except that information may be disclosed prior to this time for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 29A.40 RCW to read as follows:

County auditors must follow the procedures described in section 1 of this act regarding mailing and processing ballots for persons described in section 1(2) of this act.

Sec. 4. RCW 29A.04.061 and 2003 c 111 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:

"Elector" means any person who possesses all of the qualifications to vote under Article VI of the state Constitution, including, for the purposes of voting in a primary election or presidential primary election, persons qualified to vote in a primary election or presidential primary election pursuant to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 5. RCW 29A.08.170 and 2018 c 109 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person may sign up to register to vote if he or she is sixteen or seventeen years of age, as part of the future voter program.

(2) Except for persons described in section 1 of this act, a person who signs up to register to vote may not vote until reaching eighteen years of age((, and his or her name)). A person who signs up to register to vote may not be added to the statewide voter registration database list of voters until such time as he or she will be eighteen years of age by the next election. Information that is otherwise discloseable under this chapter is subject to section 2 of this act.

Sec. 6. RCW 29A.08.172 and 2018 c 109 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who has attained sixteen years of age may sign up to register to vote, as part of the future voter program, by submitting a voter registration application by mail.

(2) The applicant must attest to the truth of the information provided on the application by affirmatively accepting the information as true.

(3) If signing up to register by mail, the person must provide a signature for voter registration purposes.

(4) The applicant must affirmatively acknowledge that he or she will not vote in a special or general election until his or her eighteenth birthday, and will only vote in a primary election or presidential primary election in accordance with section 1 of this act.

Sec. 7. RCW 29A.08.174 and 2018 c 109 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A person who has attained sixteen years of age and has a valid Washington state driver's license or identicard may sign up to register to vote as part of the future voter program, by submitting a voter registration application electronically on the secretary of state's web site.

(2) The applicant must attest to the truth of the information provided on the application by affirmatively accepting the information as true.

(3) If signing up to register electronically, the applicant must affirmatively assent to the use of his or her driver's license or identicard signature for voter registration purposes.

(4) The applicant must affirmatively acknowledge that he or she will not vote in a special or general election until his or her eighteenth birthday, and will only vote in a primary or presidential primary election in accordance with section 1 of this act.

(5) For each electronic registration application, the secretary of state must obtain a digital copy of the applicant's driver's license or identicard signature from the department of licensing.

(6) The secretary of state may employ additional security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of voter preregistration applications submitted electronically.

Sec. 8. RCW 29A.08.210 and 2018 c 109 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application providing the following information concerning his or her qualifications as a voter in this state:

(1) The former address of the applicant if previously registered to vote;

(2) The applicant's full name;

(3) The applicant's date of birth;

(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;

(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;

(6) The sex of the applicant;

(7) The applicant's Washington state driver's license number, Washington state identification card number, or the last four digits of the applicant's social security number if he or she does not have a Washington state driver's license or Washington state identification card;

(8) A check box allowing the applicant to indicate that he or she is a member of the armed forces, national guard, or reserves, or that he or she is an overseas voter;

(9) A check box allowing the applicant to acknowledge that he or she is at least:

(a) Eighteen years old ((or is at least)); or

(b) Sixteen years old and will vote:

(i) In a special or general election only after he or she reaches the age of eighteen; and

(ii) In a primary election or presidential primary election only in accordance with section 1 of this act;

(10) Clear and conspicuous language, designed to draw the applicant's attention, stating that the applicant must be a United States citizen in order to register to vote;

(11) A check box and declaration confirming that the applicant is a citizen of the United States;

(12) The following warning:

"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, a fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both."

(13) The oath required by RCW 29A.08.230 and a space for the applicant's signature; and

(14) Any other information that the secretary of state determines is necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and prevent duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.

This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to be prescribed by the secretary of state.

Sec. 9. RCW 29A.08.230 and 2013 c 11 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

For all voter registrations, the registrant shall sign the following oath:

"I declare that the facts on this voter registration form are true. I am a citizen of the United States, I will have lived at this address in Washington for at least thirty days immediately before the next election at which I vote, I will be at least eighteen years old when I vote in the general or special election, I will be at least eighteen years old by the general election immediately following a primary election or presidential primary election in which I vote, I am not disqualified from voting due to a court order, and I am not under department of corrections supervision for a Washington felony conviction."

Sec. 10. RCW 29A.08.330 and 2018 c 109 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The secretary of state shall prescribe the method of voter registration for each designated agency. The agency shall use either the state voter registration by mail form with a separate declination form for the applicant to indicate that he or she declines to register at this time, or the agency may use a separate form approved for use by the secretary of state.

(2) The person providing service at the agency shall offer voter registration services to every client whenever he or she applies for service or assistance and with each renewal, recertification, or change of address. The person providing service shall give the applicant the same level of assistance with the voter registration application as is offered to fill out the agency's forms and documents, including information about age and citizenship requirements for voter registration.

(3) The person providing service at the agency shall determine if the prospective applicant wants to register to vote or update his or her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register or sign up to vote or update your voter registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register, sign up, or update a registration, the service agent shall ask the following:

(a) "Are you a United States citizen?"

(b) "Are you at least eighteen years old, or are you at least sixteen years old and will you vote in the general or special election only after you turn eighteen, and in a primary election or presidential primary election only if you will be at least eighteen years old by the general election that immediately follows the primary election or presidential primary election in which you will vote?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the agent shall then provide the applicant with a voter registration form and instructions and shall record that the applicant has requested to sign up to vote, register to vote, or update a voter registration. If the applicant answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not provide the applicant with a voter registration application.

(4) If an agency uses a computerized application process, it may, in consultation with the secretary of state, develop methods to capture simultaneously the information required for voter registration during a person's computerized application process.

(5) Each designated agency shall transmit the applications to the secretary of state or appropriate county auditor within three business days.

(6) Information that is otherwise disclosable under this chapter ((cannot be disclosed on the future voter until the person reaches eighteen years of age, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots))is subject to section 2 of this act.

Sec. 11. RCW 29A.08.710 and 2018 c 109 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The county auditor shall have custody of the original voter registration records and voter registration sign up records for each county. The original voter registration form must be filed without regard to precinct and is considered confidential and unavailable for public inspection and copying. An automated file of all registered voters must be maintained pursuant to RCW 29A.08.125. An auditor may maintain the automated file in lieu of filing or maintaining the original voter registration forms if the automated file includes all of the information from the original voter registration forms including, but not limited to, a retrievable facsimile of each voter's signature.

(2)(a) The following information contained in voter registration records or files regarding a voter or a group of voters is available for public inspection and copying, except as provided in RCW 40.24.060 and (b) of this subsection: The voter's name, address, political jurisdiction, gender, date of birth, voting record, date of registration, and registration number. No other information from voter registration records or files is available for public inspection or copying.

(b) The personally identifiable information of individuals ((who are under the age of eighteen are exempt from public inspection and copying until the subject of the record is eighteen years of age, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots))that is otherwise disclosable under this chapter is subject to section 2 of this act.

Sec. 12. RCW 29A.08.720 and 2018 c 110 s 206 and 2018 c 109 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) In the case of voter registration records received through the health benefit exchange, the department of licensing, or an agency designated under RCW 29A.08.310, the identity of the office or agency at which any particular individual registered to vote must be used only for voter registration purposes, is not available for public inspection, and shall not be disclosed to the public. Any record of a particular individual's choice not to register to vote at an office of the department of licensing or a state agency designated under RCW 29A.08.310 is not available for public inspection and any information regarding such a choice by a particular individual shall not be disclosed to the public. Information that is otherwise disclosable under this chapter ((cannot be disclosed on the future voter until the person reaches eighteen years of age, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots))is subject to section 2 of this act.

(2)(a) Subject to the restrictions of RCW 29A.08.710 and 40.24.060, and (b) of this subsection, precinct lists and current lists of registered voters are public records and must be made available for public inspection and copying under such reasonable rules and regulations as the county auditor or secretary of state may prescribe. The county auditor or secretary of state shall promptly furnish current lists of registered voters in his or her possession, at actual reproduction cost, to any person requesting such information. The lists shall not be used for the purpose of mailing or delivering any advertisement or offer for any property, establishment, organization, product, or service or for the purpose of mailing or delivering any solicitation for money, services, or anything of value. However, the lists and labels may be used for any political purpose. The county auditor or secretary of state must provide a copy of RCW 29A.08.740 to the person requesting the material that is released under this section.

(b) The personally identifiable information of individuals ((who are under the age of eighteen are exempt from public inspection and copying until the subject of the record is eighteen years of age, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots))that is otherwise disclosable under this chapter is subject to section 2 of this act.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "political purpose" means a purpose concerned with the support of or opposition to any candidate for any partisan or nonpartisan office or concerned with the support of or opposition to any ballot proposition or issue. "Political purpose" includes, but is not limited to, such activities as the advertising for or against any candidate or ballot measure or the solicitation of financial support.

Sec. 13. RCW 29A.08.760 and 2018 c 109 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state shall provide a duplicate copy of the master statewide computer file or electronic data file of registered voters to the consolidated technology services agency for purposes of creating the jury source list without cost. The information contained in a voter registration application is exempt from inclusion until the applicant reaches age eighteen. Information that is otherwise disclosable under this chapter ((cannot be disclosed on the future voter until the person reaches eighteen years of age, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots))is subject to section 2 of this act. Restrictions as to the commercial use of the information on the statewide computer tape or data file of registered voters, and penalties for its misuse, shall be the same as provided in RCW 29A.08.720 and 29A.08.740.

Sec. 14. RCW 29A.08.770 and 2018 c 109 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The secretary of state and each county auditor shall maintain for at least two years and shall make available for public inspection and copying all records concerning the implementation of programs and activities conducted for the purpose of insuring the accuracy and currency of official lists of eligible voters. These records must include lists of the names and addresses of all persons to whom notices are sent and information concerning whether or not each person has responded to the notices. These records must contain lists of all persons removed from the list of eligible voters and the reasons why the voters were removed. The personally identifiable information of individuals ((who are under the age of eighteen are exempt from public inspection and copying until the subject of the record is eighteen years of age, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots))that is otherwise disclosable under this chapter is subject to section 2 of this act.

Sec. 15. RCW 28A.230.150 and 2018 c 109 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) On January 16th of each year or the preceding Friday when January 16th falls on a nonschool day, there shall be observed within each public school "Temperance and Good Citizenship Day". Annually the state superintendent of public instruction shall duly prepare and publish for circulation among the teachers of the state a program for use on such day embodying topics pertinent thereto and may from year to year designate particular laws for special observance.

(2) Each year on "Temperance and Good Citizenship Day," social studies teachers must, as resources allow, coordinate a voter registration event in each history or social studies class attended by high school seniors. This event is part of the future voter program. Teachers must make voter sign up and registration available to all students.

(3) County auditors may, as resources allow, help coordinate elements of the future voter program, and participate in voter registration events for students on "Temperance and Good Citizenship Day."

(4) On each temperance and good citizenship day all students who will be eighteen years of age or older by the time of the next general election will be given the opportunity to register to vote online in the classroom. Paper registration must also be made available in the classroom. Students who do not possess a state identicard or driver's license must be provided a paper registration form. The event must include adequate time for students to complete the registration process in class.

(5) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the secretary of state, must update and distribute youth voter registration materials annually, by December 1st, for eligible students to register to vote at school. Electronic notification of the availability of the materials must be distributed to high school principals and secondary social studies and history teachers.

(6) The superintendent of public instruction must consult with the secretary of state to provide registration methods that enable the electronic collection of information on the number of students who registered to vote on "Temperance and Good Citizenship Day," with the goal of achieving at least fifty thousand new voter registrations for seventeen and eighteen year olds annually, beginning in January 2020.

(7) Beginning March 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction must report on yearly progress toward the goal established in subsection (5) of this section, including the number of seventeen and eighteen year olds registered to vote by county and recommendations for increasing youth voter registration, to the governor and the appropriate standing committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.

(8) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Future voter program" refers to the information that may be collected by a number of processes about a future voter. Information that is otherwise disclosable under chapter 29A.08 RCW ((cannot be disclosed on the future voter until the person reaches age eighteen, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots))is subject to section 2 of this act.

(b) "Sign up" means the act of providing information relevant to eventual official voter registration, prior to such time that he or she will be eighteen years of age by the next election.

Sec. 16. RCW 42.56.230 and 2018 c 109 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The following personal information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter:

(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public health agencies, or welfare recipients;

(2)(a) Personal information:

(i) For a child enrolled in licensed child care in any files maintained by the department of children, youth, and families;

(ii) For a child enrolled in a public or nonprofit program serving or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs; or

(iii) For the family members or guardians of a child who is subject to the exemption under this subsection (2) if the family member or guardian has the same last name as the child or if the family member or guardian resides at the same address as the child and disclosure of the family member's or guardian's information would result in disclosure of the personal information exempted under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

(b) Emergency contact information under this subsection (2) may be provided to appropriate authorities and medical personnel for the purpose of treating the individual during an emergency situation;

(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees, appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;

(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;

(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial information as defined in RCW 9.35.005 including social security numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by other law;

(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093;

(7)(a) Any record used to prove identity, age, residential address, social security number, or other personal information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.

(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an applicant declined to register with the selective service system.

(c) Any record pertaining to a vehicle license plate, driver's license, or identicard issued under RCW 46.08.066 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement, confidential public health work, public assistance fraud, or child support investigative activity. This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vehicle license plates, drivers' licenses, or identicards that, under RCW 46.08.066, an agency or department has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse.

(d) Any record pertaining to a vessel registration issued under RCW 88.02.330 that, alone or in combination with any other records, may reveal the identity of an individual, or reveal that an individual is or was, performing an undercover or covert law enforcement activity. This exemption does not prevent the release of the total number of vessel registrations that, under RCW 88.02.330, an agency or department has applied for, been issued, denied, returned, destroyed, lost, and reported for misuse;

(8) All information related to individual claims resolution structured settlement agreements submitted to the board of industrial insurance appeals under RCW 51.04.063, other than final orders from the board of industrial insurance appeals.

Upon request by the legislature, the department of licensing shall provide a report to the legislature containing all of the information in subsection (7)(c) and (d) of this section that is subject to public disclosure;

(9) Voluntarily submitted information contained in a database that is part of or associated with enhanced 911 emergency communications systems, or information contained or used in emergency notification systems as provided under RCW 38.52.575 and 38.52.577; and

(10) Until the person reaches eighteen years of age, information, otherwise disclosable under chapter 29A.08 RCW, that relates to a future voter, except ((for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots))as provided under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 17. RCW 42.56.250 and 2018 c 109 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The following employment and licensing information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter:

(1) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used to administer a license, employment, or academic examination;

(2) All applications for public employment, including the names of applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect to an applicant;

(3) Professional growth plans (PGPs) in educator license renewals submitted through the eCert system in the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(4) The following information held by any public agency in personnel records, public employment related records, volunteer rosters, or included in any mailing list of employees or volunteers of any public agency: Residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal wireless telephone numbers, personal email addresses, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, identicard numbers, and emergency contact information of employees or volunteers of a public agency, and the names, dates of birth, residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal wireless telephone numbers, personal email addresses, social security numbers, and emergency contact information of dependents of employees or volunteers of a public agency. For purposes of this subsection, "employees" includes independent provider home care workers as defined in RCW 74.39A.240;

(5) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency employee: (a) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW against the person; and (b) requests his or her identity or any identifying information not be disclosed;

(6) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency conducting an active and ongoing investigation of a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state, or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment;

(7) Criminal history records checks for board staff finalist candidates conducted pursuant to RCW 43.33A.025;

(8) Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and benefit information for maritime employees collected from private employers under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in RCW 47.64.220(2);

(9) Photographs and month and year of birth in the personnel files of employees and workers of criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030. The news media, as defined in RCW 5.68.010(5), shall have access to the photographs and full date of birth. For the purposes of this subsection, news media does not include any person or organization of persons in the custody of a criminal justice agency as defined in RCW 10.97.030;

(10) The global positioning system data that would indicate the location of the residence of a public employee or volunteer using the global positioning system recording device; and

(11) Until the person reaches eighteen years of age, information, otherwise disclosable under chapter 29A.08 RCW, that relates to a future voter, except ((for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots))as provided under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 18. RCW 46.20.155 and 2018 c 109 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Before issuing an original license or identicard or renewing a license or identicard under this chapter, the licensing agent shall determine if the applicant wants to register to vote or update his or her voter registration by asking the following question:

"Do you want to register or sign up to vote or update your voter registration?"

If the applicant chooses to register, sign up, or update a registration, the agent shall ask the following:

(1) "Are you a United States citizen?"

(2) "Are you at least eighteen years old, or are you at least sixteen years old and will you vote in a special or general election only after you turn eighteen, and in a primary election or presidential primary election only if you will be at least eighteen years old by the general election that immediately follows the primary election or presidential primary election in which you will vote?"

If the applicant answers in the affirmative to both questions, the agent shall then submit the registration, sign up form, or update. If the applicant answers in the negative to either question, the agent shall not submit an application. Information that is otherwise disclosable under chapter 29A.08 RCW ((cannot be disclosed on the future voter until the person reaches eighteen years of age, except for the purpose of processing and delivering ballots))is subject to section 2 of this act.

(2) The department shall establish a procedure that substantially meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section when permitting an applicant to renew a license or identicard by mail or by electronic commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. This act takes effect January 1, 2020.

--- END ---