BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. RCW 1.08.025 directs the code reviser, with the approval of the statute law committee, to prepare legislation for submission to the legislature "concerning deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions" in statutes. This act makes technical, nonsubstantive amendments as follows:

(1) Section 2 of this act updates RCW 1.20.110 to reflect 2008 legislation by the Scottish parliament, creating a new register of tartans.

(2) Sections 3, 17, and 19 of this act merge double amendments created when sections were amended without reference to the amendments made in the same year.

(3) Section 4 of this act amends RCW 13.40.193 to reflect a change in subsection numbering of a cross-referenced section.

(4) Section 5 of this act corrects an apparent error in RCW 28B.117.040(1). The reference to "subsection (3)(a) of this section" is incorrect. RCW 28B.117.030(3)(a) was apparently intended.

(5) Sections 6 through 16 of this act amend numerous sections in chapter 29A.92 RCW to replace references to "chapter 113, Laws of 2018" with "this chapter."

(6) Section 18 of this act amends RCW 41.50.033 to remove unnecessary subsection references for a defined term.

(7) Sections 20 through 22 of this act merge double amendments created when sections were amended without cognizance of amendments made in previous years.

(8) Section 23 of this act corrects five references to "emergency volunteer health practitioner" in RCW 70.15.110(1). Reference to "volunteer health practitioner" was apparently intended.

(9) Section 24 of this act corrects an apparent error in RCW 70.305.010 (4) and (5). The reference to RCW 43.216.141 appears erroneous. RCW 43.216.157 was apparently intended.

(10) Section 25 of this act amends RCW 74.13.029 to reflect multiple changes in subsection numbering of a cross-referenced section.

(11) Section 26 of this act adds a definition section to chapter 74.14B RCW to clarify that, pursuant to RCW 43.216.906, "department" refers to the department of children, youth, and families, rather than the department of social and health services.

Sec. 2. RCW 1.20.110 and 1991 c 62 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The Washington state tartan is hereby designated. The tartan shall have a pattern of colors, called a sett, that is made up of a green background with stripes of blue, white, yellow, red, and black. The secretary of state shall register the tartan with the Scottish ((Tartan Society, Comrie, Perthshire, Scotland))Register of Tartans.

Sec. 3. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2018 c 236 s 721 and 2018 c 7 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI

Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XV

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV

Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII

Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(3))

XI

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

X

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)

IX

Abandonment of Dependent Person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit and Run—Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

VIII

Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.100)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

VII

Air bag diagnostic systems (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(2)(b))

Air bag replacement requirements (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(1)(b))

Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW 9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.050(1))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))

Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.650(1)(b))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.675)

Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(b))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.060(1))

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun or Bump-fire Stock in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

VI

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 1 (RCW 9A.56.400(1))

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)

V

Abandonment of Dependent Person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Air bag diagnostic systems (RCW 46.37.660(2)(c))

Air bag replacement requirements (RCW 46.37.660(1)(c))

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Dealing in Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220, ((26.26.138))26.26B.050, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (RCW 46.37.650(1)(c))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(c))

Sending, Bringing into State Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.060(2))

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault 4 (third domestic violence offense) (RCW 9A.36.041(3))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Driving While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.502(6))

Endangerment with a Controlled Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run—Injury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel—Injury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health care service contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health maintenance organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicle Prowling 2 (third or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.52.100(3))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Viewing of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III

Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace Officer With a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily Harm By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun, Bump-fire Stock, or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 1 (RCW 9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW 9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.82.055)

Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful Misbranding of ((Food)) Fish or Shellfish 1 (RCW 77.140.060(3))

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.120(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II

Commercial Fishing Without a License 1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.90.040)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Electronic Data Service Interference (RCW 9A.90.060)

Electronic Data Tampering 1 (RCW 9A.90.080)

Electronic Data Theft (RCW 9A.90.100)

Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 2 (RCW 9A.56.360(3))

Scrap Processing, Recycling, or Supplying Without a License (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 19.290.100)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at five thousand dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW 9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians in Indian Fishery (RCW 77.15.570(2))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License (RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 2 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(a))

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism 1 (RCW 9A.44.115)

I

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a Mental Health Advance Directive (RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.450(3)(b))

Suspension of Department Privileges 1 (RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 2 (RCW 9A.56.400(2))

Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at seven hundred fifty dollars or more but less than five thousand dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business beyond the scope of licensure (RCW 48.17.063)

Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch Accounting (RCW 77.15.630(3)(b))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal Identification Device (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Releasing, Planting, Possessing, or Placing Deleterious Exotic Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.144)

Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1 (RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))

Unlawful Use of Prohibited Aquatic Animal Species (RCW 77.15.253(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Violating Commercial Fishing Area or Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))

Sec. 4. RCW 13.40.193 and 2018 c 162 s 5, 2018 c 22 s 7, and 2018 c 7 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) If a respondent is found to have been in possession of a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(((iv)))(v), the court shall impose a minimum disposition of ten days of confinement. If the offender's standard range of disposition for the offense as indicated in RCW 13.40.0357 is more than thirty days of confinement, the court shall commit the offender to the department for the standard range disposition. The offender shall not be released until the offender has served a minimum of ten days in confinement.

(2)(a) If a respondent is found to have been in possession of a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040, the disposition must include a requirement that the respondent participate in a qualifying program as described in (b) of this subsection, when available, unless the court makes a written finding based on the outcome of the juvenile court risk assessment that participation in a qualifying program would not be appropriate.

(b) For purposes of this section, "qualifying program" means an aggression replacement training program, a functional family therapy program, or another program applicable to the juvenile firearm offender population that has been identified as evidence-based or research-based and cost-beneficial in the current list prepared at the direction of the legislature by the Washington state institute for public policy.

(3) If the court finds that the respondent or an accomplice was armed with a firearm, the court shall determine the standard range disposition for the offense pursuant to RCW 13.40.160. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offender committed any felony other than possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possession of a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, or use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony, the following periods of total confinement must be added to the sentence: (a) Except for (b) of this subsection, for a class A felony, six months; for a class B felony, four months; and for a class C felony, two months; (b) for any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, committed by a respondent who is sixteen or seventeen years old at the time of the offense, a period of twelve months. The additional time shall be imposed regardless of the offense's juvenile disposition offense category as designated in RCW 13.40.0357.

(4)(a) If the court finds that the respondent who is sixteen or seventeen years old and committed the offense of robbery in the first degree, drive-by shooting, rape of a child in the first degree, burglary in the first degree, or any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 and was armed with a firearm, and the court finds that the respondent's participation was related to membership in a criminal street gang or advancing the benefit, aggrandizement, gain, profit, or other advantage for a criminal street gang, a period of three months total confinement must be added to the sentence. The additional time must be imposed regardless of the offense's juvenile disposition offense category as designated in RCW 13.40.0357 and must be served consecutively with any other sentencing enhancement.

(b) For the purposes of this section, "criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol, having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their members or agents.

(5) When a disposition under this section would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court may impose another disposition. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a disposition of confinement exceeding thirty days, the court shall commit the juvenile to a maximum term, and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a disposition of confinement less than thirty days, the disposition shall be comprised of confinement or community supervision or both.

(6) Any term of confinement ordered pursuant to this section shall run consecutively to any term of confinement imposed in the same disposition for other offenses.

Sec. 5. RCW 28B.117.040 and 2018 c 232 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Effective operation of the passport to careers program requires early and accurate identification of former foster care youth and unaccompanied youth experiencing homelessness so that they can be linked to the financial and other assistance that will help them succeed in college or in a registered apprenticeship or recognized preapprenticeship. To that end:

(1) All institutions of higher education that receive funding for student support services under RCW 28B.117.030 shall include on their applications for admission or on their registration materials a question asking whether the applicant has been in state, tribal, or federal foster care in Washington state or experienced unaccompanied homelessness under the parameters in ((subsection (3)(a) of this section))RCW 28B.117.030(3)(a), as determined by the office, with an explanation that financial and support services may be available. All other institutions of higher education are strongly encouraged to include such a question and explanation. No institution may consider whether an applicant may be eligible for a scholarship or student support services under this chapter when deciding whether the applicant will be granted admission.

(2) With substantial input from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of social and health services and the department of children, youth, and families shall devise and implement procedures for efficiently, promptly, and accurately identifying students and applicants who are eligible for services under RCW 28B.117.030, and for sharing that information with the office, the institutions of higher education, and the nongovernmental entity or entities identified in RCW 28B.77.250, 28B.117.030(5)(e), and 28B.117.055. The procedures shall include appropriate safeguards for consent by the applicant or student before disclosure.

Sec. 6. RCW 29A.92.005 and 2018 c 113 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that electoral systems that deny race, color, or language minority groups an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice are inconsistent with the right to free and equal elections as provided by Article I, section 19 and Article VI, section 1 of the Washington state Constitution as well as protections found in the Fourteenth and Fifteenth amendments to the United States Constitution. The well-established principle of "one person, one vote" and the prohibition on vote dilution have been consistently upheld in federal and state courts for more than fifty years.

The legislature also finds that local government subdivisions are often prohibited from addressing these challenges because of Washington laws that narrowly prescribe the methods by which they may elect members of their legislative bodies. The legislature finds that in some cases, this has resulted in an improper dilution of voting power for these minority groups. The legislature intends to modify existing prohibitions in state laws so that these jurisdictions may voluntarily adopt changes on their own, in collaboration with affected community members, to remedy potential electoral issues so that minority groups have an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice or influence the outcome of an election.

The legislature intends for this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) to be consistent with federal protections that may provide a similar remedy for minority groups. Remedies shall also be available where the drawing of crossover and coalition districts is able to address both vote dilution and racial polarization.

The legislature also intends for this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) to be consistent with legal precedent from Mt. Spokane Skiing Corp. v. Spokane Co. (86 Wn. App. 165, 1997) that found that noncharter counties need not adhere to a single uniform county system of government, but that each county have the same "authority available" in order to be deemed uniform.

Sec. 7. RCW 29A.92.030 and 2018 c 113 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A political subdivision is in violation of this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) when it is shown that:

(a) Elections in the political subdivision exhibit polarized voting; and

(b) Members of a protected class or classes do not have an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice as a result of the dilution or abridgment of the rights of members of that protected class or classes.

(2) The fact that members of a protected class are not geographically compact or concentrated to constitute a majority in a proposed or existing district-based election district shall not preclude a finding of a violation under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)), but may be a factor in determining a remedy. The equal opportunity to elect shall be assessed pragmatically, based on local election conditions, and may include crossover districts.

(3) In determining whether there is polarized voting under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)), the court shall analyze elections of the governing body of the political subdivision, ballot measure elections, elections in which at least one candidate is a member of a protected class, and other electoral choices that affect the rights and privileges of members of a protected class. Elections conducted prior to the filing of an action pursuant to this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) are more probative to establish the existence of racially polarized voting than elections conducted after the filing of an action.

(4) The election of candidates who are members of a protected class and who were elected prior to the filing of an action pursuant to this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) shall not preclude a finding of polarized voting that results in an unequal opportunity for a protected class to elect candidates of their choice.

(5) Proof of intent on the part of the voters or elected officials to discriminate against a protected class is not required for a cause of action to be sustained.

(6) Other factors such as the history of discrimination, the use of electoral devices or other voting practices or procedures that may enhance the dilutive effects of at-large elections, denial of access to those processes determining which groups of candidates will receive financial or other support in a given election, the extent to which members of a protected class bear the effects of past discrimination in areas such as education, employment, and health, which hinder their ability to participate effectively in the political process, and the use of overt or subtle racial appeals in political campaigns are probative, but not necessary factors, to establish a violation of this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)).

Sec. 8. RCW 29A.92.050 and 2018 c 113 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a) Prior to the adoption of its proposed plan, the political subdivision must provide public notice to residents of the subdivision about the proposed remedy to a potential violation of RCW 29A.92.020. If a significant segment of the residents of the subdivision have limited English proficiency and speaks a language other than English, the political subdivision must:

(i) Provide accurate written and verbal notice of the proposed remedy in languages that diverse residents of the political subdivision can understand, as indicated by demographic data; and

(ii) Air radio or television public service announcements describing the proposed remedy broadcast in the languages that diverse residents of the political subdivision can understand, as indicated by demographic data.

(b) The political subdivision shall hold at least one public hearing on the proposed plan at least one week before adoption.

(c) For purposes of this section, "significant segment of the community" means five percent or more of residents, or five hundred or more residents, whichever is fewer, residing in the political subdivision.

(2)(a) If the political subdivision invokes its authority under RCW 29A.92.040 and the plan is adopted during the period of time between the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November and on or before January 15th of the following year, the political subdivision shall order new elections to occur at the next succeeding general election.

(b) If the political subdivision invokes its authority under RCW 29A.92.040 and the plan is adopted during the period of time between January 16th and on or before the first Monday of November, the next election will occur as scheduled and organized under the current electoral system, but the political subdivision shall order new elections to occur pursuant to the remedy at the general election the following calendar year.

(3) If a political subdivision implements a district-based election system under RCW 29A.92.040(2), the plan shall be consistent with the following criteria:

(a) Each district shall be as reasonably equal in population as possible to each and every other such district comprising the political subdivision.

(b) Each district shall be reasonably compact.

(c) Each district shall consist of geographically contiguous area.

(d) To the extent feasible, the district boundaries shall coincide with existing recognized natural boundaries and shall, to the extent possible, preserve existing communities of related and mutual interest.

(e) District boundaries may not be drawn or maintained in a manner that creates or perpetuates the dilution of the votes of the members of a protected class or classes.

(4) Within forty-five days after receipt of federal decennial census information applicable to a specific local area, the commission established in RCW 44.05.030 shall forward the census information to each political subdivision.

(5) No later than eight months after its receipt of federal decennial census data, the governing body of the political subdivision that had previously invoked its authority under RCW 29A.92.040 to implement a district-based election system, or that was previously charged with redistricting under RCW 29A.92.110, shall prepare a plan for redistricting its districts, pursuant to RCW 29A.76.010, and in a manner consistent with this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)).

Sec. 9. RCW 29A.92.060 and 2018 c 113 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) A voter who resides in the political subdivision who intends to challenge a political subdivision's electoral system under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) shall first notify the political subdivision. The political subdivision shall promptly make such notice public.

(2) The notice provided shall identify and provide contact information for the person or persons who intend to file an action, and shall identify the protected class or classes whose members do not have an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice or an equal opportunity to influence the outcome of an election because of alleged vote dilution and polarized voting. The notice shall also include a type of remedy the person believes may address the alleged violation of RCW 29A.92.030.

Sec. 10. RCW 29A.92.070 and 2018 c 113 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The political subdivision shall work in good faith with the person providing the notice to implement a remedy that provides the protected class or classes identified in the notice an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice. Such work in good faith to implement a remedy may include, but is not limited to consideration of: (a) Relevant electoral data; (b) relevant demographic data, including the most recent census data available; and (c) any other information that would be relevant to implementing a remedy.

(2) If the political subdivision adopts a remedy that takes the notice into account, or adopts the notice's proposed remedy, the political subdivision shall seek a court order acknowledging that the political subdivision's remedy complies with RCW 29A.92.020 and was prompted by a plausible violation. The person who submitted the notice may support or oppose such an order, and may obtain public records to do so. The political subdivision must provide all political, census, and demographic data and any analysis of that data used to develop the remedy in its filings seeking the court order and with any documents made public. All facts and reasonable inferences shall be viewed in the light most favorable to those opposing the political subdivision's proposed remedy at this stage. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the court will decline to approve the political subdivision's proposed remedy at this stage.

(3) If the court concludes that the political subdivision's remedy complies with RCW 29A.92.020, an action under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) may not be brought against that political subdivision for four years by any party so long as the political subdivision does not enact a change to or deviation from the remedy during this four-year period that would otherwise give rise to an action under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)).

(4) In agreeing to adopt the person's proposed remedy, the political subdivision may do so by stipulation, which shall become a public document.

Sec. 11. RCW 29A.92.080 and 2018 c 113 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) Any voter who resides in the political subdivision may file an action under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) if, one hundred eighty days after a political subdivision receives notice of a challenge to its electoral system under RCW 29A.92.060, the political subdivision has not obtained a court order stating that it has adopted a remedy in compliance with RCW 29A.92.020. However, if notice is received after July 1, 2021, then the political subdivision shall have ninety days to obtain a court order before an action may be filed.

(2) If a political subdivision has received two or more notices containing materially different proposed remedies, the political subdivision shall work in good faith with the persons to implement a remedy that provides the protected class or classes identified in the notices an equal opportunity to elect candidates of their choice. If the political subdivision adopts one of the remedies offered, or a different remedy that takes multiple notices into account, the political subdivision shall seek a court order acknowledging that the political subdivision's remedy is reasonably necessary to avoid a violation of RCW 29A.92.020. The persons who submitted the notice may support or oppose such an order, and may obtain public records to do so. The political subdivision must provide all political, census, and demographic data and any analysis of that data used to develop the remedy in its filings seeking the court order and with any documents made public. All facts and reasonable inferences shall be viewed in the light most favorable to those opposing the political subdivision's proposed remedy at this stage. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the court will decline to approve the political subdivision's proposed remedy at this stage.

(3) If the court concludes that the political subdivision's remedy complies with RCW 29A.92.020, an action under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) may not be brought against that political subdivision for four years by any party so long as the political subdivision does not enact a change to or deviation from the remedy during this four-year period that would otherwise give rise to an action under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)).

Sec. 12. RCW 29A.92.090 and 2018 c 113 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) After exhaustion of the time period in RCW 29A.92.080, any voter who resides in a political subdivision where a violation of RCW 29A.92.020 is alleged may file an action in the superior court of the county in which the political subdivision is located. If the action is against a county, the action may be filed in the superior court of such county, or in the superior court of either of the two nearest judicial districts as determined pursuant to RCW 36.01.050(2). An action filed pursuant to this chapter does not need to be filed as a class action.

(2) Members of different protected classes may file an action jointly pursuant to this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) if they demonstrate that the combined voting preferences of the multiple protected classes are polarized against the rest of the electorate.

Sec. 13. RCW 29A.92.100 and 2018 c 113 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) In an action filed pursuant to this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)), the trial court shall set a trial to be held no later than one year after the filing of a complaint, and shall set a discovery and motions calendar accordingly.

(2) For purposes of any applicable statute of limitations, a cause of action under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) arises every time there is an election for any members of the governing body of the political subdivision.

(3) The plaintiff's constitutional right to the secrecy of the plaintiff's vote is preserved and is not waived by the filing of an action pursuant to this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)), and the filing is not subject to discovery or disclosure.

(4) In seeking a temporary restraining order or a preliminary injunction, a plaintiff shall not be required to post a bond or any other security in order to secure such equitable relief.

(5) No notice may be submitted to any political subdivision pursuant to this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) before July 19, 2018.

Sec. 14. RCW 29A.92.120 and 2018 c 113 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No action under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) may be brought by any person against a political subdivision that has adopted a remedy to its electoral system after an action is filed that is approved by a court pursuant to RCW 29A.92.070 or implemented a court-ordered remedy pursuant to RCW 29A.92.110 for four years after adoption of the remedy if the political subdivision does not enact a change to or deviation from the remedy during this four-year period that would otherwise give rise to an action under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)).

(2) No action under this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) may be brought by any person against a political subdivision that has adopted a remedy to its electoral system in the previous decade before June 7, 2018, as a result of a claim under the federal voting rights act until after the political subdivision completes redistricting pursuant to RCW 29A.76.010 for the 2020 decennial census.

Sec. 15. RCW 29A.92.710 and 2018 c 113 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) supersedes other state laws and local ordinances to the extent that those state laws or ordinances would otherwise restrict a jurisdiction's ability to comply with this chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)).

Sec. 16. RCW 29A.92.900 and 2018 c 113 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

This chapter ((113, Laws of 2018)) may be known and cited as the Washington voting rights act of 2018.

Sec. 17. RCW 41.04.665 and 2018 c 39 s 4 and 2017 c 173 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1) An agency head may permit an employee to receive leave under this section if:

(a)(i) The employee suffers from, or has a relative or household member suffering from, an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition which is of an extraordinary or severe nature;

(ii) The employee has been called to service in the uniformed services;

(iii) The employee is a current member of the uniformed services or is a veteran as defined under RCW 41.04.005, and is attending medical appointments or treatments for a service connected injury or disability;

(iv) The employee is a spouse of a current member of the uniformed services or a veteran as defined under RCW 41.04.005, who is attending medical appointments or treatments for a service connected injury or disability and requires assistance while attending appointment or treatment;

(v) A state of emergency has been declared anywhere within the United States by the federal or any state government and the employee has needed skills to assist in responding to the emergency or its aftermath and volunteers his or her services to either a governmental agency or to a nonprofit organization engaged in humanitarian relief in the devastated area, and the governmental agency or nonprofit organization accepts the employee's offer of volunteer services;

(vi) The employee is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking;

(((v)))(vii) The employee needs the time for parental leave; or

(((vi)))(viii) The employee is sick or temporarily disabled because of pregnancy disability;

(b) The illness, injury, impairment, condition, call to service, emergency volunteer service, or consequence of domestic violence, sexual assault, temporary layoff under section 3(5), chapter 32, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess., or stalking has caused, or is likely to cause, the employee to:

(i) Go on leave without pay status; or

(ii) Terminate state employment;

(c) The employee's absence and the use of shared leave are justified;

(d) The employee has depleted or will shortly deplete his or her:

(i) Annual leave and sick leave reserves if he or she qualifies under (a)(i) of this subsection;

(ii) Annual leave and paid military leave allowed under RCW 38.40.060 if he or she qualifies under (a)(ii) of this subsection;

(iii) Annual leave if he or she qualifies under (a) (v) or (vi) of this subsection; or

(iv) Annual leave and sick leave reserves if the employee qualifies under (a)(((v) or (vi)))(vii) or (viii) of this subsection. However, the employee is not required to deplete all of his or her annual leave and sick leave and can maintain up to forty hours of annual leave and forty hours of sick leave in reserve;

(e) The employee has abided by agency rules regarding:

(i) Sick leave use if he or she qualifies under (a)(i), (vi), (((v)))(vii), or (((vi)))(viii) of this subsection; or

(ii) Military leave if he or she qualifies under (a)(ii) of this subsection; and

(f) The employee has diligently pursued and been found to be ineligible for benefits under chapter 51.32 RCW if he or she qualifies under (a)(i) of this subsection.

(2) The agency head shall determine the amount of leave, if any, which an employee may receive under this section. However, an employee shall not receive a total of more than five hundred twenty-two days of leave, except that, a supervisor may authorize leave in excess of five hundred twenty-two days in extraordinary circumstances for an employee qualifying for the shared leave program because he or she is suffering from an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition which is of an extraordinary or severe nature. Shared leave received under the uniformed service shared leave pool in RCW 41.04.685 is not included in this total.

(3) The agency head must allow employees who are veterans, as defined under RCW 41.04.005, and their spouses, to access shared leave from the veterans' in-state service shared leave pool upon employment.

(4) An employee may transfer annual leave, sick leave, and his or her personal holiday, as follows:

(a) An employee who has an accrued annual leave balance of more than ten days may request that the head of the agency for which the employee works transfer a specified amount of annual leave to another employee authorized to receive leave under subsection (1) of this section. In no event may the employee request a transfer of an amount of leave that would result in his or her annual leave account going below ten days. For purposes of this subsection (4)(a), annual leave does not accrue if the employee receives compensation in lieu of accumulating a balance of annual leave.

(b) An employee may transfer a specified amount of sick leave to an employee requesting shared leave only when the donating employee retains a minimum of one hundred seventy-six hours of sick leave after the transfer.

(c) An employee may transfer, under the provisions of this section relating to the transfer of leave, all or part of his or her personal holiday, as that term is defined under RCW 1.16.050, or as such holidays are provided to employees by agreement with a school district's board of directors if the leave transferred under this subsection does not exceed the amount of time provided for personal holidays under RCW 1.16.050.

(5) An employee of an institution of higher education under RCW 28B.10.016, school district, or educational service district who does not accrue annual leave but does accrue sick leave and who has an accrued sick leave balance of more than twenty-two days may request that the head of the agency for which the employee works transfer a specified amount of sick leave to another employee authorized to receive leave under subsection (1) of this section. In no event may such an employee request a transfer that would result in his or her sick leave account going below twenty-two days. Transfers of sick leave under this subsection are limited to transfers from employees who do not accrue annual leave. Under this subsection, "sick leave" also includes leave accrued pursuant to RCW 28A.400.300(1)(b) or 28A.310.240(1) with compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies.

(6) Transfers of leave made by an agency head under subsections (4) and (5) of this section shall not exceed the requested amount.

(7) Leave transferred under this section may be transferred from employees of one agency to an employee of the same agency or, with the approval of the heads of both agencies, to an employee of another state agency.

(8) While an employee is on leave transferred under this section, he or she shall continue to be classified as a state employee and shall receive the same treatment in respect to salary, wages, and employee benefits as the employee would normally receive if using accrued annual leave or sick leave.

(a) All salary and wage payments made to employees while on leave transferred under this section shall be made by the agency employing the person receiving the leave. The value of leave transferred shall be based upon the leave value of the person receiving the leave.

(b) In the case of leave transferred by an employee of one agency to an employee of another agency, the agencies involved shall arrange for the transfer of funds and credit for the appropriate value of leave.

(i) Pursuant to rules adopted by the office of financial management, funds shall not be transferred under this section if the transfer would violate any constitutional or statutory restrictions on the funds being transferred.

(ii) The office of financial management may adjust the appropriation authority of an agency receiving funds under this section only if and to the extent that the agency's existing appropriation authority would prevent it from expending the funds received.

(iii) Where any questions arise in the transfer of funds or the adjustment of appropriation authority, the director of financial management shall determine the appropriate transfer or adjustment.

(9) Leave transferred under this section shall not be used in any calculation to determine an agency's allocation of full time equivalent staff positions.

(10)(a) The value of any leave transferred under this section which remains unused shall be returned at its original value to the employee or employees who transferred the leave when the agency head finds that the leave is no longer needed or will not be needed at a future time in connection with the illness or injury for which the leave was transferred or for any other qualifying condition. Unused shared leave may not be returned until one of the following occurs:

(i) The agency head receives from the affected employee a statement from the employee's doctor verifying that the illness or injury is resolved; or

(ii) The employee is released to full-time employment; has not received additional medical treatment for his or her current condition or any other qualifying condition for at least six months; and the employee's doctor has declined, in writing, the employee's request for a statement indicating the employee's condition has been resolved.

(b) If a shared leave account is closed and an employee later has a need to use shared leave due to the same condition listed in the closed account, the agency head must approve a new shared leave request for the employee.

(c) To the extent administratively feasible, the value of unused leave which was transferred by more than one employee shall be returned on a pro rata basis.

(11) An employee who uses leave that is transferred to him or her under this section may not be required to repay the value of the leave that he or she used.

(12) The director of financial management may adopt rules as necessary to implement subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 18. RCW 41.50.033 and 2007 c 493 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The director shall determine when interest, if provided by a plan, shall be credited to accounts in the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, or the Washington state patrol retirement system. The amounts to be credited and the methods of doing so shall be at the director's discretion, except that if interest is credited, it shall be done at least quarterly.

(2) Interest as determined by the director under this section is "regular interest" as defined in RCW 41.40.010(((15))), 41.32.010(((23))), 41.35.010(((12))), 41.37.010(((12))), 41.26.030(((23))), and 43.43.120(((8))).

(3) The legislature affirms that the authority of the director under RCW 41.40.020 and 41.50.030 includes the authority and responsibility to establish the amount and all conditions for regular interest, if any. The legislature intends chapter 493, Laws of 2007 to be curative, remedial, and retrospectively applicable.

Sec. 19. RCW 43.21B.300 and 2010 c 210 s 12 and 2010 c 84 s 4 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431, 70.95.315, 70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102 and chapter 90.76 RCW shall be imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified mail with return receipt requested or by personal service, to the person incurring the penalty from the department or the local air authority, describing the violation with reasonable particularity. For penalties issued by local air authorities, within thirty days after the notice is received, the person incurring the penalty may apply in writing to the authority for the remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the application, the authority may remit or mitigate the penalty upon whatever terms the authority in its discretion deems proper. The authority may ascertain the facts regarding all such applications in such reasonable manner and under such rules as it may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of information or factors not considered in setting the original penalty.

(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or authority thirty days after the date of receipt by the person penalized of the notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after the date of receipt of the notice of disposition by a local air authority of the application for relief from penalty.

(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:

(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;

(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition by a local air authority on application for relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or

(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the hearings board if the penalty is appealed.

(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.

(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), RCW 70.94.431, the disposition of which shall be governed by that provision, RCW 70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and elimination account created by RCW 70.105.180, RCW 90.56.330, which shall be credited to the coastal protection fund created by RCW 90.48.390, and RCW 90.76.080, which shall be credited to the underground storage tank account created by RCW 90.76.100.

Sec. 20. RCW 66.20.300 and 2014 c 78 s 2 and 2014 c 29 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 66.20.310 through 66.20.350 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Alcohol" has the same meaning as "liquor" in RCW 66.04.010.

(2) "Alcohol server" means any person who as part of his or her employment participates in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages for ((on-premise [on-premises]))on-premises consumption at a retail licensed premise as a regular requirement of his or her employment, and includes those persons eighteen years of age or older permitted by the liquor laws of this state to serve alcoholic beverages with meals.

(3) "Board" means the Washington state liquor ((control))and cannabis board.

(4) "Retail licensed premises" means any:

(a) Premises licensed to sell alcohol by the glass or by the drink, or in original containers primarily for consumption on the premises as authorized by this section and RCW 66.20.310, 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, 66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.690, 66.24.450, 66.24.570, 66.24.610, 66.24.650, ((and)) 66.24.655, and 66.24.680;

(b) Distillery licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.140 that is authorized to serve samples of its own production;

(c) Facility established by a domestic winery for serving and selling wine pursuant to RCW 66.24.170(4); and

(d) Grocery store licensed under RCW 66.24.360, but only with respect to employees whose duties include serving during tasting activities under RCW 66.24.363.

(5) "Training entity" means any liquor licensee associations, independent contractors, private persons, and private or public schools, that have been certified by the board.

Sec. 21. RCW 66.20.310 and 2014 c 29 s 3 and 2014 c 78 s 3 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1)(a) There is an alcohol server permit, known as a class 12 permit, for a manager or bartender selling or mixing alcohol, spirits, wines, or beer for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.

(b) There is an alcohol server permit, known as a class 13 permit, for a person who only serves alcohol, spirits, wines, or beer for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.

(c) As provided by rule by the board, a class 13 permit holder may be allowed to act as a bartender without holding a class 12 permit.

(2)(a) Effective January 1, 1997, except as provided in (d) of this subsection, every alcohol server employed, under contract or otherwise, at a retail licensed premise must be issued a class 12 or class 13 permit.

(b) Every class 12 and class 13 permit issued must be issued in the name of the applicant and no other person may use the permit of another permit holder. The holder must present the permit upon request to inspection by a representative of the board or a peace officer. The class 12 or class 13 permit is valid for employment at any retail licensed premises described in (a) of this subsection.

(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, no licensee holding a license as authorized by this section and RCW 66.20.300, 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, 66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.690, 66.24.450, 66.24.570, 66.24.600, 66.24.610, 66.24.650, ((and)) 66.24.655, and 66.24.680 may employ or accept the services of any person without the person first having a valid class 12 or class 13 permit.

(d) Within sixty days of initial employment, every person whose duties include the compounding, sale, service, or handling of liquor must have a class 12 or class 13 permit.

(e) No person may perform duties that include the sale or service of alcoholic beverages on a retail licensed premises without possessing a valid alcohol server permit.

(3) A permit issued by a training entity under this section is valid for employment at any retail licensed premises described in subsection (2)(a) of this section for a period of five years unless suspended by the board.

(4) The board may suspend or revoke an existing permit if any of the following occur:

(a) The applicant or permittee has been convicted of violating any of the state or local intoxicating liquor laws of this state or has been convicted at any time of a felony; or

(b) The permittee has performed or permitted any act that constitutes a violation of this title or of any rule of the board.

(5) The suspension or revocation of a permit under this section does not relieve a licensee from responsibility for any act of the employee or agent while employed upon the retail licensed premises. The board may, as appropriate, revoke or suspend either the permit of the employee who committed the violation or the license of the licensee upon whose premises the violation occurred, or both the permit and the license.

(6)(a) After January 1, 1997, it is a violation of this title for any retail licensee or agent of a retail licensee as described in subsection (2)(a) of this section to employ in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages, any person who does not have a valid alcohol server permit or whose permit has been revoked, suspended, or denied.

(b) It is a violation of this title for a person whose alcohol server permit has been denied, suspended, or revoked to accept employment in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages.

(7) Grocery stores licensed under RCW 66.24.360, the primary commercial activity of which is the sale of grocery products and for which the sale and service of beer and wine for on-premises consumption with food is incidental to the primary business, and employees of such establishments, are exempt from RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350, except for employees whose duties include serving during tasting activities under RCW 66.24.363.

Sec. 22. RCW 69.50.412 and 2013 c 3 s 22 and 2012 c 117 s 368 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1) It is unlawful for any person to use drug paraphernalia to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance other than marijuana. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) It is unlawful for any person to deliver, possess with intent to deliver, or manufacture with intent to deliver drug paraphernalia, knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will be used to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance other than marijuana. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(3) Any person eighteen years of age or over who violates subsection (2) of this section by delivering drug paraphernalia to a person under eighteen years of age who is at least three years his or her junior is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(4) It is unlawful for any person to place in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication any advertisement, knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that the purpose of the advertisement, in whole or in part, is to promote the sale of objects designed or intended for use as drug paraphernalia. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(5) It is lawful for any person over the age of eighteen to possess sterile hypodermic syringes and needles for the purpose of reducing blood-borne diseases.

Sec. 23. RCW 70.15.110 and 2018 c 184 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) No act or omission, except those acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, by a volunteer health practitioner registered and providing services within the provisions of this chapter shall impose any liability for civil damages resulting from such an act or omission upon:

(a) The ((emergency)) volunteer health practitioner;

(b) The supervisor or supervisors of the ((emergency)) volunteer health practitioner;

(c) Any facility or their officers or employees;

(d) The employer of the ((emergency)) volunteer health practitioner;

(e) The owner of the property or vehicle where the act or omission may have occurred;

(f) Any organization that registered the ((emergency)) volunteer health practitioner under the provisions of this chapter;

(g) The state or any state or local governmental entity; or

(h) Any professional or trade association of the ((emergency)) volunteer health practitioner.

(2) A person that, pursuant to this chapter, operates, uses, or relies upon information provided by a volunteer health practitioner registration system is not liable for damages for an act or omission relating to that operation, use, or reliance unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence, an intentional tort, or willful or wanton misconduct.

Sec. 24. RCW 70.305.010 and 2018 c 58 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adverse childhood experiences" means the following indicators of severe childhood stressors and family dysfunction that, when experienced in the first eighteen years of life and taken together, are proven by public health research to be powerful determinants of physical, mental, social, and behavioral health across the lifespan: Child physical abuse; child sexual abuse; child emotional abuse; child emotional or physical neglect; alcohol or other substance abuse in the home; mental illness, depression, or suicidal behaviors in the home; incarceration of a family member; witnessing intimate partner violence; and parental divorce or separation. Adverse childhood experiences have been demonstrated to affect the development of the brain and other major body systems.

(2) "Community public health and safety networks" or "networks" means the organizations authorized under RCW 70.190.060.

(3) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(4) "Evidence-based" has the same meaning as in RCW ((43.216.141))43.216.157.

(5) "Research-based" has the same meaning as in RCW ((43.216.141))43.216.157.

(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(7) "Secretary of children, youth, and families" means the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families.

Sec. 25. RCW 74.13.029 and 2011 c 89 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Once a dependency is established under chapter 13.34 RCW, the department employee assigned to the case shall provide the dependent child age twelve years and older with a document containing the information described in RCW 74.13.031(((16)))(18). The department employee shall explain the contents of the document to the child and direct the child to the department's web site for further information. The department employee shall document, in the electronic data system, that this requirement was met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26. A new section is added to chapter 74.14B RCW to read as follows:

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families.

--- END ---