BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 9.41.094 (Waiver of confidentiality) and 2018 c 201 s 6004 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 411;

(2) RCW 9.41.094 (Waiver of confidentiality) and 2019 c 3 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 1639, approved November 6, 2018), 2018 c 201 s 6004, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 411;

(3) RCW 9.41.097 (Supplying information on persons purchasing pistols or applying for concealed pistol licenses) and 2018 c 201 s 6005, 2009 c 216 s 6, 2005 c 274 s 202, 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 412, & 1983 c 232 s 5; and

(4) RCW 9.41.097 (Supplying information on the eligibility of persons to possess firearms, purchase a pistol or semiautomatic assault rifle, or be issued a concealed pistol license) and 2019 c 3 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 1639, approved November 6, 2018), 2018 c 201 s 6005, 2009 c 216 s 6, 2005 c 274 s 202, 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 412, & 1983 c 232 s 5.

--- END ---