BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 9.41.360 (Unsafe storage of a firearm) and 2019 c 3 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 1639, approved November 6, 2018); and

(2) RCW 9.41.365 (Firearm security and storage—Requirements for dealers) and 2019 c 3 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 1639, approved November 6, 2018).

--- END ---